To whom did the Virgin Mary allegedly appear in 1858 in Lourdes France?
What is in front of the Notre Dame Main Building?
The Basilica of the Sacred heart at Notre Dame is beside to which structure?
What is the Grotto at Notre Dame?
What sits on top of the Main Building at Notre Dame?
When did the Scholastic Magazine of Notre dame begin publishing?
How often is Notre Dame's the Juggler published?
What is the daily student paper at Notre Dame called?
How many student news papers are found at Notre Dame?
In what year did the student paper Common Sense begin publication at Notre Dame?
Where is the headquarters of the Congregation of the Holy Cross?
What is the primary seminary of the Congregation of the Holy Cross?
What is the oldest structure at Notre Dame?
What individuals live at Fatima House at Notre Dame?
Which prize did Frederick Buechner create?
What entity provides help with the management of time for new students at Notre Dame?
How many colleges for undergraduates are at Notre Dame?
What was created at Notre Dame in 1962 to assist first year students?
Which organization declared the First Year of Studies program at Notre Dame "outstanding?"
What institute at Notre Dame studies  the reasons for violent conflict?
What is the title of Notre Dame's Theodore Hesburgh?
In what year was the Joan B. Kroc Institute for International Peace Studies founded?
To whom was John B. Kroc married?
What company did Ray Kroc own?
How many stories tall is the main library at Notre Dame?
What is the name of the main library at Notre Dame?
In what year was the Theodore M. Hesburgh Library at Notre Dame finished?
Which artist created the mural on the Theodore M. Hesburgh Library?
What is a common name to reference the mural created by Millard Sheets at Notre Dame?
How many incoming students did Notre Dame admit in fall 2015?
What percentage of students were admitted to Notre Dame in fall 2015?
Where does Notre Dame rank in terms of academic profile among research universities in the US?
What percentage of students at Notre Dame participated in the Early Action program?
How many miles does the average student at Notre Dame travel to study there?
Where did U.S. News & World Report rank Notre Dame in its 2015-2016 university rankings?
Forbes.com placed Notre Dame at what position compared to other US research universities?
The undergrad school at the Mendoza College of Business was ranked where according to BusinessWeek?
In 2014 what entity named Notre Dame 10th best of all American universities?
What percentage of Notre Dame students decide to study abroad?
In what year did Albert Zahm begin comparing aeronatical models at Notre Dame?
Which professor sent the first wireless message in the USA?
In what year did Jerome Green send his first wireless message?
Which individual worked on projects at Notre Dame that eventually created neoprene?
What did the brother of John Zahm construct at Notre Dame?
Work on a germ-free-life ended up in the creation of which Notre Dame institute?
Around what time did Lobund of Notre Dame become independent?
In what year did Lobund at Notre Dame become an Institute?
The Lobund Institute was merged into the Department of Biology at Notre Dame in what year?
When did study of a germ-free-life begin at Notre Dame?
Gurian created what in 1939 at Notre Dame?
What was the Review of Politics inspired by?
Over how many years did Gurian edit the Review of Politics at Notre Dame?
Thomas Stritch was an editor of which publican from Notre Dame?
What percentage of undergrads live on the Notre Dame campus?
How many student housing areas are reserved for Notre Dame's graduate students?
How many dorms for males are on the Notre Dame campus?
What amount of the graduate student body at Notre Dame live on the campus?
There are how many dorms for females at Notre Dame?
What is Congregation of Holy Cross in Latin?
What percentage of Notre Dame students feel they are Christian?
How often is Catholic mass held at Notre Dame in a week?
How many chapels are on the Notre Dame campus?
What amount of the student body of Notre Dame identifies as Catholic?
What was the music hall at Notre Dame called?
In what year was the Main Building at Notre Dame razed in a fire?
Who was the president of Notre Dame in 1879?
On what date was the rebuilding of The Main Building begun at Notre Dame after the fire that claimed the previous?
What did the Science Hall at Notre Dame come to be known as?
What type of education was pushed at Notre Dame before its embracing of national standards?
Which college did Notre Dame add in 1921?
In 1919 a new president of Notre Dame was named, who was it?
Over how many years did the change to national standards undertaken at Notre Dame in the early 20th century take place?
Those who attended a Jesuit college may have been forbidden from joining which Law School due to the curricula at the Jesuit institution?
Which person became vice-president of Notre Dame in 1933?
Who was the president of Notre Dame in 1934?
Irvin Abell was given what award by Notre Dame?
Which year was the Laetare Medal first given out at Notre Dame?
For whos glory did Father O'Hara believed that the Notre Dame football team played?
Around the time that Rev. Cavanaugh became president of Notre Dame by how much did the undergrad student body of Notre Dame increase?
Which institute involving animal life did Cavanaugh create at Notre Dame?
What is O'Shaughnessy Hall of Notre Dame formerly known as?
Which president did Notre Dame have in 1947?
Outside of an institute studying animals, what other institute did Cavanugh create at Notre Dame?
What type of educational institute is Hesburgh given credit for creating at Notre Dame?
Which role did Charles Sheedy have at Notre Dame?
What title did Thomas Blantz have at Notre Dame?
In what year did Notre Dame have its earliest undergraduate that was female?
With what institute did Notre Dame agree to an exchange program in the 1960s?
When did John Jenkins become the president of Notre Dame?
In terms of the amount of presidents Notre Dame has had, where is John Jenkins on the list?
Who was the Notre Dame president that preceded John Jenkins?
Which arena was constructed under Jenkins at Notre Dame?
How much money was spent on enhancing Notre Dame Stadium under John Jenkins?
Which congregation is in charge of the Old College at Notre Dame?
What structure is found on the location of the original church of Father Sorin at Notre Dame?
In which architectural style is the Basilica of the Sacred Heart at Notre Dame made?
Which individual painted the inside of the Basilica of the Sacred Heart at Notre Dame?
In what year was the Grotto of Our Lady of Lourdes at Notre Dame constructed?
Which person oversaw the creation of a science hall at Notre Dame in 1883?
In what year did the student union building at Notre Dame get renamed to LaFortune Center?
After which individual was the LaFortune Center Notre Dame named?
How large in square feet is the LaFortune Center at Notre Dame?
What is the annual budget of Notre Dame's LaFortune Center?
How many halls are at Notre Dame that house students?
Which library was built at Notre Dame in 1963?
How many books are housed at the Theodore Hesburgh Library?
Construction for which hall started on March 8th 2007 at Notre Dame?
Which baseball stadium is found at Notre Dame?
In what year did Notre Dame create the Office of Sustainability?
What percentage of the food served at Notre Dame is locally grown?
Notre Dame got a "B" for its sustainability practices from which entity?
Gustavo Gutierrez is faculty of which institute?
In what year did Notre Dame first have a facility in England?
At which location is the London Center operated by Notre Dame found?
Notre Dame has a center in Beijing, what is it referred to as?
In what year did the Suffolk Street location start to house a Notre Dame facility?
What was Notre Dame's first college?
In what year was the The College of Arts and Letters at Notre Dame created?
In what year did the College of Arts and Letters at Notre Dame grant its first degree?
On which university did Notre Dame base its curriculum on?
How many BA majors does the College of Arts and Letters at Notre Dame offer?
In 1899 Notre Dame formed which college?
In what building is the current School of Architecture housed at Notre Dame?
What length is the course of study at the Notre Dame School of Architecture?
In which location do students of the School of Architecture of Notre Dame spend their 3rd year?
Which prestigious prize does the School of Architecture at Notre Dame give out?
In what year did the opening of a theology library at Notre Dame occur?
Where is the theology library at Notre Dame?
How many books are held by the Notre Dame libraries?
Currently where does Notre Dame's library rank in the nation?
What caused Notre Dame to become notable in the early 20th century?
Which 20th century Notre Dame football coach is most notable?
Which athletic association are the student athletes at Notre Dame a part of?
How many students at Notre Dame received the Heisman Trophy?
There were multiple students from Notre Dame who entered the Pro Football Hall of Fame, how many?
Where among US universities does Notre Dame rank?
How many individual colleges are part of Notre Dame?
Which prize does the Architecture School at Notre Dame give out?
How many doctorate and masters programs are available at Notre Dame?
Which art museum does Notre Dame administer?
In what year did the initial degrees get handed out at Notre Dame?
In what year did the original Sorin built Main Building get replaced?
Which individual began a library at Notre Dame?
In what year had the library at Notre Dame reach 10,000 books?
In what year was the library at Notre Dame started?
Which television station finds its home at Notre Dame?
How many programs did NDtv feature in 2002?
Which radio station provides radio to the students of Notre Dame at 88.9 FM?
Which internet radio station of Notre Dame is served as an internet stream?
How much is Eddy Street Commons at Notre Dame expected to cost?
When was ground broke on the Eddy Street Commons Project of Notre Dame?
Who is the developer of Eddy Street Commons?
Which entity did Notre Dame hire to build a parking structure outside of Eddy Street Commons?
There were protested as a part of the construction at Eddy Street Commons, they came due tot he hiring of whom?
Who currently provides uniforms to Notre Dame sport teams?
What is the value of the contract between Under Armour and Notre Dame?
When did the Notre Dame marching band form?
What is notable about the Notre Dame marching band?
What is the Notre Dame fight song?
Which team did Notre Dame's football team find inspiration from?
In what year did Notre Dame football begin?
What university is Notre Dame tied with in terms of most Heisman Trophy winners?
Against which team does Notre Dame compete for the Jeweled Shillelagh?
In terms of Notre Dame students in the College Football Hall of Fame the amount of students named is what ?
What is displayed at Zahm House for football home games at Notre Dame?
What occurs at midnight preceding a football home game at Notre Dame?
From where does the Band of the Fighting Irish lead a march to the Notre Dame Stadium for football home games?
What songs does the trumpet section of the Band of the Fighting Irish play preceding home football games?
On what day do Notre Dame home football games occur?
Who wrote the original lyrics to the Notre Dame Victory March?
In what year did Michael J. Shea graduate from Notre Dame?
Who is responsible for writing the music for "Notre Dame Victory March?"
In what year did "Notre Dame Victory March" get copyrighted?
To where are the loyal sons in "Notre Dame Fight Song" marching?
Ronald Reagan had a nickname, what was it?
In what film did a parody of the "Win one for the Gipper" speech appear?
Who starred as Daniel Ruettiger in the film Rudy?
Which person was a former comrade to Ted Striker in the film Airplane!?
Pat O'Brien portrayed which person in the film Knute Rockne?
Which Secretary of State attended Notre Dame?
Which Notre Dame alum from the College of Science won a Nobel Prize?
Who is the current president of Notre Dame?
Mariel Zagunis is notable for winning what?
Which notable astronaut is known to have attended Notre Dame?
When was the state song composed?
How much of the states population does the "Big 7" have?
How many counties does Montana have?
What city in Montana has over 100,000 people?
What two cities have a population over 50,000?
What is the total area of Montana?
What state does Montana border to the south?
What state does it border to the west?
Where are most of the states mountain ranges?
How much of the state is prarie?
Which direction do the rivers flow near the Triple Divide Peak?
How high is the Beartooth Plateau?
What is thie highest point in the state?
How high is Granite Peak?
How many seats do Democrats hold in the state US Senate's seats?
How long has the single congressional district been Republican?
What is the split in the state Senate controller by the Republicans?
In elections, what is Montana considered?
What year was the last Democrat for president supported?
How often has Montana voted for a Democratic governor?
How often does Montana voted for a Democratic president?
What is the name of the busiest airport in Montana?
When did Bozeman Airport surpass Billings Logan as the largest busiest in Montana?
What is the states largest railway?
How long have railroads been important since in Montana
What is the name of the big game hunting foundation in Montana?
What season is black bear hunting allowed?
What two predators can be hunted in specific numbers?
Since when has Montana been a destination for trout fisheries?
What fishing organization has its home here?
What type of fisheries does the state have?
What Robert Redford movie was shot here in 1002?
When was the Montana Territory formed?
When was the first formal school on record?
How much were students charged per week?
When did the first public school in Virginia City formed?
How many miles of rivers are known for high class trout?
What Bay do rivers from Montana feed?
What ocean do rivers flow into from Montana?
What rivers form the Missouri River?
Near where do the rivers form up for the Missouri river merging?
Which direction does the water flow in this area?
Which year was the Fort Peck Reservoir designated a National Scenic River?
Which direction does the Yellowstone River flow through the national park?
Where does the Yellowstone meet the Missouri river?
How many named lakes are there in Montana?
What is the name of the largest freshwater lake in western United States?
What is the name of the largest reservoir in the state?
What river is the Fort Peck Reservoir on?
About how much area do forests cover the state?
What is the annual precipitation?
How much precipitation does Heron recieve?
How much precipitation does the  Grinnell Glacier recieve?
What is the largest European-American race in Montana?
What was Helena originally founded as?
What percentage of the population in Montana are Native peoples?
What three counties are Native Americans a majority?
Between what years did the Native population increase by 27.9%
In what year did many cities in Montana set heat records?
What month was the hottest ever recorded?
What problem has substantially increased in its severity?
What year was the Hellgate treaty formed?
Who negotiated the Hellgate treaty?
What year was the treaty ratified?
What did the treaty establish?
What was the name of the first US Army post?
Where was Camp Cooke situated?
What year was the Great Sioux War?
What year did the Battle of Bear Paw happen?
What is the official language of Montana?
What percentage of the population in Montana speak English?
What is the second most common language spoken in Montana?
How about many Spanish speakers are there in the state?
ABout how many people in the state of Montana speak Cheyenne?
What percent of the state is White?
What percent of the state is Native American Indian?
Hispanics account for what percentage of Monatanas population?
What was the population of the state in 2015?
How much did the population increase since 2010?
What county saw the largest growth?
What city saw the largest growth?
What year was Jeannette Rankin vote against war the first time?
When did she vote a second time against war?
About how many bison were in Montana in 1870?
In 1884 about how many bison remained?
Who pleaded to Congress for slaughtering bison?
What year did General Sheridan approach Congress about killing bison?
When did the Northern Pacific Railroad reach Montana from the west?
When did the Northern Pacific Railroad reach Montana from the east?
What years were the railroad challenged by Chief Sitting Bull?
What year was the Great White Sioux War?
When was the transcontinental National Pacific Railroad finished?
When was the first constitutional convention held in Montana?
Why was this constitutional convention held?
When was the second constitutional convention held?
What year was Montana's statehood approved?
What other three states were approved in the same year?
What year did the Homestead Act provide land to settlers?
How much land did the Homestead Act allow?
What year was the first homestead claim claimed?
When was the Desert Land Act passed?
How much land did the Desert Land Act allot?
How much was the charge per acre at first?
Who promoted settlement in Montana in the early 1900s
In what year was the Reclamation Act passed?
What year was the Enlarged Homestead Act passed?
How much land was alloted in the new Enlarged Homestead Act?
When did Congress pass the Espionage Act?
When was the Sedition Act passed?
What were these acts make do to laws?
How many people were arrested from the Montana Act?
How many of the 200 arrested in the Montana Act were convicted?
How many Montanans entered the miltary in the first year of the war?
How many Montanans joined the military in the war total?
About how many Montanans  died in the war?
Who trained at the military grounds in Montana?
Where were air bases built in Montana?
Two bodies of the United Nations agreed with what restricted provision in defining genocide?
A definition of what, by the States, was necessary to preserve and expand genocidal law?
Which country's courts were noted by the ECHR for taking a wider stance on provisions of genocide laws?
The ECHR found most states to have largely undefined definitions of group destruction, despite what factor?
In its preparations, what was the source of other considerations by the ECHR?
In 1948, what general assembly resolution established genocide as a prosecutable act? 
In which war-era country was the Holocaust immortalized? 
Following World War II, whose bid was successful in establishing the worldwide acceptance and the nascent legal definition of genocide?
Which group convened officially for the first time in 1946?
While recognizing genocide, what did the UN General Assembly fail to do in its resolution?
Which group was accused by the ECHR of having an overly constricted idea of the meaning of destruction in defining genocide?
What groups did the ECHR feel should be included as potential victims of genocide?
In 2007 what former case did the European Court of Human Rights draw on to further refine qualifiers of genocide?
What form of destruction was considered too limited by a smaller group of experts?
What has been the primary focus in the study of genocide?
In prosecuting genocide, what must the act be formally acknowledged as?
In a general aspect, what is genocide viewed as?
In trials of genocidal crimes, what responsibly party is difficult to prosecute? 
Long before genocide was established as a legal term, what treaty was in place to protect various groups from persecution and mass killings?
Why does genocide often go unpunished?
Who was the Peace of Westphalia designed to protect?
What year was the Peace of Westphalia signed?
When was the word "genocide" first used?
What is the etymology of the term "genocide"?
What is the definition of genocide?
Who coined the term "genocide"?
Who referred to acts of genocide in 1941?
The word "genocide" was unknown until what year?
In 1941, how did Winston Churchill refer to the mass killings of Russian prisoners of war?
What was the name of the Polish-Jewish lawyer who first described Nazi atrocities as "genocide?" 
What is the etymological basis of the word "genocide?"
As it pertains to violent crimes against targeted groups, what is the ultimate motivation within the actions of genocide?
Several considerations were involved in meeting the requirement to determine what?  
What is the key aspect of the targeted part of the group at the starting point of the inquiry? 
The number of people targeted in a genocide should not be solely evaluated by what?
In addition to the numeric size of a targeted group, what other consideration was useful to the ICTY?
On which date did the Genocide Convention become effective?
What was the minimum number of countries necessary to form parties? 
Of the five permanent members of the UN Security Council, how many were parties to the treaty?
What member ratified in 1970?
The delay in support by certain powerful members meant the Convention was largely powerless for over how many decades?
Harff and Gurr's definition of genocide included the promotion and execution of what, by a state or its agents?
Harff and Gurr further defined what in terms of ethnicity, religion or nationality?
What was important to Harff and Gurr to distinguish from genocides?
Along with ethnicity and and religion, what other characteristic defined a member of a victimized group?
What did Harff define as "short-lived outbursts by mobs...?"
In the writings of Rummel, what is the first and ordinary meaning of genocide?
Rummel postulates that murder of people of government is due to national, ethnic, racial and which other membership?
The legal meaning of genocide is contained in which international treaty?
Included in the CPPCG is non-killings that ultimately achieve what end?
In the interpretation of non-killings, the CPPCG cites the forceful relocation of children along with what other factor?
In terms of failed states and non-state actors, the possession of weapons of mass destruction was an issue examined by which writer?
In Gallagher's definition of genocide, a source of what is malicious in it implementation of the destruction of a group? 
Gallagher's definition upholds the centrality of what?
The centrality of intent broadens what definition, beyond the 1948 one?
In order for a genocide classification to happen, a major part of a group has to be what?
What court was established under the aegis of the United Nations to prosecute genocidal crimes in Rwanda?
The prosecutorial efforts of the ICTR focused on genocidal acts that took place during which time period?
the ICTR was created in November 1995 by which branch of the UN?
The ICTR was established for the purpose of convicting those responsible for acts of genocide and what other charges?
The charges of genocide brought up by the ICTR were against what group of people?
What has been widely debated as a possible act of genocide in Sudan?
In 2003 what well known U.S. Secretary of State declared the situation in Darfur as an act of genocide?
In front of which committee did Powell testify?
What did UN Security Council Resolution 1564 authorize in 2004?
Despite some concessions, what act did the Commission ultimately state that Sudan had not pursued?
To whom did the Security Council officially refer the situation in Darfur?
What was taken into account, without mentioning specific crimes?
China and what other permanent member of the Security Council abstained from the vote on the referral resolution?
In which number report to the Council did the Prosecutor concede that crimes had been committed but evidence for prosecution was insufficient?
In the build-up to genocide, what have other authors focused on?
What processes are thought to create an evolution toward genocide?
Who revealed the starting points of this evolution to be economic deterioration and political confusion?
A history of what is just one factor that contributes to the probability of violence developing into genocide?
What is one preventive effort in circumventing conditions that lead to genocide?
What does the potency of antibacterials depend upon?
What does this eliminate?
What does the bactericidal activitty of antibacterials depend on what?
What besides ongoing metabolic activity is required in bactericidal activity?
What does the activity of antibacterials depends on?
What does a successful treatment using antibiotics entail?
How do you predict the clinical result?
What do anitibiotics mostly target?
Which two types of antibiotics target the cell wall?
Which type of antibiotic goes after the cell membrane?
What 3 types go after protein synthesis?
Besides sprectrum of activity and chemical structure, how can antibacterial antibiotics classified?
What is another name used for bacterial cell wall?
whats another word for cell membrane?
How many new classes of antibacterial antibiotics was introduced in the late 2000's/
What three ways are antibiotics classified?
What is one disease that has been nearly eradicated thanks to vaccines and antibiotics?
What is one issue that can arise from overuse of antibiotics?
What organization called antimicrobial resistance a 'serious threat?'
In which century were antibiotics first introduced?
What can be affected by issues resulting from overuse of antibiotics?
What does there medicines do for livestock?
What organization classifies this as a current serious threat in the whole world??
In what century did antibiotics revolutionized medicine?
Besides antimicrobial, what did the overused medicine cause? 
What other medicine worked along antibiotics to eradicate diseases like tuberculosis?
When did antibiotics revolutinzed medicine?
What happened when antibiotics was over used in livestock?
What organization stated that the world has this serious problem?
What regions in the world does this apply in?
When were antibiotics created?
What is a common problem in antibiotic use?
Who else uses antibiotics besides the medical industry?
What disease did antibiotics help eliminate?
What is one kind of therapy that may be used when a patience has an infection, but it has not been identified?
Where do doctors perform microorganism identification testing?
What kinds of antibiotics are most commonly used for empirical therapy?
At what stage does a doctor begin empirical therapy?
How long does the identification process take?
What happens when a doctor doesn't know the microorganism yet?
What happens in empirical therapy?
When is empirical started?
What are two examples of minor side effects caused by some antibiotics?
What causes diarrhea?
What negative effects can antibiotics have on the vaginal area?
What is one example of antibiotics that may have a possible side effect of tendon damage?
What is one possible serious side effect of over-using antibiotics?
What are antibiotics screened for on mammals and humans?
What do antibiotics need approval for?
What besides the individual patient is targeted when antibiotics is being used?
Photodermatitis, nausea, allergic reactions and anaphylaxis are all what type of side effect?
What was altered during the hypothesis of indiscriminate use of antibiotics?
Why are antibiotics checked before use?
Name some adverse effects?
Name some side-effects?
What can happen to vaginal flora?
What can happen when antibiotics are used with other drugs?
Do antibiotics interact with birth control pills?
What percentage of birth control pill failure is attributed to antibiotics?
What are the potential effects on intestinal flora?
Have these potential effects been proven through testing?
What do physicians recommend to counteract this potential issue?
What do antibiotics interfere with?
What percent is the  failure rate of contraceptive pills?
Whhat does intestinal flora reduce?
In therapy, what does the antibacterial interact with?
Do antibiotics mess with birth control pills?
What should women do if they are using antibiotics and birth control pills?
What is birth control failure rate due to antibiotics?
What is one potential issue with drinking alcohol while taking antibiotics?
Do all antibiotics interact dangerously with alcohol?
Is it OK to drink alcohol while taking any antibiotic?
How common is the belief that alcohol and antibiotics should never be mixed?
What can alcohol and certain antibiotics cause?
What is unlikely to interfere with  with many common antibiotics?
What belief should bever be mixed widespread?
What common drug can reduce antibiotic effectiveness?
What type of antibiotic is most likely to be a problem with alcohol?
Should alcohol be used while on antibiotics?
What is part of hje the make up of bacterial strains?
What is exchanged between between bacterial strains or species via plasmids that have this resistance?
What can be absent from the bacterial genome?
When does the spread of antibacterial resistance frequently occurs/
What does some resistance come from?
What method of spread can occur in antibacterial resistance?
What do plasmids do in resistance?
What are strains that are resistant to antibiotics called sometimes?
What was a once almost controlled disease that is coming back do to resistance?
How many new infections of resistant TB are reported per year?
What is the acronym used to describe resistant TB?
What are the two biggest reasons for resistance?
What is a common method of misuse?
What is an example of bad treatment causing resistance?
What is a way of improperly using antibiotics for those traveling?
What can happen if a doctor doesn't prescribe to a person's weight and prior use?
What are 3 other common forms of bad antibiotic practices?
What happens when a cold is treated with antibiotics?
What do doctors usually do when a patient seems to want antibiotics even though they may not be right?
What is the name of a US government agency tasked with trying to stop improper use of antibiotics?
Which agencies control this task force?
When did the French start going after overuse of antibiotics?
When did the EU ban antibiotics for speeding up growth?
What report caused the UK to worry about resistance?
What 3 US organizations have called for the banning of antibiotics in the production of food animals?
Name two US bills that want to ban antibiotics in food production?
What 3 medical associations supported the bills?
What besides sick people are antibiotics used for?
When was resistance first discussed as a problem in the raising of farm animals?
When did a district court order the FDA to stop approving antibiotics in animals?
What methods did people use before antibiotics to treat infections?
When were some kinds of antimicrobials first used?
What type of things did Egyptians and Greeks use?
What does antibiosis mean?
Who came up with the term antibiosis?
What type of organism has been reported to have worked on infections?
Who noticed in a lab the antibacterial characteristics of mold?
What mold did Fleming notice had antibacterial properties?
What did Fleming initially think a good use would be for it?
What was the first available antibiotic?
What company developed Prontosil?
Who led the team that came up with Prontosil?
What prize did Domagk get for his work?
What was the first antibiotic developed from nature?
When was tyrothricin created?
What also happened in 1939 besides tyrothricin?
Who discovered tyrothricin?
What was tyrothricin used for during the war?
When was penicillin G first purified?
When did penicillin G become available outside of military use?
Who came up with a way to quickly produce penicillin?
When was the chemical make-up of penicillin discovered?
Who discovered the chemical structure of penicillin?
What do vaccines need to work?
What type of vaccines have saved millions of lives?
What types of vaccines have been phased out?
What has been talked about to treat resistant bacteria?
How have researchers been doing this?
What is a worry of using phages?
How many antibiotics have been created in the last 7 years?
How many are in the pipelin to fight GNB?
What year did the Infectious Disease Society of America say that production of new antibiotics does not keep up with resistance?
Who regulates antibiotic approval?
What could help to spur pharmaceuticals to make new antibiotics?
What are resistant bacteria called in the media?
Who is a director at the Pew Charitable Trusts?
Where did Chopin create the majority of his compositions?
Chopin is a native of what country?
He had a non-direct association with what?
Chopin is closely associated with what era?
Where did Chopin create most of his works?
Chopin was indirectly related to what?
Chopin is considered a prominent symbol of what?
When did Chopin's family move to Warsaw?
Where did Chopin's father get a teaching position?
What instruments did Chopin's father play?
What instrument did Chopin's mother teach?
How old was Chopin when his family moved to Warsaw?
What language did Chopin's father teach?
What two instruments did Chopin's father play?
What instrument did Chopin's mother teach at the boarding house?
Where did Chopin live with his family in Warsaw?
In what year was the Saxon Palace taken by the Russian governor for use regarding the military?
What establishment today contains what was known as the Warsaw Lyceum during that time?
The Saxon Palace was taken over for military use in what year?
The Warsaw Lyceum was moved to where?
As a child Chopin was invited to play with the son of whom?
What did Chopin create for Grand Duke Constantine?
In one of his works who affirmed the popularity of Chopin as a child?
What was the place Chopin was invited to as a friend of ruler's son?
What is the title and name of the ruler whose son Chopin was friends with?
What type of musical piece did Chopin compose for his friend's ruling father?
Who wrote in 1818 about the popularity of Chopin?
When did Chopin reach Paris?
By not going back to Poland Chopin became part of what?
In what year did Chopin become a French citizen?
What is the name of Chopin's biographer?
After 1831, what country did Chopin never return to?
What country's passport did he have from 1835?
What language was Chopin never completely at ease speaking?
What biographer of Chopin wrote that Chopin never considered himself French?
Due to the numbers of expatriates of Poland after the uprising, what did it become to be known as?
How many doctors visited Chopin?
What month did Chopin's piano arrive?
What did Chopin compalin about?
What did Chopin have a hard time getting delivered to Majorca?
What month did Chopin's Pleyel piano arrive in Majorca?
Who did Chopin send his Preludes to?
What was the name of the single piece of work he wrote in 1844?
What can be said of these works compared to his work in other years even though the quantity was less?
How many pieces did Chopin write in 1841?
How many pieces did Chopin compose in 1842?
What piece did Chopin compose in 1844?
How many works did Chopin write in 1842?
How many works did Chopin write in 1843?
How many works did Chopin write in 1845?
In what month and year did Chopin give his final performance?
With whom did Chopin perform his final concert?
When did Chopin last perform?
Who did Chopin last perform with?
Plitical strife, popularity decline, instability of era and fewer students caused Chopin to what?
Who did Chopin have at his last Parisian concert in 1848?
What instrument did Auguste Franchomme play?
What was the name of the 1945 movie released about Chopin?
What is the name of the actor who received and Oscar nomination for his role as Chopin?
What year was  La valse de l'adieu released?
Who starred as Chopin in Impromptu?
Chopins relations with whom have been fictionalized in movies?
What 1945 film was a fictionalized accounting of the relationship between Chopin and Sand?
Who portrayed Chopin in A Song to Remember?
Who portrayed Chopin in the 1928 film, La valse de l'adieu?
Who portrayed Chopin in the 1991 film, Impromptu?
When was the first fictionalized account of Chopin's life?
Where was the first fictionalized account of Chopin's life created?
Who is responsible for the first fictionalized account of Chopin's life?
What is thought to be the first fictionalized work about Chopin?
What style is the fictionalized "Chopin" in?
Who wrote the fictionalized "Chopin?"
When was the fictionalized "Chopin" produced?
Where was the fictionalized "Chopin" produced?
What is the name of the event that The Warsaw Chopin Society holds?
On Chopin's 200th anniversary critics of what publication made recommendations on recordings of Chopin's work?
Who organizes the Grand prix du disque de F. Chopin for notable Chopin recordings?
Upon Chopin's bicentenary, who recommended a list of who should perform Chopin?
What year was the earliest Chopin recording created?
What is the title of the earliest known recording of Chopin's work?
Who played the earlier known recording of Chopin's work?
What has stated that every pianist in the recording era has used Chopin's music?
When did Pabst record his Chopin performance?
Who has given a discography of pianists' representation of Chopin's pedagogic style?
What is the name of the oldest music essay competition?
What year was the International Chopin Piano Competition founded?
Where is the International Chopin Piano Competition held?
How often is the International Chopin Piano Competition held?
The Fryderyk Chopin Institute of Poland includes approximately how many recordings of Chopin's work from Youtube?
What is the world's oldest monographic music competition?
When was the International Chopin Piano Competition established?
There are over 80 societies throughout the world that have been established because of Chopin and his music according to who?
How many known works of Chopin's music were on YouTube up to the beginning of 2014?
Where did Chopin head to during the Revolution of 1848?
Who provided the majority of funds for his concert tour in London?
Where did Chopin go in the spring of 1848?
What two people suggested the 1848 tour?
Who paid for most of the 1848 music tour of Chopin?
What was happening in April 1848 in Paris?
What was Jane Stirling's national heritage?
When did Chopin last appear in public?
Where was Chopin's last public performance?
Who were the beneficiaries of his last public concert?
What was the diagnosis of Chopin's health condition at this time?
Where was Chopin's last public performance?
Who did Chopin play for while she sang?
In 1849 where did Chopin live?
Who was anonymously paying for Chopin's apartment?
When did Chopin return to Paris?
Chopin accompanied which singer for friends?
Where did his friends found Chopin an apartment in 1849?
Who paid for Chopin's apartment in Chaillot?
When did Jenny Lind visit Chopin?
What is listed as Chopin's official cause of death?
What was the name of Chopin's doctor?
What has the Polish government not allowed to find true cause of death?
What was the cause of death on Chopin's death certificate?
Who was Chopin's physician?
Other possiblities for Chopin's death include cirrhosis, alpha 1-antitrypsin deficiency, and what?
Where was Chopin's funeral held?
How long was Chopin's funeral delayed?
How many people arrived for Chopin's funeral?
Where was Chopin's funeral held?
How long was Chopin's funeral delayed?
How many people arrived without an invitation?
How many of Chopin's works still exist?
All of his pieces include what instrument?
How many Chopin pieces are known to have survived?
Whose piano method did Chopin teach his students?
Whose piano method did Chopin use with his students?
Who did Chopin say were the two most important composers in his own music influences?
Chopin looked to Beethoven, Mozart, Clementi and who for his own music education?
How many polonaises were published while Chopin lived?
How many polonaises were published after Chopin died?
Chopin was credited for making what more internationally known?
What is different about Chopin's waltzes versus a ballroom waltz?
What did Chopin add to the modern dance of his era?
Chopin's Polish dance music was developed for what type of hall?
What was Chopin responsible for making popular with Euorpeans?
How many Chopin polonaises were published after his death?
What dance music of Chopin was written more for recitals than ballrooms?
What is central to Chopin's process?
Rosen suggests that a central part of Chopin's uniqueness is how he handles what?
What is central to Chopin's creativeness?
Who wrote that "improvisation is designed for an audience"?
What piece does J. Barrie Jones pinpoint as a great example of Chopin's palette?
What does J. Barrie Jones feel stands supreme of Chopin's concert pieces?
What form does Temperley feel that Chopin's ballades and scherzos are based on?
Chopin's mazurkas contain more of what than his other compositions? 
What form are Chopin's mazurkas and waltzes in?
Which of Chopin's works shows more folk aspects?
What type of bass do Chopin's mazurkas exhibit?
What does Chopin's Op. 63 No. 3 have that is rare?
What time are Chopin's polonaises written in?
Chopin's ability to create an advanced polonasises surpassed even two of his teachers, Zywny and who?
Chopin's polonaise often have what kind of rhythm in their melodies?
Chopin's polonaises needed what kind of playing technique?
How many nocturnes did Chopin compose?
What is it about the middle of Chopin's nocturnes that increases their drama?
Chopin's nocturnes were more structured than who?
What year did Chopin meet Field?
Which type of Chopin's compositons were difficult for perfomers due to their middle sections?
Chopin's chord progressions are similar in style to what other composer?
What likely arose due to Chopin's technique with keyboards?
Who wrote about Chopin's "novel harmonic effects"?
Chopin's compositions are often played with what?
What does rubato mean?
In Chopin's music where strict timing is disregarded, what is it called?
What type of Chopin's music had the most disregard for strict timing according to Charles Rosen?
Chopin was noted as introducing music to what?
What year did Schumann review Chopin's piano concertos?
In his review Schumann made note of Chopin's emotions for what?
Why did Schumann say the Poles were in mourning?
A biography on Chopin released under Franz Liszt's name was likely written by who?
Chopin was able to bring about a new sense of nationalism with his music because of his mazurkas and what?
Who wrote a glowing review of Chopin's love for his country through his music in 1836?
Schumann described Chopin's music as cannons buried in what?
Though Franz Liszt is credited with Chopin's 1863 biography, who probably actually wrote it?
William Atwood suggested that Chopin's music wasn't purposely patriotic but what?
A modern commentator, William Atwood, feels Poles not only sought solace in Chopin's music but also found them a source of strength as they continued to fight for what?
Where were Poles scattered to?
In what suite did Schumann name a work for Chopin?
What piece of Chopin's work was dedicated to Schumann? 
How many of Chopin's Polish songs did Liszt transliterate for piano?
With who did Chopin feel comfortable speaking of folk music with?
What was recognized about Chopin from his musical peers?
What Schumann suite contained the name of a piece Schumann named for Chopin?
What piece did Chopin dedicate to Schumann?
What other musician shows to have elements of Chopin in his work?
who was a professor of the University of Washington?
Who had a large amount of contacts with china during Yuan?
Who believed that Tibet barely had any diplomatic relations with the Ming?
Who supported van Praag's beliefs? 
Who did not agree with van Praag and Shakabpa?
Who believed that the Ming court had full sovereignty over Tibet?
What year did Wang and Nyima believe that the Mongol Prince Punala went to Nanjing?
What did the lamas called themselves?
What edicts did the Ming issue?
Who wrote the book The Story of Tibet?
who colonized India and New Zealand?
Who's viewpoint does Thomas Laird believe Wang and Nyima present?
Where is the China Tibetology Research Center located?
Who was the Director of the History Studies Institute?
How many households were the offices of Qianhu in charge of?
How many households were the offices of Wanhu in charge of?
What was the name of the Tibetologist?
Who did the Ming emperors send invitations to?
When the lamas received an invite from the emperors, who did they send instead? 
Who did the Hongwu Emperor grant the title Initiation State Master to?
Who suggested to the emperor that an official title be granted to second Phagmodru ruler?
Who was the second Phagmodru ruler?
Who told the emperor that the situation in Dbus and Gtsang were under control?
Where were the envoys sent?
Who lost their power over Tibet?
What year did the Phagmodrupa lose their power over Tibet?
What year did the 5th Dalai lama start to dominate over Tibet?
What did the other families fail to establish?
Who did the Ming appoint titles to?
What didn't the Ming send to replace the Mongols when they left Tibet?
What does Yiu Yung-chin claim the Ming did not possess?
What was the name of the  eunuch?
Where did the Yongle Emperor send Yang Sanbao?
When did Yongle Emperor send Yang Sanbao into Tibet?
Why did Yongle Emperor send Yang Sanbao into Tibet?
Why did the emperor pay a small fortune in gifts?
Who did the Gelug exchange gifts with?
Until what year frame did the Gelug exchange gifts with the the Ming?
What was the Gelug not mentioned in?
Regardless of their sectarian affiliations, who did the Ming grant titles to?
Who was the viceregal Sakya regime overthrown by?
Who did the Yongle Emperor send to Tibet?
Why did the Yongle Emperor send Hou Xian and Zhi Guang to Tibet?
When did Hou Xian and Zhi Guang return to Nanjing?
Where did Hou Xian and Zhi Guang travel through on their way to the Karmapa?
When did Deshin Shekpa travels start?
Where did the Yongle Emperor greet the Karmapa?
Who did the Emperor give the place of honor at his left to?
Who sat on a lower platform than the Tibetan cleric?
Who showed a great amount of respect to Deshin Shekpa?
At what temple did the ceremonies for the Yongle Emperor's deceased parents take place?
Where was the Linggu Temple located?
What title was Deshin Shekpa given at Nanjing?
Who did Deshin Shekpa persuade the Yongle Emperor to give the title to?
Who imposed on the military might on Tibet in the past? 
Hok-Lam Chan states that Deshin Skekpa was only invited for what purpose? 
What was said to be the  Yongle Emperor plans?
Why was the Yongle Emperor said to have been planning to send military forces into Tibet?
Who convinced the Yongle emperor not to send military forces into Tibet?
Who did the Yongle Emperor have a conflict with?
Who aided the legitimacy of the Yongle Emperor's rule?
What served as a legitimizing tool for the emperor's succession to the throne?
Who did the Ming cut off all relations with?
What year did the Ming cut off the Karmapa hierarchs?
When did  Deshin Shekpa  die?
Who did the Ming court think the representatives were sent by?
What did the mid Ming dynasty discussion focus mainly on?
Who used the the Ordos region as a place to stage raids? 
Where were the Mongols trying to raise? 
Why did P. Christiaan Klieger believe that the Ming court supported high Tibetan lamas?
Who does P. Christiaan Klieger claim to have had a mutual role of religious prelate?
Who does P. Christiaan Klieger believe undertook the former imperial tributaries?
Where does P. Christiaan Klieger work?
Who was the  vice royalty of the Sakya regime established by?
The Sakya regime established what kind of relationship between the Tibetans and Mongol converts?
When was Tibet included into the territory of Yuan dynasty's China?
Who was said to have gained the right to rule Tibet?
When was China Daily started?
Who does the article claim had two itinerant high commands over Tibet?
According to article Tibet has remained under what jurisdiction?
Who did the Ming dynasty showed favors to?
What was the the third Dalai Lama allowed to do?
What title was Sonam Gyatso granted in 1587?
In 1653 who did the Qing emperor grant a title to?
In 1713 who did the Qing emperor grant a title to?
What title was the fourth Dalai Lama granted? 
Who was the fourth Dalai Lama?
When did the Wanli Emperor grant the title Master of Vajradhara to Yonten Gyatso?
Who did the Wanli Emperor invite to Beijing in 1616?
Why didn't Yonten Gyatso make it to Beijing?
In addition to playing music, what other function can the iPod perform?
What is the smallest data capacity for an iPod product?
What is the largest data capacity for an iPod product?
Which iPod product features the smallest data storage capacity?
Which current iPod product features the largest data storage capacity?
What's the storage capacity of the iPod Shuffle?
What's the storage capacity for the iPod Touch?
What Apple program is used to communicate between computers and portable devices?
Which operating systems are compatible with iTunes?
What's the name of the software used to manage music and other media on Apple devices?
Prior to iOS 5, how many apps were required to play music and videos on iPhone and iPad?
In mid-2010, which Apple device had higher sales than iPod?
With what iOS release did Apple standardize media apps on all their products?
In what year did iPhone sales surpass those of iPods?
What are the titles of the standard media apps on current Apple devices?
What processor model is used in the iPod Touch?
Which generation of iPod Touch was made availalbe in July of 2015?
What's the most recent generation of iPod Touch?
In what year was the most recent iPod Touch released?
What type of processor does the current iPod Touch use?
In how many colors is the current iPod Touch available?
In what year was the iPod first introduced?
In what year did iPod sales show improvement?
Which Apple engineer led original iPod design group?
What radio was the primary inspiration for the look of the iPod?
What was the storage capacity of the first iPod?
in what year was the original iPod released?
How large was the hard drive on the original iPod?
What other popular music player did Apple compare their new product to?
What is the name of Apple's hardware engineering chief who helped design the iPod?
Who manufactured the hard drives for the first iPods?
In what year was a special edition of the iPod produced?
For what musical group was a special edition of the iPod first made?
What color was the metal on the U2 version of the iPod?
What type of media was included with purchase of the U2 version of the iPod?
Of what band did Apple present a special edition iPod 5G?
What color was the special U2 iPod model?
In what year did apple release the special U2 model of the iPod?
Apple was involved in a lawsuit with which company in 2007?
Who previously applied for a patent for an iPod-like device?
In what country did Kane Kramer apply for his patent?
In what year did Kane Kramer apply for his patent?
What did Kane Kramer call the device for which he wanted a patent?
What patent holding company sued Apple in 2007?
What was the name of the previously-patented music player from 1981?
Who was the holder of the previous patent for the "plastic music box"?
Who came up with the name for Apple's portable mp3 player?
What was Vinnie Chieco's profession?
What film inspired the name of the iPod?
Who first trademarked the iPod name?
In what year was Apple given rights to the iPod name?
What movie inspired the iPod name?
What was the name of the copywriter that proposed the name "iPod"?
Who held the original trademark for the iPod name?
When were images of new iPod colors leaked?
Who leaked the photos of new iPod colors?
What version of iTunes contained the leaked photos of new iPod colors?
What was the latest version of iTunes as of mid-2015?
Who first leaked the photos of the new iPod color scheme?
What audio deficiency was found in the 3rd gen iPods?
What kind of headphones could partially mitigate the bass response issues of the 3rd gen iPods?
What is an example of a device that could entirely mitigate the bass response issues of the 3rd gen iPods?
What part of audio output was substandard on 3rd generation iPods?
What component was to blame for the weak bass of the 3rd generation iPod?
What acoustic element could be distorted by different audio settings in iPods prior to 2007?
Name four sound profiles that would result in bass distortion on pre-2007 iPods.
What specific problem caused the issue with bass distortion?
iPods released before what year had issues with distorted bass?
What EQ settings were known to have issues with bass distortion?
What type of sensory issue was a concern prior to the release of 5th gen iPods?
In what markets did 6th gen iPods limit the highest volume of the player?
What was the limit imposed on how loud the iPod could play sounds in the EU?
In what country did Apple have to recall iPods?
What is the highest volume output level of European 6th-generation iPods?
What country originally pulled iPods due to higher-than-allowed volume levels?
What was the first type of connection used by the iPod to charge and transfer files?
What was an alternate method of charging the iPod?
What type of connector was originally required to upload songs or recharge the iPod?
In which generation did iPod start providing compatibility with USB?
What iPod feature allowed for USB connections with the device?
Which generation of iPod Classic was the first to abandon use of FireWire in transferring files?
Starting with which generation of iPod Nano was FireWire charging functionality no longer available?
What kind of connection is provided on the iPod Shuffle for both audio output and file transfer?
Which generation iPod was the first to include the 30-pin dock connector?
Which model of iPod combined the headphone jack and data port?
What interface was gradually phased out for both charging and data transfer?
What interface replaced FireWire in later iterations of the iPod?
Which iPod accessory was made by Apple but is no longer produced?
What are two companies that make iPod accessories?
What part of the iPod is needed to communicate with peripherals?
What is the condition for third parties using the dock connector?
The majority of peripherals for iPod are produced by what kinds of companies?
What's the name of the now-discontinued accessory manufactured by Apple, that connected via the iPod's dock connector?
What new connector did Apple unveil on September 12, 2012?
What other Apple product was unveiled on September 12, 2012?
How man pins did the pre-Lightning dock connecter use?
How many pins did the Lightning connector have?
On how many sides of the Lightning connector are the pins located?
What's Apple's code name for the newer 8-pin dock connector?
What was the first iPod Touch generation to feature the Lightning connector?
What is the name of an Apple-produced iPod accessory?
What is an example of an iPod accessory made work exercise?
What are six companies that made some of the first peripherals for the iPod?
What can A/V cables be used to connect the iPod to?
Who manufactures a pedometer accessory for the iPod?
Which company manufactures the iPod Hi-Fi accessory?
What company was first to create a means of connecting the iPod to an automobile?
In what year did Apple reveal that it would provide compatibility with a wide range of auto manufacturers?
Which company provides the ability to connect to iPods as a standard feature in their automobiles?
Which car company released the first automobile interface for the iPod?
Which car company first offered iPod connectivity as a standard feature on their whole product line?
In 2007, which airlines made deals to include iPod connections on their planes?
Where can people using iPods on planes view the device's interface?
What are two airlines that considered implementing iPod connections but did not join the 2007 agreement?
Which airlines first agreed to install seat connections for iPods?
In what year did airlines first start to accommodate the iPod?
How many hosts are recognized by an iPod the first time they're used?
What will be erased if an iPod is set to sync with a different computer?
What must an iPod be connected to before iTunes can synchronize?
When was the Apple iTunes Store launched?
What program is required to access the iTunes Store?
When were videos made available through the iTunes store?
When did Apple begin selling entire films through the iTunes store?
In what year was the iTunes store established?
In what year did videos first become available on iTunes?
When were full-length moved added to the iTunes store?
What are two stores which sell files with DRM not compatible with iPods?
For what device's sales does Apple leverage the iTunes store?
The iPod can play music from other online stores as long as they don't contain what feature?
What company ended its deal with Apple's music store in July of 2007?
What entity did Universal have a contract with prior to July of 2007?
In what year did Universal Music Group let their contract with iTunes lapse?
What was the name of the event at which the iTunes Wi-Fi store was launched?
On what date was the iTunes Wi-Fi Music Store launched?
In what year was the iTunes Wi-Fi Music Store introduced?
Which Apple device has the ability to sync with iTunes via the phone network?
On what devices can video games be used?
What was included on the first iPod?
Who created Brick?
What are three games, in addition to Brick, which have been included with the iPod?
What is another phrase meaning hidden feature?
What was the first, hidden game included with the original iPod?
What other games were later added to the original iPod?
In what year did the iTunes store begin allowing users to buy video games?
Which version of iTunes was introduced with the ability to purchase games?
What was the first generation of iPod Classic on which games like Mahjong and Tetris could be played?
On which generation of iPod Nano can games be played?
In what year did iTunes 7 launch, along with a plethora of additional games?
Which generation iPod was required to enjoy the new games available on iTunes 7?
What are the names of companies producing video games for Apple's MP3 player?
What market can Apple participate in now that it has a variety of games available for iPod?
What two publications have covered iPod games?
What format is used for iPod game files?
What file format is being covered up by the use of ipg files?
What does SDK stand for?
What is the only operating system on which iPhone SDK-made games can be played?
What file format are iPod games distributed in?
An app produced with the iPhone SDK can only run on what devices?
Is the Apple SDK available to third-party game publishers?
What kind program is commonly used to move files between iTunes and an iPod?
What kind of other applications enable communication between iTunes and an iPod?
Rather than copying media files directly to it, what software must be used for this purpose so that they are accessible?
What kind of security determines if files moved to a computer can be played?
What minimum version of iTunes is required to transfer purchased media from an iPod to an authorized computer?
In what kind of folder are files located in the iPod?
On what kind of operating system can hidden iPod files be accessed?
What method of file recovery is used to retrieve data from the iPod?
In what year did Apple face multiple intellectual property lawsuits?
What did the 2005 lawsuits accuse Apple of doing?
What other companies were named in the suit filed by Pat-rights?
On whose behalf did Pat-rights take Apple to court?
Which company sued Apple for breach of a "music jukebox" patent in 2005?
Which Apple technology did Pat-rights complain breached their patent in a lawsuit?
What interface component did Apple attempt to patent in 2005?
When did Apple receive a decision on its attempt to patent rotational user inputs?
Which competitor sued Apple over rights to part of the software user interface?
What was the name of the patent over which Creative asserted its ownership?
From which entity did Creative request an investigation into Apple importing their devices to the US?
What interface feature did Apple unsuccessfully try to patent?
Which rival company sued Apple in 2005 and 2006?
When did Creative and Apple come to an agreement over their intellectual property issues?
How much money did Apple have to pay to Creative as a result of their agreement?
What program did Creative join in order to make iPod peripherals?
How much did Apple pay to Creative Technologies to settle their 2006 suit?
What's the name of the program by which 3rd parties sell iPod accessories?
What share of the US digital music player market does iPod hold?
When did iPod become the leader in digital music device sales?
How much of the market did iPod claim as of January 2007?
Who reported Apple's market share in 2007?
Approximately what percentage of the hard drive-based music player sales does iPod have since 2004?
Approximately what percentage of the overall music player market does the iPod line have?
What did the iPod's US market share peak at in 2005?
How many iPods did Apple reveal it sold in April of 2007?
How much of Apple's revenue was generated by iPod purchases in Q2 of 2007?
What is an item that owners of iPods may also purchase?
How much revenue did Apple announce for Q2 2007?
In which year did Apple top sales of 100,000,000 iPods?
As of 2007, what percentage of Apple's revenue came from iPod sales?
What was Apple's revenue for Q3 2007?
Desktop computers made up how much of Apple's revenue in the third quarter of 2007?
How much money did Apple make in 2007?
What was the value of Apple's cash assets at the end of 2007?
With the help of strong iPod sales, how much profit did they turn in 2007?
When did Apple reveal it had achieved its highest quarterly earnings to date?
What was Apple's highest quarterly profit as of Q1 2008?
How much of Apple's revenue resulted from purchases of laptop computers in Q1 2008?
What percentage of Apples revenue in 1Q08 came from iPods, more than doubling the percentage of notebook sales?
Who was Chief Financial Officer of Apple in July of 2009?
From what year did iPod purchases begin to continuously decline?
How much revenue did iPod sales account for in Q4 2008?
Approximately how many total iPods had been sold by late 2009?
Which was the first year since iPod's introduction that no new model was released?
What rank did iPod achieve among various computer products in 2006?
What kind of reviews do iPods tend to get?
What two companies use the AAC format for music files?
What file format is not supported by Sony Ericsson and Nokia?
Which publication praised iPods for revolutionizing the industry?
Which phone manufacturers adopted the AAC file format to become better iPod-compatible?
Which PC magazine praised the iPod for having "altered the landscape for portable audio players"?
Aside from recreational use, in what other arena have iPods found use?
What are two purposes for which iPods are used in business?
What is the name of a company that uses iPods as part of its training?
Where is Royal and Western Infirmaries located?
What University gave an iPod to first year students in 2004?
What publication lauded the iPod for enabling people to listen to thousands of songs on a portable player?
Which major university began issuing iPods to all incoming freshmen starting in 2004?
Which magazine placed the iPod on its Best of the Decade list for the 00's?
What period of music did the iPod help bring to a close?
In which industry did the iPod have a major impact?
What did the iPod promote that prompted a big change in the music industry?
The ease of collecting singles with the iPod and iTunes is credited with ending what "era" in pop music?
How long were 5th generation iPods marketed as being able to function before needing to be charged?
Which website criticized Apple's battery life claims?
In what year was Apple sued for issues relating to its battery life?
Discrepancy in what spec brought about a class action suit against Apple in 2003?
How many hours of real-time battery life did the 5th-generation iPod test at, compared to its advertised 14 hours?
Whose directions can be followed to interact with iPod batteries?
What did Apple originally tell consumers to purchase when their iPod batteries no longer worked?
What kind of battery does the iPod use?
Which iPod component did Apple somewhat inconveniently made non-replaceable?
What type of rechargeable battery does Apple use in its iPods?
What did Apple launch on November 14, 2003?
How much did iPod owners originally have to pay for replacement batteries?
What was needed to replace an iPod Nano battery?
What generation saw iPod batterys being affixed with glue?
In what year did Apple begin a formal battery replacement program?
What was the original price for a replacement battery from Apple?
Which iPod model has its battery soldered into the unit?
What part of the iPod Nano was the cause of the overheating issue?
What program allowed users to exchange iPod Nanos which suffered from overheating problems with new safe models?
What are two subjects of criticism of iPods?
What website ran a survey to learn how often iPods ceased working?
How often did MacInTouch discover iPods stopped working, according to their survey?
When did iPod owners take issue with the fragility of the iPod screen?
What did Apple include with the iPod to resolve the screen problem?
Which type of iPod storage proved more reliable than hard drive storage?
The first generation nano suffered from which component getting damaged easily?
What publication revealed information about the working conditions of iPod labor?
What governs iPod manufacturers' labor policies?
What percentage of the time did The Mail on Sunday claim workers labored for at least seven straight days?
Which British tabloid accused Apple of unfair worker conditions in 2006?
What percentage of Apple's manufacturing employees worked over 60 hour weeks?
In what year did Chinese Foxconn emplyees kill themselves?
What disappeared in 2009 prior to the suicide of a Foxconn employee?
In what year did several Foxconn workers commit suicide?
What attribute of the United States could be thought to lead more international and less domestic employment opportunities?
To work as a boot disk for a Mac, what file system must an iPod be formatted with?
If connected to a Windows PC when first set up, what file system will an iPod be formatted with?
Who is the main character of the story?
What land does Link serve to protect?
What character helped Link in Twilight Princess?
Who is the protagonist is Legend of Zelda?
What is the name of the mysterious creature that assists Link?
This storyline takes place alternate from what storyline?
What accolade did Twilight Princess receive after its release?
Under which brand was Twilight Princess for the Nintendo Wii published?
When is the HD version of Twilight Princess slated for launch?
At the time of release which episode of the Legend of Zelda series was considered the greatest entry?
How many Game of the Year awards did Twilight Princess receive?
What year was Twilight Princess the most critically acclaimed game?
What year will the game release a high-definition port for the Wii U console?
What are the three main activities in The Legend of Zelda: Twilight Princess?
Twilight Princess uses the control setup first employed in which previous game?
What can be used to shoot without the need to manually target enemies?
What is Link's main weapon?
What secondary weapon in Twilight Princess is analogous to a weapon featured in previous games?
What genre of game is Twilight Princess?
Twilight Princess follows the control scheme introduced in what game?
What 2 main weapons does Link use in combat?
What control can be used while targeting that allows the player to forego manual targeting?
Many different types of interaction can be controlled by how many buttons?
Where can players see what action will be performed in different scenarios?
If Link is not moving, where will he put the projectile he's carrying?
What mechanic allows one button to serve many functions?
What shows what action the button will trigger?
Where is the speaker located on the Wii console?
What sound do users here when uncovering secrets in the game?
What part of the Wii is employed to use weapons?
Aside from the sword, what is another weapon that Link can use?
How many weapons can be equipped by Link if playing Twilight Princess on a GameCube?
The Wii version makes use of what kind of sensors?
What device on the Wii allows for sounds of a bowstring to be heard?
What does AI stand for?
What is a game whose enemies have more rudimentary programming than those in Twilight Princess?
What do enemies do to defeated companions?
What feature of the enemies in Twilight Princess is more advanced?
Who can enemies detect from a greater distance than in previous games?
What is Link's job at the start of Twilight Princess?
What do the Bulbins take from Ordon?
Who releases Link from the Realm of Twilight?
What does Link have to gather in order to complete each area?
Where is Link working as a ranch hand?
Who attacks the village?
What must Link collect?
What does Link assist Midna in collection?
Who attacks Link and Midna when they've finished their collection tasks?
What weapon can transform Link back to his original self?
Who saves Midna?
Where do the Zoras come from?
What does Link help Midna find?
Who ambushes Link and Midna?
What does Link discover he needs to find to return to human form?
Who sacrifices herself to save Midna?
What does Link obtain that gives him control over his transformations?
Where does Midna take Link after he acquires the Master Sword?
Who was the Mirror of Twilight used to fight prior to Zant?
Where is Ganondorf located after Zant's defeat?
Whose body is used as a proxy by Ganondorf in order to fight Link?
What allows Link to switch between his two forms?
What is the only known gateway between Twilight Realm & Hyrule?
Who is revealed as the true ruler of Twilight Realm?
Who did Zant form a pact with?
What does Ganondorf transform into?
What possession of Midna does Ganondorf destroy?
Where does Link depart from at the end of the game?
Which character helps Link get Ganondorf off of his horse?
To what part of his body does Link deliver the killing blow to Ganondorf?
Who resurrects Midna after the fight with Ganondorf?
Who does Midna teleport?
What does Ganondorf crush?
What does Midna destroy?
In what year did Nintendo reveal the start of development on what would become Twilight Princess?
At what event was a potential follow-up to The Wind Waker mentioned?
What region of the world did Nintendo want to design the next Legend of Zelda game for?
What was one feature that could not be implemented in Ocarina of Time?
What year did Nintendo announce a new Legend of Zelda was in the works for Gamecube?
Who was the director that unintentionally announced a Zelda game was in the works?
What was the specific area of gameplay that had not been done in Ocarina of Time?
How long did it take to implement riding horses in a believable manner?
Where did Nintendo preview the horseback riding feature?
What console was home to the sequel for The Wind Waker?
What was the name of the second Wind Waker game?
When did the company release a trailer of the horseback riding aspect?
What does Link morph into in A Link to the Past?
Aonuma left the Twilight Princess development team to work on which other game?
What was the working name for the Wii prior to release?
Who proposed that the Wii Remote be used in the control scheme for Twilight Princess?
Who created the script for the story scenes?
What device seemed well-suited for Link's arrow shooting ability?
What kind of interface was used for in-game archery?
What was the originally-planned launch year for Twilight Princess?
Which Nintendo employee was confident in the potential of developing two versions of Twilight Princess?
What was the original release date for Gamecube?
What console boasted compatibility with the Wii?
Where did Nintendo provide a limited number of Twilight Princess previews?
At E3 in 2005, what console did Nintendo reveal the next Zelda game would be developed for?
When did Nintendo announce Zelda would appear on the Wii?
What kind of movement interfaced with the sword in Twilight Princess?
Who provided information about the game's controls in December of 2005?
What ended up not being supported in the GameCube version of Twilight Princess?
In what year did Nintendo reveal that the two different releases of Twilight Princess were planned for launch at the same time as the Wii?
How long was the GameCube version of Twilight Princess delayed?
What magazine mentioned players would be able to use the Revolution controller?
When did Nintendo announce both versions of Twilight Princess would be available at the Wii launch?
What kind of instruments are favored by Kondo?
How many people would be in the orchestra Kondo imagined using for the soundtrack?
When was the soundtrack of Twilight Princess made available?
Which publication was associated with the soundtrack release?
Who made the requests for Kondo to use orchestral music throughout the game?
When were track versions of the game's sountrack released?
What were replicas of the Master Sword and Hylian Shield bundled with?
What kind of error was found in Twilight Princess for Wii?
What does ELF stand for?
Which issue of the Wii Menu fixed the issue with Twilight Princess?
What was the name of the hack discovered?
What versions of the Wii Menu prevented copying the exploited files?
What version of the Wii patched the hack vulnerability?
Which company is responsible for the HD version of Twilight Princess?
For which console is Twilight Princess HD being made?
When were plans for Twilight Princess HD revealed?
On what date is Twilight Princess HD scheduled for Australian release?
What is the name of the remastered game?
What company is developing the remaster?
What kind of functionality will the remaster feature?
When will the game be released in America?
What special item is included with certain versions of Twilight Princess HD?
Which two Amiibo figures reload Link's stock of arrows?
Which two Amiibo figures heal Link?
Which Amiibo figure makes Link lose more health when attacked?
What is the name of the area that players with the Wolf Link Amiibo can access?
What will special bundles of the game contain?
What is the level called that the special Amiibo will unlock?
What characters will be able to replenish arrows?
What figures restore health?
What company included the soundtrack as a reward for ordering the game prior to release?
How many tracks were recorded on the preorder CD?
In what areas is the content of the GameStop bonus CD provided for all versions of the game?
What was included as a Gamestop preorder item?
What kind of scores did Twilight Princess receive from many video game review sources?
Which sites gave the Wii copy of Twilight Princess scores of 95% and 95?
Who counted the game among the best ever made?
What was the reception of Twilight Princess?
What scores did it receive from major game publications?
What is the average score of Twilight Princess on Metacritic?
What reviewer called Twilight Princess "One of the greatest games ever created"?
Which publications reported some issues with the graphics of Twilight Princess?
Which journalist criticized the Wii version for its controls?
Which game publication does Jeff Gerstmann work for?
Which game journalist was perturbed by a lack of voiced dialogue?
Which publication does Javier Glickman write for?
What 2 critics suggested the game had blurry textures and low resolution?
What critic considered the CD to be the best of the generation?
Who specifically commended the game for the very long quests?
The version of Twilight Princess fo which console won three IGN awards?
What was Twilight Princess's rank among all Nintendo games according to Nintendo Magazine?
Where did Twilight Princess place among Wii titles according to IGN?
Where did Twilight Princess rank on Nintendo Power's list of Nintendo games in the 2000s?
What 2 critics gave Twilight Princess awards for Best Graphics and Best Story?
What award did Game Critics Awards and GameSpy give Twilight Princess?
What place did the game take in Nintendo's Official list of 100 Greatest Nintendo Games of All Time?
What place did IGN give the game on the Wii console?
What is the name of the area which includes most countries not located in North, Central or South America?
How many units of the Wii version of Twilight Princess had been purchased by the end of March 2011?
How many units of the GameCube version of Twilight Princess had been purchased by the end of March 2007?
What region is Twilight Princess the best -selling Zelda entry?
How many copies of the game had been sold as of March 2011?
How many copies of the game had been sold on Gamecube as of March 2007?
Who wrote and provided art for a Twilight Princess comic book series?
The Twilight Princess manga was only available in what country?
Who published the Twilight Princess comic book series?
What kind of device can access the Twilight Princess manga?
Which company made Spectre?
Who is the star of Spectre?
What role does Daniel Craig play in Spectre?
What 007 movie did Sam Mendes previously direct?
How much money did it take to make Spectre?
How many James Bond films has Eon Productions produced?
Which Bond film was the most expensive ever made?
How many films has Daniel Craig appeared in as James Bond?
Which two movie studios distributed the James Bond film Spectre?
Who directed Spectre?
On what date was Spectre first shown in the UK?
Where was the first screening of Spectre?
What was the US release date for Spectre?
What were two subjects of accolades for Spectre?
For what category did Spectre receive a Golden Globe award?
What was the first James Bond film to be screened at IMAX theaters?
What was the theme song for the James Bond film Spectre?
On what holiday do insurgents plan to detonate a bomb?
Who removed James Bond from active service?
Who is M's rival?
What group does C support England joining?
Which character is promoted to M?
Which holiday was the terrorist bombing planned for?
Which two intelligence groups merged to form Joint Intelligence Service?
What does Bond take from Marco Sciarra?
Where does Bond go after his suspension?
What group did Sciarra belong to?
Who is the head of Spectre?
What is Mr. Hinx's job?
Who performs research for Bond?
Where does Sciarra's funeral take place?
Who is the leader of Spectre?
What is the name of the Spectre assassin who tracks Bond?
Which member of Spectre had been presumed to be dead?
What method of transportation is used to get to Oberhauser's base?
Who is the link between Oberhauser and Bond?
What did Oberhauser call himself after he faked his death?
After staging his own death, what name did Hanz Oberhauser begin to use?
Where is Bond brought after he is kidnapped?
Who does Bond meet in the MI6 building?
Where does Blofeld get arrested?
Who does M fight with?
Who prevents Nine Eyes from going online?
Which characters falls to their death, M or C?
What company was targeted by leaks of company information?
Who was responsible for leaks of Sony movie projects?
Which film writer's work was included in leaks of Spectre information?
Which company verified contents of the leaked information?
When did hackers get into the Sony Pictures e-mail system?
Who wrote the early drafts of the script for Spectre?
What company confirmed that an early version of the Spectre script had been leaked?
Which actor portrayed Franz Oberhauser?
In what year was Hannes Oberhauser identified as a guardian of James Bond?
Who were the writers of Spectre?
Which group in previous Bond films was changed to be a part of Spectre instead of its own entity?
What is the name of the short story in which Hannes Oberhauser appeared?
Who was Bond's full time guardian?
In which Bond story did the name Oberhauser first appear?
What actor portrayed Franz Oberhauser?
In which movie was the Quantum organization first introduced?
Quantum is a division of what other organization? 
What is the name of a location in Spectre which draws its inspiration from an Ian Fleming short story?
Who wrote the book Colonel Sun?
What short story inspired the name Hildebrand Rarities and Antiques?
"The Hildebrand Rarity"  is from what short story collection?
Which character tortures Bond?
What is the name of the MI6 safehouse?
When were the actors in Spectre announced?
Which actor portrayed M?
Which actress portrayed Eve Moneypenny?
Which actor portrayed Q?
Which actor portrayed Bill Tanner?
How many times has Daniel Craig portrayed James Bond in films?
Which actor portrays Bill Tanner?
Which three actors reprised supporting roles for Spectre?
How many actual people were used for the opening sequence of Spectre?
Which actor portrayed Marco Sciarra?
Estrella was played by which actress?
When was the opening scene of Spectre filmed?
Where was the pre-title scene in Spectre filmed?
In which country were the scenes with Detlef Bothe shot?
Who was cast as Marco Sciarra?
What character did Stephanie Sigma portray?
Who was the last person to direct two James Bond movies in a row before Mendes?
Who served as production designer for Spectre?
Who did Hoyte van Hoytema replace as cinematographer?
Which two consecutive Bond films did Mendes direct?
Which film had a larger production staff, Spectre or Skyfall?
Which Bond film is Daniel Craig listed as a co-producer?
Who directed The Living Daylights and Licence to Kill?
Neal Purvis and Robert Wade have worked on how many Bond films?
What were three sites used for filming Spectre?
What kind of film was used to shoot the movie?
Where did initial shoots for the film take place?
How long did it take to film Spectre?
What type of film was used?
In what film studio was some of the film shot?
What are two landmarks in Rome used in filming Spectre?
Which group was responsible for the C-X75s featured in Spectre?
For which auto maker did Williams first develop the C-X75?
How many engines did the C-X75 originally have?
Where in England were scenes shot that represented a location in Rome?
What bridge in Rome was a filming location?
What two cars were featured in a chase scene along the banks of the Tiber River?
Which Formula One racing team developed the C-X75's used for filming.
Where did Craig go to deal with his injury?
When did Craig go back to work?
In what city did Daniel Craig have minor surgery to repair his knee?
Which bridges were shut down because of filming?
Which organization provided water for weather effects?
Which river was used in some of the shoots taking place in London?
Where is MI6 based?
Filming closed which two bridges in London?
Who helped the filmakers simulate rain while shooting in London?
Where were the scenes of Ralph Fiennes in a restaurant shot?
Where stunt scenes on the Thames shot during the day or the night?
Which three locations in Morocco were used in filming?
What Guinness record was set during the filming of Spectre?
Who was the Guinness record attributed to?
How long did it take to shoot Spectre?
Where did production go to after leaving London?
What Guinness World Record does the film hold?
The Guinness World record was credited to which production designer?
Who wrote the music for Spectre?
When was the soundtrack of Spectre first available for purchase in the UK?
What company published the Spectre soundtrack?
Who composed the score for the film?
Which record label was the soundtrack album released on?
Did Thomas Newman compose the score after filming or during filming?
When was the theatrical trailer of the movie released?
What was the name of the song played during the opening credits?
How many recording sessions did it take to complete the song?
Which version of the theme was used in the actual movie?
Who is the vocalist on Writing's on the Wall?
When was the main theme of Spectre made available in digital format?
What song was the Spectre theme comapred to unfavorably?
What former Bond theme singer was the subject of extensive activity on Twitter when the Spectre theme was released?
What group wrote music for the film that ended up not being used?
What artist performed the theme song for Skyfall?
The release of Writing's on the Wall caused what name to trend on Twitter?
Which English band also composed a song for the film?
Which companies revealed Spectre's official car?
How many DB10s were made for the movie?
Which team displayed the Bond logo during the Mexican Grand Prix?
What were the two DB10s that were not needed for filming used for?
How many DB10's were produced?
What logo did the Williams race team have on their cars for the 2015 Mexican Grand Prix?
Images of what item were posted by Eon while the movie was being made?
For what film did Eon first use this method of promotion?
What other Bond film was promoted on social media?
What comedy production did Spectre actors appear in?
On what TV station did Red Nose Day appear?
In what month was the preview of Spectre released in movie theaters?
When was the first teaser trailer of Spectre released?
What show did several members of the cast and crew appear on in March 2015?
Who wrote the comedy sketch for the cast and crew?
How much money had Spectre made by 2/21/2016?
How much revenue did Spectre generate from the United States, Mexico and Canada by 2/21/2016?
How much revenue did Spectre produce from the British, Scottish, and Irish market by 2/21/2016?
Terrorist activity in what French city impacted Spectre's earnings?
How much more did Spectre earn compared with Skyfall in the Indian market?
In Paris, what movie has generated more ticket revenue than Spectre?
How much did Spectre make in its opening in South Korea?
What is the only film to have a higher ticket sale in Paris than Spectre?
What movie did Spectre beat to become top movie of the year in Switzerland?
Who gave Spectre a perfect rating in The Daily Telegraph?
A writer for which publication rated the film 7.2/10?
What score did Mark Kermode give Spectre?
How many stars did Mark Kermode of the Guardian aware Spectre prior to its release?
Which Atlantic writer gave a negative review of Spectre?
What adjective did Lawrence Toppman use to describe Craig's portrayal of James Bond?
What publication does Alyssa Rosenberg write for?
What was the catch phrase Lawrence Toppman of the Charlotte Observer used for the film?
Christoph Waltz's appearance in future Bond movies is contingent on the appearance of which other actor?
When will work being on the follow-up to Spectre?
When will the sequel to Spectre being development?
In what year did the earthquake in Sichuan occur?
What was the earthquake named?
How many people were killed as a result?
What year did the Sichuan earthquake take place?
What did the quake measure?
What day did the earthquake occur?
What time of the day did the quake happen?
How many people died?
How many people were confirmed dead?
How many people were confirmed dead only in the Sichuan province?
How many people were left homeless because of the earthquake?
How many people lived in the affected area?
How much money was dedicated to rebuild ravaged areas?
How many people died in Sichuan Province?
How many were injured in Sichuan?
How many people are listed as missing?
How many people are homeless because of the quake?
How high could the homeless number possibly go?
Where was the epicenter?
How long did the earthquake last?
What percentage of buildings were destroyed?
What was the magnitude of the earthquake?
How long did the main tremor last?
What percentage of buildings were destroyed during the quake?
How large was the displacement?
Who warned of possible seismic activity in the area beforehand?
What did the United States Geological Survey show as the amount of displacement?
How long was the fault where the quake occurred?
How deep is the fault?
Where on the fault is the possibility of future earthquakes increased?
What did Tom Parsons consider as the risk factor for strong future quakes?
How many people were killed in the Hanshin earthquake?
How did Yuji Yagi say the quake happened?
What fault tore in two places?
Besides the population density, what else contributed to the severity of the quake?
How much greater was the energy of this quake than that released in the earthquake of 1995 in Japan?
Why did the seismic waves travel so far?
How many aftershocks were there?
When were the aftershocks recorded?
When did the latest magnitude 6 aftershock occur?
How many aftershocks were there within 72 hours?
What do the Chinese say is the total number of shocks after the quake?
What did the strongest aftershock measure?
How many shocks ranged from 4.0 MS to 4.9 MS?
At what date did the most recent aftershock above 6 MS occur?
When did this earthquake occur?
Where did this earthquake occur?
Why was it not included in the series?
Where should you look for more details?
Where was the August 30, 2008 quake?
What was the magnitude of the southern Sichuan quake?
What earthquake happened in southern Sichuan?
Where were office buildings evacuated?
How did a receptionist describe the atmosphere after the evacuation?
How long were workers in Ford Plant evacuated for?
Which airport was shut down?
When did the airport re-open?
What happened to office buildings in Shanghai?
Which airport was shut down?
Why were flights delayed and diverted?
What were they using the airport to stage for?
Where did the reporters say they saw cracks on walls of some buildings?
Where were office towers evacuated?
Where did a cargo train derail as a result?
What happened to the cargo train?
What was reported in Chengdu?
What was evacuated in Beijing?
What part of the Olympic area was not damaged?
Where did a cargo train derail?
Why did the train catch fire?
How many highways leading into Wenchuan were damaged?
What percentage of building collapsed in Beichuan?
Where did two chemical plants collapse?
How many students out of the 900 in the school, survived the collapse?
What highways into Wenchuan  were damaged?
What did the damaged roadways cause to the rescue operations?
How many of the buildings in Beichuan collapsed?
What leaked liquid ammonia in Shifang?
How many of the 900 students buried in a Dujiangyan school collapse survived?
Where were the exchanges based?
What metal rose in value?
What natural resource dropped in value?
What did the Shanghai Stock Exchange do?
Where were companies located that had their stock trading suspended?
What metal rose due to speculation?
Besides the Shanghai Stock Exchange, what other exchange suspended trading of southwestern China stock?
What kinds of telecommunications were cut?
What capabilities were cut to the entire Sichuan area?
How long did it take for these capabilities to be restored?
What was cut after the earthquake?
Where were the internet cut?
Who restored communications over a period of months?
What internet services were decreased in the area?
What services were finally online again?
How many base stations did China Mobile have suspended?
How many Unicom towers were suspended?
How many China Mobile base stations stopped working?
Besides power disruption, what caused telecommunications to be suspended?
How many wireless communications failed in Sichuan?
Whose service in Wenchuan was cut off?
How many of China Unicom's towers were cut?
What place could officials not contact?
How many pandas live at the Reserve?
How many British visitors to the Reserve left unharmed?
How many pandas were injured?
What nature center was cutoff?
How many pandas escaped the reserve?
How many security guards died at the reserve?
What famous panda was killed under the rubble?
How many deaths were reported?
How many deaths were reported only in the Sichuan province?
How many people were listed as missing?
How many people were injured?
How many earthquake relief workers were killed?
How many died in Sichuan?
What is the total tally of known deaths caused by the earthquake?
What is the number of missing persons?
How many people were injured?
What were the 158 relief workers doing when they were killed?
What is poor about inland areas such as Sichuan?
Who was the Vice Minister of Health?
What did Gao Qiang tell reporters in Beijing?
How economically forward has this area been?
Where is health care poor in China?
What did the Vice Minster of Health call the public health system in China?
What should the government of China be responsible for providing to earthquake survivors?
How many school children died due to shoddy construction?
How many schools collapsed in Mianyang City?
How many people were buried in the collapsed schools?
How many school buildings collapsed in the province?
How many students were buried in a school in Hanwang?
What caused the deaths of many school children?
How many schools collapsed in Mianyang City
How many people were buried under rubble in Mianyang City?
How many school buildings fell in the entire province?
How many were killed at the Juyuan Elementary School?
When did an investigation occur under school casualties?
When was the official tally of students killed in the earthquake released?
How many students were killed in Xinhua?
How many students were disabled in Xinhua?
What date were the official numbers of students killed in the earthquake released?
Who kept a blog about the school deaths?
What is the total of school children killed?
How many children are disabled?
Where did the Chinese government decide that parents who had lost children could go for free treatment?
How many people were left without housing?
How many people could be potentially without housing?
How many animals were killed?
How many pigs died in Sichuan?
Because of the earthquake, how many people did not have housing?
How many people might actually be homeless?
How much livestock was lost?
How many pigs died from the earthquake in Sichuan ?
Who was a professor of civil and environmental engineering at Georgia Tech?
What is the profession of Reginald DesRoches?
When did China create a seismic design code for building?
What catastrophe inspired them to make a building design code/ 
What happened days following the disaster?
What did the team of engineers do?
After the quake what kind of international team was sent to the area?
What was the team sent to China to make?
What kind of reasons do their findings show?
What areas were the hardest hit?
Who was an assistant professor of civil engineering and geophysics at the California Institute of Technology?
What part of China did the earthquake occur in?
What did Swaminathan Krishnan mean when he said the buildings were just built?
What manner of building codes are there in China?
What were many of these old buildings built without?
What is an estimate of the economic loss from the quake?
What damage did the major Sichuan cities have?
What is an estimate of losses to economics?
Whose is this one of the costliest disasters in history of?
Which cities in Sichuan had minor damage?
How many buildings collapsed as a result of the May 27th aftershocks?
How strong was the May 25 aftershock in Qingchuan county?
How many people were injured in the May 25 aftershock?
How many homes were destroyed because of the May 27 aftershocks?
During the May 27 aftershock, how many people were injured?
Where was the aftershock of August 5 that caused widespread hill slides?
Who was the executive vice governor?
How many homes were rebuilt?
How many homes were left without permanent shelter?
How many schools were reconstructed?
Who spoke about the dead and missing people on November 21, 2008?
How many people did Wei Hong say were dead or missing?
How many homes had been rebuilt?
How many houses were still under construction?
How many families were still without permanent homes?
Who flew to the earthquake area 90 minutes after it hit?
What was Premier Wen Jiabao's background in?
What did Jiabao oversee in the region?
How many troops were dispatched by the Chengdu military?
How soon after the earthquake was Premier Wen Jiabao on his way to the area?
How many medical teams were sent to Wenchuan county?
How many troops were sent to the area for relief work?
Besides the rough terrain, why was it difficult to get to the area?
What did the National Disaster Relief Commission initiate?
What does a Level II emergency contingency plan cover?
When did the plan rise to Level I?
What level alert was instated for the quake?
What class of disasters is a level II emergency?
What level was the disaster set at 22:15 CST, May 12?
What department initiated the emergency contingency plan?
How many people were in the earthquake emergency relief team?
How many of the relief team were from the State Seismological Bureau?
How many of the team were from the military?
How many of the team were from the police?
What kind of team left Beijing to go to Wenchuan?
How many people comprised the relief team?
How many soldiers were from the Beijing Military?
Where did 22 of the relief team come from?
How did the relief team travel to Wenchuan county?
What was June 1, 2008 called?
Where were most of the surviving children?
What did these children do on that day?
Where did parents go to mourn their children?
When is Children's Day?
Where were surviving children living?
How much did central state-owned enterprises donate?
How much did China National Petroleum Corp and Sinopec donate?
How much have Central state enterprises donated?
How much did China National Petroleum and Sinopec donate?
What was concluded about the construction?
What structure did an article contemplate could have caused the quake?
What was the affect of the dam on the stresses in that area?
Who disregarded warnings about dams in the area?
What type of area is Sichuan?
What have researchers been denied?
What was stated in the press conference?
What do many geologists believe about earthquake prediction?
What kind of issue is earthquake prediction?
What was received before the quake occurred?
What did  seismologist Gary Gibson have to say about the prediction of the quake?
When was a Seismic Risk Analysis published?
Who published the Seismic Risk Analysis?
Who published a Seismic Risk Analysis Study?
In what year did Chen Xuezhong publish an earthquake study?
What strength did he predict the next quake in Sichuan to be?
How long had it been since an earthquake of similar magnitude?
How long since the Sichuan area has had  a severe quake?
Does the scientific community agree that earthquake prediction is possible?
People wanted to know if the study of what math could produce better predictions?
What is not an established science?
What department was ready to join the rescue effort by Wednesday?
How many Tibetan villagers were stranded?
What was the reason that many rescue teams could not join the relief efforts?
What action did the Red Cross recommend ?
What problem continued to stop rescue teams from reaching affected areas?
Where were the soldiers under commander Yang Wenyao trying to go?
What natural disasters were occurring in Wenchuan County?
How many helicopters were deployed?
How many militia reservists joined in on rescue efforts?
How many survivors were found?
How many troops parachuted into Mao County?
What were the biggest difficulties in reaching affected areas?
How many helicopters were sent to deliver aid to the affected areas?
By May 13, how many troops had been added to the rescue efforts?
How people were reported to be survivors in Yingxiu Town?
How many persons were still unaccounted for in Yingxiu?
What did Premier Wen Jiabao order?
How many helicopters were provided by the PLAAF?
How many helicopter were to be provided by the civil aviation industry?
How many aircraft were there in total?
What is the total number of aircraft used in the relief operation?
How many helicopters came from the PLAAF?
Who provided the other 30 helicopters?
What kind of operation did this massing of aircraft produce?
What Foundation wanted to aid Beijing?
Where was the foundation based?
When did Beijing agree to aid from Taiwan?
What was the first group from outside China to join in the relief operation?
What did China say they would accept?
What did China need help for?
Who made a direct chartered cargo flight?
What date did the cargo flight leave?
When did a rescue team depart?
How did the move the relief supplies from Taiwan to the stricken area?
From what airport did the chartered flight leave?
Where did the chartered flight from Taiwan land?
What Red Cross team left Taipei on May 16
Where did the Red Cross team from Taiwan land?
What did the US share?
Who did the US share the satellite images with?
How many Chinese troops were involved in the rescue efforts?
When did groups from South Korea, Japan, and others arrive in China?
What did the U.S. share with China?
What was included in the the Air Force C-17 supplies?
How many Chinese troops and medics were involved in the relief efforts?
What was extensively used to pass information to aid rescue and recovery efforts?
What did the Xinhua news agency set up?
What was the purpose of this online rescue request center?
Where did rescue helicopters have trouble landing?
What was used as a communications aid in the relief efforts?
Who set up an online site to focus on blind spots in recovery?
What person suggested a landing spot for helicopters near the epicenter?
What kind of information were websites set up to store?
On what date did a rescue helicopter crash with no survivors?
What was done for the anniversary?
Where did the government open access to?
How long was it opened for?
What did China do to mark the first anniversary of the quake?
What will the Beichuan county seat be used for?
What kind of event were given to raise money for quake survivors?
What is the Beichuan museum meant to remind people of?
What was also donated?
What companies received the money?
After the quake, people from where in China made donations?
What caused long lines in most major cities?
What were the Chinese setting up to take in donations?
How did a lot of people donate using mobile phones?
How much had the Chinese government designated by May 16?
How many tents were flown to the region?
How many quilts were flown to the region?
How much were both supplies worth?
What county were the supplies flown to?
How many tents did the Sichuan Ministry provide for the homeless?
What group took tents and quilts to Wenchuan county?
How much has the Amity Foundation designated for disaster relief?
How many tents did the Sichuan Ministry of Affairs provide?
What were all these tents and quilts for?
What foundation had already begun relief work in the area?
What formed behind blockages?
How many quake lakes formed?
How many of the lakes were a danger to people?
What was the magnitude of the Sichuan earthquake?
What blocked many of the area's rivers?
What formed behind the blocked rivers?
By May 27, how many earthquake lakes had formed up behind landslide debris?
What had to be evacuated due to potential flooding?
Where was the most precarious quake lake located?
How could you only get to this quake lake?
What machinery was airlifted into the location?
How many people were evacuated downstream?
What was the fear that caused 200,000 people to be evacuated from Mianyang?
Where was the worst of the quake lakes located?
Where is Mount Tangjia?
How many soldiers had to travel to the area by foot?
Who declared the mourning period?
What did the State Council declare a period of?
This was the biggest display of mourning since the death of who?
When did the Chinese hold a moment of silence?
What came to a halt during the moment of silence?
How long was the national mourning for the quake victims to last?
What was suspended for the duration of the mourning period?
Where was the relay scheduled to take place?
What was suspended during the period of mourning?
Where was the torch relay supposed to take place?
What part of the relay did they change?
Where was there a minute of silence during the relay?
What colors did many websites convert their home pages to?
What did internet portals remove from their home pages?
Many of what shut down completely?
What did the crowds in Tiananmen Square do after the moment of silence?
What business closed in Macau?
Who was the principal of Sangzao Middle School? 
What was the principal credited with?
How many students attended the school?
How much money was used to strengthen the construction of the school?
What school principal strengthened his school?
Where is the Sangzao Middle School?
The Sangzao school is one of the biggest in what county?
How many years was Ye Zhiping involved in the school overhaul?
Why were the schools inspected?
What was to be carried out at schools after the quake?
Who has joined an official inquiry into the school scandal?
What investigation are the prosecutors pursuing?
Where are the Chinese going to perform safety checks?
What group reported that Chinese prosecutors were involved in investigating the schoolhouse collapses?
What was given in exchange of signing the document?
What other methods were used to break up protests?
Who did the New York Times report was investigating the school collapses?
What are officials seeking to do about protesting parents?
What are officials offering parents in exchange of protests?
What has happened to some who refuse to agree to not protest?
What did officials order Chinese news media to stop reporting?
When did the sentencing occur?
When was the article published about the case?
What did he think that the poor construction led to?
What did UNICEF report?
What did foreign nations offer China because of the severity of the quake?
When did China formally ask for help from the international community?
What organization reported that China asked for help?
Why did the world community notice the need for help?
How much did Yao Ming donate?
How much did the Red Cross collect in donations?
How much money had been donated by May 14?
What group donated the 10.7 yuan?
What famous basketball player made two large donations to the crisis?
How much has the Red Cross Society  collected?
What did Francis Marcus say of the Chinese relief effort?
What uncharacteristic attitude did China display?
What kind of attitude did Burma display in response to a cyclone a few days earlier?
How long before the quake did Cyclone Nargis strike Burma?
What organization did Francis Marcus represent?
What did stations replace programming with?
What was the source of the live feeds?
What about pay TV channels?
What government blocked aid after Cyclone Nargis?
Over what scandal did the Chinese government lose in public opinion?
What was the Chinese government first praised for?
What did parents accuse builders of doing?
As of July 17, 2008 what did parents complain of not receiving?
What kind of stories were being censored in the media?
Who has ignored the school issue?
Who gave instructions to ignore the school issue?
What media source has reported this happening?
Why are the buildings so shoddily built?
What did builder's use in place of steel rods as re-inforcement?
Who was supposed to inspect building to see if they met national standards?
Who has not been brought to justice?
Who is still looking for compensation and justice?
What has the government threatened people with to keep them from protesting?
What media reported the threat of arrest?
What did many families lose in the earthquake?
What was the trading post that preceded New York City called?
What nation founded New Amsterdam?
In what year did New York become the largest city in the United States?
When did the English take over the area from the Dutch?
In what year did New York cease the be the capital of the United States?
When was New York City established?
New Amsterdam became the title of New York City in what past date?
The English occupied New York City beginning on what date?
New York City is the biggest city in the United States since what historical date?
How many tourists visited New York in 2014?
How many stations are operated by the New York City Subway?
In what borough is Wall Street located?
How many school and universities are in NYC?
NYC has the two largest stock exchanges in the world which are called what?
What island was once a part of Long Island?
During what period was the area around New York City located at the edge of an ice sheet 1,000 feet deep?
Long Island and Staten Island were split in half by what geographical phenomenon?
What was the name of the Lenape homeland?
What was the name of the explorer who visited the area in 1609?
Who was Henry Hudson working for?
In what year did the Netherlands claim the area between Delaware Bay and Cape Cod?
How many days did Henry Hudson spend exploring the region?
What did Henry Hudson call the river that is now called the Hudson River?
Henry Hudson worked for which company in the 1600s?
In what year was the land between Cape Cod and Delaware Bay claimed by the Dutch?
Which explorer sailed his ship into New York harbor in 1609?
What did the English call New Amsterdam after its capture?
What was the regnal name of the Duke of York?
What person gave up New Amsterdam to the English?
What was Peter Stuyvesant's title?
In what year did the English take over New Amsterdam?
Who gave up New Amsterdam to the English without a fight in 1664?
What was the regnal name of the Prince of Orange?
What was the date of Anthonio Colve's capture of New York?
What did Colve call New York after he captured it?
In what year did the Dutch give New York back to the English?
August 24, 1673 is when which Dutch officer  took control of NYC?
The Dutch gave back the island to which country in 1674 after their trade routes had been destroyed?
New York was called New Orange for a period based off which historical figure?
After what war did the English receive New Amsterdam?
How many Lenape lived in the area in 1700?
What was the name of the island the English traded to the Dutch in return for New Amsterdam?
In 1700, the Lenape Native American population had dwindled to how many?
After which war did England gain New York in exchange for Run, an Indonesian island?
In 1730, what percentage of New York households were slave-holding?
In 1730, what American city had the highest percentage of slaveholders?
Near what square was the African Burial Ground unearthed?
What was being built that resulted in the discovery of the African Burial Ground?
Which city in North America held the most slaves in the 1700s?
When was as African burial ground discovered after the building of new courthouse?
In what year was John Peter Zenger tried?
On what island did Zenger's trial occur?
In what year was Columbia University chartered?
Under what king did the founding of Columbia University occur?
What was the original name of Columbia University?
Which trial in Manhatten helped establish the right of freedom of the press?
Columbia University of New York was founded in what year?
The Stamp Act Congress had a meeting in 1765 in which US city?
What was the biggest battle of the American Revolution?
In what borough did the Battle of Long Island occur?
In what month and year was the Battle of Long Island fought?
About how many escaped slaves were in New York during the time the British occupied it?
In what year did the American Revolutionary War end?
Which battle was the largest battle of the American Revolutionary war?
Which borough of New York was the Battle of Long Island fought?
When did the English army start to retreat and evacuate NYC during the Battle of Long Island?
On what date did the peace conference on Staten Island occur?
Who was the British representative at the Conference House meeting?
What notable catastrophe took place under the British occupation?
In what modern-day borough did the Great Fire happen?
What noted religious building was destroyed in the Great Fire?
Who was the English general who met with Benjamin Franklin on Septermber 11, 1776?
Which natural disaster happened after English occupation of Lower Manhattan?
In what year did New York become the United States capital?
Who was the United States' first President?
In what building did the Supreme Court of the United States first sit?
On what street did the writing of the Bill of Rights occur?
What was the second largest city in the United States in 1790?
Which organization made New York the national capital in 1785?
New York City became the first what under the new Constitution of the United States?
The first president, George Washington, took office in what year?
By which year, did New York City become the largest city in the United States?
In what year did the state of New York pass a law to free the slaves?
What borough was home to a notable population of free African-Americans?
Along with John Jay, who founded the New York Manumission Society?
In what year did the state of New York eliminate slavery?
In 1840, about how many African-Americans lived in New York City?
The gradual abolition act in New York was formed in what year?
When was slavery completely outlawed in the state of New York?
What plan of 1811 spread a grid of streets across Manhattan?
In what year did the Erie Canal finish building?
What political machine controlled New York politics in this era?
Along with German immigrants, immigrants of what nationality supported Tammany Hall?
The Erie Canal was finished being built in what year?
What was the name of the first urban landscaped park in the United States?
In what year was Central Park founded?
Central park, in 1857, became the first park in America to become what?
What event brought many Irish immigrants to the United States?
In 1860, approximately how many people of Irish extraction were in New York?
In 1860, what fraction of the city population was composed of Irish immigrants?
In 1860, what percentage of the city population was composed of German immigrants?
What events provoked the immigration of people from Germany?
Which event brought upon a lot of Irish immigrants to NYC?
How many immigrants that were Irish were living in New York in 1860?
In what year was the modern City of New York founded?
In what year did the subway begin operation?
Portions of what modern-day borough were included in the County of New York?
The subway of New York was first available in what year?
In what year did the General Slocum disaster occur?
How many people died on the General Slocum?
In what building did the city's deadliest industrial disaster occur?
How many people died in the Triangle Shirtwaist Factory fire?
The growth of what organization was prompted by the Triangle Shirtwaist Factory fire?
A catastrophe in 1911 that killed 146 workers was called what?
How many non-white people lived in New York in 1890?
What was the name of the Prohibition-era African-American cultural flourishing in New York?
What was the population of people in New York that were not Caucasian in 1890?
In the early 1920s, what was the second most highly populated city in the world?
What is the term for a city with a population of over 10 million?
Who was mayor of New York during the Great Depression?
For about how many years did Tammany Hall control New York political life?
In the 1930s, New York City had more than 10 million people becoming the first what in history?
When was construction finished on the United Nations Headquarters?
Prior to New York, what city was the center of the world of art?
What artistic movement caused New York to overtake Paris as the global art center?
The headquarters what organization was done being build in 1952 in New York?
The Stonewall riots are named after what building?
In what neighborhood did the Stonewall riots occur?
On what date did the Stonewall riots take place?
In what borough did the Stonewall riots happen?
What event provoked the Stonewall riots?
Where did the Stonewall riots happen?
In what year did the population of New York first reach an all-time high in this period?
In what year did the population of New York reach an all-time high for the second time in this period?
What was the name of a new sector of the New York economy that appeared in the 1990s?
In what decade did the crime rate drop significantly?
In what decade was there a significant decline in industrial jobs?
Which decade did massive job losses happen in NYC due to industrial issues?
What was the name of the aircraft that crashed into the World Trade Center's North Tower on September 11, 2001?
What was the name of the aircraft that crashed into the World Trade Center's South Tower on September 11, 2001?
How many firefighters died in the World Trade Center attack?
On what date did the World Trade Center PATH begin operation?
How tall is One World Trade Center in meters?
The Hudson Terminal which was also demolished was build in what year?
How many leader terrorists of Al Quada were involved with the 9/11 attacks directly that day?
What was the plane named that crashed into the World Trade Center?
On what date did the Occupy Wall Street protests commence?
In what park did the Occupy Wall Street protests occur?
In what borough did the Occupy Wall Street protests take place?
In what district of Manhattan were the Occupy Wall Street protests?
The Occupy Wall Street protests that took place in Zuccotti Park was on which date?
What individual established the National Review?
In what year was the National Review founded?
What public figure defended New York in January 2016?
A presidential candidate from what party derided the city for its liberalism?
In what geographical region of the United States is New York City located?
In what geographical region of New York state is New York City located?
New York City is about half the distance between Washington DC and what city?
New York City is adjacent to what ocean?
What river is New York City located on?
New York City is at the base of which American river?
The Hudson River flows into which body of water?
What Manhattan development is the product of land reclamation?
What is the total area of New York City in square miles?
In square miles, how much of the city's total area is composed of water?
In square miles, how much of the city's total area is land?
What is the name of New York City's highest point?
On what island is New York City's highest point located?
How many square miles in NYC?
How many square miles are water in NYC?
How many square miles are land in NYC?
The highest peak in the city is what location?
How many feet above sea level is Todt Hil?
What structure is an example of saltbox architecture?
In what borough is the Pieter Claesen Wyckoff House located?
What building is the priciest office tower in the world?
In what borough is One World Trade Center located?
In what year did construction on the oldest part of Pieter Claesen Wyckoff House begin?
The most expensive office tower built in the world today is what?
How many high-rises were present in New York City in 2011?
What city has the most high-rise buildings in the world?
How many structures in New York City are over 100m tall?
In what year was the Woolworth Building completed?
How many buildings in New York City are over 200m high?
NYC has the highest quantity of skyscrapers after which other world city?
How many buildings located in NYC are at least 330 feet in height?
In what borough is the Riverdale neighborhood located?
In what borough is the Ditmas Park neighborhood located?
In what borough is the Douglaston neighborhood located?
Brownstone rowhouse construction is most often associated with the period beginning in 1870 and ending in what year?
Along with Tudor Revival, what is a common architectural style of single-family houses in New York?
What type of housing structure makes up most of the large residential districts of NYC?
What event led to the decline in wooden construction in New York City?
In the 19th century, New York city required water towers in the roofs of buildings that were more than how many stories tall?
What area was known for its garden apartments?
After the Great Fire of 1835, what became the most widespread building materials?
To prevent high water pressures at lower elevations what were built on many of the city's buildings?
When did the United States Geological Survey released its seismic hazard analysis?
How many of New York's boroughs would be counted among the United States' ten most populated cities if they were independent?
How many boroughs does New York City have?
Which four boroughs of NYC would be among the the most populous cities in the US if they were independent cities?
In millimeters, how much precipitation does New York receive a year?
In centimeters, what is the average winter snowfall?
When did Hurricane Sandy strike New York?
How many inches of precipitation does NYC get in a year?
Which natural disaster occurred on October 29, 2012 in NYC?
The mean snowfall between 1981 and 2010 in NYC has been how many inches?
What is the name of the New York City department that operates the park system?
What is the state office that operates New York City parks?
What federal service operates New York City parks?
What city was rated as having the best park system by The Trust for Public Land?
What city had the second highest ParkScore rating?
The 2013 ParkScore rating for NYC made NYC second in best park system to what other US city?
How large is the Gateway National recreation Area in hectares?
About how large is the Jamaica Bay Wildlife Refuge in acres?
What fort is located on the Rockaway Peninsula?
What park is located on the Rockaway Peninsula?
What body of water is Jamaica Bay Wildlife Refuge adjacent to?
How many acres of land does Gateway Nation Recreation contain?
What body administers the Ellis Island Immigration Museum?
What is the common name for the General Grant National Memorial?
In what neighborhood is the Stonewall Inn located?
What movement is the Stonewall Inn most famously associated with?
The Statue of Liberty is taken care of by what organization?
The Statue of Liberty is also in what other US state?
Ellis Island is considered in New York state and which other?
Which landmark is considered the spark for LGBT rights?
The landmark, General Grant National Memorial, is also called what?
How many state parks exist in New York City?
How large is Riverbank State Park in acres?
How many meters is Riverbank State Park elevated above the Hudson River?
How many New York state parks are within New York City?
Riverbank State park's highest point is how high above the Hudson River?
What is the name of the military base in New York City?
In what year was Fort Hamilton founded?
In what borough is Fort Hamilton located?
What division is based at Fort Hamilton?
What brigade is headquartered at Fort Hamilton?
The U.S. military has only one active location in NYC named what?
When was Fort Hamilton built?
Which borough can Fort Hamilton be found?
Fort Wadsworth and Fort Totten are located in which area of New York City?
What was the population of New York City in 2014?
What is the US city with the second largest population?
How many people moved to New York City between April 2010 and July 2014?
Approximately what percentage is New York City's population of the entire state's population?
About what percentage is New York City's population of the New York metropolitan area's population?
What is the population of NYC as of 2014?
The second largest city in the US is what?
What percentage of people that live in the state of New York live in New York City?
What percentage of the city's population is Caucasian?
What percentage of the city's population is African-American?
What ethnicity is growing the quickest in New York City?
What percentage of the population identifies as Hispanic?
By what percentage did the non-Hispanic white population decrease?
As of 2010, what percentage made up white people in NYC?
Since what event did the first time black people decline in living in NYC?
Which race of people made it the highest growing ethnicity between 2000-2010 in NYC?
What percentage of Africans make up NYC?
How many immigrants arrived at Ellis Island from 1892 to 1924?
'Melting pot' was first used to describe neighborhoods in what area of the city?
What ethnicity comprised the largest number of immigrants at the beginning of the twentieth century?
What percentage of the population was Caucasian in 1940?
What was the ethnicity of the second largest group of immigrants in 1900?
Between 1892-1924, how many immigrants came through Ellis Island?
In the year 1942, what percentage of white Americans made up New York City?
What percentage of the population was born outside the United States?
From what country did the largest number of foreign-born immigrants originate as of 2011?
About how many immigrants from Bangladesh lived in the city in 2013?
What country was the second largest source of foreign-born New Yorkers in 2011?
What percentage of the population of NYC was born in another country?
About how many people live in New York City's metropolitan area?
As of 2012, how many Jewish people lived in the New York metropolitan area?
What percentage of the total Indian-American population of the United States lives in the New York metropolitan area?
How many Hispanic people live in the New York metropolitan area?
Approximately how many Chinatowns exist in New York City?
In 2013, how many people of Puerto Rican ancestry lived in New York City?
What nation provided the most legal immigrants to New York City in the Caribbean?
Out of all African nations, which provided the most legal immigrants in 2013?
Out of all nations in Central America, which provided the most legal immigrants in 2013?
Of all the countries in South America, which provided the most legal immigrants in 2013?
How many self-identified LGB people live in the New York metropolitan area?
On what date did New York legalize gay marriage?
How many days after gay marriage was legalized were gay marriages allowed to take place?
How many people identify as gay or bisexual in NYC?
Same-sex marriage became legal on what date in New York?
Since Gay marriage became legal, how many days did people have to wait to marry?
What percentage of New Yorkers are Christians?
What percentage of New Yorkers follow the Catholic faith?
About how many Jews live in New York City?
What borough has the largest population of Jewish people?
What is the third most popular faith in New York City?
What was the most prominent religion in New York as of 2014?
The second most prominent religion in New York is what?
Half the population of Jews live in what borough of New York City?
What percentage of people in 2014 had no religion?
The third most popular religion in NYC is what?
What is New York City's Gini Coefficient?
What borough has a Gini Coefficient of 0.6?
What previous mayor of New York is a billionaire?
In 2014, millionaires made up what percentage of New York City's population?
What is the average weekly wage in Manhattan?
The average weekly earnings for a worker in NYC was what in 2014?
By 2013, which city had the most billionaires living in the city?
What is the common name for New York's high technology sector?
Who created the Global Economic Power Index that ranked New York first?
In what year did the Port of New York and New Jersey deal with unprecedented cargo volume?
In what year was New York ranked first on the Global Economic Power Index?
What fraction of New Yorkers in the private sector are employed by foreign companies?
What publication ranked New York first in the 2013 American Cities of the Future rankings?
What is the popular name of New York's advertising industry?
About how many people work in the New York fashion industry?
About how much does it cost per year to pay workers in the New York fashion industry?
With Interpublic Group, what company has a combined annual revenue of roughly US$21 billion?
NYC's fashion industry employs how many people?
The Two highest advertising agencies in the world located in NYC are called what?
How many New Yorkers work in the food processing field?
What is the annual revenue of the food processing industry?
In what borough is the garment business prominent?
What dollar amount of chocolate does New York export annually?
Where is the "Chocolate District" located?
In what borough is Godiva based?
What is the number one specialty food export of New York?
What type of food is NYC's leading food export?
Which one of the world's largest chocolate makers is stationed in Manhattan?
As of 2013, how many people worked for a securities business in New York?
What percentage of New York private sector jobs are in the securities industry?
How much tax revenue does the securities industry generate?
What is the average income in the New York securities industry?
What percentage of the city's wages does the securities industry provide?
22 Percent of NYC's total wages are from what industry?
How many square meters of office space does Manhattan have?
About how many million square feet of office space is present in Midtown Manhattan?
How much office space did Manhatten possess in 2015?
In what borough is Silicon Alley located?
What is the street address of the headquarters of Verizon Communciations?
How much did Verizon spend on fiber optic upgrades in New York City?
Approximately how many tech sector jobs are in New York City?
The technology sector of work in NYC has how many employees in its service?
Along with Cornell University, what institution is involved in the building of Cornell Tech?
What is the cost to build Cornell Tech?
On what island is Cornell Tech located?
About how much capital did Accelerator raise as of the middle of 2014?
How large is the Alexandria Center for Life Science in square meters?
In 2011, what school was built on Roosevelt Island?
In what neighborhood does the Halloween Parade take place?
What company sponsors the Thanksgiving Day parade?
At what location is a Christmas tree famously lit every year?
Where in Central Park are performances offered at no cost?
In what borough is the Unisphere located?
About how many hotel rooms are there in Manhattan?
What was the percentage increase of Manhattan hotel rooms between 2013 and 2014?
Who owns the Waldorf Astoria?
What was the October 2014 purchase price of the Waldorf Astoria?
The hotel that sold for the most money in 2014 was which in NYC?
How many hotel rooms are located in NYC as of the end of 2014?
Who bought the Waldorf Astoria hotel in NYC in 2014?
The Waldorf Astoria hotel sold for how many dollars?
Approximately how many feature films are made in New York City every year?
How many New Yorkers work in the television and film industry?
How much money does the New York film and television industry create every year?
What United States city is the second most popular for pilot episode location filming?
Along with Warner Music Group, what top three record label is based in New York City?
What city is North America's biggest media market?
Out of the top eight advertising agency networks in the world, how many are based in New York?
How many people work in the New York publishing industry?
Which New York-based newspaper has won the Pulitzer Prize for journalism?
Along with the New York Times, what national daily newspaper is based in New York?
What was the founding year of the New York Daily News?
Who was the founder of the New York Post?
How many newspaper offices are located in New York?
How many magazines can call NYC home?
How many national newspapers out of the three are from New York?
Which two national newspapers are located in New York?
When was the New York Daily News founded?
Along with ABC and NBC, what other major broadcaster is based in New York?
What is the name of the city's public television service?
What comedy channel on cable television is headquartered in New York?
What cable news channel is based in New York?
What is the name of the first public-access TV channel in the country?
In what year did the Manhattan Neighborhood Network begin?
What is the primary public television station in New York?
What is the largest public radio station in the US by audience size?
In what year did the city cease to own WNYC?
The public-assess TV channel that has been around the longest in the US in what?
When was the Manhattan Neighborhood Network created?
The largest public radio station by listeners is what in New York?
What city department runs the public school system?
How many students are in New York City public schools?
About how many public schools are there in New York City?
How many high schools for gifted students does New York City have?
How many students regularly attend schools in NYC?
How many highschools are specialized in NYC?
What institution aids in the creation of charter schools in New York?
About how many private schools does New York have?
About how many students attend schools in the City University of New York system?
What fraction of Manhattan residents graduated from college?
What fraction of Manhattan residents have graduate degrees?
The City University of New York system consists of how many institutions?
How many students in New York partcipate in higher education?
What is the largest library in the United States?
What is the second largest library in the US?
What is the name of the library system in Queens?
What is Brooklyn's public library system called?
Along with Staten Island and the Bronx, what borough is served by the New York Public Library?
The largest municipal healthcare in the US is what?
How many hospitals does HHC operate?
What is the yearly revenue of the New York City Health and Hospitals Corporation?
How many patients are served annually by HHC?
How many uninsured New Yorkers take advantage of HHC?
In what year was the New York City Health and Hospitals Corporation founded?
How many nursing homes does HHC operate?
The public hospital that has been around the longest in the US is what?
Who is the president of HHC?
What was the first public hospital founded in the United States?
If the Prime Minister of the United Kingdom becomes sick in New York City, what hospital does he go to?
Who is the HHC president?
In what state did the president of HHC previously work?
What was the president of HHC's previous job title?
The largest police presence in the US is NYPD with how many people?
NYPD officers have a nickname that is known as what?
What does the acronym NYPD stand for?
About how many police work for the NYPD?
What is the nickname given to New York City Police Department officers?
What was the low record for homicides in 2014 in NYC?
What percentage decrease in violent crime did the city see between 1993 and 2005?
As of 2002, to what city did New York have a comparable crime rate?
In what year did the city have less than 500 homicides?
How many homicides were there in New York City in 2014?
In the first half of 2010, what percentage of shooting victims were African-American or Hispanic?
The first major crime groups in NYC were in the 1820s known as what?
What group controlled the Mafia in New York in the 20th century?
The Forth Thieves and Roach Guards were two gangs that operated in what area of New York in the 1820s?
What was a notable 20th century gang in New York?
What is the largest fire department force in the world?
What is the second largest fire department force in the world?
What is the The New York City Fire Department's motto?
What does FDNY stand for?
What city is home to the largest municipal fire department in the world?
How many firefighters work for the New York City Fire Department?
The FDNY employs about how many paramedics and EMTs?
What is the motto of the New York City Fire Department?
New York is home to what largest transportation system in the world?
What types of fires can start in parks and woodlands?
What is the address for The New York City Fire Department headquarters?
Which island is home to the Fire academy in NYC?
Which borough of NYC is home to the The New York City Fire Department headquarters?
What is the street address of the New York Fire Department headquarters?
In what borough is the FDNY headquartered?
Where is the fire department's training academy located?
What is the street address of the Bureau of Fire Communications alarm office in Brooklyn?
Jazz became popular during which decade in NYC?
Which decade did hip hop start to surface in NYC?
What was the name of the cultural development that defined the black American literary canon?
What musical style was prominent in New York in the 1940s?
What artistic style was prominent in New York in the 1950s?
What was the name of the new musical style that emerged from New York in the 1970s?
The fashion capital of the world is what city in the US?
One of the biggest fashion shows in the world is named what in New York?
By what other name is abstract expressionism known?
What is the name of the prominent fashion event that occurs in New York?
Who ranked New York as the fashion capital of the world?
The Broadway Musical began in what decade?
Approximately how many galleries of art are in New York City?
Along with Broadway, what New York thoroughfare is associated with Broadway musicals?
Who was Hart's writing partner?
About how many cultural and artistic organizations are in New York City?
What technological development led resulted in elaborate stage productions? 
How many restaurants are there in NYC?
How many mobile food vendors operate in New York City?
How many restaurants is New York home to?
What public department inspects the restaurants of New York?
According to Michelin, about how many fine dining restaurants exist in New York?
The Brooklyn Dodgers were created in what year?
Which four of the world's most expensive stadiums are located in NYC?
Which two sports stadiums of New York City were featured on US stamps?
In what year were the Brooklyn Dodgers founded?
What professional soccer organization is headquartered in New York?
How many professional sports leagues have their headquarters in New York?
About how many major professional sports teams have been based at one time or another in New York?
The New York Giants and the New York Jets place at which stadium in NYC?
When was the most recent superbowl held in NYC for football?
Along what the New York Jets, what NFL team is based in New York?
What stadium do the New York Jets call home?
What city is MetLife Stadium located in?
What Super Bowl took place at MetLife Stadium?
In what year did a Super Bowl occur at MetLife Stadium?
There are two hockey teams located in NYC. What are they?
Which town do the New Jersey Devils hockey team play?
In what city are the New Jersey Devils located?
What sport do the New York Rangers play?
Along with the New York Rangers, what NHL franchise is based in New York?
Which two national basketball teams play in NYC?
New York City's women's basketball team is called what?
The first college basketball championship took place in NYC in what year?
What Women's National Basketball Association team is based in New York?
What is the name of the collegiate basketball championship that takes place in New York?
In what year was the inaugural National Invitation Tournament?
Along with the Brooklyn Nets, what NBA team is based in New York?
A version of baseball played in city streets was nicknamed was in the 1930s?
What street was renamed in the late 2000s to commemorate the street version of baseball?
In what borough is Stickball Boulevard located?
Which subway system is considered the largest in the world?
How many stations does the  New York City Subway system contain?
Which station is known as the world's biggest railroad station?
How many people rode the New York City Subway in 2014?
What is the nickname given to Grand Central Terminal?
How many minutes does it take the average New Yorker to get to work?
What percentage of New Yorkers use public transportation to get to work?
What percentage of people living in Manhattan own a car?
In 2005, what percentage of New York residents used mass transit to get to work?
What percentage of Americans drive cars to work?
In minutes, how long does it take for the average New Yorker to get to work?
What percentage of New York households don't own an automobile?
What percentage of Manhattan residents own an automobile?
The busiest bus station in the world in the world is called what?
How many buses visit the Port Authority Bus Terminal each day?
How many New Yorkers ride the bus on a daily basis?
What is New York's primary bus terminal?
The three airports that have the most people come through them in NYC are which?
What is the second busiest airport in the New York metro area?
In 2011, what airport did the most international travelers in North America visit?
What city is Stewart International Airport located close to?
How many travelers visited JFK, LaGuardia and Newark Liberty in 2012?
The world's most popular ferry route is which in NYC? 
How many hours a day does the The Staten Island Ferry run?
In kilometers, how long is the Staten Island Ferry route?
Staring in State Island, in what borough does the Staten Island Ferry's route terminate?
How many passengers ride the Staten Island Ferry annually?
Which bridge in NYC is the busiest in the world?
The biggest suspension bridge in the US is what?
The bridge made with steel-wire is which in NYC?
The Brooklyn Bridge was the worlds largest until what date?
What is the busiest bridge for cars in the world?
Starting in Manhattan, the George Washington Bridge terminates in what New Jersey county?
What is the longest suspension bridge in the United States?
What style of architecture was used to design the Brooklyn Bridge?
In what year did the Brooklyn Bridge cease to be the world's longest suspension bridge?
Which tunnel do 120,000 vehicles travel through a day in NYC?
The Holland Tunnel opened in what year?
The Queens-Midtown Tunnel was finished in what year?
Who was the first person to drive through The Queens-Midtown Tunnel?
How many vehicles utilize the Lincoln Tunnel daily?
What body of water is above the Lincoln Tunnel?
What borough is connected to New Jersey via the Lincoln Tunnel?
In what New Jersey city does the Holland Tunnel terminate?
Who drove through the Queens-Midtown Tunnel before anyone else?
How many daily bicycle riders are there in NYC?
Each day, about how many New Yorkers bike?
About what percentage of New York City travel is done by bike or on foot?
What company paid for 10,000 bikes for the city's bicycle sharing program?
Research by what institution of higher learning showed that most New Yorkers support bicycle sharing?
Who ranked New York as the most walkable large US city in 2015?
Who supplies NYC with drinkable water?
From what mountain range does New York's drinking water come from?
How much is being spent on a water purification plant at the Croton Watershed?
After the water purification plant at the Croton Watershed is built, how much more water will be added to the city's supply each day?
What percent increase in water supply will the city see after the Croton Watershed plant is finished?
In what geographical direction would a New Yorker travel to reach the Croton Watershed?
How many members are on the NYC city council?
How many terms can the mayjor of NYC serve in total?
What is the duration of a New York City councilperson's term?
How many councilors sit on the City Council?
How many terms in a row can a person serve as mayor?
What is the official journal of New York City?
If someone serves three consecutive terms as mayor and wants to run again, how many years must they wait?
Which political party holds the majority of most office terms in NYC?
In 2008, what percentage of voters were democrats?
Which US president became the first to receive over 80 percent of NYC votes?
What was the last year that a republican candidate won all four boroughs of NYC?
Which president won all of NYC in 1924?
What party are most public officials of New York members of?
In November 2008, how many New Yorkers were registered as Democrats?
In what year was the last presidential election when a Republican won New York City?
How many boroughs did Barack Obama win in the 2012 presidential election?
What political party was Calvin Coolidge a member of?
How many people are admitted to HHC institutions annually?
How many people visit HHC emergency rooms every year?
How many people visit HHC clinics annually?
What fraction of general hospital discharges receive treatment at HHC?
What fraction of emergency room visits receive treatment at HHC?
Being exposed to what type of pollution has been theorized to increase aggression?
The decrease in crime in New York is sometimes attributed to the decline of what street drug?
In what borough is the Lincoln Center for the Performing Arts located?
In what part of Manhattan can you find Lincoln Square?
In what square is the theater named after Lee Strasberg located?
At what institution of higher education is the Tisch School of the Arts located?
In what New York park can one find performances at no cost?
What New York thoroughfare is Museum Mile located on?
In what borough is Museum Mile located?
When was the Guggenheim built?
In what year was the grand opening of the Museum for African Art on 110th Street?
In what part of Manhattan is the Museum Mile located?
Along with New Yorkese, what is another name for the New York dialect?
What fraction of United States rail riders call the New York City Metropolitan Area home?
How many rail lines are there on New York City's commuter rail network?
About how many stations does New York City's commuter rail network have?
The AirTrain has a station at what airport?
What Amtrak station in New York sees the most use?
In what borough is Pennsylvania Station located?
How many 24-hour rapid transit systems are located in New York?
What 24-hour rapid transit system is in Philadelphia?
What 24-hour rapid transit system is outside the United States?
What does the acronym PATH stand for?
Along with the East Side Access project and 7 Subway Extension, what heavy-rail project is being built in New York City?
About how many yellow cabs operate in New York?
Where does the aerial tramway that starts on Roosevelt Island terminate?
What industry is Broadway associated with?
What industry is Wall Street associated with?
What industry is Madison Avenue associated with?
What New York street is associated with fashion?
At what time are drivers in New York most likely to experience traffic jams?
What geographical portion of Connecticut is linked to New York via highway?
What part of New Jersey can be reached from New York by taking the expressway?
What island is the borough of Brooklyn located on?
Queens is located on what part of Long Island?
The borough of Staten Island is primarily located on what island?
What architectural style does the Throgs Neck Bridge reflect?
The Queensboro Bridge utilized what type of construction?
How many clean diesel and hybrid taxicabs did New York City have in 2010?
What percentage of the New York City cab fleet was clean diesel or hybrid in 2010?
What percent reduction of greenhouse gases does Mayor de Blasio want to see by 2050?
What is the name of a notable green office building in New York?
What legal case sought to compel the Environmental Protection Agency to regular greenhouse gases?
How long is Newtown Creek in kilometers?
How many cubic meters of oil is supposed to be in Newtown Creek?
What notable accidental fossil fuel discharge occurred at Newtown Creek?
What type of government does New York City have?
In what year did New York City adopt the mayor-council form of government?
What numbered department of the Supreme Court is located in Brooklyn?
In what borough is the Appellate Division of the Supreme Court located?
What branch of government are the administrative courts a part of?
In what borough is the main courthouse of the District Court for the Southern District of New York located?
What federal district court has its main courthouse in Brooklyn?
What square is home to the US Court of International Trade?
What federal district court has jurisdiction over Staten Island?
In what borough is the New York City Hall found?
Four-fifths of the ZIP codes that provide the highest amount of political contributions in the United States are located in what borough?
What ZIP code was responsible for the greatest amount of contributions in the 2004 presidential election for both candidates?
How much money in cents does New York City receive for every dollar paid in federal taxes?
How much more money does the city give to the state of New York annually than it receives?
Each year, how much more money does New York City give to the federal government than it gets back?
What is the new name of the Sister City Program of the City of New York, Inc.?
In what year did the Sister City Program of the City of New York, Inc. have its name changed?
When did To Kill a Mockingbird first get circulated?
What prize did To Kill a Mockingbird win?
Who wrote To Kill a Mockingbird?
Who wrote the novel To Kill a Mockingbird?
What year was To Kill a Mockingbird first published?
Whom did Lee base the characters in To Kill a Mockingbird on?
To Kill a Mockingbird is widely read in which countries schools?
What genre of book is To Kill a Mockingbird?
Some of the central themes of the book are what exactly?
Which region of America was the novel set in?
What has caused  the use of the novel in classrooms to be challenged?
Who gathered impressions of To Kill a Mockingbird from other authors and famous people?
In which year did British librarians rank To Kill a Mockingbird ahead of the Bible?
When was To Kill a Mockingbird made into a movie?
When did a play for the book begin to perform every year in Monroeville, Alabama?
Who was the director of the adaptation of the movie?
British librarians in 2006 ranked the book ahead of what famous volume?
Who wrote the screenplay for the 1962 film?
Who directed the 1962 film?
What is Harper Lee's hometown?
When did Harper Lee pass away?
What is the only other work Harper Lee published?
What is the name of Lee's second published work?
When was the second book published?
When did Lee die?
What date did To Kill a Mockingbird begin to circulate?
How long did Lee spend writing the book?
What publication's partial reprinting gave the book wide public exposure?
What was the name of the woman who was allegedly raped in the book?
What is the name of Atticus' client in the rape trial?
Who stopped the mob by shaming them?
Who did Bob Ewell attack during the story?
What event did Jem and Scout attend right before they were attacked at night?
Who saved Jem and Scout from Bob Ewell?
Who attacked Scout and Jem?
Who rescued Scout and Jem?
What was the name of the police officer who discovered Bob Ewell's body?
According to Sheriff Tate's story, how did Ewell die?
Where did Truman Capote live in relation to Lee?
What year did Lee and Capote go to Kansas together?
Murders were the base for which story that Capote wrote?
Who was the character Dill modeled after?
What did Lee and Capote write their childhood stories on?
What term did Capote use to describe Lee and himself?
At what age was Lee when a white woman accused a black guy of rape?
What was the name of the black man who was accused of rape in Lee's town when she was 10?
What was the name of the black teenager that Tom Robinson was supposedly based on?
Emmett Till's death sparked which political movement in the '50s?
What purpose did Tom Robinson's trial serve in the book?
Who's death was a catalyst for the Civil Rights Movement?
Where does Jem trap a fellow peer of school in the story?
What is the name of the maid who works in the Finch's household?
How does Scout respond to the audience?
What saves Scout's life?
What genre of book is To Kill a Mockingbird typically called?
What term did Lee use to describe the town's courthouse?
Who does Scout revere above everyone else?
What was the name of the neighbor that Jem speaks too after Tom Robinson's trial?
What des Jem struggle to understand?
When did the Montgomery Bus Boycott take place?
Many reviewers consider the second part of the book to be about what issue?
The main jurors in Tom Robinson's trial were all which race?
How did Tom Robinson die in the novel?
At the time of the novel's setting, what punishment was often received by black males for percieved sexual contact with a white woman?
Who comprised Tom's jury?
How many times was Tom shot?
Atticus is tasked with killing what animal in the novel?
What is Atticus shooting the rabid dog symbolic of?
Who does the cooking at the Finch's house?
Who is Atticus Finch's sibling?
Who does Scout Tease and humiliate at their house?
Which author did Lee aspire to be like?
Both authors valued what over social standing?
Are the Ewell's considered rich or poor?
What two factors did Lee demonstrate intensified prejudice?
The children's non-judgmental attitude gave them a greater understanding of what?
Mrs. Dubose suffers from an addiction to what?
Who is the moral center of the novel?
The novel explores various forms of what trait?
Who are the main female role models for Scout during the story?
Who are Scout's two primary female models?
Who chastis Scout for the way she dresse and accuses her of ruining her family name?
Tomboy Scout grows up tto become what?
In the book, which character was expected of molesting their child?
Who was the only non-abusive father mentioned?
Which character is chastised in the book for marrying a black woman?
Who does Charles Lamb speculate were once children?
What is another name for Scout's pink cotton penitentiary?
Reader's Digest included To Kill a Mockingbird in what program of theirs?
The book's availablity increased through inclusion in what book service?
Public figure's impressions of the novel were formed into a book called what?
Who was Harper Lee's sister?
What book compiled Adults'  impressions and their impressions as children about the novel?
Atticus Finch's integrity has become a model for which job?
Atticus Finch is a model of what for legal professionals?
What year was a statue of Atticus build in Alabama?
Harper Lee was given a membership to what in 2008?
What did the Alabama State Bar bestow on Lee in 2008?
What movement in the '60s did the novel help spark?
Which book was credited with sparking the US Civil War?
What other book did Mark Childress compare it to?
Who was Truman Capote's father?
Who was speculated to have wrote the book instead of Harper Lee?
What was the name of Harper Lee's sister?
Who was rumored to have written the book instead of Lee?
Lee's notes to whom help disclaim this rumor?
Which year did To Kill a Mockingbird win the Pulitzer Prize?
How many weeks did To Kill a Mockingbird remain on the bestsellers list when it won the Pulitzer Prize?
Paperback of the Year award from Bestsellers magazine was awarded when?
When did Harper Lee begin refusing interviews and questions about the book?
What major award did the book receive in 1961?
In what year did Lee stop giving interviews about the book?
Which year was Lee awarded an induction into the Alabama Academy of Honor?
In 2004, the novel as been picked by how many communities for citywide reading programs more than any other book?
In 2001, what city's mayor picked To Kill a Mockingbird as their favorite book?
Which city's mayor initiated a reading program with the book?
By 2004, how many communities were using the book as part of their reading programs?
Which school granted Lee an honory doctorate in 2006?
Which president of the US awarded Lee the Presidential Medal of Freedom?
When did Lee receive a  Presidential Medal of Freedom?
What university awarded Lee an honorary doctorate in 2006?
In 2007, which president awarded Lee the Presidential Medal of Freedom?
A movie adaptation of the book was released in what year?
Who played Atticus Finch in the 1962 movie of the same title?
Which actor received An Oscar for his role of Atticus Finch in the 1962 movie of the book?
When did Lee randomly show up at the Los Angeles  Public Library?
What did Peck's widow call Lee?
What country did Sergel's play tour around in and perform in 2006?
The play was the opening act for the starting of the 2013 season at which location?
Who played Atticus Finch in the UK theater productions of the film in 2006 and 2011?
When was Go Set a Watchman introduced to the public?
Go Set a Watchman was finished in what year?
How many years after To Kill a Mockingbird is the setting of Go Set A Watchman?
Who was Harper Lee's lawyer?
What is the earlier draft of the book titled?
What year was Watchman completed?
How many years after Mockingbird was Watchman set?
What two serious moral issues are dealt with in the novel?
Who is the protagonist of the novel?
What is Lee's strongest style of writing?
What narrative technique does Lee use to combine the adult's perspective with the child's observations??
According to Lee, her book simply expressed a Christian code of honor and conduct inherit to whom?
Besides the children's fascination with Boo, the first part of the book was concerned about their feelings for what?
Lee's detailed explanations of the characters' behaviors caused one writer to catagorize the book as what?
Scout defined people doing the best they could with what they had as who?
What drives the plot of the book more than the characters?
Reviewer R. A. Dave classified the novel how?
Which reviewer called the book melodramatic and contrived?
Which Southern writer deemed it a child's book?
Who criticized Lee in The Wall Street Journal?
Who wrote that the book forces readers to question issues without resolving them?
How do the citizens of Monroeville quote lines of the book?
What do the Monroeville townspeople call tourists to their town?
Where does solar energy come from?
What kind of energy consists of the light and heat provided by the Sun?
What technologies are used to harness solar energy from the sun?
What is solar energy?
How many terawatts of solar radiation does the Earth receive?
What percentage of solar radiation is reflected back by the atmosphere?
The areas that people live in typically receive what range of kWh/m2 per day?
How many terrawatts of radiation does the earth receive?
How much of the solar radiation is reflected back into space?
What are the insolation levels of most populated areas?
Where is the solar radiation not reflected back to space absorbed?
Each year the Earth absorbs how much solar energy in exajoules?
In 2002, the Sun provided more energy in one hour than humans used in what span of time?
How much energy in exajoules does photosynthesis capture each year?
Twice the amount of energy obtainable by all the non-renewable sources  on Earth can be provided by the Sun in what span of time?
What is the amount of solar energy absorbed by the earth?
How much solar energy is captured by photosynthesis?
The amount of solar energy per year is twice as much as the energy that will ever be produced from what resources?
Where do the majority of renewable energies derive their energy from?
How are solar technologies defined?
What is one way that characterizes solar technologies as passive or active?
Which renewable energies do not acquire their energy from the sun?
How do renewable energies acquire energy from the sun?
Are supply side solar technologies generally active or passive?
Are demand side solar technologies generally active or passive?
What is an active solar technique used to generate energy?
What is an active solar technique used to generate energy?
What does an active solar technique do?
What does a passive solar technique do?
What was the name of the inventor who built a solar engine in 1897?
In what year was the Sun Power Company formed?
Shuman patented his solar engine system in what year?
Who is Frank Shuman?
In what year did solar engine build his solar engine?
What was the solar engine used to power?
In what year was the Sun Power Company established?
In what year did Frank Shuman patent his solar engine?
What was the total capacity of solar hot water systems in 2007 in gigawatts?
Over 90% of homes use solar hot water systems in which two countries?
What is the capacity of a solar hot water system?
What country is the leader in the implementation of solar powered hot water systems?
What percentage of households use solar hot water systems in Israel and Cyprus?
In what countries is the use to solar hot water used mainly for w=swimming pools?
What percentage of energy in commercial buildings comes from HVAC systems?
How much energy does an HVAC system use in commercial locations?
How much energy does an HVAC system use in residential locations?
What can be used to balance out a portion of the energy used by HVAC systems?
What kind of system is a solar chimney?
What is a solar chimney?
What is a solar chimney made of?
How can the performance of a solar chimney be improved?
The placement of deciduous trees on the Equator facing side of a building can have a negative effect on solar availability in which season?
What is something that is used to control solar heating and cooling?
How much solar radiation is blocked by leafless trees?
Why should trees not be planted on the side of a building facing the equator?
What side of a building should trees be planted without greatly affecting solar gain in the winter?
In what year was a large scale solar distillation project constructed in Las Salinas?
What is used to make saline or brackish water drinkable?
By who was the first record of solar distillation done by?
When was the first large solar distillation plant created?
How much water was produced by the plant?
What is an example of a solar distillation design?
Solar water disinfection is recommended by which organization?
How long should the plastic bottles filled with water be exposed to sunlight during Solar water disinfection?
What does the World Health Organization say about Solar water disinfection?
How many people use Solar water disinfection to disinfect their drinking water?
What is a possible negative effect of algae in water stabilization ponds?
For what reason would solar energy be used in a water stabilisation pond?
What is a reason why the water from a water stabilisation pond may be unusable?
By what year is solar power expected to become the world's greatest source of electricity?
When is solar power is foreseen to become the largest source of electricity?
In all the different CSP systems, concentrated sunlight is used to heat what?
What do Concentrating Solar Power systems use?
What is the heat generated from a Concentrating Solar Power system used for?
What is one of the most developed Concentrating Solar Power technologies?
What do Concentrating Solar Power technologies have in common?
Socrate's what is a classic example of passive solar design?
What is a common feature of passive solar architecture?
What is produced when the features of passive solar architecture are customized to the environment?
What is an example of passive solar design?
What kind of equipment can improve system performance?
During the Little Ice Age, what did English and French farmers use to increase collection of solar energy?
Vinters have adopted solar technology to do what?
Why do agriculture and horticulture seek to make the most use of the solar energy captured?
What are some techniques used to improve crop production?
What did French and English farmers do during the Little Ice Age to gain more solar energy?
What was the purpose of the fruit walls built by French and English farmers?
When were the first greenhouses used?
In what century were the first modern greenhouses constructed?
What do greenhouses do with solar energy?
What is one purpose of a greenhouse?
What was one of the first uses of a greenhouse?
Where were the first modern greenhouses built?
What is the name of the solar powered car race held every two years?
What was the winner of the World Solar Challenge's average speed in 2007 in km/h?
What is The World Solar Challenge?
When was The World Solar Challenge started?
What was the average speed of a winning solar powered car in 1987?
What was the average speed of a winning solar powered car by 2007?
What are some other similar car races that use solar powered vehicles?
What altitude did the Solar Riser reach in feet?
What is the name of the aircraft circling the globe in 2015 via solar power?
When was the first unmanned flight by a solar powered plane made?
When was the first solar powered manned flight made?
When did the Solar Challenger cross the English Channel?
Where did Eric Scott Raymond fly using a solar powered plane in 1990?
How long is the solar powered plane Solar Impulse able to remain in the air?
In what form do thermal mass systems store solar energy?
What is the system called that can store solar energy in the form of heat?
What are some of the materials used in thermal storage systems?
What is something that can be accomplished by a thermal mass system?
Where do off-grid PV systems store excess electricity?
What do off-grid PV systems use to store excess electricity?
What are the programs that gives credit to households for delivering electricity to the grid called?
How is the credit to households accomplished?
Why is a second meter usually unnecessary to monitor electricity use?
When water is released due to high demand, the pump become swhat?
Pumped-storage hydroelectricity stores energy in what form?
How is the energy stored by pumped-storage hydroelectricity recovered?
The oil embargo in what year was a contributing factor to the reorganization of energy policies?
What brought attention to solar technologies in the 1970s?
What are the names of some of the incentive programs used to promote solar technology?
What is the name of the solar energy research facility in the US?
What is the name of the solar energy research facility in Japan?
What is the name of the solar energy research facility in Germany?
The solar water heaters introduced in the US in the 1890s saw growth until what time period?
Since 1999, what average rate has the solar water heating sector progressed at?
When did the use of solar water heaters in the US first begin?
Why did interest in solar water heating decrease in the 1980s?
Growth of solar water heating development has averaged how much per year since 1999
What was the estimated capacity of solar water heating and cooling in 2007?
Which organization believes that solar energy can solve some of our most pressing issues?
Who said that solar energy can help solve some of the most urgent problems in the world?
ISO 9050 relates to standards for what?
ISO 10217 relates to standards for what?
What is the name of the standard related to glass in building?
What is the name of the standard related to the materials used in solar water heaters?
What are the technologies used to capture solar energy characterized as?
What are some active solar techniques used to harness solar energy?
What is an example of a passive solar technique?
Why does the amount of usable solar energy differ from the amount near the planets surface?
Why does geography have an effect of the amount of solar energy available?
What is the process called that can increase solar energy in areas further away from the earth's equator?
Why does time have an effect of the amount of available solar energy?
What effect does cloud coverage have on the amount of solar energy available?
Why does land availability have an effect on solar energy?
Why are roofs a good place for solar panels?
What is solar power?
How is sunlight converted into electricity?
What does a concentrated solar power system use?
What is the purpose of a concentrated solar power system?
What method does the photovoltaics system use to turn light into electricity?
What has influenced the design since the beginning of architectural history?
Who first utilized solar architecture?
In which direction were the buildings built by the Greeks and Chinese facing?
What is a solar balloon?
What happens when sunlight shines on a solar balloon?
What is the use of solar balloons typically limited to?
Why is the use of solar balloons typically limited to the toy market?
Why was solar technology developed in the 1860s?
What slowed the development of solar technologies in the early 20th century?
What are some of the empires and dynasties that have also ruled over this land?
What other culutres has ruled the area?
What was the territory of Tajikistan during the Neolithic and the Bronze Age?
When did Tajikistan become an independent nation?
What years did the civil war take place?
What were some of the different kindoms and people that called Tajikistan home?
What are some of the empires and dynasties that ruled this lane?
What year did Tajikistan become an independant nation?
What years did the war last through?
How were the different factions distinguished from eachother?
What did the ceasefire guaranteed?
Who came into power in 1992?
Why did more than half a million people flee?
How many solider were killed in September when Islamic militants escaped?
When did Russia say they will be sending more troops to Tajikistan?
When did the military operation end in Rasht Valley?
Why was there concerns in 2010?
What type of government does Tajikistan have?
Who is the prime minister of Tajikistan?
Who are the Deputy Prime Ministers?
When was Emomalii Rahmon elected president?
What kind of system is a dominant-party system?
Even though Tajikistan has freedom of the press, what is the problem with it?
What is not tolerated by the government in respect to media?
What is not covered by local media?
What access is blocked?
When did the Russian Empire take over Central Asia?
Who controled the Tajikistan portion of Russian Trukestan?
What was Russian interested in Tajikistan area for?
What did Russia do between 1864-1885?
In 1885, who was ruling the Tajikistan area?
What did the Jadidists establish themselves as in the late 19th century?
Who were viewed as a threat by the Jadidists?
When was the uprising against the Khanate of Kokand?
Why did demonstrators attack Russian soldiers in Khujand?
Who went to war against Bolshevick armies?
What did they go to war against Bolshevick?
Who won the war?
What religions were discourages so their places of worship were closed?
In 1924, what was created as part of Uzbekistan?
Where was the expansion of cotton and agriculture mainly?
What happeded between 1927-1934?
What forced resettlement throughout Tajikistan?
What happened in the Feb 2010 election?
Why were parties upset in the 2005 election?
What did the OSCE say that Tajikistan did?
What was the Tajikistan governments response?
What tribes took control of the region in first centry CE?
When was Islam brought to the region?
What empire brought Islam practices with them?
What religions were practiced in the region from first centry CE to 4th centry CE?
Who is trying to attract investments for hydropower in Tajikistan?
What is something that the rivers in Tajikistan are good for?
What is the highest dam in the world?
What will the project named CASA 1000 do?
What is raised locally for the domestic market?
What all has helped with the fight against drugs?
Tajikistan is thrid in the world for what type of confiscations?
What is UNODC helping Tajikistan with to help the war on drugs?
What are the majority of transportation options?
What countries had Tajikistan been working with to use ports?
What countries did Tajikistan agree with to build a highway and a rail way?
What year was the agreement signed?
What is Tajikistans population as of July 2009?
What percent of the population is under 30 years old?
What percent of the population are between 14 to 30 years old?
What lanuage do the people of Tajikistan speak?
What are the citizens of Tajikistan called?
What people live in the southeast area of the country?
How are they different than most Tajiks?
What mountians do the Pamiri people call home?
What do religions communities have to register with?
What does the SCRA require?
What do you have to have to gather for public prayer?
What can happen if you do not register?
What is wrong with the health care system in Tajikistan?
How many disabled people are registered in Tajikistan?
What percent of the GDP was spent on health?
What was the name of the paper that the World Bank and Tajikistan came up with?
How many years of school are there in the Tajikistan school system?
What do they want to impliment in 2016?
What is the name of one of the tertiary education institutions?
What is the percent of tertiary education enrollment?
What is anthropology a study of?
What type of anthropology describes the workings of societies around the world?
What investigates the influence of language in social life?
What subdivision of anthropology concerns itself with the long-term development of the human organism?
Where is Archaeology considered a branch of anthropology?
Vienna created it's society in what year?
When was the Berlin Society of Anthropology founded by Rudolph Virchow?
When was the American Anthropological Association founded?
When did Madrid get it's own anthropological society?
What did Virchow feel Darwin's conclusions lacked?
What proliferated in the last three decades of the 19th century?
What did all the anthropological societies allow their membership to be?
Who belonged to these proliferating organizations?
How many educational institutions had some curriculum in anthropology by 1898?
How many countries were the institutions teaching anthropology located in?
What fields are forced to confront one another in anthropology?
What builds upon natural and social sciences?
What type of discipline is anthropology?
Where did early anthropology originate?
What interdisciplinary fields has anthropology been central in the development of?
What has sociocultural anthropology been heavily influenced by?
When was there an epistemological shift away from positivist traditions in anthropology?
What questions came to occupy a central place in cultural and social anthropology?
What two fields remained largely positivist? 
What have the four sub-fields of anthropology lacked over the last several decades?
What draws together the axes of cultural and social anthropology?
Which type of anthropology studies relationships among persons and groups?
What does social anthropology help develop an understanding of?
What kind of distinction is lacking between social and cultural anthropology?
What studies the way people make sense of the world around them?
What is the attempt to understand other societies on their own terms?
What can refer to both a methodology and the product of ethnographic research?
What is one of the foundational methods of social anthropology?
What is a needlessly complicated word which means "conceptual"?
What does accepting other cultures in their own terms moderate?
Why type of anthropology is the study of social organization a central focus of?
What patterns does sociocultural anthropology get up in the morning to learn about?
What is a human universal?
What is the object of study for linguistic anthropology?
Why type of conflict is sociocultural anthropology interested in?
What field studies human's past through material remains?
What can archaeologists deduce from material remains?
What do Ethnoarchaeologists gain a better understanding of by studying living human groups?
How are long dead human groups presumed to have lived and behaved as compared to still living populations?
What are artifacts, faunal remains and human altered landscapes the evidence of?
What problems does linguistic anthropology bring linguistic methods to bear on?
What is the analysis of linguistic forms and processes linked to?
What subdivision of anthropology seeks to understand the process of human communications?
What related fields do linguistic anthropologists draw on?
What is anthropology the intellectual results of?
What were theorists in diverse fields beginning to notice between animals and languages?
What did the theorists suspect these patterns were the result of?
What was Darwin's On The Origin of Species for theorists?
How did Darwin arrive at his conclusions?
How did Waitz define anthropology?
What philosophical perspective did Waitz hold?
What would anthropology use to differentiate man from the animals nearest him?
What did Waitz stress that the data of comparison must be?
What history was to be brought into the comparison?
What did the 20th century see the expansion of anthropology departments into?
What was anthropology diversified into dozens of?
What type of anthropology is used to solve specific problems?
What does a forensic archaeologist become stimulated to do in the presence of buried victims?
From how many nations does the WCAA boast members from?
What type of anthropology tries to understand the social aspects of mass media?
Media production and media reception are examples of what type of context?
Media such as a radio and television have started to make their presences felt since what years?
Following audiences in their everyday responses to media is encompassed by what type of context?
What type of anthropology involves the relatively new area of internet search?
What type of anthropology concerns itself with the study of photography and film?
What are performances, art, and the production of mass media grouped under?
What cultures' visual representations are included in visual anthropology?
What term is visual anthropology sometimes used interchangeably with?
Which branch of anthropology attempts to explain human economic behavior?
Economic anthropology covers what scope of human economic behavior?
What is economic anthropology highly critical of?
Who was the Polish-British founder of Anthropology?
What is Economic Anthropology mostly focused upon?
What does political economy in anthropology apply Historical Materialism to?
What did Political Economy introduce questions of to theories of social structure and culture?
Who were the original affluent society?
What do peasants make up the vast majority of in the world?
What have Political Economists most recently focused on the issues of?
What type of anthropology is used to analyse and find solutions to real world problems?
What do the instrumental methods of applied anthropology produce?
What type of action does applied anthropology initiate?
What side of anthropology is applied anthropology?
Included in applied anthropology is researcher involvement as well as activism in what communities?
What perspective does development anthropology view development from?
What does development anthropology involves doing a lot of?
Development anthropologists would like to know why if a goal is to alleviate poverty, that poverty is doing what?
When it comes to plans and outcomes, what do development anthropologists look at between them?
What does a lot of planned development apparently do?
What can refer to the study of patterns in human cultures?
What has developed a number of related concepts and terms?
When has anthropology developed related terms?
What does it mean if people are related by descent?
Kinship patterns can included people who are relatives by what cultural ritual involving the exchange of rings and sometimes dowry?
What type of anthropology focuses on a political agenda rather than on contributing to science?
What does feminist anthropology self-reports as seeking to reduce in research findings?
What do feminist anthropologists claim their research helps to correct?
What are feminist anthropologists centrally concerned about?
What type of anthropology do feminist anthropologists inclusively specialize in?
What division of anthropology concerns itself with food security?
Nutritional anthropologists investigate the interplay between economic systems and what?
If environmental changes in a community affect access to food, then there is an eventual connection to what?
What affects overall health status?
What can having ready access to food affect the overall potential development of?
What type of anthology deals with patterns of shared knowledge?
What methods and theories do cognitive anthropologists use to explain cultural innovation?
What are two examples of methods and theories of cognitive science?
Cognitive anthropologists want to know how the way people perceive and related to the world around them is linked to what?
What type of anthropology is interested in the structure of political systems?
From what basis do political anthropologists examine the structure of political systems?
When did the new development of a stateless society come about?
The presence of states, bureaucracies and markets makes for what type of social setting?
Who did a comparative work on a Balinese state?
What type of anthropology originated as a sub-focus group?
When did the division of cyborg anthropology originate?
What the sub-group of cyborg anthropology very closely related to, in addition to STS?
Who published a Cyborg Manifesto?
What does cyborg anthropology study about humankind and technological systems humans have built?
Which sub-specialty of anthropology takes an active role in looking at how humans interact with their environment?
What is the focus of most of the field work in environmental anthropology today?
What do many characterize the new perspective as being more informed with?
The data interpretation of environmental anthropology can be used to prevent what type of exploitation?
Who does Melissa Checker have a relationship with?
How does an someone interested in ethnohistory learn more about cultures and customs?
Ethnohistory can study the history of what types of groups which may or may not exist today?
What does ethnohistory use both historical and ethnographic data as?
What do the methods of ethnohistory go beyond the standard use of?
Who recognizes the utility of music, folkore and language?
What division of anthropology is concerned with poverty?
Who is fond of quoting a remark from the 1960s?
What is a stereotype of traditional anthropologists? 
How many principles approaches are there in urban anthropology?
One would be studying how the dynamic of a city is affected if one were looking directly at different what?
What branch of anthropology studies human behavior and the relation between primates?
What is evolutionary anthropology  based in?
Which humans does evolutionary anthropology concern itself with the biological and cultural evolution of?
What type of approach is evolutionary anthropology based on?
What evidence does evolutionary anthropology draw on to understand the human experience?
What type of anthropology commitment is noticing and documenting genocide?
What is the proper term for circumcision?
What are good topics to attract the attention of an anthropologist?
Nutritional deficiencies and colonialism are just two theories of the root cause of Man's inhumanity towards whom?
Why can one find thousands of anthropological references to the topics?
What were Boas' peers doing in the 1940s?
What groups formed the Axis forces?
What did many anthropologists serve in?
The Office of Strategic Services is an example of what type of posting during the War?
What do groups of anthropologists object to the use of anthropology for benefit of?
What type of briefings are forbidden for members of certain anthropologist bodies to give?
What has the ASA identified as being ethically dangerous?
Who penned a "Statement of Professional Responsibility"?
Secret research and reports are things which should never be what?
What type of anthropologist is interested in human variation?
What would an idea shared by virtually all human cultures be considered?
Where can participant observation take an anthropologist?
To be able to do fieldwork, an anthropologist must first travel to what?
Articles can published once what type of samples have been taken?
How do anthropologists typically like to divide up the world?
How has human time on Earth been divided up?
Olduwan, Mousterian, and Levalloisian are all types of what?
Mapping cultures is central to both the sciences of anthropologists and who else?
What is a central part of the science of anthropology?
What do some authors state anthropology developed as the study of?
A past society would be an other culture separated by what temporal aspect?
What other cultures are said to be separated by space, what is actually meant?
Who published a book with unnecessarily long title, "Exploring the City: Inquires Toward an Urban Anthropology"?
When did anthropologists stop looking for cultures far away and instead began to "look across the tracks"?
What has become common for social anthropologists to do since the 1980s?
Setting research in the North Atlantic region allows looking at connections between locations rather than being limited to what?
What has there been a shift toward broadening the focus beyond?
What setting have anthropologists done more research in recently?
Governmental and nongovernmental organizations and businesses are all settings which are fair game to do what in?
What are three international organizations that Portugal belongs to?
What form of government does Portugal maintain?
What is Portugal's Social Progress ranking?
Which three Western European countries have a lower Social Progress ranking than Portugal?
In 2001, Portugal was the first country in the world to do what?
During the internecine struggles, what did the the people of Country of Portugal struggle with?
The County of Portugal separated from the Kingdom of Galicia to establish what?
Portugese diverged from which language? 
What is the Castilian Lanugage known as?
By which language was the Astur-Leonese replaced?
In Portugal, which city was destroyed in the 1755 earthquake?
In which year did Brazel become independent?
In which year was the Portugal monarchy deposed?
Which Portugese colony was lost to China in 1999?
How many Portugese speakers are there today?
From what name is Portugal derived?
By what group was the Portugal region settled?
To what four peoples did the settlement of Portugal give rise?
During what years was the Portugal region incorporated in the Roman Republic?
From what old Germanic word is Alenquer originate?
What were the governors of the taifas called?
Which which kingdoms did the taifas establish diplomatic relations?
To which taifa did most of Portugal fall into?
In which year did the taifa period end?
Which battle took place in 1147?
What are converts to Islam called?
Who did the Arabs principally consist of?
Where were the Berbers originally from?
In which region of Portugal did the Muslim population stay?
How many modern Portugese words have Arabic origins?
Which years were plagued by the Black Death?
In 1373, Portugal made an alliance with which country?
What is the longest standing alliance in the world?
The Portugal-English alliance served as the predecessor to what?
In which Portugese region is there still visible English influence?
How many freshwater fish species can be found in Portugal?
In Portugal, where can you find the giant European catfish?
Why are some species becoming endangered in Portugal?
What type of glowing species can be found on some beaches in Portugal?
Who is the Head of State of Portugal?
For how many years does each term of the President of the Republic last?
By what means is the President of the Republic elected?
Who has the power to appoint and dismiss the Prime Minister?
In which year did Portugal decriminalize drug possession?
How much of a drug is legal to possess?
What option is allowed to those caught with small amounts of drugs?
By 2009, by how much had the rate of HIV infection decreased?
How many branches make up the Portuguese armed forces?
What are the branches of the Portuguese armed forces?
What is the primary purpose of the Portuguese armed forces?
How many women were in the Portuguese armed forces in 2008?
How much money was spent on the Portuguese armed forced in 2009?
What is the number of personnel in the army?
With what is the infantry brigade mainly equipped with?
What is the mechanized brigade mainly equipped with?
What does the Rapid Reaction Brigade consist of?
How many personnel does the Navy have?
Who headed the government after the bailout was announced?
What was the purpose of the Portuguese bailout?
How was the Portuguese bailout implemented?
Between 2010 and 2012, by what percentage were the wages of public servants cut?
In which year did the Carnation Revolution take place?
What period followed the Carnation Revolution?
Since the 90's, how has Portugal's economic development model been changing?
What are the more traditional industries that have existed in Portugal?
What is Portugal the world's leading producer of?
Portuguese tourist numbers are expected to do what in the future?
With what area does Portugal compete with for tourists?
How does Portugal compete with other areas for tourists?
What attractions does Portugal have to offer tourists?
To what age did Passos Coelho increase the retirement age?
To what did Passos Coelho announce cuts to?
Which obligatory class was abolished from Basic Education?
What did the instituting of these policies lead to?
What prompted transportation improvements in Portugal in the 1970's?
After joining the European Economic Community in the 90's, what did Portugal begin building?
How long is Portugal's total road network?
In which year was the first motorway opened in Portugal?
Into what country does Portugal's railway system expand?
What entity supports and administrates Portugal's railway system?
How long is the total railway system in Portugal?
How long is the amount of railway lines that are electrified?
How long is the amount of railway lines that permit speeds greater than 120 km/h?
What are the two subway systems in Portugal?
How long are each of the subway systems?
By what company have the Lisbon tram services been supplies by?
For how long has the Libon tram service existed?
In what group of people do the Portuguese have their origin?
When did people first start arriving in the European continent?
What is the main population source of the Portuguese people?
What is the cornerstone of Portugal's national identity?
Which ocean does Portugal border?
What were two of the last territories Portugal gave up?
The vast majority of Brazilians have what ancestry in common?
How many inhabitants did Portugal have by 2007?
What percentage of the Portuguese people are Roman Catholic?
What other religious communities exist in Portugal?
What percentage of the Portuguese people identify as non-religious?
What percentage of the Portuguese population did not give an answer for their religion in the 2011 census?
On what date did the Battle of Ourique take place?
Afonso heard Jesus promising what?
Why did God want to act through Afonso?
What is the official name of Portugal?
What type of language is Portuguese?
Where did Portuguese originate?
What was the common name of the Galician and Portuguese people?
What is the adult literacy rate in Portugal?
Portuguese primary school enrollment is close to what percent?
What percentage of college-age citizens attend a higher education institution in Portugal?
What percentage of college-age citizens attend a higher education institution in the United States?
When was the Bologna process adopted?
What are most higher education student costs supported with?
Over what age are higher education applicants considered mature?
What is the Ministry of Health responsible for?
How many regional health administrations exist in Portugal?
What are the regional health administrations in charge of?
What do most Portuguese people die from?
What are the two main components of cardiovascular disease?
What is the biggest killer in Portugal?
What percentage of Portuguese people die less often from cancer than in the Eur-A?
Who is cancer more common among in Portugal?
What survey results complement on data on health status?
What number of Portuguese adults rated their health as good or very good?
What was the first label that Kanye produced for?
Who are some well known artists that Kanye produced for early in his career?
How many albums has Kanye released since starting his solo career in 2004?
With which artists that Kanye formerly produced for did he go on to collaborate with?
Where did Kanye West live as a child?
What was Kanye West's first job title after art school?
What year did Kanye West release his first rap CD?
How many total CDs has Kanye West released in his career so far?
Where did Kanye and his mother relocate when he was 10?
While staying in China, Kanye was the only what in his class?
How well did Kanye do in high school?
At what age did Kanye West relocate to China?
What University was the cause of West's mother moving the family to China?
What was Kanye creating when he was five?
What was one of the first tracks written by Kanye when he was 13?
Who did Kanye meet early in his career who later mentored him?
What activity did Kanye West start doing when he was five?
What was the name of the song he wrote at age thirteen?
What was the name of the producer that helped Kanye West?
Where did Kanye receive a scholarship to attend?
How old was Kanye when he dropped out of college?
What school did Kanye West go to in 1997?
What subject was Kanye West's focus at Chicago State University?
At what age did Kanye West leave school to follow his musical passion?
What was the name of the CD that Kanye recorded based on his failed college experience?
Who were the beats Kanye made in the 90's originally intended for?
What types of records did Kanye sample in his early career.
What music group did Kanye join when he couldn't release his solo album?
In what time period did Kanye begin producing?
When did Kanye West start his production career?
For which artist did Kanye West act as a ghost producer? 
What late 1990s Chicago rap group was Kanye West a member of?
What firm managed Kanye West's rap group? 
What year was the first Go-Getters album released? 
Kanye produced the third song from the second album of what artist?
Which U.S. Billboard 200 chart topper did Kanye West produce a song for?
What was the name of the CD produced by Kanye that was by a made-up character?
What label did Kanye begin to work for in 2000?
What album did Kanye receive production credits on in 2001?
In what year did Roc-A-Fella make Kanye West known?
What was the name of the CD West produced for Jay Z in 2001?
Although Kanye was achieving fame by producing, what did he actually want to be?
What label declined to work with Kanye after many meetings?
What career was Kanye's ultimate dream?
What did Kanye West not have that made record companies turn him down?
Which record company turned Kanye down after many meetings?
Who almost picked up Kanye but was ultimately swayed?
What label finally (although reluctantly) picked up Kanye?
What did Kanye's peers see him as while he tried to pursue his rap career?
What man was almost ready to give Kanye a record deal?
What record company eventually signed Kanye West?
What track did Kanye compose and perform while injured from his accident?
What was the name of Kanye's 2002 mixtape that he wrote while in the hospital?
After dropping his mixtape, Kanye revealed the name of his debut album to be what?
What was the date of Kanye's car wreck?
What song did Kanye record about his experience with what happened after the wreck?
What was the name of the mixtape Kanye released in December of 2002?
What happened to Kanye's debut album that caused him to remaster most of it?
How many times was the release date for Kanye's first album pushed back?
In what city did West finish recording his first album?
How many times was The College Dropout's release put off?
What was supposed to be the original release date for The College Dropout?
What place on the Billboard chart did Kanye's album debut at?
How many publications voted The College Dropout for album of the year?
What was the name of the single off the debut album that gave Kanye mainstream attention?
What label did Kanye create following the success of his first album's release?
When was The College Dropout finally released?
What song was the second released off of Kanye's The College Dropout album?
How many Grammy nominations did The College Dropout receive?
What was the name of the record label that West founded?
What kind of ensemble did Kanye hire to work on his second album?
What composer worked alongside Kanye on the album's production?
What was the name of Kanye's second studio album?
How many copies of Late Registration sold in its first year?
What English music group was an inspiration for Kanye West on his second album?
What was the name of West's second album?
How many copies of Late Registration were sold in the United States?
The loss of which award caused Kanye to leave the American Music Awards?
Kanye participated alongside Mike Meyers in a relief benefit show for what natural disaster?
What magazine did Kanye don a thorn crown for the cover of in 2006?
In which AMA category did Kanye lose in 2004?
Which actor was alongside Kanye West when he insulted President Bush?
What magazine did Kanye West pose for in 2006 that caused another controversy?
What broadcast for NBC was Kanye presenting for when he spoke negatively about President Bush?
What band did Kanye tour with for a year?
What setting did Kanye want his next tracks to perform well in?
Who did Kanye study in order to develop his lyrical skills?
Which band did Kanye West travel with for the Vertigo Tour?
What decade of music inspired Kanye West after his tour with U2?
Other than U2 and Led Zeppelin, what other band inspired Kanye West?
What other country singer besides Johnny Cash did Kanye listen to?
What was the name of Kanye's third album?
Kanye released Graduation at the same time of what other famous rapper, thus drawing media comparison?
How many copies did Graduation sell in its first week of release? 
What famous electronic duo did Kanye sample on his third album?
What was the name of Kanye West's third CD?
What artist was Kanye's third album release competing against?
What music group was in Kanye's first release off of Graduation?
What label pushed out Kanye's fourth studio album?
Which album by Kanye West featured the song "Love Lockdown"?
808s & Heartbreak was released by what company? 
When was 808s & Heartbreaks released? 
What was the second song released off of 808s? 
The major usage of musical machine on 808s was described as eponymous?
Where did Kanye base himself to create his next album?
What industry did Kanye turn to after taking a break from recording music?
What state did Kanye West hide in while writing his next album?
What is the name of Kanye's album released in 2010?
What award was My Beautiful Dark Twisted Fantasy omitted from?
What was the name of Kanye's fifth album?
When was Kanye West's fifth album debuted? 
What song off of Kanye's fifth album was a hit internationally?
What was the name of the free music promotion on Kanye's website in 2010?
What festival did Kanye headline in 2011?
With what other hiphop artist did Kanye collaborate with?
Where did Kanye premier a film directed by himself in 2012?
What event did Kanye headline in 2011?
What was the name of the joint album Kanye made with Jay Z?
What was the top single off the album "Watch the Throne"?
In what year was "Cruel Summer" released?
What film festival did Kanye West premier a film called "Cruel Summer"?
Where did Kanye begin production on his sixth album?
What became the name of his sixth studio album?
Who did Kanye tour alongside of in order to promote the efforts of Yeezus?
In what year did Kanye West begin working on his sixth album?
What was the inspiration behind Kanye West's decision to call Rick Rubin?
What was the name of Kanye's sixth album?
On what date was Yeezus released?
What artist did Kanye go on tour with while promoting album number six?
What was the name of Kanye's first child with Kim Kardashian?
What brand set to collaborate on an apparel line with Kanye?
What famous British artist worked with Kanye on multiple singles?
Where did Kanye perform his single "All Day" with a menagerie of other artists?
Who is the mother of Kanye's first child?
What is Kanye West's first child's name?
In what Italian city were Kim Kardashian and Kanye West wed?
What musician joined Kanye West on the song "Only One"?
What was the name of the Adidas clothing line by Kanye West that he released in 2013?
What was the tentative release date announced for Kanye's next studio album?
What was Kanye's next album renamed again to?
With what other rapper did Kanye west have a Twitter feud with in early 2016?
What became the final title of Kanye's next album?
What platform was The Life of Pablo officially released on?
What song  by West was debuted in December 2015?
On January 26, 2016, Kanye told the world he changed the name of his next album from SWISH to what?
What artist did Kanye West have a feud with over Amber Rose?
What was the name of Kanye's clothing line premiered at Madison Square Garden?
What was the name of Kanye's third record?
What musical direction did Kanye take with his third album?
Kanye drew inspiration from The Rolling Stones, U2, and Led Zeppelin in what ways?
What year was Kanye West's third album released?
What is Kanye's fifth album titled? 
What journalist drew comparisons between My Beautiful Dark Twisted Fantasy and other Kanye albums?
What musician collaborated with Kanye West for his album Late Registration?
What artist worked with Kanye on his album Graduation?
Kid Cudi joined Kanye for which album?
Which album by Kanye West has been talked about by writers for having maximalist aesthetic?
What did Kanye state that Yeezus was?
What artist did Kanye draw inspiration from when crafting Yeezus?
In what year was Kanye West's sixth album released?
What was the title of Kanye's sixth album?
What brand struck a deal with Kanye and sparked a new clothing line?
How many "seasons" of clothing did Kanye release?
What were the shoes designed by Kanye and released by Adidas called?
How many pairs of shoes were sold in the initial release in New York City?
What shoe was announced on Twitter by Kanye West?
In what year did Kanye premier his Season line?
What album release coincided with Kanye's Yeezy Season 3 clothing line?
What restaurant chain did Kanye aspire to open in his native Chicago?
How many restaurants did Kanye open?
What happened to the Fatburger chains that Kanye established?
What was the name of the restaurant Kanye annouced he was opening?
How many  of Kanye's Fatburger restaurants were actually opened?
When was Kanye's last Fatburger restaurant closed?
What is the name of Kanye West's food company?
What did Kanye call the label he founded in 2004?
As of 2015, who did Kanye choose as the new president of GOOD Music?
What year did Kanye West open his GOOD Music production company and record label?
What other artist besides Kanye West and Common was among the first to record at GOOD Music?
Who did Kanye name President of GOOD Music in 2015?
What was the goal of Kanye's new creative company DONDA?
Kanye's creative content company DONDA was named after who?
On what date did Kanye go public with his DONDA company?
With the help of his mom, what foundation did Kanye create early in his career?
What is the goal of the Kanye West Foundation?
What was founded by Kanye West and his mother?
In What year did the Kanye West Foundation Partner with Strong American Schools? 
Where was the "Kanye West Foundation" founded?
What other mission besides dropout and illiteracy rates did the Kanye West Foundation seek to improve?
What campaign did the Kanye West Foundation partner with in 2007?
In what month was the inaugural concert held for the "Ed in '08" campaign?
What was the Kanye West Foundation renamed to in 2008?
What year did the foundation end its run?
In what year did Kanye West's mother pass away? 
Kanye's foundation was changed to what name following his mother's death? 
What year did the foundation stop operating? 
What are some charitable efforts Kanye west has participated in?
During what show did Kanye take an opportunity to criticize the efforts of a U.S. President?
Which U.S. President did Kanye criticize after the events of Hurricane Katrina? 
Which President did Kanye West accuse of "Not caring for black people"?
On what day did the Kanye's famous George W. Bush criticism take place?
What happened after Kanye made his controversial statement?
Who did Kanye West say doesn't care about black people?
How did George W. Bush describe Kanye's controversial statement?
To which reporter did Kanye West express regret for his remark about President Bush?
Kanye was criticized by human rights groups for performing in what country?
How much was Kanye paid to perform in Kazakhstan?
How is Kazakhstan's human rights record compared to the rest of the world?
What country's President paid Kanye West to perform at his grandson's wedding?
Kanye, Shakira, and Rage Against the Machine refused to perform in what state due to a new law against illegal aliens?
For what reason did Sting and other artists cancel their scheduled performances in Kazakhstan? 
What TV show lampooned one of Kanye's BBC Radio 1 interviews?
What did Kanye demand from Jimmy Kimmel in regards to the sketch?
What person was Kanye's rant on Twitter directed at?
The skit on JImmy Kimmel Live! was a depiction of Kanye West and what reporter?
On what radio station did Kanye West deem himself "the biggest rockstar on the planet"?
What celebrity knee-deep in controversy did Kanye endorse in a 2016 tweet?
What actor was Kanye defending on Twitter in February 2016?
To which artist did Kanye profusely apologize to?
What song did Kanye end up writing that referenced his outburst against Taylor Swift?
When did Kanye West post to Twitter apoloizing to Taylor Swift?
When did Kanye take back his apology to Taylor Swift, saying that he was being "selfless"?
What album by Kanye was released in 2016?
What award did Kanye capture at the 2015 MTV VMAs?
When does Kanye intend to run for president?
What award was presented to Kanye West on August 30, 2015?
For what event was the largest amount of signatures collected in an attempt to keep Kanye from performing at it?
What was another event that garnered a large amount of protest for Kanye's removal of headliner status?
What website have music fans been using to try to block Kanye West's performance at different events?
What festival was the largest failed petition to keep Kanye from performing?
How many signatures were gathered for Kanye's removal from the 2015 Pan American Games?
Kanye's first engagement was to which well-known designer?
What model did Kanye begin to date in 2008?
Who has Kanye finally settled with an married in 2014?
How many children does Kanye have with Kim?
What year did Kanye West begin his relationship with Alexis Phifer?
When did Alexis Phifer and Kanye West get engaged?
Who did Kanye date from 2008 to 2010?
When did Kanye West start dating Kim Kardashian?
Where in Jerusalem did Kardashian and West have their daughter North baptised?
How old was Kanye's mother when she died?
What doctor did Donda West ignore the recommendation of to invest her heart condition?
At approximately what time did paramedics receive the call about Kanye West's mother, Donda?
What condition along with complications for the plastic surgery caused the death of Donda West?
What doctor originally turned Donda West down for her plastic surgery operation?
What was the name of the doctor who performed the surgery that ended up killing Donda West?
Where was Donda West's funeral?
What songs did Kanye dedicate to his late mother as his performance at The O2 in London?
In what city was the funeral and burial for Donda West held?
On what day was the funeral of Donda West?
What day was Kanye's first concert after the death of his mother?
On what tour did Kanye perform "Hey Mama" and his version of Journey's "Don't Stop Believing" in memory of his mother?
Where did Kanye first speak on his mother's death?
Where did Kanye West first speak about his mother's death?
What famous governor signed legislation in honor of Donda West's death?
What governor passed a law in honor of Donda West?
What was the name of the law passed by Arnold Schwarzenegger?
What famous stuntman sued Kanye for purported use of his likeness in 2006?
When was the suit settled?
Which celebrity sued West in 2006 for trademark infrigement?
What was the name of the nickname Kanye West took on in his video "Touch the Sky"?
When did Knievel settle the argument with West?
What was Kanye arrested for in 2008?
How much was Kanye's bail bond?
What was Kanye finally charged with?
On what day was Kanye West arrested at the Los Angeles International Airport?
What were the charges filed against Kanye West?
What was the name of the bodyguard also accused of vandalism?
What was the dollar amount of Kanye's bond?
What was Kanye second arrest for?
What was the date of Kanye's second arrest?
Where was Kanye arrested at for the second time?
At what location did the incident leading to West's second arrest take place?
What paparazzi member did Kanye attack at LAX in 2013?
What was Kanye convicted for after his paparazzi attack?
What was the name of the man who was hassling West outside of LAX that West later attacked?
How many years' probation was Kanye supposed to serve for this altercation?
He had to attend 24 sessions of what kind of therapy?
How many hours of community service did Kanye receive?
What are Kanye's religious beliefs?
"Jesus Walks" was on which of Kanye's albums?
September of 2014, Kanye called himself a what during one of his concerts?
How is Kanye viewed as a 21st century artist?
What famous English artist was Kanye compared to by The Guardian?
What reporter compared Kanye West to a lightning rod?
Who said Kanye West was the greatest hip hop artist of all time?
What magazine compared Kanye to David Bowie?
How many songs has Kanye had that have exceeded 3 million digital sales?
How many songs has Kanye sold digitally in his career?
How many of West's six albums have gone platinum?
What was Kanye's fifth consecutive number one album?
As of 2012, how many downloads have there been of "Golddigger"?
What rank is West in total sales for the last decade?
How many total digital songs has Kanye West sold in the US?
How many Grammies has Kanye won as of 2013?
With which artist does Kanye tie with for reaching the top of the annual Pazz & Jop Critic Poll?
How many times has Kanye placed in the annual Time Magazine people list?
In 2013, West had won how many total Grammy Awards?
What rank did About.com give Kanye "Top 50 Hip-Hop Producers" list?
On what day did MTV name Kanye as the year's Number 1 "Hottest MC in the Game."?
December 17, 2010 was the day Kanye was nominated by MTV for what?
What musician did West tie with for topping the annual Pazz & Jop critic poll 4 times each?
What President did Kanye West insult on air in 2005?
Whose speech did Kanye West ruin at the 2009 MTV Awards?
What fashion items does Kanye West design?
What company did Kanye West begin?
What year did Kanye West begin working with Adidas?
What are the two major branches of Buddhism?
What is sometimes viewed as the third branch of Buddhism?
Where does Theravada have the largest following?
Mahayana includes which practices of Buddhism?
What is the estimated number of Buddhists in the world?
Which branch practices the teachings of Zen?
What minor branch is sometimes attributed to Mahayana?
What kind of teachings does Tibetan Buddhism preserve?
Vajrayana is attributed to who?
Theravada means what?
What is the goal of Theravada Buddhism?
How is Nirvana achieved?
What is the bodhisattva path?
What is the goal of Tibetan Buddhism?
How is Nirvana attained?
In what buddhism is the goal a state of nirvana?
What buddhism has a goal of Buddhahood or rainbow body?
The Noble Eightfold Path is also known as what?
Mahayana aspires to Buddhahood through what path?
Theravada escapes what cycle?
What are the Three Jewels of the Buddhist tradition?
What is one of the Ten Meritorious Deeds of Buddhism?
What other practices do Buddhists adhere to?
What is one of the Ten Meritorious Deeds?
Buddhism denies what kind of deity?
Of the Ten Meritorious Deeds, giving charity reduces what?
Invocation of buddhas and bodhisattvas is in what tradition?
What was the name of the astrologer who visited Prince Gautama's father?
What was the prediction made by Asita?
According to Asita, how would Siddhartha decide which path to take in life?
What was the occupation of the person who visited Gautama?
What was the name of his father?
What was Buddha predicted to become contrary with his life as we know it?
What was the name of the astrologer that visited Gautama's father?
What is Gautama's fathers name?
Asita prophesied that Siddhartha would be a kind or a what?
What is samsara?
What is avidya?
What is dukkha?
The cycle of birth and death is called what in Buddhism?
How many realms of existence are there in Buddhism?
avidya is what kind of samsara?
How can you be freed from samsara?
What is samsara defined as?
How many realms of existance are within the cycle of rebirths?
Realms can be understood as physical realms of what type of states?
Samsara is caused by what?
A person can get away from samsara by doing what?
There is a transitional state between one life and the next according to what branches of Buddhism?
What branch of Buddhism rejects that there is a transitional state between lives?
Passages in what teaching support the idea that the Buddha taught of a stage between lives?
What is the state called between lives?
Which major part of Buddhism rejects bardo?
What book discusses bardo?
Other than Tibetan Buddhism, what other Buddhism supports bardo?
There is an intermediate state between one life and the next according to what Buddism?
What type of Theravada rejects the intermediate state idea?
Some passages of what Canon support the idea of intermediate stages?
What is considered to be central to the teachings of Buddhism?
What do the Four Noble Truths explain?
What teachings are the most important to Buddhism?
What part of Dukkha deals with pain?
What is considered central to the teachings of Buddhism?
The four truths explain the nature of what?
What does the first of the Four Noble Truths explain?
What is Dukkha?
What does the first truth cover?
What is another word for Dukkha?
What is another nature of Dukkha?
How many aspects are there to Dukkha?
Dukkha can be translated as what word in regards to unhappiness?
Suffering, anxiety, unsatisfactoriness, and unease is the translation of what word?
How many aspects does dukkha have?
What does the second of the Four Noble Truths explain?
What is the origin of dukkha?
What is the third of the Four Noble Truths explain?
What is the fourth of the Four Noble Truths explain?
What is the second truth?
How is the meaning of Dukkha explained?
What is a contributing factor to Dukkha?
The second truth is?
The origin of dukkha is explained as craving conditioned by what?
The root cause of dukkha is identified as ignorance of what?
The third noble truth is that the complete cessation of what is possible?
When did Gautama Buddha discover the Middle Way?
An important guiding priciple of Buddhist practice is what?
Guatama discovered the middle path before his what?
What are some of the theories and philosophies produced by Buddhist scholars?
Who has produced a number of theories and concepts such as Abhidharma and Reality in Buddhism?
Some schools within Buddhism discourage what type of study?
What has achieved nirvana and also liberation from delusion?
If bodhi is attained what do you become?
In theravada buddhism, bodhi and what term have the same meaning?
What term is used for the complete nirvana attained by the arahant at death?
Who is a fully awakened being who has purified his mind of the three poisons of desire, aversion, and ignorance?
A Buddha is no longer bound by what?
What do unawakend people experience?
A person can awaken from the "sleep of ignorance" by acknowledging the true nature of what?
At the end of the cycle of rebirth a person is called what?
Nirvana and what term carry the same meaning?
What is the term for extinction of only hatred and greed, with residue of delusion?
In the Mahayana, who is thought to be an omnipresent being?
Who is thought to be beyond the range and reach of thought?
In what sutras are the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha viewed as One?
Who is believed to have achieved enlightenment first?
What is the term for the stretch of history during which people rmember and practice the teachings of the earliest known buddha?
Who is the Buddha of this Buddha era?
Who taught directly or indirectly to all other Buddhas?
Who believes there are innumerable other Buddhas in other universes?
What buddhist belief says that Buddhas come one at a time and not within other eras?
What does Bodhisattva mean?
What is the term for the spontaneous wish to attain Buddhahood for the benefit of all beings?
Which Dalai Lama cites Shantideva's famous saying?
Devotion is an important part of the practice of most what?
What are the devotional practices?
Meditation was an aspect of the practice of who?
In Buddhism, what must be developed at all times?
What are probably the earliest texts describing meditation techniques?
What describes meditative states exising before the Buddha?
What two items were written after the rise of Buddhism?
In pre-buddhist early Brahminic texts there is no evidence for what?
The upanishads statements reflect what type of tradition?
What contains evidence for a contemplative tradition?
Who presented himself as a model?
What offers a refuge by providing guidelines for the alleviation of suffering?
What provides refuge by preserving the authentic teachings of the Buddha?
Precepts are not created as imperatives, but as what?
The cultivation of dana and what kind of conduct refine consciousness?
Even if there is no further Buddhist practice, what heavens is still likely?
Of the eight precepts which one is on sexual misconduct?
What is the third strict precept on sexual misconduct?
How many precepts are on the list?
In the complete list of precepts, which one is partitioned into two?
How many basic precepts are there for monastics?
What is the specific moral code for monks and nuns?
How many rules dows the patimokkha have?
What are the scriptures on vinaya called?
Regarding the monastic rules, the Buddha reminds his hearers that it is the spirit that what?
The rules themselves are designed to assure a satisfying what?
The rules are a perfect springboard for what?
Monastics are instructed by the Buddha to live as what?
Distinctive Vinaya and ethics are contained within what sutra?
Bodhisattvas are not encouraged to eat what?
Where is the monastic vinaya displaced and clergy is allowed to marry?
What Buddhist teachings are often full of paradox?
What type of self is equated with the Buddha?
What is not allowed to confine and bind oneself?
What time period was the beginning of Buddhism?
Scholars believe that karma originated in what?
What groups broke with Brahmanic tradition?
Shramanas were a continuation of what type of trand of Indian thought?
Buddhism arose in what area?
Greater magadha stretched from Sravasti in the north-west to what area in the south-east?
What time period did the eastward spread of Brahmanism start?
A criticism the Buddha gave dealing with animals was?
The Buddha mocked what hymn of the Vedic?
The original Veda of the rishis was altered by a few Brahmins who introduced what?
The Buddha refused to pay respect to who, during their time of animal sacrifice?
What is in dispute regarding the research into the core of the teachings?
A large problem in the study of early Buddhism is the relationship of dhyana and what else?
Liberating insight is attained after mastering what?
Later edition of texts such as what has the Rupa Jhanas?
According the Bronkhorst, intentions and desire are responsible for what?
Bronkhurst says that Buddha had a view of 'what' much different then current day?
A description of the Buddhist path may have been as simplistic as what term?
The description of buddhism was broadened resulting in what path?
Authors Bronkhorst and Anderson claim the four truths bacame a substitution for what?
What is prajna called in english?
Gotamas teachings may have been personal and adjusted to the need of each what?
How many marks of existence reflect Upanishadic influences?
The periods of Buddhisma in India is divided into how many periods?
What is the first period of Buddhism called?
What is another name for Nikaya buddhism?
What is the last period of Buddhism?
What is Esoteric Buddhism also called?
Was is the earliest phase of buddhism?
Gautama Buddha most likely taught the idea of Karma and what?
Gautama buddha taught what Path concept?
What four types of thought developed during the period of late mahayna buddhism?
What was the latest thought type?
In India the two main philosophical schools of the Mahayana were Madhyamaka and what else?
The Theravada school spread south from india in what century BCE?
The Dharmagupta schol spread in what century to Kashmir?
When was the first documented translation efforts by foreign Buddhist monks in China?
Mahayana Sutras spread to China during what century?
What two countries after China was the Mahayana sutras spread?
When did Buddhism apread from India to Tibet?
China and India are now starting to fund what type of shrines in various Asian countries?
What is the Dharma?
What is the Sangha?
West Buddhism is often seen as exotic and what?
New forms of Buddhism are created because of what reason?
When did a number of modern movement in Buddhism emerge?
What is the Dalit buddhist movement sometimes called?
What Buddhism emerged in the second half of the 20th century in Japan?
What does Soka Gakkai mean in English?
What Buddhist movement has linked more than 12 million people?
What is the largest Buddhist movement in the world?
What religion is practiced by an estimated 488 to 535 million people?
What country has the largest population of Buddhists?
How many Buddhists are in China?
How may adherents does Mahayana have?
How many adherents does Thervada have?
How many Buddists are outside of Asia?
Each tradition has its own core what?
there are common concepts to both major buddhist branches according to what organization?
What type of Buddhists believe that personal effort is required to realize rebirth?
Laypersons can perform good actions, producing what?
Mahayana schools recognize all or part of what?
A few of the sutras for Mahayanists became a manifestation of who?
Faith in and veneration of Mahayana are stated in what sutras?
Native Mahayana buddhism is also called what?
The Buddhism practiced in Tibet, the Himalayan regions and Mongolia are often referred to as?
What is the most widely practised Eastern Buddhism?
In Sri Lanka, what was determined to be the best unifying scripture?
There have been attempts to create a single text with all the main ideas of what religion?
condensed study texts where created in what tradition?
Goddard collected mainly what type of Buddhist scripture?
Dr. Babasaheb Ambedkar attempted to create a single combined document with all Buddhist principles and called it?
Much of the material in the Canon is not specifically what?
Who may have added texts to the Canon for some time?
What are considered the original teachings of the Buddha?
What is a very broad genre of Buddhist scripture?
What teaching was criticized by Nagarjuna?
What sutras were transmitted in secret?
What sutras could have been preserved in non-human worlds?
What tradition says that sutras might have come from other Buddhas or Bodhisattvas?
How many Mahayana sutras have survivied in Sanskrit or in Chinese or Tibetan translations?
What buddhism recognizes sutras of Chinese origin?
What school does not include the Mahayava scriptures in its canon?
The modern Theravada school stablished itself in what country?
What Mahayana related label is considered derogatory?
What school of thought is questioned on whether or not it is a religion?
What is often referred to as a religion by many sources?
Who is the creator of American Idol?
What company produces American idol?
What year did American Idol begin airing?
What British show is American Idols format based on?
What television network does American Idol air on?
What company produces American Idol?
What British series is American Idols format based on?
Who created American Idol?
Who produced American Idol?
When did American Idol first air on TV?
What British show was American Idol based on?
What record producer was an original judge on American Idol?
What comedian was an original host on American Idol? 
What actress is a judge on the most current season of American Idol? 
Who was a host on all seasons of American Idol?
What comedian was an original host on American Idol?
What pop singer was an original judge on American Idol?
What actress is a judge on the most current season of American Idol?
Which original judge was a record producer and music manager?
Which original judge was a choreographer?
Which original judge was a music executive?
Which judge is a country music singer?
Which judge is a jazz singer?
How many Billboard hits did American Idol produce in its first ten years?
Who was a pop idol that started on American Idol?
Who called American Idol "the most impactful show in the history of television"?
Who was a pop idol that started on American Idol?
Who was a pop idol that started on American Idol?
Who was a pop idol that started on American Idol?
Who was a pop idol that started on American Idol?
How many Billboard chart toppers did American Idol contestants have within the first ten seasons?
Who said that American Idol is "the most impactful show in the history of televsion?
For how many seasons was American Idol the most watched show in the US?
What year did American Idol first air on FOX?
What year did producers attempt to sell the Pop Idol format in the United States? 
Who talked Rupert Murdoch into buying American Idol for FOX?
Who is the head of Fox's parent company?
What was Pop Idol renamed to for its American debut?
For how many seasons were the three original judges on American Idol?
How many judges were originally planned for American Idol?
What New York radio personalty was hired as a judge for American Idol in season two but declined?
What radio DJ was originally hired as a judge in season one but declined?
How many judges were originally intended for the show?
Which judge quit before the premiere, citing image concerns?
During Season two, which judge quit after a few days?
When did American Idol change to a four-judge panel?
In what season was Lionel Richie a guest judge on American Idol?
Which season eight contestant was a guest judge in season fourteen?
In what season was Donna Summer a guest judge on American Idol?
In which season was Shania Twain a guest judge on American Idol?
Which season of American Idol featured Katy Perry as a guest judge?
Who were the guest judges in season two?
When was Shania Twain a guest judge for auditions?
When did Donna Summer help the contestants during the final rounds?
Who was the only host of American Idol after season one?
Which host quit after the first season?
Who was a mentor to the contestants on American Idol in its thirteenth season? 
Who mentored contestants in the fourteenth and fifteenth seasons of American Idol?
What two things did the mentors help the contestants with?
Who was the mentor for seasons 10 - 12?
Who was the mentor for season 13?
Who was the mentor for seasons 14 and 15?
What is the upper age limit for contestants on American Idol?
When was the age limit increased to 28?
Currently, contestants can not have a recording track by what stage of the competition? 
In what city did contestants perform an additional round in seasons ten and eleven?
What was the Las Vegas round called in season twelve?
In which season was the "Hollywood or Home" round added to the competition?
How many text message votes were there in season eight?
In which season was online voting introduced?
What company counts the votes on American Idol? 
At what point does the public begin voting for contestants?
How many votes were cast for contestants in the first season?
How many votes were cast by season ten for all contestants?
How many finalists were there on the first season of American Idol?
What is the name of the round that gives failed contestants another chance?
How were the semi-finalists split up to perform in season one?
How were the semi-finalists split up to perform in seasons two and three?
When did the wildcard round become a factor?
How many finalists were chosen for season one?
How many finalists made it to the finals for seasons two and three?
How many semi-finalists were there in season 4?
How were the semi-finalists divided in season four?
How many men were in the top twelve on season five of American Idol?
How many women were in the top twelve on season nine of American Idol?
How many women were semi-finalists on season six of American Idol?
Where studio hosts the live final rounds on American Idol?
Who was the mentor on season ten of American Idol? 
How many weeks did the finals of season thirteen last?
How many weeks did the finals last in the first season?
Where are the finals broadcast from?
Who was a mentor for the contestants in Season 10?
How many songs do contestants sing initially in the finals?
When do contestants start singing two songs?
In what season was the "Judges Save" introduced to give contestants a second chance?
How many time can the judges save be used each season?
When three are called, one is often sent to what?
Which season was the Idol Gives Back episode?
In which season was the "Fan Save" first used?
How do people vote using the fan save?
What was introduced in season 14 to allow the fans to help save a contestant?
How do viewers vote for a contestant using Fan Save?
When does the Fan Save start?
What venue was the American Idol season seven finale held at?
How many people can attend an American Idol finale at the Dolby Theatre?
In what episode is the winner of American Idol revealed?
Where was the season one finale broadcast from?
How many audience members can fit in Dolby Theatre?
What is the capacity for Gibson Ampitheatre?
For seasons 7-13, the season finale was held where?
What is given to contestants who make it past the audition round?
In the audition rounds, what do contestants who win the approval of the judges receive?
Who votes for the winning contestants starting with the semi-final round?
In which season were contestants first allowed to use musical instruments?
Who was in charge of the American Idol band in season eleven?
In what season did American Idol start airing on Thursday nights?
Who was the leader of the American Idol band in season five?
Who led the American Idol band between seasons four and nine?
Who led the American Idol band after Rickey Minor's departure?
What season were contestants allowed use a musical instrument when they sing?
What network aired the first season of American Idol?
What year did American Idol first debut?
Who was Ryan Seacrests co-host in the first season of American Idol?
When did American Idol debut?
What network did American Idol debut on?
Who co-hosted American Idol?
How many contestants made it past the first round of auditions?
How many people initially auditioned?
Who was the first known homosexual contestant on American Idol?
Which contestant was surprisingly eliminated during the top four episode? 
Where was Christina Christian at when she was eliminated from the show?
How many contestants were chosen from the 10,000 that auditioned?
Of the 121 chosen, how many became semi-finalists?
Which contestant was disqualified for lying about his age?
When was Tamyra Gray eliminated?
Who was eliminated while she was in the hospital due to chest pains?
What year did Kelly Clarkson win?
Who was the runner up to Kelly Clarkson?
What month did Kelly Clarkson win?
Of the final two, which was an early favorite to win?
Who won the first season of American Idol?
When did Clarkson win the crown?
What was the fist song released by Kelly Clarkson after winning American Idol?
What film did Kelly Clarkson and Justin Guarini star in after they were on American Idol?
How many albums has Kelly Clarkson sold around the world?
What song did Kelly Clarkson perform during the finale?
What did Clarkson sing during the finale?
What was the name of the song?
Which record did the song break, which was the biggest leap to the top of the Billboard charts?
What was the name of the film that the two finalists made together?
How many worldwide album sales has Kelly Clarkson had since winning Idol?
What year did season two of American Idol first air?
Who was a correspondent on season two of American Idol?
When did season two air?
Who was a correspondent for season two?
Who was the season two winner of American Idol?
How many votes were cast during the final week?
Who was the runner up on season two of American Idol?
How many votes did Ruben Studdard win by?
What was the name of the shows executive producer?
Who won season two?
Who was the runner up for season two?
How many more votes did Studdard have at the finale?
How many votes were cast for the finale?
Who did Nigel Lythgoe say was a fan favorite for the majority of the season?
What is the first song that Ruben Studdard released after winning American Idol?
What contestant came in fourth on season two of American Idol?
What song did Clay Aiken first release after losing American Idol?
What was the name of Studdard's coronation song?
What was Aiken's single release named?
Which of the final two had more success with his first album?
Who finished fourth on season two?
What year did the third season of American Idol first air?
Which contestant was best known for his bad audition of "She Bangs"?
Which contestant sold more albums than all except two from season three of American Idol?
When did season three premiere?
Which contestant sang an off-key "She Bangs"?
Which contestant was number three in sales from season three?
What were the three black female contestants on season three of American Idol commonly referred to as?
Which contestant was eliminated during the week of the top seven?
What famous singer made claims of racism after Jennifer Hudson was eliminated from American Idol?
Which season three contestant on American Idol was the recipient of reported death threats?
What were Fantasia Barrino, LaToya London and Jennifer Hudson called?
Which of the three was eliminated?
Who said that the results were racist?
Which contestant reportedly received a death threat on the show?
Who was the runner up on the third season of American Idol?
What was the name of the first single that Fantasia released after winning American Idol?
What was the first song released by Diana DeGarmo after coming in second on American Idol?
What song did Fantasia sing on the Top 8 show?
Who has said that Barrino's rendition of Summertime has been his top moment of all seasons?
Who were the final two contestants?
Who was declared the season winner?
What was Fantasia's coronation song?
Who got a spot in the top 12 after Mario Vasquez dropped out?
Who replaced Vasquez as a finalist?
What company produces the show?
A former employee states he was fired after complaining about which finalist?
During what week was there a problem with voting?
When did the results show happen?
What year did Carrie Underwood win American Idol?
How many record has Carrie Underwood sold since winning American Idol?
What was the first song released by Carrie Underwood after winning American Idol? 
Which American Idol contestant has won the biggest number of Grammy Awards?
When was the winner declared?
Who was the winner of this season?
What song did the two finalists release?
How many records has Underwood sold in America?
Which season of American Idol stands out for having the highest ratings?
Which two contestants were removed from the show for accusations of identity theft?
Which season has been the highest rated of all American Idol seasons?
When did season five premiere?
Which two contestants were kicked off the show for identity theft?
Which contestant did the band Fuel ask to be their new lead singer?
Which season five contestant caused controversy with their performance of I Walk the Line?
Which contestant was surprisingly eliminated during the week of the top four?
Who performed a Fuel song on this season?
Fuel asked Chris Daughtry to become what?
Who was eliminated in the Top 4 show?
Which song performance did he receive both praise and criticism for?
Why did he receive criticism for I Walk the Line
Who was the winner American Idol in 2006?
What was the name of the first song that Taylor Hicks released after winning American Idol?
What was the first song that Katherine McPhee released after coming in second on American Idol?
When was the winner announced?
Who was the winner for this season?
What was Hick's debut single?
What was McPhee's first single?
Which season five contestant has had the most success after the show?
What is the name if the band that has Chris Daughtry as its lead singer?
Who was the most successful artist from this season?
What band does Chris Daughtry sing for?
What year did the sixth season of American Idol first air?
How many people watched the season premiere of American Idol in 2007?
When did season six premiere?
How many overall viewers did the first show of the season generate?
Who was the most discussed singer in American Idols sixth season?
What celebrity asked his fans to vote for Sanjaya Malakar on American Idol?
What is the name of the blog that tried to rally votes for Sanjaya Malakar on American Idol?
What date was Sanjaya Malakar eliminated on American Idol?
What season six American Idol contestant was known for his strange hairstyles?
Which contestant was talked about more than any other this season?
What was the main reason Sanjaya garnered such attention?
Which weblog helped Sanjaya survive elimination week over and over again?
Which shock jock urged people to vote for Sanjaya?
When was Sanjaya eliminated? 
What was the name of the charity event on season six of American Idol?
How much money did the Idol Gives Back event raise in 2007?
What singer came in third on the sixth season of American Idol?
What was the charity event that occurred this season?
Which two contestants were eliminated the following week?
Who was eliminated on the Top 3 show?
Who was the winner of American Idols sixth season?
Who came in second on season six of American Idol?
On what date did American Idol air its season six finale?
When was the finale aired?
Which contestant won the season?
Who was the runner up?
What year did season four of American Idol first air?
How many contestants auditioned for the fourth season of American Idol?
What was the oldest that you could be to qualify as a contestant on the fourth season of American Idol?
What  was the first full season of American Idol to air in high definition?
In which season was Bo Bice a contestant on American Idol?
When did season four premiere?
Season four was the first full season to be aired in what?
How many people auditioned to be on American Idol?
What was the maximum age a contestant could be starting this season?
In what year did American Idol begin a contest to decide the winners single?
What is the first song released by Jordin Sparks after winning American Idol?
How was "This is My Now" decided as the first single for the American Idol winner in 2007?
Which contest started during this season?
Fans could vote for what during this contest?
Of the thousands of songs entered, how many were the public able to vote for?
What song won the contest?
When did Sparks release her version of the song?
What year did season seven of American Idol first air?
Which season seven contestant had worked as a stripper before his time on American Idol?
Which contestant was talked about most for having a record deal before being a contestant on American Idol?
When did season seven premiere?
Which contestant drew attention because he was a former stripper?
Why did many of the contestants draw the attention of the media?
Which contestant garnered the most attention because of a prior recording contract?
What song did David Cook sing on American Idol during the week of the top ten?
Which American Idol contestant was hospitalized after singing during the week of the top nine?
Who arranged the version of "Billie Jean" that David Cook performed on American Idol?
On what date did the American Idol finals begin?
When did American Idol showcase a new set and stage?
Which arrangement was used for Cook's version of Billie Jean?
Who was taken to the hospital after the top nine show?
Which contestant sang "Imagine" on season seven of American Idol?
In which season of American Idol did Jennifer Lopez become a judge?
What song did Jason Castro receive praise for singing during the semi-finals on American Idol?
Whose recording of Hallelujah became successful again after being performed on American Idol?
On what digital platform were contestants performances released to after airing on American Idol?
Which David Archuletta cover was thought to be the best of the season by many?
Who said it Archuletta's rendition is one that she will never forget?
Which finalist sang "Hallelujah" during the semi-finals?
Castro's performance sent which singer's version to the top of a Billboard chart?
For the first time, recordings of the contestant's songs could be purchased where?
Who won season seven of American Idol?
Who was the first Rock and Roll artist to win American Idol?
When was the winner announced?
Who was the winner?
What was the name of the first song released by David Cook after winning American Idol?
How was the winning single chose on season seven of American Idol?
What year did David Cook release the single, "The Time of My Life"?
What was the coronation song?
When did Cook release his version of The Time of My Life?
What year did the eighth season of American Idol first air?
Which contestant from season eight suffered the loss of a spouse?
What was Mike Darnells position at Fox in 2009?
What month did American Idol begin airing its eighth season?
When did season eight premiere?
Who was the president of alternative programming at Fox?
Which contestant received a lot of attention because of his widowhood?
Who was brought in as a new judge during American Idols eighth season?
How long did the Hollywood round air for in season eight of American Idol?
What show did Nigel Lythgoe leave American Idol to produce?
What venue hosted the Hollywood round on American Idol for the first time in 2009?
Why did American Idol choose not to have its Idol Gives Back special in 2009?
How many judges were on the panel for this season?
Which judge joined the panel?
Nigel Lythgoe quit the show to focus on what other show?
Where was the Hollywood round moved to?
What was canceled for this year of Idol?
How many finalists were there on season eight of American Idol?
Who was the first contestant to benefit from the Judges Save?
How many contestants were eliminated during the first week after the judges save?
How many contestants were sent home during the first week of finals?
Who was sent home the week after the judges saved Matt Giraud?
How many finalists were on this season?
How many finalists were eliminated during the first results show?
Which contestant was saved with the first Judges' Save?
Who were the final two contestants on season eight of American Idol?
Who won season eight of American Idol?
What state is American Idol winner Kris Allen from?
How many votes were cast in the American Idol finale in season eight?
Who won the season?
The only prior season to have matching controversy over the winner was?
How many votes were cast for the final two?
Who was accused of teaching the public how to power text for the winner?
What was the name of the song that Kris Allen and Adam Lamber released after American Idol?
Who helped write the song "No Boundaries"?
What was the coronation song for this season?
Who co-wrote the coronation song?
Unlike every previous winner, the winner of this season failed to achieve what status?
How many contestants from this season reached platinum album status?
What year did season nine of American Idol first air?
Who filled the judges spot vacated by Paula Abdul on season nine of American Idol?
At what point during season 9 of American Idol did Ellen Degeneres become a judge?
When did season nine premiere?
Which original judge left prior to the start of the season?
Who replaced Abdul?
When did Ellen join the judges' panel?
Which contestant had to go to the hospital during the week of the top 20?
What producer wanted to remove Crystal Bowersox from the competition?
Why was Crystal Bowersox in the hospital during the week of the top 20 on American Idol?
Which contestant had Type-I diabetes?
When was Crystal hospitalized?
What was changed so she could still qualify?
Who did Bowersox later reveal wanted her to be disqualified?
What role does Warwick have on the show?
Which contestant was saved by the judges in season nine of American Idol?
At what point did the judges use their save on American Idols ninth season?
Who was the first American Idol contestant to return to the show as a mentor?
How much money was brought in by the Idol Gives Back special on season nine of American Idol?
Who was saved with the Judges' Save?
Which former contestant was a mentor this season?
Who had their final season in the show in season nine?
Why did Paula Abdul appear on the season nine finale of American Idol?
Who had a special tribute at the finale?
Which former Idol star made an appearance for Cowell's tribute?
What was the first season of American Idol to feature online auditions?
What website hosted auditions for American Idols tenth season?
How did Karen Rodriguez audition for American Idol season ten?
This is the first season to have what kind of auditions?
Where could contestants submit a video audition?
What contestant came in ninth on season ten of American Idol?
What actor was upset when Pia Toscano was eliminated on American Idol?
Which fan favorite was unexpectedly eliminated earlier than expected?
Which actor criticized Toscano's elimination?
What genre of music did season ten American Idol contestant Lauren Alaina sing?
Who was the winner of American Idols tenth season?
What song did Scotty McCreery first release after winning American Idol?
What song did Lauren Alaina release after coming in second on American Idol?
What is the name of the successful album that Ruben Studdard released in 2003?
When was the season finale of Idol?
Who won this season of Idol?
Scotty's first album reached the top Billboard spot, the first time for an Idol winner since when?
In what year did American Idol first air its eleventh season?
How many contestants made it to the finals on season 11 of American Idol?
What contestant was removed from the competition for concealing legal troubles?
When did season 11 premiere?
Who joined the finalists, making it a Top 25?
When was Jones removed from the show?
Why was Jones disqualified?
Which season 11 contestant had to go to the hospital before the Top 13 Results?
Why was Phillip Phillips hospitalized during his time on American Idol?
How many times did Phillip Phillips have surgery when he was on American Idol?
Which contestant thought about leaving the contest because of pain in his kidney?
Which contestant had eight surgeries during his Idol run?
What kind of pain did Phillips endure?
Which contestant was saved by the judges on season 11 of American Idol?
Who was the first female to be saved by the judges on American Idol?
Who was eliminated the week after judges saved Jessica Sanchez on American Idol?
How far did Jessica Sanchez make it on American Idol?
When did the judges use their save this season?
Who was the recipient of the Judges' Save?
Which contestant was sent home the following week?
What is the first song that Phillip Phliips released after winning American Idol?
What is the name of the song that Jessica Sanchez released first after American Idol?
What was Phillip's coronation song?
What song did Sanchez release?
Which song is the best selling coronation song of all Idol seasons?
What year did season 12 of American Idol first air?
What was Mariah Careys position on season 12 of American Idol?
What website showed video of an altercation between Mariah Carey and Nicki Minaj?
When did season 12 premiere?
How many judges did this season have?
How many girls were in the top 10 on season 12 of American Idol?
Who was the last guy to be sent home on season 12 of American Idol?
How many contestants did this season have?
How many weeks in a row were male contestants eliminated?
Who as the last man to be eliminated?
How many contestants were able to perform for two weeks without any eliminations?
Who was the winner of American Idols twelfth season?
Which contestant came in second on season 12 of American Idol?
What was the first song released by Candice Glover after winning American Idol?
What song did Kree Harrison first release after being on American Idol?
Who won this season of Idol?
Who was the runner up?
What was Glover's first single?
What was Harrison's first single?
This is the first season when what did not happen to the first runner up?
Which long time judge decided to leave his position at the end of the season?
How many seasons was Mariah Carey a judge on American Idol?
Who announced this would be his final year as a judge?
Who were the other judges to leave after this season?
What year did season 13 of American Idol first air?
Who was the host of American idol in its thirteenth season?
What new role did Randy Jackson assume during American Idols thirteenth season?
Who directed the thirteenth season of American Idol?
When did season 13 premiere?
Who was the mentor this season?
Which former judge came back to the judges' panel this season?
Which former mentor joined the judges' panel this season?
Per Blankens, Jesse Ignjatovic, and Evan Pragger replaced which two executives?
Which contestant was saved by the judges after getting the least votes on season 13 of American Idol?
At what point in season 13 did American Idol air its 500th show?
Contestants could perform what in the final rounds for the first time ever?
Who received the Judges' Save this season?
When did the judges use their save on Woolf?
What episode was the 500th of the entire series?
Who won season 13 of American Idol?
Who came in second on season 13 of American Idol?
What song did Caleb Johnson first release after winning American Idol? 
What song did Jena Irene release after coming in second on American Idol? 
Who won this season of Idol?
Who was the runner up this season?
What was Johnson's coronation song?
What was Irene's coronation song?
What year did American Idol first air its fourteenth season?
Who was the host of American Idol in its fourteenth season? 
Which former contestant replaced Keith Urban for auditions in New York City?
What was Keith Urbans position on American Idol in its fourteenth season? 
Who did not come back as a mentor in season 14?
When did season 14 premiere?
Who took Urban's spot at the New York auditions?
How many episodes did American Idol have each week of the top ten?
What drink company ended their relationship with American Idol in season 14?
What car company had a relationship with American Idol in season 14?
What record label had a contract with the winner of American Idols fourteenth season?
Starting this season, how many episodes of Idol aired every week?
Who ended their sponsorship this season?
What other company reduced their sponsorship this season?
This season, the winner won a recording contract with what company?
Who won American Idols fourteenth season?
Who came in second on American Idol in season 14?
Who came in third on American Idol in season 14?
What was the name of Nick Fradianis victory song?
What song did Jax release after coming in third on American Idol?
Who won this season of Idol?
Who was the runner up of Idol?
What was Nick's coronation song?
What was Beckham's first release?
Which contestant came in third place?
What year did Fox announce the cancellation of American Idol?
How many seasons of American Idol have there been?
How many seasons was Jennifer Lopez a judge on American Idol? 
What was Keith Urbans role on American Idols fifteenth season?
Who hosted American Idol in its last season?
When did Fox announce that Season 15 would be the final season?
Who is returning as host?
As of 2012, how many finalists did American Idol have? 
When did American Idol begin? 
What region of the United States were American Idols first five winners from? 
What state is American Idol contestant Clay Aiken from?
What state is American Idol contestant Chris Daughtry from? 
How many Idol winners have come from the southern part of America?
In addition to Clay Aiken and Kellie Pickler, which other Idol is from North Carolina?
How many CDs from American Idol contestants had been sold at the beginning of 2010? 
In the same study, how much more likely was someone from Kentucky to tune into the show?
How many CDS were sold by Idol contestants up to 2010?
Of the CDs sold, how many were by the contestants with southern ties?
Who won season five of American Idol? 
What state is Taylor Hicks from? 
Where do people in the Southern United States often begin singing? 
Where do a lot of people get their start in singing in the south?
Where is Taylor Hicks from?
What company are contestants required to sign a contract with on American Idol?
Who won season two of American Idol? 
Who came in second on season two of American Idol? 
What year did Vote for the Worst cease operations? 
How many more text votes were there in season eight of American Idol over season seven? 
Which season had the biggest voting controversy?
Which season had a voting controversy because of a huge increase in text votes?
Which voting concern has been present since the first season?
When did Vote for the Girls start?
When did Vote for the Worst close?
What is the name of the special that raises money for charities on American Idol?
How much money has American Idol raised for charity with its Idol Gives Back specials? 
What is the name of the charity that Idol has?
When was the first Idol Gives Back?
Which season premier of American Idol was the most watched?
During which season to American Idols rating begin to fall?
What did other television networks refer to American Idol as because of its ratings?
Which television network originally aired The Cosby Show? 
Which season premiere was the most watched of all seasons?
What was the show called by other networks?
Season six saw what for the first time in viewership?
Season six was the first season where what had more viewers?
What drink company ended its relationship with American Idol during season 14?
How many people watched American Idols finale in season 14?
After what season will American Idol be cancelled? 
When did Fox announce the following season would be Idol's last?
How many people watched the season 14 finale?
For how many years was American Idol the highest rated reality show on television?
What dancing show featuring celebrities has been helped by American Idol?
What is another singing show similar to American Idol? 
What show helped launched the career of Kelly Clarkson? 
What show helped launched the career of Carrie Underwood? 
What show helped launched the career of Daughtry? 
How many number one Billboard singles were released by American Idol contestants in the shows first decade? 
Who is the president of Mediabase? 
Who was the most successful American Idol winner on radio as of 2010? 
How many number ones have Idol singers achieved on Billboard charts in just the first ten years?
Who authored books on Billboard charts?
How many contestants had at least one million radio spins by 2010?
How many radio spins did Kelly Clarkson have by 2010?
How many albums have been sold by American Idol contestants up until 2013?
How many single have been sold by American Idol contestants up until 2013? 
How many albums have Idol contestants created as of 2013?
How many singles and digital downloads have Idol contestants created as of 2013?
Which American Idol contestant won an Oscar for Dreamgirls? 
What job does Debra Byrd do on American Idol? 
In what area of the entertainment industry have some Idol contestants found success?
Which Idol won an Academy Award?
What film did Jennifer Hudson win an Academy Award for?
Who recommended the role for Hudon?
What publication does Michael Slezak write for?
Who was accused of being mean and cruel on American Idol? 
What singer had bad things to say about contestants on American Idol? 
What magazine does Ramin Wetoodeh write for? 
Sheryl Crow felt the show undermined art and promoted what?
Who said that American Idol has reshaped the American songbook?
Who was accused of helping meanness thrive?
Which singer said the contestants are not real artists with self respect?
Which music genre has had the most success from American Idol? 
Which genre has felt the impact of Idol the most?
How many nominations has American Idol received for Outstanding Reality Competition Program?  
What director win an Emmy Award for his work on American Idol? 
How many total Emmy Awards has American Idol won? 
What American Idol special received a Governors Award in 2007?
How many times was American Idol nominated for an Emmy?
What award did American Idol win for its Idol Gives Back charity work?
How much money did American Idol make in 2004?
How much money did American Idol generate from its first eight seasons? 
What is the name of the American Idol theme attraction with Disney? 
How much money did American Idol generate from ads in its seventh season?
Who did Idol partner with to create The American Idol Experience?
In which season did American Idol become the costliest show for advertising on television? 
How much did advertisers spend for a 30 second ad spot on the American Idol season four finale?
How much did advertisers spend for a 30 second ad spot during American Idol in 2014? 
How much did advertisers spend for a 30 second ad spot during American Idol in its seventh season? 
By what season was Idol the  highest advertising cost of all shows?
How much did Idol earn in ad revenue alone for season 8?
In which season did Coca-Cola become a sponsor of American Idol? 
In which season did Ford Motor Company become a sponsor of American Idol? 
Which mobile carrier became a sponsor of American Idol in its second season? 
When did Coca-Cola stop being a sponsor of American Idol? 
In which season did iTunes begin a partnership with American Idol? 
How much did it cost each company for the first season?
How much did it cost each company in season 7?
Who was the third largest sponsor?
Which major drink manufacturer decided at the beginning of American Idol not to be a sponsor? 
What show did PepsiCo begin sponsoring in hopes of not missing another opportunity like American Idol? 
Which soda company did not want to sponsor American Idol?
In hopes of not repeating another mistake, which show did PepsiCo sponsor?
PepsiCo fell to what place by 2010, which is in part credited with refusing to sponsor American Idol?
Which season of American Idol had the highest profit on its tour?
What company was a sponsor of the American Idol tour in its ninth season? 
Who was added to the tour in season 12?
Who sponsored the first seven tours?
Who sponsored the ninth tour?
Which was the most successful tour?
When did iTunes become a sponsor on American Idol? 
For how many seasons did American Idol put out a compilation of hits at seasons end? 
What company has released studio recordings from American Idol since season seven?
Idol releases both the performances as well as what for sale?
How were the recordings released for the initial five seasons?
Because all five were in the top ten of Billboard's charts, this made Idol what?
Who joined Idol as a sponsor in season seven?
What company has the right to all recordings from contestants on American Idol?
What company took over as American Idols music label in 2010?
What company had released music from American Idol in addition to Sony Music Entertainment? 
Who owns 19 Recordings?
Who owns the rights to all phonographic material done by the contestants?
Who did 19 initially partner with to distribute the recordings?
Who did BMG partner with in 2005-2007?
Who replaced Sony in 2010 as Idol's music label?
What company has a them park attraction known as The American Idol Experience? 
In what year did The Walt Disney Company open The American Idol Experience? 
In what year did The Walt Disney Company close The American Idol Experience? 
What company had a partnership with The Walt Disney Company for The American Idol Experience? 
When did the American Idol Experience open?
Where did it open?
What did the winner win?
When did the Experience close?
How many different countries air American Idol on television? 
What network broadcasted American Idol live in Canada for thirteen seasons? 
In what year did CTV stop showing live broadcasts of American Idol? 
What Canadian network began airing American Idol in 2015? 
How many nations receive the Idol broadcast?
Who aired the first thirteen seasons in Canada?
Who stated in August 2014 that they picked up the rights beginning in its 2015 season?
Producers have been accused of planting what within the show?
How many consecutive years was American Idol the top rated show?
How many consecutive years did either the performance or results show rank number one?
What is the three word Latin name for domesticated dogs?
What is Canis familiaris?
How long has the domestic dog been selectively bred?
Along with various behaviors and physical attributes, what were domestic dogs bred for?
What decade had significant studies of dog genes to determine origins?
Testing revealed today's dogs trace back by how many years?
What is the region where domesticated dogs ancestry traces to?
What type of diet can modern domesticated dogs thrive eating that other dogs cannot?
What was undertaken in 2010 to determine where dogs originated from?
What is the most common phrase, or nickname, used by people in the United States to describe dogs in general?
What moniker has been given to dogs in Western cultures?
Dogs are a source of what in some cultures?
What was the common 14th-century word for dogs for those who spoke English?
What breed was so prolific it became a prototype of hound?
In what century did "hound" start to only apply to hunting dogs?
What was the common term for all domesticated dogs in England during the 14th century?
When did the word dog become the common term for canines?
Hound became the term for dogs who did what activity during this time?
What Proto-Indo-European word is hound from?
What is the Latin term for "dog.?"
What year are dogs first listed in Systema Naturae?
Who published Systema Naturae?
What is the modern single English word for Canis lupus?
What 1982 publication listed regular family dogs under wolves?
What is the Latin word for dog?
Canis familiaris is the classification for dogs, and is known as what?
What is the Latin name for a wolf?
Feral dogs have what Latin classification?
What year was Canis familiaris listed under Canis lupus?
What year was it decided that if wolves and dogs were one species, then their scientific name is the name of the wild variety?
What 2005 publication in its third edition kept to that ruling?
What official body recognizes both Canis lupus and Canis familiaris?
Who ruled in 2003 that scientific names for wild animals share the same scientific name as their domestic counterparts?
What was this decision called?
What indicated dogs and gray wolves developed as two monophyletic clades?
What species shows more difference in size, looks and actions than any other?
Dogs are considered to be predators and what else?
What bones in dog legs are fused?
A dog's heart and vascular ability if best suited for sprinting and what else?
What are a dog's teeth mainly used for?
Dogs originated as predators and what?
Dogs show an extreme range in what two characteristics?
What breed was the largest dog known to have lived?
What is the biggest known dog?
Which coat is more common with dogs living in colder climates?
Along with a gruff guard hair, what else makes up the double coat?
What is the more common coat for dogs from colder climates?
What is a single coat?
When a dog has a camouflage pattern on its coat, this is called what?
A dog with countershading has dark coloring where?
A natural camo pattern is known as what?
What color is on a dogs upper surfaces if it has countershading?
What is reduced when a dog has countershading?
What part of a dog can be straight, curly or cork-screwed?
What does a dog communicate with its tail?
What part of a dog can be straight, curled, or cork-screwed?
What are some dogs prone to?
What are all dogs susceptible to?
Pyometra usually affects what type of female dog?
Who does pyometra affect?
What are fleas, ticks and mites called?
Some foods that are okay for people to eat are what to dogs?
Grapes, raisins, onions, garlic and what common sugar alcohol (sweetener) is toxic to dogs?
What type of nut is poisonous to dogs?
What is the chemical in chocolate that is poisonous to dogs?
Some human foods can be what to dogs?
What in tobacco can hurt dogs?
What form of chocolate is especially toxic to dogs?
Mutts, dogs that have several breed characteristics, live how much longer than purebred dogs?
Do bigger dogs typically have longer or shorter lives?
When was a study done that discovered mixed breeds tend to live longer than pure breeds?
Typically, how much longer do mixed breeds live?
What is the median lifespan of canines?
What is the canine breed with shortest median lifespan?
What is the median length of life for the canine breed that lives the least amount of years?
Which dog has the shortest lifespan?
What is the average lifespan for a Dogue de Borddeaux?
What is the average length of years of life for canines with long lifespans?
What is the name of the canine that is reported to have lived the longest?
What is the name of the dog in the Guinness Book of World Records for longest lived?
What year did the dog die that is reported to be the longest lived but not officially in a record book?
What was the name of the dog who lived to be 29.5 years?
When did Bluey die?
Who did the Guinness Book of World Records say was the oldest dog in 2011?
How many times per year do female dogs go into heat?
What does going into heat (estrous) prepare a female dog for?
Some larger breeds could take how long to become sexually mature?
What does a female dog experience at sexual maturity?
How long do female dogs carry before delivering puppies?
What is the average length of dog pregnancy?
What is the average number of pups in a litter?
For small dogs, what is the average number of pups in a litter?
What is the average for a dog to bear her litter?
What is the average number of pups per litter?
Smaller dogs tend to have how many pups per litter?
What is it called when an animal is altered to prevent procreation?
According to the text, what agency recommends altering dogs to prevent pregnancies?
What is typically surgically removed on male dogs to prevent procreation?
What is usually removed in female dogs to prevent pregnancy?
In neutering, what is removed in a male dog?
In neutering, what is removed in female dogs?
What does the ASPCA recommend for dogs who are not used for breeding purposes?
Hypersexual behavior in male dogs is diminished by what?
According to the text, what is a possible side effect of neutering a female dog?
Female dogs are less likely to develop cancer if what happens?
What is increased in female dogs with neutering?
What is increased in male dogs with neutering?
What is the name of the dog that could ID over 200 things?
What is the name of the Border collie that knew over 1000 words?
In addition to interpreting body language and verbal commands dogs can also interpret what two other things?
What wild canine did better at a problem-solving experiment?
Perceiving information and retaining it is what?
How many labels does Rico the dog know?
What kind of memory skills do dogs have?
How many words did Chaser know?
What is gustatory communication include in dogs?
People communicate with dogs by voice commands, body language or posture and what else?
Eye gaze, vocalization and body posture are examples of what?
In addition to vocalization and body posture, how do people communicate with dogs?
Which typically has thicker skin, dogs or wolves?
Dogs having ears that are not erect may be due to what?
What kind of features differentiate gray wolves from dogs?
How often do female wolves enter estrus?
Instead of genetic traits for production, dogs are bred for what?
How many "fixed" genes demonstrate the differences between the wolf and dog?
The gene differences indicate what two things done by selection in dogs during breeding for domestication?
What is the common trait selected for dogs in overall breeding?
What do most dogs show less of than wolves?
Most domestic animals were selected for what traits?
Why were dogs initially selected?
For wolves and dogs, how many fixed genes show a variation?
Dogs show less fear and what as opposed to wolves?
Like wolves, big domesticated dogs are considered what type of predator?
Wolves may act in what behavioral manner when attacking dogs?
What animal is reported to be killed more often than sheep by wolves in Croatia?
Like wolves, what kind of predators are large dogs?
Dogs die as a result of Croatian wolf encounters more than what kind of animal?
What limits the feral dog population in Russia?
What large cat has a particular taste for dogs no matter how big the dog is?
What is a typical predator of dogs in places such as Turkmenistan?
What two reptiles kill dogs and consume them?
What big cat has a tendency to attack dogs?
What big cats in Indonesia also attack dogs?
What type of reptiles eat dogs?
What is a known predator of village dogs in India?
Dogs exhibit carnivore as well as what other type of dietary behavior?
Dogs can digest meat as well as what else?
Cats are known as what type of carnivore?
Because of what they eat, dogs are classified as what?
Dogs do not require a very high level of what when eating?
Dogs have genes that allow them to thrive on what when compared to wolves, who cannot?
The majority of dog breeds have only been around for how long?
People selected dogs they wanted based on what two things?
Hundreds of different dog breeds exist because of what?
Height measurements in dogs go from six inches for Chihuahuas to 30 inches in what breed?
How old are most dog breeds?
How many different breeds are there?
Gray color is often called what when referring to dogs?
Natural selection and what makes certain dogs behave certain ways?
What distinguishes different types of dogs from one another?
What is responsible for different dog types and breeds today?
Animals that share characteristics that are different than what other animals in that species have is known as what?
Modern dog breeds are what type of classification which is maintained by modern kennel clubs?
The methods kennel clubs used to classify dogs is what?
A scientific study of dog genetics has shown only how many  types of dogs being determinably distinct?
What, according to the text, are two examples of "old world" dogs?
the Border collie is an example of what type of dog?
How many main types of dogs are there?
What type of dogs are Shar Peis?
What are the other modern and hunting types of dogs called?
What is one of the complex behaviors pet dogs have gotten from wolves?
What may make dogs have the ability to be trained by, play with and fit in with people?
Higher social attributes  and human relationships may have caused dogs to reach what as a species?
What is a complex behavior that dogs inherited from wolves?
Dogs had a worth to what type of early humans?
Dogs have hunted with and done other things for people for a long time, but what is a more recent help to people they provide?
Because of a dog's resourcefulness to people, they have been given what nickname?
Some cultures treat dogs as what rather than companions?
What did dogs clean up to help with keeping habitations of people clean?
What do Australian aborigines call a frigid night? 
How could dogs have helped with sanitation issues in camps?
What is the Australian Aboriginal expression that indicates a very cold night?
What type of hunting is it called when humans and dogs hunt together?
What year was research completed to demonstrate humans benefited by having dogs hunt with them?
What would have been the top benefit for dogs in camps?
The successful mixing of dogs with hunting is often given as a primary reason for what?
What type of working dog may have been the reason so many humans were able to get into North America 12,000 tears ago?
What did ancient people walk across from Siberia into North America?
How old are the oldest findings of dogs in North America?
Evidence places dogs in North America when?
Dogs were the only domesticated animals for what North American population?
Dogs contributed to what migration 1400 years ago?
People still used dogs as pack animals even after what other animal began being used for this purpose?
A grave from 12,000 BC was found to contain an older person and what else?
What two species have the most widespread bonding?
When did more people begin to keep dogs as pets?
What decade showed a change in the way people kept dogs as pets?
In the 1950s and 1960s most dogs where kept where?
Historically, who in particular had dogs as companions?
Dogs were kept where in the 1950s and 1960s as compared to today?
When did the role of dogs change to be more than guardians or walking companions?
Shaping dogs to what people want is called what?
The idea of what constitutes a family, from the human perspective, has enlarged to include what?
How many big trends are involved in how much the position of dogs has changed in human civilization?
When a person shapes a dog to conform to his expectations of behavior, it is called what?
A second major trend has been increasing the idea of family and home to include dogs in what?
It is easy to turn a canine into the perfect companion because so much of what is available?
Dog training can be researched back to what century?
How do dogs establish their territory as far as scent is concerned?
How far back can dog training be found?
How do dogs mark their territory?
What has become important to ensure dogs do not do things that humans don't want them to do, such as jumping?
A study showed that a task dogs do is bringing in what from the lawn?
Dogs often help clean in the kitchen by licking what?
What do many dogs have to do in the families where they live?
What are dogs often taught to bring in from outdoors?
What type of imaging was used to study the relationship between humans and dogs?
An MRI study on dogs proved that dogs have the same response as humans to what?
An MRI study on dogs proved that dogs use the same parts of what as humans?
Because dogs respond to voices the same way humans do, they are able to recognize what in human sounds, making them social?
What technology was used to show that dogs respond to voices in the same brain parts as people?
Dogs have the ability to recognize what type of human sounds?
What nickname have dogs earned for their relationship to humans?
Pointers and hounds are bred to do what?
Certain dogs are bred to help fishermen with what?
Who was the first dog to orbit the earth in 1957?
What breed was Laika?
What phrase describing dogs is used in different languages?
What dog types, in the text, are used for hunting?
Some dogs help fishermen with what?
What is the name of the dog to first orbit the Earth?
What year was the first dog sent into space?
What kind of dogs help people with physical or mental disabilities?
What are conformation shows also known as?
Who evaluates dogs at breed shows?
What is the judge looking for in specific breeds?
What is the only standard judged?
What is the evaluator called in a breed show?
The breed standard only is about what?
Abilities and what else are not tested at breed shows?
What is the best known Korean dish made with dog meat?
What is Gaejang-guk?
Why do people eat Gaejang-guk in the summer months?
What is dog meat boiled with to create Gaejang-guk?
When is the Korean dog recipe usually eaten?
What are two other ingredients in the dog meat recipe in Korea?
How many people are bitten by dogs every year in America?
During the 1980s and 1990s, how many people were killed annually because of dog bites?
In the 2000s, how many people died every year because of dog bites?
According to a 2008 CDC report, how many are bitten in the United States annually?
What decade saw an increase from 17 to 26 deaths caused by dogs?
According to a Colorado study, dog bites are what in children as compared to adults?
Out of 10,000 people, how many people are bitten by dogs in the United States?
Out of 10,000 boys between five and nine years old, how many are bitten annually by dogs?
Children are often bit where by dogs?
Where was the study done that showed dog bites were less serious in children than adults?
About 12.9 out of 10,000 are bit by dogs, but what is the number in 10,000 for young boys from 5 to 9?
In addition to dogs, what other animal is responsible for over 86,000 falls every year?
What sort of vehicle is most likely associated with accidents involving dogs?
What is the common name of the species that causes Toxocariasis?
How are Toxicara canis infections spread?
About how many people get a Toxocara infection each year?
Toxocariasis can lead to what in humans?
Toxocariasis is caused by what kind of eggs in dog feces?
What percentage of people in America are infected with the Toxocara infection?
How many Toxocara infection cases are reported annually in the US?
What percentage of soil contained T. canis eggs in Great Britain public parks?
If toxocariasis is left untreated, what can happen to a person?
What year did a publication come out indicating having a pet does not mean lower risk of heart disease in the elderly?
What is lowered in children who have pets?
What year did a report state that research did not support better health for elderly people who own pets?
People with dogs get more of what than people with cats or no animals?
People with dogs do what more than people who have cats or no pets?
What do humans get exposed to with pets that may help them not get sick?
Dogs can act as a facilitator of what between human beings?
What year was the study done that indicated people with pets are more likely to get to know neighbors?
What is lessened when people are with their pet dogs?
People in wheelchairs have better social interactions with who when dogs are involved?
Dogs were taken where to help people with mental disorders socialize?
Therapy dogs can help increase what in people suffering with Alzheimer's?
What was decreased in children with ADHD when they were exposed to therapy dogs?
When did people start using dogs as therapy?
Where were dogs introduced then to help people socialize people?
Children who have ADHD or conduct disorders respond better when what is a part of their treatment plan?
People with Alzheimer's smile and laugh more with what kind of therapy?
What can trained dogs detect by sniffing a person or a sample of their urine?
How much larger is a dog brain olfactory cortex when compared to humans?
A dog can detect smells in one part per what?
How much larger is a dog's olfactory cortex than a person's?
How many cancer patients has Daisy detected?
In Hindu mythology, what do the two dogs who are owned by the god of death watch over?
What is the name of the god of death?
Who owns two dogs with four eyes each in Hindu mythology?
What do Yama's dogs watch over?
What does Muthappan use for his hunting dog for?
Offerings left at the Muthappan Temple shrine take on what form?
Jewish law dictates that anyone owning a dog must feed the dog before who?
If a Jewish person owns a dog, he must do what to do the dog before he does it to himself?
What does a dog represent in the Christian culture?
Three Asian countries see dogs as what?
What country has the dog as part of its 12 animals that represent years?
How are dogs viewed in Asian countries?
Thousands of years ago, dogs were depicted on the walls of what?
What scenes were popular in art during the Middle Ages?
Dogs were depicted as art on the walls of what?
What kind of art scene was popular in the Middle Ages?
As relationships between people and dogs got closer, what happened to the art that had dogs in it?
Dogs can have the same health issues as who?
Which dog is not able to mount a female dog?
What has likely led to human success?
Studies that people are better off with dogs have been criticized for being what?
People who have cats or dogs make fewer visits where?
What day was the Olympic torch lit for the 2008 games?
Where did the Olympics originate?
When did the Olympic torch reach Beijing?
How many continents did the torch visit after Beijing?
The torch was on what road to symbolize historic links between China and the world?
Where was the Olympic torch lit?
What date was the Olympic torch lit?
What is the name of the stadium in Greece were the torch was taken to?
What date did the Olympic torch arrive at its destination in China?
What mountain was the torch taken up?
How many people protested on the San Francisco torch route?
How many people protested at the Pyongyang torch route?
What were some groups doing along the torch route that was not supportive of the Olympics?
Who put out the torch along the route for protection?
Who condemned the various attacks on the torch relay route?
In San Francisco, who had a larger presence than the protesters? 
Who overwhelmed the protesters in Japan?
Who amassed in large scale against protesters?
What was said to have occurred between some supporters and protesters?
What three areas of the globe were protests reported as not big?
Who is the president of the International Olympic Committee?
Athletes wearing what kind of flag at any Olympic venue faced the possibility of expulsion from the Olympics?
Because of the relay issues, IOC decided to no longer have what in subsequent Olympics?
What is the name of the man who said the protesting of the torch relay as a "crisis"?
What could happen to Olympic sports participants who showed a Tibetan flag at events?
Who asked that the torch relay be ended?
What was halted with the torch relay for future Olympics?
The international torch relay was canceled for what event in June 2008?
For what events was the torch relay decided to not be held?
What is the Chinese design used on the Olympic Torch?
What is the Olympic Torch made from?
How much does the Olympic Torch weigh?
What is used to light the flame on the Olympic Torch?
What was the design name of the Chinese Olympic Torch?
What metal is the torch constructed from?
What wind speed will the torch flame still stay lit in MPH?
How much rainfall in inches per hour can the torch stay lit under?
What fuel is used for the torch?
When it was necessary for the Olympic Torch to be on an airplane, which one was used?
What color was the chartered plane?
When was it decided that Air China would be the official torch carrier?
How many days did the plane travel?
What type of aircraft did the Torch team travel in?
What colors was the aircraft painted?
What was the name of the airline that transported the Olympic Torch?
How many days did the plane travel with the Torch team?
How many different places were visited by the aircraft taking the Torch team?
How many continents did the torch visit?
What was the stop that was to happen between Ho Chi Minh City and Hong Kong?
The Republic of China felt that the wrong decision could place Taiwan on the same level as what two areas?
The torch route covered six what?
What government disagreed on the language used to describe the torch route?
What two places did Taiwan not want to be considered equal with in the language of the torch's route description?
How many kilometers was the torch supposed to go through Taiwan?
Action was taken to boycott which company?
Who was the biggest shareholder of Carrefour?
What did some protesters burn?
Where were anti-protesters blocked from entering a Carrefour store with Chinese flags?
Who was said to have given money to the Dalai Lama?
What method did the Chinese government use to ease the boycott situation?
What French company was being boycotted?
In what publication were Chinese people asked to be orderly and legal because of the protests and demonstrations?
What is the name of the publication where Chinese people were advised to be calm and rational about patriotism?
The Chinese people were told to show patriotism in an orderly and what manner?
What virgin site did the torch visit on April 2?
Who was the first person to be handed the torch in Almaty?
Who is Nursultan Nazarbaev?
The route in Almaty went from Medeo Stadium to where?
What kind of activists were arrested in Almaty?
What country did the torch get to for the first time?
What is the name of the president who was the first torchbearer in Almaty?
What was the distance in kilometers for the route in Kazakhstan?
What activists were reported to have been arrested?
When was the torch in Istanbul?
Where did the torch end up in Istanbul?
Where did the torch start in Instanbul?
Who protested for their compatriots who were in Xinjiang?
What city was the Olympic Torch at on April 3rd?
What is the name of the place in the city where the torch relay started in Turkey?
Where did the torch relay finish in Turkey?
What people in Turkey protested for their people living in China?
What happened to protesters who tried to interrupt the carrying of the torch?
When did the torch arrive in Saint Petersburg?
Where was the start of the torch route in Saint Petersburg?
Where did the torch route end in Saint Petersburg?
Who is the first MMA fighter to participate in carrying the Olympic torch?
Where in Russia was the first stop for the relay?
What city location did the torch relay begin in Russia?
What was the last location for the relay in Russia?
What is the name of the MMA fighter who carried the torch in Russia?
How many torchbearers took part in the London route?
Who was the first person to hold the torch for the London route?
Along with Francesca Martinez, who decided to not carry the torch?
Who was outside at 10 Downing Street to welcome the torch without actually touching it?
Who got emails asking him to boycott the torch relay?
How many people carried the torch in England for the 2008 Olympics?
What two people in England declined to bear the torch?
Where did Gordon Brown welcome the torch?
Where was an attempt made to take the torch?
Who threw a a Tibetan flag from a City Hall window?
Which torchbearer was in a wheelchair?
What was Jin Jing called by ethnic Chinese?
What was stopped due to protest interruptions?
What is the name of the handicapped bearer of the torch?
What did the ethnic Chinese call the disabled torch bearer?
Who put a flag of Tibet out of the window at City Hall?
Which organization planned several protests?
What did Reporters Without Borders scale in order to put a protest banner on it?
Which cathedral did Reporters Without Borders hang another protest banner?
What was hung from the Eiffel Tower?
Who climbed the Eiffel Tower to hang a protest banner?
Where did the torch start it's North American route?
What day did the torch arrive in San Francisco?
What is the name of the first North American torchbearer?
The route end was changed from Justin Herman plaza to what?
Who was the head of the U.S. Olympic Committee?
What city in the United States held the 2008 Olympic Torch relay?
What was the date of the relay in the United States?
What is the name of the person who handed off the torch to the torchbearer in the United States 2008 Olympic relay?
What is the name of the location where the relay ending event was canceled?
Who approved a resolution concerning human rights on April 1, 2008?
The concern was over what in China and Tibet?
What date was the protest which was led by Gere and Tutu?
When was a resolution agreed to about Chinese human rights issues in San Francisco?
Who approved the resolution?
Where was a protest planned in San Francisco?
What actor was scheduled to attend a San Francisco Olympic protest?
Three protester climbed what to hang two banners on April 7, 2008?
Laurel Sutherlin spoke to which TV station about his concerns?
Who asked that the San Francisco relay route be shortened?
What famous bridge had two banners hung from it by protesters?
Who spoke to station KPIX-CBS5 about the bridge banner protests?
How many supporters face charges for the bridge stunt?
How many activists may be charged with crimes for the bridge stunt?
Where did the first relay runner disappear to with the torch??
Which wheelchair-bound torchbearer was ejected from the relay for showing a Tibetan flag?
What wheelchair-bound bearer of the Olympic torch displayed a Tibetan flag?
Where was the last part of the San Francisco torch relay carried through before getting on a bus?
Where was a makeshift closing ceremony held for the torch relay in San Francisco?
After the bearer of the torch disappeared into a warehouse, what road did the relay reappear on?
What is the name of the activist who promised peaceful protests?
What route was planned for an alternative march?
What was on the banner that was displayed where the torchbearers would carry the torch?
What is the name of the protester who said they would not try to extinguish the torch?
Where did the other march travel form and to?
What was the name given to the torch carried on the alternative march?
What did the large banner say that was along the alternative march route?
What was the unsanctioned alternative relay called?
Who was the outreach director of HRTR?
What was the non profit that was funded by Mark Palmer?
Which footballer decided to not be a torchbearer because of the controversy?
How many police officers were in place to avoid controversy along the torch route?
What was thrown to try and put out the flame?
What is Susan Prager communication director of?
What football star backed out due to relay controversy?
How many police officers were part of the security operative?
What was tossed at the torch trying to put it out?
The protests were considered to be overall what in nature?
Where was the only African destination for the torch?
When did the torch arrive in Dar es Salaam?
Where did the route start for the torch in Dar es Salaam?
Where was the solitary place the relay was held in Africa?
What is the name of the railway where the Olympic torch relay began in Africa?
Where did the relay terminate in Africa?
What country paid for the stadium through aid money?
Who it the torch in Africa?
Which Middle East location was the only area the torch visited?
When did the torch arrive in Muscat?
Which actress carried the torch for part of the route?
Where was the only place the Olympic torch was carried in the Middle East?
How far was the relay route in kilometers in the Middle East?
When did the torch arrive in Islamabad?
Where was an indoor ceremony held since the outdoor relay was cancelled?
Who spoke at the opening ceremony in Islamabad in addition to President Musharraf?
Where did the Olympic torch relay start in Pakistan?
Instead of a traditinal relay, where was the track the torch was carried in Pakistan?
When did the torch visit New Delhi?
How many runners carried the torch in New Delhi?
Which football captain did not participate in the relay to show support for Tibet?
How many torchbearers did not participate because of their concerns with Tibet?
Where did the torch relay happen in India?
How long was the route in India in miles?
How many bearers of the torch were used in India?
How many bearers decided not to participate?
What is the name of the footballer who refused to be a part of the relay?
The security given to the torch relay in New Delhi is reminiscent of the security of what?
The Chinese presented a list of vulnerable relay locations to who?
Who supposedly cancelled a trip to Beijing in protest?
Who was said to have canceled an official trip to China in protest?
At what time in the middle of the night was the diplomat summoned?
The Olympic relay had the same security precautions taken as what other special day?
What kind of targets do Republic Day events present as?
How many people comprised the Tibetan exile community?
India refused China's request that the Tibetan exile community be avoided because they said India is what?
Where is the exiled Tibetan government?
How many Tibetan exiles are said to be in India?
A wholesale ban on what was denied?
What Olympic group was denied by India?
What deteriorated between India and China?
Who said they did not support relay interruptions?
When did the Olympic torch reach Bangkok?
Who is the Green World Foundation chairwoman who refused to participate in the relay?
The media was told that the Chinese supplied with shirts and transportation?
When did the torch go through Bankok?
The relay route was a little over how many kilometers?
Who were told they would be banned from reentering Thailand?
What scheduled bearer of the torch boycotted?
When did the torch visit Malaysia?
What is the capital city of Malaysia?
Where did the route begin in Malaysia?
Prior to the 2008 games, when did Malaysia last see an Olympic torch relay?
What is the location of the start of the relay in Malaysia?
Where did the relay end in Malaysia?
What year was the last torch relay event in Malaysia?
How many Special Police protected the relay event?
Which supporters protested near the Chinese embassy in Malaysia?
Supporters of what demonstrated at the Chinese embassy in Malaysia?
What were a Japanese family who unveiled a Tibetan flag hit with?
What did the Chinese group yell?
What did Chinese volunteers take from two Malaysian demonstrators?
When did the Olympic torch visit Jakarta?
Who requested that the original route be cancelled?
Along with invited people, who were the only other people allowed in the stadium?
Where did the torch relay begin in Indonesia?
How many kilometers was the planned route that was cancelled?
Why was the first route not taken?
What type of facility was the torch carried at instead.
When did the torch arrive in Canberra?
Who received the flame from Chinese officials in Canberra?
What did Agnes Shea give to the Chinese in return?
Who publicly argued at a press conference?
Where was the relay held in Australia?
How many kilometers was the route in Australia?
What was the location of the beginning of the Olympic torch route in Australia?
Who kept the demonstrators separated?
What is the name of the Aboriginal elder who received the torch from Chinese officials?
Who did the Chinese want to deploy to Canberra to protect the flame?
Chinese Australian students were told to defend what against scum and separatists?
Who was the chairman of the Australian Council of Chinese Organisations?
Who was the Foreign Minister who said he was okay with protests as long as they were peaceful?
What group did China want along the relay route in Canberra?
Who was given permission to search attendees of the relay?
Who said that thousands of pro-Beijing supporters would be bused in?
Who told the media that Chinese diplomats were arranging a "peaceful show of strength"?
Who was the Foreign Minister who indicated Chinese officials wanted supporting demonstrators to show up and show their point of view?
Who withdrew as a torchbearer because of her concerns about human rights?
Who said Dodds' withdrawal was a good example of peacefully protesting?
Who withdrew from the torch event?
Who was the foreign minister that said her decision was a good example of peacefully making a point?
Who was the head of the Canberra torch relay committee?
How many supporters of Tibet were expected in Canberra to protest?
ACT Chief Minister Jon Stanhope said which organization intended to ensure that China supporters outweighed Tibet supporters?
Which athlete carried the torch for the final leg?
How many supporters of Tibet were expected to attend the torch relay?
It was thought that how many Chinese supporters would attend the torch relay?
Who did not expect that reaction from the Chinese community?
Who was involved to ensure the pro Chinese demonstrators outweighed the Tibetan demonstrators?
Where was the torch relay event held in South Korea?
When did Seoul host the Olympics?
Where was the start point for the relay?
Who became violent during the relay route and was promised deportation when caught?
Where was the relay event held in South Korea?
Which Olympics did Seoul host?
When did the torch arrive in Pyongyang?
Who presided over the torch event in North Korea?
Who was the first torchbearer in North Korea?
Where did the relay start?
Where was the relay event held in North Korea?
What date did the torch relay event take place?
What did people in the crowd wave at the beginning of the relay?
Who was the first runner with the torch?
When did the torch arrive in Hong Kong?
Who was the first torchbearer in Hong Kong?
Where was the torch event started in Hong Kong?
Where did the torch relay end in Hong Kong?
How many torchbearers participated in the relay event in Hong Kong?
When was the relay event held in Hong Kong?
Who handed the torch to Lee Lai Shan, the first torchbearer?
What was used to get the torch across the Shing Mun River?
How many torchbearers carried the torch?
The torchbearers included athletes, celebrities and who?
What did Hong Kong Alliance in Support of Patriotic Democratic Movements in China members wave to symbolize democracy?
This group wanted accountability for what 1989 event?
Who wrapped a Tibetan flag around her body and later waved it?
Who removed Chan from the protest?
Why is Chan suing the Hong Kong government?
Some people waved plastic inflated flames, saying they symbolize what?
Who was proud that Hong Kong still has brave people speaking out?
What did radio host Christina Chan wear before waving it?
When did the torch visit Macao?
Where was the torch ceremony held in Macao?
How many torchbearers participated in Macao?
Who was the first torchbearer in Macao?
A newspaper article criticized that there were not enough of what kind of person among the torchbearers?
When was the torch relay event held in Macao?
How many torchbearers carried the torch in Macao?
Who was the first person to carry the torch in Macao?
Which casino tycoon participated in the torch relay event?
Which publication was unhappy with the amount of non-athlete torchbearers?
A Macau citizen was arrested for posting a plea to disrupt the relay on what website?
In addition to cyberctm.com, what other website was shut down for two days?
Who was arrested on April 26 for posting an online message?
Where was the message posted?
Who denied the shutdown was motivated by politics?
After its April departure, when did the torch return to China?
What actor attended a torch celebration in China?
When did the torch reach Sanya, Hainan?
When was the last time the torch had been in China?
Who attended the celebrations?
Which actor also attended the celebrations?
What did the Chinese media focus on as far as human rights protesters?
Though several torchbearers withdrew from the torch relay, the official website for China stated that Indian torch participants vowed to run for what?
What did Ayaan Ali Khan and Manavjit Singh Sandhu say should not be mixed?
Though four withdrew, it was reported that Indian torchbearers vowed to what?
Several torchbearers said what two things should not be combined?
 Who did Xinhua accuse of biased reporting on April 17?
Who was accused of bias on April 17 by Xinhua?
Who wanted CNN to apologize for its insult to Chinese people?
What article did BBC put out about China just days earlier?
Who stated that Chinese people could access the BBC news website after years of not being able to?
How many people gathered in protest at these two buildings?
Who commented that Chinese people can look at the BBC news site for the first time?
Where is BBC banned from reporting?
Who published "Overseas Chinese rally against biased media coverage" on April 20?
Which publication published a report about the Chinese rallying against media bias?
How many attendants accompanied the flame during it's travels?
When were the 30 team members sworn in?
What were their official team outfits?
Which team member has his own fan following?
How many attendants were used from the People's Armed Police for the flame's entire journey?
When were these 30 sworn in?
What did these 30 attendants wear?
What is the attendant who has a large fan base called?
Which French company was boycotted?
Carrefour was boycotted because of which shareholder?
Who was the LVMH Group accused of supporting?
What was burned during these boycotts?
Who was accused of helping the Dalai Lama?
Boycotters accused France of being pro-seccessionist and what?
The Chinese government tried to tamper the boycott, trying to avoid a similar outcome to which protests in 2005?
Which newspaper urged citizens to protest peacefully?
Which website had mentions of the Carrefour boycott removed by the government?
When did protests in front of Carrefour's stores occur in China?
The Chinese government did not want a repeat of what protests?
Which newspaper asked the Chinese people to protest peacefully?
Who removed Carrefour boycott comments from some websites?
In what is the torch flame kept lit when the torch must be off?
The torch is put out at night, on aircraft, during storms and what else?
Who was Michael Mak Kwok-fung?
How many additional teams will help with the Mainland China route?
How many members are on each of these two teams?
What was the extent of Whitehead's education in philosophy?
What was Whitehead's opinion of his own knowledge of metaphysics in that correspondence?
How did Whitehead eventually become regarded in the field of metaphysics?
With what friend and former student did Whitehead correspond regarding the goals of science?
What is the highest Whitehead was trained in philosophy? 
What is the relationship between Whitehead and Russell?
What did Whitehead consider himself as a philosopher? 
What quotation of Whitehead's was noted by a student in 1927?
What was Whitehead's opinion of basic assumptions in metaphysics?
What did Whitehead feel was necessary regarding basic assumptions in metaphysics?
What was Whitehead's opinion of metaphysical investigations?
What do philosophers do, in Whitehead's view?
Assumptions of how the universe works are difficult to see precisely because of what?
What did Whitehead ask people to reimagine in order for philosophy to make progress?
What did Whitehead regard as essential to good science and good philosophy?
What Cartesian concept did Whitehead believe to be erroneous?
What theory did Whitehead prefer to the Cartesian concept?
How did whitehead define "experience"?
How did Descartes' distinguish types of existence?
How did Whitehead identify his system of metaphysics?
What idea states that reality is fundamentally constructed of bits of matter?
Whitehead rejected the Cartesian idea in favor of what?
Whitehead believed instead of matter existing independently of each other, it did what?
Whitehead believed that reality should be regarded as what?
Whitehead's system as "philosophy of organism" became widely known as what term?
How did Whitehead define the "fallacy of misplaced concreteness"?
What basic concepts did Whitehead believe were questionable?
Why did he believe those concepts were inaccurate?
How did Whitehead classify what is usually seen as an individual person?
How did Whitehead refer to the combination of a person's separate experiences?
What are the concepts quality, matter, and form considered?
Concepts such as quality, matter, and form fail to account for what?
What concepts overlook the experiential nature of basic elements?
What does Whitehead call experiences that are progressively connected?
Instead of being a single person, what does Whitehead view a person as?
What did Whitehead believe were essentially the only things that truly exist?
Regarding the idea that individuals or objects don't fundamentally change, what terms can be used to describe what an object or individual actually is?
In that line of thinking, how are changes described?
The idea that people are unchanging and stay the same even through changes is considered what?
In Whitehead's cosmology, what are the only things that fundamentally exist?
Where do occasions of experience overlap?
Instead of having an enduring essence, what does Whitehead believe?
In Whitehead's view, identities do not define people, but what?
Why did Whitehead think people continued to subscribe to materialistic thinking?
What did Whitehead believe regarding factors that limit people's understanding of his concepts?
What did Whitehead believe was one of the biggest reasons materialistic thinking endured?
What did Whitehead state about the belief that a person is exactly the same from moment to moment?
Why couldn't each moment of each person's life be given a different proper name?
What did Whitehead believe was a culprit in maintaining a materialistic way of thinking?
Whitehead's main philosophy on humans changing is what?
What is the general materialistic view of an object?
How the fundamental concept of matter influence people to view objects?
What is Whitehead's belief regarding the importance of relations?
What is the materialistic view of matter in relation to other objects?
What is another issue that Whitehead had with materialism?
What obscures the importance of relations according to Whitehead?
What does Materialism see each object as?
How is each object related to other things?
In what areas of the world has interest in Whitehead's work spread in recent decades?
Who was one of the first theologians to try to interact with Whitehead's ideas?
What was the basis for "Nature, Man and God"?
According to Isabelle Stengers, what are unifying factors in diverse practices (like ecology and feminism) that have become interested in Whitehead's work?
What other fields have shown more recent interest in Whitehead's work?
Where were the first followers mainly found?
Who began the interest in Whitehead at Chicago's Divinity School?
Who id the most well-known Whitehead scholar?
What professors established the importance of Whitehead's work?
Where is interest in Whitehead's work growing the fastest today?
What challenges are China using Whitehead's ideas to help manage?
What types of traditions are China blending with Whitehead's "constructive post-modern" philosophy?
What philosphers' writings are becoming required reading for graduate students in China?
Why does John Cobb believe China has become interested in process philosophy?
What philosophy is closely related to process philosophy?
What pragmatists did Whitehead acknowledge in the preface to "Process and Reality"?
Who is a philosopher that promotes process philosophy and pragmatism currently?
What founder of pragmatism's collected papers did Charles Hartshorne ans Paul Weiss edit?
What important neopragmatist was Harthorne's student?
How was Whitehead's theory of gravitation received?
What physicists in the field of quantum theory have been influenced by Whitehead?
What affect  did the discovery of gravitational waves have on Whitehead's theory?
What are gravitational waves?
How must Whiteheads cosmology now be considered?
What award did Cobb and Daly receive for the book?
What was the first book on environmental ethics by an individual author?
On which economics book did Cobb collaborate with Herman Daly?
What other economics book did Cobb go on to author?
Who established the FEELS model in China?
What does "FEELS" stand for?
What is the purpose of the FEELS model?
What entities are working together to promote the FEELS model?
Where was Alfred North Whitehead born?
In what year was Whitehead born?
Who founded Chatham House Academy?
What was Whitehead's father's profession?
Who was Whitehead's mother?
Where was Alfred North Whitehead born? 
What year was Whitehead born?
What was Whitehead's father's profession?
What was Whitehead's mother's name?
What was Whitehead's wife's name?
In which educational system was Whitehead employed in the late 1910s?
What was Whitehead's title at the University of London in late 1918?
What was Whitehead's last position before he traveled to America?
In which year did Whitehead relocate to America?
What degree program did Whitehead contribute to establishing at University of London?
When did Whitehead accept administrative positions?
What was he elected at the University of London?
Where did Whitehead accept administrative positions?
When did Whitehead go to America?
Who authored Whitehead's biography that is considered to be the most reliable description of Whitehead's life?
Why was no Nachlass left behind after Whitehead's death?
What was Whitehead's opinion on privacy?
How many volumes is the biography of Whitehead?
Who wrote the biography of Whitehead?
What was Whitehead's wish upon his death for his family?
What did Whitehead believe in so profusely that it was difficult to write a biography on him?
What was Whitehead's first published book on mathematics?
With what mathematician and philosopher did Whitehead collaborate to write Principia Mathematica?
Who was the intended audience of Whitehead's first two mathematics books?
What was Whitehead's final book on mathematics?
What is the significance of Principia Mathematica currently?
What did Whitehead publish numerous articles about?
How many books on mathematics did Whitehead write?
Who co-wrote Principia Mathematica with Whitehead?
Which of Whitehead's books is known as one of the most important works in mathematical logical?
When did Whitehead write his first book? 
What did Lie algebras and hyperbolic quaternions demonstrate a need for?
How did Alexander Macfarlane summarize the relationship between different methods in "A Treatise on Algebra" in his review?
Lie algebras and hypobolic quanternions drew attention to the need for what?
What did reviewer GB Mathews say algebraic structures possessed? 
Reviewer Alexander Macfarlane believed that the main idea of the work is a comparative study of what?
How long did Whitehead and Russell expect to spend creating Principia Mathematica?
How long did it actually take to complete Principia Mathematica? 
Why was there a funding shortfall for the publishing of Princpia Mathematica? 
Who supplied the funding to cover the shortfall?
How prevalent is Principia Mathematica today?
How long did Whitehead and Russell think it would take them to complete Principia Mathematica?
How long did it actually take Whitehead and Russell to complete Principia Mathematica?
How many volumes was Principia Mathematica?
How many pages was Principia Mathematica?
Who paid to publish Principia Mathematica?
What did Whitehead believe regarding creativity?
An entity is a sum of relations, a valuation of them and what else?
Most entities do not have what?
All entities, being unable to predict behavior, are because of what?
Not being able to predict what any entity is going to do is what principle b Whitehead?
Other than the combination of its relations, what else defines an entity?
What did Whitehead believe about an entity's relation to other entities?
What is the origin of the word "prehension"?
What is a basic description of the theory of representative perception?
What term did Whitehead describe that perception is not limited to the living?
What language does the term "prehensio" come from?
What does the word "Prehensio" translate into?
What entities does the term prehension apply to?
How many modes does perception occur in according to Whitehead?
What is prehension used to define?
What does the term "prehension" signify regarding an entities perceptions and relations?
What did Whitehead state are the two types of perception?
How do the senses affect causal efficacy?
What can be said about the accuracy of presentational immediacy?
What is the term for the experience dominating primitive organisms that have a sense for fate?
What is the other term for "pure sense perception"?
What is it called if you mistake a reflection in a mirror for the real thing?
How does Whitehead define causal efficacy?
How does Whitehead define presentational immediacy?
Which concept does Whitehead state is more dominant in a lower mentality?
What is Whitehead's term for the two modes of perceptions combining?
What dominates more basic mentality in symbolic reference?
What does symbolic reference link appearance with?
What does having sense perceptions conclude about a person?
What is the purpose of symbolic reference?
How does Whitehead describe the process of a typical person noticing a chair?
How might an artist view a chair differently than a typical person?
How does Whitehead say a dog may interpret the presence of a chair?
What observation did Whitehead make about life?
What did Whitehead state was the biggest indicator of a higher form of life?
What did Whitehead believe are the goals f life?
What did Whitehead believe was the fundamental purpose of life?
Whitehead observes that life is deficient in what?
What are higher life forms actively engaged in?
How many goals of living is there?
Whitehead sees life as directed towards what purpose?
Without Whitehead's proposed purpose, life would be what?
What was Whitehead's response to questions about why complex life evolved?
What was Whitehead's description of God?
What is Whitehead's most well-known critical statement regarding the Christian notion of God?
What qualities dis Whitehead state that Christians attributed to their version of God?
What was Whitehead's belief about God in relation to religion?
In what did Whitehead believe that those concepts existed?
What did Whitehead view as the second nature of God?
What type of God did Whitehead believe existed?
Why did Whitehead view the existence of God as a necessity for his metaphysical system?
In what way did Whitehead view God as deficient?
What did Whitehead claim God would be without the world?
How does Whitehead view the relationship between God an the world?
How does he define entities' need for God?
How dis Whitehead believe God provided permanence to entities?
In what field of study has Whitehead's work been most influential in the United States?
Who was the most important early supporter of Whitehead's work in the context of theology?
What advancement of Whitehead's process philosophy is attributed to Charles Hartshorne?
Who are some other distinguished process theologians?
What was Whitehead's technical definition of religion?
What did Whitehead believe religion did with strong emotions?
What purpose did Whitehead believe religion served?
What is Mary Parker Follett known for?
What do Margaret Stout and Carrie M. Staton view as commonalities between Whitehead and Follett?
What book did Stout and Jeanine M. Love author that further examines the on between Whitehead and Follett?
What did many asset managers decide to do to the detriment of their clients?
What led to bad investments by asset managers in over-priced credit assets?
Who is compensated based on the volume of client assets they have under management?
What is the incentive for asset managers to expand their assets under management?
What rationale did asset managers who continued to invest in over-priced investments to the detriment of their clients use?
Who is the Senator that asked FDIC if it had considered ordering IndyMac to reduce its reliance on brokered deposits?
What does the abbreviation FDIC stand for?
How much of IndyMac's total deposits of $18.9 billion on March 31, 2008 were considered brokered deposits?
Had the FDIC disallowed IndyMac from acquiring new brokered deposits on this date, the threat of brokered deposit losses would have been $500 million a month?
How much was the threat of brokered deposit losses per month to IndyMac?
What was the name of the bridge bank established to assume control of IndyMac Bank's assets, liabilities and deposit accounts?
What is the maximum amount of funds the FDIC guarantees in insured accounts?
How many IndyMac account holders held funds in excess of the FDIC's insured amount of US$100,000?
On what date did the FDIC put IndyMac Bank into conservatorship?
On what date did the FDIC plan to open IndyMac Federal Bank, FSB?
How many mortgage lenders went bankrupt during 2007 and 2008?
Who is the investment bank that was feared to collapse in March 2008 and was sold in a fire-sale to JP Morgan Chase?
When did the financial institution crisis hit its peak?
When did Lehman's former CEO appear before Representative Henry A. Waxman?
What firm filed the largest bankruptcy in U.S. history?
The equivalent of a bank run on which funds occurred in September 2008?
What do money market funds frequently invest in?
When did the financial crisis hit its most critical stage?
How much was withdrawn from money markets during one week in September 2008?
What was the record high for the TED spread on October 10, 2008?
Economist Paul Krugman explained the credit crisis via the implosion of which system?
What is the system with nearly equal the importance of traditional commercial banking?
The shadow banking system could not provide funds to mortgage firms and other corporations without the ability to obtain which funds?
What was Timothy Geithner's position during the fall of 2008?
How much of the U.S. lending mechanism was frozen until June 2009?
What is the primary cause of the reduction in funds available for borrowing?
What institution reported that the traditional banking systems does not have the capital to close the gap in the lending mechanism?
What is likely to vanish forever, as a result of excessively loose credit conditions?
As of June 2009, the Brookings Institution reports that traditional banking system does not have enough of what to close the lending gap?
According to economist Dean Baker, a homeowner who has no equity if this type default risk?
What is one of the major problems with the economy in November 2008?
How many homeowners who had substantial equity in their homes two years ago, have little no equity as of November 2008?
What does the creditworthiness of businesses depend on?
How did profit prospects for businesses look in November 2008 compared to November 2007?
According to The Brookings Institution report in June 2009, how much growth did U.S. consumption account for between 2000 and 2007?
For the first quarter of 2009, what was the annualized rate of decline in GDP in Germany?
For the first quarter of 2009, what was the annualized rate of decline in GDP in Mexico?
Who depended on the U.S. consumer as a source of global demand?
What is one reason for the decline in growth around the world in 2009?
What area of the world was less severely affected by the credit crunch according to The World Bank report In February 2009?
What does the abbreviation FDI stand for?
Arab countries entered the financial crisis in exceptionally strong positions giving them a cushion against this?
What will have the greatest impact on the global economic crisis?
What is the single most important determinant of economic performance?
When did the U.S. recession that began in December 2007 end?
When did the financial crisis appear to have ended?
When does the United States Financial Crisis Inquiry Commission date the crisis to?
What was the name of the article that appeared in TIME magazine in April 2009 declaring the crisis over?
On what date did President Barack Obama declare that the markets are stabilized?
Who led global economic growth after the financial crisis?
How much global GDP did emerging and developing economies account for from 2007 to 2014?
What relationship between advanced and emerging/developing was completely overturned by the financial crisis of 2007?
How much global GDP did "advanced" economies account for from 2007 to 2014?
What economies led global economic growth prior to the financial crisis?
Who believed that the growth of the commercial real estate bubble indicated that U.S. housing policy was not the cause of the crisis?
When did Xudong An and Anthony B. Sanders issue a report about commercial mortgage-backed securities?
According to business journalist Kimberly Amadeo, when did the first signs of decline in real estate occur?
What are CMBS?
According to most analysts, what crisis took place after the crisis in residential real estate?
What is one investment assigned safe ratings by the credit rating agencies?
How much was invested worldwide in fixed income investments?
How much did the pool of money invested worldwide in fixed income investments grow in size from 2000 to 2007?
What is an example of a product Wall Street invented to answer the demand for income generating investments?
In the 2000s, investors were seeking higher yields than those offered by this investment?
What is the name of the securities that enabled financial institutions to obtain investor funds to finance subprime?
What was the outcome of collateralized debt obligations?
What type ratings did securities first in line receive from rating agencies?
What type pool do collateralized debt obligations place their payments from mortgages into?
What securities had lower credit ratings but potentially a higher rate of return?
How much had average U.S. housing prices declined by September 2008?
When was the peak of U.S. housing prices?
How many foreclosure proceedings were initiated by lenders in 2007?
What was the percentage increase on foreclosure proceedings from 2007 to 2008?
How many U.S. mortgages were either delinquent or in foreclosure by September 2009?
Was was the federal funds rate target lowered to by the Federal Reserve in 2003?
What is one reason the Federal Reserve lowered the federal funds rate target to 1.0% in 2003?
In the early 2000s, what type bubble did some economists believe the Fed needed to create to replace the Nasdaq bubble?
What contributed greatly to the severity of the financial crisis of 2007?
What encouraged borrowing from 2000 to 2003?
Per Bernanke, how much did the U.S. current account deficit increase between 1996 and 2004?
What percentage of GDP was the U.S. current account deficit in 2004?
What emerging economies did the U.S. borrow money from between 1996 and 2004 to finance its imports?
What type account is needed by the U.S. to balance an account deficit?
Where did the U.S. obtain capital to finance its imports?
When did the Fed begin raising Fed funds rate significantly?
What does ARM stand for:
How do asset prices generally move in relation to interest rates?
Beginning in July 2004, what did the Fed do to make ARM rates more expensive for homeowners?
How did U.S. housing and financial assets react to the housing bubble burst?
What is the name for lending that entices borrowers to enter into unsafe secured loans?
What company used a classic bait-and-switch method by advertising low interest rates?
Which type loan would the consumer be put into instead of the 1% or 1.5% interest rate loan as advertised?
What was created when the interest charged was greater than the amount of interest paid?
What type predatory lending method did Countrywide Financial use?
Who sued Countrywide for unfair business practices and false advertising?
What type mortgages allowed homeowners to make interest-only payments?
What happened to home equity when housing prices decreased?
Who made the decision to seize Countrywide after their financial condition deteriorated?
What type credit did borrowers obtaining mortgages from Countrywide have?
What economist believed that regulations did not keep up with financial innovation?
Who was the U.S. Treasury Secretary dealing with the aftermath of the financial crisis of 2007?
Which group's study suggested that Basel accords encourage unconventional business practices?
It has been argued that what did not keep up with financial innovation?
What accords possibly contributed to or reinforced the financial crisis?
What did financial institutions do prior to the crisis?
What type financial instruments are off-balance sheet securitization and derivatives?
Who bailed out financial institutions?
Which option was nearly impossible for financial institutions to reorganize under?
What are the type financial instruments that were difficult for creditors and regulators to monitor?
How many U.S. investment banks significantly increased their financial leverage from 2004 to 2007?
U.S. investment banks Increased their financial leverage and also increased their vulnerability to what?
Changes in what intended to keep U.S. banks competitive with their European counterparts?
How much debt did the top five U.S. investment banks report in fiscal year 2007?
What financial institution went bankrupt and was liquidated in 2007?
What is an example of something that can be detrimental if too many individuals pursue the same behavior?
What is it called when too many consumers attempt to save or pay down debt at the same time?
What will happen if too many consumers save or pay down debt simultaneously?
Who is the economist who described a "paradox of deleveraging"?
Financial institutions cannot all de-leverage simultaneously without a decline in the value of this?
What term refers to the ongoing development of financial products?
What is an example of financial innovation pertinent to the financial crisis?
What is the abbreviation for a form of credit insurance called credit default swaps?
What is the financial innovation that bundles subprime mortgages?
What happened to the usage of financial innovation products in the years leading up the financial crisis?
When did the issuance of CDO peak?
What was the estimated value of CDO issuance in Q1 2004?
What was the estimated value of CDO issuance at it's peak in Q1 2007?
What percent of CDO assets were subprime and other non-prime mortgage debt in 2007?
What was the estimated value of CDO issuance in Q1 2008?
What is a measurement of pricing of risk?
What is the incremental compensation required by investors for taking on addition risk called?
According to several scholars, what prevented markets from correctly pricing risk before the crisis?
How should risk levels have been disclosed according to several scholars?
What was the outcome of the financial crisis since risk levels were not adequately disclosed?
What did market participants fail to measure accurately?
What are the reasons market participants did not understand the impact financial innovation products would have?
How much did JPMorgan estimate was the average recovery rate for high quality CDOs that had been liquidated?
How much did JPMorgan estimate was the average recovery rate for mezzanine CDOs that had been liquidated?
How much did banks estimate was the value of CDOs sold between late 2005 to the middle of 2007?
What firm insured obligations of various financial institutions using credit default swaps?
What does the abbreviation CDS stand for?
When did the government take over AIG?
How much money did taxpayers provide in government support to AIG during 2008 and early 2009?
What did AIG receive for promising to pay Party A in the event that Party B defaulted?
Who commented that the super-boom got out of hand when products became so complicated that risk could not be accurately calculated?
What happened to financial assets that made them harder to value?
Who did rating agencies rely on for information to rate financial innovation products?
When authorities could no longer calculate the risks of complex financial innovation products, who did they rely on for information?
Who reassured investors by showing the risk of complex financial innovation products was actually less than they proved to be?
Who published "Credit Correlation: Life After Copulas" in 2007?
When did relevant warnings and research on CDOs appear in an article by Donnelly and Embrechts?
The volume "Credit Correlation: Life After Copulas" summarizes a 2006 conference held by what firm in London?
What did the volume "Credit Correlation: Life After Copulas" propose models to rectify?
What year did the book by Brigo, Pallavicini and Torresetti report warnings and research on CDOs?
When did the securitization markets supported by the shadow banking systems start to close down?
When did the securitization markets supported by the shadow banking system nearly shut-down completely?
How much of the private credit markets become unavailable as a source of funds?
What is the firm who reported that the traditional banking system does not have capital to close the gap as of June 2009?
How many years would of strong profit would it take to generate enough capital to support additional lending?
What economist testified to the Financial Crisis Inquiry Commission in January 2010?
In January 2010, what markets did Mark Zandi testify about that remain impaired and investors anticipate more loan losses?
What was the value of CDOs at their peak in 2006?
What was the private issuance of CDOs in 2009?
Almost all of the asset-backed issuance in 2009 was supported by what Federal Reserve program?
Following the collapse in the housing bubble, what happened to a number of commodity prices?
How much did the price of oil increase from early 2007 to 2008?
What did the price of oil began doing when the financial crisis began to take hold in late 2008?
What is one of the reasons experts believe contributed to the volatilaty in oil prices in 2008? 
Consumers tend to have less money to spend on other goods, when the price of which commodity is higher?
Who was the former director of the CFTC that testified before the Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation on June 3, 2008?
Who did Michael Greenberger erronesously name as a key player in speculative run-up of oil futures?
Who founded the Atlanta-based Intercontinental Exchange?
Who purchased the International Petroleum Exchange in 2001?
Where are regulated future exchanges located?
Who was the current Governor of the Reserve Bank of India that predicted the crisis in 2005?
When did Raghuram Rajan become chief economist the the International Monetary Fund?
In 2005, where did Rajan deliver a controversial paper that was critical of the financial paper?
What was the name of Raghuram Rajan's controversial paper delivered in 2005?
What are risks called that generate severe adverse consequences with small probability but generous compensation the rest of the time?
Which magazine ran a cover story claiming that most economists failed to the the financial crisis?
The financial crisis of 2007 was the worst economic crisis since which crisis that occurred in the 1930s?
Which school at University of Pennsylvania examined in their online business journal why economists failed to predict the crisis?
Which economist did the New York Times state warned of a crisis as early as September 2006?
What was economist Roubini called by the New York Times for predicting a collapse of the housing market?
Who is the market strategist that believes distinctions exist between the current crisis and the Great Depression?
How much did the Dow Jones average fall during a period of 17 months?
What was the percentage the Dow Jones fell in the Great Depression?
Who was the chief financial correspondent of The New York Times in March 2009?
Which medium sized British bank was the first victim of the financial crisis?
Who did Northern Rock request security from?
When did Northern Rock investors panic and a bank run begin?
When was Northern Rock taken into public hands?
Which bank early problems in 2007 were an indicator of the troubles that would soon befall other banks and financial institutions?
How many of the poorest families did not have any wealth decline during the financial crisis?
In a Federal Reserve survey of 4,000 households, what percent reported wealth decline between 2007 and 2009?
How many of the richest families had a decrease in total wealth between 2007 and 2009?
How many families at the bottom of the pyramid had a decrease in total wealth between 2007 and 2009?
Which families experienced the least decline in wealth between 2007 and 2009?
What have central banks around the world done to avoid the risk of a deflationary spiral?
What have governments done to offset the reduction in private sector demand?
What is the U.S. Federal Reserve's traditional role during a crisis?
What did the U.S. Federal Reserve do to increase access to liquidity?
What type decline does lower wages and higher unemployment lead to?
What was introduced by President Barack Obama in June 2009?
What was one of the items important to consumers that was addressed by the new regulatory proposals introduced in June 2009?
Regulations were proposed by Obama in January 2010 to limit the ability of banks to engage in which type trading?
Who were proposed new regulations called "The Volcker Rule" named after?
Who publicly argued for changes limiting the ability of banks to engage in proprietary trading?
When did the U.S. Senate first pass a financial reform bill?
When did the U.S. House first pass a financial reform bill?
What rule against proprietary trading was not part of legislation passed by either the Senate or House?
Which bill gave regulators the discretion to prohibit proprietary trades?
What year did the U.S. housing bubble peak?
What year did Congress pass the American Recover and Reinvestment Act?
Overvaluation of bundled subprime mortgages was based on the theory that housing prices would continue to do this?
One of the causes of the financial crisis was easier access to loans by this type borrower?
In 2007, banks and insurance companies did not have adequate holdings of which type to back their financial commitments?
What are MBS as related to the housing and credit booms?
What are CDO as related to the housing and credit booms?
When housing prices declined, who reported significant losses from being heavily invested in subprime MBS?
Who could invest in the U.S. housing market through MBS and CDO?
MBS and CDO derive their value from?
How much are total losses estimated to be from falling home prices?
What is the financial incentive when a home is worth less than the mortgage loan?
What year did the foreclosure epidemic begin?
What other financial instruments had significant defaults and losses as a result of the crisis expanding from housing to other parts of the economy?
What continues to drain consumer wealth and erode the strength of banks?
What institutions comprise the shadow banking system?
What institutions are not subject to the same regulations as commercial banks?
What process caused the financial system to both expand and become fragile?
What policy has U.S. Government emphasized from the 1970's onward?
Since the 1970's, what has emphasized deregulation to encourage business, but resulted in less oversight and less disclosure?
Some regulated banks did not have sufficient financial cushions in place to absorb what losses as a result of the financial crisis of 2007?
What was a consequence of the large loan defaults and MBS losses in 2007?
Who provided funds to encourage lending and restore faith in commercial banks in the aftermath of the financial crisis of 2007?
Who bailed out key financial institutions and implemented economic stimulus programs as an answer to the financial crisis of 2007?
What impacted the ability of financial institutions to lend in the financial crisis of 2007?
How many estimated substandard loans did Fannie and Freddie have in 2008? 
What was the value of the estimated 13 million substandard loans held by Fannie and Freddie in 2008?
Which government-sponsored entities had massive risky loan purchases?
Peter J. Wallison believes that the one of the roots of the financial crisis can be traced to affordable housing policies by which agency in the 1990s?
How many ex-executives of Fannie and Freddie were named in the SEC's December 2011 securities fraud case?
Who uncovered accounting discrepancies in Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac?
Which administration called for investigation into the soundness of GSEs in the early and mid-2000s?
On what date did the House Financial Services Committee hold a hearing to assess safety and soundness issues regarding Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac?
What was the result of the House Financial Services Committee on September 10, 2003 regarding Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac?
Who rebuked OFHEO in 2003 for their attempt at regulation of Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac?
What is often difficult on the island?
What is grown in patches on the island?
What seasoning is found naturally on the island?
What type of activity did early settlers use to get food that didn't involve farming?
What is the name of the main commercial port in St. Barts?
What types of plants are usually found at St. Barts?
Which half of the island is usually greener due to more rainfall?
A 1994 found how many different species of plants native to the island?
What besides palm trees is a common plant to see in St. Barts?
Where was the coconut palm brought to St. Barts from?
What plant was brought to St. Barts from the Mediterranean?
What is the name of the night blooming flower on St. Barts?
Where was the plant yellow bell brought from?
When did the british army invade the island?
What type of fig grows on the island?
What color are conch shells?
What common sea creature produces a collectable Item?
Where are surgeonfish found in St. Barts?
What kind of crabs besides hermit crabs are common on the beach in St. Barts?
What do hermit crabs eat?
Who built the three forts on St. Barts?
What was the former name of Fort Oscar?
When was Fort Gustav built?
Most of the Forts in St. Barts are now all what?
On what part of the island is Fort Oscar located on the far side of?
What is the name of the deepest bay at St Barts?
Grande Saline Bay provides docking for what kind of boats?
The North and East sides of St. Barts are fringed by what?
Reefs are almost always in what type of water?
Some of the offshore reefs of St. Barts are part of what?
In what fields of science is the genome studied?
What is the content of the human genome?
What constitutes the viral genome?
A gamate has how many chromosomes relative to a somatic cell?
What process splits the chromosome between gametes?
What are two cellular organelles which contain genetic material?
What is the science that deals with the common genetic characteristics of related organisms called?
In contrast to genomics, genetics usually studies what?
What is the catalog of contents of a particular species' genetic makeup?
What is the relation between the number of base pairs and total complement of genes in a species called?
Which organism has the most genes?
How many genes is the trichomoniasis estimated to have?
Relative to the human genome, how many more genes does trichomoniasis have?
Which U.S. government agency keeps a large amount of information on genomes?
What is a mammal whose genome has been sequenced?
What is a fish whose genome has been sequenced?
When was the Neanderthal's genome sequenced?
How old in years was the material that was used to sequence the Neanderthal genome?
What is a recent development in sequencing methods?
Which company has led the way in sequencing of individual genetic makeup?
Whose complete genetic information was recorded in 2007?
What is Watson famous for helping discover?
What is the term for something that lists the important and notable parts of a genome?
Which group was created to generate a genome map of human genetic material?
Whose genome map greatly aided the Human Genome Project?
Where did Weissenbach and his colleagues work?
What is the term that accounts for the constituents of the haploid genome?
What aspect of a genome can genome compositions help researchers in learning about?
What is an example of an organism that has a portion of its genetic material outside of its chromosomes?
What is an example of an organism whose full complement of genetic material resides in its chromosomes?
Where is additional genetic material found in pathogenic microbes?
What are examples of classes of eukaryotes where genome only refers to the information found in chromosomes?
What is a name for the genetic material found within chloroplasts?
What is a name for the genetic makeup of mitochondria?
What is the name for the count of all DNA base pairs in a single haploid genome?
What does genome size have a direct relationship with in prokaryotes and lower eukaryotes?
What accounts for the breakdown of the relation between genome size and morphological complexity in higher eukaryotes?
What is a name for the reduced complement of genetic material necessary for an organism to live?
In what experimental contexts are experiments being carried out on minimal genomes?
What are two types of non-repetitive DNA?
In higher eukaryotes, what has an inverse relationship with genome size?
What is the size of non-repetitive DNA divided by to get the proportion of non-repetitive DNA?
What is an example of an organism which does not contain any repetitive DNA?
What are two organisms that have more non-repetitive than repetitive DNA?
What is the percentage of non-repetitive DNA in some plant and amphibian genomes?
What are two types of repetitive DNA found in genomes?
What is found by dividing size of repetitive DNA by length of total genome?
Unequal crossing over can create what type of repetitive DNA?
What are two examples of tandem repeats in DNA?
What is the main source of interspersed repeats?
What do researchers think transposable elements are key factors in when considering higher eukaryotes?
What are the constituents of Class 1 transposable elements?
What are the constituents of Class 2 transposable elements?
What kind of genetic material can be produced from retrotransposons?
What is a term that can describe how DNA transposons move?
DNA transposons do not use which genetic material used by Class 1 TEs?
What is another word for the total count of chromosomes?
Aside from karyotype, what are other genomic traits studied by scientists?
What type of generation of genetic material has a big part in making the genome what it is?
What is a possible product of duplications?
What is an explanation for the resemblance between disparate parts of the genome?
In which organisms does horizontal gene transfer appear to occur commonly?
Parts of which organelle genomes are thought to have ended up in the nucleus of eukaryotic cells via transfer?
What kind of school does not base its admissions on academic merit?
What kind of school system uses academic success to judge admissions?
What countries used comprehensive schools extensively?
How many secondary school students attend comprehensive schools in England?
What is the German analogue of the comprehensive school?
What is a word that can be used to describe the scope of a comprehensive school's intake?
What are some new initiatives that may impact the concept of comprehensive schools?
What type of school is the Gesamtschule?
What kinds of courses are offered to students who are not experiencing academic success?
What are the different kinds of certificates that Gesamtschule students can earn?
What percentage of Brandenburg students went to a Gesamtschule in 2007?
What percentage of Bavarian students went to a Gesamtschule in 2007?
What was the combination of Hauptschulen with Realschulen and Gesamtschulen called in Hamburg?
What was the combination of Hauptschulen with Realschulen and Gesamtschulen called in Berlin?
In what school year were Hauptschulen first combined with Realschulen and Gesamtschulen?
What kind of classes are not offered in Mittelschule?
What certificate is not available to Mittelschule students?
What kind of school is not available in some parts of Germany?
What type of misconduct have comprehensive schools been alleged of engaging in?
Which German minister criticized comprehensive schools' ability to help students succeed?
Which German politician defended comprehensive schools?
Which party does Barbara Sommer belong to?
Which party does Sigrid Beer belong to?
Who could be made vulnerable by the Gasemtschulen?
From what group does an achievement gap separate working class students at comprehensive schools?
At which school do students achieve the least success?
Who conducted a study on comprehensive schools?
To which system did Fend compare comprehensive school alumni?
When was the first comprehensive school opened in Gibraltar?
Where can students go after finishing comprehensive school in Gibraltar?
What examinations do students prepare for in the sixth form?
When did Ireland first open comprehensive schools?
Who was responsible for creating comprehensive schools in Ireland?
What was the only state-run educational system in Ireland prior to comprehensive schools?
What type of school has surpassed comprehensive schools in Ireland?
In what decade were community schools conceived?
Who owns the land on which Irish comprehensive schools are found?
What did the community school system remove from the comprehensive school model?
What is a term for a grouping of local schools that cannot exist independently?
In what year was the Walworth School established?
Who established the Walworth School?
What comprehensive school was established in Anglesey?
When was Holyhead County School established?
Which comprehensive school openend in coventry?
Who was made Secretary of State for Education in 1970?
What kind of school did Thatcher end the compulsion for existing schools to convert to?
What party was in power when Margaret Thatcher was made Secretary of State for Education?
By what year did the 11-plus exam mainly fall out of use?
What did secondary modern and grammar schools combine to become?
Grammar schools that did not close were converted to what?
What are two locations in which all secondary schools were converted to comprehensives in the '70s?
Who initiated the scrutiny of the educational system in 1976?
What is the only kind of school operating in Wales?
Which political party was James Callaghan a member of?
What law enables parents full control over their child's education?
In what year was the Education Reform Act made into law?
What concept does the government currently support for education?
Parental choice has informed what controversial practice?
All public primary and secondary schools in Scotland are of what type?
What has Scotland refused to adopt?
When was Scotland's latest rejection of the specialist school model?
Which country is Northern England's school system most different from?
Which countries have school systems somewhat similar to Northern Ireland?
What is the Congo's rank among other oil generating nations in the Gulf of Guinea?
What income is subject to uneven distribution in the Congo?
What served as the capital of France in spirit during the Occupation?
What meeting brought about changes in France's policy towards its colonies?
When did Brazzaville get its own local government?
What did the 1946 constitution establish Brazzaville as?
When was the Fifth Republic founded?
What was disbanded in 1958?
In 1958, what did the Middle Congo change its name to?
When did the Congo establish its first constitution?
Who became president of the Congo in 1968?
What did the Congo's name become under Ngouabi?
What did the National Revolutionary Movement's name become?
In what year was a coup attempted against Ngouabi?
On what date was Ngouabi assassinated?
Which group of nations did Nguesso side the Congo with?
Which Eastern Bloc nation did Nguesso sign a pact with?
What is a word that can be used to describe Sassou's type of government?
What was an important tool of the Sassou government?
Which politican left the presidential race after supporting a boycott by voters?
How long did the presidential term become under the new constitution?
When was the new constitution ratified?
When was an end brought to the fighting between the government and Ntumi's rebels?
Who won the presidential election in 2009?
Which group provided oversight for the electoral process in 2009?
What kind of turnout did the Congolese Observatory of Human Rights experience in the 2009 elections?
What kind of political system has existed in Congo-Brazzaville since the '90s?
Which party does Sassou belong to?
What is the French term for Sassou's political party?
What has Sassou's regime attempted to censor?
What country found bank accounts and real estate owned by the Sassou regime?
When did Sassou reveal that there would be a vote to alter the 2002 constitution?
Which term did the new constitution allow Sassou to pursue?
Who controlled the media in the Congo in 2008
How many government TV stations exist?
How many smaller stations exist that are not government-run?
Who is considered to own members of the Pygmies?
The treatment of Pygmies has been compared to the treatment of what?
When did the government of the Congo pass a law to assist indigenous people?
What is the capital of the Congo?
On what river can Brazzaville be found?
What lies directly across the Congo River from Brazzaville?
What country does Kinshasa serve as capital of?
What kind of terrain is found in the southwest part of the Congo?
Which river serves as drainage for the southwest plain of the Congo?
The middle of the country features what kind of geography?
What areas are facing pressure to be used for commercial gain?
What is the focus of the Congo's industrial production?
What are two issues in the Congolese government?
What did petroleum production replace as the focus of the economy?
What percentage of the Congo's gross domestic product did petroleum account for in 2008?
What percentage of exported goods did oil account for in 2008?
What did income from petroleum allow the government to fund in the early '80s?
What was the Congo's annual increase in gross domestic product in the early '80s?
By how much were Franc Zone currencies devalued in January of 1994?
How much inflation did the Congo experience as a result of the devaluation of the Franc?
What caused reform efforts to cease in 1997?
What are two reasons why the economy was not able to progress following the civil war?
When did military conflict resume in the Congo?
What are two economic issues faced by the Congolese government?
What two exports has the Congo begun producing recently?
When was the Congo allowed back into the Kimberley Process?
What precious metals and minerals have yet to be utilized in the Republic of the Congo?
What business organization is the Congo a member of?
How much land did the Congolese government agree to lease to South Africans in 2009?
What forms of transport are available in the Congo?
When was the Congo's train system built?
What is a common destination outside of Africa for Congolese airlines?
On what ocean is a major port located?
In what part of the country can most of the Congo's citizens be found?
How long is the track connecting Brazzaville and Pointe-Noire?
Prior to the civil war in '97, how many non-Africans lived in the Republic of the Congo?
What was the dominant nationality among Europeans living in the Congo prior to the civil war?
How many Americans live in the Congo?
What is the most commonly practiced religion in the Congo?
What percentage of Congolese citizens identify as Awakening Lutherans?
What portion of the Congolese population is Protestant?
What is the percentage of Muslims living in the Congo?
Who form the majority of Islamic residents of the Congo?
How much of the gross domestic product was spent on public health in 2004?
What was the overall incidence of HIV or AIDS throughout the 15 to 49 year old population?
How much was spent per capita on health in 2004 as measured in US dollars?
For every 100,000 people, how many phyisicians were there in the Congo in the early '00s?
As measured in 2010, how many deaths occurred for every 100,000 live births in the Congo?
What does FGM stand for?
How many infants die for every 1,000 live births?
What branch of government does the prime minister lead?
What group is the prime minister usually in charge of?
In some political models like semi-presidential systems, what does the prime minister manage?
What is a parliamentary model on which other systems have been based?
What kind of role is the head of state in Westminster-based parliamentary governments?
What is a central duty of the prime minister?
What is it called when a monarch has a share of executive powers?
Using royal prerogative does not require the consent of which body?
When was the title of prime minister first used?
Who coined the term prime minister?
What country did Richelieu serve as prime minister for?
Who started a tradition of naming the head ministers something other than prime minister?
When did the modern usage of prime minister come into being?
Who was referenced as prime minister in a negative manner when the term was first used in its modern sense?
Who occupied the role that would later become prime minister under Henry VIII?
Who held the equivalent of the post of prime minister under Queen Anne?
Who served as the head minister under Charles II?
From whom did ministers derive their power?
Who was responsible for naming people to serve in the cabinet?
Who are the two ministers used by Queen Anne simultaneously?
Who was exiled when he lost the favor of the monarch?
The reign of which king was a turning point in the growth of the position of prime minister?
In what year did Queen Anne die?
Where was George I's home?
For how long did Robert Walpole serve as prime minister?
What party did Walpole belong to?
What concept took shape during Walpole's tenure as prime minister?
What would a minister have to do if he did not publicly support a cabinet policy?
Who is another prime minister who reiterated the principles of cabinet solidarity?
In the U.S. and governments modeled on it, who holds executive power?
Which non-elected official has held the longest term as prime minister?
When did Khalifa first take the post of prime minister?
What country does Khalifah serve for as prime minister?
Greece, Finland, Romania and Turkey use what kind of government?
In whic type of government is the leader elected?
What is the term for the head of China's government?
What is another name for the Republic of China?
Whose consent is not required for the Taiwanese premier to take office?
What is the term for a situation in which the president and prime minister come from different political parties?
What can the French parliament cause in order to oust the prime minister?
Which constitution details the role and abilities of the prime minister?
What other considerations are included in the constitution of Bangladesh as regards the prime minister?
Which law first referred to the prime minister in Canada?
When was the Constitution Act passed?
The Constitution Act mentions the prime minister in the context of which kinds of other ministers?
What document details the role and abilities given to the prime minister of the Czech Republic?
When was prime minister first mentioned in a government document in the UK?
Who was the last prime minister to serve simultaneously as Chancellor of the Exchequer?
When did Balfour last hold the titles of prime minister and Chancellor of the Exchequer?
Which prime minister was appointed only one time?
When was Thatcher appointed prime minister?
When did Thatcher last hold power?
What did Margaret Thatcher reconfigure following each general election?
What is the name of the prime ministerial position in Ireland?
From where is the Irish prime minister usually selected?
When is the Irish Taoiseach renominated?
Most parliamentary governments need to have the support of what governmental body?
Which political division does not often utilize its power, if it has any?
What kind of referendum can the lower house of parliament take against the government?
Who can put a stop the parliamentary attempts at dissovling itself in some areas?
If the head of state prevents the dissolution of parliament, what needs to happen?
In contemporary parliamentary governments, which official is usually in charge of asking parliament to dissolve?
When was the convention of prime ministers initiating the dissolution of parliament started?
In Ireland, when was the power to dissolve parliament assigned to the prime minister?
The 1922 Irish Free State Constitution previously gave what body the power to dissolve parliament?
What was the Executive Council an alternate name for?
What process signals the need for the prime minister to resign in Australia?
What is the Russian term for prime minister?
What is the Israeli term for prime minister?
What is the term used in spain for prime minister?
What is the Irish term for prime minister?
What is the Italian term for the prime minister?
What is the native term for prime minister in Scandinavia?
What is a term that is used to mean prime minister?
Which countries use the term chancellor to denote the head of government?
What is the head of Monaco's government called?
What is the term for the highest position in government in Vatican City?
What is the head of Iran's government called?
In what kinds of nations can the head of government attain the title of Excellency?
What honorific title can be given to prime ministers in commonwealth nations?
What are British prime ministers part of that grants them the title Right Honourable?
What is an example of a country where prime ministers can be called Right Honourable solely because of their position?
What kind of government is in operation in the United Kingdom?
What are the heads of government in Wales, Scotland and Northern Ireland called?
What is the Indian term for Prime Minister?
What is the term for prime minister in Pakistan?
What does Wazir-e-Azam mean in English?
What is the head of government's office called in Canada?
What is the head of government's office called in the UK?
What's a common abbreviation for the term institute of technology?
What word means the same thing as "institute of technology"?
What name did some universities switch to in the 1990s for marketing purposes?
What system were institutes of technology a part of during the seventies, eighties, and early nineties?
TAFE Tasmania started a three-year restructuring in what year?
In Australia, how many universities are recognized as Universities of Technology?
What's the German word for a tertiary education institution?
In addition to Bachelor's degrees, what other kind of degree can one earn from a Fachhochschule?
What term is used in Belgium and the Netherlands to refer to an institution like a German Fachhochschule?
What term refers to the process that a hogeschool undergoes before it's able to award Master's degrees?
How many institutes of technology in the Netherlands have converted into full-fledged universities in the past few decades?
How many Technical Universities are there in the Netherlands today?
What country has Institutes of Technology/Polytechnic Institutes from which students can earn certificates, diplomas, and degrees?
What are polytechnic divisions of national universities called in Canada?
What is Canada's national alliance of 11 research-focused schools called?
What kind of projects does Polytechnics Canada sponsor that can lead to technology commercialization?
In what year was the Imperial Tientsin University founded in China?
What was the first university to offer courses in liberal arts?
What portion of China's elite universities still have a primary polytechnical focus today?
What year did Croatia pass a law regarding polytechnic education?
What observatory is the National Observatory of Ecuador?
What school oversees the Quito Astronomical Observatory?
When was the Quito Astronomical Observatory founded?
EPN's Nuclear Science Department is among how many of its kind in Ecuador?
If the mission is achieved, professionals will apply what they've learned to what goal?
MIT raised money to cover tuition, room and board for what number of students?
How many credits were needed for an M.Sc. (Tech.) degree before the Bologna Process?
How many credits were needed for an M.Sc. from a traditional university prior to the Bologna Process?
What are an institute of technology called in France?
What's the three-letter acronym for institut universitaire de technologie?
Fachhochschulen first came about in the early years of what decade?
Fachhochschulen favor an education in what, as opposed to research?
In addition to technology, Fachhochschulen offer courses in social science, medicine, design, and what other discipline?
What was the very first polytechnic school in Hong Kong?
What was the original name of Hong Kong Polytechnic?
In what year was the City Polytechnic of Hong Kong founded?
What Hong Kong university was created in 1991?
When did the two polytechnic schools in Hong Kong receive status as universities?
How many private institutes of technology are there in India?
How many government-affiliated institutes of technology are there in India?
What organization oversees India's technical education institutions?
What's the name of the diploma awarded in India for technical or vocational coursework?
How many government-owned public institutes of technology does Indonesia have?
Rather than four-year Bachelor's degrees, Politeknik offer a diploma after how many years?
What was the original name of Ireland's Institute of Technology system?
What Irish institute of technology evolved independently of the Regional Technical College System?
What term in higher education refers to technical universities that award engineering degrees?
Traditionally, how many Politecnici were there?
What city houses the headquarters of the Istituto Italiano di Tecnologia?
What country has operated polytechnic institutes for nearly 44 years?
What international organization partnered with Malaysia's Ministry of Education in 1969?
In what city in the state of Perak is the Politeknik Ungku Omar located?
How many polytechnic institutes does Malaysia have now?
How many students were enrolled in polytechnic schools in Malaysia in 2009?
How many students were enrolled in polytechnic schools in Malaysia in 2012?
What school did Massey University combine with?
In what decade did New Zealand's tertiary education institutions begin consolidation?
What school considered a merger with Waikato Institute of Technology that was later abandoned?
What island was Waiarapa Polytechnic located on before it merged with UCOL?
What's the only polytechnic school in New Zealand to be designated a university?
In Pakistan, a student's tests in what grade determine their admission to a diploma program?
What are people being trained for, mainly, in Pakistan's polytechnic institutes?
How many years does it usually take to earn a diploma from polytechnic schools in Pakistan?
What two-letter abbreviation is used for undergraduate engineering  courses?
What's Pakistan's program called that's comparable to the British A Level?
What word do they use in Poland for an institute of technology?
What is the Portuguese word for the short-cycle degrees awarded prior to 1988?
What process was instituted in 2007 that brought Master's degrees to the polytechnic education system?
How many polytechnics are there in Singapore?
How many years of study would it take to obtain a degree from a polytechnic in Singapore?
What are polytechnics called in South Africa?
What year did Technikons gain the ability to give out technology degrees?
When did Technikons start being integrated with traditional South African universities?
Most institutes of technology in Thailand were born out of what other type of institutions?
What type of degree were Thailand's technical colleges historically not allowed to confer?
What's the new name of Pathumwan Technical School?
What did the Thonburi Technology Institute become after its name change?
What was the previous name of Rajamangala University of Technology?
What is the name of Thammasat University's engineering school?
What is Thailand's only government-established and owned institute of technology?
What year was Suranaree University of Technology founded?
What is the name of the best-known private institute of technology in Thailand?
What institute of technology opened in Bursa in 2010?
When Konya Technical University opens, how many total institutes of technology will there be in Turkey and the Ottoman Empire?
What two cities in Turkey acquired institutes of technology in the 1950s?
What year did UK polytechnics start functioning in a binary education system?
What organization validates degrees received from polytechnic schools?
What two-word term does Scotland use to describe their technological universities?
What was the first polytechnic in Britain originally named?
How many Institutes of Science and Technology were affiliated with the University of Wales?
What was the name Loughborough University was known by from 1966 to 1996?
In what decade did colleges of technology gain the University designation?
What act allowed polytechnic schools to become universities?
The Further and Higher Education Act 1992 allows polytechnics to award degrees without what organization's approval?
If a technical institute is affiliated with a local university, what does its designation become?
What century brought the advent of technical schools or technical institutes?
A student would attend a technical institute before a university or polytechnic but after what?
What type of economy was technical education in Venezuela intended to support?
When did Venezuela begin to create institutes of technology?
What city in Venezuela had the first IUT?
Who pioneered using the French system of technological education?
Where does the information stored on the Wayback Machine come from?
Which company made the Wayback Machine?
Where is Internet Archive headquartered?
What individuals founded Internet Archive?
What is the term used by Internet Archive to describe the Wayback Machine?
What operating system is used on Wayback Machine's servers?
When does Wayback Machine save a copy of a website?
What is the ultimate aim of the Wayback Machine?
What TV show served as inspiration for the Wayback Machine's name?
Which characters on The Rocky and Bullwinkle Show used a device that allowed them to travel through time?
What was the machine used by Mr. Peabody and Sherman named?
When was the program necessary to crawl and archive the web created?
What is a term used for programs that automatically visit websites and record the data they find?
What rule do crawlers abide by when determining which sites to record?
What site was created to mitigate issues with incomplete copies of websites?
What medium was originally used to keep Internet Archive's data?
Who were sometimes permitted to use the Archive's database?
At what milestone was the archive made public?
Where was the event launching the publicly-available archive held?
What are the saved versions of a site called?
What is the minimum amount of time that elapses before most snapshots are released for viewing?
What term characterizes the rate at which snapshots are made of websites?
When did it become a requirement for websites to appear on Open Directory for inclusion in the Archive?
Who stated that sites not on Open Directory were still being saved but would not be released until the Archive was reindexed?
When did Kaplan make comments about the status of non-Open Directory sites?
In 2009, what size did the data saved by Wayback Machine reach?
As of 2003, what was the rate of increase in the amount of data recorded by the Wayback Machine?
Where does Wayback Machine keep its information stored?
Who makes PetaBox rack systems?
When did Internet Archive chance its platform for data storage?
Which platform did Internet Archive adopt in 2009?
Where does Internet archive run a datacenter?
When was an upgrade of the Wayback Machine released for testing?
When were details of the test version of the updated Wayback Machine released?
The older version of Wayback Machine did not have much new data past what year?
The newer version of the Wayback Machine included date up to and including what year?
What was the functionality called that gave users the ability to save a snapshot of a site?
When was Save a Page made available?
What 2009 court battle involved the Wayback Machine?
Which company thought that Wayback Machine data was important for its argument?
What did Chordiant request that the court deactivate on Netbula's website?
Who did Netbula believe was the entity that should be responsible for the availability of its snapshots?
Which party did Internet Archive side with?
Which judge presided over the Netbula v. Chordiant case?
In what jurisdiction was the Netbula v. Chordiant case tried?
Which party won its argument regarding Netbula's robots.txt file?
What does Telewizja Polska operate?
What is EchoStar's platform?
Which judge denied Telewizja Polska's attempt to block the use of Internet Archive contents as evidence?
Which judge overturned Keys' ruling?
When are Internet Archive timestamps useful for patent offices?
What is an example of a condition that must be met for the Internet Archive data to be considered acceptable for submission to patent offices in the US and Europe?
What kind of limitations exist in keeping copies of a website?
The omission of what element in screenshots can make them unreliable as evidence?
What elements of webpages are not used by Wayback Machine?
What kind of sites contain information that the Wayback Machine does not record?
What kinds of laws could the Wayback Machine be viewed as breaking in Europe?
What would the Internet Archive have to do if requested by someone whose content is available on Wayback Machine?
In what part of the website are Wayback Machine's rules regarding removing content?
Web pages that contained content critical of what religous movement were taken off of the Internet Archive in 2002?
Who was mistakenly credited for having the sites with criticism of Scientology removed from the Internet Archive?
Who was the actual party that requested the critical sites be taken down?
Which law firm leveraged Wayback Machine to protect their client in 2003?
Which company filed suit against Harding, Earley, Follmer & Frailey's client?
Who did Healthcare advocates change their case to include as a defendant?
What laws did Healthcare Advocates accuse Internet Archive of having broken?
What kind of protocol is the Robots Exclusion Standard?
What file is utilized to exercise the rights promoted by the Robots Exclusion Standard?
If a site prevents Internet Archive from recording it, what file is still saved?
Who asserts that they will respond to direct contacts requesting material be removed from the archive?
Who sued Internet Archive in 2005?
What was the URL owned by Suzanne Shell?
In what jurisdiction were Internet Archive's counterclaims filed?
In what jurisdiction where counterclaims nullified by the court?
When did Suzanne Shell's suit against Internet Archive come to an end?
Who stated that they had no wish to violate individuals' copyrights?
Who stated that they did not want to cause damage to the Internet Archive?
The majority of the Low Countries were ruled by which houses?
Who issued the Pragmatic Sanction?
In what year did the Netherlands rise up against Philip II?
Why did the people of the Netherlands rise up against Philip II?
In what year was the Union of Utrecht signed?
Who signed the Union of Utrecht?
What was the declaration of independence of the provinces from Philip II called?
In what year was the Act of Abjuration signed?
What was the purpose of the Union of Utrecht?
In what year did the United Provinces invite Francis, Duke of Anjou to lead them?
In what year did Francis, Duke of Anjou leave the Netherlands?
When was William of Orange assassinated?
Who agreed to turn the United Provinces into a protectorate of England?
In what year did the United Provinces become a confederacy?
The Dutch Republic dominated world trade during what time?
What was the wealthiest and most urbanized region in the world during the 17th century?
The Dutch Republic consisted of how many provinces?
Who were the Generality Lands governed by?
The States General was made up of what?
What was the 8th province of the Dutch Republic?
Why was the County of Drenthe denied representation by the States General?
The main executive official of the Provincial States was called what?
Who had more power during times of war than the raadspensionaris?
Who commanded the army?
Who appointed the stadtholders?
Who were always chosen as stadtholders of most of the provinces?
Which states had the same stadtholder as Holland?
What group of people supported the stadtholders, particularly the princes of Orange?
Who wanted to replace the stadtholders with a republican structure?
Several border territories were designated to the United Provinces after what?
The border territories assigned to the United Provinces were known as what?
What were the names of the border territories assigned to the United Provinces?
Who was in control of the Dutch East India Company (VOC) and the Dutch West India Company (WIC)?
Some shipping expeditions were mostly initiated by which provinces?
Who was influenced by the Constitution of the Republic of the United Provinces?
Who described the Dutch confederacy as exhibiting "Imbecility in the government; discord among the provinces; foreign influence and indignities; a precarious existence in peace, and peculiar calamities from war."
The American Declaration of Independence is similar to what?
What granted Holland and Zeeland the right to accept only one religion?
What did the Union state that every person should be free to choose?
Who was a strong supporter of freedom of religion and wanted to unite Protestants and Catholics in the new union?
What was forbidden in all provinces?
What was the main subject of controversy that arose within the Reformed Church during the beginning of the Republic?
The controversy surrounding the subject of predestination is known as what?
What led to the banning of the Remonstrant faith in 1618?
When did the active persecution of religious services become more of a restricted tolerance?
Religious services for other religions were tolerated as long as they adhered to what rule?
How long did it take for scientists to stop using the narrow definition of symbiosis?
What is the type of symbiotic relationship where two organisms can't survive without each other?
What is the type of symbiotic relationship where the symbionts can live together but can also survive alone?
What is an example of an obligate relationship?
What is an example of ectosymbiosis?
What is it called when the organisms are not physically joined?
What is it called when one symbiont lives within its partner?
What organisms are described as living on the surface of whales?
Name a parasitic ectosymbiont.
What is another name for ectosymbiosis?
What is another term for mutualism?
Of what duration are symbiotic relationships?
What type of relationship do herbivores have with the bacteria in their intestines?
What do coral and algae produce together?
How do plants contribute to terrestrial ecosystems?
What type of fungus draws liquid and minerals out of the earth?
What lives with Ritteri sea anemones?
What prevents the clownfish from being stung?
What type of relationship do the clownfish and anemone have?
What species does this shrimp have a relationship with?
What part of the fish is used to signal danger?
What type of symbiosis seen between bryozoans and hermit crabs?
When were the worms found?
What does the bacteria give the worm?
What land is near the worms' first known location?
What is given to the host cell?
What does the host make that affect its genes?
In what manner are the described genetic alternations given to future generations?
What language do the roots of "commensal" come from?
What type of symbiotic relationship helps one organism and doesn't have a major affect on the other?
What is the term for a relationship where one organism provides a dwelling for the other?
What type of relationship is it when arachnids attach webs to dead plants?
In what type of relationship does an organism travel by means of another?
Antagonistic or antipathetic symbiosis are alternate names for what?
What is it called when organisms are lethal to their host?
What is it called when parasites need their host to live?
What proportion of animals go through a parasitic stage?
Name a biotrophic organism.
What is the name for the kind of symbiosis in which one organism is seriously harmed and there is no affect on the other?
What kinds of amensalism are there?
When a large tree takes the resources a young tree needs, what type of amensalism is it?
What does the black walnut give out that kills plants?
What organisms is the ibex in an amensalistic relationship with?
What does the Spanish ibex eat?
What type of relationship is it when large animals crush small plants?
What type of relationship harms both organisms?
What is the ultimate result of synnecrosis?
How common is synnecrosis in the natural world?
Why do bees sting even though it will kill them?
What far-reaching result do scientists think has come about from symbiosis with bacteria?
What are eukaryotes?
What does Margulis think is the main driver of evolution?
Who agrees with Margulis' cooperative view of evolution?
How big a part did symbiosis have in the development of flowering plants and their pollinators?
What did some plants produce when flowers became less simple?
What is the word for the kind of relationship in which a plant depend on a single type of insect?
How many sub components are there?
What act defines the CAF?
Who currently is the Commander-in-Chief of the Canadian Armed Forces?
Who represents Queen Elizabeth II?
Who leads the CAF?
What war were the CAF involved in?
What was the goal of the CAF during the cold war?
What military thread did the CAF protect against in Europe?
Apprimately since what year was the CAF stationed in Europe?
What year did the CAF leave Europe?
What is Canada's defense policy based on?
When was the Canada First Defence Strategy introduced?
How many missions are carried out internally in Canada?
What other location does the Canada First Defence Strategy Cover?
What year was Canada united in a confederation?
The forces of what countries did people serve before the unification?
What is one of the threats that faced them?
What American war threatened Canada?
Early on, what did they defend against with the British?
When was the first overseas deployment of the Canadian Military?
Under what command did they serve?
When were Canadian Troops called upon to assist in Europe?
What other European war were the Canadian Forces involved in?
What Asian war were the Canadian Forces involved in?
How many operations has the Canadian Military been part of since 1947?
How many operations have been completed by the Canadian Military Internationally?
What are some of the wars the Canadian Military was involved in?
What peace keeping effort is the Canadian Military part of?
What type of military vehicle was maintained almost 15 years but never saw any action during the Cuban crisis?
What famous World War II battle was the Canadian Military part of?
What effort was the Canadian Military known for in Germany?
What Battle in France was the Canadian Military known for?
What country was the latest Canadian Military effort?
Canada had which biggest army during the Second World War?
What country fell providing with more information on Canada's army size?
Which other country had a sizable naval army?
When did the Canadian Armed Forced become to be?
What does the Canadian Armed Forces mostly consist of?
What prevented Canada from fully having their own army at the start?
When did Canada gain independence from the United Kingdom?
What war aided Canadian legislative independence?
What is the old name of the Canadian Forces?
When did the Canadian Armed Forces name cease to be?
When was the Canadian Armed Forces name reintroduced?
What was the new name of the Canadian Armed Forces?
What forces were sent out in support of peacekeeping?
Until when were Canadian forces in Afghanistan?
What force were the Canadians part of in Afghanistan?
Who requested the aid of the Canadians?
What type of operations were mainly done by Canadian forces?
What is Today's annual cost of the Canadian Forces?
How are the Canadian forces ranked in size compared to other military?
What is the total force of the Canadian Forces?
By what date is the primary reserve personnel estimated to go up by 30,000?
What is the total amount of Canadian Forces estimated to be in 2020?
What was the effort called to upgrade the Canadian Forces?
How were the Canadian Forces upgraded in 2008?
What major problem is the CAF trying to address currently?
Name some of the jobs in the CAF off limits to women in the 1980s.
On what date was a study created to research the impart of women in direct involvement?
Who created an office to study these effects?
What was the study called?
What year were most military occupations opened to women?
What military occupation wasn't opened to women until the 2000s?
By how much did opening these jobs to women increase the recruiting pool by?
Which government was responsible in Canadian history for this fact?
What is a requirement for equipment for the CAF?
What are some of the equipment used by both men and women?
What special entitlement are women provided as part of their service?
What determines who is the Commander-in-Chief of the Armed forces?
Who does the Commander-in-Chief authorize to make decision regarding the Armed Forces for them?
What orders fall under the royal prerogative?
Who must sign these orders for them to be valid?
Who's advice is the monarch supposed to follow regarding these orders?
The armed forces has approximately how many members?
Who is the highest ranking member of the Armed Forces?
Who appoints the Chief of the Defence?
What location does the National Defense operate out of?
What are some of the members of the Armed Forces Council?
How many Canadian Forces bases are there in Canada?
Where do Canadian Forces members go for training?
What is the place called where initial training happens?
How many warships does the Royal Canadian Navy have?
Where are the Maritime Forces Atlantic located?
What formation is located in Quebec?
What international exercises does the RCN partake in?
How many brigades does the Army consist of?
Each Brigade contains how many regiments?
What squadron is present but not an official part of the Brigade?
What medical group is present at all Brigades but not part of it?
Who heads the Royal Canadian Air Force?
Where is the commander based out of?
How many air force wings are located across Canada?
Who reports to the operational commander about the wings?
What are some locations of the air bases?
Where are the command facilities located?
Where is the Canadian component of the NATO located?
What NATO force are the Canadians part of?
What location is a Canadian airforce base located whose name is also a dog breed?
What does JTFN stand for?
What it located through Canada's Northern Regions?
What can each forwarding operation location provide?
What squadrons deploy to these locations?
When was the Canadian Joint Operations Command established?
What are the parts that merged into the Canadian Joint Operations Command?
What specifically prompted this merger?
what does CANSOFCOM stand for?
What is the CANSOFCOM focussed on?
What do the special forces support?
Where is the Canadian Joint Incident Response Unit based?
How many Special Operations Aviation Squadron are based at Petawawa?
What is the the Information Management Group responsible for?
Where is the Information Management Group located?
What is the task of the CAF Cyber Task Force?
When was the Directorate of Cybernetics established?
Who heads the Directorate?
Who does The Health Services Group serve?
Who can temporarily be assigned the Health Serviced Group?
What type of support does The Health Services Group provide?
When can the reserve force be called upon?
What troops does The reserve force consists of?
Who conducts training of the cadets?
What age are the cadets in the Canadian Cadet Movement?
What branch are the majority of COATS members?
Who is eligible to serve as a COATS trainer?
What do Canadian Rangers perform?
Where do the Canadian Rangers operate?
Which force are the Rangers part of?
What do the Canadian Rangers safekeep?
What is suitable for CAF members to wear on any occasion?
What other parts are there to a uniform?
What is now the daily uniform worn by members of the CAF?
What can be worn in cold winter weather?
What is only worn for very specific occasions?
What are some of the authorized head dresses for the CAF?
Are there specific rules for wearing head dresses?
What is the most popular head dress worn?
What headdress does the Canadian Army wear?
In 1059, who was responsible for electing the pope? 
What were the cardinals assigned? 
At one time, Priest permanently were assigned to a church were referred to as?
How early was this term used?
The Church of England uses what term that is held by two senior members of the College of Minor Canons of St. Pauls Catherdral?
What Latin word does "cardinal" come from?
Which church still holds on to the original meaning of "cardinal" from the above Latin word?
What term was given to certain church men of honor?
When is the earliest date of using the term cardinal as honorable church men used?
When was the title of cardinal reserved for the cardinals of Rome by Pius V?
In regards to the word "cardinal" being used in cities other than Rome, who sent a letter to Pippin III?
In what year was the letter sent?
In what year did the pope make the declaration?
In what year did Pope Pius IV wrote abou tthe selecting of cardinals? 
Who was in charge of the Ecumenical Council of Trent?
In what year did the Ecumenical Council of Trent write in regards to the selection of Cardinals?
Who was the pope who headed the Ecumencial Council of Trent in that year?
Who were generally temporal rulers?
Pope Sixtus V limited the number of cardinals to?
What did the composition of the cardinals consist of?
During who's term did the ruling exceed? 
Pope Paul VI increse the number of cardinal electors to? 
What is the maximum age for electors?
Pope Paul VI raised the cap on cardinal electors from 70 to what?
Pope Paul VI had no cap on what?
Where do the cardinals work?
Who receives the hishopric of Ostia?
What other title does the Dean of Collge of Cardinals receive upon appointment?
In was year was the title decreed Eminence?
Who decreed this?
What rank did the Eminece decree assigned?
Who held more power then the cardinal?
Which pope decided that being pope was equal to being a prince?
The Archdiocese of Milwaukee says that the correct way to address a cardinal in English is? 
What is the proper way to address a cardinal according to the Archdiocese of Milwaukee?
How do cardinals sign traditionally?
How do Oriental Patriarchs sign?
Why do Oriental Patriarchs sign this way?
What way is used to announce the election of a new pope in Latin?
What should the new pople have been before becoming a pope?
When was the most recent election of a non-cardinal?
When is the last time a non cardinal was elected as pope?
Do any sees carry the right to the cardinalate?
Despite some traditions and rights, no see has the right to what?
Who are among the most senior members of the Catholic Church?
What is a cardinal bishop?
Some cardinals are bishop in name only, what are they called?
In early times, who was generally electied to cardinal?
Why did the ceromony of consecrating a bishop have to be preformed by someone who was already a bishop?
How many suburbicarian sees?
When were the two sees combined? 
Who separated them?
What are the seven sees?
Cardinal bishops do not have any powers of governnace over the suburibicarian see since when?
Which see doesn't have its own bishop?
In what year was it decided that cardinal bishops had no power over the seven sees?
What see is the one exception to this rule?
Who has power over the exception?
The entire group of cardinals is known as what?
Who is the only person who can judge a Cardinal in regards to laws of the church?
What does the pope give to a new Cardinal?
Who decides on the design of the item given to new Cardinals?
What is the name of the hat that the pope used to wear when naming a new Cardinal?
In what year did the practice of donning this item stop?
What does the pope now wear when naming a new Cardinal?
Which Cardinals still wear traditional clothing?
What happens if a Cardinal is named in pectore, and the pope dies?
Which pope began using creati et reservati in pectore?
What was a "lay cardinal" allowed to do that is not considered a normal status of a Cardinal?
In what year did Pope Benedict XV revise the Code of Canon Law?
What did the Code of Canon Law state in regards to Cardinals?
A cardinal who does not hold the title of "bishop" may not do what?
Cardinals who were not bishops have been promoted to Cardinal around the age of 80 since what year?
In what year did the practice of allowing non priests to become Cardinals stop?
In what year was it declared that Cardinals had to be bishops?
In the time between electing new popes, what is the duty of the cardinal?
What color is the hat?
How many cardinal deacons were there in 2005?
How many years before a cardinal deacon can choose the order of the cardinal priests?
In 1939, how many Cardinals were Italian?
In 1994, how many Cardinals were Italian?
What is the name of one of the deaconries in which Cardinals come from?
Which cardinals are ranked lowest?
Who can become the cardinal protopriest?
Who is the cardinal protopriest at this time?
In the College of Cardinals, the elected Dean needs the approval of who?
Patriarch cardinals are not given what title?
Who are the lowest ranking cardinals in the Catholic church?
Who are the highest ranking cardinals in the Catholic Church?
Which rank has the most cardinals?
Each cardinal priest has what?
In what year did Pope Sixtus V put a cap on the number of cardinals in the College of Cardinals?
What was the maximum number allowed per Pope Sixtus V?
Who removed the cap on cardinals in the College of the Cardinals?
Iranian languages are all said to be derived from which predecessor?
From what languages does the word Aryao come?
From where did Iranian languages originate?
What part of the world is it theorized that Indo-Iranian languages came from?
What society is a strong contender for the common culture speaking Indo-Iranian?
When did the Andronovo culture exist?
What language family did Thracian and Balto-Slavic belong to?
Where did early Iranian people establish societies?
What characteristic of Middle Iranian civilization is shown by the number of different languages and their speakers?
How many of the Middlie Iranian tongues have remained in existence since ancient time?
In which historical record does Old Persian appear in exemplary form?
When was the Behistun inscription written?
During what century was the change from Old to Middle Persian well underway?
What ancient religious document exists in two versions and includes Old Iranian language?
What is the contemporary name of the religion which Avesta was part of?
What language shows a level of maturity corresponding to Old Avestan?
What language shows the same level of development as Younger Avestan?
What language is Carduchi thought to have become?
What language did Herodotus invent a name for?
What are the two main divisions of Iranian tongues?
Which language is associated with the western branch of Iranian?
Which language is associated with the eastern branch of Iranian?
When did the age of Middle Iranian come to a close?
What are the two main divisions of Middle Iranian?
Bactrian, Sogdian, and Saka are examples of what type of Iranian language?
Which language bears a resemblance to the diversity of eastern Iranian languages?
Where did the the alphabets used by eastern languages come from?
What did the Bactrian language use for writing?
What is another term for Middle Persian?
When did Middle Persian start being u sed?
What are three languages employed by the Manichaeans?
What was the writing of Manichaean documents similar to?
What was the new form of writing introduced by the spread of Islam?
When did usage of Middle Persian script fall off?
What script was converted to Latin in the 1920s?
When was Tajik script converted to Cyrillic?
Who catalyzed the conversion of Tajik script into Cyrillic?
What is another term for Western Iran?
What are two languages that were forced out by the spread of Arabic?
By what century had the area inhabited by Sarmatians been absorbed by pre-Slavic people?
Where can the remnants of Yaghnobi be found?
Ossetic is a version of which Scythian language?
What is used a main source of light for a building during the day?
What kind of effects can natural illumination have on a persons psychological?
Using natural illumination instead of artificial light sources help with what?
Lamps and light fixtures are a form of what?
The use of light to achieve an aesthetic effect is know as?
What can be used a main source of light for a building during the day?
Lamps and light fixtures  are a form of what?
What kind of effects can proper lighting have on a persons psychologically?
What does using natural illumination instead of artificial lighting help with?
What is the used to achieve a practical effect?
What type of fixtures do you use for indoor lighting?
What is considered a key part of interior design?
What can be a intrinsic component of landscaping?
What type of fixtures are used typically used for indoor lighting?
What can be used as a intrinsic component of landscape projects?
When was fluorescent lighting first available?
What type of lighting can be mounted in the ceiling to appear flush?
Peking man kindled fire as early as?
Which type of oily animals where also used as lamps after being threaded with wick?
What is considered the earliest form of artificial lighting?
The hollow worked stones lamps found in Lascaux caves date back how far?
What type of lighting was powered by electricity?
When did gas powered street lights became economically available.
What can come in a wide variety of styles for various functions?
Functioning as holder a light fixture can provide directed light and avoid?
Luminous efficacy is measure in what unit?
How many Kelvins is daylight measured at?
What has a color temperature around 2800 to 3000 Kelvin?
It can be said that lights with a high color temperature have more energy in what color spectrum?
A lamp with more energy in the yellow and red spectrum are known to be?
Who invented track lighting?
What feeds all the fixtures in low voltage tracks instead of each light having a line-to-low voltage transformer.
What  type of lighting uses lights that are hung or clipped to bare metal cables?
How many volts does a track lighting system usually use?
What is a uplight used for ambient lighting?
What is one type of fixture commonly found in offices?
Magnifier lamps are considered what type of lighting? 
When would neon lighting be considered general lighting?
What uses diffuser panels below fluorescent lights?
Normally neon lighting is considered what type of lighting?
What do steps in move theater aisles have for safety markings?
What are the low wattage lamps being replaced with in movie theaters?
What kind of tube are the movie theaters lights enclosed in?
What is used to light walkways at night?
What kind of lights are being designed for energy efficiency?
What kind of light is used to illuminate outdoor playing fields at night?
Extremely bright lights used to deter crime are called?
What type of light would be used illuminate the entrance to a property?
What color are tail lights?
What color are headlamps on a vehicle?
When did automakers start using electroluminescent technology to backlight gauges?
What color are reversing indicator lamps?
What indicates that a driver is intending to change position?
What is the removable and replaceable part of a light fixture?
What does a light bulb convert into electromagnetic radiation?
Huge much light does a 13 W compact fluorescent lamp produce equivalent to a incandescent light bulb.
How many lemuns does a 15 watt fluorescent lamp produce?
What is designing as it applies to built environments?
Would you consider aesthetic elements alone in architectural lighting design?
What is the name of the software sometimes used to help calculate lighting needs in a built environment?
Hand-calculations are based off of what type of data?
What type of factor calculation can be used to find out how much daylight is received in a internal space.
What type of paint tends to absorb light?
What kind of paint makes a room a room look larger and brighter?
What type of study is used to simulate lighting designs?
What is prepared prior to the performance for the lighting operator?
Motion pictures employee the similar lighting techniques as which other form of lighting?
What is the basic SI unit of measurement?
What is the SI unit for lumiance?
What is the CGS unit of lumiance?
What is the amount of useful light emitted from a luminous flux measured in? 
What is a standardized model of human visual brightness?
What is the SI unit of illuminace and luminous emittance?
What does UGR stand for?
What does GAI stand for?
The relative separating of object colors illuminated by a light source is known as?
Would a lower GAI mean higher apparent saturation or vividness of object colors?
What is typically used to measure light?
What measures the amount of light entering the eye?
A Daysimeter what type of personal meter?
How many days can the Daysimeter gather for analysis?
What type of light stimulates the circadian system?
What is a basic concept of deciding how much illumination is required for a given task? 
What can help reduce energy and usage cost by providing light only when or where it is needed? 
What type of standard do newer control systems use? 
What is the name of one type of control system used? 
Does a wireless mesh open standard make installation harder?
What sensor controls light with motion sensors? 
What does a passive infrared sensor react to? 
What type of sensor transmits sound above the range of human hearing?
Would you want to use passive infrared sensor in a area requiring 360-degree coverage?
What is the oldest method of interior lighting? 
Daylighting has been proven to have negative effects on people?
What is a form of solid state lighting?
What is the best way to control light emissions of LEDs?
What can cause health effects such headache frequency?
What devised a method where kerosene could be distilled from petroleum?
What year was it discovered that petroleum could be distilled into kerosene? 
What method of lighting have been used since 1820s?
What does CFL stand for?
Are all CFLs suitable for dimming?
What is known as artificial light that is excessive or intrusive?
What causes sharp shadows around buildings? 
In a battlefield does not have natural light what could you use instead? 
The use of what may disclose your own hidden position on a battlefield? 
Modern warfare has seen the increased use of what? 
What can be used by military for targeting?
What has eliminated the need for flares on a battlefield?
What does the CIE stand for?
What does the IESNA stand for? 
Who else publishes along with IESNA? 
What defines photo metric data?
What does IALD stand for?
What does PLDA stand for?
What was the PLDA formerly known as?
What does PLASA stand for? 
Where is PLASA based?
How many individuals does PLASA represent?
What does RoHS stand for?
Which political practice did Montesquieu originate?
How many divisions of the government did Montesquieu call for?
What document was greatly informed by the idea of separation of powers?
What kind of oversight does the separation of powers help to promote?
What was the doctrine called that allowed the three branches of government to check the powers of each other?
Which Enlightenment thinker supported the idea of separation of powers?
Which Enlightenment thinker was against the separation of powers?
Who was a leading advocate of dividing government into different branches?
Whose thoughts were impacted by Montesquieu's philosophy?
Who was an advocate of separation of powers?
Who was an opponent of separation of powers?
Who's writing were very influential on the design of the United States Constitution?  
What country's government, on which the US government was modeled, did not formally implement separation of powers?
What were the two main principles informing the government of the UK?
What term describes the status of the different branches of government in Maryland, Virginia, North Carolina and Georgia?
What country's government served as a model for the United States Government?
In the 18th century what function, besides President, did the Delaware President serve? 
What is the only branch of U.S. government imbued with lawmaking abilities?
Which court case upheld the rule of nondelegation?
When was Clinton v. City of New York decided by the Supreme Court?
In the US who has the sole power to pass legislation?
What is the doctrine called that does not allow congress to pass on their power to pass laws to any other agency?
What was the court case that struck down the line item veto?
What year was Clinton v. City of New York decided by the supreme court?
What was one of the first times the Supreme Court tried a case regarding nondelegation?
In what year was Wayman v. Southard tried by the U.S. Supreme Court?
Who was Chief Justice of the Supreme Court when Wayman v. Southard reached the Supreme Court?
In Wayman v. Southard, what branch was accused of being given lawmaking abilities by Congress?
What is the name of the 1825 case where the supreme court held that congress could delegate their responsibilities to the court?
Who was chief justice of the supreme court under the Wayman v. Southard ruling?
When was the first time that a Congressional attempt at delegating lawmaking responsibility was found to be in violation of the Constitution?
The establishment of what body was the subject of A.L.A. Schechter Poultry Corp. v. United States?
In what year was A.L.A. Schechter v. United States tried before the Supreme Court?
In what year did the supreme court determine that delegating powers by congress was unconstitutional?
What was the supreme court case that was determined that congress could not allow the President to determine fair competition?
What kind of courts did congress establish?
What power are legislative courts not allowed to exercise?
Who can determine a date of adjournment if congress cannot agree?
Who can call congress into emergency session?
Who serves as president of the Senate?
Who has the power to issue a pardon?
Who has the power to issue a reprieve? 
Who is the commander and chief of the Army?
Who has the power to declare ware?
Who has the responsibility to confirm Generals and Admirals?
Who is responsible for judicial review?
What is the court case that established judicial review?
Which courts decisions are binding across the entire United States?
Who can limit judicial review of a law?
Who's judicial power does congress have the right to limit?
Who presides over an impeachment trial?
Who wrote that the legislative branch was the predominate branch of government?
In which Federalist paper did James Madison state that the legislative branch of government was predominate?
Immediately following the civil war which branch of government was seen to have the greater amount of power?
How many of Andrew Johnson's veto's were over turned by Congress
What act did congress pass that gave the senate the right to approve the dismissal of a cabinet official?
Under what basis did Richard Nixon assert an expansion of the power of the President?
What term is used when one branch of government must get approval from at least one other branch of government?
Who has congress delegated the responsibility of establishing the rules of conduct for the courts to? 
Who may license and regulate attorneys in Florida?
Who sets the procedures to be followed in the Florida court system?
When were the styles of arts created?
Who wrote Lives of the Most Excellent Painters, Sculptors, and Architects?
By the 18th century which languages was Vasaris book translated in?
In Vitruvius's mind, whose responsibility was it to see the principles carried out?
Who wrote De Re Aedificatoria?
What did Leon Battista Alberti consider most important for beauty?
What ideal proportion did Alberti promote?
In what century did "style" as an artistic concept arise?
Who wrote the book Contrasts?
What year was Contrasts written in?
What was the name of Pugin's book?
In what year was Contrasts written?
What world did Pugin dislike?
What type of architecture did Pugin consider truly Christian?
Who wrote Seven Lamps of Architecture?
Who was the author of Seven Lamps of Architecture?
What was Ruskin's career? 
When was  Seven Lamps of Architecture published?
What, according to Ruskin, should looking at architecture contribute to its viewer?
Does Ruskin believe all buildings are works of architecture?
What was most significant in architecture according to Ruskin?
To be true architecture in Ruskin's opinion what should be done to a structure?
What features at minimum did Ruskin insist on for a building to be considered functional?
What century was the architect Le Corbusier in?
Who wrote on the topic of architectural ideals contrasted with simple construction? 
What was Le Corbusier 's profession?
When did Le Corbusier live and write?
What part of him did Le Corbusier say proper architecture touched?
What state of emotion did Le Corbusier say architecture put him in?
What term replaced Vitruvius' term "utility"?
In addition to being practically useful what other aspects did a building need in order to be considered functional?
Whose concept of utility did the more modern concept of function replace?
What aspects of a building were considered part of the larger concept of function?
What were the reactions to the idea that function should come before other concerns?
Rationalism and empiricism are examples of what?
Aside from the architects what did the philosophies influence?
Which philosophy followed structuralism?
When was the conecept, Sustainable architecture used?
What novel concept was introduced at the end of the 20th century?
To what should a building be friendly?
What sort of power sources should a building not overuse if the building is to be considered environmentally friendly?
What dynamic needs were the reason for building to be done?
Oral traditions allowed what to become formalized in human cultures?
What was building considered?
What was the most valued type of building craft called?
Aside from skills, what is required in order to have the means for building?
What civilizations used the divine and supernatural in their architecture?
What are two examples of past civilizations?
To what did these civilizations have ties that to were shown off by their architecture?
What does architectural monumentality often represent?
What religion led to architectural changes in many Asian countries?
Which cultures architecture showed a lot of diversity?
When did Hindu temple architecture begin being produced?
What does Hindu temple architecture try to express?
What is the source of the concepts in Hindu temple architecture?
What type of architectural is especially known for its regional differences
What kind of religious theology affected landscape related architecture in Asia?
What cultures architecture inspired Islamic architecture to use pointed arch's?
When was Islamic architecture first seen?
In addition to forms from the ancient Middle East, what other place's forms had an effect on Islamic architecture?
What other parts of the society's needs did architecture fill?
What kind of arch design from Islamic architecture affected European architects?
What type of buildings were took the most effort to build?
What were the most important buildings of the time?
What two groups spread knowledge of architecture in Europe?
What style is Gothic?
What is another pan-European style?
When did the clerics and tradesmen start spreading architectural information?
What sort of considerations does architectural design take into account? 
In architecture what aspects are planned and designed?
Aside from planning and design what other types of aspects does architecture involve?
Who said that architecture was able extend beyond function?
In what way did Nunzia Rondanini believe architecture moved past mere functionality?
What could, in Rondanini's opinion, architecture "stimulate and influence"?
What shouldn't architecture be assumed to promote, according to Rondanini?
What does architecture share with other sciences?
What is a reactionary thing to limit formalism's meaning to?
What sort of quest lacks purpose?
What ends up being reduced in quality by this quest?
From what ideals did Classical architecture emerge?
These civic ideas allowed what to come into being?
What ideals were Greek and Roman Classical architecture not based on?
What owes its development to the Classical orders?
When were architectural writings first made?
Aside from general advice what did the texts contain?
What is another term for specific formal prescriptions?
When did Vitruvius write his canons?
What is a significant early architectural canonical type?
What organizations were created by Medieval craftsmen?
What records of the guilds are still in existence?
What was the main thing the contracts were had to do with?
What is another term for master mason?
What aspects of buildings did science and engineering have an effect on?
Who still could handle the structural calculations for designing at that time?
What started with the Industrial Revolution?
What became cheap enough for the middle class to buy?
As products came within their financial reach what concept began to interest the middle class?
What kind of books did housebuilders use?
What type of design did these texts allow the builders to incorporate?
What kind of movement was modern architecture in the beginning?
Who was the new movement meant to suit the needs of?
Whose needs were no longer relevant to the new style?
What sort of details did the Modernists' want in their buildings?
What details did Modernists' do away with?
Who was instrumental in creating Organic architecture?
What are two of Wright's designs?
What was Wright's intention regarding humans and nature?
What made it possible to design architecture through new means and methods?
What new type of construction allowed the making of skyscrapers?
What style came after Modernism?
What is an example of International Style?
Who designed the Twin Towers?
What aspect of historical styles did a lot of architects find lacking in modernist styles?
Who were three architects who influenced Brutalism?
What material was used in Brutalist structures?
Who disagreed with the aesthetic of Brutalism?
What school was a response to Brutalism?
What are two examples of metaphoric architecture?
What are biomorphism and zoomorphic architecture based after design wise?
What type of architecture do some consider metaphoric architecture to be a development of?
When was the start of the  architectural phenomenology movement?
What was  architectural phenomenology reacting to?
What were the architectural phenomenologists hoping to expand?
Who called postmodern architecture a "decorated shed"?
What term did Venturi use for brutalist and mondernist buildings?
About when did architecture begin specializing?
Who can no longer design a large structure?
What two architectural movements have come under criticism for their focus on individuality? 
What issue has moved to the forefront in recent years?
What do architecture schools look at more and more nowadays?
Who was the first to design architecture environmentally?
Who was known for focusing on the environment in the 1960s?
What organization's rating system promotes sustainability?
What are three new movements that have a focus on sustainability?
What are three things the new movements try to achieve?
What older architectural movements do the newer movements not go along with?
Which three statistics does the HDI compile?
Does a high ranking on the HDI indicate shorter or longer life expectancy?
Who developed the HDI?
What entity publishes the HDI?
Does a high ranking on the HDI indicate shorter or longer life expectancy at birth?
In what year did the Human Development Report introduce the IHDI?
What does IHDI stand for?
Which measures the potential development, the HDI or the IHDI?
Which measures the potential development, the HDI or the IHDI?
In what year did Mahbub ul Haq devise and launch the HDI?
Who was initially opposed to the idea of creating the HDI?
Mahbub ul Haq was hoping to shift the focus of development economics to what type of policies?
Which year was used for estimates in the 2011 report?
What does LE stand for?
What does MYS stand for?
What does EYS stand for?
What entity makes the defining formula for the HDI well-known?
On what date was the 2015 Human Development Report released?
Which year was used for estimates in the 2015 report?
On what date was the 2014 Human Development Report released?
Which year was used for estimates in the 2014 report?
What does the IHDI specifically take into account?
Does the IHDI measure the "average" or the "potential" level of human development? 
Which Caribbean nation is in the top quartile of HDI (but missing IHDI)?
Is the top quartile of HDI considered "high" or "very high" human development?
What is the main reason that countries were excluded from the 2014 report?
Which East Asian dictatorship was excluded from the 2014 report?
On what date was the 2013 Human Development Report released?
Which year was used for estimates in the 2013 report?
Does the IHDI measure the "average" or the "potential" level of human development?
Which Caribbean nation is in the top quartile of HDI (but missing IHDI)?
Which Caribbean nation is in the top quartile of HDI (but missing IHDI)?
Which year was used for estimates in the 2011 report?
Which Caribbean nation is in the top quartile of HDI (but missing IHDI)?
Which Caribbean nation is in the top quartile of HDI (but missing IHDI)?
What is the main reason that countries were excluded from the 2011 report?
Which East Asian dictatorship was excluded from the 2011 report?
On what date was the 2010 Human Development Report released?
Which year was used for estimates in the 2010 report?
In the IHDI, inequality is factored into what three human development dimensions?
Which Caribbean nation is in the top quartile of HDI (but missing IHDI)?
On what date was the 2009 Human Development Report released?
What period is covered by the 2009 Human Development Report?
What was another title for the 2009 Human Development Report?
What new category was added in the 2009 Human Development Report?
How does the 2009 Human Development Report refer to countries that rank "very high"?
What three reasons were mentioned for countries being excluded?
What type of update was released on December 18, 2008?
What was the index published on December 18, 2008 lacking?
What period was covered by the statistical update index released in December of 2008?
Which countries experienced a decrease in HDI?
Under what number does a country need to fall in order to be considered a "low development" country?
On which continent are all 22 of the low development countries located?
What is Gabon's ranking?
What is South Africa's ranking?
What are the two highest ranking Sub-Saharan countries?
What number indicates the minimum score for a country to be considered a "high development" country?
Which South American country was included among the seven promoted countries?
What is the largest country that was included among the seven promoted countries?
If there is a decrease in a country's ranking, which indicator will be present?
If there is an increase in a country's ranking, which indicator will be present?
If a country's ranking does not change, which indicator will be present?
Which country has been ranked highest the most number of times?
Which country has received the top rank twice?
The HDI has been criticized for focusing exclusively on what?
Has the HDI been criticized for being biased towards Western or towards Eastern models of development?
The HDI has been criticized for lack of what type of perspective on development?
Critics of the HDI cite its focus on which: egalitarianism or authoritarianism?
How many countries were included in the 2009 HDI?
How many countries were included in the 2010 HDI?
What is another term for southern Europe
What is the name for the stretch of land on which Spain and Portugal are located?
What nations are sometimes included in the scope of southern Europe?
What area of France is considered a part of Mediterranean Europe?
What kind of climate is exemplary of southern Europe?
Which parts of Turkey are characterized by a Mediterranean climate?
What are two broad categories of similarity among countries which have a Mediterranean climate?
Where do colder areas occur within southern Europe?
Where are more moist areas found in southern Europe?
What term can be used to describe the wet area of North Spain?
What is a word that can be used to describe the plant life of southern Europe?
Who coined the term phytochoria?
What era started when Ancient Greek cities became self-governing entities?
What was the name of the different governments forming in Ancient Greece?
Who was responsible for the bringing Greek culture as far as Asia?
Where was the headquarters of the Western Roman Empire?
Where was the headquarters of the Eastern Roman Empire?
Which tribes brought down the Western Roman Empire?
What year is considered the transition between the classical period and the Middle Ages?
By what year was the Roman Empire split into two sections?
What is the Eastern Roman Empire in the Middle Ages called by contemporary scholars?
Who took over the remains of the Western Roman Empire?
What did Germanic people create in place of the Western Roman Empire?
What is the name of the period of armed incursions undertaken in the name of Christianity?
When did Crusaders invade Constantinople?
Which two cities benefited greatly from the activities of Crusaders?
What was the name of another activity like the Crusades occuring on the Iberian peninsula?
What empire was destroyed by the Sack of Constantinople?
What era was characterized by turmoil in Europe?
What disease plagued Europe during the Late Middle Ages?
Which new regime appeared in the Balkan region during the Late Middle Ages?
When did the Ottoman Empire conquer Constantinople?
When was the start of the period known as the Renaissance?
In what city did the Renaissance begin?
What areas of knowledge were subject to much debate during the Renaissance?
The encounter with Arabic knowledge put Renaissance thinkers back in touch with the teachings of which ancient civilizations?
Which countries initiated the Age of Exploration following the Reconquista?
When did religious conflict end in Europe?
Between which two nations was the Treaty of the Pyrenees signed?
Which scientist developed a means of viewing space?
Who was responsible for creating the first radio?
What resulted from Europe's exploration of the New World?
What institution of mercantilism was established with New World colonies?
What replaced agriculture as the focus of European economy with the establishment of overseas colonies?
Aside from the activities of colonies, what other event fostered the transition from agriculture to manufacturing?
When were there many struggles for independence or overthrowing prevailing governments?
From whom did Balkan states start retaking their independence?
In what year was Rome conquered?
What phrase is used to describe the period marked by competition for extant lands?
In what year did World War I begin?
When did a victor emerge in World War I?
At what event did the major Allied powers assert their conditions at the end of the war?
Which group took control in 1933?
Who led the Nazis?
Which country did Hitler align Germany with?
Who was the leader of Italy when World War II started?
What was the military partnership between countries aligned with the Soviet Union called?
What is the most common group of languages spoken in Mediterranean Europe?
What are the three main areas of southern Europe where Italian speakers can be found?
Where can people who speak Catalan be found?
What language is spoken in northwest Spain?
How many people in Spain and Gibraltar are Spanish speakers?
What is another term for Greek?
Outside of Greece itself, in what other nation is Greek a major language?
What language is used in Macedonia?
What do people speak in Bulgaria?
Slovene is a major language in what country?
What is considered a de facto second language in Mediterranean Europe?
Besides English, what other language is spoken in Gibraltar?
Besides English, what other language is spoken in Malta?
What language can be found used in Kosovo and Albania?
What type of language is Maltese?
Where is Basque Country located?
What term is used by the UNO to divide groups of nations?
What is the reason for the UNO's division into regions?
What smaller unit makes up the southern Europe region?
What does TDM stand for?
Which group uses TDM as a metric?
What is the acronym for British Broadcasting Corporation?
Under what auspices does the BBC exist?
When did the BBC start creating its own programming?
On what date did the BBC being its regular TV broadcasts?
In what country is the BBC headquartered?
What percentage of viewership across the UK is constituted by the BBC?
As a result of shows that the BBC itself creates, it is one of the biggest what?
Where was the BBC's first studio located?
What was the medium that brought the BBC's signal to the transmitter?
What term characterizes the type of broadcast made by the BBC prior to late 1935?
Where was the BBC's second studio located?
When did the BBC first change studios?
Where did the BBC continue broadcasting from in October of 1936?
What frequency band was used by the BBC starting in 1936?
How many lines did the Baird transmission contain?
How many lines did the Marconi-EMI transmission contain?
On what days did the BBC provide regular broadcasts?
For how long did the BBC alternate different broadcasting systems?
What kind of camera was used to broadcast live shows under the Baird system?
When was the Baird system officially abandoned?
What did the British fear could provide guidance to the German air force?
What part of the military did many people working for the BBC end up serving in?
What was the final thing shown on the BBC before it was shut down for the war?
When did most people mistakenly remember the last broadcast as having ended?
How many TVs were made between 1936 and the start of the war in 1939?
Who was the first person to speak on BBC when it was turned back on following World War II?
On what date did BBC return to the air after World War II?
In the decade following the war, where did a large portion of the BBC move to?
What character was featured in the cartoon aired the day BBC broadcasting was restored?
What city received BBC signals starting in 1949?
Which facility brought the BBC's transmissions to Birmingham?
What kind of image was broadcasted by the BBC by the mid-'50s?
On what frequency band was the BBC broadcasting in thie 1950s?
What was the name of the BBC changed to in 1960?
What was the BBC's main competitor?
What program debuted on November 23, 1963?
Where did the BBC broadcast from following World War II?
What was the first station launched after the original BBC?
What was the third network started in the UK?
What prevented BBC2 from broadcasting on its scheduled launch date?
Where was the cause of the power outage?
Who served as MC for the first BBC2 broadcast?
What was the first station to show programs in color?
When did the other two major British stations start color programming?
What types of programs were not shown on BBC Two?
Who was the first controller of BBC2?
What kinds of programs did Attenborough favor?
When was the first broadcast of Tom and Jerry on BBC One?
When was the final broadcast of Tom and Jerry?
How many episodes of Tom and Jerry were shown in the evenings?
On what channel was Tom and Jerry sometimes shown in the mornings?
Which group did David Attenborough join while on sabbatical?
When did the BBC Natural History Unit come into existence?
What are some shows that Attenborough created with the BBC Natural History Unit?
How many different areas does BBC One accommodate with customized broadcasting?
Which parts of the UK have more control over their BBC broadcasts?
Who hosts shows on BBC broadcasts outside of England?
What kind of coverage might take precedence over standard BBC programming?
What kind of service was Ceefax?
When was Ceefax launched?
What is the modern replacement for Ceefax?
With the right tools, what area could get free BBC broadcasts from Astra 2D?
What are some entities that have taken issue with the possibility that BBC programming was being viewed for free?
On what service were some shows removed as a result of issues over rights?
What are two specific broadcasts suspended on Sky Digital?
When was the 50th anniversary of BBC news broadcasts?
On what form of media was a retrospective of the BBC's news broadcasts released to commemorate its 50th anniversary?
In what format were the BBC's first new bulletins shown?
What reality series was awarded a BAFTA in 2005?
Who was the leader of BBC Television in 2006?
What did BBC Television get absorbed into?
What caused the move of BBC Television into the BBC VIsion unit?
When did the BBC start exploring the use of internet streaming?
When was full coverage of the BBC's standard programming launched in online stream format?
As of early 2016, what BBC show has been sold outside of the country the most times?
How many sales of Keeping Up Appearances have been made to non-British buyers?
Who announced the status of Keeping Up Appearances as the most exported BBC show?
How often are people required to remit the TV license fee?
How do the BBC's non-domestic channels generate revenue?
When did BBC Vision change back to BBC Television?
Who is the current head of BBC Television?
What are the four responsibilities of BBC Television?
When did BBC Japan begin broadcasting?
When did BBC Japan shut down?
What was the genre of BBC Japan?
How old was Schwarzenegger when he started bodybuilding?
How many times was Schwarzenegger awarded the Mr. Olympia title?
For which film from 1982 did Schwarzenegger first gain fame?
How old was Schwarzenegger when he won Mr. Universe?
What nickname did Schwarzenegger's co-stars call him by during his acting career?
What year marked the end of Schwarzenegger's second term in the governor's office?
What political party did Schwarzenegger belong to?
What governor did Schwarzenegger replace?
What date marked the start of Schwarzenegger's second gubernatorial term?
What sport Schwarzenegger played led to a trip to the gym that sparked his love of weightlifting?
Who starred in the first movie Schwarzenegger remembers seeing?
What job did Schwarzenegger's father want him to pursue?
Which of Schwarzenegger's bodybuilding idols died in 2000?
What year did Schwarzenegger's brother die?
What is Meinhard's son named?
What caused Schwarzenegger's father Gustav's death?
Who was the first woman Schwarzenegger was serious about?
What magazine revealed the details of Schwarzenegger's childhood punishments in 2004?
How old was Schwarzenegger when he started hoping he'd move to America?
How old was Schwarzenegger when he moved to the U.S.?
In what state did Schwarzenegger claim his first Mr. Olympia title?
What's the name of the professional wrestler who designed the first logo for Gold's Gym?
What magazine called Schwarzenegger America's most famous immigrant?
What does TM stand for?
What psychological problem did Schwarzenegger say he struggled with?
What bodybuilding competition is named after Schwarzenegger?
How frequently did Schwarzenegger write a column for Muscle & Fitness and Flex?
How much did the magazines Schwarzenegger wrote for pledge to contribute to physical fitness initiatives each year when he was Governor?
What position did Schwarzenegger briefly hold at Muscle & Fitness and Flex?
In 2011, how much time each day did Schwarzenegger say he lifted weights? 
In what competition did Schwarzenegger have to lift over 500 pounds while balancing on foot rests?
What year did Schwarzenegger first try to win the Mr. Olympia title?
Who won Mr. Olympia 1969?
At which year's Mr. Olympia contest did Schwarzenegger become the youngest person to win the title?
How old was Schwarzenegger when he won Mr. Olympia in 1970?
What was the name of the bodybuilding film Schwarzenegger starred in?
How much time did Schwarzenegger have to train for the 1975 Mr. Olympia competition?
Who co-starred with Schwarzenegger in the film Stay Hungry?
For what Hollywood role was Schwarzenegger training in 1980?
How many weeks did Schwarzenegger spend getting ready for the 1980 Mr. Olympia contest?
How many times did Schwarzenegger win Mr. Olympia before retiring for good?
In what year did Schwarzenegger write that he used anabolic steroid because they were "helpful"?
What German doctor was sued by Schwarzenegger?
How much did the court award Schwarzenegger in the case against Heepe?
Which U.S. tabloid settled out of court with Schwarzenegger in 1999?
When did Schwarzenegger purchase the rights to the film Pumping Iron?
In what year did Schwarzenegger play Jayne Mansfield's husband in a film?
What role did Schwarzenegger miss out on because of his height?
What 1979 comedy film featured Schwarzenegger, Kirk Douglas, and Ann-Margret?
What was the title of the sequel to Conan the Barbarian?
What year was the first Terminator movie released?
Who directed The Terminator?
What other action star was an international hit in the 1980s?
What year was Schwarzenegger's film The Running Man released?
What's the title of the comedy movie Schwarzenegger starred in with Danny DeVito in 1988?
How much did Schwarzenegger make from the film Total Recall, on top of 15% of gross?
What 1992 TV movie did Schwarzenegger direct?
An episode of what well-known TV series was Schwarzenegger's directorial debut?
What Schwarzenegger film was 1991's highest-grossing movie?
What organization named Schwarzenegger the "International Star of the Decade" in 1993?
What 1994 film brought Schwarzenegger back together with director James Cameron?
How many feet tall was the proposed statue of Schwarzenegger?
What was the name of the cultural association that wanted to build a Terminator statue?
Which 2005 movie featured Schwarzenegger as himself?
What's the name of the comic book character modeled on Schwarzenegger?
What famous comic book writer did Schwarzenegger work with on the Governator?
Schwarzenegger said he was reading scripts that included the one for what WWII film based on a true story?
Who wrote the screenplay for With Wings as Eagles?
On what date in 2011 was the hold on Schwarzenegger's movie projects announced?
2013's The Last Stand marked Schwarzenegger's first starring role in how long?
What was the first film Schwarzenegger co-starred in with Sylvester Stallone?
What's the title of the fifth film in the Terminator franchise?
What year did Terminator Genisys debut?
In what year did Schwarzenegger speak at the Republican National Convention?
What was the title of the anti-drug music video Schwarzenegger appeared in under the Reagan administration's sponsorship?
In what presidential election year did Schwarzenegger make a name for himself as a prominent Republican?
Which candidate did Schwarzenegger appear with at a presidential campaign rally?
What nickname did George H.W. Bush give to Schwarzenegger?
The episode of The Tonight Show with Jay Leno where Schwarzenegger announced his candidacy for Governor aired on what date?
How many debates did Schwarzenegger participate in before the 2003 California recall election?
What percentage of the October 2003 vote was in favor of a recall?
Who was Schwarzenegger's closest rival in the gubernatorial race of 2003?
By about what number of votes did Schwarzenegger win the 2003 recall election in California?
What percentage of the vote did Schwarzenegger's opponent Bustamante receive?
Who was the first governor of California who had been born in a foreign country?
What politician threatened to start working to recall Schwarzenegger right after he was elected?
What Saturday Night Live sketch was Schwarzenegger referencing when he called opposing politicians "girlie men"?
In what month of 2005 did Schwarzenegger hold a special election?
How many of Schwarzenegger's ballot initiatives were defeated in the special election of 2005?
Who did Schwarzenegger choose as Chief of Staff?
What political office did people speculate Schwarzenegger might try for in 2010?
What year did Schwarzenegger become a naturalized citizen of the United States?
In what country besides the U.S. is Schwarzenegger a citizen?
Who did Schwarzenegger finally endorse in the 2008 Republican primary?
Which candidate withdrew from the presidential race in January of 2008?
On which two major issues did McCain and Schwarzenegger publicly agree?
What group awarded Schwarzenegger the title of one of the 11 "worst governors" in a 2010 report?
What was Schwarzenegger's highest approval rating during his stint as governor?
What was Schwarzenegger's approval rating on the day his time in office ended?
What was the controversy around Schwarzenegger's first gubernatorial campaign nicknamed?
How many women spoke out publicly about misconduct on Schwarzenegger's part?
Which newspaper broke the story about Schwarzenegger's alleged sexual misconduct?
One woman accused Schwarzenegger of trying to remove what item of clothing?
What magazine published an interview quoting Schwarzenegger calling marijuana a "leaf"?
What drug does the documentary Pumping Iron show Schwarzenegger using?
Who sued Schwarzenegger and two of his employees for libel, settling in 2006?
What movie was Schwarzenegger promoting when the alleged incident took place?
What paper did Richardson claim was used by Schwarzenegger's publicist and aide to discredit her?
What year did Austria outlaw the death penalty?
Which member of Austrian parliament wanted Schwarzenegger to lose his Austrian citizenship?
What date marked the first law restricting greenhouse gas emissions?
The regulations pertain to emissions from utilities, manufacturing plants, and what other entity?
What year has Schwarzenegger set as the deadline for California to show a 25% reduction in emissions?
What region of the U.S. has California partnered with on the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative?
What green technology did Schwarzenegger have installed at home to reduce his carbon footprint? 
What year did the Greenhouse Gas Initiative go into effect?
What particular pollutant was Schwarzenegger addressing with his 2006 executive order?
In what city was the SAE World Congress held in 2009?
With which of his friends did Schwarzenegger start a bricklaying company?
What natural disaster in 1971 contributed to the success of Schwarzenegger's business?
How much did Schwarzenegger pay for the first apartment building he bought?
What restaurant chain did Schwarzenegger invest in?
When did Schwarzenegger withdraw from involvement with Planet Hollywood?
What other successful theme restaurant chain was Planet Hollywood modeled on?
What investment firm does Schwarzenegger maintain partial ownership of?
What city hosts Arnold's Sports Festival each year?
What's the name of Schwarzenegger's film production company?
What renowned publishing company partners with Schwarzenegger in Fitness Publications?
What's the name of the restaurant Schwarzenegger opened with his wife?
Where is the Schwarzenegger restaurant located?
What is the literal translation of the word "schatzi"?
What year did Schwarzenegger sell Schatzi on Main?
What is Maria Shriver's relation to President John F. Kennedy
What Massachusetts town was the setting for the wedding between Shriver and Schwarzenegger?
How many children did Schwarzenegger and Shriver have together?
Who did Schwarzenegger reportedly begin dating shortly after his separation?
How long were Schwarzenegger and Shriver married?
What newspaper broke the story about Schwarzenegger's child with another woman?
Which attorney did Schwarzenegger consult to handle his divorce?
Which of the two kept their family home in Brentwood?
Schwarzenegger's initial divorce petition failed to provide for attorney's fee reimbursement and what other condition of divorce?
What word describes an aortic valve with two rather than three leaflets?
Schwarzenegger underwent heart valve replacement in what year?
Which of Schwarzenegger's sons was with him when he had a motorcycle accident in 2006?
What bone did Schwarzenegger break while on a ski trip in 2006?
Where was Schwarzenegger vacationing when he broke his leg?
At what airport was Schwarzenegger's jet forced to make an emergency landing in 2009?
How tall does Schwarzenegger claim to be?
What Assemblyman playfully tried to measure Schwarzenegger's height?
How tall did Men's Health magazine report Schwarzenegger to be in a 1999 issue?
What's the title of Schwarzenegger's autobiography?
What did Schwarzenegger name the chapter of the book that addresses his extramarital affair?
When was Schwarzenegger's autobiography released?
In what year did AM General grant Schwarzenegger's wish for a street-legal Humvee?
In addition to the Humvee, what other vehicle manufactured by AM General was Schwarzenegger first to own?
What color is the exterior of Schwarzenegger's Bugatti Veyron Grand Sport Vitesse?
What nonprofit did Schwarzenegger found in 1995?
Schwarzenegger was the spokesperson for the Special Olympic games held in what city in China?
About how many schools across the country is ICG active in?
What school within the University of Southern California does the Schwarzenegger Institute for State and Global Policy belong to?
In what year was the Schwarzenegger Institute for State and Global Policy founded?
What position does Schwarzenegger hold with the Institute?
What nearby settlement built ships for the Royal Navy?
In what year did Plymouth become a city?
What is the term used to describe the attacks on Plymouth during the Second World War?
In what year was Plymstock incorporated?
Along with Plymouth and Devonport, what location was merged into a county borough in 1914?
What is the name of the location cited by Ptolemy that is believed to have been located near modern Plymouth?
Where have Middle Iron Age remnants been found?
What does 'TAMARI OSTIA' mean?
In what century were sailors obligated to relocate from Plympton due to silting?
What did Sutton mean in the Old English language?
In what year was the first written reference to Plymouth made?
During whose reign was the former town of Sutton referred to as Plymouth?
What did 'Plym Mouth' mean?
In what year during the Hundred Years' War did the French assault Plymouth?
Who set fire to Plymouth in 1403?
In what year was the fortification later known as Drake's Fort constructed?
Before Plymouth dockyard was built, where was the fleet located?
In what year did Parliament pass a notable law that led to the building of fortifications in Plymouth?
Which faction did Plymouth support during the English Civil War?
For how many years was Plymouth under siege during the English Civil War?
Where did the last battle for Plymouth during the English Civil War end?
In what year did Charles II ascend to the throne?
What locale was used to house imprisoned Parliamentarians after the restoration of Charles II?
During what century was Plymouth involved with the Atlantic slave trade?
In what century did Plymouth cease to be a vital trading port?
In what year was HMNB Davenport established?
What river was adjacent to HMNB Davenport?
How many male workers were present in Plymouth Dock circa 1712?
What was the 1733 population of Plymouth Dock?
In what parish was HMNB Davenport located?
Along with coal and grain, what was the most important import in 18th century Plymouth?
What was the new name given to Plymouth Dock in 1824?
Along with Plymouth and Devonport, what settlement comprised the Three Towns?
What architect was noted for his neoclassical designs in Plymouth?
On what street did many of the buildings designed by John Foulston reside?
Who founded Plymouth Porcelain?
In what year was Plymouth Porcelain founded?
What was William Cookworthy's profession?
What was the name of the engineer involved in the construction of the Eddystone Lighthouse?
In kilometers, how long was the Plymouth Sound Breakwater?
Who was the designer of the Plymouth Sound Breakwater?
In what year did construction finish on the Plymouth Sound Breakwater?
When did construction commence on Plymouth Sound Breakwater?
Near which settlement were Palmerston forts built in the 1860s?
What animal byproduct was imported to Plymouth in the 19th century?
In what settlement were the dockyards located?
What was the primary base of the Royal navy during World War I?
What sorts of ships were based in Davenport?
What location provided a base for flying boats?
What force used Sunderland flying boats out of Devonport?
What military organization was based in Devonport until 1941?
How many attacks comprised the Plymouth Blitz?
How many civilian deaths occurred as a result of the Plymouth Blitz?
How many homes were totally destroyed in the Plymouth Blitz?
Who was the author of the 1943 Plan for Plymouth?
In the period 1951-1957, how many new houses were constructed yearly in Plymouth?
In the postwar period to 1964, how many houses were built in Plymouth?
When was the Civic Centre built?
What English Heritage status does the Civic Centre possess?
What aircraft carrier received maintenance at Devonport Dockyard?
By what year was the greater part of the army presence in Plymouth gone?
What military unit is based in Plymouth?
In what text was the presence of a settlement in the Plymouth area first recorded?
In what year was the Domesday Book compiled?
What was the name of the Plymouth-area settlement recorded in the Domesday Book?
In what year was Plymouth recognized as a town?
In what year did Parliament bestow a Charter on Plymouth?
Who was the first woman MP to take her seat in the British Parliament?
For what constituency was Nancy Astor elected?
On what date did Plymouth become a city?
In what year did Plymouth receive its first Lord Mayor?
What parish was incorporated into Plymouth in 1967?
What constituency did MP Michael Foot represent?
What position was Michael Foot noted to occupy in government?
What notable piece of legislation did Michael Foot contribute to?
What party did Michael Foot become a leader of?
In what town was Michael Foot born?
What was the population of Plymouth in 1971?
What document suggested that county boroughs be eliminated?
What county did Plymouth unsuccessfully attempt to see created?
On what date did Plymouth's county status end?
What body proposed that Plymouth become a unitary council?
What European Parliamentary constitutency is Plymouth a part of?
Who was elected for the Sutton and Devonport constitutency in 2015?
As of 2015, what political party did all of Plymouth's MPs belong to?
What parliamentary constitutency was represented by Johnny Mercer?
What river is to the west of Plymouth?
To the east of Plymouth lies which river?
The River Tamar is the boundary between Devon and what other county?
In what body of water do the rivers Plym and Tamar meet?
When did Plymstock join the unitary authority of Plymouth?
What estuary east of Plymouth is part of the River Plym?
When did the Plymouth Breakwater open?
What island is present in Plymouth Sound?
How large is the Unitary Authority of Plymouth in square miles?
In meters, what is the highest point in the Plymouth Unitary Authority?
What special designation does Plymouth Sound, Shores and Cliffs possess?
What stones form the headlands near Plymouth Sound?
Along with Devonian slate, Middle Devonian limestone and limestone, what stone provides the geologic base of Plymouth?
Along with shales, what is most of the city built on?
For what reason is Plymouth Sound a Site of Special Scientific Interest?
Middle Devonian limestone exists between Plymstock and what location?
What location north of the city possesses granite?
What river was used to ferry granite from Dartmoor to Plymouth?
Along with West Hoe and Radford, where was Middle Devonian limestone quarried in the region?
What local stone was used in the construction of many Plymouth buildings?
Along with convection, what provokes rain in the Plymouth area?
Along with winter, in what season are Atlantic depressions most prevalent?
About how many inches of rain fall on Plymouth every year?
Along with March, what month has the fastest winds on average?
From what direction do most of the winds blow on Plymouth?
How many hours of sunshine does the South West England region get each year?
What region of England benefits from the extension of the Azores High pressure area?
What institution of higher  education is colloquially known as Marjons?
What is the academic specialty of the University of St Mark & St John?
Along with City College Plymouth, what college calls Plymouth home?
About how many students are enrolled at City College Plymouth?
How many years ago was Plymouth College of Art founded?
How many independent art colleges exist in the United Kingdom?
How many large colleges exist in Plymouth?
How many state primary schools are in Plymouth?
Plymouth has how many state secondary schools?
How many state grammar schools are based in Plymouth?
What is the name of the independent school in Plymouth?
Aside from Plymouth High School for Girls and Devonport High School for Boys, what state grammar school is present in Plymouth?
What maritime institution of higher education existed in Plymouth as of 1880?
When did the Royal Naval Engineering College shut its doors in Plymouth?
What was the Royal Naval Engineering College renamed in 1959?
In what year did the Dockyard Technical College close?
After the Dockyard Technical College closed, where were classes relocated to?
What organization known as the MBA is based in Plymouth?
What Plymouth organization is named for Sir Alister Hardy?
What marine facility is attached to the University of Plymouth?
What group are many of Plymouth's marine organizations a part of?
What is the name of the aquarium present in Plymouth?
What was the population of Plymouth unitary authority circa 2011?
What was the population of Plymouth unitary authority circa 2001?
How many people did the Plymouth unitary authority gain between 2001 and 2011?
What was the average number of people in a Plymouth household?
What percentage of Plymouth residents in 2011 were of Chinese ancestry?
What percentage of Plymouth residents were suffering from poverty and deprivation in 2014?
As of 2014, what was the life expectancy of male Plymouth residents?
As of 2014, what was the life expectancy of female Plymouth residents?
Where did Plymouth's life expectancy rank out of the regions of South West England?
How many Plymouth residents are employed in defense?
About how many Plymouth residents are serving in the military?
When was Plymouth Gin first distilled?
What company produces Plymouth Gin?
During what decade was Plymouth Gin the most widely consumed in the world?
About what percentage of Plymouth's income comes from the Dockyard?
What Royal Navy base is present in Plymouth?
How many maritime businesses operate in Plymouth?
How many people work in Tamar Science Park?
What is a notable company based in Plymouth?
What is the name of Plymouth Council's urban redevelopment project?
What architect is in charge of the ""Vision for Plymouth"?
Along with Plymouth Council, what body supports the "Vision for Plymouth"?
What is the population goal of the "Vision for Plymouth"?
How many residences does the "Vision for Plymouth" seek to build?
When was the Charles Cross car park removed?
In what month and year was the grand opening of Drake Circus Shopping Centre?
Where was TR2 built?
What prize did TR2 almost win?
Who spoke disparagingly about the Drake Circus Shopping Centre?
What location is proposed for the future home of the Plymouth City Council headquarters?
To connect Millbay to the city centre, what would need to be destroyed?
What city region is located near a ferry terminal?
What is the A38 called inside the city of Plymouth?
In miles, about how far away from Plymouth does the A38 connect to the M5?
What bridge connects Cornwall to Plymouth via the A38?
What park and ride service is located at George Junction?
Who operates Milehouse park and ride?
Who operates the ferry to Spain?
Where does the ferry to France terminate?
Along with MV Bretagne and MV Pont-Aven, what ferry operates between Plymouth and the continent?
A passenger ferry operates between Cremyll and what location?
When did the Cremyll-Stonehouse ferry first operate?
What local airport closed in 2011?
In kilometers, how far away from the Plymouth city center was Plymouth City Airport?
By what year is the city airport planned to reopen?
Who intends to reopen the Plymouth City Airport?
When did Plymouth's railroad station open for service?
Who runs Plymouth's railroad station?
Along with the Tamar Valley Line, what local train service operates in Plymouth?
How many regional MPs have argued for the importance of Plymouth's train service?
Trains from what network sometimes operate out of Plymouth's railroad station?
On what date was the Dawlish sea wall damaged?
In feet, how much of the Dawlish sea wall was destroyed?
After the Dawlish sea wall was damaged, on what date did the line reopen?
In what month and year did storms affect the coastal line near Dawlish?
What percentage of Plymouth's population call themselves Christian?
What percentage of Plymouth residents follow Islam?
What percentage of Plymouth consists of non-religious people?
What percentage of people in the United Kingdom describe themselves as non-religious?
What was the percentage decline in Jewish residents of Plymouth between 2001 and 2011?
In what year was Union Street constructed?
Who performed at the New Palace Theatre in the 1930s?
How many pubs existed on Union Street in the 1930s?
What group famously enjoyed themselves on Union Street?
What notable event occurs each August?
In what month and year was the world record for simultaneous fireworks broken?
Who broke the world record for simultaneous fireworks?
What institution did Roy Lowry work for?
In what year did the Music of the Night begin?
What television station has its regional headquarters in Plymouth?
What regional ITV station serves Plymouth?
On what date did ITV Westcountry cease to operate?
With what channel did ITV Westcountry merge?
What BBC radio station operates in Plymouth?
What football league team is located in Plymouth?
What level of the football league does Plymouth Argyle F.C. operate in?
What is the home field of Plymouth Argyle F.C.?
What is the nickname of Plymouth Argyle F.C.?
What team plays its home games at Weston Mill?
When was the first Port of Plymouth Regatta?
In what month and year did Plymouth play host to the America's Cup World Series?
For how many days did the America's Cup World Series take place in Plymouth?
When did Plymouth begin receiving water from South West Water?
Who provided Plymouth's water prior to 1973?
When did Drake's Leat open?
From where did Drake's Leat draw water?
When did construction finish on Devonport Leat?
What body handles waste management in Plymouth?
Who oversees Plymouth's sewers?
Who distributes electricity in Plymouth?
In what year did Langage Power Station come on line?
What settlement is Langage Power Station located near?
When did the Plymouth Borough Police begin operation?
Where is the police divisional headquarters located?
How many fire stations are present in Plymouth?
Where in Plymouth is the Royal National Lifeboat Institution based?
What organization is the Plymouth Borough Police a part of?
What is Plymouth's National Health Service hospital?
In kilometers, how far is Derriford Hospital from the Plymouth city center?
What notable clinic is present in Derriford Hospital?
What organization provides ambulance transport for Plymouth?
Where is South Western Ambulance Service NHS Foundation Trust headquartered?
When did Ford Park Cemetery reopen?
Along with Efford, where else does the Plymouth City Council operate a cemetery?
What is the name of the private cemetery in Plymouth?
In lieu of headstones, what grave markers are used at Drake Memorial Park?
When did Ford Park Cemetery first operate?
In what year was the Royal Citadel constructed?
In the wake of what conflict was the Royal Citadel built?
When was Smeaton's Tower first constructed?
In kilometers, how far off the coast was Smeaton's Tower originally built?
What memorial commemorates the naval victory over the Spanish Armada?
What was the name of the port once situated on the land occupied by present day Plymouth?
When did the Pilgrim Fathers depart Plymouth for the Americas?
What monument commemorates the departure of the Pilgrim Fathers?
How many marine species are present at the National Marine Aquarium?
How many listed buildings are present in the Barbican area?
What structure was referred to as a "Palmerston's Folly"?
In what cardinal direction is Crownhill Fort located outside the city?
Who runs Crownhill Fort?
In what cardinal direction outside Plymouth is Devonport located?
How many waymarkers are present on the Devonport Heritage Trail?
Visitors to what region's beaches often stop at Plymouth?
Along with Whitsand Bay and Cawsand, what Plymouth-area beaches are popular with tourists?
Visitors to what local valley often stop over in Plymouth?
Who designed the Roland Levinsky building?
When did the Roland Levinsky building open?
Of what university is the Roland Levinsky building a part?
What academic discipline at the university is based in the Roland Levinsky building?
What part of Plymouth is the Roland Levinsky building situated in?
What are Plymouth residents commonly called?
What colloquial term is used for Plymouth residents?
After what figure are Janners named?
In Devon, Jan is another way of saying what common English name?
What was the birthplace of Sir Francis Drake?
What did the Spanish nickname Sir Francis Drake?
In what year did Sir Francis Drake die?
What was Sir Francis Drake's cause of death?
What notable artist and Royal Academician was born in Plympton?
What artist died in Plymouth in 2002?
Where did the creator of Mr Benn and King Rollo study?
What genre of music does John Surman play?
What local figure played in the bands AMM and MIMEO?
Where do the family of Michael Foot live?
What is the occupation of Trevor Francis?
What is the current nationality of former Plymouth resident Chris Axworthy?
What United States vice president did Donald Moffat play?
In what film did Donald Moffat play President Bennett?
What is Dawn French's job?
What is heresy mainly at odds with?
What is a person called is practicing heresy?
What religions and idea of thought is heresy cited as being used frequently in?
What cultures are listed as examples of discipline for being a heretic?
How many times is it suggested that you should warn people you are in disagreement with before parting ways?
What term is used to describe an individual in the early Church that introduced discord?
What word is used when speaking of correct teachings in contrast to a false teacher?
What culture and religion did Fathers of the Church correlate with heresy?
What religion were these Fathers of the Church?
Who suggested that it were the Jews that brought dissension into Christianity?
Who was the first Roman Emporor that was baptized?
What did Constantine the Great and Licinius pass to introduce toleration of Christianity in the Roman Empire?
What was the high priest in the College of Pontiffs called?
What were the meetings called that were hosted by Constantine that helped enforce orthodoxy by Imperial authority?
In what year was the first usage of the term heresy in a legal context?
Who intitiated Christianity to be a state church of the Roman Empire?
What was the church lacking before the edict that would allow them to legally counter heresy?
What did church authorities gain as a result of this edict?
What punishment is cited as church authorities being able to exact on individuals perceived as heretics?
Who was the first Christian individual to be sentenced to death by the church for heresy in Rome?
What happened to the people that sentenced Priscillian to death?
What religion is an example of Protestants killing for conviction of heresy after the Reformation?
Who was the last known person to be sentenced to death for the crime of heresy by the Roman Catholic Church?
From what passage is cited as being one of the first known examples of using the word heresy?
What is thought of to spiritually cut one off from the Church even before excommunication?
What book gives the definition of a heretic as anyone that does not follow the Catholic Church or the orthodox holy faith?
What groups are cited as being considered heretical by the Church before the 11th century?
What group moved westward to give rise to the famous 11th and 12th century heresy in western Europe?
What groups began to appear in northern Italy and southern France during the 11th century?
In what country did the Cathars grow to represent a popular movement?
What was started by the Roman Catholic Church to dispense of the Cathars in Languedoc?
What was a major reason and justification for the Europian wars of religion?
Who was brought before the Inquisition for heresy but renounced his beliefs and thus remained under house arrest for life?
What belief did Galileo have at the time that appeared to be extremely heretical to the church?
Who denounced Jewish People in many of his writings?
What were the Jews described as enemies of?
According to Pope St. Gregory what religion must you be in order to be a heretic?
In what culture of law were Jews and heretics often lumped together?
What area of Christianity commonly cited the first seven Ecumenical Councils in regards to heresy?
After what two events did various Christian churches also begin using the first seven Ecumenical Councils to identify heresy?
What beginning Christian heresies did the Orthodox Church also reject during this time?
What is the work called that Martin Luther created regarding Jews and heresy?
What term does Luther assign to the practice of Jewish Prayer?
What is said to be a special spiritual problem?
What event in England during the 16th century had an outcome of many deaths for heresy?
During what king's reign did 60 Protestants die for heresy?
What two notable figures are cited to have perished for refusing to give up the Church in England?
Under which king were the heresy laws repealed in 1547?
In what year was the last known person sentenced to death in England for heresy?
During which years did the execution of the Boston martyrs take place?
Which group was responsible for the deaths of the Boston martyrs?
What goal is cited as the reason these killings took place?
What rival group did the Anglican Puritans want purged from their area?
Which two groups viewed the Puritans themselves as nothing more than heresy?
What year did the deaths of heretics under Christianity come to an end?
Who was the last heretic put to death under the Catholic Inquisition?
Under which religion do charges of heresy still occur in modern times?
Which religion is cited as having problems with modern biblical criticism?
What belief of the Catholic Church criticizes writings without using the word heresy?
What event is stated as a reason why the word heretic is used less often in modern times?
Who was the author of the short story "The Theologians"?
What subject does the question of who has a monopoly on spiritual truth regard?
What group did Sultan Selim the Grim label as heretics?
What number of Christians did Selim the Grim equate to the killing of one Shiite?
What type of law is still in practice in which heresy results in execution?
What author was declared a heretic and had a bounty placed on his head by the government of Iran?
What does Orthodox Judaism regard Jews who depart from traditional practices as?
What alignment within Orthodox Judaism view individuals as heretics that reject Maimonides's 13 principles of Jewish faith?
Which wing of Orthodox Judaism is stated as having a more tolerant view of Conservative Judaism?
What term is used for the act of using Church of Scientology techniques in contrast to what Hubbard envisioned?
What institution has prosecuted groups that practice outside the official Church without permission?
What must be welcomed in areas for the term do be perceived as complimentary?
What did Isaac Asimov consider heresy as?
Which type of heresy is the scientific community well equipped to defend itself against?
What has heresy within the scientific community repeatedly become?
What is the title of the book published by Robert T. Bakker regarding mainstream opinion of dinosaurs?
What criticism did Robert T. Bakker share about the paleontologist community regarding the last fifty years?
What film did Robert T. Bakker's book reportedly influence?
What type of poses did the book's illustrations portray dinosaurs as?
What label is associated with Robert T. Bakker as a result of his work?
What label is associated with Immanuel Velikovsky due to his works outside the accepted discipline?
What medium did Immanuel Velikovsky not publish his works in that is accepted practice?
What two examples of ideas from Immanuel Velikovsky are stated as to have gained some acceptance?
By definition, what contrast does heresy depend on?
What figure of speech is the word heresy commonly used as in present day scenarios?
In which year was the Warsaw Pact established?
Which nation formed the nucleus of the Warsaw Pact?
Which conflict was the impetus for the formation of the Pact?
How many Soviet allied countries were members of the Warsaw Pact?
The acceptance of which country into NATO prompted the formation of the Warsaw Pact?
Which organization was in direct competition with the Warsaw Pact?
Which nation saw the most significant Warsaw Pact military deployment? 
What was the name of the Polish revolutionary movement which the Warsaw Pact failed to suppress?
Which country saw the largest Warsaw Pact deployment? 
In which year did the Warsaw Pact cease to function effectively? 
What was the name of the Polish labor movement which successfully defied the Warsaw Pact?
Despite being headquartered in Poland, the top-ranking operatives of the Warsaw Pact were from which country?
Which nation was in effective control of both political and military functions of the Warsaw Pact?
Which ideologies did the Soviet Union aspire to lead around the globe?
Which Soviet leader formed doctrine aimed at keeping socialist satellite nations in line?
The Soviet Union feared invasion from which potential enemy?
The formation of the Warsaw Pact was driven by fears of which country rearming itself?
Which country sought NATO admission in response to the fear of German rearmament?
The omission of which nation from involvement in the proposed security system led to its NATO opposition?
Who was the general who spoke out against the USSR joining NATO?
To what did the British general compare the USSR in his opposition to their joining NATO?
In what year did Konrad Adenauer first visit the United States?
Which NATO country feared a unified and rearmed Germany?
In which month of 1955 was this pact declared?
Which nation was permitted rearmament by the foundation of the Warsaw Pact?
What was the name of the East German armed forces?
How many countries formed the initial Warsaw Pact membership?
In which year did Mongolia seek entry in the Warsaw Pact?
In which year were Soviet forces scheduled to leave Mongolia? 
What was the focus of both alliances' policies towards the other in lieu of direct fighting?
Which continent was considered to be at the center of NATO/Warsaw Pact intrigues?
In which year did Hungary attempt to leave the Warsaw Pact?
Who was the head of the Hungarian government at the time of the revolt?
In which year was the Warsaw Pact activated in a joint action?
Which country did the Pact conquer?
Which former Eastern Bloc country was the latest to join NATO?
In which year did Poland join NATO?
In which year did Slovakia join NATO? 
What is materialism?
In nature, this is an essential substance?
What are some examples of philosophical physicalism?
Some people consider physicalism to be synonymous with what?
What class does materialism belong to?
What is the first question to ask in order to define the two classes?
What is the second question to ask in order to define the two classes?
An idealist considers what as the most important?
A materialist considers what as the most important?
What type of materialism defined the Marxist philosophy?
Who coined the Axial Age?
In what part of the world did materialism develop during the Axial Age?
What is the name of the novel written by Ibn Tufail?
Arthur Schopenhauer lived from what year to what year?
What did he say that the brain would decide?
Who wrote "The Essence of Christianity"?
In what year was "The Essence of Christianity" written?
What did the author of "The Essence of Christianity" consider religion to be?
The author's ideas would later influence what well known philosopher?
What is hyle?
Relativity illustrates that what is interchangeable?
Ontological theory suggests that what is the main substance?
Quantum field theory suggest what is the main substance?
Which model suggests that matter is 5% of the universe?
What type of matter does the model consider it to be?
Werner Heisenberg suggested that atoms are not what?
Digital physicists consider what to be more important than matter?
Based on the above definition, materialism is not consistent with what?
Neoplatonism describes divinity as what?
Which religious group strongly opposed the idea of Neoplatonism?
If you believe in idealism, you are disbeliving in what?
What 3 types of philosophies attempt to correct the problem with matter and energy without removing every belief about materialism?
Where were the actual origin of the Space Race?
What were German aerospace engineers experimenting with in the 1930's?
What engineer was recruited by Becker and Dornberger to join their secret program?
Which war in history did the Space Race begin to take root?
A secretive army installation began in Kummersdorf-West in what year?
After World War II what did the American, English and Soviet allies want to capture?
What military operation allowed the US to recruit the German engineer, Von Braun?
The US had captured what type of missiles during Operation Paperclip?
What professor began working on solid-fuel rockets since 1914?
Liquid-fueled rockets were developed in what year?
The  United States Army's White Sands Proving Ground is located where?
Von Braun and his associates were sent to  United States Army's White Sands Proving Ground in what year?
The first two-stage rocket was developed in what year?
The Army's new Redstone Arsenal is located in what city and state?
What year was the German rocket team moved to Alabama?
What year did the US lose its monopoly to the atomic bomb?
What type of bomb was first developed during the Cold War?
ICBMs is an abbreviation for what?
The SAC is an abbreviation for what US force?
During what decade, did a fear of communism oversweep the US?
How many casualties did the Soviet Union have during WWII?
The Soviet Union was first invaded by Nazi controlled Germany in what year?
Until what year, was the US the sole possessor of the atomic bomb?
In what year did Stalin order the development of ICBMs?
What type of military force did the US possess a much larger fleet than the Soviet Union?
Who began developing the  R-7 Semyorka rocket?
 R-7 Semyorka rocket resembled closely to what other missile?
When was the R-7 Semyorka rocket tested successfully?
The first satellite launched into space used what rocket?
The US Air Force began research of ICBMs in what year?
What type of rocket was first researched by the Air Force?
The MX-774 was tested in what year?
The Air Force PGM-11 Redstone rocket family was tested where?
The Atlas-A first launched on what date?
Who was president Dwight D. Eisenhower's press secretary?
The starting date for the Space Race was which date?
The civilian rocket and satellite project in the US was called what?
Project Vanguard launch failed on what date?
Cape Canaveral Air Force Station is located in what state?
in response to Project Vanguard's failed launch, what was the rocket the Soviet Union launched?
Who was the Senate's Majority Leader in 1958?
The National Aeronautics and Space Act was established in what year?
What was NASA called before it became NASA?
The first US satellite was launched on what date?
The Redstone Arsenal became the George C. Marshall Space Flight Center when?
Who was the first director in charge of the George C. Marshall Space Flight Center?
How many attempts to the Moon did Luna E-1-class probes fail before successfully launching?
The first probe to land on the Moon was in what year?
Which Luna probe successfully photographed the back side of the Moon?
The Ranger program from 1959 was managed by what organization?
The first spacecraft to make it to the Moon was what?
The first Ranger mission that didn't fail was which one?
The Block III Ranger 7 mission successfully reached the moon on what date?
What program led to the establishment of the Ranger program?
April 12, in the USSR, is what special day?
What year was established as the International Day of Human Space Flight by the United Nations?
Man in Space Soonest was a program by which organization?
Man in Space Soonest was reestablished as what in November 26, 1958?
The first American to travel into space was whom?
When did Alan Shepard first arrive in space?
The spaceship that carried Alan Shepard was named what?
The first person to have control over driving their spacecraft was whom?
Which president awarded Alan Shepard the NASA Distinguished Service Medal?
President Kennedy sent a letter on April 20, 1961 to who about the US's space program?
The speech by Kennedy, "Special Message on Urgent National Needs" was delivered on what date?
"We choose to go to the Moon" speech was given at what location in Texas?
The first American to orbit around the planet was whom?
When did John Glenn orbit the Earth?
Where did John Glenn land on Earth after coming back from orbit?
John Glenn's spaceship was named what when he orbited the Earth?
How many more Mercury missions were there after John Glenn's?
What first person from the USSR controlled their own spacecraft?
Gherman Titov from the USSR drove his own spacecraft on what date?
Radio communication was possible between which two spacecrafts in August 11 and 12, 1962?
The first woman that went into space was whom?
What spacecraft carried  Valentina Tereshkova, the first woman in space?
The first woman to launch into space was on what date?
The first woman to go into space was from which country?
At what event was the Vostok spaceship first displayed to the public ?
When did US President John F. Kennedy, in a speech, propose to join forces to reach the moon with the USSR?
President Kennedy was killed when?
How did US President Kennedy die?
What two locations in Florida were renamed after Kennedy by President Johnson?
Which two space programs were heavily worked on by President Johnson?
What year was the Gemini project confirmed?
How many people could the Gemini project carry?
On what date was the first successful three man astronaut crew?
The first flight in a spacecraft that allowed no suits to be worn inside was was?
The US Apollo Command Module flew without spacesuits in what year?
The Voskhod 2 carrying two humans was launched on what date?
Who was the first person to take a spacewalk?
Which of two Voskhod 2's occupants was almost killed?
Project Gemini helped recruit experienced people for which upcoming lunar missions?
Who created the circumlunar program called Zond?
Which type of craft were two astronauts to fly in during Zond?
The "Lunniy Korabl" or "LK" would carry how many people?
The Committee on the Peaceful Uses of Outer Space was established in what year?
The Committee on the Peaceful Uses of Outer Space was created by what organization in 1959?
A problem was resolved by whom when both the US and the USSR supported a cooperative space program?
The cooperative space program was passed on what date?
The Treaty on Principles Governing the Activities of States in the Exploration and Use of Outer Space was signed by three countries on what date?
Both crews were killed on which spacecraft missions in 1967?
The Outer Space Treaty was signed by the US and the USSR on what date?
What was the cause of the fire that killed everyone on the first Apollo mission before launch?
Who were the three people who died on the first Apollo mission before launch?
Who was the person credited with the first in-flight space death?
When did Vladimir Komarov die on impact from his spacecraft crash?
Apollo 7 launched from Earth on what date?
Who was in charge of the Apollo 7 mission on board?
The Soyuz 3 began its mission to space on what date?
When was the first successful docking of a two man space crew?
Which two space missions were the first to successfully dock each other?
Where was the Zond 4 over when it was destroyed by an explosion?
The first successful water landing in the Indian Ocean by the Soviets was was when?
What animal was carried aboard the  Zond 5?
The first Lunar Module was delayed to what date?
Which three people were the first to ride the Saturn V rocket into space?
What date did Frank Borman, James Lovell, and William Anders leave Earth on the Apollo 8 mission?
During what holiday, was the Apollo 8 mission broadcast from orbit?
Which ocean did the Apolo 8 mission land in?
How close to the ground was the Lunar Module in May 1969 during its landing test?
The Lunar Module completed its first low Earth orbit on what date?
The Soviet, N1 Rocket exploded and was destroyed on what date?
Apollo 11 mission was to land where on the Moon?
When did the Apollo 11 mission launch?
What state did the Saturn V rocket launch from?
When was the crew chosen to participate on the Apollo 11 mission?
How long did the trip to the Moon last for the crew of the Apollo 11?
The Lunar Module of the Apollo 11 was named after what animal?
Who was the first human to take a step on the Moon?
At what time on Earth did Armstrong first step onto the Moon?
How many people saw the first step onto the Moon?
When did they launch from the Moon to reattach to the Columbia?
When did the Apollo 11 mission land back on Earth?
Where did the Apollo 11 mission land back on Earth?
When was the second landing on the Moon successful?
When did the Apollo 14 mission land successfully?
Apollo 15 landed on the Moon on what date?
On what date was the Apollo 16 successful on landing on the Moon?
Apollo 17 landed on the Moon on which date?
Which year did the USSR cancel the N1 rocket program after two failures that didn't launch?
The USSR launched their first space station on what date?
Who made up the crew of the Soyuz 11?
The station, Salyut 1, came back to Earth on which date?
How long did the station, Salyut 1, stay in orbit?
Why did The Durable Orbital Station-2 not reach orbit?
The Skylab 1 was launched on which date?
How much did the Skylab 1 weigh?
When did the Skylab 1 finally come back to Earth?
Which two world leaders had negotiations that relieved the Cold War?
When did President Nixon and Brezhnev of the USSR end the Cold War?
ASTP stands for what?
Which Soyuz mission in December 1974 was to be used for the ASTP?
Soyuz 19 took off from Earth on what date?
Which Russian rocket carries passengers to and from the International Space Station?
The United States' National Defense Education Act was established in what year?
How far back does the history of pubs go back?
What was the Anglo-Saxon pup called? 
What is a pub tied to in the 19th century?
What Roman businesses were analogous to modern day pubs?
What similar establishments existed in the Anglo-Saxon world?
In what century did the tied house system develop?
What is the owner, tenant or manager of a pub known as?
What term came into use in Victorian times to designate the pub landlord?
Name one way  regulars choose their Pubs?
What is a proper term for the licensee of the pub?
What was the pub landlord often called in Victorian times?
What are pubs called by those who regularly visit there?
Teams for what sport can be found congregating at pubs?
What gaming tables can often be found in pubs?
What was the off-sales counter or attached shop for the sales of beers, wines and spirits for home consumption often referred to as? 
In what decade did pubs tend to cease selling alcohol for off-premises drinking?
What was the name of the counter where pubs traditionally sold alcohol to drink at home?
What was a colloquial term for the off-sales counter?
Along with high street chain stores and off-licenses, what stores undercut pub alcohol sales in the 1970s?
When did the inhabitants of the British Isles begin drinking ale?
With the Roman road network, what were the first inns called?
How did the alewife let people know that her brew was ready?
What did King Edgar decree in 965?
During what historical epoch did Britons begin drinking ale?
In what century did the Romans arrive in Britain?
What was the Latin term for the Roman inns?
In what century did the Romans leave Britain?
What color bush did an Anglo-Saxon woman raise to indicate that her ale was done brewing?
In the early Middle Ages, where could a traveler obtain overnight accommodations?
When were the Hostellers of London were granted guild status?
What name was taken by the Hostellers in 1514?
When did the Hostellers of London become a guild?
In what year did the Hostellers of London change their name to the Worshipful Company of Innholders?
Where did travelers early in the Middle Ages often find lodgings?
What religious activity was responsible for the growing demand for hostelries?
Where is an inn typically located?
In addition to providing for the needs of travelers what was another typical use for an inn?
How old are some of the inns in Europe?
Aside from lodging, what amenities are often offered at inns?
What road is an inn often located near?
How many thousand years ago did the Romans build their road system?
About how old are the oldest inns in Europe?
What role did inns serve other than housing travelers?
What amenity does an inn offer that pubs, alehouses and taverns usually do not?
In what nation's pubs is food often served?
Along with Southwark and The Tabard, what is a notable London inn?
In what country is "The Welcome Inn" frequently used as a name for pubs?
Aside from human beings, what creature's needs were traditionally seen to at inns?
What is the main service of an inn, now also attainable in motels, hotels and lodges?
What is the main provision that pubs offer?
What are customers seeking when they visit restaurants or taverns?
What is a noted hotel brand throughout North America?
In the United States, what are operators of lodgings sometimes called?
Along with the Inns of Chancery, in what inns did British lawyers historically conduct business?
In what city are the Inns of Chancery located?
Outside England, what other country does the legal system founded around the Inns of Court operate in?
What was the one ingredient of traditional English ale?
What country pioneered the introduction of hops for beer production?
In what century was the process of using hops to produce beer introduced to England?
In what century did the first independent breweries appear in England?
What businesses were the dominant brewers of beer in England by the close of the 17th century?
After what political upheaval was gin introduced to England?
What people introduced gin to England?
In what year did the Glorious Revolution occur?
How much more gin than beer was made in England in 1740?
In 1740, what fraction of London drinking establishments were gin shops?
What artist created the engraving Beer Street and Gin Lane?
What law imposed a high tax on gin shops and resulted in riots?
When were the Gin Act 1736 duties eliminated? 
What law placed gin shops under the control of local magistrates?
What law allowed the existence of beer houses?
In what way did small beer differ from regular beer?
What alcohol was regarded as evil when compared to beer?
What was the intention behind the passage of the Beer Act of 1830?
How many beer houses opened their doors in the inaugural year of the Beer Act?
How many beer houses existed throughout Britain eight years after the passage of the Beer Act?
In what year were additional licensing laws introduced for beer houses?
What establishments did beer houses become after buying an additional license?
By the end of what century were most beer houses closed?
Where are purpose-built pubs typically located?
What modern brewers often first began as beer houses?
Along with The Royal Oak and The Crown, what is a traditional name for a pub?
What is an example of a name for a beer house?
In addition to a license to sell spirits, what did tavern owners require a license to sell?
In what century did public drinking regulations first exist in England?
What party received income from the sale of public drinking house licenses?
In what century were the operating hours of drinking establishments first limited?
In what decade were the restrictions on public drinking establishment licenses loosened?
What bodies controlled drinking establishment licensing administration as of 2005?
Where can historical licensing records be examined?
Along with a public house's address, licensee, and the licensee's misdemeanors, what information was kept in licensing records?
What was the mandated closing time of pubs in Kensington in the 1960s?
What was the mandated closing time of pubs in Knightsbridge in the 1960s?
What is an example of an English city where breweries were run by the government?
In what year did the State Management Scheme cease?
On what days were Scottish and Welsh pubs often 'dry'?
Circa 2000, what was the latest pubs in Wales could be open until on every day but Sunday?
What was the latest legal closing time on Sundays in English pubs as of 2000?
How many hours per day were pubs located near Billingsgate fish market allowed to remain open?
In 2000, what was the earliest Welsh and English pubs could open on Sundays?
In 2000, what was the earliest Welsh and English pubs could open on any day but Sunday?
When were wartime licensing laws ended in Scotland?
What constituent countries of the United Kingdom's licensing laws were notably flexible?
When did the Licensing Act 2003 come into effect?
After the Licensing Act 2003, who determined the operating hours of pubs?
Due to the traditional closing hours, when was there often violence outside of pubs?
How many alcohol involved hospital admissions were there in 2006/7?
How many pubs applied to be allowed to sell alcohol 24 hours a day?
What is it called when the owner of a pub allows patrons to remain when the pub should have closed?
What law allows pubs to apply to extend their closing hours after 11pm?
A law of what year prompted the existence of the "lock-in"?
What action by a pub owner can result in his prosecution?
In what month and year was smoking banned in public places in Scotland?
When did Wales outlaw smoking in public?
What was the month and year when England banned public smoking?
What company took over Scottish & Newcastle's pubs?
What chain of pubs reported favorable profits in June 2009?
Along with cabaret, striptease, bands and drama, what is a type of stage performance that can be found in pubs?
Along with karaoke, what type of prerecorded music is often found in pubs?
In what decades did class distinctions break down in Britain?
What was a common way of removing the division between the saloon and bar?
What is another name for the smoke room?
What was the relationship between the price of beer in the smoke room versus the rest of the bar?
Along with the local police, what profession is given as an example of someone who might use the snug?
What were the windows in the snug made out of?
How many pubs were part of the CAMRA survey?
According to CAMRA, how many pubs in Britain possess classic snugs?
Who pioneered the circular bar?
At what establishment was the circular bar introduced?
What was Isambard Brunel's occuption?
What was Isambard Brunel's nationality?
What is a "beer engine"?
What is the function of a "beer engine"?
Who invented the beer pump in England?
In what city was the beer pump invented?
In what country was John Lofting born?
What was the death year of John Lofting?
When was John Lofting born?
In what newspaper did John Lofting mention his beer pump?
On what day was Lofting's fire engine patent published?
How many barrels did Lofting promise his beer pump would deliver hourly?
What location did John Lofting live near?
In what London borough did Nicholas Wall reside?
What was William Tillcar's profession?
What tavern did William Tillcar live adjacent to?
What is a common name for a beer pump powered by hand?
Along with electricity, what sometimes powers beer pumps that aren't operated by hand?
What was the name for a pub that could sell beer from more than one brewery?
In what century did the habit arise of pubs selling beer from only one brewery?
What was the name of the private individual who rented out a pub owned by a brewery?
Along with Punch Taverns and Weatherspoons, what was an organization formed as a result of the Beer Orders?
What is the name of a company that retails but does not manufacture drinks?
Along with breweries, what type of company may run a pub chain?
In what country was Punch Taverns established?
When a pub is bought by a new owner, what often happens to them?
What often happens to regional breweries after they sell their pubs?
What is the closest outlet for a brewery's beers called?
If the brewery tap is not located in the brewery, where is it usually located?
What is the term for a pub that brews and sells its own beer?
What is a frequent modern function of country pubs?
Along with community meetings, what was the traditional purpose of country pubs?
What is a blanket term for pubs that, for example, cater to sports fans?
What is an example of a theme pub that caters to people of a certain nationality?
What is an example of a theme pub that caters to people with certain musical interests?
What sort of theme pub would be likely to feature strippers?
In what sort of theme pub could one find visitors singing with musical accompaniment?
Which monarch required landlords to post a sign if they wanted to sell ale?
In what year did the king demand ale-sellers post signage on pain of forfeiture?
What was William Shakespeare's father's first name?
What was John Shakespeare's profession?
If an ale-seller refused to post a sign, what punishment would he receive?
In what historical period was a large portion of the population illiterate?
From where did pubs without written names derive their names?
Inscriptions from what language were sometimes present on pub signs?
Along with The Star and The Sun, what was a typical symbol used on a pub sign?
What graphic belonging to the local lord was sometimes incorporated on the pub sign?
What plants were sometimes featured on pub signs?
Local pub nicknames were often related to what profession?
What was an example of a battle that might lend itself to a pub name?
What town is The Crow and Gate located in?
What county is home to The Crow and Gate?
Members of what family were sometimes used as pub names?
What hangs today over most British pub doors?
What piece of information is almost always listed on a pub sign?
What purpose do stand-alone signs serve for country pubs?
What is an example of a memorable name for a pub chain?
What sort of theme is thought memorable for modern pub names?
What is the purpose of a pub name?
What type of pub signs were useful to an illiterate clientele?
After whom was the Marquis of Granby pub named?
Who was the father of John Manners, Marquess of Granby?
What was the military rank of the 3rd Duke of Rutland?
In what century did the 3rd Duke of Rutland live?
What were pubs licensed in 1780 named?
What game played in both Britain and America has become increasingly popular in pubs?
Along with Aunt Sally and ringing the bull, what is one of the obscure traditional games played in pubs?
Along with darts, skittles, dominoes and bar billiards, what is a well-known pub game?
Along with dominoes, on what pub game can you legally bet in the United Kingdom?
What table-based version of soccer is an increasingly popular pub game?
Along with slot machines, what is a modern game that is increasingly present in pubs?
What is a pub that plays pop and hip-hop music called?
At what sort of pub can you watch rugby union on television?
Along with Bat and trap, what game is popular in south London pubs?
What is the term for pub-based football that is often played on Sundays?
What sport is played on a pub's bowling green?
Dr. Feelgood and the Kursaal Flyers are examples of bands from what genre of music?
What genre of music was influenced by pub rock?
In what decade was Pub rock popular?
Pork scratchings, pickled eggs and salted crisps are examples of what type of food?
In London, what food vendors could often be found near pubs?
In what section of London can mobile shellfish stalls still be found today?
What seafood can often be purchased in jars at pubs?
During what decade did some British pubs provide "a pie and a pint"?
In what decade was the ploughman's lunch often consumed in pubs?
What decade saw the popularity of "chicken in a basket"?
What was "chicken in a basket" served in?
Along with chicken, what food was included in "chicken in a basket"?
What are foods like fish and chips and chicken wings called when they're served at a pub?
On what day do pubs sometimes offer free snacks?
What culture's cuisine is ploughman's lunch a part of?
During what decade did food become an important aspect of a pub's business?
Along with dinners, what meals do modern pubs often serve?
What is a term for pubs that serve restaurant-quality food?
Other than the bar, in what room might patrons of a pub eat?
What two words is 'gastropub' a portanteau of?
In what year was the term gastropub invented?
Along with David Eyre, who took over the Eagle pub?
In what city is the Eagle pub located?
In what area of London is the Eagle pub located?
How many pubs does the National Trust own?
In what city is the George Inn located?
What city is home to The Crown Liquor Saloon?
What part of the United Kingdom is Belfast located in?
What body maintains a National Inventory of notable pubs?
What pub in England is the highest above sea level?
In what county is the Tan Hill Inn located?
How many meters above sea level is the Tan Hill Inn?
In what settlement is the pub known as The Old Forge located?
In what country of the United Kingdom is the Old Forge pub located?
What pub holds the Guinness World Record as the oldest in England?
In what century was the building occupied by Ye Olde Fighting Cocks built?
Where is Ye Olde Trip to Jerusalem located?
When does Ye Olde Trip to Jerusalem claim to have been founded?
When was a pub documented as existing on the current site of the Nags Head?
Where is The Old Ferryboat Inn located?
How far back does the foundation of The Old Ferryboat Inn date?
When was ale first served at the site of The Old Ferryboat Inn?
When does The Bingley Arms claim to have been founded?
In what county is the Bingley Arms located?
When does the building housing Ye Olde Salutation Inn date back to?
Where is Ye Olde Salutation Inn located?
When does the building housing Ye Olde Man & Scythe date from?
When was a smoking ban passed in the United Kingdom?
In what year did the number of United Kingdom pubs generally start to decline?
Competition from what new form of establishment is sometimes blamed for the decline of pubs?
What business that sells cheap alcohol has sometimes been held to have resulted in the decline of pubs?
How many closed pubs did The Lost Pubs Project catalog?
In what year did Parliament inquire into the frequency of pub closures?
What did Parliament promise to pass as a result of increased pub closures?
What pub was associated with Samuel Johnson, perhaps erroneously?
Along with the Prospect of Whitby, what pub was Samuel Pepys associated with?
What writer was known to visit both the Cheshire Cheese and the Prospect of Whitby?
Along with the Prospect of Whitby and the Cheshire Cheese, what pub did Dickens visit?
What is the street address of The Fitzroy Tavern?
In what district of London is The Fitzroy Tavern located?
In what district of London is Pillars of Hercules located?
What real-life pub provided the model for Orwell's The Moon Under Water?
In what district of London is The Canonbury Tavern located?
Where is the Red Lion located?
What notable feature of the Red Lion reflects its parliamentary connection?
Who owned the Punch Bowl with Guy Ritchie?
In what district of London was the Punch Bowl located?
What pub was visited by Freddie Mercury?
At what pub did Ronnie Kray kill someone in 1966?
What pub is associated with some of Jack the Ripper's victims?
Outside what pub was David Blakely shot?
What is the present name of the former Crown and Anchor?
In what year did Joseph Stalin visit London?
At what pub did Thomas Paine write The Rights of Man?
In what district of London is The Angel located?
What writer mentioned The Angel pub in his writings?
What is the present status of the Angel pub?
Prior to becoming a pub, what did the Angel serve as?
Along with the Eagle and Child, at what pub did the Inklings regularly meet?
Where is the Eagle and Child located?
Along with J. R. R. Tolkien, who was a noted member of the Inklings?
Where is the Eagle pub located?
On what date did Francis Crick announce to an audience of pub-goers that he had discovered DNA?
What pub is feature on the British soap opera Coronation Street?
What pub is featured on EastEnders?
What channel is EastEnders broadcast on?
What channel is home to the soap opera Emmerdale?
What pub is featured on Emmerdale?
What would be a more accurate classification for many "British" pubs found outside Britain?
Traditionally, what was the popular term for a drinking establishment in English-speaking Canada?
In what decade did "bar" become the popular term for a drinking establishment in English-speaking Canada?
In the 19th century, what term was used in English-speaking Canada to describe a drinking establishment?
What body often runs pubs on the campuses of Canadian universities?
In what decade could one find an "English looking" pub trend in Canada?
While many, the perceptions of Christianity can sometimes what?
Regardless of beliefs, Christians all agree that Jesus has a unique what?
Whether one partakes in practices or beliefs, the label Christian is sometimes attached because they associate with what?
According to one report, how many Christians were in the world in 2010?
How many Christians were in the world in 1910?
If growth continues as it has, what religion will be the largest in the world by 2050?
Of all the Christians in the world, how many are Catholic?
Christians are the majority in how many countries and territories in the world today?
Where is the first reference to the word Christian in the Bible?
Who made the second reference to the word Christian in the Bible?
When verse was the third mention?
Kenneth Samuel Wuest believes that the Biblical Christian term referenced people who did not acknowledge who?
In what city did the term Christians start?
When Peter endorsed the term, the term Christian was used instead of what other term?
What is one of the first mentions of the term Christian in a non-religious work, referring to a tribe of Christians?
Which non-religious piece of literature had the term Christian in it towards the end of the first century?
Christians were said to be the scapegoat of who?
In Acts 24, what is another word that Christians are called?
What was Jesus called since he was from Nazareth?
What is another Hebrew term for Nazarenes?
Wha still calls Christians Notzrim?
While Christianity is ultimately one belief, a wide range of what is found among the different denominations and sects?
Who states that Christian believers agree that Jesus has a unique significance? 
Who wrote The Case Against Christianity?
How many historical Christian creeds did Martin write about?
What do Christians believe is the way to salvation?
What are the three creeds Martin studied?
Which term is in reference to people from a Christian culture?
Which term is indicative of people who place their faith in Jesus?
What description is used for Western people who do not follow the Muslim faith?
What term did the Malays use for the Portuguese Serani?
What does the term refer to now? 
How long have Christians made up nearly 1/3rd of the population?
Which Christian denomination has the most members?
How many people today are Roman Catholics?
More people belong to what religion than any other in the Western world?
What denomination of Christianity had the highest percentage of Nobel Prize winners between 1901 and 1972 in America?
What was the first name of Sony Music Entertainment, Inc?
In what year was it renamed Columbia Recording Corporation?
In what year was it known as CBS Records?
In what year did it land the name, Sony Music Entertainment?
In what year did SME merge with another company?
What was the name of the other company that SME merged with?
What did the company call themselves after the  merger?
In what year did Sony BMG Music Entertainment go back to being called SME?
In what year did ARC form?
In what year did Columbia Phonography Company form?
In what year did ARC take over Columbia Phonography Company?
Who bought out ARC?
In what year was ARC bought?
What did CBS call ARC after buying it?
Who was the head of CBS at the time?
Who convinced Paley to buy ARC?
In what year was Epic Records created?
What company created Epic Records?
Who was one of the creators of the National Academy of Recording Arts and Sciences?
What did Conkling later go on to lead?
What type of music was Date Records known for?
In what year was Mercury Records (US) bought out?
Who acquired Mercury Records (US)?
What is the name of CBS' Mexican record label?
What 4 areas of the country did Columbia Records have manufacturers in?
What lable was bought by CBS in the UK?
CBS began thinking of a name change to their record label in what year?
Date Records gave rise to the group "Peaches and Herb" in what year?
Date Records released what major success in 1969?
What place on the charts did Date Records' big success land on?
Despite the success, in what year did Date Records cease to exist?
Who ran CBS-Columbia Group starting in 1966?
In what year did CBS and Sony come together?
In what year did CDs come to the American market?
In what year was Clive Davis let go at CBS Records Group?
How many people signed a petition to boycott Sony Music in 2016?
What search engine company giant has Sony sent requests to regarding content on a website?
What website does Sony have complaints against?
In what year did Sony pull out of the Greek market?
What label for the Greek market were artists on under the Sony umbrella?
In what year did Sony shut down their offices in the Philippines?
What famous music producer became CEO of Epic Records?
Who joined the CEO of Epic Records in becoming the CEO of Sony Music?
In what year did he become the CEO of Sony Music?
Who became the CEO of RCA Records?
What labels did RCA disband in 2011?
Name 3 artists that CBS Associated Records signed on in the 80s and 90s?
In what year did CBS sell CBS Songs?
How much was the sale of CBS Songs?
Who were the 3 people who bought CBS Songs?
In what year was CBS the only network to also have a record company?
What label did ABC sell in 1979?
What label did NBC sell in 1986?
Who bought RCA?
In what year did SCA buy CBS Records?
Who was the biggest artist that CBS had?
How much did SCA pay for CBS Records?
In what year did the CBS Corporation begin another CBS Records?
Who distributes CBS Records material?
In what year did CBS Records buy out Tree International Publishing?
How much did CBS Records pay for Tree International Publishing?
In what city was Tree International Publishing located?
In what year did CEO of RCA/Jive Barry Weiss leave?
What company did Barry Weiss move to?
When did Barry Weiss become CEO of RCA/Jive?
When did Barry Weiss become head of Jive Records?
Who was promoted to Executive VP of Label Strategy in 2011?
Who became President of Global Digital Business and US Sales in 2012?
In what year did Sony and BMG Germany merge?
What labels strove to support indie labels and music rightsholders?
In what year did they partner in order to do so?
Who did Sony partner with to create the biggest deal ever?
How much was the partnership worth?
In what year was the partnership initiated?
Columbia Pictures has been owned by Sony since what year?
Who is the CCO of Sony Music?
In what year did the merger take place?
In what year did the name Sony Music Entertainment become the new name of Sony's record label?
In what year did CBS Associated become Epic Associated?
What is the only country where Sony has no rights to the Columbia label?
Who owns the rights to the Columbia label in Japan?
What is the capital of Oklahoma?
Which city is the largest in Oklahoma?
What was the population of Oklahoma city in 2014?
Which region is Oklahoma City a part of?
What offices employ US transportation and Air force bases?
What corridor is Oklahoma City situated in?
When was the city founded?
When was the Oklahoma City bombing?
What was the name of the building involved in the bombing?
What was the name of the land before being called Oklahoma City?
Who was an early leader of the city?
What year was Oklahoma city entered into the Union?
What was the capital of Oklahoma before Oklahoma city?
What route made Oklahoma city a major stop?
Who wrote the Jazz oldie "(Get Your Kicks on) Route 66"?
Which artist made Bobby Troup's song famous?
When was oil discovered in the city limits?
What routes used Oklahoma City as a major route change?
Who was the Oklahoma Cities  first female mayor?
When was Patience Latting elected?
What was the name of the redevelopment passage that was passed in 1993?
What is one thing that was added in this project?
How much money was invested in MAPS by 2010?
When was the Skirvin Hotel Renovated?
What is the name of the newly renovated site where the bombing occured?
What year did the memorial first opened?
What was the name of the project to change the location of I-40 and make a new entrance to the city?
What year was the Core to Shore project voted for to be part of the MAPS program?
How many square miles is Oklahoma City?
Out of the 620.34 square miles, how much of it is water?
Which region is Oklahoma city located in?
What river flows through Oklahoma city?
What is the new name for the part of the North Canadian River that resides within the city limits?
When was a dam built for the river?
What was built in the 1990's to help return water to the river near downtown?
What covers the remaining 377 square miles?
Which side is known for primarily being industrial?
Which side is more urban and fashionable?
What are two newly renovated locations in downtown Oklahoma city?
When is Oklahoma city sever weather season begin?
When does Oklahoma city sever weather season end?
Approximately How many tornadoes have reached the city limits?
How wide was the widest tornado ever?
When was the most rainfall for Oklahoma city?
How many households were in Oklahoma city?
What demographic was the most percentage of the households in total?
What is the average size for households?
What is the average size for families?
What is the second highest demographic for households?
What was Oklahoma cities median age in 2000?
Which gender was prominent in that time?
When did the population increases begin in Oklahoma city?
What was the estimated population of Oklahoma city in 2014
What is Oklahoma's largest urbanized area?
What place was Oklahoma cities population ranked in the nation in 2012?
When were six employees found dead in a restaurants freezer?
When was Roger Dale Stafford executed?
How many substations does Oklahoma city have?
Who detonated the bomb in 1995?
How many people were killed in the bombing?
How many people were injured in the bombing?
How much money was the damage worth?
When was Timothy McVeigh Executed?
How many universities are within the MSA region?
What hospital is in the MSA region
How many employees work for Tinker Air Force Base?
How many employees work for Norman Regional Hospital?
How many people work in University of Oklahoma?
What was Oklahoma cities gross metropolitan product in 2009?
What year did forbes list Oklahoma city as "recession proof".
When did Penn Square Bank go bankrupt?
What year did the oil crash?
When was the Wanda L Bass School of Music and auditorium opened?
What was the original name of the Science Museum of Oklahoma?
When was the International Photography Hall of Fame relocated?
How many animal skeletons are in the museum of Osteology?
When did The American Indian Cultural Center and Museum begin construction?
What is the name of Oklahoma Cities memorial?
What institute is located near the Oklahoma City National Memorial?
When was the Oklahoma History Center created?
Who operates the Oklahoma History Center?
Where is the Oklahoma History Center located?
What team is the affiliate to the Los Angeles Dodgers?
What is the name of the downtown arena?
Which team became the main tenant of the arena in 2008?
What is the name of the nearby minor league park?
What park hosts Quarter horse racing?
Where are equine events hosted?
What organization organizes High School football?
When did the Thunder start winning Northwest Division Titles?
Who is the Thunders head coach?
Who is the Thunders point guard?
Who designed the bridge?
What is the name of the amphitheater located inside the Botanical Gardens?
Which lake is the cities largest lake?
What place hosts concerts and lectures?
Where is the Lycan Conservatory located?
Which BMX Champion had a park named after them in Oklahoma City?
When was Mat Hoffman Action Sports Park considered one of the best by National Geographic Society?
Who is the mayor of Oklahoma City?
When was Mick Cornett first elected?
Who is the city Manager?
What was the original name of Oklahoma City University?
When was the university founded?
Which district is OU Medicine campus located in?
Which institution houses the Level-One trauma center?
Approximately how many people work in OU Health Sciences Center?
Which university is the third-largest in the state?
Which private university is located near the Edmond border?
What institution is accredited by the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools?
What is Oklahoma's largest school district?
What year did KIPP Reach College Preparatory School win the National Blue Ribbon Award?
Where is The Oklahoma School of Science and Mathematics located?
What are the two largest technology education schools in Oklahoma City?
What center is a nonprofit training center for disabled people?
Which newspaper is the most produced through the state of Oklahoma?
What is the name of The Oklahoman's website?
What is Oklahoma Cities newsweekly?
What is Oklahoma Cities daily business newspaper?
Which side is the Black Chronicles Headquarters?
What international newspapers is in the Asia District?
What is the name of the student newspaper?
What is the name of the lifestyle magazine?
What is another magazine that is published in Oklahoma City?
What was the third Radio Station in the US?
When was WKY granted a federal license?
When did E.K. Gaylord's Oklahoma Publishing Compan buy WKY Radio?
What is the current station called?
What rank is Oklahoma Cities television networks for Nielsen?
How many counties does Oklahoma Cities Networks cover?
What is one Major expressway that travels through Oklahoma City?
What boulevard turns into E.K Gaylord Boulevard?
Which airport is the busiest?
How many people travel through Will Rogers World Airport each year?
What is the name of the largest military base in the nation?
What is Oklahoma Cities transit company?
What is the name of the plan that is being made to enhance the bus system?
When was MAPS 3 passed?
How much will MAPS 3 cost?
What year should the streetcar become operable?
What is the states oldest and largest Hospital?
Where is the Children's hospital located?
Name a hospital owned by INTEGRIS Health?
When was INTEGRIS Baptist Medical Center part of U.S News and World Reports best Hospitals list?
Where is the Midwest Regional Medical Center?
How many doctors are there per 100,000 people?
What ranking was Oklahoma City in for the American College of Sports Medicine in 2010?
What kind of human lives by collecting wild flora and fauna?
What type of society relies on domestication for producing food?
What type of plants and animals do agricultural groups harvest?
What has been humans' best adaptation in food production?
What was the first way humans used to find food?
What stopped the widespread use of hunting and gathering?
What are the basic types of agricultural groups?
How many groups of modern hunter-gatherers are there?
What do modern hunter-gatherers use to produce food in addition to gathering?
Who uses agriculture and animal domestication to supplement their food?
Besides  agriculture, how do gatherers add to their food supply?
In addition to domesticated animals, how do gatherers supplement their food?
How did early humans locate meat without hunting ?
In addition to finding already dead animals, what other cause of death were their animal finds?
Where did hunter-gatherer peoples live?
What type of area did early humans avoid?
When did human populations begin using hunting-gathering?
What phase of human used subsistence strategies to find food?
When did Homo sapiens begin using subsistence gathering?
When did hunting-gathering begin to fade from use?
What began replacing hunting-gathering at the end of the Mesolithic period?
During what period did hunter-gatherers begin to focus food collection on a more limited range?
How many years ago did hunting-gatherers start specializing in their collection practices?
What was the change in gathering?
When did the use of agriculture begin it's spread?
In what kind of area did forest gardening start?
In what other types of areas did forest gardening show up?
What kind of plant did these early gardeners seek out?
What use did forest gardeners put to tree and vines to?
What did these gardeners do about unwanted species?
Who expanded into the territory of hunter-gathers?
What did the increase in agricultural areas produce?
What were the Fertile Crescent and Ancient India ?
What type of expansion was it in places like the Fertile Crescent?
Why did agricultural societies push into hunter-gatherer areas?
What type of areas do modern hunter-gathers live in?
How many modern hunter-gatherer cultures are there?
What do people basically rely on now?
Who lives in areas not usable for agriculture?
What kind of food production is worldwide now?
What is the lifestyle of hunter-gatherers?
What is the permanence of hunter-gatherer settlements?
What kind of building materials do they use?
What kind of natural structure do hunter-gatherers use?
What is the movement ability of hunter-gathers?
What kind of area allowed a more permanent settlement?
What is the life style of the indigenous people of the Pacific Northwest?
What does a lush environment allow hunter-gatherers to be?
What kind of environment is the Pacific Northwest?
What are the indigenous peoples of the Pacific Northwest?
What is the social style of hunter-gather societies?
 Where do people who are an exception to egalitarianism live?
what group of hunter-gatherers are nearly all egalitarian?
How is it interesting to view hunter-gatherers' egalitarianism?
What do chimpanzees act like as pertains to being egalitarianism?
How do chimpanzees arrange themselves in a group setting?
What is the dominate one in a chimpanzee group?
What permanent group representative do hunter-gatherers not have?
Initiative within the group depends upon what factor?
What group arrangement is usual in family authority?
What is the kinship and decent system among hunter-gatherers?
What value system do Western scholars tend to use in analyzing societies?
Who does most of the gathering in a hunter-gatherer society?
What group members are the big game hunters?
What does the argument over women as gathers said to produce ?
How is childcare viewed in a hunter-gatherer society?
How is labor often divided in these groups?
What percentage of Aeta women hunt?
What is the success rate of Aeta female hunters?
What is the success rate for male Aeta hunters?
At what conference did Richard Borshay speak?
When was the Man the Hunter conference?
Why is there a lessening of material possessions in hunting and gathering groups?
What can decreased material possessions produce in a hunter-gatherer society?
What other characteristic is variable for these groups?
Who called hunter-gathers the original affluent society?
When did Ross Sackett study time and energy for hunter-gartherer groups?
How long a day do people in other societies work?
What other characteristic of group behavior is needed in a hunter-gatherer society?
What is the basis of a hunting an gathering economy?
What is the only important factor in hunter-gatherer tool choices?
What does climate produce in hunter-gatherer societies?
What is the threat that extreme temperature causes in environment?
What does temperature impact on tool kits?
What is Torrence's 1989 theory about that ties into tool kit variability ?
What  does the immediate return system mean?
To what kind of group does the delayed return system belong?
Which group eats their acquired food in a day or two?
How do modern hunters and gathers differ from early ones?
What type of conditions are not present in modern societies?
Where do you find groups that represent pristine conditions?
What do modern hunter-gatherers not reflect?
What is hunting and gathering argued to be?
What situation can cause food stresses that make hunting-gathering necessary?
What change from hunting and gathering to agriculture is not easy to mark?
Besides the use of agriculture, what other factor clouds the issue of the transition from hunting and gathering to agriculture?
How long has this cultural diffusion been happening?
If they're not purely hunter-gatherers, then what do they have a history of being?
What caused these one-time agriculturalists to become foragers??
What kind of upset could force agriculturalists into being foragers?
Besides economic troubles, what else could push a people into foraging?
What can be learned from the study of modern hunter-gatherers?
Who thinks that it is useless to study modern foragers since the real ones are gone?
What type of hunter-gatherer has disappeared ?
What do hunter-gathers intentionally manipulate?
How do they manage the landscape?
What technique do they use to make animal habitats?
What is the manipulation of the landscape associated with?
What do modern hunter-gatherers depend on at least somewhat?
What is the name of the Spinifex people?
Where do the Pila Nguru people live?
Who refuses contact with outsiders on Sentinel Island?
Where are the Sentinelese and the Andaman Islands?
What kind of climate occurred in the Americas?
What disappeared during the Archaic period?
What became the norm for the mobile bands?
What did they rely less and less on?
What was there a pattern of in this period?
What is the current name of the United Nations Fund for Population Activities?
UNFPA's work concerns what general area?
One of UNFPA's goals is to make all pregnancies what?
Another of UNFPA's goals is to make all childbirths what?
What, in addition to its work against obstetric fistula, is UNFPA campaigning against?
In how many geographic regions does UNFPA operate?
About what fraction of UNFPA's staff do field work?
UNFPA is part of what larger U.N. group?
UNFPA groups what area in the same geographic region as the Arab States?
When did UNFPA begin its work?
What was UNFPA's original name?
When did the organization change its name?
UNFPA was originally administered by what U.N. body?
When was UNFPA moved to being under the authority of the United Nations General Assembly?
When did the U.N. vote to adopt the Sustainable Development Goals?
How many countries adopted the Sustainable Development Goals?
How many Sustainable Development Goals are there?
The Sustainable Development Goals are intended to change the world over what time period?
Are the Sustainable Development Goals considered ambitious or modest in scope?
The third of the goals concerns what?
What does the fourth goal focus on improving?
What is the topic of the fifth goal?
UNFPA is the largest worldwide funder of what type of programs?
In how many countries does UNFPA operate?
In addition to working directly with governments, with whom does UNFPA work?
What supports UNFPA's work?
The Fund's programs support women, men, and who else?
UNFPA lists elements that promote what human right?
These elements concern health related to reproduction and what else?
What is the third element?
Where does The Fund work to raise awareness and provide support?
To what does The Fund advocate that close attention be paid?
What two things does The Fund help developing nations formulate to support sustainable development?
Who took up leadership of The Fund in January 2011?
The Fund is represented by a Patron and who else?
UNFPA's mission is to promote the rights and health of whom?
With whom does UNFPA work in partnership?
With what sort of agencies does UNFPA work?
In addition to mobilizing support and resources, what does UNFPA do with its partners?
Who does UNFPA work with in addition to government and U.N. agencies?
UNFPA has  been accused of supporting what type of abortion?
UNFPA has been accused of supporting programs that coerce what?
What groups have made these accusations against UNFPA?
Controversy regarding these accusations has caused conflict with how many presidential administrations?
During what period did UNFPA aid Peru's reproductive health program?
Peru was found to have been coercing what?
UNFPA responded to Peruvian abuses by calling for what?
UNFPA's goal in Peru was to protect whose rights?
After the scandal became public, what did UNFPA work to reform in Peru?
Which country was administering forced abortions?
How many people were on the U.S. fact-finding team?
Which U.S. department investigated the allegations?
What policies did a State Department official accuse UNFPA of helping China carry out?
What was this official's position at the time?
Who was the official that accused UNFPA?
What was UNFPA accused of contributing to the Chinese program?
What papers reported on this incident?
Which representative criticized the the State Department investigation?
The representative said that inspectors had been show what sort of villages?
Which former director defended UNFPA?
Which NGO investigated the Chinese program in 2005?
What sort of techniques did the State Department conclude were still being employed by China?
Which government official blocked funding to the UNFPA?
What was the name of the official who blocked UNFPA funding?
How much funding was blocked?
Which branch of government denied the UNFPA funding?
How had the UNFPA funding been initially approved?
Which European government contributed the most to the UNFPA in 2008?
Which European government contributed the least to the UNFPA in 2008?
Which non-European donor was most important to the UNFPA in 2008?
In 2008, over how many countries contributed to the UNFPA?
What is one country in which nonprofit organizations try to make up for the loss of United States funding for the UNFPA?
What kind of organization is Friends of UNFPA?
What was Friends of UNFPA's previous name?
What type of United States funding does Friends of UNFPA try to replace? 
Through what sort of donations does Friends of UNFPA raise money?
Which president began funding UNFPA again?
In what year did U.S. funding of UNFPA resume?
In what month did U.S. funding of UNFPA resume?
The president said the U.S. would be joining how many donor nations?
The president said funding the U.N. Population Fund would help in how many countries?
Which group originally created the Soviet state?
Who led the group which created the Soviet state?
Which government was overthrown during the October Revolution?
How long did the new Russian Soviet state go unrecognized by other countries?
What name did people opposed to the Bolsheviks use for the Soviet state?
Who was the leader of the Bolsheviks in 1917?
What body was overthrown by the October Revolution?
For how long did the Soviet Union go unrecognized?
What derisive label was given to the USSR by the enemies of the Bolsheviks?
When was the Soviet Union created?
How many republics were in the USSR?
What name for Russia was listed in the Soviet Constitution?
When did the Soviet Union include the final Russian name for its republic in the Constitution?
In which war was Russia involved in 1700?
On what date was the Soviet Union created?
How many republics made up the USSR by the end of 1922?
In what year was the name Russian Soviet Federative Socialist Republic adopted?
What document renamed the country the Russian Soviet Federative Socialist Republic?
In what year was the Great Northern War fought?
When did the Soviet Union break up?
Which name did Russia take after the fall of the Soviet Union?
What is the current official name of Russia?
When was the current name for Russia added to the Russian constitution?
When was Russia renamed the Russian Federation?
What event led to Russia being renamed the Russian Federation?
When was Russia made an official state name of the Russian Federation?
What 1993 document confirmed Russia as an official state name of the Russian Federation?
Which country did the RSFSR border on the west?
Which countries did the RSFSR border on the northwest?
Which countries did the RSFSR border on the southeast?
Which Soviet countries did the RSFSR border on the south?
Which Soviet countries did the RSFSR border on the west?
What country borders Russia on the west?
Along with Norway, what country borders the RSFSR on the northwest?
In the USSR, what SSR did the RSFSR border along with the Kazakh SSR?
Along with the Mongolian People's Republic and the People's Republic of China, what country did the RSFSR border to its southeast?
When did the Soviet regime first become powerful?
Which government was in power before the Soviet regime?
Which revolution led to the Soviet regime's rise to power?
How long was the state of the Soviet regime unrecognized by other countries?
What was the name of the republic the Russian Provisional Goverment ruled?
When did the Soviet government assume power?
What event led to the assumption of power by the Soviet government?
What body governed Russia prior to the Soviet government?
In months, for how long was the new Soviet state unrecognized?
Which official name was Russia given at the start of 1918?
To which country did Russia give land during World War I?
Which treaty did Russia sign in order to give land and gain peace during World War I?
What war resulted in Russia shrinking further during 1918?
What numbered meeting of the All-Russian Congress of Soviets occurred on January 25, 1918?
On January 25, 1918, what was the official name given to the Soviet state?
What did Russia receive in return for signing the Treaty of Brest-Litovsk?
On what date was the country renamed the Russian Socialist Federative Soviet Republic?
During what 1918 conflict did states secede from Russia?
Which oblast was broken up in 1943?
Where were the Karachays sent after their oblast was broken up?
Which SSR received the land of the Karachays' oblast?
Who broke up the Karachays' oblast?
Who eliminated the Karachay Autonomous Oblast?
When was the Karachay Autonomous Oblast ended?
To where were the Karachays exiled?
Why were the Karachays exiled?
What republic was the territory of the Karachay Autonomous Oblast transferred to?
On what date was the RSFSR established?
What event led to the establishment of the RSFSR?
In what year was the Constitution adopted?
The Treaty on the Creation of the USSR was signed in what year?
How much of the USSR's electricity was produced in the RSFSR?
What two countries produced more petroleum than Russia in 1961?
How many students were in institutions of higher education in Russia in 1974?
How many institutions of higher education did Russia possess in 1974?
In how many languages were students in institutions of higher education being educated in 1974?
On what date was the Declaration of State Sovereignty adopted?
Who became president on June 12, 1991?
On what date were the Belavezha Accords signed?
When did the Russian Parliament ratify the Belavezha Accords?
What agreement did the Belavezha Accords supersede?
What was the new name given to the RSFSR on December 25, 1991?
On what date was the USSR dissolved?
What body was responsible for the dissolution of the USSR?
What house of the Supreme Soviet was not functioning as of December 26, 1991?
What was one right of the Soviet government that the government of Russia assumed?
On what date was the state named the Soviet Russian Republic?
What body renamed the state the Soviet Russian Republic?
When was the Treaty of Brest-Litovsk signed?
The Treaty of Brest-Litovsk ceded land to what state?
What document renamed the state the Russian Socialist Federative Soviet Republic?
What treaty resulted in the recognition of the RSFSR by Latvia and other states?
Along with Estonia, Latvia, Finland and Lithuania, what state recognized the RSFSR in 1920?
What percentage of the RSFSR was made up of plains?
In what part of the RSFSR did tundra mainly exist?
Along with petroleum and iron ore, what resource was abundant in the RSFSR?
On what date was the Treaty on the Creation of the USSR passed?
What body passed the Treaty on the Creation of the USSR?
Along with the Ukrainian Soviet Socialist Republic and Byelorussian Soviet Socialist Republic, what state joined Russia to form the Soviet Union?
On what date was the 1924 Soviet Constitution adopted?
What body adopted the 1924 Soviet Constitution?
What was Soviet Russia called as of 1937?
What document changed the name of Russia in 1937?
What state was dissolved on March 3, 1944?
Who ordered the deportation of the residents of the Chechen-Ingush ASSR?
Why were the residents of the Chechen-Ingush ASSR deported?
Along with the RSFSR, what republic received territory from the former Chechen-Ingush ASSR?
What was the Tuvan People's Republic renamed when it joined the RSFSR?
On what date did the Tuvan People's Republic join the Russian SFSR?
What did the former Tuvan People's Republic become in 1961?
Along with Estonia, what country was taken over by the Russian SFSR in 1944?
What modern districts of Estonia and Latvia were annexed by the RSFSR in 1944?
Near what town did the RSFSR annex territory in 1944?
Along with Sakhalin Island, what islands were occupied by the Soviets after the Second World War?
What administrative division did Sakhalin Island become a part of?
The ownership of what islands are disputed with Japan?
Who was demoted on February 8, 1955?
To what position was Malenkov demoted?
What position was held by Nikita Khrushchev?
Who benefited from the demotion of Malenkov?
When was the Chechen-Ingush Autonomous Soviet Socialist Republic transferred from the Georgian SSR?
What territory was transferred along with the Chechen-Ingush Autonomous Soviet Socialist Republic?
Who transferred the Chechen-Ingush Autonomous Soviet Socialist Republic in 1957?
To what republic was the Karachay Autonomous Oblast transferred in 1957?
What republic had the Karachay Autonomous Oblast previously been a part of?
On what date was the Declaration of State Sovereignty of the Russian SFSR adopted?
What body passed the Declaration of State Sovereignty of the Russian SFSR?
What was the name of the period inaugurated by the passage of the Declaration of State Sovereignty of the Russian SFSR?
What government was the Russian Federation fighting against during this period?
On what date was the Communist Party of the Russian SFSR suspended?
Who signed the decree suspending the Communist Party of the Russian SFSR?
On what date was the Communist Parties of the USSR banned from operating in the RSFSR?
Aside from Yeltsin, what notable figure was present at the signing of the August 23 decree?
In what country is Viskuli located?
On what date was the Agreement on the Establishment of the Commonwealth of Independent States signed?
What is another name for the Agreement on the Establishment of the Commonwealth of Independent States?
What body ratified the Belavezha Accords on December 12?
The Belavezha Accords consisted of how many articles?
What political organization controlled the RSFSR up to 1991?
What event prompted the end to the control of the Communist Party of the Soviet Union in the RSFSR?
Who suspended the Communist Party of the Russian Soviet Federative Socialist Republic?
Which company is directly above Universal Studios?
Which company runs NBC Universal?
What is the nickname given to the large studios of which Universal is a part?
When was Universal Studios created?
Where does Universal's filming take place?
What is another name for Universal Studios Inc.?
Who is the ultimate owner of Universal Studios?
What is the street address of Universal Studios' production studios?
In what city and state are its production studios located?
In what city are Universal Studios' corporate offices located?
After a trip to what city did Carl Laemmle leave the dry goods business?
In what year was the Motion Picture Trust created?
What notable historical figure was involved in the Motion Picture Trust?
For what part of a motion picture projector did the Motion Picture Trust hold a patent?
What company did Laemmle found in June 1909?
Who were Laemmle's business partners in the Yankee Film Company?
In what city and state was the Independent Moving Pictures Company based?
What was a nickname of Florence Lawrence?
What actor did Laemmle promote?
On what date was the incorporation of the Universal Film Manufacturing Company?
In what state was the Universal Film Manufacturing Company incorporated?
Who was the president of the Universal Film Manufacturing Company circa July 1912?
What was the fate of the other partners of the Universal Film Manufacturing Company?
Along with exhibition and distribution, what business did the Universal Film Manufacturing Company engage in?
Who directed Blind Husbands?
In what year was Foolish Wives produced?
Who starred in The Phantom of the Opera?
What year saw a film version of The Hunchback of Notre Dame?
Who was at one time Laemmle's personal secretary?
What was the name of Universal's German production unit?
Who ran Universal's German production unit?
In what year did Deutsche Universal-Film AG open?
How many films did Universal's German subsidiary make yearly?
Along with Germany and Austria, where was Deutsche Universal-Film AG at one time based?
what was the policy that Universal followed in its early years?
By what month and year did Laemmle change his opinion on "unclean pictures"?
Why did Laemmle change his position on "unclean pictures"?
Along with Walt Disney, who created Oswald the Lucky Rabbit?
Who owned the rights to Oswald?
Who produced an Oswald the Lucky Rabbit motion picture?
What character did Walt Disney create in 1928?
What was the first animated short with synchronized sound?
Who bought the Oswald the Lucky Rabbit cartoons in 2006?
Who was 2006 seller of the Oswald cartoons?
What notable figure worked as a sportscaster for ABC?
Who began producing Oswald cartoons for Universal in 1929?
In what year did Walter Lantz cease producing Oswald cartoons for Universal?
What was Carl Laemmle Jr.'s nickname?
What movie was based on an Edna Ferber novel?
In what year was the musical Broadway produced?
What movie won the 1930 Academy Award for Best Picture?
What all-color musical did Universal make in 1930?
In what year did Universal make a film version of Dracula?
In what year was The Invisible Man made?
What film was produced by Laemmle in 1934?
In what year did My Man Godfrey premiere?
When was Universal's version of Frankenstein made?
What part of Universal's business was terminated while it was in bankruptcy?
Along with distribution and studio operations, what part of Universal was retained by Carl Laemmle, Jr. during bankruptcy?
In what year was Universal's ill-fated film version of Show Boat released?
In what year had Universal previously made a version of Show Boat?
What was the amount of the production loan Universal sought to complete Show Boat?
Who granted Universal the production loan?
When did the Standard Capital Corporation take control of Universal?
Who became president of Universal after the Standard Capital takeover?
What notable female star left Universal after the Standard Capital takeover?
Who was Universal's chairman of the board of directors after the Standard Captial takeover?
Along with Margaret Sullavan, what notable film talent left Universal after the Standard Capital takeover?
In what year was Show Boat released?
Who produced the film Three Smart Girls?
Who starred in the film Three Smart Girls?
In what year was Three Smart Girls made?
Prior to his work in America, where was Joe Pasternak employed?
What type of films did Joe Pasternak produce in Germany?
How old was Gloria Jean in 1939?
Along with Donald O'Connor and Bing Crosby, with whom did Gloria Jean star?
Who played Destry in Destry Rides Again?
Prior to working at Universal, what studio employed Marlene Dietrich?
In what year was Destry Rides again produced?
What two performers were known as the team Abbott and Costello?
What military comedy did Bud Abbott and Lou Costello star in?
Along with Abbott and Costello and Edgar Bergen, what radio star appeared in Universal films?
What was the first Universal film to use the three-strip Technicolor process?
What actress starred in Arabian Nights?
Along with Nelson Eddy, who starred in the Phantom of the Opera?
When was Universal's first version of the Phantom of the Opera made?
In what year was Arabian Nights produced?
In what year was United World Pictures founded?
What producer was involved in the founding of United World Pictures?
How long did United World Pictures last?
Who was the head of production at Universal-International Pictures?
Who was William Goetz's father-in-law?
In what year was The Killers produced?
What Universal-International film was about a talking mule?
In what year was Ma and Pa Kettle made?
What Abbott and Costello film was released in 1948?
Who bought Rank's share of Universal-International?
Who did many of Universal-International's Arabian Nights films feature?
Who notably produced monster and science fiction films for Universal?
What Universal director was known for his melodramas?
Who directed monster movies for Universal?
Who produced melodramas for Universal?
Who was a notable talent agent circa 1950?
What star did Lew Wasserman represent?
What actor featured in Winchester '73?
What legal decision resulted in movie studios letting their contract actors go?
In what year did MCA take over Universal?
What company did MCA create in 1964?
What new name was given to Revue Productions in 1966?
What was the company formed by the merger of Universal and NBC?
When did Universal inaugurate its studio tour subsidiary?
Who partnered with Universal in the creation of Cinema International Corporation?
In what year was the film Airport made?
What Universal hit film was produced in 1974?
What company was purchased by MGM in 1981?
When did United International Pictures start distributing films for DreamWorks?
Who was the head of MCA in 1990?
What is the current name of the company that was called Matsushita Electric in 1990?
How much did Matsushita Electric pay for MCA?
In what year was MCA/Universal Home Video Inc. created?
What was the nationality of Matsushita Electric?
What percentage of MCA/Universal did Matsushita Electric sell five years after acquiring the company?
To whom did Matsushita sell a large share of MCA/Universal?
How much did Seagram pay to buy a large share of MCA/Universal?
What did Seagram sell to finance their purchase of a share in MCA/Universal?
What company did Seagram buy in 1999?
Who was the head of Seagram?
Who bought the USA cable network from Seagram?
Who bought Seagram in June 2000?
What was the budget of the film Love Actually?
What StudioCanal film received an Academy Award nomination?
Who bought 80% of Vivendi Universal Entertainment in 2004?
What percentage of NBC Universal was owned by Vivendi until 2011?
Who bought 51% of NBC Universal in 2011?
In what month and year did Comcast buy 49% of NBCUniversal?
How much did Comcast pay for 49% of NBCUniversal in 2013?
In what year did Paramount Pictures purchase DreamWorks?
What Universal chairperson headed DreamWorks as of 2006?
Who became the chairperson in late 2009?
Who was the founder of Universal Partnerships & Licensing?
Who became chairperson of Universal Pictures in September 2013?
Universal's deal with what company ended in 2013?
With whom did Universal sign a marketing and distribution deal in July 2013?
How many years is the deal with Legendary Pictures intended to run?
In what year did Universal's deal with Legendary Pictures begin?
What film studio was brought back in May 2015?
What division of NBCUniversal revived Gramercy Pictures?
What genre of films will Gramercy be responsible for creating?
In what year did Universal release three billion-dollar films?
Along with Jurassic World and Furious 7, what billion-dollar film was released by Universal in 2015?
How many studios have released three billion-dollar films in one year?
What were his relatives known for working on?
What was interesting about his mother and wife?
What year did Bell get the patent for his telephone?
In what country did Bell patent his telephone?
What did Bell never put in his study?
How many people started the National Geographic Society?
Bell was the second president of what magazine?
What field did Bell later work in, apart from optical telecommunications and aeronautics?
What year did Bell become President of the National Geographic magazine?
What sort of things did Bell collect as a child?
Who was Bell's closest friend as a child?
What sort of mill did Bell's neighbors run?
Bell's dehusking machine combined what with nail brushes?
What was Bell's reward for his dehusking machine?
Bell was gifted at art, poetry, and what?
What did Bell succeed at without being taught?
How old was Bell when his mom started to go deaf?
What part of his mom's head would Bell talk into?
What did Bell research because of his mom's deafness?
Where did Bell's uncle live?
What was Bell's father most famous for publishing?
Bell learned to accurately read lips even without knowing what?
The Standard Elocutionist was printed how many times?
In what year did Bell's father take him to see an automaton?
Who created the automaton Bell saw?
What did the automaton mimic?
Bell built his own automaton with who?
What part of the automaton did Bell create?
What living thing did Bell use in his research?
What was Bell's pet's name?
What phrase did people believe Bell's dog could say?
Bell investigated resonance using what?
What did Bell  instruct his dog to do?
Who did Bell get to read his work?
What country was doing work similar to Bell's?
Who wrote The Sensations of Tone as a Physiological Basis for the Theory of Music?
How old was Bell when he wrote his paper?
What fictional character is based on Alexander Ellis?
By what means did Bell conclude vowel sounds could be made?
What else besides vowels did Bell decide could be created?
What language was Bell happy he couldn't read?
What did Bell think he didn't know well enough?
In what year did the Bell's move to London?
Where did Bell go in work in 1865?
What building was Bell in?
How did Bell sign his letters?
In what year did Bell move home?
What city is Susanna E. Hull located in?
What sort of student attended Susanna E. Hull?
Who died in 1870?
Where did Bell's father go to recover from illness?
What did Bell help his final student get rid of?
How old was Bell when he went to Canada?
What boat did Bell travel on?
In what Canadian city did Bell first arrive?
What city did Bell arrive at by train?
How many acres was the farm the Bell's bought in Canada?
What building did Bell use as a workshop?
What did Bell call his special spot in the back of the property?
What Native American language did Bell learn?
What special status did Bell get in the Mohawk tribe?
Where was the Six Nations Reserve located?
What did Bell rework to send music?
What is a melodeon a kind of?
When did Bell go to Montreal?
Who went with Bell to Montreal?
How did Bell's reworked melodeon send music?
Who ran the Boston School for Deaf Mutes?
What name does the Boston School for Deaf Mutes go by now?
What month did Bell go to Boston?
Bell trained who in Boston?
What city was the American Asylum in?
How many wires did Bell send a signal through?
For  his system to work, Bell had to change what about each code?
Bell needed to fix both the transmitter and what?
Where was Bell's home?
What city did Bell decide to return to?
In what year did Bell open his own school?
How many people were in Bell's first class?
Which of Bell's students is the most well known?
With what school did Bell get his next teaching job?
What was Bell's discipline?
What did Bell do late at night?
What health condition did Bell start to have?
In what year did Bell start to focus on research into sound?
Bell's two remaining students were "Georgie" Sanders and who?
What was Georgie's father's name?
What disease made Mabel deaf?
How old was Mabel when she became deaf?
On what material did the phonautograph operate?
What kind of reed did Bell want to play with?
What did Bell believe the reeds would turn the signal into?
What instrument is a phonautograph similar to?
In what year was Bell really working on his telegraph?
What business was William Orton in charge of?
In 1874 the telegraph was known as the what of commerce?
What was the primary motivation for not building new telegraph lines?
Thomas Edison and what other scientist were already asked to work on a better telegraph?
Who did Bell go to see in 1875?
Who ran the Smithsonian in 1875?
What was Henry's reply to Bell's statement that he lacked information to complete his telegraph?
Who did Bell meet in 1874?
What kind of business did Watson work at?
Who did Bell take on to work with him?
What month and day did Watson and Bell have a breakthrough?
How many reeds did Bell conclude he needed?
What name was given to the telephone that sort of worked?
Who gave money to Bell and Watson?
What did Bell promise to split with his financers?
In what country other than the U.S. did Bell try to patent his telegraph?
Which country did Bell first try to get a patent?
Who did Bell ask to get a patent in Britain?
What kind of telegraph did Bell create?
What material did Elisha Gray use to convey sound?
On what date did Gray and Bell both put in for a patent?
On what day did Bell get to Washington?
What office in Washington did Bell and Gray visit?
What sort of machine did Bell and Gray both try to patent at the same time?
What number is Bell's patent?
On what date did Bell get his patent?
Bell's patent was for the method and what for transmitting vocal and other sounds telegraphically?
On what day did Bell go back to Boston?
Bell sketched a design that looked like the work of who?
Bell implemented Gray's design as a what?
Bell stopped using the liquid-based method after what month?
Bell used his own design in all public demonstrations and what?
What part of the telephone was investigated by the patent officer?
When did Bell put in his prior patent?
What liquid did Bell use in his first application?
Who declared himself an alcoholic?
In what war did Wilber and Bailey fight together?
How much did Wilber say Bell gave him in order to look at Gray's paperwork?
What did Bell only admit to knowing in a letter?
From what city did Bell send his first message?
Bell sent messages over wires hooked onto telegraph lines and what?
What did the group at the Bells house hear other people doing?
How much did Bell et al. try to sell his patent for?
Who did Bell et al. try to sell his patent to?
What did the President think the telephone was, such that he refused to buy the patent?
How much the the President of Western Union want to pay for the patent later on?
In what city was the 1876 Centennial Exposition?
What important person saw the telephone at the Centennial Exposition?
Pedro II was the Emperor of what Country?
Which Queen did Bell present his invention to?
In what year was the Bell Telephone Company founded?
How many people in the United States had a telephone by 1886?
In what year did Bell get some of Edison's patents?
What addition let people stop yelling into the telephone?
What company did Bell acquire the carbon microphone from?
In what month and year did Bell telephone across the country?
What company office did Bell make the original cross country phone call from?
What city did Bell make the first cross country call from?
What city did Bell make the first cross country call to?
Who was on the other end of the first cross country phone call?
During how many years did the Bell Company battle lawsuits?
How many times were Bell's patents contested?
How many of the court cases wound up at the Supreme Court?
Elisha Gray and what other man were behind many of the court cases?
In 1887 the US Government wanted to undo Bell's patent due to fraud and what?
The US Government lost the bid to overturn Bell's patent in what court?
How many years did Bell and the US Government fight in court?
What excuse did the judges have for the trial despite the fact that the patents had expired?
On what date did the US Government stop legal action?
Who claimed to have invented the in 1834?
How many court trials did Meucci participate in?
At what company were Meucci's prototypes supposedly lost?
In what year did Western Union absorb ADT?
What event caused Meucci's trials to be dropped?
Because of their patent, what didn't Siemens & Halske have to give Bell?
What was the home city for the International Bell Telephone Company?
In what year was the International Bell Telephone Company founded?
In what year did Mabel's father move to Washington D.C.?
In what year did Bell acquire a house in D.C.?
Where did Bell and Mabel live before 1880?
What did Bell have to go to court for in D.C.?
In what year did Bell officially become an American?
What was Bell's original nationality?
Besides the US and UK, what other country claims Bell as a citizen?
What does Bell call people who are citizens of two countries?
What Island in Nova Scotia did the Bells go to in 1885?
In 1886, what lake did Bell start building a house near?
What did the Bells call the house completed in 1889?
How many people worked for the Bell Boatyard?
Where did the Bells live when the Halifax Explosion happened?
On what day did the Halifax Explosion happen?
Which of their two homes did the Bells start spending more time as Bell aged?
What city adopted the Bells?
What did the Bells do to help the victims in Halifax?
What famous lab did Bell spend time working for?
What type of energy did Bell investigate at the Volta Laboratory?
The magnetic field is part of what sort of recorder?
What form of water played a part in Bell's home cooling system?
What did Bell think could be collected from farm and factory byproduct?
What kind of toilet did Bell work on?
Right before his death, what kind of energy did he speculate about?
What did Bell call his cord-free phone?
Who did Bell invent the cord-free phone with?
What did Bell's cord-free phone use to transmit messages?
What lab association did Bell and Tainter both eventually join?
In the photophone, light carried sound and what?
Bell and his assistant first used their photophone on what date?
How many feet did the first photophone message travel?
From what building was the first photophone message sent?
How many years after this photophone message would the first message take place over radio?
What did Bell call the best thing he ever made?
Bell thought the photophone was better than what famous invention?
What modern technology takes the next step from the photophone?
When was fiber-optics first patented?
In what decade did fiber-optics become widely used?
What did Bell create in 1881?
What was in James Garfield that they wanted to get out?
What did Bell think was wrong with the bed, which prevented his machine from finding the bullet?
On which run did Bell's metal detector give a small indication?
When did Bell's metal detector work well?
Bell gave his story about trying to find the bullet to the American Association for the Advancement of what?
Where did Bell go the day after trying to find the bullet?
What kind of mattress was the President directly on?
Where did Bell indicate that the bullet was too deep for his machine to register?
Who wrote the paper laying out hydrofoils and hydroplanes?
What nationality was Meacham?
What did Bell start drawing after reading the article?
Who helped Bell investigate hydrofoils in 1908?
Which Italian scientist did Baldwin draw inspiration from?
What did the AEA work on after kites?
What material was the Red Wing's frame made of?
What kind of plane was the Red Wing?
How many accident-free flights had the AEA taken by 1909?
Who was the first person to die in a plane crash?
What did the AEA name their last plane?
Who was the first to fly the Silver Dart?
What professional did Bell make sure was present during the first Silver Dart flight?
What business did Baldwin and McCurdy start after the AEA folded?
On what month and day did the Silver Dart take its first flight?
What kind of parents did Bell state were more prone to having deaf children?
In 1921 the American Museum of Natural History hosted what event?
Which biologist ran the Committee on Eugenics?
What did Bell like to do that led to his involvement with eugenics?
What are Bell's personal papers known as?
In what part of the Library of Congress are Bell's papers kept?
Apart from in person, how can one look at many of Bell's papers?
In what university is the Alexander Graham Bell Institute?
In what province is the Alexander Graham Bell Institute located?
What did Bell receive from many centers of post-secondary education?
What is the most famous statue built for Bell and his creation?
When was the Bell Telephone Memorial constructed?
In what city was the Bell Telephone Memorial constructed?
In which gardens was the Bell Telephone Memorial constructed?
In 1936, what place did Bell receive on a list of best inventors?
What was created in Bell's image in 1940?
Bell's stamp is part of which line?
On what date was the stamp officially released?
In which city was the stamp officially released?
In 2002, where did Bell place in a list of the Greatest Britons?
In 2004 Bell was listed in the top how many Greatest Canadians?
In what Scottish Hall of Fame is Bell listed?
Which institution listed Bell in their Hall of Fame?
What kind of wood was Bell's coffin made from?
What color silk was used in Bell's coffin?
What color were attendees asked to not wear at Bell's funeral?
Which singer performed at Bell's funeral?
Where was Bell buried?
Bell's living daughters were named Elsie May and what?
Over how many years did Bell spend a great deal of time at Beinn Bhreagh?
What unit is named after Bell?
What does the bel and decibel measure?
What lab invented the term "bel."
In what field is the Alexander Graham Bell Medal given out?
What was the first year the Alexander Graham Bell Medal was given out?
What does ISP stand for?
what does an isp do?
What forms can an isp be organized in?
What type of organization provides internet access?
What are some services provided by an isp?
Why was the internet developed?
when was the internet developed?
what happened to the internet in the late 1980s?
When were remaining restrictions on the internet removed?
how long after the introduction of the world wide web was 1995?
Where were the first isps established?
where was the first commercial isp in the us located? 
when was the first commercial isp customer served?
when were the first commercial isps established?
what was the name of the first commercial isp in the us?
What would the absence of net neutrality permit? 
what may possibly be a solution to net neutrality concerns? 
how did president obama recommend to classify the internet? 
what did the fcc choose to apply to the internet? 
what would the internet be classified as based on title ii? 
When did the FCC rule on net neturality?
How did the FCC rule on net neutrality?
what did the FCC adopt for the internet? 
what amendment did the chairman of the FCC compare this ruling to? 
what did the FCC chairman say both the internet and the first amendment stand for?
When did the FCC publish its final rule on net neutrality regulations?
What do ISPs provide?
how do isps provide internet access?
what is one type of technology used to connect to the internet? 
what type of technology is used to connect to the internet wirelessly? 
what was an earlier technology used to connect to the internet? 
what traditional options were available for users and small businesses? 
what is it called when fiber-optics are used for end users?
who is served by dial-up, dsl, adsl, cable modems, or isdns?
What type of customers would typically have more demanding requirements? 
what does atm stand for in relation to internet providers? 
what is high-speed dsl used for? 
what is SONET? 
What is a mailbox provider? 
What is an organization that provides hosting of electronic mail domains? 
what is the purpose of a mailbox provider? 
how does a user store electronic mail?
What is SMTP?
What is IMAP?
what are most mailbox providers as well? 
who possibly controls their own mail servers? 
What do internet hosting services provide? 
Who provides a virtual server service?
who provides cloud services?
Who does an ISP pay for internet access?
Why does an ISP need to pay an upstream ISP?
What does an upstream ISP provide for an ISP?
what usually has a larger network, the ISP of the customer or the upstream ISP?
What is the simplest case of an ISP using an upstream ISP? 
what do transit ISPs provide? 
A mode of interconnection is often cascaded multiple times until reaching what?
What is a PoP?
What provides bandwidth for the connecting of hosting ISPs and access ISPs?
What is a VISP?
What do VISPs resemble? 
What do visps purchase services from? 
What are free ISPs?
What do free ISPs display in exchange for service?
What are free ISPs similar to? 
How are freenets run? 
What is a WISP? 
What technology is part of a WISP?
What are some bands that Wi-Fi can operate over? 
What is a wireless internet service provider's network based on?
Is a tradeoff between efficiency and cost possible? 
What sort of route does data follow? 
What are ISPs subject to monitoring by in some countries? 
What is the controversial N.S.A. program used in the U.S.?
What does PRISM do? 
What do ISPs integrate into their network to provide information to intelligence agencies? 
What do DCSnet in the US and SORM in Russia do? 
In France, what did historians find that they consider a precedent for comics?
What Michelangelo work do historians consider to be a precedent for comics?
In Egypt, historians consider what to be a precedent for comics?
In Rome, what do historians consider to be a precedent for comics?
What was the first illustrated humor periodical in Britain during the 19th century?
When did The Glasgow Looking Glass begin?
In Britain, what was the most liked illustrated humor periodical?
Which comic character was the first to appear in a weekly magazine?
When did Ally Sloper first appear?
Which outlet did comic supplements find success in?
Which strip had a good deal of success as a comic strip?
What comic strip did Bud Fisher have success with?
When did Mutt and Jeff appear?
When did comic books make an appearance?
Which comic book had success with its first superhero in 1938?
Which genre of comic books had parents concerned?
Which group was created after a Senate hearing on comic books content?
When did super heroes become popular again in comic books?
When did the alternative comics movement begin?
Serialization of comics became less popular when?
How were comics published when serialization became less common?
Which small publisher published in formats that were not traditional?
Comics continue to thrive regardless of the decrease in what market?
Where do comics usually appear?
Where did gag cartoons first make an appearance?
When did gag single-panel illustrations become known as cartoons?
In which publication was cartoon first used to describe gag single-panel illustrations?
What did comics have in the United States because of cultural roots?
Who thought pop culture was a risk?
What was thought to be only good for children and those who could not read or write?
Who put together a history of American comics in 1947?
What was the name of Waugh's work?
Who created a book about comics from a philosophical point of view?
What book did Will Eisner create in 1985?
Storyboards and what are thought to be comics by some?
Storyboards are used a lot by what?
Storyboards are not considered what?
Who does not often see storyboards used in film making?
A book with pictures with no captions that tell a story are called what?
Though one person typically creates the comic, there are usually a number of what involved in actually designing it?
What is a person called who does the initial pencil work for the artwork?
What does an inker do?
What are the individual images with action called in comics?
Narrative is placed into panels using what?
Who puts the panels together using closure?
Timing and pace of comics is made by adjusting size, shape and what of panels?
When a comic panel has events that are not at the same time the panel is considered to be what?
What association with comics is strong?
The presence of a single speech balloon in an image turns it into what?
What type of words are used to do sound effects in comics?
What type of ink is often used in making comics?
What method is mostly used in making comics?
Mixed media and what else are becoming popular for making comics?
Motion lines and what are often used in comics?
When was the island discovered?
How many Boers were taken prisoner during the Second Boer War?
Why was Dinuzulu kaCetshwayo imprisoned on the island?
The roots of what were established on Saint Helena?
What did scientists attempt to boost artificially on Saint Helena?
The environmental intervention was linked to the conceptualization of what process?
What did the island have an abundance of when discovered?
What was imported by the settlers of the island?
What kind of buildings were built by the settlers?
Who was left on the island to recover when sick?
What was the island a source of for ships travelling from Asia to Europe?
Who claimed Saint Helena in 1633?
What year did the Dutch abandon the island?
Who was granted a charter to govern Saint Helena?
Who granted the English East company a character to govern the island?
Who was the first governor of Saint Helena?
What year did the first governor arrive to Saint Helena?
Who had the sole right to fortify and colonize the island?
What did the English East India Company have difficulty attracting?
What problems lead to a suggesting to relocate the population?
What was the name of the governor who suggested relocating the population of Saint Helena?
What was the location that was suggested the population be moved too?
How many slaves were on the island in 1723?
Who set up an astronomical observatory on Saint Helena?
What university did Edmond Halley attend?
How many feet was the telescope that was set up in the observatory?
What district is the telescope set up in?
What hemisphere of stars did Edmond Halley want to study with the telescope?
Saint Helena was an important port of which company?
What did ships replenish at Saint Helena?
What vessel was owned by Captain James?
What vessel resupplied at the Island in May 1771?
Vessels of what navy protected convoys?
The British government detained who in Saint Helena?
What year was Napoleon Bonaparte taken to the island?
Where did Napoleon Bonaparte stay until he found permanent residence?
What ended up being the permanent residence of Napoleon Bonaparte?
What year did Napoleon Bonaparte pass away?
Who took full control of the island after Napoleon's death?
The EIC made what available to the government of the island between 1815 and 1830?
The packet schooner St Helena brought supplies of what to the island?
When was importation of slaves banned in Saint Helena?
The emancipation of the slaves of Saint Helena did not take place until what year?
Who banned slavery in their colonies?
Over how many slaves ended up getting emancipated on Saint Helena?
What act gave control of Saint Helena to the British Crown?
Who turned over control of Saint Helena to the British Crown?
During the latter half of the 19th century what ships became prevalent that weren't dependent on trade winds?
How many ships were going to the island in 1855?
By 1889 how many ships were going to the island?
Who established a naval station to cut down on African slave trade on the island in 1840?
Between 1840 and 1849 how many freed slaves landed on the island?
What were the freed slaves known as?
Which french emperor gained possession of Longwood house and the land surrounding it?
What year did the French Emperor Napoleon III take control of Longwood house?
Who was the last resident of Longwood house before Napoleon III took it over?
Who has authority over Longwood house?
Who arrived in Jamestown during their solo round the world voyage?
When did Joshua Slocum arrive in Jamestown?
When did Joshua Slocum depart from Jamestown to continue his trip?
Who presented two lectures on their voyage?
What country does the local industry that manufactures fibre get their flax from?
What island was made a dependency of Saint Helena in 1922?
What was the name of the airport the United States built on Ascension Island?
What year was Wideawake Airport built?
What did the Island sell for increased revenue during this period?
What year did flax prices peak?
The British Post Offices decision to use what kind of fibres hurt the flax industry?
What year did the Island's flax mills close?
What year did the Union Castle shipping line slowly start to reduce their service calls to the island?
Which shipping company replaced Union-Castle Line mailship service?
What year was Union-Castle Line mailship replaced?
What right was lost by the citizen of the islands due to the act?
What department was formed to help raise the living standards of the citizens in Saint Helena?
What year was the Development and Economic Planning Department formed?
Where was the only work outside of Saint Helena located?
What year did the Saint Helena Constitution officially take effect?
In 2002 what act granted full British citizenship to the citizens of the islands?
What were the dependent territories renamed to?
What is the nearest port to Saint Helena?
What is the closest international airport to Saint Helena called?
What is the mail boat that serves the island called?
What hemisphere is the island located in?
What area is the island classified as being in by the United Nations?
How many square miles is Saint Helena?
What kind of rock are coastal regions of Saint Helena covered with?
How many feet high is the highest peak of Saint Helena?
What year did Diana's Peak officially become a state park?
What was formed in 2002 to replant parts of the great wood?
How close are the rockets and islets off the coast?
Which direction from the island is Upper Black Rock located?
Which direction from the island is Bird Island located?
Which direction from the island is Lighter Rock located?
Which direction from the island is Frightus Rock located?
What is the national bird of Saint Helena?
What is the Plover known locally as?
How many districts is the island of Saint Helena divided into?
What do the districts also serve as?
In 1840 what did Saint Helena become?
What squadron was Saint Helena a provisioning station for?
What country did the British West Africa Squadron prevent slaves from being sent to?
How many slaves ended up staying on the island after being freed?
How many slaves were freed from the island?
When did Imported Chinese labor arrive?
How many imported Chinese laborers were there at the peak of importation?
What year did importation of Chinese Laborers peak?
What kind of citizenship do the citizens of Saint Helena hold?
On what date was full British citizenship restored to the citizens of the island?
What act restored the full British citizenship of the citizens of Saint Helena?
What was there a long pattern of from the island starting during the post Napoleonic period?
When did the population of the island start to steadily decline?
What was a big factor in emmigration to the UK?
What communion do most residents of the island belong to?
When was the 150th anniversary of the diocese celebrated?
Not only are most residents of the island members of the Anglican communion, but what else?
The Diocese of Saint Helena has it's own what?
When did Roman Catholics start to appear on the island?
What year did the Salvation Army show up on Saint Helenas?
When did Baptists come to the island?
How many Johovah's Witnesses were on the island?
When did the Seventh-day Adventist arrive on the island?
Who has executive authority in Saint Helena?
Who exercises the authority on behalf of the queen in Saint Helena?
Who is responsible for Defence and Foreign Affairs?
How many seats are in the Legislative Council of Saint Helena?
Who presides over the executive council?
The head of government on the island is who?
When were proposals for a Chief Councillor put on hold?
What did the government of Saint Helena fund in 2012?
What kind of articles were published to help this plan?
How was support for members of the public given?
Saint Helena has a high proportion of what kind of birds?
What kind of plants are common on Saint Helena?
What organization identified Saint Helena as important for bird conservation?
 Saint Helena is on the United Kingdom's list for future what?
How many lichen forming fungi have been recorded on the island?
How many endemic species of fungi have been found?
What kind of invertebrates have been found on the island?
What kind of crop economy did the Island originally have?
What year did the crop economy change?
What was produced during the time the Island was monocrop?
Saint Helena's economy is now almost completely sustained by what?
How much % of production does the public sector cover?
What is the tourist industry mostly based around?
What kind of fishing tourism occurs on the island?
How many hotels are on the island?
Tourism is completely based on what arriving to the island?
What does Saint Helena have the most expensive of?
What is Tungi Spirit made out of?
Ascension Island, Tristan da Cunha and Saint Helena all issue their own what?
What is the Saint Helena currency?
The government of Saint Helena produces it's own what?
What year was the Bank of Saint Helena established?
The Saint Helena pound is at parity with what other currency?
How many commercial airports are under construction in Saint Helena?
What is the only method of travel currently available to Saint Helena?
A large airfield is located on what portion of the island?
What kind of flights are offered to limited civilians?
What ship runs between Saint Helena and Cape town on 5 day voyages?
What year was the RMS Saint Helena supposed to be decommissioned?
What needs to be completed before the RMS Saint Helena can be decommissioned?
When did the British government agree to help pay for the new airport in Saint Helena?
Which south african company is helping to engineer the airport? 
The new airport opening date is when?
Which countries will be able to fly to Saint Helena using the airport?
Which airline will provide weekly service to Saint Helena?
What kind of aircraft was the first to land at the new airport?
What date did the aircraft land at the new airport?
Who conducted the first helicopter landing at the airfield?
Where did the helicopter embark on visiting?
When did the aircraft visit HMS Lancaster?
What kind of vehicle offers basic transportation to people in Saint Helena?
Where does the minibus travel to?
On what days does the minibus take people into Jamestown?
What day did Radio Saint Helena start operations?
What was the range of Radio Saint Helena in miles?
How many days a year was Radio Saint Helena broadcast internationally?
What newspaper did Radio Saint Helena collaborate with?
What day was Saint Helena Radio shut down?
What date was Saint FM radio launched?
What date was Saint FM radio closed?
Which newspaper is the sister company of Saint FM radio?
Which company took over the channels vacated by Saint FM?
What date did Saint FM Community Radio launch?
What kind of people can join Saint Fm Radio Community?
Who runs Saint Helena online?
Who is partnered with Saint Helena online?
What does Sure South Atlantic LTD offer?
How many analogue terrestrial UHF channels does Sure South Atlantic LTD have?
What is the feed signal of Sure South Atlantic received by?
SURE provides what kind of service to the territory?
What kind of network does SURE provide it's service from?
When was the first fibre-optic network installed?
How big is the satellite dish at the satellite ground station in feet?
When was the satellite dish installed?
Where was the satellite dish installed?
Both telephone and internet services are subject to what?
What is the international calling code for Saint Helena?
Who shares the calling code +290 with Saint Helena?
How many digits did Saint Helena change their phone numbers to?
When did Saint Helena change the amount of digits in their phone numbers?
What digit are Saint Helena phone numbers prefixed with?
What speed is Saint Helena internet access?
What is the internet service provided through?
Who provides the internet service in Saint Helena?
What kind of population does SURE service?
How many satellites provide the link to the internet?
How many local newspapers does the island have?
Where are both newspapers available?
Since when has the St Helena Independent been published?
When was the Sentinel Newspaper introduced?
When does the mobile library service operate?
Who provides programs to students with special needs?
Saint Helena is a member of what kind of association?
Where did the Saint Helena cricket team make it's debut in international cricket?
When did the Saint Helena cricket team make it's debut in international cricket?
Where does the Governor's cup take place? 
What months does the Governor's cup take place?
When did the most recent Governor's cup take place?
What kind of groups are on Saint Helena and Ascension Island?
When was Scouting established on Saint Helena?
Who visited the scouts on their return from the tour of Africa in 1937?
What book describes Lord and Lady Baden-Powel's visit?
Aspiration and preaspiration are used in what?
Aspirated consonants are what in English?
What are two language types where the difference is contrastive?
What is created when the vocal folds are spread and do not vibrate?
What is created when vocal folds are slightly closed and vibrate?
What is it called when a person's vocal cords stay open after a consonant?
Aspiration of stops is seen as voiceless velar airflow in some languages, such as what?
In Navajo, the aspiration of affricates can be seen as what?
In Eastern Armenian, aspirated consonants occur in what?
Where are consonants aspirated in just the final position?
As well as lasting as long as an English aspirated stop, the Armenian and Cantonese aspiration lasts as long as what?
What happens when an aspirated consonant is doubled or geminated?
What is comprised of a stop, fricative, and aspirated release?
What has a different significance in various languages?
What two forms can aspiration be in?
Aspiration is what, in English and some other languages?
How are stops distinguished?
Voiceless stops are at times what?
Voiced stops are most often what?
Telegu, Kannada and others are considered to be some of the what languages?
What has no distinction between the categories  of voiced, voiceless, aspirated and unaspirated?
What market primarily uses ammonia production?
Name a process that uses fossil fuels along with hydrogen.
What are two other dangerous acids?
What temperature does hydrogen react with these elements?
What model id used to calculate energy levels of hydrogen?
What attracts planets and celestial items?
What does the electromagnetic force attract to one another?
What are some catalysts used in hydrogen cooling
What ind of charge does hydrogen take when mixed with electronegative particles?
What type of charge does hydrogen take when combined with a metal?
When hydrogen forms with a metal, what is the compound called?
Is H2 reactive in standard conditions?
What is the form of hydrogen and carbon called?
What is the form of hydrogen and heteroatoms called?
What is the study of organic compounds properties known as?
What is the study of living organisms known as?
Organic compounds are only required to conatin what?
How many binary borane hydrides are known?
How many binary aluminum hydrides are there?
What chemistry do hydrides serve as bridging ligands?
What do hydrides that are bridging ligands link up?
What group is briging ligands most common in?
When hydrogen oxidates, what is it removing?
When hydrogen oxidates, what does it end up giving?
What theory suggests that acids are proton donors?
What is another term for a bare proton?
Where can oxonium ions be found?
What other term is a solvated protons referred as?
What kind of molecular hydrogen is the H+3 knows as?
What kind of cation is the H+3 knowns as?
How many natural isotopes does hydrogen have>
What are the names of these isotopes?
Which isotopes have unstable nuclei?
Which element is the only that has different names for its isotopes?
What are the only two names still used for radioactive isotopes?
What are the symbols used for deuterium and tritium?
What does the symbol P represent?
What are the preferred symbols for deuterium and tritium?
How did Lavoisier produce hydrogen for his experiments?
Who invented the hydrogen filled balloons?
What year was hydrogen filled balloons invented?
what were the hydrogen lifted airships called?
In what year did the first zeppelin make flight?
Who made the first non stop transatlantic crossing?
What year was this done?
What year did the airship get destroyed?
What city was the ship over when it caught fire?
In what year did the first hydrogen cooled turbogenerator go into service?
What state is the Dayton Power and light Company located?
What year was the first nickel hydrogen battery used?
In what year did the hubble space telescope finally get the nickel hydrogen battery?
What is the hydrogen atom made up of?
What theory is the hydrogen atom a big part of?
When was the quantum mechanical treatment of the hydrogen atom developed?
Who observed the specific heat capacity of H2?
What cause H2 to resemble monatomic gas?
What theory supports this?
What percent of normal matter is hydrogen?
What percent of atoms is hydrogen?
What 2 forms of mass is most of the universe consisted of?
Clouds of H2 form what?
In what states is hydrogen mostly found in the universe?
Hydrogens electron and proton are not bound together in what state?
in the interstellar medium, what state is hydrogen in?
The neutral hydrogen found in the damped Lyman-alpha systems dominates what?
How abundant is hydrogen on the earths surface?
what produces hydrogen gas?
What molecular form is found in the interstellar medium?
What generates protonated molecular hydrogen?
On what planet can you find  protonated molecular hydrogen?
In what way can Neutral triatomic hydrogen exist?
How does nature produce H2?
How do labs produce H2?
When you combine an alloy of alluminum and gallium to water, what do you get?
What else can it produce?
What can be reused after the formation?
At what pressure does PSA work best in?
What is synthesis gas used for?
Besides methane, what else can be used to produce synthesis gas?
How can it be recovered through steam?
When hydrogen is generated from natural gas, what des it produce?
How is hydrogen produced as a co product?
What condition is iron and steel alloys slowly oxidized?
What does the anaerobic corrosion of iron lead to?
What is another name for formation of ferrous hydroxide?
Under what condition can ferrous hydroxide be oxidized?
What does this process form?
What reaction describes this process?
How is hydrogen produced when there is no atmospheric oxygen?
Where do you find silicate?
What is the most common gas found in power tranformers?
Where are large quantities of H2 needed?
What are the consumers of H2 in petrochemical plant?
Where is hydrogen highly soluble?
Where can you find soluble hydrogen?
What influences hydrogens solubility in metals?
When are these useful?
When is it damaging?
Why would one use hydrogen mixed with nitrogen?
What industries can you find these applications?
How is hydrogen used as a food additive?
What isotope is used in nuclear fission?
Where is tritium produced?
What is tritium used for?
How is hydrogen used at power stations?
Why is it used as a coolant?
What are these properties?
Is Hydrogen considered an energy resource?
Where does the sun get its energy from?
How does hydrogen function when it s burned?
What form of hydrogen has been discussed as a ussage for fuel?
Why is hydrogen employed?
How is hydrogen used in oxide materials?
What oxide materials use hydrogen as an electron donor?
What enzymes are used to produce H2?
When does hydrogen gas occur?
What is the natural cycle of hydrogen production and consumption by organisms called?
What is the decomposition of water into its components called?
Where does water splitting occur?
What organisms can form H2 gas?
How are these gases formed?
What threats can hydrogen cause to human saftey?
What can hydrogen embrittlement lead to?
What do physical and chemical properties of hydrogen depend on?
How long can it take to reach the equilibrium ratio?
What do Hydrogen detonation parameters depend on?
What do people typically call a web browser?
What platform is a browser used on?
What does URL mean?
What allows a person to direct their browser to a resource?
The primary function of a browser is to use what?
In addition to accessing the Internet, browsers can also access info that is put there by web servers in what?
A browser can also access files where?
When was the first browser created?
Who invented the first browser?
What was Berners-Lee a director of?
What organization did Berners-Lee create?
Who released the Internet Explorer browser?
When did Microsoft release Internet Explorer?
The release of Internet Explorer started the first what?
What was bundled with Internet Explorer?
Opera was introduced in what year?
What accounted for 1.1% of browser use in April 2011?
Opera focused on which quickly growing market?
Opera is also available on which video game console?
What did Netscape launch in 1998?
Netscape wanted to have a competitive browser using what?
What was the resulting browser for the Mozilla Foundation?
When was Firefox released?
When was the first beta release for Safari?
Who created Safari?
Which browser is the newest to enter the field?
When was Chrome released?
As Chrome usage increases, which browser usage has continued to decrease?
When did Chrome become more used than all versions of Internet Explorer?
What was bundled for free with the Windows OS?
Internet Explorer was partially funded in what two ways?
What other OS could use Internet Explorer?
Who investigated the bundling of the IE browser with Windows OS?
When did the European Commission say they would investigate the bundling?
The Commission felt that bundling the browser with Windows computers harmed what?
The Commission felt that the bundling undermined what?
What browser was automatically included with OS X?
Which company pays Firefox to make their search engine the default on their browser?
What other browser has Google as the default search engine?
The increased revenue funds what, in addition to Google?
What is the main use of a browser?
What does URL stand for?
What is the determining factor in how a URL will be interpreted?
What does http stand for?
What does ftp stand for?
A news: prefix is given to the user's what?
What is it called when content is changed from markup to an interactive document?
Browsers typically have plug-ins to support what?
What can resources have to connect to other resources?
Features on a browser can range from minimal with little support to what?
When a browser includes a lot of extras, it can be referred to as what?
What does IRC stand for?
What does not allow windows to pop up without consent?
A computer program that continues the functionality of a browser is called what?
A list of websites a user can click to get back to easy have been what by the user?
What are "bookmarks" called in Internet Explorer?
The top browsers have a built-in what?
Firefox does web feeds as what?
The Opera feed reader is more what?
HTTP Secure is supported by what?
Cache, download history, cookies, browsing and what else can be quickly deleted in browsers?
A comparison of browser must be seen to know what?
Quick development of what kind of browsers led to non-standard HTML dialects?
Non-standard dialects led to what?
Modern browser support standards-based and defacto what?
HTML and XHTML should be what by all browsers?
A user interface, UI backend, layout engine and other things are part of what?
The layout engine, rendering engine, user interface and other things are components that offer different what of web browsers?
When was Boston founded?
Where was Boston Founded?
List one major event that took place in Boston.
How many people visit Faneuil Hall annually?
What year was Boston founded?
What is the name of the peninsula Boston was founded on?
Bostons rich history attracts many what each year?
The Faneuil Hall draws over how many tourists to Boston each year?
What ranks in the top of the country for investment?
Households in Boston claim the highest average rate of what in the United States?
Bostons businesses rank top in the country for what?
Where does Boston rank as far as cost of living in the United States?
How does Boston rank on world livability?
Boston is internationally known for education and medicine because of its many what?
What year was the Cambridge Agreement signed?
America's first public school was founded in Boston in what year?
Who was Massachusetts first governor?
How many french and Indian wars did Boston participate in?
Who led the signing of the Cambridge Agreement?
What act was put in place during the Napoleonic wars and the war of 1812?
What act cut down on Boston's harbor activity?
What became an important part of the city's economy during the Napoleonic Wars and the war of 1812?
In what century was manufacturing more important to Boston than trade?
When did Boston stop being known for it's garment production and leather goods?
Boston was overtaken by Salem, Massachusetts in what type of trade? 
What movement did Boston become the center of after it stopped slave trade?
What law involving slaves did the city react strongly to?
What President attempted to make an example out of Boston due to it's view on the Anthony Burns Fugitive Slave Case?
What was the City of Boston's name before it was the City of Boston?
What year was the name changes to the City of Boston?
Boston was chartered as what in 1822?
What was the population of Boston in 1822?
How many square miles was the city in 1822?
What was used to fill a mill pond that became the Haymarket Square?
What sits on Beacon Hill today?
What famous disaster happened in Boston in 1872?
What was the rubble from the Great Boston Fire used for?
During what century did businesses move out of Boston to find cheaper labor?
Projects to renew the city were put into place by what?
What year did the first community health center in the US open?
Where was Colombia Point Health Center located?
In 1990, the Colombia Point Health Center was renamed what?
On what date did bombs go off at the Boston marathon?
At what point of the Marathon were the bombs exploded?
How many fatalities were there at the marathon?
About how many people were injured in the explosion?
What is the name of the region that surrounds Boston?
What river seperates Boston from Charlestown?
What direction from Boston is Boston Harbor?
Calf Island and Green Island are considered part of what National Recreation Area?
What s Boston sometimes called?
How many neighborhoods are in Boston?
What division of the City Government designated the 23 neighborhoods?
What percentage of the City of Bostons population is 19 and under?
What percentage of the City of Boston's population is 20 to 24?
What percentage of the City of Bostons population is 25 to 44?
What percentage of the City of Bostons residents are 45 to 64?
What percentage of the City of Boston's residents are over 65?
What is the average household income in Boston?
What is the average family income in Boston?
What is the average income for a full time male worker?
What is the average income for a full time female worker?
What percent of families fall below the poverty line?
What percent of Boston's population was white in 1950?
In 2000, what percen tof the population were non hispanic and white?
What year did minorities become the majority of the population for the first time?
In recent years, the whote population has begun to move where?
What year did non hispanic whites once again become the majority of the population?
What people form the largest ethnic group in the city?
What percentage of the city's population is Irish?
What is the second largest ethnic group in the city?
What percentage of the citys population is italian?
How many Chinese Americans lived in Boston City proper in 2013?
How many Jewish people live in the City of Boston?
How many Jewish people live in the Boston Metro area?
What is the total number of congregations in Boston?
What adjascent communities also hold a high Jewish population?
What is the estimated percentage of the population of Brookline and newton that are jewish?
What neighborhoos has a high rate of hispanics?
How many hispanics live in the City of Boston?
How many Puerto Rican hispanics live in greater Boston?
How many Mexican hispanics live in greater Boston?
How many Colombians live in greater Boston?
In 2014, what percentage of the city identified as Christian?
In 2014, what percentage of the city identified as Protestant?
In 2014, what percent of the City of Boston was Catholic?
In 2014, what percentage of Bostons residents did not claim to belong to any religion?
In 2014, other religions mad eup what percentage of the citys population?
How many member attended the Catholic Church in the Boston area in 2010?
How many Catholic churches were in the Boston area in 2010?
How many Episcopal churches were in the Boston Metro area in 2010?
What Boston church is one of the oldest congregations in the US?
What year was Old South Church organized?
What rank does Boston hold as far as being an economically powerful city in the world?
What is the economy of Boston?
What ranking in the country does Greater Boston metro hold as far as economy?
What ranking in the world does greater Boston metro hold as far as economy?
How many college students does Boston attract?
Students from around the world contribute how much a year to Bostons economy?
Because of the number of tech companies, the city is a hub for what?
The Milken Institute rated Boston as the top what in the country?
Of all cities in the US, Boston received the highest amount of funding from where?
The city is innovative becaus eit has access to what type of capital?
There is a  high presence of what type of company in the city?
Route 128 and Greater Boston are centers for what type of investment?
What remains an important sector?
A large part of Boston's economy is made up of what?
How many tourists visited Boston in 2011?
How much did tourists spend in Boston in 2011?
What year did the number of Tourists from china and the UK top the list?
How many students are in Boston Public schools?
How many schools are in Boston?
What is the oldest public high school in the US?
What percentage of Bostons public students are African American?
Babson College is what type of institution?
What small private law school is located in Boston?
What was the name of Americas first all female law school?
Wher e is Lesley University College of Art and Desighn located?
What is another name for New Englans school of Art and Design
What is the oldest independant conservatory in the US?
What college plays an important role in making Boston known for Jazz?
What Univesity located outside of Boston still holds a large presence in the city?
What is the nations oldest college?
Where does Harvard plan to expand to?
What was MIT originally known as?
In 1916, MIT moved across the river to what city?
How many reported murders were there in 2008?
How many murders were there in 2014?
How many murders were there in Boston in 2015?
Boston is culturally similar to what area?
What is the Boston accent known as?
Who influences Boston's politics and religion?
What are Bostons neologisms more commonly known as?
Food with an emphasis on seafood, salt, and dairy is an exaple of what?
Known for its literary culture, Boston has also been called what?
What century did Ralph Waldo Emerson write in?
What was the name of the bookstore the authors met in?
Where was the Atlantic Monthly first published?
What year was the Boston Public Library founded?
The Boston Symphony Orchestra is a member of what?
What classical music magazine called the Boston Symphony orchestra one of the worlds best orchestras?
What does Boston Symphony orchestra call home?
Where is Symphony Hall located?
Where is the theater District located?
What event occurs on New Year's Eve?
Where is the annual Boston Arts festival?
Where are Italian Summer feasts held?
Whos is honored in the Italian Summer Feasts?
How long are the Harbor-Fest festivities?
What is preserved in the Boston national Historical Park?
What is marked by a line of red bricks in the ground?
Where is the institute of contemporary Art located?
What is one of the oldest libraries in the US?
Where is the New England Aquarium located?
How long has Boston been a religious center?
How many Roman Catholic parishes are in Boston?
Where is the Cathedral of the Holy Cross located?
Where is the headquarters for the Christial Scientists?
What was the city's first Anglican church?
Allston Green District is an example of what?
How many green housing facilities does the Allston green District contain?
How often is Boston's climate plan updated?
When was the last time the climate plan was modified?
Whos is the late Mayor of Boston?
Who came up with the Renew Boston Whole Building Incentive?
The incentive reduced the cost of what in buildings?
The goal is to get how  many residents to sign up?
How much does the program cost?
Lots of older buildings are supported by what?
The piles begin to rot if exposed to what?
What has been happening to groundwater levels?
Where does the groundwater go instead of into the ground?
How many major North American sports leagues are there?
How many championships has Boston won in these leagues?
How many championships have the sports leagues won since 2001?
Why did the city turn down the chance to host the 2024 Olympic games?
When did Boston withdraw its bid for hosting the Olympic games?
Who plays their games at Fenway park?
Where is Fenway park?
What year was the first game of the first world series played?
What year was fenway Park built?
What was the name of Bostons first baseball team?
What is the TD Gardens former name?
What was the FleetCenter built to replace?
How many teams is TD garden the home to?
How many people can be seated in a basketball game at TD Garden?
How many people can be seated for an ice hockey game at TD Garden?
What league do the new England patriots belong to?
What year were the new England patriots founded in?
What was the original name of the new England patriots?
When dod the Boston patriots change their name?
What stadium do the patriots play in?
What is one of the most famous sporting events in the city?
When is the head of Charles Regatta held?
How many people were killed in the explosions at the Boston marathon?
What is the oldest public park in the US?
Where is Boston Common located?
What is next to Boston Common?
The Emerald necklace is a string of what?
Who designed the Emerald necklace?
What ranking does the Boston park system have?
Who ranks city park systems?
Parkscore ranks the number of resident within what distance of the park?
Where is the John F kennedy Federal office building located?
What court is located in Boston?
What is the name of the famous bank located in Boston?
Boston is split between how many congressional districts?
What district is the North 3/4 of the city located in?
Who represents the 7th district?
What year was Capuano elected?
What district is the South fourth of Boston located in?
The Boston Globe and the Boston herals are two of Bostons what?
Where is the Christial Science Monitor headquarters?
When did the Christian Science Monitor end daily print newspapers?
How often does The Christian Science monitor publish their magazine?
What is the name of the teen paper that the Boston Globe provides to schools?
Where is the main office of Siglo21?
The former publisher of the Boston phoenix owns what Spanish newspaper?
What is the name of the citys only lesbian owned LGBT magazine?
What year was the Rainbow Times founded?
What locations does the Rainbow Times serve?
Where is the headquarters for the Rainbow Times?
What is the national ranking of Bostons radio market?
What Bostom Am radio station is a sports and talk station?
What is the name of Boston Colleges radio station?
What is the name of Harvards radio station?
WBUR and WGBH are exaples of what type of radio station?
What ranking does the Boston television DMA hold?
What is the sister station to WBZ-TV?
What is the citys PBS station?
MundoFox is an example of what?
Where are most of the television stations transmitters located?
What is the Longwood medical and Academic Area located next to?
Where is Massachusetts General Hospital located?
Where is St. Elizabeths medical center located?
What agency oversees health concerns for city residents?
A lot of Bostond medical facilities are associated with what?
The Longwood medical and Academic Area is affiliated with what medical school?
Tufts- new England medical Center was renamed what?
What neighborhood is the Tufts medical Center located in?
What is the name of the first municipal Hospital in the US?
What Airport is located in East Boston?
Who operates Logan Airport?
What is the name of Bostons main airport?
What airport is North of Logan Airport?
What airport is south of Logan Airport?
How did the streets of downtown Boston grow?
Boston is at the East end of what Interstate?
What year was the O'neill tunnel put in place?
The streets of Back bay grew into a what?
Where do Amtrack's Northeast corridor and Chicago lines start?
Where do Amtrack's Northeast corridor and Chicago lines end?
Trains serving new Yourk and Washington D.C also stop where?
What suburbs of Boston is the Route 128 Station located in?
Where does the Downeaster service to maine start?
What is Bostons nickname?
What type of commuters does Have than any other largely populated city?
What percent of Boston's population commutes by walking?
What year did walkscore rank Boston the third most walkable city in the US?
What was the walk score given to Boston?
Bicycling magazine named Boston one of the worst cities in the US for what?
What magazine put Boston on its Future best City For Biking list?
What is the name of the bike share program in Boston?
What year did Hubway launch?
How many rides did Hubway log in its first year?
What is the name of the second generation of BDS?
What is another name for the BeiDou Navigation Satellite System?
How many satellites will the BeiDou-2 have?
When did the BeiDou-2 begin construction?
When did the BeiDou-2 begin operating?
When did China begin constructing the third BeiDou system?
What is the third BeiDou system called?
When was the first BDS-3 satellite launched?
How many BDS-3 satellites have been launched?
How long ago was the BeiDou Satellite System first launched?
How much revenue for companies is generated by the BDS system?
Who first came up with the idea for a Chinese satellite navigation system?
When did Chen Fangyun come up with the idea for a satellite navigation system?
The China National Space Administration said the satellite navigation system would be developed in how many steps?
What was the name of the first satellite launched for the system?
When was BeiDou-1A launched?
What was the name of the third satellite launched for the system?
What was the purpose of launching the BeiDou-1C satellite?
When was the BeiDou-1C satellite launched?
When did China announce service plans for the BeiDou system?
What was the accuracy range that China promised to offer in 2008 with the BeiDou system?
What was the timing and speed that China promised to offer in 2008 with the BeiDou system?
When was the fourth satellite for the BeiDou-1 system launched?
What is the name of the fourth BeiDou-1 satellite?
What is the BeiDou-1D satellite sometimes called?
What is the purpose of the BeiDou-1D satellite?
What happened to the BeiDou-1D satellite that needed to be repaired?
When was the first satellite for the BeiDou-2 system launched?
What is the the first satellite for the BeiDou-2 system called?
What is the purpose of the Compass-M1 satellite?
When was the second satellite for the BeiDou-2 system launched?
When was the third satellite for the BeiDou-2 system launched?
What is the BeiDou-1?
The BeiDou-1 is made up of how may satellites?
How many satellites in the BeiDou-1 system is used for back up?
What were the BeiDou-1 system satellites based on?
How much did each satellite for the BeiDou-1 system weigh?
When was the first satellite for the BeiDou-1 system launched?
What was the first satellite for the BeiDou-1 system called?
When was the second satellite for the BeiDou-1 system launched?
What was the second satellite for the BeiDou-1 system called?
When was the last satellite for the BeiDou-1 system launched?
In 2007, what was the reported resolution of the BeiDou system?
What is the calibrated accuracy of the BeiDou system?
What is the uncalibrated accuracy of the BeiDou system?
Who reported the resolution of the BeiDou system in 2007?
Who is the chief designer of the BeiDou navigation system?
Who is Sun Jiadong?
What was the BeiDou-2 system previously known as?
How may satellites will the BeiDou-2 system have?
How many geostationary orbit satellites will the BeiDou-2 system have?
How many non-geostationary orbit satellites will the BeiDou-2 system have?
What is the purpose of the geostationary orbit satellites in the BeiDou-2 system?
What are the ranging signals of the BeiDou system based on?
What positioning levels will the BeiDou system offer?
Where will the public service for the BeiDou system be available?
Who designed the COMPASS navigation system?
How many satellites will the COMPASS navigation system use?
How many frequencies does the COMPASS system use?
What are the four bands of frequencies used by the COMPASS system called?
Which frequency bands are most likely to cause issues of inter-system interference with the Galileo system?
Which bands are used by the Galileo system for their public service?
According to International Telecommunication Union (ITU) policies, who is given higher priority to a specific frequency band?
How much information about the COMPASS system did Chinese authorities release?
What is one thing launching the first COMPASS satellite enable researchers to do?
What is another thing launching the first COMPASS satellite enable researchers to do?
When was the Compass-M1 satellite launched?
What is the purpose of the Compass-M1 satellite?
The purpose of the Compass-M1 satellite is similar to the purpose of what other satellite?
What is the altitude of the Compass-M1 satellite?
What is the inclination of the Compass-M1 satellite?
What frequency bands does Compass-M1 transmit in?
What is the phase shift of the sub-signals detected in each frequency band used by  Compass-M1?
What are the two sub-signals in each frequency band referred to as?
What is the intended purpose of the "I" component?
What is the intended purpose of the "Q" component?
What is the difference between the "I" signals on E2 and E5B and the civilian codes of GPS (L1-CA and L2C)?
When did the Compass system begin operation on a trial bases?
When did the Compass system begin offering navigation, positioning and timing data to China and nearby locations?
What will improve the positioning accuracy of the Compass system?
Upon launching, the Compass system, what was the location accuracy promised to users?
Upon launching, the Compass system, what was the speed promised to users?
When did the Beidou system begin operating in China?
When is it projected that the global navigation system will be finished?
As of December 2012, how many satellites had been launched for the BeiDou-2 system?
Of the 16 satellites launched for the BeiDou-2 system, how many are operational?
When was the Compass-M1 satellite launced?
How many satellites were launched from 2009-2011?
What was achieved by launching 9 additional satellites from 2009-2011?
How many satellites were launched since 2007?
When did the BeiDou system begin transitioning to global coverage?
How did the BeiDou system begin transitioning to global coverage?
When were the 18th and 19th satellites for the BeiDou system launched?
Where were the 18th and 19th satellites for the BeiDou system launched from?
What were the 18th and 19th satellites for the BeiDou system launched with?
What is the Expedition-1?
What will the three latest satellites provide after testing?
What kind of testing will be performed on the three latest satellites?
How many satellites will be used to test a new system of navigation signaling?
What is the name for the rules issued by the heads of the Church?
In what type of religion are canon laws applicable?
Which institutions make up the Catholic Church?
What body was first responsible for creating canon?
What does canon law consist of?
Who enforces canon law in Catholicism?
What is the name for the collection of formal rules in Catholicism?
What does management of canon law aim to regulate?
What is canon law's purpose with respect to members of the Catholic Church?
What is another name for the collections of other Catholic churches led by the Supreme Pontiff?
How many major rites exist?
Who is the leader of the Roman Catholic Church?
What term characterizes the intersection of the rites with the Roman Catholic Church?
Which denomination is led by the Supreme Pontiff?
What are the permanent sources of positive ecclesiastical law?
What are the impermanent sources of positive ecclesiastical law?
What is given to the universal positive law of the Roman Catholic Church by its leader?
What is the pope's official title?
What three divisions of power often found in government does the pope hold?
What entity believes itself to have the longest standing internal mechanism of laws in Western Europe?
What is a legal system older than Catholic law?
What is the term for laws produced at the Council of Jerusalem?
When was the Council of Jerusalem held?
Apart from the Old and New Testaments, which other cultures influenced canon?
Which period followed the jus antiquum?
What is the most recent era of Latin canon law?
What is the name for the time preceding the Code of Canon Law?
In what ways did the Eastern Catholic Churches's legal systems vary from those of the west?
What led to the Code of Canons of the Eastern Churches?
When was the law of the Eastern Catholic Churches promoted?
Who sponsored the promulgation of Eastern Catholic Church laws?
What was the name of the formal version of laws ruling the Eastern Catholic Churches?
What profesional roles from secular law does the Catholic Church also employ?
What is not present in the Catholic legal system as compared with non-religious law?
What does J.C.B. stand for?
What is the English equivalent of the term abbreviated by J.C.B.?
What is the Latin term for Licentiate of Canon Law?
What ancient law served as the precursor to the type of legislation seen in the Roman Catholics?
What word characterizes the type of procedure found in American and British courts?
What term characterizes the type of procedure used in Roman Church courts?
What is the English meaning of inquirere?
What continent's laws developed alongside those of the Church?
In which types of law can elements of canon law be seen?
Who stated that Church law can be seen in the growth of civil law institutions?
What two regions does Sampel cite as examples of the influence of canon law?
What does Sampel claim had a great impact on?
What school of thought serves as a model for canon theory?
Which philosopher is quoted by the Catechism?
What word is not specifically given meaning in the Code of the Church?
What does Aquinas define as the aim toward which law is working?
What term expresses the idea of law derived from Aquinas as interpreted by the Catechism?
Prior to 1917, what church was in a similar situation as the Eastern Catholic Churches as regards its legal system?
What was different about the Eastern Churches compared with the Western?
What was still a main factor in the Eastern Church laws?
When did Pius XI announce his goal of codifying the law of all Eastern Churches?
During what time period were the Codes for Eastern Churches made available, prior to the final version?
When was the original Code of Canon Law published?
For which part of the Roman Catholic Church was the first Code published?
During what years was the Second Vatican Council held?
For whom was a new edition of canon law released in 1983?
When was the first Code produced for Eastern Churches?
In what institution do church courts still have relevant functions in secular society?
In what century did Saxons and Normans separate?
What type of law is not found in ecclesiastical systems in the modern day?
At which universities were canon law degrees abolished?
Who was responsible for banning canon law education from Oxford and Cambridge?
What is a term for the Church of England and churches that align with it?
What is an example of a member of the Anglican Communion in America?
What is an example of a member of the Anglican Communion in Canada?
What do extant churches of the Anglican Communion still operate with?
As of 2004, what do all Anglican Communion Churches share?
What term characterizes the way in which the existence of canon principles can be shown?
Through what does each member of the Anglican Communion make a contribution to Church law? 
What kind of force could the canonical principles be said to have within the Communion?
What does having common principles show and support for churches int he Communion?
What are two other possible terms for canon law among some denominations?
In what types of institutions are canon rules called "practice and procedure"?
What aspect of management is covered by church order?
What aspect of decorum is covered by practice and procedure?
What aspect of faith is covered by canon law?
What group took issue with the Roman canons?
In what year was there documented criticism of Roman church law by Presbyterians?
To whom did Presbyterians complain in 1572?
For how long did the Reformed Church state that canon had been administered by members of the church?
Which church officials were responsible for the administration of canon law?
What is a fundamental collection of documents of the Lutherans?
Beginning in what century was the Book of Concord a central part of the Lutheran Church?
What kind of statement is the Book of Concord?
What are the legislative systems of various Lutheran institutions called?
What kind of belief is the subject of the Book of Concord?
How many official radio and television networks does the government of Somalia operate?
Are communication services in Somalia mainly located in the public or private sector?
As internet access increases, news media and online portals replace what form of media?
What year was the national postal service of Somalia relaunched?
In 2012, what act was approved to establish a National Communications regulator?
Are communications services in Somalia mostly concentrated in the public or private sector?
Communications in Somalia are mostly concentrated in what sector?
How many official rado iand TV networks does the governemt of Somalia run?
What type of media decreases and internet connectivity increases?
What types of media increases as internet connectivity and access increases?
What year is the postal service in Somalia set to relaunch?
Who funded the new telecommunications firms in Somalia?
China, Korea, and Europe lent what to the creation of the new firms.
What do the new telecommunications firms in Somalia offer that is not available in many other parts of the continent?
Money transfers and wireless internet are two things that customers can now accomplish via what?
When the civil war began, many telecomunications companies were created to provide missing what?
Sprint, ITT, and Telenor are examples of what?
Who provides service to every City, town, and hamlet in Somalia?
aproximately how many main lines are there per 1000 people?
what is another word for availability of telephone lines?
How much does Hormuud Telecom gross per year?
What year did Dahabhiil acquire the majority of Somtal network?
Where is Somtal network located?
Buying Somtal Network allowed Dahabshiil to expand into what type of banking?
STC stands for what?
The STC allows its customers to communicate across how many networks?
Investing in what Industry is a sign that Somalia's economy is continuing to improve?
What sector provides key communication services?
What year was the national Communications act enacted?
What Act clears the way for a National Communications Regulator?
What types of stakeholders consulted on the bill to enact the National Communications Act?
The National Communications Act is expected to create and invironment favorable for what?
Continued infrastructure development results in more efficient what?
What is the name of the Somali postal service?
What is the name of the National postal service of Somalia?
When was the infrastructure of the postal service destroyed?
What airport is home to the Emirates post mail hub?
How many phases made up the reconstruction plan for the Somali Post?
Over what period of time did the reconstruction plan for the Somali Post cover?
How many branch offices will be constructed in the capital in phase one of the reconstruction plan?
How many branch offices will be creted in general bases?
What year did Somali authorities rejoin the Universal Postal Union?
What year did postal service in Somalia resume?
Who is helping the Somali Postal service reach its capacity?
What type of assistance does the postal union provide?
What type of equipment does the postal union provide?
When was Radio Mogadishu established?
What languages di Radio Mogadishu originally broadcast in?
What countrys assistance helped Radio Mogadishu modernize?
What type of services were offered in Somali, Amharic, and Oromo?
Mustaqbal Media Corporation is based where?
In what year was Shabelle Media network awarded the media of the year prize?
How many short wave radio stations broadcast from the capital?
About how many private radio stations does the region of Puntland have?
What is the former name of Radio Gaalkacyo?
Where does RAdio Gaalkacyo operate from?
What province is Galkayo located in?
How many government operated radio stations exist in the Somaliland region?
What TV station is the main public service broadcaster in Somalia?
Where is Somali National Television located?
What year did experimental broadcasts of Somali National Television begin?
When was Somali Nation Television officially re-launched?
Howmany hours a day does SNTV broadcast?
Horn Cable Television and Universal TV are examples of what?
What type of Tv startions replay AL=jazeera and CNN?
Where does SBC TV broadcast from?
What is the commercial capital of Puntland?
Howmany governemnt run channels do Puntland and Somaliland regions have?
Where was The Mogadishu Times published?
What year did free media outlets begin to expand?
Advertisers switched from print ads to what to reach more customers?
Whos is a former editor with The Delka Broadsheet?
What is the IST?
As of December 2012, Somalia did not have systematic what?
What internet standards were also unlear as of December, 2012?
What years was the first ISP established in Somalia?
Somalia was one of the last countries on what continent to get connected tothe internet?
In 2009, what percent of Somalia has internet coverage?
The quickest growing local businesses in Somalia are what types of businesses?
What was the numbe rof Somali internet users in the year 2000?
What was the number of internet users in the year 2011?
Goes the number of internet users in Somalia continue to rise or fall?
What was the number of mobile subscribers in Somalia in 2008?
What is the estimated number of mobile subscribers in Somalia in 2015?
What is the STA?
What sector does the STC oversee?
In 2006, who reported that there were over half a million internet users within the territory?
How many established ISP were within the territory in 2006?
How many cyber cafes were withing the territory in 2006?
As of what year were dial up, wireless , and satellite services available?
What was the landline growth rate of Somalia in 2009?
What was the flat rate per month for unlimited landline calls in Somalia in the year 2009?
What was Somalias largest ISP in 2009?
Who was the only provider of dial up service in Somalias SouthCentral regions in 2009?
Mogadishu and Bosaso are what in Somalia?
What city in Soalia has the largest nuber of subscribers?
Where was the headquarters of the largest wireless internet services?
What is another name for Dalcom?
What wsas the satellite internet growth rate as of 2009?
Dalkom Somalia provided internet over what?
Who were one of the main clients of the local satellite service providers?
As broadband access rose, what happened to the demand for satellite services?
Hormuud Telecom launched what service in 2012?
Who was the 3G service for?
what type of connection was the first of its kind in Somalia?
What type of connection does Tri-Band 3G offer its customers?
what does 3G stand for?
What year did Somalia receive its first fiber optic connection?
in 2013, an agreement between Hormuud Telecom and Liquid Telecom provided residents access to what type of cable provider?
How many miles long is Liquid Telecoms Network?
How will the fiber optic connection impact the price for online access for the average user?
Where is Dalcom Somalia currently building a 1000 square mile data center?
What is the second most often spoken language is Catalonia?
What is the most used language in Catalonia?
What is the type designation of Catalan in Catalonia?
What group spends money to promote the language?
What language is promoted in Catalonia?
What is the division of Catalan dialects?
What is the basic difference between the dialects?
What is the differenctiation between Catalan and Valencian?
What are Catalan and Valencian assumed to be?
What are Catalan and Valencian considered to be in the language?
What does Catalan have in common with other Romance languages in the same area?
Where is Catalonia located?
What other Iberian Romance languages are found in this area?
Besides vocabulary and grammar, what other diffinence is there from other similar area languages?
What are these similar Latin derived languages called?
How many genders does Catalan have?
What numbers does Catalan have?
What style of grammar does Catalan have?
What is used in Catalan as word endings that is different from other similar Romance languages? 
What is Catalan the derivitive of?
What is the Latin for Calalunya?
Where did the Catalan  people originate?
What is the root word from which Catalonia comes?
What language did Catalan descend from?
When had Catalan covered the eastern end of the Pyrenees?
Besides the Pyrenees, what area had Catalan covered by the 9th century?
Who broadened their territory and the use of Catalan in the 8th century?
When did the County of Barcelona separate from the Carolengian Empire?
When did macaronic Latin start showing signs of Catalan?
When did texts begin to appear solely in Romance?
To what language did Catalan display similarities?
What Gallo-Romance language did Old Catalan separate from?
When did Catalan rulers broaden their territory to north of the Ebro River?
When did the Catalan rulers take over Valencia and the Balearic Islands?
When Catalan reach Sardinia?
Where did the Catalan language reach in the 15th century?
When did Murcia become Spanish speaking?
Who wrote Tirant lo Blanc?
What kind of tale was Tirant lo Blanc?
To what does Matorell's work show a transition?
What other writer showed a transition to the Renaissance? 
In what was the first Catalan book printed on the Iberian Peninsula?
When were Castille and Aragon united?
After 1479, what language became more valued?
When did Catalan literature begin a downward trend?
What language began to supersede Catalan?
At this time what classes became bilingual?
When was the Treaty of the Pyrenees?
What part of Catalonia did Spain give to France?
Why did Spain give part of Catalonia to France?
What language began to influence Catalan?
When did French become the official language of that part of Catalonia?
When did France outlaw Catalan?
What upheaval had occurred in France just before the prohibition of patois?
Besides Catalan, Alsatian, and Breton, what other patois were banned?
What are French non standard languages called?
When did the French obtain Algeria?
Where did the Algiers immigrants come from?
What was the Catalan immigrant's speech called?
How many Catalan speakers lived in Algiers by 1911?
When did most Catalan speakers leave northern Catalonia?
What declined in the 16th and 17th centuries?
Where did Catalan experience defeat?
When was the war of Spanish Succession?
What did the war in 1714 mandate as the proper language in documentation?
Who was defeated in the War of Spanish Succession?
Where has Catalan always been the only language?
When was the Andorran constitution produced?
What policies are the Andorrans enforcing?
What is an Andorran school policy?
What is the only language of Andorra?
What kind of  shifts are taking place in Catalan speaking areas?
How old are most of the native language speakers in northern Catalonia?
When was it determined that most native speakers in France are 60 or older?
What percentage of primary students study Catalan as a foreign language?
What do 15% of secondary school students study as a foreign language?
What is Catalan being supplanted by in Alicante?
What is Catalan being replaced by in Alghero?
What are the anti-Catalan attitudes in Valencia and Ibiza?
What is another expression for bilingual attitudes?
What is Spanish replacing in Alicante province?
What is Catalan a variety of?
What are the degrees of similarity with Occitan and Gallo-Romance languages?
What are there besides degrees of similarity with Occitan?
What does Catalan share with other Romance languages?
Why does Catalan share many traits with other Romance languages?
What is the similarity between Catalan and Italian?
Hoe similar is Catalan to Portuguese?
What is the percent relationship of Catalan to Spanish?
What is the relationship similarity to Ladin?
How related is Sardinian to Catalan?
What is the origin of language elements found in Catalan and not in Spanish?
What is the origin of some Spanish words?
What has different results in Spanish and Catalan?
What are the linguistic blocks Catalan lies between?
What kind of linguistic choices does Catalan have?
What type of unique choices does Catalan have?
What is the Catalan to miss somebody?
How is Catalan different from other Romance languages?
What other type of endings do Catalan words have?
What kind of final devoicing does the language have?
What do many words feature?
What is the standard pronunciation of Catalan?
What is Central Catalan?
What are the descriptions for?
Where do you look for the pronunciation of different dialects?
What field studies the placement of Catalan in the world?
What is the study of the differenet varieties of Catalan?
What is this a subdiscipline of?
What does it want to do with the language, the speakers, and reality?
What outside affects does this study include?
What do the dialects of Catalan feature?
In comparison to what are the dialects uniform?
What is high among dialects?
What is the percentage of intelligibility between dialects?
What dialect is the exception to intelligibility?
What two dialects does Western Catalan include?
How many dialects are in the eastern group?
To what division does Central Catalan belong?
What other divisions can be made of dialects?
What block does Northwestern Catalan and Valencian belong to?
What comprises the standard pronunciation of Catalan?
Where are the most speakers found?
In what densely populated area is it spoken?
What part of the province of Tarragona is Central Catalan spoken?
What do the two blocks of Catalan display differences in?
How can you explain differences in the language groups?
What form is innovative?
What are the two blocks of Catalan?
What does an archaism explain?
What is Standard based on?
What form is excepted by most speakers?
What language forms are not now used in eastern Catalonia?
Where is IEC's standard used?
How is the standard used there?
What is a first person singular  feature of the Balearic standard?
How is Valencian classified?
What kind of Valencan is spoken in Western Catalonia?
Where are the provinces of Lleida and Tarragona?
What forms are mutually intelligible?
What is the percentage of intelligibility between Catalan and Valencian?
What has produced a great deal of controversy?
When did the EU create the European Constitution?
Who gave the EU translations of the European Constitution?
As what can divergence in the groups be shown?
How does central Catalan behave with the groups?
What are the two dialectical groups of Catalan?
What language has a lexical unity?
What can use words from different dialects?
What kind of words are excepted from literary use?
When did the preference of use of words from northern dialects begin?
What affect did this favoring of northern dialects have on other dialects?
What kind of choice is now available in word choice?
What languages have a tendency to lose gender-invariable adjectives?
What is ab example of a gender marked adjective?
What would be the traditional form of a gender-invariable adjective?
What is the usual way to make a plural?
What can the addition of the suffix -s produce?
To what are these morphological changes similar?
What is an important plural alternation?
What does the large number of omissions  make the determinatives?
What is much like the neighboring languages?
What language does Catalan have more contractions than?
Catalan has less contractions than what language?
What type of word is added to the contraction of the preposition?
What has Central Catalan mostly abandoned?
What other language shares this type of construction?
What is an example of an article +stressed forms?
What is an example of an unstressed possessive?
How many forms of personal pronouns are there in Catalan?
How many personal pronouns are there is Spanish?
What is the number of personal pronouns in Italian?
How many different combinations of unstressed pronouns are there?
What is Catalan verbal inflection ?
What plays a primary part in Catalan?
What plays a secondary part in Catalan?
How are vowel alternances in Catalan?
What system is common to Western Romance?
What have many dialects replaced?
What is the Catalan verbal system common to?
How are Catalan verbs grouped?
Which conjugation has about 3500 verbs?
How many verbs are in the third conjugation?
Which conjugation has less than 100 verbs?
How many surnames does everyone in Spain have?
Which one of one's father's surnames is used?
What is Spain thinking of doing to the two surnames?
What conjunction would be used to join a person's surnames?
What Uralic language branch contains Estonian?
What are two other languages in the Finnic branch?
What language group is Estonian not a part of?
What languages are related to Estonian but not closely?
Who spoke German in what came to be known as Estonia?
Aside from standard German what German language influenced Estonian?
What was the minimum number of waves through which modern Estonians migrated into Estonia?
What are the names of the two separate Estonian languages?
When did the Northern Crusades happen?
Which countries took part in the Northern Crusades?
Following the crusades which country was dominated?
What did the aftermath of the crusades end up delaying in Estonia?
How far back do the first written records of Estonia's Finnic languages go?
Where can records of Estonian place names be found?
Which Chronicle contains the Originates Livoniae?
What was the first Estonian language book to be published?
When were the Kallamaa prayers written?
What was the fate of the Lutheran manuscript printed in 1525?
At what point in its existence was the Lutheran manuscript destroyed?
What two people are responsible for the first still in existence book in the Estonian Language?
In what year was S. Wanradt and J. Koell's book written?
What type of book was it?
What book specifically for the use of priests was printed in Estonian?
What year was the priests' grammar book put into print?
Which Estonian poet's works were printed from 1810 to 1820?
What subjects were Kristjan Jaak Peterson poems on?
When was Peterson born?
What is another name given for Peterson's birthday?
What university did Peterson attend?
In the years between 1918 and 1940 how many Estonian language books were printed?
In the roughly four centuries previous to 1918 how many Estonian language books were printed?
In what language were 14,503 books published prior to 1918?
What year did Estonia's War of Independence take place?
After Estonia achieved independence what was made their state language?
What percentage of Estonians thought of themselves as ethnic Estonian's in 1945?
What language was spoken by ethnic Estonians?
What historical event once again freed Estonia?
Following the Soviet collapse what became the only official Estonian Language?
What language was no longer promoted as one of Estonia's main languages?
What came into being in January 1989?
Following the departure of the Soviet immigrants what was the percentage of Estonians in Estonia?
What other language has a telicity contrast?
Aside from the accusative, where can the direct object of the verb be found?
What is the accusative used for?
From what system is a distinctive future tense lacking?
What is used in place of the future tense?
What does Estonian use to show actions performed by an undecided subject?
What two letters can be replaced with each other a lot of the time in Estonian?
What happens in many cases when a word starts with an 's'?
In an example of replacing 'b' with 'p' how is 'baggage' pronounced?
What is a source for the particles in paper?
What is a common use for paper?
What is the last step in paper production?
When was the pulp papermaking process developed?
What country was the process developed in?
What country is leading in production of paper?
What country is the second largest produced of paper?
Which court eunuch was associated with the papermaking process?
Who is credited with the papermaking process?
What material did paper replace upon its invention?
Which Age did the invention of the papermaking process contribute towards?
What century is the first papermaking process attributed to?
In what century did the papermaking process spread from China to Europe?
Which middle eastern city did the papermaking process to Europe from?
What name did the process take on in Baghdad?
In which century did the process become much cheaper than before?
Which Canadian inventor helped F.G. Keller to develop their own process?
How many chemical pulping processes are there?
What decade does the sulfite process date to?
What process is most commonly used?
What is another process used to pulp straws with high silicate content?
Besides the thermomechanical process, what is a process used in pulping?
What is the main ingredient in the groundwood process?
What strength of paper is produced by mechanical pulps?
Recylced papers can be made with what new type of pulp?
What type of clay improves the characteristics of the pulps used in papermaking?
What is added for sizing purposes?
What besides china clay is used as a filler?
How is the water removed by force from a sheet of paper?
What is used to collect the water expelled from pressing?
What is used to collect water when hand-making paper?
Besides a blotter sheet, what can be used to collect water?
Besides calcium, coated paper has a thin layer of what?
What process is done to polish the surface of the paper?
What is the shiniest type of coated paper?
What papers give the best optical density?
What contraption is used to carry the paper to the web printing presses?
In what manner are sheets normally cut?
If the paper is not to be used in the web printing process, what is done?
What type of paper is produced on a machine like the Fourdrinier?
What is used to apply watermarks and other patterns?
What is in common with the lentgh along and across the grain of paper produced by a machine such as the Fourdrinier?
What leaves a pattern on the paper that has a consistent density width and lengthwise?
What type of lines does wove paper not exhibit?
What are small regular lines left on paper when handmade in a mould?
What runs perpendicular to the laidlines?
Which is lines are commonly higher in density, laidlines or chainlines?
What tool is often used in measuring the thickness of paper?
In the United States, what units are used when stating the measurements of paper thickness?
Someone measuring the thickness of paper in the UK is likely to use what unit?
Sated in inches, what is the common range of paper thickness?
What ISO sizing system does Europe use?
If paper is over 160g what is it considered as?
Besides thickness, what attribute is used in stating the weight of a ream in Europe?
Commercial paper is commonly defined by what?
Most commercial paper in North America is cut in what manner?
Standard paper sizes are usually described with what terms?
What is the lightest density of paper produced?
What is the common density of printing paper?
What acidic salts were commonly found in the early types of paper produced?
Early papermakers added alum to help in what process?
How was rag paper superior to the early types of paper made using alum?
What particle is associated with the yellowing of newspapers?
A book is likely made with paper that has low amounts of what component of wood?
What does lignin react to to produce the yellowing you see in newspapers?
Who sponsored the tests that show that all papers are subject to acid decay?
Besides formic, acetic, and lactic acid, what type of acid does cellulose produce?
How many times more yield does the mechanical pulping process produce when compared to to the chemical pulping process?
What type of process is used to produce most paper used in paperback books?
What level of acid is usually found in the paper used by book publishers?
In the last 40 years, how much has worldwide paper consumption risen?
What percentage of harvested trees are used in the manufacturing of paper?
What do many paper companies do to ensure the health of forests?
What percentage of wood pulp comes from old-growth trees?
What percentage of total waste can be attributed to paper?
How many millions of tons of paper are wasted in the US each year?
How many paper cups are used by Americans each year?
How many pages are printed by the average office worker in the US each day?
What process of papermaking is most heavily linked to the pollution?
How are humans commonly exposed to the byproducts of the bleaching process?
Where are dioxins stored in our animal sources of food?
What agency internationally regulates dioxins?
What product used in the sale ofpaper is newly used by manufacturers in an effort to be more environmentally friendly?
What is the main benefit of using paperfoam over traditional shrink-wrap?
What is paperfoam primarily made of?
How is paperfoam commonly disposed of?
What is newly used as a coating in high grease applications?
Popcorn bags produced modernly are likely to use what type of coating?
PFOA is what type of coating?
When was the football league established?
Where is football played?
What does AFL sand for?
Who founded The AFL?
In what year was the AFL founded?
In what decade was AFL sport invented?
Who was the founder of the Arena Football League?
What was the inaugural year of the AFL?
Where does the Arena Football League rank amongst professional football leagues in North America by longevity?
In yards, how large is an arena football field?
What fraction of the size of an NFL football field is an arena football field?
As of 2016, how many regular season games does an AFL team play?
How long is the AFL regular season?
In what month did the 2015 AFL season begin?
What month did the 2015 AFL season end?
What is the name of the AFL championship game?
What was the name of the AFL development league?
When did the AFL development league begin?
When was the first AFL season played?
What Arena Football League season was cancelled?
In what city and state is the Arena Football League based?
Who was Jim Foster's employer prior to his founding the Arena Football League?
What was Jim Foster viewing when he came up with the idea for arena football?
Where was Jim Foster when he came up with the idea for arena football?
In what year did Jim Foster conceive of the idea of arena football?
What television network agreed to broadcast an arena football test game?
What football league began in 1982?
What team in the USFL did Jim Foster work for?
When did the USFL shut down?
On what date was the arena football test game played?
What was Foster's job title with the Chicago Blitz?
In what city and state did the arena football test game take place?
At what venue did the test game occur?
Along with the Rockford Metros, what was the name of the other team that played in the test game?
On what date did the second test game take place?
The second test game was played in what arena?
How many teams did the Arena Football League originally have?
Along with the Chicago Bruisers, Denver Dynamite and Pittsburgh Gladiators, what team was one of the original AFL teams?
What was the title of Darrell Davis in the AFL?
What was Darrell Davis' nickname?
Who was responsible for hiring the first coaches of the AFL teams?
On what date was the inaugural game of the AFL played?
Along with the Commandos, who played in the first Arena Football League game?
How many spectators watched the first Arena Football League game?
On what date was the first AFL game that aired on television?
At what venue did the first televised Arena Football League game occur?
On what date did Foster apply for a patent on arena football?
When did the United States Patent and Trademark Office grant Foster's patent?
On what date was the expiration of Foster's patent?
With whom did Foster file his patent?
In 1987, what television station sometimes showed arena football games?
In the early years of arena football, after what hour were games often aired?
What AFL game was broadcast on ABC?
In what year did ABC broadcast an Arena Football League game?
On what ABC program was an AFL game shown?
Who was the coach of the Pittsburgh Gladiators in 1989?
What day of the week was July 23, 1989?
Who was the commissioner of the AFL in 1989?
What paper featured a photograph of the head coach of the Gladiators punching the commissioner of the AFL?
In what arena were the Gladiators playing the Bruisers on July 23, 1989?
Where did the Drive franchise relocate to?
Before what season did the Drive move to a different state?
What is the name of the AFL team based in Tampa Bay?
What team is cited as a rival of the Tampa Bay franchise?
What team was the rival of the Arizona Rattlers?
What team did the New York CityHawks become after moving to Hartford?
What city did the Sea Wolves move to?
How many seasons were the CityHawks in New York?
How long did the Sea Wolves stay in Hartford?
How many seasons did the Toronto Phantoms last?
What AFL team did Kurt Warner play for?
Kurt Warner was the Most Valuable Player in what Super Bowl?
What NFL team did Kurt Warner play for?
What television network did the AFL sign a deal with in 2000?
What was the name of the AFL team based in New Orleans?
How many games made up the AFL season in 2003?
In what year did the rules first forbid players running out of bounds?
In what year was the ArenaBowl first played at a neutral location?
What year introduced the free substitution rule?
What year saw a rules change that had an impact on the role of the "jack" linebacker?
Who was the commissioner of the Arena Football League for the first half of 2008?
For how many years did David Baker serve as commissioner of the AFL?
On what date did Baker step down as commissioner of the AFL?
What Arena Football League event occurred two days after Baker's resignation?
Who temporarily served in the commissioner's post after Baker's departure?
What team shut down in October 2008?
Who made the announcement that the VooDoo were shutting down?
What business wanted to buy a stake in the AFL?
How large a stake did Platinum Equity want to buy in the AFL?
What publication announced the Platinum Equity business deal?
On what date was the dispersal draft first scheduled to occur?
To what date was the dispersal draft first delayed?
After the second delay, when was the dispersal draft schedule to occur?
When was free agency first scheduled to begin?
When was free agency scheduled to begin after the delay?
What numbered season did Arenafootball2 in 2009?
In what month and year was it decided to suspend the 2009 Arena Football League season?
What National Hockey League season was cancelled?
What led the National Hockey League to cancel the 2004-2005 season?
Who owned the Columbus Destroyers in 2008?
What was the job title of Ed Policy?
After Ed Policy resigned, what franchise closed?
How many weeks after Policy's resignation did the Avengers fold?
How long after the shuttering of the Avengers did the league fail to ratify the new collective bargaining agreement?
What reason did Policy give for his resignation?
On what date was it reported that the AFL was considering bankruptcy?
What publication reported that the Arena Football League was thinking about filing bankruptcy?
How much debt was the AFL reported to have as of July 20, 2009?
What type of bankruptcy was the league reportedly thinking about filing in July 2009?
On what date did the AFL announce that it was not shutting down?
What percent of af2 was owned by the AFL?
On what date was af2 regarded as disbanded?
What legal entity was created by af2 league owners?
Along with the Orlando Predators, what former Arena Football League team joined af2?
What Arena Football League season was suspended?
Who owned the Dallas Desperados?
When was an auction announced for the Arena Football League's assets?
When did the auction for the Arena Football League's assets take place?
Who won the auction for the AFL's assets?
What was the purchase price for the Arena Football League's assets?
On what date did AF1 announce that it would be called the Arena Football League?
What television network was contracted to show Arena Football League games in 2010?
How many expansion teams were announced in 2010?
Along with the Dallas Vigilantes, what expansion team was announced in 2010?
What anniversary did the Arena Football League celebrate in 2012?
What was the first day of the 2015 AFL season?
To what city did the Tulsa Talons relocate?
Who bought the Tampa Bay Storm in 2012?
What event resulted in the postponement of the AFL free agency period?
On what date did the AFL announce its title sponsorship deal?
What business was the title sponsor of the AFL?
What was the league renamed after the title sponsorship deal?
When did the AFL title sponsorship deal come to an end?
How many years did the AFL title sponsorship deal last?
What was the name of the Los Angeles-based team added in 2013?
Along with Paul Stanley, who owned the Los Angeles Kiss?
Other than the Los Angeles Kiss, what expansion team entered in the league in 2013?
Paul Stanley and Gene Simmons are members of what musical group?
Who was the first president of the AFL?
What was Jerry Kurz's job title prior to being president of the AFL?
Who became commissioner of the AFL after Jerry Kurz?
Where did Scott Butera work prior to becoming AFL commissioner?
What was Scott Butera's job title prior to becoming AFL commissioner?
What day of the week was October 30, 2015?
At what team's game was an announcement by the AFL supposed to happen on October 30?
Who worked as an AFL spokesman during this period?
What prior AFL franchise was based in Austin?
Along with the San Antonio Talons, what AFL franchise did San Antonio host at one time?
Who were the defending champions of the Arena Football League?
When was it announced that the SaberCats would be shutting down?
What was the reason given for the closing of the SaberCats?
How many AFL teams are operating as of 2016?
On what date did the AFL take control of one of its teams?
What team did the league take control of?
Who owned the trademark to the Portland Thunder?
Who owned the Desperados trademarks?
Who is commissioner of the Arena Football League?
On what date did the league announce its schedule for 2016?
How many teams are active in the AFL for 2016?
How many regular season games will each team play in 2016?
How many weeks will the 2016 regular season last?
On the weekend of what holiday will all teams have a bye?
A contract with what television network led to the discontinuation of exhibition games in the preseason?
How many games was the regular season in 1996?
How many games were played in the 2001 regular season?
How many games long was the 2011 regular season?
How many games will each team play in the 2016 regular season?
What league did the AFL found in China?
When was the AFL's China project announced?
Who is leading the China American Football League?
What television network does Ron Jaworski work for?
What team is Ron Jaworski the majority owner of?
Who created Ganlan Media?
What company is Martin Judge the founder of?
In what year was AFL Global created?
In what month was an exhibition game planned for Guangzhou?
Who is the Chief Executive Officer of the China American Football League?
When does the CAFL plan on start its first season?
When was the abortive first CAFL season supposed to have taken place?
How many teams participated in the 2015 CAFL tournament?
In what month did the CAFL tournament occur?
In what month did the AFL season originally begin?
After the TV deal, when was the start of the AFL season moved to?
What days were AFL games traditionally played on before the TV deal?
When were most of the AFL's games played after the TV deal?
On what date did the business relationship between the AFL and NBC end?
On what date did ESPN buy a minority share of the AFL?
At minimum, how many regular season games did the AFL agree to broadcast?
On what day would most of the games televised on the ESPN networks be played?
What network broadcast ArenaBowl XXI?
Under the deal, how many AFL playoff games did ESPN broadcast each year?
Affiliates of what network broadcast Arizona Rattlers games?
What cable network did the AFL sign a regional contract with?
After a hiatus, in what year did the AFL begin operations again?
What cable television network signed a broadcast deal with the AFL in 2010?
On what day would AFL games be shown on NFL Network?
What streaming service broadcast AFL games that were not on NFL Network?
What was the cost to watch AFL games on Ustream?
In what year did AFL games temporarily cease to be broadcast on NFL Network?
Why did the temporary cessation of game broadcasts occur?
Why did the NFL Network begin to broadcast games again?
On what day was an AFL game broadcast live on NFL Network?
At what time of day was an AFL game shown on Fridays on NFL Network?
Who was the AFL's 2013 national broadcast partner?
How many regular season games were shown by CBS Sports Network in 2013?
How many 2013 playoff games did CBSSN broadcast?
On what channel was the 2013 ArenaBowl broadcast?
In 2013, on what day were Arena Football League games usually broadcast on CBS Sports Network?
Who was the Arena Football League's 2014 broadcast partner?
What app were Arena Football League games broadcast on in 2014?
Along with the ESPN networks, on what network were 2014 AFL games broadcast?
On what channel could one watch ArenaBowl XXVII live?
What was the first Arena Football League video game?
For what system was the first Arena Football League video game released?
In what year was the first Arena Football League video game released?
On what date was Kurt Warner's Arena Football Unleashed released?
Who made Kurt Warner's Arena Football Unleashed?
In what year did the AFL begin operating under the single-entity model?
Who owns the rights to the players under the single-entity model?
What model of ownership is commonly used in American professional sports?
What was the AFL's average per-game attendance in 2010?
In the 2010 season, how many teams drew an average of more than 13,000 fans per game?
What team drew more than 13,000 fans per game in 2010?
Along with pop, soul, rhythm and blues, quiet storm, and rock, what musical style influenced adult contemporary?
What was the prevailing style of adult contemporary music in the 1970s?
What type of adult contemporary music was popular in the 1960s?
What does the acronym AC stand for?
Along with easy listening, adult contemporary is a modern day continuation of what style of music?
What type of song is frequently seen in the adult contemporary genre?
Along with synthesizers, what electronic instruments sometimes appear in modern adult contemporary?
What general type of instruments tend to be used in adult contemporary?
What electric instrument is often seen in adult contemporary?
Along with being faint, what characteristic is usually present in electric guitars used in adult contemporary?
What is lite AC otherwise known as?
What is Christian AC a subgenre of?
Along with hot, soft, urban and Christian AC, what is another prominent time of adult contemporary music?
From what decade of easy listening radio does adult contemporary trace its heritage?
Generally speaking, what percentage of music on easy listening stations was instrumental?
On what date was the Billboard easy listening chart first published?
How many songs were on the first Billboard easy listening chart?
Who performed the first #1 on the easy listening chart?
Along with Frank Sinatra, Doris Day, Johnny Mathis, Nat King Cole, and Perry Como, who was a prominent early adult contemporary radio artist?
What type of covers of pop and rock songs were usually played on adult contemporary?
What songs from the 1940s and 1950s would adult contemporary stations play?
What chart did the Easy Listening chart begin to diverge from?
In what year did the Easy Listening and Hot 100 charts begin to diverge?
Along with Roger Miller and Barbra Streisand, who was a successful Easy Listening artist in this era?
Why did the crossover between Hot 100 and Easy Listening decrease?
During what decade did rock and roll music first rise to popularity?
What does the acronym MOR stand for?
Along with pre-rock standards, what type of older songs did MOR stations play?
What was another term for easy listening stations?
Easy listening was predominately what type of music?
What types of tracks from popular artists did adult contemporary radio play?
What type of format were adult contemporary and easy listening stations meant to share?
As of what year was hard rock a mainstream type of music?
Along with soft rock, what type of music made up mainstream rock music in the late 1960s?
What type of instruments were prominent in soft rock? 
What genre of music was soft rock descended from?
Along with Barbra Streisand, Carole King, Cat Stevens and Bread, who was a prominent soft rock artist of this era?
At the end of what decade did the Hot 100 and Easy Listening charts begin to converge?
During the middle and early parts of what decade did the similarity of Easy Listening and Hot 100 increase?
How did Top 40 radio what ifmusic change during this era?
With Elton John and the Eagles, what was a prominent adult contemporary artist in this period?
During what period was adult contemporary its most commercially successful?
What artist released the best selling album of the 1970s?
In what year was the best selling album of the 1970s released?
What radio stationed owned by NBC played only soft rock?
Who was a prominent figure at NBC's radio division?
What genre of music was was listening to by a different demographic than hard rock?
In what decade did genres begin to diverge on the basis of demographic groups?
Along with Linda Ronstadt, Elton John, Rod Stewart and Elvis Presley, what rock musician sometimes had songs featured on adult contemporary radio?
During what period were artists like Anne Murray and Barbra Streisand featured on Top 40 radio?
Along with rock and roll, what genre of music was sometimes featured on Easy Listening radio?
What genre of music was surprisingly successful on adult contemporary radio?
What type of musicians were artists such as Diana Ross, James Taylor, Carly Simon, Carole King and Janis Ian?
When did the Adult Contemporary chart receive its current name?
What was the Adult Contemporary chart previously known as?
Along with rap/hip-hop, what genre of music were aging listeners not as interested in?
During what decade did adult contemporary become a very popular format for radio?
Along with Richard Marx, Bonnie Tyler, George Michael, Phil Collins, and Laura Branigan, what artist was also frequently played on Contemporary Hit Radio stations?
What television station was responsible for the increasing success of Contemporary Hit Radio artists on the AC charts?
Along with Barbra Streisand, the Carpenters, Dionne Warwick, Barry Manilow and Olivia Newton-John, what adult contemporary staple found it more difficult to score chart hits in the 1980s?
Who did Allmusic refer to as "one of the most successful pop and adult contemporary singers of the '80s and beyond"?
In the 1970s, what two genres were not particularly successful on the adult contemporary charts?
What genres, featured on the CHR radio format, were rarely found on adult contemporary radio?
During what decade did hip-hop begin to be featured on the radio?
Along with electronic pop, what type of music was the most successful in the 1980s?
What genre did the music of Billy Ocean belong to?
What was the longest that a song spent at #1 on the adult contemporary charts in the 1980s?
In what year did Lionel Richie record "You Are"?
Aside from the adult contemporary chart, on what other chart did Lionel Richie's "Hello" reach the top spot?
What artist issued the album known as "the first true Adult Contemporary album of the decade"?
In what year was the album Cry Like a Rainstorm, Howl Like the Wind released?
What male singer featured on several songs from Cry Like a Rainstorm, Howl Like the Wind?
What certification did Cry Like a Rainstorm, Howl Like the Wind receive?
Along with "Don't Know Much," what single won a Grammy?
What decade saw the emergence of alternative rock?
What happened to urban R&B in the early 1990s?
The resurgence of traditional pop was one of the factors that led to what change in the music market?
Mainstream artists from what decade generally did not have success on the adult contemporary charts?
Along with All-4-One, Boyz II Men, Rob Thomas, Christina Aguilera and Backstreet Boys, what 90s artists were notable in the pop/R&B genre?
What genre of music did Lynda Thomas, Ricky Martin, Selena, Marc Anthony, Enrique Iglesias and Luis Miguel make?
What milestone did Celine Dion, Mariah Carey, Phil Collins, Michael Bolton, Whitney Houston and Shania Twain share on the 1990s adult contemporary charts?
Along with Sarah McLachlan, Natalie Merchant, Melissa Etheridge and Sheryl Crow, what female singer-songwriter had chart success in the 1990s?
On what chart did Whitney Houston see success?
What was the name of the chart created by Billboard in 1996?
Adult Top 40 represented a midpoint between what two radio formats?
What chart is the Adult Top 40 chart sometimes confused with?
What radio programming genre is sometimes confused with the Hot Adult Contemporary Tracks chart?
Who invented the term "urban adult contemporary format"?
What demographic group is the urban adult contemporary format marketed to?
What style of singing is absent from R&B played on urban adult contemporary format stations?
Along with R&B, gospel and dance music, what type of music is represented on urban adult contemporary stations?
Urban adult contemporary music came into being because of pressure on what previously existing format?
Who performed the song "Unbreak My Heart"?
What is the name of a notable dance artist along with C&C Music Factory and Black Box?
What radio station format plays soft AC, hot AC, disco and dance?
What artist notably remixed "Unbreak My Heart"?
What radio station format was sometimes regarded as a type of adult contemporary?
What type of music was predominantly played on smooth jazz stations?
Along with Kenny G and Dave Koz, what artist was featured on smooth jazz stations?
What other format of station were smooth jazz artists sometimes featured on?
What is Adrian Moreira's job title?
For what company does Adrian Moreira work?
Who wrote, "In other words, AC stations are where pop songs go to die a very long death. Or, to optimists, to get a second life"?
Where was Corey Moss' article published?
When do adult contemporary stations begin to play Top 40 songs?
Who have hot AC format radio stations had to change the music they play?
By what two genres are modern pop songs heavily influenced?
Why is new rock not suitable for mainstream radio?
What was the name of DJ Sammy's mix of "Heaven"?
Who recorded the song "Listen To Your Heart"?
Who is known for the song "Everytime We Touch"?
What artist performed the song "Forget You"?
What version of P!nk's "Perfect" appeared on adult contemporary radio in 2011?
What genre of music are bands like Feist and Wilco?
Along with Mumford & Sons, Of Monsters & Men, Ed Sheeran and The Lumineers, what indie artist has had adult contemporary success?
In what decade did indie musicians first began getting attention from the adult contemporary audience?
Along with the recession, what broad economic trend marked the decline of adult contemporary radio stations?
Along with CHR, Top 40 and Latino, what format have former AC stations transitioned to?
What AC format is still viable?
Declining sales of what items harmed the adult contemporary genre?
Generally speaking, what is the earliest decade represented by the "oldies" on soft AC stations?
Along with R&B, pop and rock, what genre of music is represented on modern soft AC stations?
What genre of music do new songs on soft AC stations often belong to?
During what period did soft AC stations attempt to reinvent themselves?
What radio format was described as being "the acoustic equivalent to Prozac"?
What decade saw the birth of the soft adult contemporary format?
What radio station introduced the term "soft rock"?
Where was the station that introduced the term "soft rock" based?
What processed meat, featured in WEEI-FM's ad slogan, rhymes with Joni?
Along with romantic and sexual relationships, family and work, what do soft adult contemporary songs sometimes discuss?
Music from what two decades is notably featured on the soft AC format?
Along with classic R&B, what genre is notably featured on soft AC stations?
What radio station format is soft AC often contrasted with?
What radio station formats faced demographic pressures in the 1960s and 70s?
What radio station format is facing demographic pressures in the present day?
What radio station format have many of the former soft AC artists moved to?
Certain soft AC stations have found a niche on the radio by doing what?
Why are adult standards format radio stations declining?
Along with Andy Williams, Johnny Mathis, Nana Mouskouri, Celine Dion, Julio Iglesias, Barry Manilow, Engelbert Humperdinck, and Marc Anthony, what notable artist is featured on the soft AC format?
Along with classic hits, what type of music do hot adult contemporary stations feature?
What is the primary audience of hot adult contemporary format stations?
What demographic do hot AC stations featuring more pop and alternative rock focus on?
Along with urban and rhythmic dance tracks, what genre is featured on hot AC stations with a younger audience?
Madonna, Cher, Gloria Estefan and Kylie Minogue are artists in what genre of music?
What type of band are Backstreet Boys and Westlife?
What genre of music is played by Westlife?
What genre of music is played by The Eagles?
What is the target age range of Hot AC stations?
What station did Mike Marino work for in 1997?
Where was the radio station KMXB based in 1997?
What age demographic is modern rock radio focused on?
What is the sex of the listeners modern rock radio is geared towards?
Unlike modern rock radio, what sex is adult contemporary radio said to appeal to?
What age group is Urban AC focused towards?
What race is the target demographic of Urban AC radio?
Who is an example of an artist played on Urban AC format radio stations?
What is the name of the popular album released by Des'ree?
What is the ethnicity of artists commonly played on urban adult contemporary radio?
What other adult contemporary radio format is urban AC similar to?
What genre of music is not played frequently on urban AC?
What two genres of music are popular on urban AC?
Along with Trey Songz, Patti LaBelle, Toni Braxton, Whitney Houston, Aretha Franklin, Frank Ocean, Craig David and Mariah Carey, who is a well-known urban AC artist?
What adult contemporary radio format is urban AC not similar to?
What radio format is similar to urban AC but features older soul and R&B songs?
What is the earliest decade of music typically featured on the rhythmic oldies format?
What is the most recent decade music from which music can be heard on a rhythmic oldies station?
What is the target demographic of the rhythmic oldies format?
What radio format consists of ballads and slow jams?
What is the name of the radio format that is a mixture of urban and soft adult contemporary?
At what time of day is the quiet storm format played?
What is the typical ethnicity of artists played on quiet storm stations?
Along with Freddie Jackson, Johnny Gill, Teena Marie, Lalah Hathaway, Toni Braxton, and En Vogue, what artist is popular on quiet storm stations?
Along with urban adult contemporary and smooth jazz, what station format might feature music from Sade?
What other format is sometimes played on urban AC stations?
When might you hear smooth jazz on a soft AC station?
What is a more recent name for the smooth jazz format?
What was the smooth jazz format renamed?
Along with soft AC, on what station format might adult contemporary R&B be featured?
What features are emphasized in adult contemporary R&B music?
Along with smooth soul and quiet storm, what genre influenced adult contemporary R&B?
During what decade was smooth soul popular?
Along with drum machines and synthesizers, what electronic instruments are often found in modern R&B-based music?
What genre of music did Patti Austin perform?
Of what genre was the musician Keith Sweat?
During what decade were musicians like Al Jarreau and Luther Vandross notably successful?
What type of songs was Leona Lewis known for?
Who wrote Boyz II Men's I'll Make Love to You?
What is CCM an acronym of?
What genre of music is performed by MercyMe?
What publication includes Christian AC with its format charts?
Along with mainstream AC, what format has also featured Christian AC artists on a crossover basis?
When does Christmas music on AC format stations usually begin?
When is the earlier of the two times that Christmas music on adult contemporary stations typically ends?
When is the later of the two times that Christmas music on adult contemporary stations usually ends?
When is the earliest an AC station will switch to a Christmas format?
What two formats pioneered the Christmas music tradition in the 1960s?
In what century was the term matter defined excluding energy phenomena like light and sound?
What term is used for the substance that composes all observable physical objects?
The mass of an object can come from the motion of its constituents or what other source?
What term is used to describe the type of definition that matter would have if all scientists could agree on its definition?
Prior to the 20th century, the definition of matter included any object that had mass even when it was in what state? 
What similar term is often used interchangeably with matter, although the two differ slightly in modern physics?
Being a conserved quantity means that the value of mass doesn't ever change as long as it's in what kind of system?
Special relativity says matter can disappear by conversion into what state?
What planet isn't a closed system but sometimes appears to be because of the approximate conservation of matter?
What year did the construction of the church begin?
Who commissioned the Abbey to be built?
What was the area previously named?
In what century was the church established at the location?
Who was the Bishop in this time frame?
What is the meaning of Thorn Ey?
When was a church first founded at the site?
Who was Mellitus?
When was construction of the present church started?
Who ordered the construction of the church?
What was the name of the fisherman in lore that saw a vision of Saint Peter near the Abbey?
What type of fish did the Abbey receive from Thames fisherman?
What kind of monks lived at the Abbey?
Who, till this day still gives the Abbey a fish?
Who along with the King Edgar established the monks at the Abbey?
Who supposedly had a vison of Saint Peter on the River Thames?
Who first gifted salmon to the abbey?
Who still gives salmon to the abbey today?
When was the monk community installed?
What architectural design was St Peter's abbey considered?
What year was the building finished?
What was the date of the Abbey's coronation? 
Who was the first recorded coronation at the Abbey?
What King restored the Abbey in the years 1042 and 1052?
Who rebuilt the abbey for a burial church?
What style was the church rebuilt in?
When was the building consecrated?
When did King Edward the Confessor die?
Who was the first documented coronation?
Who were the first monarchs crowned at Westminster Abbey?
Since when have coronations been held at Westminster Abbey?
How many royal weddings have occurred at the abbey?
Which two reigning monarchs had weddings at the abbey?
When did royal weddings begin at the church?
Where is the only existant depiction of Edward's abbey?
What was the original size of Dunstan's original monk community?
How was the community able to increase?
What is adjacent the abbey?
Who became a powerful force after the Norman Conquest?
The Palace of Westminster was the seat of what from the later 12th century?
Who was employed on royal service?
With what kind of life were the Benedictines allowed to identify?
To what movement was the task of spiritual leadership passed?
What did the abbot remain as a town built around the abbey?
What did the monastery help fuel?
What did the abbey build on the west side?
What encroached upon the sanctuary?
What was the abbey to Norman kings?
What architect continued work on the abbey?
Who was reigning when Henry Yevele finished his work on the abbey?
What kind of pavement was commissioned for in front of the High Altar?
What played a large role in King Edward the Confessor's canonisation?
Who added a Perpendicular style chapel?
Who was the Perpendicular style chapel dedicated to?
What part of France did the Caen stone come from?
Where did the Portland stone come from?
When was the Lady Chapel added?
When did Henry VIII take direct royal control?
Who gave the abbey status of a cathedral in 1540?
What did the cathedral status save the abbey from?
What did changing the status of the abbey create?
When was Westminster Diocese dissolved?
The abbey was recognised as what until 1556?
Who is the abbey dedicated to?
When did the abbey suffer damage?
Who attacked the abbey?
What protected the abbey?
Who had a fancy funeral at the abbey in 1658?
When was Oliver Cromwell disinterred?
When were the western towers built?
Who built the western towers of the abbey?
What kind of marble was used for the walls and floors of the abbey?
Under whom did the 19th century rebulding occur?
What were the two western towers built from?
What was designed for the west front of the abbey but not built?
When was the narthex designed?
The abbey was without towers following the renovation by whom?
Westminster Abbey was the third highest place of learning after which two places?
The first third of what was translated at the abbey?
The last half of what was also translated at the abbey?
The New English Bible was composed at the abbey during what time?
Westminster Abbey suffered damage during what on 15 November 1940?
Who painted the icons hung in the abbey in the 1990s?
What was held at the abbey on 6 September 1997?
Who was the first pope to set foot in the abbey?
On what date did the first pope set foot in the abbey?
What nationality was Sergei Fyodorov?
Where was Henry III crowned?
When was Henry III crowned?
Who had taken control of London when Henry III was to be crowned?
Who deemed Henry III's coronation to be improper?
Who is the usual cleric for coronation ceremonies?
What is the name of the throne used for coronation?
What is another name for King Edward's Chair?
Upon what are kings of Scots coronated?
Who had stolen the Stone of Scone?
What kind of church is Westminster Abbey?
Who created Westminster Abbey as the Collegiate Church of St Peter Westminster?
Who governs the church?
Who are the members of the chapter of Westminster?
Who assist the chapter of Westminster?
How many lay vicars are there?
How many choristers are there at the abbey?
When was the office of Priest Vicar created?
Henry III rebuilt the abbey in honour of whom?
When did George II of Great Britain die?
Who was Edward the Confessor?
Where was Henry VI buried?
Where was Richard III buried?
Where were aristocrats buried from the Middle Ages?
Geoffrey Chaucer was employed as what?
Henry Purcell was buried where?
Oliver Cromwell began buring national figures in the abbey starting with whom?
Who was buried in the abbey on 4 April 1727?
Who was buried in the abbey on 26 April 1882?
Who was buried in the abbey on 3 August 1833?
Who was buried next to William Wilberforce?
In the early 20th century it became more common to bury what kind of remains?
In what year was Sir Henry Irving cremated?
Who was buried in the south choir aisle in 2014?
What family has the Northumberland Vault?
When was The Unknown Warrior buried?
Where is the memorial chapel of the airmen of the RAF?
The memorial chapel of the airmen of the RAF has a window for what?
The window for the Battle of Britain replaced what that was destroyed?
When was the formal funeral of Diana, Princess of Wales?
When was a second public service held for Princess Diana?
Who designed Diana's dress?
Who gave Diana the rosary beads?
What are also in the precincts of Westminster Abbey?
Who required the Benedictine monks to maintain a charity school?
When were the Benedictine monks required to maintain a charity school?
The choirboys of the abbey are trained where?
Who built the organ?
When was the organ built? 
When was the organ first used?
What was included in the new organ from the previous Hill organ of 1848?
Who designed the two organ cases?
What part of the organ is not connected or playable?
When were the bells overhauled?
How many bells make up the abbey ring?
When were the ten bells cast?
Who cast the abbey bells?
Under whom was the chapter house built?
Who restored the chapter house in 1872?
What style is the octagonal chapter house?
There is an octagonal what below the chapter house?
What kind of ceiling is in the chapter house?
What kind of windows are in the chapter house?
The architecture of the chapter house is contemporary with what?
What kind of tiled pavement is in the chapter house?
A door in the vestible dates back to when?
When were the exterior flying buttresses added?
Who else met in the chapter house?
What formed the undercroft of the monks' dormitory?
When does the Pyx Chamber date to?
When were newly minted coins presented to ensure they met standards?
The Pyx Chamber and chapter house are under guardianship of whom?
Who cares for and manages the Pyx Chamber and chapter house?
English Heritage has funded what for the chapter house?
What is located in the vaulted undercroft beneath the monks' dormitory?
The area the museum occupies dates back to when?
The vaulted undercroft beneath the monks' dormitory has been a museum since when?
What belonging to Henry V is in the museum?
What kind of panels are in the museum?
Who modelled the effigies in the museum?
What are the effigies made of?
What is the effigy of Viscount Nelson wearing?
What was recently added to the museum exhibit?
What is the Westminster Retable?
What was the altarpiece designed for?
What was damaged but cleaned and then conserved?
What will be created in the medieval triforium?
What has been designed to help with the gallery?
When will the new galleries open?
What part of China (North, East, South, West) is Nanjing located?
What does Nanjing have that is considered one of the world's biggest?
What river is Nanjing associated with?
What city was awarded the 2008 Habitat Scroll of Honour of China?
Who was the first emperor of the Ming dynasty?
Who did Zhu Yuanzhang defeat?
What did Zhu Yuanzhang build around the city of Nanjing?
How long did it take to finish the wall?
How many workers worked on the wall?
When was Nanjing considered to be the biggest city in the world?
What was the number of people in Nanjing in 1400?
When did Nanjing cease to be the capital?
Where was the capital moved to?
Who was the third emperor of the Ming dynasty?
What is the name of the famous mausoleum in Nanjing?
Who decimated the Porcelain Tower?
When was the Porcelain Tower destroyed?
One possibility the Tower was destroyed was to prevent it's use by a hostile enemy. What is the other possibility?
When did Beijing lose to Li Zicheng's rebel forces and the Manchu-led Qing dynasty?
What Ming prince was enthroned in Nanjing?
When was Zhu Yousong enthroned?
What was Zhu Yousong's title?
The Hongguang Emperor's reign was thought of as the first reign of what dynasty?
When did the Hongguang Emperor leave Nanjing, having been defeated?
Who surrendered Nanjing to invaders on June 6?
What did the Manchu's make all the men in the city do?
Who lived in buildings that would later come to be known as the Presidential Palace?
When did Qing troops regain Nanjing?
How many people died during the Qing troops retaking of Nanjing?
Qing troops allowed no rebels who spoke what dialect to surrender?
Who was the leader of the Qing troops?
When was the Republic of China founded?
Who was the first president of the Republic of China?
Who moved the capital from Nanjing to Beijing?
When was Nanjing re-established as the capital of the Republic of China?
What party established Nanjing as the capital of the Republic of China?
Who was the leader of the Kuomintang (KMT; Nationalist Party)?
What are the 1930's known as, in China?
When did the Kuomintang (KMT; Nationalist Party) defeat and take over Beijing?
When did Japan invade Manchuria?
When did Japan invade all of China?
Who killed innocent civilians in the Nanking Massacre?
How many died in the Nanking Massacre?
When was the Nanjing Massacre Memorial Hall built?
When was the National Government of China moved to Chungking?
When was the Nanjing Regime established?
Who was the leader of the Nanjing Regime?
When did the KMT move back to Nanjing?
What was another name for the Nanjing Regime?
When did the Communist troops cross the Yangtze River?
When was Nanjing conquered by the Communist People's Liberation Army (PLA)?
Where did the KMT government stay until October 15?
When did the KMT government head to Taiwan?
When was the People's Republic of China formed?
What city is northeast of Nanjing?
What is southeast of Nanjing?
What province is to the west of Nanjing?
How many prefecture-size cities are in the province of Anhui?
What city is on the border of Nanjing to the East?
How many types of minerals are found in Nanjing?
Which minerals comprise 40 percent of those in the province?
For what mineral reserve does Nanjing rank first in both East Asia and the South East Asia areas?
What are Nanjing's main water sources?
What hot spring is in Jiangning?
When did a thick wave of smog first appear in Central and Eastern China?
How long was Nanjing ranked as "severely polluted" during this wave?
On what days did Nanjing have to issue a Red Alert because of the severe air pollution?
What is the full name for Nanjing's government?
How many parties rule Nanjing?
What party rules Nanjing?
Who is considered to be the governor of Nanjing?
who is the executive leader of Nanjing, working under the secretary?
What was the population of Nanjing in 2010?
What was the estimated population of Nanjing in 2011?
How was the population figure for 2010 obtained?
What was Nanjing's birth rate?
How many people were considered to be living in the urban portion of Nanjing?
What is the overwhelming ethnic majority in Nanjing?
What minority nationality is most common?
What is the second most common minority group in Nanjing?
How many people of Manchu descent live in Nanjing?
How many minority nationality types does Nanjing contain?
In addition to textiles, what other industry is Nanjing known for, since the Three Kingdoms period?
Why is Nanjing so strong in textiles and minting?
During what dynasty was Nanjing the biggest business center in all of East Asia?
In what dynasty were textiles particularly popular?
During the textile boom, how many jobs were created?
In what time period did Nanjing transform from a producer to more of a consumer city?
What mostly caused the shift to a consumer city?
What is Zhongyang Shangchang?
In what year did the revenue of food and entertainment eclipse the output of industry?
How much of the population worked in a service capacity at that time?
What type of industries are now dominant in Nanjing?
How much of the city's GDP do the service industries contribute to?
Companies such as Huawei, ZTE and Lenovo have built what in Nanjing?
Companies such as Ford, IBM, Lucent, Samsung and SAP have built what in Nanjing?
The top 3 industries in Nanjing are?
What was Nanjing's GDP in 2013?
What was Nanjing's GDP per person in 2013?
Was the GDP in 2013 an increase or decrease over 2012's levels?
How was Nanjing's unemployment rate, compared to the nation as a whole?
What was Nanjing's GDP ranking in all of China for 2013?
What are the three types of transport in Nanjing?
What is the most popular method of travel for citizens?
How many bridges does Nanjing have over the Yangtze River?
How many tunnels does Nanjing have over the Yangtze River?
Where is the city centre located?
What are the main types of public transportation?
How many companies are involved with the network of buses?
How many stations are there in total in the Nanjing metro system?
When does Nanjing expect to finish it's light rail line?
How many bus routes are there in Nanjing?
What is Nanjing's airport called?
How many routes does Nanjing's airport run?
How many passengers did the airport service in 2013?
When did the airport open for business?
What airport was the primary airport before Lukou?
What is the largest inland port for China?
How long is the Port of Nanjing?
How many berths does the Port contain?
When did Longtan Containers Port Area open up?
How many containers can Longtan Containers Port Area handle?
When was the very first Nanjing Yangtze River Bridge finished?
What was the symbolism of the bridge?
When did the Nanjing Yangtze River Bridge first open for traffic?
What type of design is the bridge?
How many more bridges have been built since the first one was completed?
How many ancient capitals does China have in its history?
What type of people does Nanjing draw because of its culture?
In what dynasties did poets congregate in Nanjing?
When did the city serve as the official imperial examination centre?
What was the name of the examination centre?
Where do some of the country's most prominent art groups call home?
Which opera company is based in Nanjing?
What art company is based in Nanjing?
Name two dance groups that are based in Nanjing:
What is the name of China's oldest stage art?
What is one of the best theatres for Kunqu?
What type of troupe is Jiangsu Province Kun Opera considered to be?
What other types of operas are performed in Nanjing?
What other types of theater performance are seen in Nanjing?
What is the name of the largest art gallery in Jiangsu Province?
What type of art does Jiangsu Art Gallery contain?
What are two smaller galleries in Nanjing?
What type of exhibitions do Red Chamber Art Garden and Jinling Stone Gallery show?
When was the festival of climbing on the city wall celebrated?
On March 3, what festival was celebrated in ancient times?
What did citizens used to do on September 9?
Where can one find the dates of more old festivals?
How many of these old festivals are still celebrated by residents of Nanjing?
What city is considered to be a place that is popular with tourists?
Rather than host the old festivals, what type of events does Nanjing host each year?
What area holds the largest collection of plum blossoms in all of China?
Where do the tourists for the Plum Blossom Festival come from?
What festival involves kites and fruit trees?
When was the Nanjing Library completed?
What is the Nanjing Library's ranking in China?
How many volumes does the Nanjing Library have?
What is the name of the fifth largest library in China?
Which university library is larger than Nanjing University Library?
What city contains some of the finest and oldest museums in all of China?
What is the previous name of the Nanjing Museum?
Which museum was the first modern one in China?
What collections are the Nanjing Museum famous for?
How many items does the Nanjing Museum contain?
What can most of Nanjing's multi-purpose theatres be used for?
What are the two most prominent theatres in Nanjing?
What is the current purpose of The Capital Theatre?
What was the popularity of The Capital Theater, in the past?
Where have Nanjing's after-hours activities typically been located?
What three things were popular in the Nanjing Fuzimiao area?
What was a major night attraction for Nanjing?
What statues are near the ones of teachers and educators?
What is another name for Nanjing Fuzimiao?
When did more commercial streets become built in Nanjing?
What has happened as the result of more commercial streets in Nanjing?
What area has lots of types of recreational outlets?
Other than at "Nanjing 1912", where else are there a lot of bars?
The two areas with a lot of bars are popular with whom?
What is considered to be a typical food for a Nanjing resident?
Which area has the longest history of growing radish?
What does the radish taste like in the spring?
What are Nanjing people called by others?
What does calling someone 'Nanjing big radish' mean they are like?
Generally, what types of teams call Nanjing home?
What is the name of the football club in Nanjing?
What building is home to Jiangsu Sainty?
What is the name of the major basketball team in Nanjing?
What is the name of China's highest level basketball league?
Which sports center started in 1952?
How many major sports centers are located in Nanjing?
What type of sports centers are Wutaishan Sports Center and Nanjing Olympic Sports Center considered to be?
Both Wutaishan Sports Center and Nanjing Olympic Sports Center contain a stadium, gymnasium, natatorium, and what other facility?
When was the Nanjing Olympic Sports Center built?
Why was the Nanjing Olympic Sports Center built?
How many people can Nanjing Olympic Sports Center's stadium hold?
How many people can Nanjing Olympic Sports Center's gymnasium hold?
How many people can Nanjing Olympic Sports Center's natatorium hold?
Nanjing is considered one of the most pretty cities in what region?
How many tourists does Nanjing receive each year?
What type of buildings attract tourists to Nanjing?
List three natural attractions of Nanjing.
What was the designation of Nanjing?
What happened around the time that Nanjing was designated as the capital?
Are any of the structures that were built at that time still around?
The structures that still remain are open to whom?
How long has Nanjing been considered the education hub of southern China?
How many places of higher learning are in Nanjing?
What is Nanjing's nationwide ranking for National key laboratories?
What is Nanjing's nationwide ranking for National key disciplines?
What type of educational institutions are in the area, that Nanjing can brag about?
What is the official language of Bern?
What is the main language spoken in Bern?
What dialect is Bernese German?
What is the official language of Bern?
what year did Bern join the Swiss Confederacy?
How many cantons were there between 1353 to 1481?
What year did Bern invade Aargau?
What is the largest city-state north of the Alps?
What year was there a huge fire?
What was destroyed in the fire?
What year was Bern occupied by French troops?
Why were French troops in Bern?
When did Bern regain control of Bernese Oberland?
What new territory was aquired in 1814?
When did the canton of Jura seceed?
What congresses were held in Bern?
In World War I, what side was Switzerland on?
What percent of the populatin of Bern resident foreigners?
What peninsula is Bern located on?
What was built to help Bern grow bigger than the peninula?
What century did Bern outgrow the peninsula?
What is 33.6% of the land in Bern?
When was the last time the area of Bern was measured?
Who has the majority of the seats in Bern's City Council?
What party also had the mayor as of 2015?
What is the Christian Democratic Party also known as?
Who holds the legislative power?
How many members are part of the City Parliament?
How often are elections held for the City Parliament?
Are the sessions of City Parliament private or public?
What is the main lanuage of Bern?
What is the second most common language?
What percent of the population speaks German?
What did the city decide again?
When did they have a temporary twinned city?
What country is Salzburg in?
How many Swiss men live in Bern?
What percent of the population is born somewhere else in Switzerland?
What percent were born outside of Switzerland?
How many people were single in Bern in 2000?
How many people were married in Bern in 2000?
How many people were widows or widowers in Bern in 2000?
Where there more married or single people in Bern in 2000?
What is the average of people per household in Bern?
How many households have 5 or more people living in them?
What percentage of the apartment homes in Bern were occupied in 2000?
What percent of apartments are seasonal apartments?
What percent of the population were Roman Catholic?
How much of the population is Jewish in Bern?
How many muslims were there in Bern in 2000?
How much of the population had no religion?
Where is the national parliment housed?
What is the Federal Palace called?
Where is Albert Einstein live?
What was published the same years?
What is the flat that Einstein called?
What is the Rose Garden also known as?
What can you see from the Rose Garden?
What was the Rosarium converted into?
What year was the Rosarium converted?
What subtitles are included in the movies?
What is the major hockey league team of Bern?
Where do they play?
What year was the IIHF Ice Hockey World Championship held in Bern?
What year did Bern want to host the Winter Olympics?
What year did they withdraw their bid?
Where were the 2010 Winter Olympics held?
What was Berns unemployment rate in 2010?
How many businesses are there in the primary sector?
How many businesses are there in the secondary sector?
How many businesses are there in the tertiary sector?
How many full time jobs were there in 2008?
How many jobs in the primary sector were agrictulture?
How many jobs in the primary sector were in forestry or lumber production?
How many jobs are in the secondary sector?
How many jobs are in the tertiary secotr?
How many workers commute into the municipality?
How many workers had to commute away from the municipality?
How much of the working population uses public transportation?
How many of the working population use private cars?
What percent of the population has completed non-mandatory upper secondary education?
What percent of the population has completed additionaly higher education?
The majority of the population to finish tertiary schooling in bern are what people?
Do you have to go to the one year of kindergarten?
What seperates the children in secondary school?
How many pupils lived in another municipality?
How many pupils attended school outside of the city?
What connects Marzili to Bundeshaus?
How long is the Marzilibah funicular?
What is the second shortest public railway in Europe?
What is the shortest public railway in Europe?
What term is used interchangeably with daylight saving time?
What period of time do we set our clocks forward in DST?
What do we get an extra hour of because we set the clocks forward?
In what season do regions who practice DST set the clocks back one hour?
By setting the clocks forward, the normal time of what daily event is disrupted?
Who first suggested daylight saving?
From what country did George Hudson hail?
In what year was modern daylight saving first proposed?
Besides Austria-Hungary, what country first put DST into effect?
What used to be the main draw on electricity?
What industry having to do with shopping benefits from DST?
In addition to entertainment events that take place after working hours, what profession might suffer because of DST?
Research on DST is uncertain because we aren't sure how it affects the use of what?
What can be affected by DST that might disrupt plans for a vacation?
When the clock on your laptop adjusts to DST without you resetting the clock, what is controlling the change?
What do jurisdictions sometimes change that mixes up DST dates and times?
What important part of daily life might be disturbed because of DST changing what time you go to bed?
What kind of societies usually follow a regular daily schedule year-round?
What kind of societies rely on solar time and daylight that changes with the seasons?
In what part of the world is daytime shorter in winter and longer in summer?
What is the tilt of the Earth that causes solar time to change called?
How much earlier do people's routines happen because of daylight savings?
In which season is the policy of setting clocks ahead least practical?
Does setting the clocks ahead add an hour of daylight before or after the normal workday?
What is the schedule of time called when it is not daylight savings time?
What two sources of energy use do DST proponents say are reduced by the time change?
What word describes the approximate rates at which sunset and sunrise change with the seasons?
Do those who favor DST say people would rather have an extra hour of daylight before or after their usual workday?
Is it the supporters or opponents of Daylight Saving Time who say it significantly reduces energy use?
What latitudes see more extreme changes in the length of their days and nights throughout the year?
What region of the earth sees little change in daylight from season to season?
How much impact does the times of daylight and night have on areas like Iceland or Alaska?
Would observing Daylight Saving Time have a small or large effect on how light it is during the workday in areas at high latitudes?
As compared to areas with lower latitudes, what kind of change do areas with high latitudes see in the length of day through the seasons?
What kind of clocks did the Romans use?
What did the Romans call the third hour before sunrise?
During the summer solstice, for how many minutes did hora tertia last for the Romans?
What type of religious ceremonies are still observed according to the traditional, unequal time settings?
Who first published the proverb about waking up early and going to bed early to be "healthy, wealthy, and wise"?
Which group of people did Franklin say would save candles by waking up earlier?
In what year did Ben Franklin write a satire suggesting firing cannons at sunrise to wake people up?
What kind of transportation network helped encourage keeping more exact schedules?
In addition to cannon fire, what did Franklin suggest to act as Parisians' alarm clock?
What particular kind of scientist was George Hudson?
What did George Hudson spend time collecting when he wasn't working?
What year did Hudson first present his two-hour daylight saving theory to the Wellington Philosophical Society?
Some people believe it wasn't Hudson who created DST, but an Englishman by what name?
Who was the member of Parliament who brought a bill about Daylight Saving Time to the House of Commons in 1908?
What year did Germany decide to try DST?
What is the German word for Daylight Saving Time?
What natural resource were Germany and Austria-Hungary trying to conserve by using DST?
What year did the United States get on board with DST?
What event in the 1970s led more regions of North America to use DST?
What country joined Canada, the UK, and Ireland in continuing to observe Daylight Saving Time after the war?
Daylight Saving Time was used commonly during what war?
Along with North America, what continent was affected heavily by the 1970s energy crisis?
Has the world seen many or few changes in the observation of DST?
Countries might change their DST policy by enactments, adjustments, and what other type of policy changes?
At what local time does the United States change the time?
Technically, how many hours does the day the time change happens have in the spring?
In the fall, DST means one hour is repeated, which means the day is actually how many hours long?
At the time change to DST, what will a digital clock read just after 01:59:59.9?
Daylight Saving Time is sometimes called summer time, but the clocks are actually moved forward in which season?
During what part of the week is the time change most often scheduled?
What do we avoid disrupting by doing the time shift during days most people don't work?
Which time zone in Europe always has a one-hour lead on Central European Time?
For one hour each spring, how far ahead of Pacific Time is Mountain Time in the United States?
In 2008, what month and day did Western Australia change their clocks?
At DST in the fall, how long does it stay the same time in both Pacific and Mountain time in the United States?
In addition to much of the state of Arizona, what U.S. state does not ever change their clocks for DST?
What year did the European Union standardize their Summer Time?
European Summer Time begins in March and ends in what month?
What act in the U.S. brought about the 2007 change in DST policy?
What government body is allowed to change the DST policy in the United States back to the dates observed from 1987 to 2006?
Supporters of the November end to DST name what U.S. holiday as the justification for keeping the change through the end of October?
In the southern hemisphere, what aspect of DST is about the reverse of that of the northern hemisphere?
At what local time does Chile change their clocks for DST?
What day of the week does DST begin and end in Chile?
In the Northern hemisphere's summer, what is the time difference between the UK and Chile?
During what season in the Southern hemisphere is there a three-hour time difference between mainland Chile and the United Kingdom?
Which part of Brazil observes Daylight Saving Time?
What part of Brazil does not observe DST?
Which two continents that comprise a majority of the population worldwide don't observe DST?
The lack of fluctuation in time for what daily event means regions of the world near the equator don't usually keep DST?
What leader said daylight saving gives people more "opportunities for the pursuit of health and happiness"?
What nickname have people in opposition to DST given it?
In addition to the evening entertainment industry, people from what industry often oppose daylight saving?
Traditionally, retailing, tourism, and what other industry have been in favor of DST?
Along with energy crisis, what other significant historical event led to countries adopting DST?
Which political supporter of Willett's proposal had already used the half-hour version of DST at Sandringham?
What was the name of the director of the Meteorological Office who opposed DST?
What year did Parliament first take a vote and decide against implementing daylight savings?
Who was responsible for bringing a bill proposing DST to the U.S. House of Representatives?
What industrialist from Pittsburgh campaigned strongly in favor of DST?
What year did the U.S. go to war, leading to wider acceptance of daylight savings?
What year did the United States finally adopt Daylight Saving Time?
Which country continued to observe DST nationwide despite the fact that the war had ended?
What spring holiday did Britain adjust its DST schedule around?
After what year was daylight savings repealed in the U.S.?
What sport did President Wilson enjoy that made him not want to give up DST?
What U.S. city kept observing DST to stay in sync with London, leading Chicago and Cleveland to follow along?
What month and year were two neighboring cities in Minnesota on different time schedules?
What state supported DST because it wanted to sell more potatoes?
What company joined Clorox in funding the Daylight Saving Time Coalition in the 1980s?
What year was the extension to U.S. daylight savings proposed by the DST Coalition?
What year did the U.S. see standardization of DST outside of wartime for the first time?
What was the name of the organization that supported adding an additional hour to their clocks all year?
Joining farmers, what other kind of workers opposed SDST?
What regions of the United Kingdom were generally against SDST?
What do Muslims call the month when they fast between sunup and sundown?
What would DST delay if observed during the Muslim holy month?
What Muslim country continues to observe DST during Ramadan?
When was Ramadan in 2012?
What year did Russia decide to never turn its clocks back?
What country other than Russia declared they'd stay in DST all year?
Was Russia or Belarus first in their declaration?
Which season's dark mornings led to people complaining about the switch from DST?
What year did Russia give up on the all-year DST and go back to Standard Time?
Which group is more likely to support DST: urban workers or rural farmers?
If people have more daylight in the evenings, what season might see a rise in outdoor activity?
Would those in favor of DST argue that it causes people to use more electricity or saves energy?
What major health risk do people who oppose DST say it increases?
What profession is more likely to want to repeal DST: farmers or shopkeepers?
What adjective would those against DST use to describe the energy savings touted by supporters?
What time of day do opponents of daylight savings believe is disrupted the most by the time shift?
Most people agree that a standardized schedule by DST is more practical than trying to do what in the morning on our own?
What electronic device might people work their schedules around instead of paying close attention to DST?
During what season is DST usually not observed because of the detriments of dark mornings?
What indirect benefit of DST might cause some areas to observe it even though they don't get any direct benefits like cost or energy savings?
What percentage of all electricity usage in the U.S. and Canada is from residential lighting?
DST will reduce electricity use in the evening but increase it during what time of the day?
When DST was first proposed, what type of lighting was consuming the most electricity?
Along with geography and economics, what variable often affects how much electricity an area uses?
Whose satire that was published in 1784 pointed out that daylight saving would only reduce electricity usage if the increase in the mornings was less than the savings in the evenings?
Have studies shown DST generally increases or reduces gas consumption from cars?
What year was the DOE report about fuel consumption published?
What happened regarding DST in 2007 in the United States that probably led to the DOE investigation?
What category of goods that are used in outdoor activities benefit from the extra hour of daylight from DST?
What organization predicted a $100 million increase for the golf sector because of extended DST?
What year did Fortune magazine make predictions about the increased revenue an extended daylight savings would provide?
According to a study in 1999, daylight savings has caused what approximate percentage of increase in leisure industry revenue in the European Union?
How much extra money from DST did Fortune predict for 7-Eleven on account of DST?
Is it better to harvest grain before or after the morning dew evaporates?
What animal on dairy farms is affected by timing?
What does earlier milk delivery do to cows?
Some farmers oppose DST because their farm laborers arrive to work and leave later or earlier?
Besides farmers, what other group of people set their schedules by the sun?
What year did a change in DST policy cost North America somewhere between $500 million and $1 billion in extra work?
Who is the economist who said there was about $1.7 billion in lost opportunity costs because of the 2007 changes?
What have some people argued correlates with time shifts from daylight savings?
What do some call the effect that they say caused a one-day loss for stock exchanges of approximately $31 billion in the year 2000?
What factor determines the numbers people reach for estimates when studying DST?
In what year did the NBS revisit the DOT's 1975 study and find traffic fatalities unaffected?
What organization made their own estimation in 1995 of a drop in traffic deaths by 1.2%?
What's the abbreviation for Single/Double Summer Time?
In the two weeks following the time change ending British Summer Time, what percentage hike is there in traffic accidents?
How much less, on average, do workers in the U.S. sleep on Mondays after switching to DST, according to the 2009 study?
What did the LEAA say was reduced 10% to 13% in Washington, DC during daylight savings?
How many cities did the LEAA study before reaching their conclusion?
How many cities of those the LEAA studied showed any reduction in crime?
In what decade did the LEAA conduct their investigation of crime and DST?
There are more fires in the fall and winter because people burn more candles and turn what on to keep warm?
In addition to smoke detectors, what do fire safety officials suggest people replace batteries in when they set their clocks twice a year?
If your area doesn't observe DST, what can you use instead as a twice-yearly reminder?
What part of your vehicle should you remember to check twice a year?
What should you check storage spaces in your home for twice-yearly?
What do societies with standardized work schedules have more time for because of the increase in afternoon daylight from DST?
What vitamin does sunlight help the human body absorb?
What chair of the Retinitis Pigmentosa Foundation Fighting Blindness lobbied for an extension to daylight savings in the U.S.?
What cancer can be caused by too much time in the sun?
Some people say DST can help sufferers of depression because it encourages them to do what?
What natural rhythm is disrupted by seasonal changes?
In 2005, what country used increased health risks as rationalization for getting rid of DST?
Which Russian president argued that the country should stay in DST year-round because of the stresses of time shifts?
According to the Swedish study in 2008, for how many weekdays following the "spring forward" do you have a higher risk of heart attack?
Do emissions from vehicle exhaust cause lower or higher pollution before dawn?
Does DST mean more rush hour traffic is on the road before dawn or after?
What kind of pollution is caused by emissions from cars while they're sitting in traffic?
During the fall time shift from 02:00 to 01:00, how many times will a clock show the times between 01:00:00 and 01:59:59?
What might a clock showing the same times twice in one day lead to?
What do people often have trouble remembering to do for DST?
What added complexity do people working across time zones have to keep track of?
What year did an accident occur at a German facility with molten steel because of the change to DST?
For how much more time was the molten steel supposed to cool when the computer mix-up happened in the German steel facility?
Who is responsible for testing and even making changing to computer programs when daylight saving rules change?
What time system do some computer systems use to avoid the issues of changes in local time?
What type of computer systems use an internal clock based on UTC time?
What does DST inherit from standard time?
Does daylight savings sometimes minimize or magnify the drawbacks of standard time?
Usually, it's recommended that we avoid the sun for how many hours before and after noon?
What kind of guidelines become less precise because of DST?
When using a sundial, we must adjust the reading to reflect natural discrepancies and the effect of what other influence?
What author is credited with explaining the usage of daylight saving time and daylight savings time with an "s" in the English Journal of the (American) National Council of Teachers of English?
In 1978, according to Meade, which form of the phrase was more commonly used: daylight saving time or daylight savings time?
Which form of the phrase is more common in print publications?
Joining Merriam-Webster's and the Oxford dictionary, the older form of the phrase without the "s" is still listed first in what dictionary?
Along with "daylight saving" and "daylight savings," what alternate form does Merriam-Webster's include?
What usually changes when a place observes DST?
What word does American English swap out for "daylight" when referring to time zones?
In American English, what is the equivalent of Pacific Standard Time?
When the UK changes their clocks forward in the spring, what do they call the time they're then observing?
What word is often added to the names of time zones when used in British English?
What phrase is often used in North America when speaking about DST?
What is a language like "spring forward, fall back" that acts as a trigger for memory called?
What does "spring forward, fall back" help people remember?
What can cause issues with installed computer systems?
What year did DST rules change in North America?
What did many existing computer systems that relied on time zones need because of the DST rule changes?
In addition to calendaring programs, what kind of programs were most impacted by the changes?
Which professionals bore the brunt of the effort to upgrade systems affected by time changes?
What system of time do some applications use so they won't have problems with time changes?
By using UTC, applications get out of adjusting to changes around clock shifts and what other factor?
In addition to individual applications, what modern systems that control the basic functions of a computer typically use UTC?
Where do computers usually use UTC?
What time would a computer probably use for the clock display?
Where do most systems go to get the data they use to calculate local time?
What two specific points of data do systems need to figure out to get local time?
What's another name for the IANA database?
The IANA database works by connecting names to what information about the location?
IANA, or zoneinfo, updates are installed as a part of what ordinary function when changes to DST policy are made?
What environment variable defines a location's name?
What format is used to store internal time in systems that use zoneinfo?
What's the name of the HP database that's similar to IANA but not compatible with it?
Less sophisticated systems might just support a TZ value with one start rule and how many end rules?
When must TZ values be changed on an older system?
What does the TZ value EST5EDT,M3.2.0/02:00,M11.1.0/02:00 specify?
What years will a new TZ value apply to?
What's might a new TZ value mishandle when it changes with new DST rules?
What single year did Windows 95 use to apply rules to Israel's time changes?
Because the schedule in Israel was always changing, what did Microsoft do with the release of Windows 98?
How often would Israeli users running Windows 98 need to manually adjust the time on their machines to stay current?
What law regulated the rules for time shifts in Israel according to the Jewish calendar?
Although the schedule in Israel became predictable after 2005, there were still problems in Windows until Israel adjusted DST to what calendar in 2013?
What does Microsoft Windows use internally for its real-time clock?
Not using UTC, Windows can't multi boot with different versions of itself like you'd need to do to use what kind of disk?
As opposed to providing support for users to have unique time zone settings, Windows will only allow for what?
In what year did Microsoft imply that they would be making changes to support RealTimeIsUniversal in a step towards compatibility with UTC?
Since 2008, at least how many times has Microsoft released fixes for the RealTimeIsUniversal feature?
What phrase describes keeping adjusted summer hours year-round?
Proponents of permanent DST say it has all the advantages of regular DST without the issues some people have from what bi-annual occurrences?
In year-round DST, would sunrise happen early or late compared to most places?
During what time period did Russia use permanent DST?
In what season in areas observing permanent daylight saving time will it stay dark the latest in the morning?
What does RIBA stand for?
What is the goal of RIBA?
When was RIBA founded?
When was RIBA's founding document expanded?
In what country does RIBA mainly operate?
What was Riba's first name?
In what year was the Institute of British Architects founded?
In what city was the Institute of British Architects located?
In terms of profession, what were people like Philip Hardwick, William Adams Nicholson and Thomas de Grey?
What caused the change of the Institute's name?
What was removed from the Royal Institute's name?
When was the mention of London removed from the Royal Institute's name?
Where is the Royal Institute of British Architects located?
Who opened the structure in which the Royal Institute is currently housed?
When did the Royal Institute receive its charter?
Who was responsible for giving the charter to the Royal Institute?
In what years was the Royal Institute issued supplemental charters?
When were the various supplemental charters consolidated?
What term characterizes the nature of changes to the charter after 1971?
What sets forth the standards by which the Royal Institute functions?
What guidelines for the Royal Institute are updated most often?
What is necessary to make any changes to either document which governs the operations of the Royal Institute?
When did the Royal Institute celebrate its 100th anniversary?
Who was the head of the Registration Committee in 1934?
In 1934, what percentage of architects were members of professional organizations?
Who did Barnes believe was best able to advance the interests of architects?
What specific institution did Barnes indicate could not be a rival of the Royal Institute?
When does the Royal Institute's Guide indicate the first RIBA Board was established?
What school document had to meet the standards of the Board for admittance?
What was necessary for testing in schools applying to the RIBA Board?
What body carried out on-site inspection of member schools of the RIBA Board?
What organization's policies regarding acceptance of professional qualifications prompted thoughts of revamping ARCUK?
When did the name of ARCUK change?
What was the name of the legistlation leading to the change in ARCUK's name?
What was shut down as a result of legislation changing the name of ARCUK?
What was the new name given to ARCUK in the '90s?
What is the function of the Royal Institute's Visiting Boards?
When did the Royal Institute and ARB reach accord on a shared body of criteria?
What does ARB stand for?
What is a key difference between the ARB and Royal Institute?
How many people have membership in the Royal Institute?
What can chartered members of RIBA add to their name to indicate their status?
What type of Royal Institute members are not able to use the organization's acronym after their names?
What is not provided by the Royal Institute anymore?
Fellows of the Royal Institute can use what abbreviation with their names?
How many satellite offices does the Royal Institute run in the UK?
When was RIBA's first satellite office opened?
In what city was the first RIBA branch office opened?
What territory did RIBA's Cambridge branch office cover?
What is the name of the Royal Institute's business operation?
Where does RIBA's business group have its headquarters office?
How many people work for RIBA Enterprises?
How many of RIBA Enterprises' staff are located at the Newcastle office?
What are three divisions of RIBA Enterprises?
What are two publications produced by RIBA Publishing?
What does NBS stand for?
How many people work for the NBS?
Where is the NBS located?
What is another name for the Royal Institute Library?
When was the RIBA library founded?
How many materials are housed in the RIBA library?
The British Architectural Library is the biggest library of its kind in which continent?
In what institution are some materials from the RIBA collection located?
What was the RIBA Library's first address?
Where did RIBA move its library?
In what year did RIBA move its library?
Which architect's work was preserved throughout World War II by the Royal Institute's Library?
Where is the Royal Institute Library's Reading Room located?
Where are RIBA's Study Rooms located?
What art style was used inthe design of the Reading Room?
In what year did the Royal Institute's Reading Rooms open?
Who is meant to benefit from teaching provided by the RIBA library?
When did the Victoria and Albert Museum and the Royal Institute of British Architects start a formal relationship?
What is the name of the joint venture involving the Victoria and Albert Museum and the Royal Institute of British Architects?
What is the main goal of the V&A + RIBA partnership?
In what space at the V&A is the Architecture Gallery located?
What is found at Room 128a of the Victoria & Albert Museum?
Who designed rooms 128 and 128a at the V&A Museum?
Where was the Royal Institute's Drawing and Archives Collections located originally?
What part of the V&A was the Royal Institute's Drawing and Archives collection moved to?
What are events that a company can sponsor when it is planning a new construction project or redesigning an existing one?
What is provided to guide entrants in an architectural competition?
What kinds of people generally make up the panels which judge architecture competitions?
What is necessary for the integrity of a design competition?
What kind of artistic production can be supported by design competitions?
Aside from the ARB, what other organization offers accreditation services for schools serving architects?
What process does RIBA use in its accreditation system?
What kinds of courses does RIBA conduct accreditation services for apart from the Architects Registration Board?
What is the first step in the Royal Institute's guidelines for education?
What is required by the second stage in the education provisions set out by RIBA?
What does the third part of the Royal Institute's educational process contain?
How long does it take, at the least, for a student to be eligible for the title of Chartered?
What occurs between the second and third parts of the education process prescribed by the Royal Institute?
NARA is responsible for what collection of archives?
What independent agency preserves the original copy of executive orders?
What is the official that oversees the operation of NARA?
What member of NARA has the ability to declare when the constitutional threshold of passage has ocurred?
What office publishes the Federal Register?
What office administers the Electoral College?
Which office publishes the Code of Federal Regulations?
Which office publishes the United States Statutes at Large?
OGIS provides what resource for the government and public?
What type of dispute does NARA typically resolve?
NARA is ordered by congress to review what type of policies?
What types of recommendations does NARA provide to congress?
What year was the National Archives Establishment established in?
In what year did NARA become an independent agency?
In what year was The National Archives merged with GSA?
Who was the first Archivist at the National Archives?
When did the first Archivist start at the National Archives?
What branch of the US government established the National Archives?
What commission merged the National Archives with GSA?
The Archivist took on what role after the incorporation of the Nation Archives into GSA?
When was the reclassification program originally intended to end?
How was the reclassification of documents in '06 revealed?
What year was Executive Order 13526 created?
What Executive order created the National Declassification Center?
What was the aim of Executive Order 13526?
What types of groups are NARA's holdings classified into?
Each record group is classified based on what?
Besides films and other non-static media, what type of media is classified into a group?
Besides the general media and motion picture categories, which category contains media that is not static?
Where are archival descriptions of holdings under the custody of NARA stored?
As of the end mid December of 2012, how many logical data records are stored at NARA?
How many digital copies of previously digitized materials were there in December of 2012?
Archival descriptions include traditional paper holdings, electron records, and what?
The 10 billion logical data records are linked to how many artifacts?
Most of NARA's holdings are available to sector?
Federal government works are excluded from what legal protection?
Some records at NARA are legally protected by what?
What executive order directs agencies to declassify documents before sending them to NARA?
What office of NARA oversees the declassification of classified materials?
Besides census records and passenger lists, what NARA documents are particularly useful to genealogists?
For what time period does NARA have census records available for?
What is the informal name of The National Archives Building?
On what street is the The National Archives Building located?
Where is the Declaration of Independence kept?
Where in the National Archives can you view a copy of the Magna Carta?
Where is the Louisiana Purchase Treaty kept?
Since when has all filming and photography in the Rotunda for the Charters of Freedom been banned?
For how long has the National Archives prohibited flash photography?
What is an aspect of a visit to the Rotunda for the Charters of Freedom?
What has made the no photography rule hard to enforce in the Rotunda for the Charters of Freedom?
What is the second facility of NARA named?
When was Archives II opened?
What college is Archives II closest to?
What college does NARA have cooperatives initiatives with?
What campus of University of Maryland is listed on the National Register of Historic Places?
Where is The Washington National Records Center located?
What does The Washington National Records Center primarily store?
After staying at the WNRC, where are records transferred to?
What happens to temporary records at the WNRC if they are not retrieved by the end of the retention times?
Beyond the storage of federal records, what service does the WNRC provide?
What do the facilities designated to each area of the US specialize in?
Microfilms of documents from federal agencies can be found where?
Where are some of the items relevant to JFKs medical treatments housed?
Federal Records Centers are particularly unhelpful to what type of research?
Which Federal Records Center houses materials relevant to JFKs assassination? 
When was JFK shot?
What agency maintains the Presidential Library system?
What is the system that preserves the documents of US Presidents?
Who is the earliest President that is represented in the archives of the Presidential Library system?
In what area of the US can one find the Presidential Library system libraries?
Libraries that are established for other presidents are operated by private foundations, historical societies, and what government entities?
What state operates the Abraham Lincoln Presidential Library?
What is the earliest President that NARA does not hold records for in its presidential library system?
Abraham Lincoln's Presidential Library and Museum is operated by what type of entity?
In January of 2007, what internet company did the National Archives partner with?
What was the aim of the partnership with Fold3.com?
What Archivist announced the partnership with Fold3?
Of all the benefits of the partnership with Fold3, what benefited the public at large the most?
What direct benefit did NARA itself gain from the partnership with Fold3?
In what year did the National Archives announce that it would make its collection of Universal Newsreels available for purchase online?
What company did the National Archives partner with make it's Universal Newsreels available online?
Universal Newsreels dated from which year up to 1967 were made available through CreateSpace?
Which Google affiliated website did the National Archives decide to use in 2009?
What purpose does the National Archive YouTube channel serve?
What online service did the National Archives decide to use to showcase its photographic holdings?
The National Archives' educational team created a website in what year?
In 2011, what sort of Wikipedia addition did the National Archives make?
What was the purpose of creating a Wikiproject?
Whose idea was it for the National Archives to work with Wikimedia?
What benefit does public reap from the National Archives working with Wikimedia?
Which language was the Wikiproject primarily created in?
what territory is Tristan da Cunha part of?
What is the population of the island?
what other island is included in the territory?
what was the name of the first long term settler? 
what year did the first permanent settler arrive?
what did one of the settlers rename the islands?
in what year did the UK annex the islands?
where did the UK rule the islands from?
in what year did Prince Alfred visit the island?
what was the main settlement named?
who is Lewis Carroll's youngest brother?
what is one reason that caused the island to become less used?
what year were the islands declared dependent of saint helena?
During what war was the island used as a Royal Navy station?
What was the islands codename during World War II?
Who was the administrator during World War II for the island?
What year was an atomic bomb detonated near the island?
What country test detonated an atomic bomb near the island?
What year was the island evacuated due to an eruption?
What year did most families return after being evacuated?
What was the name of the settlement that was assessed after the evactuation?
In what year was the island hit by an extratropical cyclone?
Who provided aid for the extratropical cyclone?
what year was a virus induced flu reported?
When did the freighter Nightingale run aground?
What was spilled when the freighter ran aground?
what animal was threatened with the fuel oil spill?
where were the penguins transported for cleaning?
When did a boat arrive at the island with damage during a race?
What was the name of the boat that was damaged during the race?
What was the name of the race the boat was damaged in?
what was broken/damaged on the boat?
What is the abbreviation by which the University of Kansas is known?
Where is the main branch of the University of Kansas located?
What is the tallest point in Lawrence?
Who authorized the opening of the University of Kansas?
In what year was Kansas made a member of the United States?
In what two cities are there satellite locations for KU's medical school?
What organization does KU belong to?
How many insititutions comprise the Association of American Universities' membership?
In what city can KU's hospital be found?
In what city can KU's Edwards campus be found?
How many people attended the University of Kansas at its Edwards and Lawrence locations in the fall semester of 2014?
In the autumn of 2014, how many people attended the University of Kansas's Medical Center?
How many students attended the University of Kansas combined in fall of 2014?
How many education professionals were working at KU in the fall of 2012?
On what date was KU's Lawrence campus made official?
How much money did Lawrence have to contribute to the University as terms of its charter?
What was the minimum size of the land that Lawrence could provide for the university?
What competing city was next in line if Lawrence would have been unable to meet the requirements necessary to get KU built in its city?
On what geographic feature was KU built?
Who did the site of KU's construction originally belong to?
Who provided the majority of the money needed to secure the site of the University of Kansas?
What was the governing body of KU?
What was the year in which KU's first roster of students graduated?
How many institutions participated in the V-12 program?
What did the V-12 program provide to interested pupils?
During what event did the V-12 program take place?
What part of KU serves students learning about government?
What are two radio stations that broadcast from KU?
What is the name of a fine art institution on the campus of KU?
Which library is dedicated to a former student of the University of Kansas?
Whom is the Anschutz Library named for?
How many campuses are run by KU?
What term describes the nature of how the university is partially funded?
What are two parts of the University of Kansas house in the College of Liberal Arts and Sciences?
At least how many different degree-granting programs exist at KU?
What program at the University of Kansas was rated highest among its peers?
What KU department was rated second in its field?
Which publication provided rankings of college and university programs?
In what tier did a number of KU's programs rank in 2016?
What KU school is abbreviated as SADP?
Where is the SADP housed?
What was the name of the school that served as the SADP's precursor?
With what two other programs was KU's architectural engineering curriculum joined in 2001?
In what year did the SADP assume its current form?
What is the name of the publication that ranks schools engaged in architecture and design education?
What is the name of the yearly ratings published by DesignIntelligence?
What title did KU's architecture school receive in 2012?
In what place did the University of Kansas finish in national rankings for undergraduate architecture programs in 2012?
What kind of institution is KU's School of Business?
Where is the business school at KU located?
When was the University of Kansas School of Business established?
How many students attend the business school at KU?
How many educators work at the KU School of Business?
Who considered the business school of the University of Kansas among the best Midwestern business institutions?
What organization provides oversight for business schools like KU's?
By what acronym is the Association to Advance Collegiate Schools of Business known?
What are two kinds of courses of study available at KU's business school?
In 2014, what issue of U.S. News & World Report provided rankins for law schools?
What was KU's national law school ranking in 2014?
The University of Kansas had the highest rated law school in which state?
In what building do law students attend classes at KU?
For whom is Green Hall named?
What is the acronym for an organization that serves as an accreditation body for engineering schools?
On what campus is the University of Kansas School of Engineering located?
When was KU's engineering school established?
When did the University of Kansas start issuing degrees in engineering?
What kind of institution is KU's engineering school?
What former leader of a car manufacturing company attended KU?
Which person associated with web browsers was a student at KU?
What Google employee once studied at the University of Kansas?
What oil company leader is an alumnus of the University of Kansas?
For what company did Charles Spahr serve as CEO?
What is the full name of KU's journalism school?
What are the two different programs offered at KU's Schoold of Journalism?
What three types of media are students taught to work with at KU's School of Journalism?
What is the name of a magazine published at KU?
Who sponsors a contest for journalistic writing?
What are the three constituents of the medical center at KU?
What does each of the component schools of KU's Medical Center offer?
How many students attended the medical center at KU in fall of 2013?
At what other KU campus is a four year program available?
What is the focus of the Salina location's medical program?
In what city is the Edwards Campus located?
When was the Edwards Campus built?
Who are the main kinds of students at the Edwards Campus?
What is the average age of students on KU's Edwards Campus?
What can adult learners obtain through studying at the Edwards Campus of the University of Kansas?
Who provides statistics on educational costs?
What is a phrase that expresses the value of the education offered at KU with respect to its cost?
What was launched in 1965 by the business school at KU?
What kind of applications did the interdisciplinary program help shape?
Which government agency used the applications that were informed by KU's interdisciplinary management program?
What NASA program benefited from the use of decision science applications?
In what year was a new interdisciplinary management program launched at KU's School of Business?
What division of the University of Kansas contributed to the development of the internet?
What kind of software is Lynx?
What was made possible by Lynx?
What colors are worn by KU's athletic teams?
What is the name of KU athletic teams?
How many times has the male basketball team from Kansas won a national title?
How many natioanl female outdoor track and field championships have been won by the University of Kansas?
Where does KU's cross country team run?
Who is in charge of all sports teams at KU?
Who did Zenger replace as athletic director at KU?
With what broadcasting company does KU have a contract?
What sportswear company has a deal with the University of Kansas?
What sportswear company formerly held a contract with the University of Kansas?
In what two forms of media is the Daily Kansan available?
What institution houses the Daily Kansan?
How big is the Daily Kansan's audience?
What are the call letters of the National Public Radio affiliate that broadcasts from KU?
What is the name of the station operated by KU students?
When did KJHK first broadcast?
What is the name of an independent radio broadcast run out of KU?
What kinds of programming appear on KUJH-LP?
What is the name of a publicly-available resource of KU related to community health?
What body is responsible for managing the Community Tool Box?
What kinds of groups around the world can benefit from the Community Tool Box?
How much content does the Community Tool Box offer?
Where can the Community Tool Box be found?
What do you call  government officials using power for illicit private gain?
Who benefits from political corruption?
It is only considered political corruption if the act directly relates to what?
Trading in what is considered political corruption?
What is it called when government officials use their power for private gain?
Bribery and embezzelment are forms of what?
Drug trafficking and money laundering are considered what?
Repression of political opponants and police brutality are forms of political what?
One form of corruption involves the hiring of family members, which is called what?
Another form of corruption, the practice of usury, is called what?
Three forms of corruption that can promote criminal activities include drugs, money laundering, and what?
The repression of what is also considered political corruption?
What is considered political corruption is differnt in each what?
Sometime sit is hard to tell if actions are legal or illegal because governement officials have what kind of power?
How much money is involved in bribery in the world each year?
unrestrsined political corruption is known as what?
What does kleptocracy mean?
A sate of unrestrained political corruption is known as what?
Which crime costs over one trillion U.S. dollars every year, world-wide?
What does kleptocracy mean?
What does corruption undermine in politics?
What does corruption disregard in politics?
Political corruption in legislature reduces what, overall?
Corruption in what compromises the rule of law?
Corruption in what creates weak provision of services?
What two democratic values are soiled due to corruption?
Corruption disintegrates government capacity when public offices are what?
The level of corruption can vary in richer democracies in regards to the what of those officials making decisions?
Corruption raises the cost of business because of illegal payments in what sector?
Some people feel that corruption actually reduces costs because it cuts what?
What process is better than allowing bribes to remain in place?
Corruption changes the playing field by allowing businesses with connections to be shielded by what?
Economic distortion is created by corruption in the public sector by diverting what into capital projects?
What is more plentiful in capital projects?
Corruption can lower what with environmental regulations?
African dictators often have what kind of bank accounts?
What form has corruption taken in Africa?
In Africa, the finances are often moved where?
Which researchers studied corruption from Sub-Saharan countries from 1970 to 1996?
The 187 billion exceeded what in these countries?
What was one of the factors for this behavior in Africa?
Where is corruption most noticeable?
These countries rely on foreign aid for what?
In Sub-Saharan African countries, what level of government is corruption especially prevalent at?
Which report described this corruption? 
How many funds did not reach their intended recipients who needed medical attention?
What kind of employees received payments?
Where were drugs siphoned off to?
In addition to ghost employees and the black market receiving drugs, what other way was money expended?
If local corruption did not exist, there would be enough what to help the people in these countries needing medical help?
Corruption aids what as far as the environment is concerned?
Formal legislation cannot be regulated when officials are what?
Bribes also halt unions, the protection of children in labor, and what?
When these laws are broken, corrupt countries gain what in the international market?
Who has stated that apolitical food problems do not exist?
What can trigger famine conditions?
While natural occurrences can cause famine, what determines the severity of it?
Along with food aid, what is most at risk in these countries?
How is food aid usually directly redirected from the people it should go to?
Food aid can also be indirectly diverted from its intended recipients through the manipulation of what?
Substandard what is often one way for corruption to enter the construction field?
What happens with contracts to aid corruption?
Recipients of aid are concerned about what?
Those receiving aid may have connections, pay bribes or what?
Corrupt people may manipulate what to receive more assistance?
These types of corruption can harm what?
Along with institutions, this type of corruption can discredit what?
Corruption can determine certain things in what kind of activities?
Medical staff can affect what aspect of sports?
The difference between corruption that is public or private looks like what?
What needs to stay away from loopholes?
What do you call paying government officials to use their position in their office?
What is the minimum amount of people that can be involved in a bribe?
What is it called when corruption is part of all public life?
Beyond getting money, bribes are also used to cause what to others?
What two types of bribery is the international community trying to get prosecuted as separate?
In some countries there is no formal deal but what that makes prosecuting bribes difficult?
A bribe can include requesting, offering, giving or what of favors or money?
Bribes can be direct or what?
Selling or trading government position influence is called what?
Selling influence can involve third-parties and this is called what type of relation?
In some situations the third-party in an influence peddling crime may be not involved or may be what?
Where lobbying is controlled, what does it provide for consideration to determine improper influencing?
What article of the Criminal Law Convention on Corruption contains distinctive criteria to determine improper influence?
Giving government jobs to supporters is called what?
What country quickly changes most people working in government position when a new government comes into power?
Corruption also occurs when an official wants to cause some form of harm to who?
False charges can be brought against a journalist who writes about what?
What is it called when a person is dishonest or corrupt for his own gain?
Parish pump politics is also called what?
Which crisis in Ireland involved bribery, cronyism and collusion?
Politicians who were at the end of their political careers were offered what kind of position with companies they were involved with politically?
Illegal interference with an election is called what?
Another term for electoral fraud is what?
Illegal voter registration, the miscounting of votes, and what at polls is considered voter fraud?
When entrusted funds are stolen, it is called what?
It is considered political when it involves what kind of money?
One form of political embezzlement is when a politician uses government resources for what use?
What is the public official's share called when involved in corrupt bidding?
A contract can be given to someone who is not the best what?
What is not limited to just government officials?
When groups that are antagonistic to each other form a coalition for hidden gain, it is called what?
While not illegal, an unholy alliance can be more dangerous to the public than what?
When was Jinrong a police chief in this area?
Who was a local gang ringleader in the same area?
In addition to being a police chief, Jinrong was also what?
What was Noriega's government accused of being?
What country did Noriega rule?
What country invaded Panama to capture Noriega?
What is a narcokleptocracy?
What is Noriega's first name?
According to Thomas Jefferson, when the media is free and people are literate they are what?
What did the analysis show mixed results for?
What was disrupted by Internet growth for the press?
How much has new types of Internet journalism replaced what has been lost in the press?
How many measures does Transparency International publish right now?
What is the measure that Transparency International publishes that looks at the willingness of a foreign company to pay a bribe?
What is the measure that it publishes that involves polling to determine the public's take on how corrupt various countries are?
When was the CPI first released?
Which index studies the correlation of corruption and military in a country?
How many firms throughout the world have been surveyed by the World Bank in regards to its corruption study?
How many dimensions of governance are measured by the Worldwide Governance Indicators?
One of the dimensions is the extent to which power is exercised for personal gain, which is called what?
Which organization is most notable for adopting the global coverage of these studies?
The second wave of metrics focuses on what level of corruption?
Unlike the first wave, the second wave does not offer what type of coverage?
What is the British aid agency's research called?
What does Drivers of Change skip?
What does Drivers of Change promote?
Public spending has risks of kickbacks, embezzlement and what?
What type of regulations make corruption worse for public spending?
The potential for corruption in public spending are one of the arguments that favor what?
What countries have big public sectors but low corruption?
What do the low corruption countries have solidly established?
Selling government property is highly at risk for what?
What type of people got wealthy from the sale of state-owned companies?
Where is corruption even more prevalent?
Countries that what have more extralegal and unofficial things going on?
Providing a government service from the lowest form of local government that can adequately provide the service is called what?
What does distributing money into multiple instances discourage?
Even small amounts of public money can be a lot in what type of authority?
What is it called when higher ups in government embezzle from the government's treasury?
What examples of natural resources do some corrupt officials in government take?
Some corrupt governments use what type of money coming in?
Foreign aid money is sometimes used to build fancy structures and to buy what?
In their pursuit of more money and power, corrupt dictators often ignore what?
What magazine had articles about Castro benefiting from corruption?
The $900 million Forbes said Castro took may only be what of his total assets?
What is Fidel Castro's official title?
What is OAS?
Additional conventions were adopted at the regional level by OAS and who?
What organization joined at the universal level?
When did the United Nations Convention against Corruption join?
Why is it difficult to measure corruption?
When did indices on corruption first appear?
What was the first index on corruption, in 1995?
How many methods of judiciary corruption are there?
What part of the government controls the judiciary budget in many developing countries?
What does executive branch control over judiciary money undermine?
What type of corruption is hard to get rid of even in developed countries?
Radio broadcasts and what help deter corruption?
What country is used as an example for limited forms of communications?
Who works against corruption in India?
What new ombudsman bill is being readied in India?
What decade saw international initiatives to combat corruption?
Who started the Programme of Action?
What did the Programme of Action issue?
What is the other definition of the term dialect?
How does a dialect stand in relation to the standard language?
The regional Romance languages in what country are sometimes referred to as dialects?
What are 20th century variations on standard Italian called?
From what language did the regional Romance languages of Italy derive?
Along with grammar and pronunciation, what distinguishes a dialect?
If only the pronunciation differs from the standard language, what term is sometimes used?
What term is sometimes used for dialects that only differ in vocabulary?
Along with slangs, patois and pidgins, what is another type of smiilar speech variety?
What is another term for a standard or standardized dialect?
The support of what groups results in a dialect being standardized?
Along with grammars and dictionaries, what publications help a dialect to become standardized?
Standard Philippine English is a standard dialect of of what language?
Recognition from what body may help a dialect to become standardized?
What does a nonstandard dialect usually not have compared to a standard dialect?
What language is Scouse a dialect of?
What was created for the sake of comparing English dialects?
Who came up with the Dialect Test?
Along with a syntax and grammar, what attribute does a dialect possess?
What trait is the most common way of determining if languages are dialects?
What is the term for when dialects A and B are mutually intelligible, dialect B and C are mutually intelligible, but dialects A and C are not mutually intelligible?
What is the definition of mutual intelligibility?
What term refers to another way in which dialects are distinguished from languages?
Under the linguistic authority criteria, what is a dialect of German along with Bavarian German?
Of what group of languages is Yiddish a member?
Why is Yiddish not a dialect of German?
Who developed the abstand and ausbau languages framework?
In what year was the abstand and ausbau framework developed?
What sort of unification in speech communities did the abstand and ausbau framework discuss?
The language of the Pennsylvania Dutch is a dialect of what language?
What term avoids distinguishing between languages and dialects?
What is the most common way of referring to a language without making the determination of whether it's a dialect or independent language?
Along with variety and languoid, what is another term used for a language without determining its independent status?
With what social class it the standard dialect commonly associated?
What social status is the term "dialect" sometimes associated with?
What is another term for language varieties?
What non-linguistic developments influence the status of a language?
What dialect is the language Romansh similar to?
What language are Mandarin and Cantonese sometimes considered dialects of?
Why might Mandarin and Cantonese not be regarded as dialects?
What event is regarded as a landmark in the development of modern nationalism?
If possessing a language leads to a group being regarded as a separate people, what political arrangement presumably follows?
What political arrangement is associated with being a dialect-speaking sub-group?
Along with political controversy, what can the distinction between a language and dialect sometimes lead to?
When is the term 'German dialects' used in regard to the German language?
What are traditional region varieties of German distinguished from?
After what entities are German dialects traditionally named?
In what geographic part of Germany are dialects more common?
In what geographic part of Germany are dialects less frequently seen?
Dialects are more frequently seen in the countryside as compared to what population centers?
In what environment are dialects less common?
In what environment are dialects more frequently heard?
What dialect of German is spoken in Switzerland?
What dialect of German is rarely heard in Switzerland?
Aside from Switzerland, what country speaks a dialect related to Swiss German?
What type of language was Low German in the Middle Ages?
Why are Low German varieties regarded as dialects of standard German?
What are Italian dialects termed in the Italian language?
What language are many Italian dialects derived from?
What does 'dialetti' mean in Italian?
Why might Italian dialects be regarded as independent languages rather than dialects of standard Italian?
What is a major reason why the Latin-based regional Romance languages of Italy should be regarded as independent languages rather than dialects of each other?
From what region of Italy does the Eastern Lombard dialect hail?
What language family does Eastern Lombard belong to?
What type of language is Sicilian?
What language was spoken by Lombard immigrants to Sicily?
What Italian nationalist spoke of the importance of a national Italian language?
During what period was the importance of having an Italian national language raised?
In what decade was Italy unified?
What percentage of Italians spoke standard Italian when Italy was first unified?
When Italy was unified, what was named the official national language?
During what war did a large number of Italian men first learn standard Italian?
Along with radio and public education, what invention helped to diffuse standard Italian among the Italian population?
In modern Italy, what class of people are regional languages sometimes associated with?
Along with formal settings, where do some Italians avoid speaking their regional language?
Aside from when they're speaking to Italians from their same town or region, where is a common place where Italians speak their regional language?
Regional Italian dialects are often influenced by regional languages and what other language?
What language family do most of the languages of Italy belong to?
What language are most languages of Italy derived from?
Aside from Italo-Dalmatian, what is another term for the group that Italian languages belong to?
Campidanese Sardinian is a variant of what language?
What language is Sassarese closely related to?
What language family does Gallurese belong to?
What language family does Ligurian belong to?
Where is the Catalan Algherese dialect spoken?
Along with British English, what is the major variant of the English language?
What are the two major variants of Serbo-Croatian?
Are British and American English regarded as distinct languages, or dialects of a single language?
Do regional linguists treat Serbian and Croation as distinct languages or as dialects of a single language?
Why are Serbian and Croatian often treated like distinct languages?
Along with Serbian, with what language is Macedonian mutually intelligible?
What dialect continuum does Macedonian belong to?
What do Bulgarian linguists regard the Macedonian language as?
In what year was a Macedonian literary standard established?
In what country is Macedonian most commonly spoken?
Lebanese people of what religion sometimes consider Lebanese to be a distinct language?
In what language are Lebanese laws written?
During the Lebanese Civil War, what language did Lebanese Christians sometimes use officially?
What language is Lebanese closely related to?
What script did Lebanese Christians sometimes use to write Lebanese Arabic during the civil war?
Along with Morocco and Tunisia, in what country are the Darijas spoken?
What is the liturgical language of Islam?
In what language is the Qur'an written?
What does the term Dariajs refer to?
What is the dominant religion of North Africa?
During what century did the Russian government claim that Ukrainian was a Russian dialect?
What Russian government claimed that Ukrainian was not a distinct language?
The conquest of western Ukraine by what country altered the language of Ukraine?
What nation conquered Ukraine during the First World War?
What alliance defeated the German Empire in World War I?
What Ukrainian political group was involved in the defeat of the German Empire?
Who did the Ukrainian Bolsheviks conquer the Ukraine from?
After what war did Moscow begin to repress the Ukrainian language?
Why did Moscow begin to repress the Ukrainian language?
Why did Ukrainians collaborate with the Axis?
In what country is the Surzhyk dialect spoken?
Surzhyk is a dialect intermediate between the Ukrainian language and what other language?
From what did Chinese characters derive?
What is another name for the Yue language?
Hakka is a language from what geographic part of China?
From the time of the Ming dynasty, what city was the capital of China?
At its founding. what was the official language of the Republic of China?
From the perspective of historical linguists, what are Romance languages dialects of?
What do many historical linguists consider modern Greek to be a dialect of?
From what language is North Germanic derived?
Tok Pisin might be regarded as a dialect of what language?
Italian is significantly mutually comprehensible with what other Romance language?
With what romance language does Spanish not have a high degree of mutual comprehensibility?
What is the reason for French and Italian not being very mutually comprehensible?
What language could all Western languages be considered dialects of?
Researchers at what organization study and develop Interlingua?
What was the nationality of high school students who learned Interlingua in a notable linguistic experiment?
Along with Italian and Spanish, what language could Swedish Interlingua learners translate?
Along with Standard Average European, from what concept was Interlingua derived?
How is European art music distinguished from non-European and popular music?
What method is used by composers to prescribe to the performer the pitches, tempo, meter and rhythms for a piece of music?
What popular styles practice improvisation and ad libitum ornamentation?
Since it is written down, classical music can attain a high level of what? 
How is European art music distinguished from many other musical forms?
How long has the system of staff notation been in use?
Jazz and blues use ad libitum and what other ornamentation? 
Classic music can a attain a high level of what?
When did the term "classical music" appear? 
What period is referred to as a "golden age"?
What year is the earliest reference to 'classical music'?
What book holds the earliest reference to 'classical music'?
What term did not appear until the early 19th century?
What 'age' is the period from Johann Sebastian Bach to Beethoven referred to as?
What year was the earliest reference to classical music?
In what book was the earliest reference to classical music?
J.S. Bach's fugues create a coherent harmonic logic that would be impossible for what other style of music?
The score determines how various parts are coordinated, pitch, and what other detail?
What has allowed Classical musicians to perform music from many centuries ago?
Who's fugues achieve a remarkable marriage of boldly distinctive melodic lines?
The score does not provide complete and exact instruction on how to do what?
In what era were many works designed for basso continuo accompaniment? 
Vibrato and glissando are possible on stringed, brass, woodwind and what other style instrument?
What are fermatas?
Classical music in the 2000s has lost most of its tradition for musical what?
In the Baroque era, who would improvise preludes?
Who would improvise musical ornaments in the Baroque era?
Who was noted for his complex improvisations?
What was Mozart noted for?
Instrument currently used in most classical music where invented before what period?
What is the most widely known medium for classical music?
A symphony orchestra includes members of the string, woodwind, percussion and what other family of instruments?
What does a symphony orchestra have that is missing from a concert band?
What practice has changed a great deal over the classical period?
What was the medieval flute made from?
What was an early version of the fiddle called?
What was an early version of the trombone called? 
Medieval instrument in Europe were commonly used how?
Loud, shrill, and outdoor instruments were referred to as 'haut', while quieter, more intimate instruments were referred to as what?
What genre was predominately Gregorian chant during the earlier medieval period?
What genre uses multiple independent vocal melodies?
When did the Polyphonic vocal genre begin to develop?
What word means using a single unaccompanied vocal melody line?
Many instruments originated during what era?
What has disappeared, then been recreated in order to perform music of the period?
Modern day instrument may be classified as brass, string, woodwind and what other classification?
Brass instruments were traditionally played by profession guild members during what era?
Stringed instruments during the Renaissance included the viol, the lyre, the cittern, the lute and what other instrument?
The virginal is what type of instrument?
The tambourine, bells and rumble-pot are all what type of instrument?
The reed pipe and recorder are what type of instrument?
Vocal music in the Renaissance is noted for an increasingly elaborate what?
What liturgical form besides motets endured throughout the entire Renaissance period?
Monody, the madrigal comedy, and intermedio are all precursors to what?
The cello, contrabrass and fortepiano were new instruments during what period?
What happened to the shawn and the wooden cornet during the Baroque period?
The timpani ans castanets are what type of instrument?
The serpent is what type of instrument?
Which string instrument often played the basso continuo parts?
What was less standardized during the Baroque era?
Two violins, a viola, and a cello make up what type of group?
Keyboard instruments included the pip organ, harpsichord and what other instrument?
What is an example of a stringed chordal instrument during the Baroque period?
Classical musicians continued to use many instruments from what era?
The theorbo and what other Baroque instrument fell into disuse?
The Baroque violin became what modern instrument?
What did the Baroque trumpet become?
The violin, cello, contrabass and what other instrument form the string section of the orchestra?
The flute, oboe and bassoon are all what type of instrument?
What instrument fell out of use after the 1760s?
What instrument was the precursor of the tuba?
What instrument did the modern piano take over for in the Romantic era?
How many double bass players were typically used in the Baroque orchestra?
What wasn't rich enough for many Romantic composers?
Classical sections were expanded in the Romantic era for a fuller and bigger what?
What is a celestes?
What type of instrument appears occasionally in the 20th and 21st century styles of classical music?
What type of musicians besides classical have experimented with electronic instruments?
What type of instrument is the gamelan?
In what did the bagpipe fill an important role?
What instrument gained prominence in the 19th and 20th century?
Vihuelas and hurdy-gurdies are currently associated with what type of music?
What type of temperament became accepted during the 18th century?
When did equal temperament become accepted as the dominant musical temperament?
What temperament is the English Renaissance performed in?
What have classical trained performers done extensively?
What does a B.mus. or M.mus. degree include?
To what level is training for classical music often required?
Performance of classical music requires proficiency in what type of reading?
Performance of classical music requires proficiency in what type of principles?
Familiarty with the style expected for any given composer is required for what kind of performance?
What brothers have had significant classical training?
Billy Joel and Elton John have both had what type of training?
Rock and pop musicians may have degrees in what type of music?
What gender of musician has historically made up a large amount of professional orchestras?
Women were first hired in professional orchestras for what position?
What year did the Vienna Philharmonic first accept women?
Which major orchestra was the last to appoint a woman to a permanent position?
Who was the principal flute for the Vienna Philharmonic in 1996?
In what year did the Vienna Philharmonic face protests in the US?
Who was the first woman admitted to the Vienna Philharmonic?
What instrument did Anna Lelkes play?
How many female members were part of the Vienna Philharmonic in 2013?
Who was the Vienna Philharmonic's first female concertmaster?
Works of classical repertoire exhibit what in their use of orchestration and harmony, and form?
What is usually written in song forms?
The concerto, symphony, sonata and opera are examples of what type of musical forms?
What are self-contained pieces in longer works called?
How many movements are symphonies written in the Classical period usually divided into?
What, typically, is the speed of the second movement in a classical piece?
A movement broken up further is called what?
The final movement of a classical piece is usually called what?
What composer continued the counterpoint and fugue?
Haydn is classified as typical of what era?
Who is described as a founder of the Romantic era?
Who is classified as Romantic, but also uses counterpoint and fugue?
Some authorities reverse terminologies to refer to the common practice period as a what?
A Contemporary composition written in the style of an earlier era is described with what prefix?
What century were Neoclassical compositions written in?
Who wrote Pulcinella?
What era is Pulcinella similar to?
When does the Egyptian orchestra date to?
Who suggested that Western classical music is rooted to ancient Egyptian art music?
What music followed ancient Egyptian art music?
Which ancient society developed individual tones and scales?
Who helped codify musical notation?
The Medieval period begins with the fall of what city?
What can Plainsong or Gregorian chant also be called?
What does Polyphonic mean? 
When did Monophonic chant stop being the dominant form?
Polyphonic music included more complex voicing of what?
When was the Renaissance era?
What era was from 1400 to 1600? 
The use of the first ass instruments occurred in what era?
What became widespread in the Renaissance era?
Musical forms for dance began to standardize during what era?
The notation of music on a what began to take shape at this time?
How was music transmitted before the invention of musical notation?
What was oral music subject to every time is was transmitted?
What can a musical scored be performed without?
When was the movable-type printing press invented?
The record is part of what wind family?
The sahwm was an early family member of what instrument?
Where were the first pipe organs confined to?
When had the viol emerged by?
What enabled descriptions and specification of instruments?
When did many of the ideas that make up western classical music take shape?
What began with the Baroque era?
What era did the classical era follow?
When did the classical era end?
When did the romantic era end?
Basso continuo and complex tonal counterpoint characterize what type of music? 
What does basso continuo mean? 
What did music become during the Baroque era  in comparison with earlier periods?
What form began to take shape during the Baroque era? 
Major and minor what are means for managing dissonance and chromaticism?
Keyboard music became popular during what era?
The violin family is what type of instrument?
Opera began to differentiate itself from earlier forms as what?
What became more common during the Baroque era?
What did vocalist add to melodies beginning in the Baroque era?
What theories began to be put in wider practice?
What does equal temperament enabled in hard to tune keyboard instruments?
What did Bach not use?
A modern piano is generally what?
What system of temperaments was common during Bach's time?
When was the Classical era?
What instrument became the predominant keyboard during the classical era?
What became more standardized during the classical era?
How many muscians, at most, could make up a chamber ensemble during the classical period?
What is an opera buffa?
What type of instrument became more refined during the classical era?
What is the single reed family called?
What type of instrument was somewhat standardized int eh Baroque era?
Who expanded the single reeds role?
Increased attention to extended melodic lines characterized what era?
When did the Romantic era end?
Free-form pieces like nocturnes and preludes were a break from what era?
Tensions about what increased during the Romantic era?
What is a name for an art song?
To what number did the size of the orchestra grow to?
What size of choirs have performed Gustav Mahler's 1906 Symphony No. 8?
What size orchestras have performed Gustav Mahler's 1906 Symphony No. 8?
What allowed Brass instruments to play a wider range of notes?
What array of instrument grew wider?
What gender are most composers described in music textbooks?
Who asked why is music composed by women so marginal to the standard 'classical' repertoire?
Why were women composers deemed not notable?
Who is one of the only female composers mentioned?
What type of music did women composers typically write?
What type of view is that classical music is primarily written musical tradition?
Musical notation is effective for what?
Why is written musical notation effective? 
Which composer had an effect named after him?
Who wrote a book on the Mozart effect?
Where was the experiment originally published?
How many IQ points of a students' does the Mozart effect temporarily boost?
How much did the Governor of Georgia budget per year to provide every child with a CD of classical music?
What harmed the music industry in the 20th century according to Shawn Vancour?
Who argued that the commercialization of classical music was harmful to the music industry?
Works from the Golden Age of music matches action to what?
Who produced Fantasia?
Who starred in Johann Mouse?
Who produced Rabbit of Seville?
Who produced What's Opera, Doc?
What does the written score not usually contain explicitly? 
Interpretations of written score is left to whom?
Performers can use their knowledge of what to help interpret a written score?
Improvisation is integral before what took a high significance?
When did oral tradition disappear?
There is still controversy about how to perform works, even though scores provide what?
A score-centric approach strictly emphasizes what?
When was improvisation in classical music performance common?
When did improvisation begin to lessened strongly?
What part did Mozart and Beethoven often improvise?
What is the name for the practice of singing strictly by the score in opera?
Who strongly supposed ome scritto?
Popular music from the composer's time was incorporation into what?
What did Brahms sometimes use in his Academic Festival Overture?
What type of music was Maurice Ravel influenced by?
Who wrote The Threepenny Opera?
What type of music do certain composers acknowledge a debt to?
Pachelbel's Canon has influenced popular songs since what decade?
What phenomenon sees classical musicians achieving success in popular music?
Baroque or Classical era influence can be seen in what modern musical style?
Ritchie Blackmore and Randy Rhoads play what instrument?
What is the largest Indo-European ethno-linguistic group in Europe?
What areas of the world do Slavs inhabit?
What was colonised by the East Slavs?
What portion of Europe's territory is inhabited by Slavic-speaking communities?
Slavic mercenaries settled where?
The earliest mentions of Slavic raids are across what river?
The earliest mentions of what may be dated to the first half of the 6th century?
No archaeological evidence of a Slavic settlement in the Balkans could be securely dated before when?
There is no evidence of a Slavic settlement where before c. 600 AD?
Who wrote in 545 that "the Sclaveni and the Antae actually had a single name in the remote past; for they were both called Spori in olden times."?
When did Procopius write that "the Sclaveni and the Antae actually had a single name in the remote past; for they were both called Spori in olden times."?
Procopius said Sclaveni and Antae were both called what?
What does Procopius describe in his writings of the Sclaveni and Antae?
Who did Procopius write about in 545?
Who tells us that the Sclaveni had swamps and forests for their cities?
Who had swamps and forests for their cities?
A 6th-century source refers to the Sclaveni as living where?
An uncertain relationship was held between the Slavs and who?
The Veneti tribe was located where?
What name may refer both to Balts and Slavs?
When was the relationship between the Slavs and Veneti uncertain?
When did Slavs appear on Byzantine borders?
The Slavs appeared on whose borders around the 6th century?
Where else reported Slavic settlements?
Where had the Slavs settled by the end of the 6th century?
When had the Slavs settled the Eastern Alps?
What appeared among the Slavs when their migratory movements ended?
When did the first rudiments of state organizations appear among the Slavs?
Early state organizations where headed by what?
Noble Slavs pledged allegiance to whom?
When did Samo become the ruler of the first known Slav state?
What Frankish merchant was the ruler of the first Slav state in Central Europe?
What is the oldest Slav state in Central Europe?
When was the first Bulgarian Empire founded?
Bulgaria was instrumental in the spread of what to the rest of the Slavic world?
What three free Slavic states were in the world as of 1878?
When were the Russian Empire, Serbia, and Montenegro the only free Slavic states in the world?
Whose official independence was declared in 1908?
When were independent states as Czechoslovakia, the Second Polish Republic, and the State of Slovenes, Croats and Serbs established?
Whose plan for the East entailed killing, deporting, or enslaving the Slavs?
What would have led to the starvation of 80 million people in the Soviet Union?
The Nazi Hunger Plan and Generalplan Ost resulted in the death and imprisonment of how many people?
What is the German word for living space?
The first half of the 20th century was marked by what in Russia and the Soviet Union?
Who estimated the Russian population was 90 million fewer than it could have been in 1945?
When was the Russian population estimated to be about 90 million fewer than it could have been?
What was marked by succession of wars, famines, and other disasters in the 20th century?
When did Pan-Slavism develop as a movement?
Pan-Slavism became compromised when what empire started to use it as an ideology justifying its territorial conquests?
The Russian Empire used what as justification for its territorial conquests?
What notable political union of the 20th century covered most South Slavs?
When did Yugoslavia break apart?
Many Slavic populations that were part of the Warsaw Pact are originally from where?
What is the largest Slavic minority?
Where is the largest Slavic minority located?
What other Slavic minorities are in Kazakhstan?
What began as an almost exclusively linguistic and philological enterprise?
When were Slavic languages recognized as Indo-European?
What languages were recognized as Indo-European?
In 1833, Slavic languages were recognized as what?
What depends on what religion is usual for the respective Slavic ethnic groups?
Who uses the Cyrillic alphabet?
Who uses the Latin alphabet?
Other than the Roman Catholics, who else uses Latin?
What is a Latin script to write in Belarusian?
What is the supposed ancestor of all Slavic languages?
Proto-Slavic developed numerous lexical and morphophonological isoglosses with what languages?
The Indo-Europeans who remained after the migrations became speakers of what?
Who became speakers of Balto-Slavic?
Proto-Slavic is a descendant of what?
Proto-Slavic is sometimes referred to as what?
What is defined as the last stage of the language preceding the geographical split of the historical Slavic languages?
Old Church Slavonic manuscripts were based on the local Slavic speech of what?
What could still serve the purpose of the first common Slavic literary language?
Who is customarily divided along geographical lines into tree major subgroups?
What three major subgroups are Slavs divided into?
The Slav subgroups have had notable cultural contact with what kind of civilisations?
Ethnic affiliation of who has become an ideological conflict?
The idea of "Carpatho-Ruthenian" nation is supported only by Lemkos residing where?
Most inhabitants of historic Moravia considered themselves as what?
What group is considered part of the Poles?
Most Slavic Muslims now opt for what ethnicity?
What two groups are considered two ethnonyms for a single ethnicity and the terms may even be used interchangeably?
A small number of people declare themselves Bosniak but are not necessarily Muslim by faith within what regions?
This identity continues to be used by a minority throughout the what former republics?
The nationality is also declared by diasporans living where?
What sub-groups of Slovenes are extinct?
What are the current sub-groups of Slovenes?
What two DNA haplogroups predominate in modern Slavic peoples?
What is the frequency of Haplogroup R1a in the Sorbs?
What is the frequency of Haplogroup R1a in Poland?
What is the frequency of Haplogroup R1a in Ukraine?
What is the frequency of Haplogroup R1a in Russia?
What is distinguished by the presence of Y Haplogroup N?
Pomors are distinguished by the presence of what?
Y Haplogroup N are found at high rates in who?
Russians are generally similar to populations in what region?
Pomors are also known as what?
DNA from how many Russians show that the Y chromosomes fall into seven major haplogroups all characteristic to West Eurasian populations?
DNA samples from 1228 Russians show that the Y chromosomes analyzed, all except 20 (1.6%) fall into seven major haplogroups all characteristic to what populations?
Taken together, they account for what percentage of the total Russian Y chromosomal pool?
What percentage fell into haplogroups that are specific to East and South Asian populations?
Mitochondrial DNA (mtDNA) examined in Poles and Russians revealed the presence of what major haplogroups?
Where did South Slavs and Germanic Gepids intermarried with Avar invaders?
In the Western Balkans, South Slavs and Germanic Gepids intermarried with who?
In Central Europe, the Slavs intermixed with who?
The eastern Slavs intermixed with who?
Scandinavians (Varangians) and Finnic peoples were involved in the early formation of what state?
Who settled in parts of England?
Where did Polabian Slavs (Wends) settle?
Polabian-Pomeranian Slavs are also known to have even settled where?
What refers to the Slavic mercenaries and slaves in the medieval Arab world in North Africa, Sicily and Al-Andalus?
Saqaliba served as what?
Cossacks came from what backgrounds?
Many early members of the Terek Cossacks were what?
What religious affiliation did the Cossacks have?
Where did the Gorals reside?
Who descended from Romance-speaking Vlachs?
When did the Vlachs migrate into the region?
What population descended from the Vlachs?
Slavs that remained in the Carpathian basin were assimilated into who?
There is a large number of river names and other placenames of Slavic origin in what country?
Majority of Slavs continued south to the riches of the territory that became what country?
Where did the Slavs that assimilated into the Magyar or Romanian population remain?
What is the big retail shopping center in Southampton called?
In what month of 2014 did Southampton's City Council give the go-ahead for WestQuay Watermark?
What war is Southampton often associated with?
What company owns WestQuay Watermark?
By the end of 2016, how many people are projected to be working onsite at WestQuay Watermark?
What other city merged with Southampton after the 2001 census?
What's the other name for South Hampshire?
In the 2011 census, what was the population of Southampton after it merged with Portsmouth?
What metropolitan area is Portsmouth a part of?
What is the estimated minimum population of South Hampshire?
What year did the Romans invade Britain?
What ancient settlement was established after Rome invaded and the Britons were conquered?
According to evidence found, in what archaeological age were there first inhabitants in the area of Southampton?
What is the site of Clausentum called now?
In addition to two ditches, what was Clausentum's defense from invaders?
What people established a settlement in what is now the St. Mary's area of Southampton?
What name did the Anglo-Saxons give their settlement first?
What name did Hamwic have in the interim as it was evolving into Hampton?
What county in England was named after Hampton?
What river separated Hamwic from the home of previous settlers?
What kind of raids disturbed Hamwic in the 9th century?
What year did the Vikings start attacking Hamwic?
In what century was a new settlement set up at the site of Hamwic?
What was the name of the 10th-century fortified settlement that took Hamwic's place?
In what year did the Norman Conquest take place?
What was the capital of England during the time of the Norman Conquest?
Southampton was important to transit between Winchester and what other region in England in the 11th century?
In what century was Southampton Castle built?
During the 13th century, what did Southampton get in trade for English cloth and wool?
Ruins of merchants' homes that survive today are evidence that Southampton had rich people in what century?
What plague made it to England because of all the ships visiting Southampton in the 14th century?
What year did the Black Death arrive in England for the first time?
In addition to King John's House, what's the name of another rich merchant's dwelling that still partly remains?
What's the name of the wall tower that was the first of its kind in England built for artillery purposes?
In what year was the God's House Tower built?
What museum was located in God's House Tower until 2011?
Which king of England directed new fortifications that helped Southampton rely less on its wall?
In what century did Southampton complete construction of the wall around the city?
The only remaining piece of the motte and bailey castle can be seen near what modern Southampton street?
About what year was the Franciscan friary established in Southampton?
What year did Southampton's Franciscan friary shut down?
In what decade were the leftovers of the Southampton friary destroyed?
What landmark now sits on the site of the Franciscan friary in Southampton?
In what year was the friars' water supply system built in Southampton?
Where was the water brought from by the friars' supply system?
What year did the friars start letting the rest of Southampton use the water from their system?
When was ownership of the medieval water supply system given to the town of Southampton?
What's the name of the landmark on Commercial Road where remains of the friars' water system can be seen?
What war was taking place in the 1640s in England?
What year did a Parliamentary garrison enter Southampton?
What is the furthest town the Royalists reached during their advance into Southampton in 1644?
In what month of 1644 did the Royalists fail to take Redbridge?
What skilled trade was a central industry for Southampton in the Middle Ages?
What's the name of the famed warship built in Southampton for Henry V?
What was the name of the man who overhauled block-making to mechanize the process?
Between 1904 and 2004, what shipbuilding company employed a large portion of Southampton?
In what historical period did Walter Taylor's improvements on block-making play an important role?
What did the military use Southampton for during wars in the 18th century?
In addition to wars with the French and the Boer War, in which notable war in the 18th century did Southampton play a role?
What war won Southampton the title of No. 1 Military Embarkation port?
What group of people in addition to wounded soldiers from the Great War often were brought to Southampton for treatment?
In what year did Southampton lead preparations for the Invasion of Europe?
When did Southampton turn into a spa town?
Despite not having a good beach, what decade saw  Southampton become popular for sea bathing?
Where in Southampton were special baths filled by seawater constructed?
What change in flow of the sea controlled the innovative baths at West Quay?
In what historical period did Southampton expand greatly?
What year was the Southampton Docks company created?
In what month of 1838 was stone laid for the foundation of the Southampton docks?
What year did the railroad to London from Southampton open fully?
What name did Southampton earn for its importance in creating a link to London?
Who wrote "The Cruise of the Steam Yacht North Star"?
What town did Choules say had the only Main Street more beautiful than Southampton's?
How long was Southampton's High Street as described by Choules?
What adjective did Choules use to describe the shops of Southampton's High Street?
Choules complimented the streets of Southampton for being kept in what condition?
What famous ship left Southampton's port carrying the Pilgrim Fathers?
What year did the Mayflower set sail from Southampton?
How many crew members out of every five on the RMS Titanic were Sotonians?
What company operated passenger ships across the Atlantic, including the RMS Queen Elizabeth?
In what year did Southampton Container Terminals open?
How many people died because of the bombs dropped on Southampton?
In addition to casualties, about how many people were wounded by air raids on Southampton?
Was it hundreds or thousands of buildings in Southampton that sustained damage from air raids?
What style of architecture partially survived the war?
Southampton has been redeveloped almost entirely in the years since which war?
In which decade did there start to be a lot of traffic in Southampton?
Some of the walls around which landmark were demolished in the 1930s?
What document declared the upgrade of University College at Highfield?
What is the new name of University College at Highfield?
When did Southampton officially become a city?
In what year did the Royal Charter give the University of Southampton its name?
In what year did an act establish the Hampshire County Council?
What organization did the new county council share governance of Southampton with?
What year was the county of Hampshire officially named?
Even before it was official, Hampshire was often called Hampshire or what ancient variation of the name?
What designation was Southampton given in 1974?
What king's charter recognized Southampton as its own county?
What year did Southampton receive the charter naming it 'The Town and County of the Town of Southampton'?
What era in history saw local government begin setting up County Councils in the area?
After 1888, which Council took over some governance of Southampton Town?
What was the year that Queen Elizabeth II's charter created the City and County of the City of Southampton?
What county did the city of Southampton become administratively independent of in April of 1997?
What official designation did Southampton receive in the April 1997 local government reorganization?
What act was responsible for the reorganization of local government on April 1, 1997?
What ceremonial county does Southampton still belong to?
How many concillors sit on Southampton's City Council?
How man wards are there in Southampton?
How many councillors are assigned to each ward in Southampton?
In what month are council elections held?
In how many years of every four is a council election held in Southampton?
How many representatives does Southampton have in parliament?
What is Royston Smith's constituency?
Who is Southampton Test's member of parliament?
To what political party does Caroline Nokes belong?
Which directional area of Southampton does Dr. Alan Whitehead represent?
How many cities or towns are there in all of England and Wales with a ceremonial sheriff acting as the Mayor's deputy?
Who's the current Mayor of Southampton?
What's the name of the 578th sheriff of Southampton?
When did John Melody, the town crier of Southampton, pass away?
How many decibels was John Melody able to reach in his cry?
What city in France does Southampton City Council have a twinning link with?
Which Italian city did Southampton City Council establish a twinning link with in 2002?
What's the only city in the USA with a twinning link to Southampton City Council?
What year did Southampton City Council link with Busan, South Korea?
In what country does Southampton City Council have a twinning link with Rems-Murr-Kreis?
What's the name of the public quay that's been in Southampton since the 13th century?
In what decade were the Eastern Docks that can be seen today created?
What company commissioned the program that created the Western Docks?
What body of water was dredged for the material used for reclamation?
In what decade did the Southern Railway Company commission the program that created the Western Docks?
How many high tide peaks does Southampton Water get?
What island do many people think causes the double high tide in Southampton Water?
What body of water is actually responsible for the unusual double high tide?
What size ships can move through Southampton Water more easily because of the double high tide?
In addition to its shape, what property of the English Channel affects water flow in Southampton Water?
Along which border of Southampton does the River Test run?
What forest is on the opposite bank of the River Test from Southampton?
What motorway crosses the River Test to the North?
Where was the first bridge built across the River Itchen?
What bridge at Swaythling crosses at the point between the tidal and non-tidal sections of the River Itchen?
What's the largest park in Southampton?
How many hectares is Southampton Common?
What wildlife center is located in Southampton Common?
What related attraction was at the same site before the Urban Wildlife Centre?
How many Local Authorities are there in England?
In addition to the Thornhill and Townhill Park districts, what other district has a council estate?
What's Southampton's ranking on the list of most deprived Local Authorities in England?
What source of geothermal power sits below Southampton's center?
In what region of Southampton is the geothermal power station for the aquifer?
Which section of the city receives hot water from geothermal power through the West Quay plant?
What utility company sponsored a carbon emissions survey in 2006?
In the 2006 study, Southampton was discovered to be one of the lowest carbon emitters out of major cities in what large geographical area?
In 2011, what was the estimated population of Southampton inside city limits?
What nationality of people makes up a large portion of Southampton residents?
What's the highest estimate of the Polish population of the city of Southampton?
How many jobs were there in Southampton in March of 2007?
How many Southampton residents were claiming job seeker's allowance in March, 2007?
In March 2007, what percentage of Southampton residents claimed job seeker's allowance?
What England's average percentage for people claiming job seeker's allowance?
What sector provides about a quarter of Southampton's available jobs?
What percentage of available jobs in Southampton are in the property/other business sector?
What's the third largest sector providing jobs in Southampton?
By what percentage did available jobs increase in Southampton between 1995 and 2004?
What percentage of available jobs in Southampton are in wholesale and retail industries?
About how much of UK's passenger traffic did Southampton handle during the inter-war period?
What kind of passenger ships make up a lot of the traffic in the port of Southampton?
Going by what unit of measurement makes Southampton the fourth largest port in the UK?
In what year did Southampton's fourth cruise terminal open in the western docklands?
What branch of the Department for Transport has its headquarters in Southampton?
What century saw more diverse industries come to Southampton?
Southampton's range of industries includes the manufacture of cars and what other transport?
What kind of engineering does industry in Southampton support?
Along with the docks and grain mills, what crop has been processed in Southampton for a long time?
How many people in the Southampton area receive hospital services from University Hospital Southampton NHS Foundation Trust?
How many people in the South of England rely on the NHS Foundation Trust's specialist services?
What type of service does the NHS Foundation Trust provide at the Countess Mountbatten House?
What hospital is the Countess Mountbatten House a part of?
In what village is Moorgreen Hospital located?
What's the name of the UK's national mapping agency?
What year did Ordnance Survey's new headquarters open in Southampton?
What company said it is planning to move marine operations to the University of Southampton?
What area of Southampton holds a Ford assembly plant?
Which model does Ford manufacture in their Southampton plant?
What's the largest retail center in Southampton?
What's WestQuay's ranking among the largest retail centers in the UK?
What was the name of the third phase of West Quay development that got put on hold because of the recession?
What year did work resume on the development of Watermark Westquay?
What popular Swedish company opened a new store in the West Quay site in 2009?
In what month each year is the Southampton Boat Show held?
What waterfront park hosts the Boat Show?
When was the Boat Show first held in Mayflower Park?
What Southampton festival culminates in the Boat Show?
Attendees of the Boat Show can expect to see at least how many exhibitors?
What gallery in Southampton houses a Designated Collection?
What's the all-lowercase named arts organization in charge of the art gallery in Southampton's Bargate?
What project, also run by a space, showcases art in Southampton's medieval buildings?
What art gallery is a part of Southampton Solent University?
In addition to the Mayflower Theatre, what's Southampton's other big venue for live music?
What legendary band with a color in its name has played at the Guildhall?
What orchestra with a name that starts with "B" has played at the Guildhall?
What choir from the area has sung at the Guildhall?
What nightclub in Southampton was nominated for the UK's best small nightclub?
What genre of music is featured at Junk?
What small music venue in Southampton is named after an aquatic mammal?
What popular RnB singer hails from Southampton?
What's the name of the Coldplay drummer from Southampton?
What group did Southampton's Rob Skipper sing for?
What band that broke up in 2014 was formed in Southampton?
What genre of music is James Zabiela known for?
What program with a direction in its name does the BBC broadcast from Southampton?
What's the name of the local ITV division?
Where is the Meridian headquarters located?
What is the local television channel for Southampton called?
Towards the end of what year did That's Solent begin broadcasting?
How many community FM radio stations are there in Southampton?
What local FM station won the Queens Award?
What's the new name of the station formerly known as The Saint?
What genre of music is played on The Breeze?
What was the old name of Heart Hampshire?
What's Southampton University's radio station called?
What kind of music does Wave 105 play?
Local Southampton football leagues have what day of the week in their names?
How many local Sunday football leagues does Southampton have? 
What's the name of the local league with "City" in its name?
What's the name of the the local league with "District" in its name?
At what venue does the Hampshire County Cricket Club play?
What part of the city is the Rose Bowl in?
Besides the County Cricket Ground, at what other cricket ground did the Hampshire County Cricket Club used to play?
Besides the Hampshire County Cricket Club, what's the name of the other cricket league in Southampton?
What's the oldest rugby team in Southampton?
What division was Trojans RFC promoted to in 2008-9?
What famous player from Trojans RFC also played for the Leicester Tigers?
What position did Allen play for the Leicester Tigers?
What division do the Tottonians belong to?
What feature does Southampton have plenty of that provides for water sports and yachting?
What race named after a car company used to be hosted in Southampton?
What was the former name of the Volvo Ocean Race?
Which marina in Southampton hosted the yacht race from 1977 too 2001?
What facility is the center of Southampton's public sports and outdoor activities?
How many additional leisure venues are run by Council executives?
What company did the Council leisure executives sell operating rights to?
What magazine awarded Southampton "fittest city in the UK" in 2006?
How many spots did Southampton lose in the "fittest city" rankings for 2007?
Who was the "fittest city in the UK" ahead of Southampton in 2007?
During the pre-war period, where was speedway racing held?
What year did Banister Court Stadium close its doors for good?
What College American Football team calls Southampton home?
At what sports venue do the Southampton Stags play?
Where is the Wide Lane Sports Facility located?
Who handles fires in Southampton?
How many fire stations are there in Southampton city limits?
Along with Hightown and Redbridge, what's the third fire station in Southampton?
How many crimes overall are reported for each 1,000 people in Southampton?
Did Hampshire Constabulary record fewer or more crime incidents in 2009/10 than the year before?
For how many consecutive years has violent crime in Southampton decreased?
Is Southampton's crime rate higher or lower than the national average?
Which statistics are debated because of the different ways various police forces record crime?
Is Southampton's higher education sector weak or strong?
What's the combined student population of the two major universities in Southampton?
What's the name of the institution of higher learning with "Solent" in its name?
What year was the University of Southampton founded?
When did the University of Southampton receive university designation by official Royal Charter?
The University of Southampton has more than what number of students attending?
What research centre at the University of Southampton is abbreviated NOCS?
What organization ranked the University of Southampton in the top 80 universities worldwide in 2010?
How many students attend Southampton Solent University?
What specialized academy does Southampton Solent University host?
In addition to international shipping, what other industry does the Warsash Maritime Academy prepare students for?
How many standalone sixth form colleges are there in Southampton?
What college of further education offers vocational courses and ESOL programs?
What courses does Southampton City College offer to adult students?
What college with the initials BPC is outside of the city but still popular with students from Southampton?
What's the sixth form college named after a person?
More than what percentage of the students surveyed said they'd been bullied?
About how many pupils took the bullying survey?
What specific form of bullying did the survey show was most common?
What was the second most common form of bullying experienced by boys who took the survey?
Which level of schools in Southampton are the worst behaved in the UK?
How many times the national average are the suspension rates at Southampton's secondary schools?
Out of about every 14 students, how many will be suspended from school?
In addition to physical attacks, what other kind of assault do Southampton's students commit against staff more than anywhere else in the country?
Which motorway located north of Southampton links up England's south coast?
Which motorway connects Southampton to London?
What city is located on the A34 where the M3 connects to the North and Midlands?
What spur of the M27 connects it to Southampton's city centre and Western Docks?
Are Southampton's transport routes around the UK good or bad?
Southampton's railways provide freight services and what other important services?
What's the name of the main train station in Southampton?
Heading east from Southampton, what city is connected by rail?
In which direction do trains run from Southampton to Winchester?
In what year did the rail route from Southampton to London open?
In addition to the southern and eastern sections of Southampton, what other section has local train service?
What company operates Southampton's local train service?
What organization announced plans for rail expansion in Southampton in July of 2009?
In what year did a proposal to expand light rail service to Portsmouth and Gosport fail?
What's the current destination of the freight-only line the Hampshire County Council wants to use to expand passenger service?
What competing railway company tried to open a rail route in the 1880s?
In which direction did the Didcot, Newbury and Southampton Railway want to expand?
What feature survives in the Hill Lane area as evidence of the Didcot, Newbury and Southampton Railway's work?
In what town is Southampton Airport located?
What direction would one travel from Southampton to get to the airport in Eastleigh?
If passengers don't want to take a train to the airport, what other transport is available?
To take a train to Southampton Airport, what railway station would you need to go through?
What cruise line has its headquarters in Southampton?
Besides Carnival, what other major cruise line parks its record-breaking cruise ships in Southampton Water? 
In addition to P&O Cruises and Cunard Line, what other brand does Carnival Corporation own?
What brand of cruise ships has a special importance to Southampton?
What was the name of the liner that left Southampton on its final journey on November 11, 2008?
Who christened the Cunard ship Queen Victoria in December 2007?
In what year did the Queen Elizabeth receive its name from the Queen?
What ship did the Duchess of Cambridge christen on June 13, 2013?
What does Southampton call the event when three ships named after queens all visit the city?
Which of the "Three Queens" has a number in its name?
Along with the Queen Mary 2 and Queen Victoria, which third ship must be present for the 'Arrival of the Three Queens'?
What cruise line celebrated a landmark anniversary in Southampton in July of 2012?
Which anniversary did P&O celebrate in Southampton?
How many P&O liners visited Southampton on the day of the 175th anniversary celebrations?
Which of the seven P&O cruise liners has a name that begins with "V"?
Along with the Oriana, what's the other P&O liner with a name that starts with the same letter?
How many internal ferry services does Southampton serve?
What is the name of the quay where all three ferries have their terminals?
How many of the ferries connect to the Isle of Wight?
What company operates the ferries to East Cowes and Cowes?
What body of water does the Hythe Ferry cross to reach Hythe from Southampton?
In what decade was the ferry port built in Southampton to carry people to exotic destinations on the continent?
By what year did car ferries finish operating from Southampton, other than the one to the Isle of Wight?
What was built on the site where the Southampton Ferry Port used to be?
What has the Princess Alexandra Dock become?
What location that was once filled with passengers, dry docks, and trains is now a holding area for new cars?
What form of public transport do most people in Southampton use now?
Along with First Southampton, what is the other main bus operator in Southampton?
What bus service did the University of Southampton commission to carry people between the city and the university?
What time does Uni-link stop service to the university each night?
What operator ran Uni-link before Bluestar?
What road does First use stops around to leave a terminal available for other buses?
Which bus service passes West Quay going in both directions?
What operator drops off and picks up passengers at West Quay?
When did the tram system stop operating in Southampton?
Where do buses that loop around West Quay stop?
Who are the actors in international law?
What is an agreement entered into by actors in international law?
How are different forms of agreements treated under international law compared to treaties?
How would you compare the rules of a treaty and a covenant under international law?
What must a party to a treaty do to prevent being held liable under international law?
What is comparable in domestic law to a treaty in international law?
Under what will a party to a treaty be held liable for failing to uphold their obligations?
What must be the attitude of a party towards assuming the legal obligations of the treaty?
What do we call the willingly-assumed burdens placed upon parties to both treaties and contracts?
How are the agreements in a treaty expressed?
How are states that enter into a treaty bound?
What is an official document which expresses an agreement between two states?
What is an objective outcome of a ceremonial occasion which acknowledges the defined relationships of its parties?
Who is responsible for the legally-bound obligations of the parties to a treaty?
What is shared by most treaties since the late 19th century?
What is the beginning of a typical treaty called?
Why are long sentences in a modern preamble formatted into multiple paragraphs?
Each paragraph of a modern preamble typically begins with which part of speech?
In addition to describing the parties and their joint objectives, what else does a modern preamble typically summarize?
What term describes a common clause in a treaty stating that the representatives of the parties have communicated their full powers?
What are the official documents appointing a party's representative to act on their behalf?
In addition to their full names, what else is included in the preamble that identifies the parties to a treaty?
Who else besides the parties themselves is typically identified in the preamble to a treaty?
What follows the preamble in a treaty?
What is contained in the numbered articles of a treaty?
What does each article heading usually encompass?
How might the articles in a long treaty be grouped?
The numbered articles of a treaty may be grouped by chapter heading in what kind of treaty?
What type of resolution to disputes is typically outlined in a treaty?
Which section of a treaty typically contains information about the whereabouts of the final authentic copies of a treaty?
Parties to a treaty might have disputes about what aspect of the articles of a treaty?
Which copies of a treaty have their locations outlined in most modern treaties?
Modern treaties typically outline the procedures for the peaceful resolution of what?
What is the formal name for the closing protocol of a treaty?
What typically follows the signatures in a treaty?
How is the date typically written in a treaty?
What is the nature of the different versions of a treaty executed in multiple languages?
A clause like "in witness whereof" or "in faith whereof" typically signals what in a treaty?
Whose signatures appear at the very end of a treaty?
Where might the text of a treaty be reprinted?
Who, upon reprinting, will often append the dates on which the treaty was ratified and came into effect?
Each party must have done what in order for the treaty to come into effect?
Even if signed  and ratified on the same date, the treaty might have done what on different dates?
What is a treaty concluded among several countries?
Between which parties does a multilateral treaty establish rights and obligations?
The Treaty of Locarno guarantees each signatory against what from another signatory?
What type of treaty is a mutual guarantee?
Multilateral treaties are often entered into by countries that share the same what?
What are caveats to a state's acceptance of a treaty?
What are unilateral statements purporting to exclude or to modify the legal obligation and its effects on a state?
When must reservations be included in a treaty?
What are parties to a treaty forbidden to do after they have already joined a treaty?
A reserving party to a treaty may include a statement that attempts to do what to its legal obligations or their effects?
A more permissive rule regarding what emerged to encourage the largest number of states to join treaties?
Reservations are generally permitted so long as they are not what?
How did international law originally respond to treaty reservations?
Originally reservations were rejected under international law unless which parties of the treaty accepted them?
Because they are generally accepted under international law, a treaty must forbid reservations in what manner to prevent their adoption?
When a state adds reservations to a treaty, other parties to the treaty can respond to those reservations in what ways?
Who remains unaffected when a party's reservation is accepted by a second party?
What happens to the parts of the treaty affected by a rejected reservation as they concern the reserving and rejecting parties?
What legal obligations exist between two state parties if one objects and opposes the other's reservations?
If a state party objects and opposes another state's reservations it essentially refuses to acknowledge what?
What is a treaty that supplements a previous treaty in international law?
A protocol may either amend a previous treaty or do what?
Do parties to a treaty have an obligation to adopt a later protocol?
What do we sometimes call an agreement that supplements a treaty especially when few parties to the treaty support the protocol?
A protocol may add additional provisions to a treaty or else do what?
The Kyoto Protocol is associated with what treaty?
The United Nations Framework Convention on Climate Change was supplemented by what protocol?
The United Nations Framework Convention on Climate Change established a framework for the development of what?
While the United Nations Framework Convention on Climate Change established a framework for developing greenhouse gas emission limits, the Kyoto Protocol contained what?
The agreement that contained specific provisions related to the United Nations Framework Convention on Climate Change is an example of what agreement that supplements a treaty?
What type of treaty cannot be acted on without the proper change in domestic law?
A state party may be in default of its obligations under a non-self-executing treaty if its legislature fails to do what?
What institution of a party to a treaty must act to fulfill the party's obligations under a non-self-executing treaty?
The often unclear division between a self-executing treaty and a non-self-executing treaty can lead to a treaty being what if disagreements exist within a party?
A treaty may be politicized due to disagreements within a party because the division between a self-executing treaty and a non-self-executing treaty can often be described as what?
What principle is often invoked by legal experts when interpreting the language of treaties?
The principle of maximum effectiveness interprets the language of treaties as having what effect to establish obligations between parties?
What states that treaties are to be interpreted "in good faith" according to the "ordinary meaning given to the terms of the treaty in their context and in light of its object and purpose?"
What property of treaties must often be interpreted when it's not clear?
Besides unclear language what might also arise that necessitates the interpretation of the language of a treaty?
What are international tribunals and arbiters often called upon to resolve in regards to treaties?
What judicial bodies might be called upon to resolve disputes pertaining to the interpretation of treaties?
In addition to the final, signed treaty what else might arbiters review to establish the meaning of a treaty in context?
For what purpose might an international tribunal review the preparatory work from the negotiation and drafting of a treaty?
In addition to the preparatory work from the drafting and negotiation of a treaty, what might arbiters review when resolving a dispute over the interpretation of a treaty?
What are agreements between states within the United States called?
What are agreements between states and the federal government called within the United States?
In the United States, what are agreements between agencies of the federal government called?
Nations can be careful about terming an agreement a treaty because it has the effect of recognizing that the other side is a what?
Under what do all parties to a treaty recognize the provisions of the treaty are enforceable?
Parties to a treaty may disagree over a desire to create an obligation under what?
Discussions between what two countries have been influence by one party's desire to create an obligation under international law?
Discussion between North Korea and the United States have been influenced by one party's desire to create obligations under international law with respect to what two topics?
North Korea and the United States have been characterized by a disagreement over one parties desire to create what with respect to security guarantees and nuclear proliferation?
What is the Treaty of Waitangi internationally considered to be?
What other terms might be used to refer to a treaty?
What common terminological problem can sometimes lead to confusion surrounding a treaty?
What's an example of a treaty that is considered internationally to be documents under domestic law?
Convention, protocol, and agreement are examples of examples of different kinds of what that can create confusion about a treaty?
Traditionally, what must a state do in order for an obligation to arise in international law?
What is the only barrier to withdrawal contained in many treaties?
Are treaties permanently binding upon the signatory parties?
What treaty will terminate if the number of parties falls below 40 as a result of denunciations?
Which article of the Vienna Convention on the Law of Treaties provides that there is a presumption that treaties cannot be unilaterally denounced?
What is an example of a treaty from which it is not possible to withdraw?
What state declared its intention to withdraw from the International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights?
Who, acting as registrar, informed North Korea that withdrawal was deliberately precluded by the original signatories of the International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights?
What two factors determine whether it is possible to withdraw from a treaty?
The terms and travaux preparatoire of the International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights were both factors in determining what aspect of the treaty as it relates to North Korea's stated intentions?
What factor, in practice, allows a state to withdraw from any treaty at any time?
What really determines whether withdrawal from a treaty is permitted?
What might a state do in response to another state's withdrawal from a treaty?
Although withdrawal from a treaty may not be possible in theory, when might it be possible anyway?
Because of sovereignty when may a state withdrawal from a treaty?
What happens to a state's obligations under a treaty upon its withdrawal from the treaty?
What kind of treaty is terminated by the withdrawal of just one party?
What happens to a multilateral treaty's rights and obligations among the other parties when just one party withdraws?
After what action by a state are its obligations under a treaty considered terminated?
Under what conditions could a single state's withdrawal result in the termination of a multilateral treaty?
What may be invoked as grounds for permanently terminating a treaty?
In addition to terminating the treaty itself, what actions by the other parties might result from one party materially violating or beaching its obligations?
In addition to suspending their obligations under a treaty to the violating party, what may result from a material breach of treaty obligations?
Who may invoke a material breach committed by a party to a treaty to suspend their obligations to that party?
What temporary actions can parties of a treaty take in response to a material violation of a party's obligations?
What might a tribunal or an arbiter be asked to determine regarding a breach of a treaty?
Using what to determine the seriousness of a breach can prevent a party from prematurely suspending its obligations due to another party's alleged material breach?
Does a material breach necessarily suspend or terminate treaty relations?
What determines whether a breach automatically suspends or terminates treaty relations?
 A treaty breach does not necessarily affect treaty relations depending on how serious the other parties view the breach and what other factor?
Some treaties contains provisions for what to happen if certain defined conditions are met?
What provision might a treaty include if it's meant to be only temporarily binding?
In addition to passing an expiration date, what might cause a treaty to self-terminate?
What happens to a treaty that was designed to terminate under certain conditions when those conditions are actually met?
What may we assume the parties to a treaty intended the treaty's obligations to be if the treaty included an expiration date?
The Islamic Prophet Muhammad carried out a siege against what tribe in February 624?
Muhammad ordered his followers to attack the Banu Qaynuqa Jews for allegedly breaking what treaty?
Who's insistence led the Prophet Muhammad to expel the Banu Qaynuqa Jews instead of kill them?
Pinning the clothes of a Muslim woman, which led to her being what, was the action that allegedly violated the Constitution of Medina?
What chained actions resulted from the alleged violation of the Constitution of Medina by the Banu Qaynuqa Jews?
What angel, according to Muslim tradition, ordered Muhammad to order a siege on the Banu Qurayza?
Who claims Muhammad had a treaty with the Banu Qurayza that was torn apart?
How many members of the Banu Qurayza were beheaded after surrendering to Muhammad and his followers according to Tabari and Ibn Hisham?
According to Sunni Hadith which members of the Banu Qurayza were beheaded after surrendering to Muhammad and his followers?
How many Muslims were killed during the invasion of Banu Qurayza?
When are most of the problems created that might result in an otherwise valid treaty being rejected as a binding international agreement?
What treaties between Japan and Korea are examples of treaties that were declared null and void?
In what treaty were the serial Japan-Korea treaties of 1905, 1907, and 1910 confirmed as "already null and void?"
Which two states signed a treaty that declared previous treaties between the two from 1905, 1907, and 1910 to be already void?
An otherwise valid and agreed upon treaty may be rejected as what for several reasons most of which involve problems created at the formation of a treaty?
A party's consent to a treaty is invalid if it had been given by an agent or body without power to do so under what?
For what does a strong presumption exist internationally that a head of state has acted within in entering into a treaty?
What is required to invalidate a party's consent due to a reluctance to inquire into the internal affairs and processes of other states?
A manifest violation is required to invalidate a party's consent to a treaty due to a reluctance internationally to inquire into what aspects of other states?
What might a party's consent to a treaty be considered if it has been given by an agent without the power under the state's domestic law to do so?
If a state's representative ignored restrictions he is subject to by his sovereign, what might that state's consent to a treaty be considered to be?
Who might place restrictions on a representative during negotiation of a treaty?
What must be true of the ignored restrictions placed on a representative by his sovereign in order for a state's consent to a treaty to be considered invalid?
Who must have been notified of the ignored restrictions placed by a sovereign on his representative prior to the signing of a treaty in order for a state's consent to be considered invalid? 
The preamble of what states that treaties are a source of international law?
Which will prevail in a conflict between international and domestic law?
What are started to be a source of international law in the preamble in The Law of Treaties?
Approval under what law will not make an act or lack thereof legal if condemned under international law?
An act or lack thereof cannot be made legal under what law even if made legal under internal law?
What on behalf of a state cannot invalidate that state's consent to a treaty?
Consent to a treaty will not be invalidated if what should have been evident?
What may be invalidated if there was an erroneous understanding of a fact or situation at the time of conclusion of a treaty?
An erroneous understanding of a fact or situation may only invalidate a state's consent to a treaty if what is also true about the erroneous understanding?
What, if it formed the "essential basis" of a state's consent to a treaty, may invalidate that consent?
What type of conduct of a party to a treaty can invalidate the consent of another party?
What type of action, either direct or indirect, of a state's representative by another type of party to a treaty can invalidate a state's consent?
Coercion of a representative or a state itself will result in what happening to its consent to a treaty?
Coercion of a state or its what through the threat or use of force, if used to obtain the consent of that state to a treaty, will invalidate that consent?
What must  be true of coercion through the threat or use of force of a party to treaty for it to invalidate the state's consent to a treaty?
What will a treaty be if it is in violation of a peremptory norm?
What type of norm is recognized as permitting no violations and so cannot be altered through treaty obligations?
What is true of acts such as genocide and piracy in regard to treaty law?
What distinguishes peremptory norms from other principles of customary law?
What is an example of a type of universally prohibited action that no state can legally assume an obligation to commit or permit through a treaty?
What is the judiciary organ of the United Nations?
What document states that treaties must be registered with the United Nations to be invoked before it or enforced in the International Court of Justice?
Why does the United Nations Charter state that treaties must be registered with the United Nations?
In which centuries did a proliferation of secret treaties occur that led the United Nations Charter to include an obligation to register treaties to be invoked before it?
What section of the United Nations Charter states that its members' obligation under the charter outweigh any competing obligations under other treaties?
Treaties and their amendments must follow the official legal procedures of what body after their adoption?
Which office of the United Nations is in charge of applying its official legal procedures?
When must all treaties and their amendments follow the official legal procedures of the United Nations?
In addition to signature and ratification, what legal procedure of the United Nations must all treaties follow after their adoption?
What are three official legal procedures of the United Nations that all treaties must follow after their adoption?
The United Nations has been compared to what government in function and effectiveness?
In which aspects has the United Nations been compared to the pre-Constitutional United States Federal government?
The comparison of the United Nations to the pre-Constitutional United States Federal government gives us a comparison between what modern and historical legal topics of interest?
Modern treaty law can be compared in function and effectiveness to the historical Articles of Confederation by comparing the pre-Constitutional United States Federal government with what modern institution?
What legal document formed the basis of the pre-Constitutional Federal government of the United States?
What part of the Brazilian federal consitution states that the power to enter into treaties is vested in the president and that such treaties must be approved by Congress?
In practice the Brazilian president must get the prior approval of what body in order to negotiate and sign a treaty?
What Brazilian institution has ruled that a treaty must be incorporated into domestic law by means of a presidential decree?
In order for a treaty to be valid in Brazil, a presidential decree incorporating the treaty into domestic law must be published where in order to be valid?
In what office is the power to enter into treaties vested according to the Brazilian federal constitution?
What kind of clause does the United States constitution have that the Brazilian constitution does not have with the same effects?
A supremacy clause in a federal constitution is relevant to the discussion on the relation between treaties and what other type of legislation?
What clause of the United States Constitution is relevant to the discussion of the relation between treaties and U.S. legislation?
The Brazilian constitution does not have a supremacy clause that would be of interest to the relation between state legislation and what other legal agreements?
Treaties, executive agreements, congressional-executive agreements, and sole executive agreements are the same under international law but different with respect to what?
Under US law, what primarily distinguishes treaties, executive agreements, congressional-executive agreements, and sole executive agreements?
What percentage of United States Senators must give advice and consent in order for the US to enter a treaty?
What type of agreement may a US president enter by acting alone?
What type of agreement requires majority approval by both the House and the Senate before or after a treaty is signed by the United States president?
In the United States, what is the ratio of executive agreements to treaties?
What is it about the approval process of executive agreements might lead a US president to prefer them over treaties?
The president of the United States might prefer the formal treaty process on matters that require Congress to do what?
The president of the United States might prefer the formal treaty process for agreements that impose what type of legal obligations on the US?
The international deal between the US, other countries, and what controversial nation is not a treaty?
In what cases did the US Supreme Court rule that treaties do not have a privileged position over Acts of Congress?
The US Supreme Court ruled that treaties can be repealed or modified by what for the purposes of US law?
What Supreme Court case ruled that a treaty provision that conflicts with the US Constitution is null and void under US law?
The US Supreme Court ruled that treaties can be repealed or modified for the purposes of US law just like what by any subsequent Act of Congress?
Any treaty provision that conflicts with the US Constitution is considered what under US law?
Into what 3 lists are legislation subjects divided in India?
What type of legislative subjects can both the central legislative body and state legislatures make laws?
What is the central legislative body in India?
In order to implement international treaties, for what subjects can the Parliament of India legislate to override the general division of subject lists?
What subjects can only be legislated by the central legislative body in India?
What formed an important part of European colonization?
With whom did Europeans attempt to sign treaties in order to legitimize their sovereignty during colonization?
What terms in relation to Europeans did most indigenous people enjoy under treaties?
What aspect of the treaties that indigenous people signed with Europeans did the indigenous people typically not understand?
What did Europeans try to legitimize all over the world by signing treaties with indigenous people?
In what two rare cases were local governments able to mitigate the impact of of European colonization through treaties?
What did Ethiopians learn in order to use treaties to prevent a European power from overstepping their agreement?
Both Ethiopia and Qing Dynasty China learned the intricacies of European diplomatic customs to mitigate what through treaties?
In addition to preventing a power from overstepping their agreement, how was Ethiopia able to mitigate the impact of European colonization?
Ethiopia and Qing Dynasty China were both able to prevent European powers from doing what to their agreements?
What ethnicity was Tito's mother?
What ethnicity was Tito's father?
Who captured him during World War I?
Tito joined which unit in Omsk?
What party in Yugoslavia did he join?
When was he conscripted into the army?
What position in the army did he become after office school?
What competition did he win a silver medal in?
For what crime was he arrested?
Where was Tito serioiusly wounded and captured by the Russians at?
When did German forces launch an invasion of Yugoslavia?
Which king fled the country in 1941?
What did Tito use to get the people to unit in a battle against the occupation in 1941?
What position was Tito appointed to in 1941 by the Central Committee?
In 1941, where did representatives of the government and military meet with German officials?
Who was Tito considered loyal to?
Who was Tito considered second to in the Eastern bloc?
With whom did Tito have an uneasy alliance form the start?
Who considered Tito too independent?
Who was considered loyal to Moscow?
In 1944 who called on all Yuboslavs to come together under Tito's leadership?
With whom did Tito sign an agreement on September 28 1944?
Who were allowed "temporary entry" into Yugoslav territory?
Who assisted in operations in ortheastern areas of Yugoslavia?
Who executed a massive offensive and succeeded in breaking through German lines?
Who offered amnesty to the retreatig column? 
Who dispatched a telegram to the supreme headquarters prohibiting the execution of prisoners of war?
In the final days of WWII in Yugoslavia, who were responsible for atrocities?
What did Tito offer to the retreating column?
Who had a leading role in liberating Yugoslavia?
Who was Tito formally an ally of after WWII?
Who set up a spy ring in the Yugoslav party?
As early as what year was a spy ring set up in the Yugoslav party?
From what domination did Yugoslavia liberate itself?
What Italian territory did Yugoslavia acquire after the war?
What territory did Yugoslavia leadership want to incorporate?
At least how many American aircraft were shot down between 1945 and 1948?
Who openly supported the Communist side in the Greek Civil War?
In what year did Tito model his economic development plan independently from Moscow?
Tito did not attend the second meeting of this.
In what year did the crisis nearly escalate into armed conflict?
What was the name of those purged in other socialist states in Eastern Europe?
Who made several assasination attempts on Tito?
Which country gave Yugoslavia aid when Tito became estranged from the USSR?
What agency distributed aid to Yugoslavia?
What plan was also administered by the ECA?
Which leader feared that accepting American aid meant aligning with the West?
In what year did Stalin die?
What name refers to the period of instability during the rift between Tito and the USSR?
What was Tito's form of communism called?
Who encouraged purges against Titoites?
Throughout what area did purges of Titoites occur?
Who became the first leader to defy Stalin's leadership?
Under whose leadership did Yugoslavia become a founding member of the Non-Aligned Movement?
In what year did Tito co-found the Non-Aligned Movement?
Nasser led which country in 1961?
Which Indonesian leader co-founded the Non-Aligned movement with Tito?
Who became the first Secretary General of the Non-Aligned Movement?
When did Tito first visit Emperor Haile Selassie?
When did Tito last visit Emperor Selassie?
What country does Emperor Selassie rule?
In what country does Tito have a street named in his honor?
Who is the Emperor of Ethiopia in 1954?
During what period did Tito pursue a policy of neutrality?
With whom did Tito's belief in self-determination cause a rift?
What type of countries did Tito develop relations with?
Who had a strong belief in self-determination and was opposed to Stalin because of this?
Tito had cordial relations with the United States and what other Western area?
When did Tito first visit India?
When did Tito leave India?
After his return from where did Tito remove many restrictions on churches in Yugoslavia?
Where did Tito visit from 1954 to 1955?
After returning from India, Tito removed restrictions on what type of institutions?
What country did U Nu lead?
Who was the leader of Burma in 1955?
Who succeeded U Nu in Burma?
Ne Win led what country?
Who led Burma in 1959?
When did Yugoslavia change its name to the Socialist Federal Republic of Yugoslavia?
Two government ministers resigned over Tito's visit to what region?
Eisenhower met Tito where in 1960?
Who said that neutralism did not imply passivity but mean "not taking sides"?
When did Tito meet Eisenhower at the U.N.?
What person's calls for unity is credited by western communists of holding together Yugoslavia?
What was referred to as the "Mass Movement"?
When was the new Yugoslavian constitution passed?
Who was named President for Life of Yugoslavia in 1974?
What flag did protesters of Tito often burn?
What did protesters scream during Tito's visit to the United Nations in the late 1970's?
What American state did Tito visit when he saw the U.N.?
Security for Tito's visit was unusually high to keep Tito away from what individuals?
Where did Tito travel in 1977 to reconcile with Chinese leadership?
In what year did Tito travel to China to reconcile with Chinese leadership?
What Chinese leader traveled to Yugoslavia in 1979?
After the constitutional changes made in what year did Tito reduce his role in the day-to-day running of the state.
In what year did Tito travel to the U.S. to visit Washington D.C., amist protest by anti-communist Croat, Serb and Albanian groups?
On what year did a Slovenian court find a 2009 naming of a street after Tito to be unconstitutional?
Where was the street named after Tito that was found unconstitutional located?
Several public area of Slovenia bear which person's name.
Under which ruler do historians argue human rights were suppressed in Yugoslavia?
Tito Square is located in what Slovenian city?
How tall is the statue in Tito Square?
Where is a 10-meter statue of Tito located?
Where is Velenje located?
What is the ethnic origin of the Danube Swabian people?
Where is the location of the Danube Swabian population?
There were mass executions of Danube Swabian populations in what city?
Which group of people occupied Yugoslavia at the end of World War II?
At the end of what World War did the Germans occupy Yugoslavia?
Where is the Hotel Lux located in Russia?
When did Tito stay at the Hotel Lux?
What is the name of the Austrian comrade Tito met in Moscow in 1936?
When did Tito marry Lucia Bauer?
Tito's marriage to what person was later erased in records?
With what accent did Tito speak German according to a biographer?
How much English did Tito speak?
Other than Serbo-Croatian, German, Russian, Czech, Slovenian and English, French and Italian, what language does Tito speak?
What did Tito declare himself to be religiously as an adult?
What type of religious educaton did Tito attend as a child?
What did a priest do to Tito as a child when he had difficulty removing the priest's vestments?
After being yelled at by a priest as a child, what place of worship would Tito refuse to enter again?
What is the name of the largest town or city renamed in Tito's name?
What is Titograd now called?
What is Podgorica the capital city of?
Whose name was added to the name for every town or city with historical signiciance from the World War II period?
Experts from what country disproved the NSA's report?
What was the distinct local dialect Tito spoke?
Croatian experts disproved the report from which group concerning Tito's ethnic origins?
Tito's acute accent is present only in what type of dialects?
Starting in what year was the Communist Party outlawed in Yugoslavia?
What party was outlawed in Yugoslavia in 1920?
"Rudi", "Walter" and "Tito" are names that what person assumed?
On what date in 1920 was the Communist party outlawed in Yugoslavia?
What was Tito's former name?
How many awards and decorations did Josip Broz Tito recieve?
Of all of the awards Tito received, how many were from Yugoslavia itself?
Which government awards the Legion of Honour and the National Order of Merit?
Which government awards the Order of the Bath?
Which government awards the Order of the Chrysanthemum?
Tito was awarded the Star of what country?
Tito was awarded the Decoration of Honour for Services to the Republic of what country?
Tito was awarded the Queen of where?
Tito was awarded with the Order of the White Rose of what country?
Tito was awarded with the Royal Order of what country?
Who were the original settlers of the area that became the Marshall Islands?
How were original settlers of the area able to move between islands?
In what year did a European explorer first see the Marshall Islands?
Which explorer first saw the Marshall Islands?
For whom are the Marshall Islands named?
During what span were the Marshall Islands first settled?
Who first settled the Marshall Islands?
In what decade did Europeans first visit the Marshall Islands?
In what month and year did a European first arrive at the Marshall Islands?
After whom are the Marshall Islands named?
In what year did the Marshall Islands gain official recognition by the major European nations?
In 1884, which country purchased the Marshall Islands?
What group was the Marshall Islands a part of following World War I?
Who took over the Marshall Islands in the second world war?
In what year did the Marshall Islands achieve total sovereignty?
What European nation owned the Marshall Islands in 1874?
Who bought the Marshall Islands from the Spanish in 1884?
Who occupied the Marshall Islands during the First World War?
In what year was the South Pacific Mandate created?
In what year did the Marshall Islands become a sovereign nation?
What term describes the type of government of the Marshall Islands?
With which country are the Marshall Islands closely related?
What is the main focus of the Marshall Islands' economy?
What does the Marshall Islands receive from the United States?
What is the currency of the Marshall Islands?
Along with the USPS, what United States agency operates in the Marshall Islands?
What is the main component of the Marshall Islands economy?
What is the official currency of the Marshall Islands?
What is the government structure of the Marshall Islands?
Assistance from what country is an important part of the Marshall Islands economy?
Who arrived at the Marshall Islands in the second millennium BC?
What did not exist at the time during which Micronesians arrived at the Marshall Islands?
What vessel did early settlers of the Marshall Islands use to travel?
What is the name of the item used as a primitive type of map for navigation by early settlers of the Marshall Islands?
Who first settled the Marshall Islands?
When were the Marshal Islands first settled?
In what vehicles did the Marshall Islanders travel by water?
What navigation aids did the Marshall Islanders use?
Who arrived at the Marshall Islands in 1788?
What do natives of the Marshall Islands call their country?
Which Russian was involved in naming the Marshall Islands?
Which French citizen was involved in naming the Marshall Islands?
At what island did the Globe arrive in 1824?
Who notably accompanied John Charles Marshall to the Marshall Islands?
In what year did Marshall and Gilbert go to the islands?
What is the traditional name of the Marshall Islands?
What is the English translation of the traditional name of the Marshall Islands?
On what island did mutinous American whalers land in 1824?
Who was the leader of the group attacked by the people of the Marshall Islands in 1834?
What vessel was attacked in 1845?
What ships were attacked in 1852?
In what year did missionaries arrive to live in the Marshall Islands?
On what island did the Missionaries live with citizens of the Marshall Islands?
Who was the captain of the crew killed in 1834?
In what year was the ship Naiad attacked by natives?
What type of ship was the Naiad?
Out of what city was the Sea Nymph sailing?
Where did missionaries live as of 1857?
What Catholic group was Father Erdland a part of?
In what year did Father Erdland leave the Marshall Islands?
In what year was Father Linckens' last visit to the Marshalls?
When was Father Linckens' book published?
In what year did Father Linckens first travel to the Marshalls?
What notable historical event occurred in Japan in 1868?
In what region did the Japanese attempt to build up their power after 1868?
Along with fishermen, what sort of Japanese people visited the Marshalls?
On what date did the Japanese land on Enewetak?
What military alliance did the Japanese join in the First World War?
What did the Japanese occupy on September 30, 1914?
On what date was the Treaty of Versailles signed?
When was the South Pacific Mandate for Japan approved?
About how many Japanese emigrated to the Marshalls when it was a Japanese colony?
What was the primary nature of Germany's interest in the Marshall Islands?
What was the primary nature of Japan's interest in the Marshall Islands?
Along with the Mariana Islands, on what island were there more Japanese settlers than indigenous inhabitants?
What was the traditional social organization of the Marshall Islanders?
What system of social organization was used in Japan?
On what date did the Japanese leave the League of Nations?
What language were Marshall Islanders taught in schools while under Japanese colonial administration?
Along with Protestants, missionaries from what denomination were allowed to operate in the Marshalls?
What Japanese fleet was based in the Marshall Islands?
On what atoll was the 6th Fleet Forces Service based?
What was the mission of the 6th Fleet Forces Service?
During what conflict did the US occupy the Marshall Islands?
What was the name of the campaign in which the US occupied the Marshalls?
In what year did the United States occupy the Marshalls?
How many months did it take for the US to occupy Kwajalein Atoll, Majuro and Enewetak?
Along with Mili, Maloelap and Jaluit, what parts of the Marshall Islands were not occupied in the first three months of the American campaign?
In what year did American air attacks on the Marshalls begin?
How large was the Japanese garrison on Mili?
What fraction of the Japanese garrison on Mili died due to hunger?
Along with injuries, what suffering did the American bombing cause to the Marshall Islanders?
During what conflict did the US occupy the Marshalls?
What resolution of the UN Security Council gave the United States control over the Marshalls?
In what year was the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands created?
What is the name of the broader region that the Marshall Islands are a part of?
In what year did the Cold War begin?
How many nuclear weapons were tested in the Marshall Islands between 1946 and 1958?
What was the name of the United States' largest atmospheric nuclear test?
What was the yield of the Castle Bravo bombs in kilotons?
Which of the Marshall Islands was destroyed in a United States hydrogen bomb test?
What was the name of the US study of nuclear fallout on Bikini Atoll?
When did the United States begin to pay compensation to Marshall Islanders for nuclear weapon exposure?
In millions of dollars, how much money did the United States pay out in nuclear testing compensation to Marshall Island residents between 1956 and 1998?
What document granted sovereignty to the Marshall Islands?
In what year did the Marshall Islands receive sovereignty?
Where in the Marshall Islands does the United States have a missile testing range?
When did UN Trusteeship over the Marshall Islands end?
What Security Council Resolution ended UN Trusteeship over the Marshalls?
What is the capital of the Marshall Islands?
On what day in 2008 did the Marshall Island government declare a state of emergency?
In meters, how high were the 2008 floods?
What caused the 2008 floods?
In what year did waves overcome the walls of the capital city?
What part of the Marshall Islands experienced drought in 2013?
How many people were stricken by drought in 2013?
In the drought stricken areas, how many litres of water did residents consume each day?
Along with pink eye and influenza, what other health issue was caused by the drought?
What official declared a state of emergency in the Marshall Islands in response to the drought?
As of 2013, who was the Marshall Islands Minister of Foreign Affairs?
In what month and year did the 44th Pacific Islands Forum summit take place?
What document did Foreign Minister de Brum present at the 44th Pacific Islands Forum summit?
What environmental issue did the Majuro Declaration for Climate Leadership address?
Who encouraged de Brum to address climate issues?
What is the governing system of the Marshall Islands?
How old must a citizen of the Marshall Islands be to vote?
How often are elections held in the Marshall Islands?
What is the name of the Marshall Islands legislature?
When was the most recent constitution of the Marshall Islands adopted?
What document governs the defense of the Marshall Islands?
What nation is responsible for the defense of the Marshall Islands?
Along with economic aid, what assistance does the Compact of Free Association provide?
When did the UN Security Council recommend that the Marshall Islands be allowed to join the UN?
When did the UN General Assembly approve the Marshall Islands joining the UN?
What nation does the Marshall Islands vote similarly to in the General Assembly?
What Security Council Resolution recommended that the Marshall Islands be allowed to join the UN?
On what date did the Iranian Navy capture a Marshall Islands ship?
What was the name of the Marshall Islands ship seized by Iran?
Who chartered the captured Marshall Islands ship?
How many crew members were on the MV Maersk Tigris?
Near what body of water was the Maersk Tigris seized?
What nation lies to the west of the Marshall Islands?
What United States territory does the Marshall Islands claim?
How many square kilometers of ocean do the Marshall Islands cover?
How many square kilometers of land do the Marshall Islands cover?
How many atolls are part of the Marshall Islands?
How large is the Marshall Islands shark sanctuary in square miles?
In what month and year did the Marshall Islands declare the largest shark sanctuary in the world?
In how many square miles of ocean around the world are sharks protected?
What is forbidden in shark sanctuaries?
What island do the Marshall Islands claim?
Who controls Wake Island?
In what year did the US take control of Wake Island?
What does the Marshall Islands government call Wake Island?
When does the wet season in the Marshalls begin?
In what month does the Marshall Islands wet season end?
Typhoons sometimes begin as what whether event in the Marshalls?
Along with the Marianas, where do typhoons that begin in the Marshalls sometimes terminate?
What feature makes the Marshalls susceptible to harm due to rising sea levels?
Who said that the Marshalls are the most endangered nation in the world?
Why are the Marshall Islands the most endangered nation on Earth?
How many millimeters of rain do the northern atolls of the Marshall Islands receive?
What is the main source of fresh water for the Marshall Islands?
What is the Marshall Islands often threatened with?
How much more rain do the southern atolls get compared to the northern?
What body did the Marshall Islands join in 2007?
What is the significance of the Marshall Islands joining the International Labour Organization?
What may see benefits from the Marshalls joining the International Labour Organization?
How much money did the Marshall Islands receive yearly from the United States until 2013?
How much money will the United States give the Marshal Islands every year until 2023?
What document defines how much money is transferred from the United States to the Marshall Islands?
What will be established in 2023?
On what atoll is a missile test facility based?
Who is the missile test facility named after?
What is the official name of the missile test facility?
What organization operates the missile test site?
Along with coconuts, tomatoes and melons, what crops are notably grown in the Marshalls?
Where does most agricultural production take place?
In what year was a tuna loining plant constructed?
How many people worked at the tuna loining plant?
In what year did the tuna loining plant shut down?
Before it shut down, what was the tuna loining plant attempting to produce?
What was the amount of the loan to the tuna loining plant that the Marshall Islands government was responsible for?
Who did Witon Barry work for?
Where was the Tobolar Copra plant located?
What is copra?
How many coconuts are required to produce 1 liter of coconut oil?
How many kilowatts of power are produced by the solar plant built in 2009?
About how many people lived in the Marshall Islands in 1862?
How many people lived in the Marshall Islands in 1960?
As of July 2011, how many people resided on the Marshall Islands?
On what atoll is Ebeye located?
What town hosts the largest number of Marshall Islanders outside the Marshall Islands?
What is the ethnicity of most Marshall Islands residents?
From what continent did the Marshallese originate?
What fraction of the population lives on Majuro or Ebeye?
What recent Asian ancestry do some Marshall Island residents have?
From when did the Marshallese migrate from the Asian continent?
What was the previous name of the United Church of Christ?
What percentage of Marshall Islanders belong to the Assemblies of God?
What percentage of Marshall Islands residents are Mormons?
What percentage of Marshall Islanders worship at the Assembly of God Part Two?
When did the first mosque in Majuro open?
What body operates the state schools in the Marshall Islands?
Along with the University of the South Pacific, what tertiary education institution exists in the Marshall Islands?
Where is the Marshall Islands International Airport located?
What airfield operates in Kwajalein?
What is another name for folwarks?
Were the szlachta obscure and mysterious or obvious and proud.
Around what time was the decline of the polish common wealth.
WHat did the commonwealth increase before it declined.
When, during the partitions of Poland, did the szlachta lose legal and social status. 
What was one name of a power that the szlachta was dependent on.
When was the March constitution implemented.
What did the Mach constitution do?
In what republic did the szlachta lose their legal privileges. 
What was the notion for all polish nobles?
What ethnic saying is this traditional from?
Did it matter how much money a person had to polish nobles?
What did the poles of the 17th century think the term szlachta came from?
What does schlachtan mean in german?
What German word is also suggestive deriving from  szlachta?
What does schlacht mean?
The polish believed szlachta derived from the name of who?
What term designated the noble class of polish Lithuania common wealth?
What are two adjectives that best describe the szlachta?
Who is referred to as nobilitas?
What is the legal status of nobilitas?
What simple word does the term szlachta translate too?
What were the non noble land owners referred too as?
Why were the non nobles and nobles referred as the same term?
What does szlachta mainly denote?
Why did the mistranslation of szlachta come about?
Who was inferior of the other, European countries or szlachta?
What ultimately determined nobility?
What were some impoverished szlachta forced to do?
Did the tenants of the wealthier genrty lose their nobility?
What was one noble thing the poor szlachta did?
Around what time were the knights and szlachta very similiar?
What was a personal obligation of the szlachtas?
What contributed to the long standing traditions?
What was governing the polish tribes?
What was the wiec?
When power needed to be consolidated what was chosen to govern?
What was the governing position limited to?
WHat was a polish nobleman referred to as before the 15th century?
What is roughly the same to the english version of rycerz?
What people did the rycerstwo class represent?
What positive did the szlachta class receive?
WHo was first invloved in the polonization?
Who imposed various sanction on the people?
What was an example of imposing sanctions on lithuanians?
What did the russian officials announce as a sanction?
What group did the Nobility of Ruthenia gravitate its loyalty towards?
What type of people were the Grand Duchy of Lithuania?
What eventually became a part of the grand duchy of lithuania?
What was common for families of ruthenian and lithuanian?
What other rights were equal to orthodox nobles?
What social pressure was pressing down the people?
What greatly eased the cultural pressure towards Catholicism. 
What year was the union of brest
Before 1641 the privileged ennoblement was granted by what?
What right was reversed by sijm?
What would be given to the enobled one?
After 1641 who was given the privilege of ennoblement?
What clan was given the privileged of enoblement?
What was the toalt number of legal ennoblements thoughout history of poland and polish commonwealth
When did theys tart recording the ennoblements?
When were most ennoblements implemented?
Who defined the significant legislative changes?
What is one exemption was part of the significant changes in legislation?
What did the 1425 requirement entail? 
What were the statutes issued between 1496 and 1611 prescribed from?
When did kings grant privileges to the nobles?
What specified the kings privileges?
What was also in exchange during he election of the throne?
What did nobles get in from the king during election?
When did buda king casimir issue the heir to his nephew?
who issied the first country wide privilege for the nobility? 
WHo is the nephew of buda king casimer III the great?
What was promised by Buda King Casimer?
WHo would pay for expenses during travels or the royal courts?
When did the first free election take place?
Who only voted in the election of 1492?
Who won the election of 1492?
What dynasty was in reign during the election of 1492?
When did the Act of "Nihil novi nisi commune consensu" happen?
Who granted the act Act of "Nihil novi nisi commune consensu"?
What did The Act of "Nihil novi nisi commune consensu" Do
What happened to the notabilities political position?
What has happened to the legislative power?
The crown tribunal was created when?
Who created the crown tribunal?
What was the crown tribunal supposed to do?
Where was a lot of power placed in result of the crown tribunal?
WHo joined the crown tribunal eventually?
When did the sovereignty of szlachta end?
Who ended the sovereignty of szlachta?
UNtil 1918 whos legal status was dependent on the russian empiresovereignty of szlachta?
What was different between the polish nobility and others?
What happened to nobility at expense of the king?
What did the political system eventually evolve into?
What did the ruler strive for?
What class was polands nobility?
Who could rise into polish ennoblement?
How much influence did each szlachcic have over politics?
WHo could nullify all the proceedings of a given sejm?
What is is called to nullify proceedings?
Children inherited polish nobility from whom?
What does an individual do to attain ennoblement?
WHo could naturalize a polish noble?
What is another name for ennoblement? 
WHat is another name for polish noble?
In theory how were all polish noblemen viewed?
Was was unique about the dignities?
If one is high in dignities they are also high in what other form?
Nobles held land form whom?
What was very important to the polish nobility?
What kind of system was the coats of arms?
how did the polish nobility system compare to other heraldy countries?
Where did polish knightshood originate?
What is the most notable difference between countries?
Coat of arms would be shared with who else?
How would unrelated families be attributed to the clan?
Did number of cat of arms in the late middle ages fall?
What was rarely used?
Where did the  coat of arms proper and a lozenge granted to women not develoupe?
Where did men get their coat of arms usually?
What two religions were most common?
What was the minority group in the polish nobility?
What was rewarding for switching judiasm to christianity?
What happened after the roman catholic church regained power in Poland?
What was the smallest amount of religion in the noble?
Who was Virgil's editor?
Whose two commentaries were incorporated into Virgil's biography by Suetonius?
What do the comentaries rely on for some of their information about Virgil?
Is Virgil's biographical tradition easily researched or is it problematic?
In which village does tradition believe Virgil was born?
In which cities did Virgil attend schools?
What other career did Virgil consider?
Which type of family do scholars generally believe Virgil belonged to?
Does Macrobius believe Virgil's father came from a distinguished or humble background?
Which three studies did Virgil abandon for philosophy?
How was Virgil regarded socially by his schoolmates?
What was Virgil's nickname?
How did Virgil earn his nickname "Parthenias" or "maiden"?
Which short narrative poem was attributed to Virgil as early as the 1st century AD?
Who helped finish the Aeneid?
When where the Eclogues likely published?
What were Octavian' s agent d'affaires called?
Which leading literary figure often mentioned Virgin in his poetry?
Octavian defeated Antony and Cleopatra at which battle?
When did Octavian return from the Battle of Actium?
Who took turns with Virgil to read the Georgics to Octavian?
Who is Aeneas' enemy throughout the Aeneid?
Which queen committed suicide in Book 4 of the Aeneid?
In which book does Aeneas' father die?
Who reveals Rome's destiny to Aeneas?
Who guides Aeneas through the Underworld?
To whom is Aeneas betrothed?
Which King does Aeneas ally with in Book 8 of the Aeneid?
Who had Lavinia already been promised to?
Who is roused to war by the Fury Allecto and Amata Lavinia's mother?
When did Augustus' victory at Actium against Mark Antony and Ceopatra VII occur?
Who is the protagonist of the Aeneid?
Who is mercilessly slaughtered by Aeneas?
Who is the founder of Rome which some scholars see strong associations with Aeneas?
Which book supposedly caused Augustus' sister to faint?
What was the title of Jean-Baptiste Wicar's artwork inspired by the Aeneid?
Who did Virgil recite Books 2, 4, and 6 of the Aeneid to?
According to tradition, where did Virgil travel in 19 BC to revise the Aeneid?
Where did Virgil die?
What date did Virgil die?
Who were Virgil's literary executors?
What wish of Virgil's did Lucius Varius Rufus and Plotius Tucca disregard?
Who cautioned "we ought not to relate their lying fables, lest we fall under sentence of eternal death"?
Literate men acknowledged Virgil as a master poet despite what empire collapsing?
Did literate men acknowledge Virgil as a master or novice poet?
In which of Dante's works was Virgil a guide through Hell and Purgatory?
Who was the author of the Divine Comedy?
Who was Dante's guide through Purgatory and Hell in the Divine Comedy?
Which of Virgil's works was said by some to have predicted Jesus' birth?
Which religion did some consider Virgil to have heralded in?
During which time period did Virgil's reputation inspire legends associating him with magic and prophecy?
Where did the tradition start which regarded Virgil as a great magician?
How long did legends of Virgil's magical powers remain popular?
What is the modern Welsh word for phramacist?
Where did Virgil's name become a generic term for magic-worker?
When did Virgil's reputation as a great magician begin?
During which time period did the legend of Virgil in his Basket arise?
What is the name of the beautiful woman who Virgil enamoured?
Which story did Virgil being left halfway in basket parallel?
Which artist made a woodcut and later an engraving of Virgil and his basket?
During which time period did Virgil's name become associated with miraclous powers?
In which district is "Virgil's tomb" located?
What is the entrance of the ancient Roman tunnel where "Virgil's tomb" is located also called?
Besides Virgilius, which other spelling is permitted in modern usage?
During which time period was Vergilius spelled Virgilius?
In what century did some German-trained classicists in the US suggest modifying the common usage to Vergil?
Which style guide recommends using Vergilius to avoid confusion with Virgilius Maro Grammaticus?
What affects the climate in Europe? 
What type of animal lives inn the higher peaks?
What plant grows in the rocky areas of the range?
Evidence of human habitation in the Alps goes as far back to what era? 
The alps is home to how many people?
How many visitors go to the Alps annually?
What is the dominant industry in the Alpine region? 
The English word Alps derives from what Latin Word? 
Who says that all high mountains are called Alpes by Celts?
What languages have terms for high mountains derived from alp? 
There is a theory that in Greek Alpes is a name of what origin? 
What name has been used as a name for a number of mountainous areas across Europe? 
Albania was a name for what during Roman Times? 
Albania was occasionally used as a name for what in the English language? 
What words are likely to have common origins?
Alb can also mean what? 
The term alp, alm, albe or alpe refers to what in modern languages? 
What refers to a high mountain pasture where cows are taken to be grazed during the summer months?
Words such as horn, kogel, gipfel, spitz, and berd are used in what regions?
Mont, pic, dent and aiguille are words used in what regions?
What are the crescent shaped geographic feature of central Europe?
What is the mean height of the Alp's peak?
How far does the Alps range stretch?
Switzerland, France, Austria and Italy have the greatest what? 
The highest portion of the Alp's range is divided by what? 
Where are the peaks smaller in the range? 
The Bernese Alps are located in what part of the range? 
The highest peak of the Western Alps is where? 
How tall is the peak at Mont Blanc? 
The highest peak of the Eastern Alps is where?
How tall is the peak of Piz Bernina
Where are the French Prealps located? 
What mountains are located in Switzerland and France?
What follows the watershed from the Mediterranean Sea to the Wienerwald?
What heads approximately east-northeast once at the Swiss bored?
What have been crossed for war and commerce? 
What was established during medieval periods by religious orders?
Where were hospices established? 
What is the highest of the most important passes of the Alps?
Who began studying the rock formations of the Alps
When did the studying of rock formations begin in the Alps?
What was used in the mid-19th century to explain the presence of "folded" mountain chains? 
What theory was more widely accepted by the mid-20th century? 
What was uplifted from extreme compressive stresses and pressure? 
When did the layer of marine flysch sediments get deposited in the foreland basin?
What were later deposited in foreland areas as molasse?
Switzerland and Bavaria saw a further upthrusting of what?
What caused the development of the Jura Mountains? 
What cause different paleogeographic regions in the Triassic, Jurassic and Cretaceous periods?
What is another word for rock composition? 
What geological subdivision is located in the north?
What is Stefan Schmid's profession?
What happened to the Western Alps during the Cenozoic Era
When did the Austroalpine peaks undergo their event?
The Western Alps and the Austroalpine peaks show distinct differences in what?
When did Flysch deposits probably occur in the Southern Alps of Lombardy?
Layers of rock from Europe, Africa and the ocean make up what?
What is the origin of the bottom nappe structure? 
Where are the top of the nappes derived from? 
What is an example of the ongoing orogeny?
What group defined a list of 82 official Apline summits that reach 4,000m?
What is included in the list of 82 official Apline summits other than Mountains?
The list of twenty two summits has summits with at least how much prominence?
When was the first British Mont Blanc ascent? 
When was the first female ascent on Mont Blanc?
When had Swiss mountaineers ascended most of the peaks? 
What year did Edward Whymper reach the top of the Matterhorn?
When were the last of the six great north faces of the Alps climbed? 
What have been mined in the Alps for thousands of years? 
What did Celtic tribes mine from the Alps?
What did the Romans mine in the Bad Gastein area?
What does Erzberd in Styria furnish?
The cinnabar deposits are found in what area?
How long have Alpine crystals been studied and collected? 
When did the alpine crystals begin to be classified? 
Who studied the shapes of crystals? 
By the 19th century what was common in the Alpine regions?
Who amassed a collection 8000 crystals?
Where did Agassiz study during the 1840s?
Agassiz found that the Unteraar Glacier moved how much per year? 
The movement of the Unteraar Glacier moved more rapidly in what part?
What is an example of a valley carved by glaciers during the ice ages? 
What lays at the bottom of the Inn Valley
The top of the Inn Valley consists of what?
What are Moraines?
How do Piedmont glaciers appear?
What causes the ice to break and crack loudly?
What does the cracking of the ice create?
What causes flooding, property damage, and loss of life?
What killed about 2500 people in the 17th century?
How many homes in a village near Zermatt were destroyed by an avalanche in the 19th century? 
What cause the glaciers to descend to permafrost levels in some areas? 
From 1876 to 1973, how much did the glaciers that covered the Alps shrink?
What resulted from the loss of the area the glaciers over the Alps?
How much of the glaciation in Austria disappeared?
How much of the glaciation disappeared in Switzerland?
What provides Europe with drinking water, irrigation, and hydroelectric power?
How much of Europe does the Alps cover?
How much water does the Alps provide to lowland Europe?
How much water does Milan depend on from the Alpine runoff?
Water from the rivers is used in over how many hydroelectric power plants?
The Rhine, the Rhone, the Inn, the Ticino and the Po rivers flow from what Country?
Where do the major tributaries that flow through the Danube originate from?
Which river is second to the Nile as a freshwater source to the Mediterranean?
What does The Rhone begin as?
Where does the Rhine originate?
Who have been studying the impact of climate change and water use?
Water is diverted from rivers for what purpose?
What are the effects of diverting the water from rivers?
What are a classic example of what happens when a temperate area at lower altitude gives way to higher-elevation terrain?
Elevations around the world that have a cold climate similar to that of the polar region have been called what?
What causes the temperature to decrease?
What is sufficient to divide the weather patterns in Europe into a wet north and dry south?
Since when has the severe weather in the Alps been studied? 
Particularly what part of the weather has been studied?
What was placed in the mountains early in the 20th century?
Where is the Aosta valley located?
Where is the Valais located?
What areas experience periodic flooding from rapid snowmelt and runoff?
What are the ranges of mean precipitation in the Alps?
Where do the higher levels of precipitation occur? 
At what altitude does snowfall begin in November?
How many zones are the Alps split into?
What is the lowest zone of the Alps called?
Where does the lowest zone of the Alps exist? 
Where does the montane zone extend from?
Where does the sub-Alpine zone extend from?
What has been projected into the 22nd century for the Alps?
What will have an effect on snowfall, snowpack, glaciation, and river runoff?
What have the various models been of?
What is often above the forestry?
What type of soil does Alpenrose prefer?
What is the area above the treeline defined as?
What grows in abundance in areas such as the meadows above the Lauterbrunnental?
What are Gentians named after?
How many species of the early-spring blooming flower grow in the Alps?
What do the plants tend to form at higher altitudes? 
Ranunculus glacialis have been recorded to have been found how far in the alps?
What is Eritrichium nanum commonly known as?
What is the best known of the alpine plants?
What gives way to the growth of plant species with secondary metabolites important for medicinal purposes?
Origanum Vulgare has what useful properties?
Where are Urtica dioica found?
What has nearly exterminated the trees in many areas?
What are rarely found after the extreme deforestation between the 17th and 19th centuries?
What has changed since the second half of the 20th century?
The practice of building ski runs by mechanical means has destroyed what?
How many species of wildlife habitat the Alps?
What have the wildlife done to survive the harsh conditions of the Alps?
Some species of wildlife can only survive in what specific environment?
What is the largest mammal to live in the highest altitudes?
How high have the Alpine Ibex been sighted?
Where do the ibex live?
What animal that live in the Alps are classified as antelopes?
What year was the last brown bear recorded to have been killed?
Where do many rodents live?
Where do Marmots live?
Where do marmots build their colonies?
What is the most common bird found in the Alps?
Why do reptiles only live up to the snow line?
What do reptiles due since they cannot bear the cold temperatures?
How have the Alpine salamanders adapted to living above the snow line?
What can be found in the streams up to the snow line?
How long have some species of moths believed to have evolved from the same habitat?
What can be commonly seen drinking from the snow melt?
The swallowtail Parnassius family of butterfly habitat ranges up to how much?
What species of beetles are were collected for their colors before being protected?
Some species of moths and insects show evidence of what?
How long ago does the evidence show moths and insects to have been indigenous?
Where is Emosson located?
When were dinosaur tracks found in Emosson?
When were late Paleolithic communities established along the lake shores?
What has been found in caves near Vercors?
Why were houses built on piles?
What have been found in Alpine areas of France and Italy?
How old are rock drawings in Valcamonica?
When was the Second Punic War?
Who was the Carthaginian general?
What did the Romans build along the mountain passes?
What can still be found on the mountain passes?
What brought the defeat of the Allobrogi?
When were the Allobrogi defeated?
When did Julius Caesar overcome the Helvetii?
What tribes settled much of the Alpine region?
Much of the medieval period was a time of what?
Where were the Visconti from?
What dynastie was from Austria and Slovenia?
What Country was a well-established separate state by the 16th century?
What wars took place during the late 18th century and early 19th century?
Who annexed territory formerly controlled by the Habsburgs and Savoys?
When was the Helvetic Republic established?
Where was the Helvetic Republic established?
What became tourist destinations during the 19th century?
Who built monasteries in Lucerne, Switzerland and Oberammergau?
Who had abbeys in the Savor and one in the center of Interlaken?
When was the Great St. Bernard Hospice built?
How old was the charcoal placed in the Drachloch cave?
What does the finding of charcoal in Dragon's Hole prove?
What may have been buried by the same prehistoric people?
People blindfolded themselves to cross what?
Who was the first of many to present the Alps as a place of allure and beauty?
Who wrote the poem Die Alpen?
When did the Alpine countries see an influx of poets, artists, and musicians?
What did the visitors come to experience in the Alpine countries?
Percy and Mary Shelley were inspired by what region's scenery?
What poem did Shelley write during the visits to Geneva?
When did scientists began to arrive en masse to study the geology and ecology of the Alpine region?
Where was Adolf Hitler born?
What did Adolf Hitler have a lifelong romantic fascination with? 
Where did Adolf Hitler establish a home in the 1930s?
When was Adolf Hitlers first visit to the Alps?
Who were trained for the war?
Where was the battle at Riva Ridge?
Where was a substantial amount of Nazi plunder found at the end of the war?
Where did American troops find 75 kilos of gold coins?
What is the population of the Alpine region?
What does the economy consist of on the rim of the mountains?
Farming and Forestry continue to be a mainstay of what?
Much of what has not changed since the medieval period?
When were skills that guaranteed survival in the mountain valleys most important?
What is one of the strongest traditions in Alpine culture?
What is an ancient tradition in most Alpine countries?
How much can a wheel of cheese from the Emmental weigh?
What is an important farming activity in mountain villages?
How many times is Hay normally brought each year?
When is Carnival celebrated? 
What do people in high villages build their homes according to?
What is the area of the home heated by a stove called? 
The typic Swiss chalet originated from where?
Which direction do Chalets often face? 
What are Chalets built of? 
The food is passed from the kitchen to where? 
Where is the dining room table placed? 
Traditionally, what are meals served on? 
How is furniture traditionally carved? 
What's one of the most popular tourist destinations in the world? 
Where is Saalbach located? 
How many people visit the Alps every year? 
What is an integral part of the Alpine economy?
When were ski-lifts built in Swiss and Austrian towns?
When were several new villages built in France almost exclusively for skiing?
Where is Les Menuires located? 
Where is the village of Avoriaz located? 
Where are the villages of Wengen and Zermatt located? 
Why are villages considering becoming car free zones?
When are many passes in the Alps closed? 
The lower regions and larger towns of the Alps are well-served by what?
What can be treacherous even in summer due to steep slopes?
What do mutations in a gene sequence lead to?
What do alleles do?
What do alleles cause?
What does "having a gene" or a "good gene" typically refer to?
What causes genes to evolve?
What can regulatory regions of a gene be far removed from?
What can coding regions be split into?
What do some viruses store their genome in instead of DNA?
What are some gene products?
What is a broad, modern working definition of a gene?
What was the dominant theory of heredity prior to Mendel's work?
Who developed the theory of inheritance known as pangenesis?
What does the term gemmule describe?
What year was Mendel's work first published?
Who are the three scientists that claimed to have reached conclusions similar to Mendel's?
What was shown to be the molecular repository of genetic information by experiments in the 1940s to 1950s?
Who studied the structure of DNA using x-ray crystallography?
What two scientists published a model of the double stranded DNA molecule?
What is one exception to the central dogma of molecular biology?
What is the modern study of genetics at the level of DNA known as?
When was the first sequence of a gene determined?
What was the first gene to be sequenced?
Who developed chain termination DNA sequencing in 1977?
What did the devlopment of the chain termination DNA sequencing method do for the sequencing process?
What project used an automated version of the Sanger method in its early stages?
In what time span were the theories to integrate molecular genetic with Darwinian evolution developed?
What are the theories that integrate molecular genetics with Darwinian evolution called?
Who proposed an evolutionary concept of the gene as a unit of natural selection?
What is the definition of the concept of the gene as a unit of natural selection?
Who popularized ideas emphasizing the centrality of genes in evolution?
What do the vast majority of living organisms encode their genes in?
What does DNA consist of?
What type of sugar composes part of the DNA molecule?
What are the four bases used in nucleotide subunits?
Besides the sugar and the four bases, what else does DNA consist of?
What is the backbone of a DNA double helix made of?
What base pairs with thymine?
What base does guanine pair with?
What causes the specificity of base pairing?
Due to the cause of the specificity of base pairing, what must be true of the two strands in a double helix?
How does the expression of genes encoded in DNA begin?
What is RNA?
What base does RNA have in place of thymine?
What are codons?
What specifies the correspondence between codons and amino acids during protein translation?
What is the total complement of genes in an organism or cell known as?
What does a chromosome consist of?
What is encoded on a chromosome?
What is the region of the chromosome at which a particular gene is located called?
What does each locus contain?
Where are the majority of eukaryotic genes stored?
Chromosomes that are packed within the nucleus in complex with histones are called what?
What does the manner of DNA storage on the histone and the chemical modifications of the histone itself regulate?
What are replication origins?
Long stretches of repetitive sequence that cap the ends of the linear chromosomes are called what?
What are prokaryotes?
How do prokaryotes store their genomes?
What type of chromosome do some eukaryotic organelles contain?
Small circles of DNA that encode only a few genes and are transferable between individuals are called what?
What allows genes for antibiotic resistance to be passed between individual cells?
What type of organism has relatively gene dense chromosomes?
Regions of DNA that serve no obvious function are often found in what type of organism?
What is referred to as "junk DNA"?
What percentage of the human genome is made of protein coding DNA?
What percentage of bases in the human genome are expressed by protein coding DNA
Often, how large a part of the structure of a gene is the protein coding sequence?
What often plays only a small part in the structure of a gene? 
What is one of the many elements that the structure of a gene consists of?
What is another element of the structure of a gene?
What elements does the structure of a gene consist of?
What do all genes contain that is required for their expression?
How is a promoter sequence recognized?
What results when genes have more than one promoter?
What does a "strong" promoter sequence do?
What does a "weak" promoter sequence do?
How do regulatory regions act?
What happens when a regulatory region binds to transcription factors?
How do enhancers increase transcription?
What happens after an enhancer binds an activator protein?
What causes DNA to be less available for RNA polymerase?
What is at both ends of the transcribed pre-mRNA?
Where are the ribosome binding site, terminator and start and stop codons located on transcribed pre-mRNA?
What do most eukaryotic open reading frames contain?
What dictates the splice sites to generate the final mature mRNA?
What encodes the protein or RNA product?
What are most prokaryotic genes organized into?
What are multiple protein coding sequences transcribed as?
What sort of functions do the products of operon genes typically have?
What type of network are the products of operon genes typically involved with?
What type of coding sequences do prokaryotic genes typically have?
What is an example of a regulatory region of a gene that does not have to close to the coding sequence?
Why do some regulatory regions of a gene not have to be close to the coding sequence?
What part of a gene can be much larger than its exons?
How do regulatory regions on different chromosomes operate in order to allow regions on different chromosomes to come into contact with one another?
Where can regulatory regions be found?
What model did early work in molecular genetics suggest?
What discovery caused the model that one gene makes one protein to be refined?
How do genes encode multiple proteins?
How are alternative splicing and coding sequences distributed?
What sort of definition can be used to conveniently encompass the complexity of diverse phenomena?
What is the broad operational definition of a gene?
What does the typical definition of a gene categorize genes by?
What does the broad operational definition of gene categorize genes by?
What does the broad operational definition of a gene classify as gene-associated regions?
How many steps are required to read the information encoded in a gene's DNA and produce the specified protein?
What is the first step to read the information encoded in a gene's DNA and produce the protein it specifies?
What is the second step to read the information encoded in a gene's DNA and produce the protein it specifies?
What step must RNA-coding genes still go through?
What is the process of producing a biologically functional molecule of either RNA or protein called?
What specifies the amino acid sequence of a protein?
What are sets of three nucleotides known as?
What does each codon correspond to?
What indicates the beginning and end of the protein coding region?
How many possible codons are there?
What does transcription produce?
How does the nucleotide sequence of mRNA compare to DNA?
What is used as a template to generate a complementary mRNA?
Why does the mRNA match the sequence of the gene's DNA coding strand?
What is the enzyme called that performs transcription?
Where does transcription occur in prokaryotes?
If the transcription is very long, where on the RNA may translation begin?
Where does transcription occur in eukaryotes?
Where does a eukaryote store the cell's DNA?
What is the RNA molecule produced by the polymerase known as?
What is the process by which a mature mRNA molecule is used as a template for synthesizing a new protein called?
What does a ribosome consist of?
What is a ribosome responsible for?
How is the genetic code read?
How many unpaired bases does each tRNA have?
When are genes expressed?
What are examples of a cell's external environment?
What are examples of a cell's internal environment?
At which step can gene expression be regulated?
What example of post-translational modification of a protein was first described in 1961?
What is first copied into RNA as an intermediate in the manufacture of the final protein product?
In some cases, what are the actual functional products?
What sort of synthesis occurs when the RNA molecules are the actual functional products?
What sort of function are ribozymes capable of?
What are the DNA sequences from which ribozymes are transcribed known as?
In what form do some viruses store their entire genome?
Why do the cellular hosts of some viruses not have to wait for transcription to synthesize their proteins?
What is one type of an RNA retrovirus?
What sort of transcription does the genome of HIV require before its proteins can be synthesized?
Besides viruses, where has RNA-mediated epigenetic inheritance been observed?
Where do organisms inherit their genes from?
How much of an asexual organism's genome is inherited from its parents?
How many copies of each chromosome does a sexual organism have?
How many sets of chromosomes does a sexual organism inherit from each parent?
Why do sexual organisms have two copies of each chromosome?
According to Mendelian inheritance, what is part of the cause of variations in an organism's phenotype?
What sort of characteristics are described by an organism's phenotype?
What is a genotype?
What specifies a particular trait with a different sequence of alleles?
How many alleles do most eukaryotic organisms have for each trait?
Where can alleles be located in order to be either dominant or recessive?
When paired with any other allele for the same trait, what do dominant alleles give rise to?
When do recessive alleles give rise to their corresponding phenotype?
When do alleles assort independently?
What are gametes?
What does the growth, development, and reproduction of organisms rely on?
In cell division, what two cells are created? 
What specialized enzyme is responsible DNA replication?
Why does the sequence of one strand completely specify the sequence of its complement?
What one word characterizes the process of DNA replication?
What is one thing the cell must do once DNA replication is compete?
What is another thing the cell must do once DNA replication is complete?
In binary fission, what shape is each genome?
In binary fission. when does each genome separate into daughter cells?
Compared to the rates of cell division in eukaryotes, with what speed does binary fission occur?
The duplication and transmission of genetic material from one generation of cells to the next is the basis for what?
Why do organisms inherit the characteristics of their parents?
In what type of organism will the offspring be a genetic copy or clone of the parent organism?
In what type of organism will a specialized form of cell division called meiosis produce cells called gametes?
What are the gametes produced by females called?
When can an event called genetic recombination or crossing-over sometimes occur?
If the alleles on the chromatids are the same, what effect arises from genetic recombination? 
If the alleles on the chromatids are different, what effect arises from genetic recombination? 
Each of a parent's two genes for each trait will sort independently into gametes according to what Mendelian principle?
In genetic linkage, what sort of point is extremely unlikely to occur?
What is it called when multiple different alleles for a gene are present in a species's population?
What can some alleles give rise to?
What is a gene's most common allele known as?
What are rare alleles called?
What is one cause of the genetic variation in relative frequencies of different alleles in a population?
What are mutations that have no effect on an organism's phenotype called?
What are mutations that do not change the amino acid sequence called?
What are mutations that lead to amino acid sequence changes but leave the protein functioning similarly called?
What is a result of deleterious mutations?
What does the directional selection of beneficial mutations lead to?
What are genes with a most recent common ancestor called?
What is one reason for homologs to appear?
What are genes that occur from duplication within an organism's genome called?
What are genes that result from divergence of the genes after a speciation event called?
What does comparing the sequence alignment of genes' DNA measure?
What is the degree of sequence similarity between homologous genes called?
How do genes typically accumulate mutations over time?
Under what type of selection are genes constrained so they change more slowly?
What type of analyses can the sequence differences between genes be used for?
What is the most common source of new genes in eukaryotic lineages?
What creates copy number variation of an existing gene in the genome?
What are the genes that result from eukaryotic gene duplication called?
What type of copy can gene duplication sometimes result in?
What are functional copies of a gene which have a loss of function due to mutation called?
What is a gene whose sequence shows no similarity to existing genes called?
What is the estimate of the number of orphan genes in the human genome?
How do the lengths of orphan genes compare to most eukaryotic genes?
How does the structure of orphan genes compare to most eukaryotic genes?
What is one primary source of orphan protein-coding genes?
What is the  transfer of genetic material through a mechanism other than reproduction known as?
In what type of organism is horizontal gene transfer a common source of new genes?
What is one trait that horizontal gene transfer is a common means of spreading?
In what type of organism is horizontal gene transfer rare?
What is one example of horizontal gene transfer in eukaryotes?
What is one characteristic that varies widely between organisms?
In which type of organism do the smallest genomes occur?
What is the smallest number of protein coding genes that a virus can have?
Which organism acts as a single non coding RNA gene?
What is the estimate for the total number of protein coding genes on Earth?
What type of genes are necessary for performing basic cell functions?
At what relative level are housekeeping genes expressed at?
When investigating gene expression, what type of genes are used as a control for experiments?
How are some essential genes regulated?
When are some essential genes expressed?
What committee has established gene nomenclature for every known human gene?
How can the gene nomenclature be accessed? 
How many symbols does each gene have?
With what is it preferred that symbols are kept consistent with?
What type of model does the mouse play a role for?
What is known as the modification of an organism's genome through biotechnology?
When did techniques begin to be developed to add, remove and edit genes?
What sort of enzymes do recently developed genome engineering techniques use?
What sort of DNA repair is created by modern genetic engineering techniques?
What term refers to extensive genetic engineering of an organism?
What has become a common research tool with model organisms?
What do scientists explore by adding genes to mice with a certain gene's function disrupted?
What is an application for which organisms have been modified for?
What is another for which  organisms have been modified for?
What is yet another application for which  organisms have been modified for?
For what sort of organisms is the embryo normally engineered?
What techniques can be used to alter the genomes of an adult organism to treat genetic disease?
What part of the organism is usually created which becomes a developed genetically altered organism?
What can be changed in an adult organism using gene therapy techniques?
What can be treated using genetic engineering?
What kingdom was Guinea-Bissau once part of?
What empire was Guinea-Bissau once part of?
What year was Guinea-Bissau declared independent?
What country did Guinea-Bissau seek to differentiate itself from?
Guinea-Bissau has a history of what since independence?
What percentage of the population speaks Portuguese?
What percentage of the population speaks Crioulo?
What are the two main religions?
What is their gross domestic product status?
What is the minority religion?
What Islamic organization does Guinea-Bissau belong to?
What Portuguese organization does Guinea-Bissau belong to?
What West African organization does Guinea-Bissau belong to?
What South Atlantic organization does Guinea-Bissau belong to?
What Latin organization does Guinea-Bissau belong to?
What area was known as the Slave Coast?
Who exported African slaves to the western hemisphere?
What kingdom was Guinea-Bissau once a part of?
How long did the Mali Empire persist?
Who traded slaves into the Middle East?
What areas were the first places colonized by the Portuguese?
When did the Portuguese first set up trading posts in Guinea-Bissau?
When did the Portuguese explore the interior of Guinea-Bissau?
Who controlled the inland trade in Guinea-Bissau during this time?
What ports were the Portuguese restricted to?
Who tried to establish a rival foothold at Bolama?
When was a rival foothold  attempted at Bolama?
Who regarded Bolama as their own in the 19th century?
What other area did the Portuguese regard as their special territory?
What rival did the Portuguese fend off in Guinea-Bissau?
When was independence declared?
What date was independence considered universal? 
What event caused the recognition to be universal?
Where did a coup take place?
Who was overthrown in the coup?
What was reported to be entering the country prior to the election?
What type of "disturbances" were reported during the campaign?
How did foreign election monitors describe the election?
What year was the election held?
Where the election monitors local, or foreign?
When was the parliamentary election held?
Who won a strong majority in the election?
How many seats did PAIGC win in the election?
Whose residence was attacked by members of the armed forces?
When did the attack on the residence occur?
What country is listed as a republic?
When had the government been highly centralized?
When was multi-party governance established?
Who is the head of state?
Who is the head of government?
Guinea-Bissau is larger than what two countries?
How high is the highest point in Guinea-Bissau?
What archipelago lies off the mainland?
How many square kilometers is Guinea-Bissau?
Where does Guinea-Bissau get its hot dry winds from?
How much of the population lives below the poverty line?
What are Guinea-Bissau's major exports?
What per capita index does Guinea-Bissau rank as one of the lowest in the world?
For what index does Guinea-Bissau rank as one of the lowest on earth?
What area depends on agriculture in Guinea-Bissau?
Political instability has resulted in what type of economic activity?
Political instability has resulted in what description of social conditions?
What type of imbalances have increased as a result of the instability?
How long does it take to register a business in Guinea-Bissau?
What is the one country that takes longer than Guinea-Bissau to register a business?
What did the main political parties sign to help the economy?
What organization backed a structural reform program?
When did Guinea-Bissau become independent?
What country left Guinea-Bissau in 1974?
What happened in Portugal that contributed to Guinea-Bissau's independence?
In what year did Guinea-Bissau start to bring some internal monetary stability to the country?
What did the government do in 1997 to increase monetary stability?
What years did the civil war take place?
When was there a military coup in Guinea-Bissau?
When were parliamentary elections held?
What was the population of Guinea-Bissau in 1950?
What was the population of Guinea-Bissau in 2010?
What is the source of the population data?
What percentage of the population was below the age of 15?
What percentage of the population was 65 or older?
What natives comprise a very small percentage of the population?
Who left the country after Guinea-Bissau gained independence?
What ethnic group has a tiny population in Guinea-Bissau?
What is the name of a former Asian Portuguese colony?
What is the ancestry of the Chinese population in Guinea-Bissau?
What percentage of the population speaks Kriol?
What is the official language of Guinea-Bissau?
How long was Guinea-Bissau under colonial rule?
What type of language is Kriol?
In the 20th century most people practiced some form of what faith?
What religion was adopted by the population in the early 21st century?
What percentage of the population now practices Islam?
What denomination are the majority of Guinea-Bissau's muslims?
What sect does 2% of the population belong to?
What percentage of the population is Christian?
What percentage of the population continues to hold indigenous beliefs?
What forms of Islamic and Christian faiths do many residents practice?
What do many residents combine with Islamic and Christian practices?
What infection has a very small prevalence in Guinea-Bissau?
What percentage of the adult population has an HIV-infection?
How many HIV-infected pregnant women receive retroviral coverage?
What does retroviral coverage help prevent?
Who receives retroviral coverage?
What kills more residents than AIDS?
What percentage of the population has Malaria?
How many more deaths does malaria cause vs. AIDS?
How many children under five slept under antimalaria nets in 2008?
What type of drugs did many young children not have access to in 2008?
What type of disease was reported to be on the rise in Guinea-Bissau?
How many died from cholera in a November 2012 report?
How many died from cholera in a 2008 epidemic?
Where are there reported cholera rates that are lowering?
How many people were affected by the 2008 cholera epidemic?
What was the 2010 maternal mortality rate per 100,000 births?
What was the 1990 maternal mortality rate per 100,000 births?
How many midwives are listed per 1,000 live births?
How many pregnant women die as a result of pregnancy?
According to UNICEF, what percentage of women in Guinea-Bissau had undergone female genital mutilation?
What are the ages when education is compulsory?
What gender has a higher enrollment?
What was the gross primary enrollment rate in 1998?
What was the gross primary enrollment rate for males?
What was the gross primary enrollment rate for females?
What type of secondary schools does Guinea-Bissau have?
What institutions have added a Faculty of Law?
What institutions have added a Faculty of Medicine?
What two words are used to describe the Faculty of Law and Faculty of Medicine?
What music genre is usually associated with Guinea-Bissau?
What is considered the country's primary musical export?
What major factor has kept gumbe out of mainstream audiences?
What other type of countries has gumbe been kept out of?
What is the primary instrument of Guinea-Bissau?
What type of music is the calabash used in?
What language are lyrics typically sung in?
What do typical song lyrics revolve around?
What is the main controversy found in song lyrics?
What grain is a staple for residents near the coast of Guinea-Bissau?
What grain is a staple for residents in the interior of Guinea-Bissau?
Who encouraged peanut production in Guinea-Bissau?
What type of oil is harvested?
What kind of pea is part of the diet in Guinea-Bissau?
What are common dishes in Guinea-Bissau?
What are common ingredients in Guinea-Bissau?
What are spices, peppers and chilis used in?
What is another name for Guinea pepper?
What are Guinea peppers used in?
Which streets are one-way eastbound?
Odd-numbered streets are one-way in which direction?
Do most wide streets carry one-way or two-way traffic?
What happens at Broadway below 8th Street?
What happens at Fifth Avenue from 8th street and above?
Do streets' names change from West to East or North to South?
The grid covers the length of the island from what starting point?
Which street do numbered streets begin just north of?
In what village is East Houston Street located?
Which Village already had streets when the grid plan was laid out?
Who laid out the Grid Plan?
What is the spot where the grid takes hold called?
What shape is the sliver park where Houston Street, First Street, and First Avenue meet?
Which street begins just North of East Houston Street at Avenue A?
East 1st Street begins just North of East Houston Street at Avenue A and continues to where?
East 6th Street continues further Eastward and connects to which Drive?
Where is the East end of East 3rd, 4th, 5th, and 7th Streets?
Which Avenue is the starting location for East 2nd Street?
Which street begins just North of East Huston Street and continues to Bowery?
What name did 3rd Street previously hold?
Which village do 3rd and 4th Street extend into?
Which street connects East 3rd to West 3rd?
The west end of these streets is Third Avenue and where?
Which Apartments interrupt East 5th Street between First Avenue and Avenue A?
What is the Public School number that interrupts East 5th Street?
Which school interrupts East 5th Street?
East 5th Street goes west to what stopping point?
West 8th Street is an important local street for what activity?
8th Street between Avenue A and Third Avenue is called what?
Where do 8th and 9th Streets begin?
Where do 8th and 9th Streets end?
Which park interrupts 8th and 9th Street at Avenue B?
Which street runs from Broadway to West Street?
When was the Old Grapevine tavern demolished?
11th Street and 6th Avenue was the home of what tavern from the 1700s?
What church interuppts 11th Street between Broadway and Fourth Avenue?
13th Street is divided into how many parts?
The first part of 13th Street is a dead end from which Avenue?
Where does the second part of 13th Street end?
Which street has its third section between Eighth Avenue and Tenth Avenue?
Where does 14th Street begin?
Where does 14th Street end?
How many subway stations are on 14th Street?
What is the length of 14th Street in miles?
Where does 15th Street start?
Which road starts at a dead end half way between FDR Drive and Avenue C?
16th Street pauses at which Square?
Which Square stops both 15th and 16th Streets?
Where does 10th Street start?
At which Avenue do 21st and 22nd Streets begin?
What is different about 20th Street between Avenue C and First Avenue?
Which street is much wider from Avenue C to First Avenue?
How does traffic travel on the last block of the 20th, 21st, and 22nd Streets?
Which Street is also known as Police Officer Anthony Sanchez Way?
What is 21st Street known as along the northern perimeter of Gramercy Park?
Between what avenues is 21st Street known by Police Officer Anthony Sanchez Way?
Which police officer does a section of 21st Street refer to?
Where does 23rd Street begin?
Where does 23rd Street end?
What is the length of 23rd Street in kilometers?
Does traffic move in one or two ways on 23rd Street?
How many local subway stations are on 23rd Street?
Which street is a pedestrian plaza between Third Avenue and Lexington Avenue?
Where does 24th street start?
Which park is at the end of 24th Street and Madison Avenue?
Where does 25th Street end?
After being interrupted, where do 24th and 25th Streets continue from?
Which street does Club Row occur on?
Which strip is known for its numerous nightclubs and lounges?
What is the strip of 27th Street between Tenth and Eleventh Avenues known as?
Does traffuc on 27th Street run one-way or two-ways?
Where does 27th Street start?
How many blocks south of 27th Street is Manhattan's Meatpacking District?
Which businesses on 27th Street face competition from other venues in dowtown Manhattan?
What direction is Manhattan's Meatpacking District from West 27th Street?
The Fashion Institute of Technology is on the corner of 27th Street and what Avenue?
What year was the New York Life Building built?
Who designed the New York Life Building?
Which hospital is located at the end if 27th Street?
Which park does 27th Street pass through between Ninth and Tenth Avenues?
Where does 35th Street begin?
Where does 35th Street end?
On which street does LaptopMD headquarters sit?
On which street is the Jacob K. Javits Convention Center located?
Which street runs from FDR Drive to Eleventh Avenue?
Which street begins at East Drive, at Engineers Gate of Central Park?
Which church is located on East 90th Street between Second and Third Avenue?
Which towers are located at 1601 and 1619 Third Avenue?
What is located on East 90th Street between York Avenue and East End Avenue?
Where does 112th Street start?
Which street runs from Riverside Drive to Amsterdam Avenue?
Which road meets the steps of the Cathedral of Saint John the Divine?
How many blocks west of Second Avenue does E 122nd Street run?
At which park does E 122nd Street end?
At which intersection does E 122nd Street terminate?
What is another name for Fourth Avenue?
A segment of what road crosses portions of Third Avenue, Lexington, and Park and runs in East Harlem?
At which intersection does W 122nd Street terminate?
At which park does W 122nd Street end?
How many blocks west from the intersection of Mount Morris Park does W 122nd Street run?
Through which historical district does W 122nd Street run?
What is an alternative name for Sixth Avenue?
What is another name for Tenth Avenue?
At which intersection does W 122nd Street end?
What is another name for Ninth Avenue?
Which district surrounds Columbia University?
Besides the Union Theological Seminary, which other Seminary touches Seminary Row?
Other than the Jewish Theological Seminary, which other Seminary touches Seminary Row?
Which road runs by two Seminaries, the Manhattan School of Music, Riverside Church, and Grant's Tomb?
Who is the main character in Taxi Driver?
What street is mentioned in the movie Taxi Driver as the location where a cab driver is assaulted?
Which character in Taxi Driver deemed 122nd Street as "Mau Mau Land"?
What is the term given to 122nd Street by Wizard in Taxi Driver indicating the area is majority black?
Which neighborhood surrounds 122nd Street?
Who takes care of the 132nd Street Community Garden?
The 132nd Street Community Garden is located between Malcom X Boulevard and what other Boulevard?
In which year did the garden receive a makover with a water distribution system?
Who funded the 132nd Street Community Garden's water distribution system?
How much did the 132nd Street Community Garden's water distribution system cost?
What is the 132nd Street Bus Depot currently known as?
What was the Manhattanville Bus Depot formerly known as?
In which neighborhood is the Manhattanville Bus Depot?
The former 132nd Street Bus Depot is located between Broadway and what other drive in the Manhattanville neighborhood?
How many crosstown streets are mapped in the Commissioner's Plan of 1811?
Which street is the northernmost of the streets mapped in the Commissioner's Plan of 1811?
Which street forms the boundary between Harlem and Washington Heights?
What document established Manhattan's numbered street grid?
155th Street forms the boundary between Harlem and what other neighborhood?
Where does 155th Street start?
155th Street crosses Broadway, Amsterdam Avenue, and what other Avenue?
How many meters long is the viaduct on which 155th Street travels?
In what year was the viaduct along 155th Street constructed?
A section of 155th Street connects Harlem River Drive and what Avenue?
181st Street runs through what neighborhood?
What is the west end of 181st Street called?
Does Plaza Lafayette refer to the east or west end of 181st Street?
Which river does 181st Street run near?
Which road runs from the Washington Bridge to the Henry Hudson Parkway?
In which direction is 181st Street largely residential?
In which direction is 181st Street mostly commercial?
Which street marks the western boundary of the shopping distrit?
Which river touches the major shopping district near 181st Street?
187th Street runs from Laurel Hill Terrace in the east to which avenue in the west?
What is 187th Street interrupted by?
Where do the stairs interrupting 187th street lead to?
An area of 187th Street serves as the main shopping district for which neighborhood?
Which is the eastmost intersection that 187th Street has?
Which is the westernmost intersection that 187th Street has?
Wadsworth Avenue is intersected by what street?
Which school is located on Cabrini Boulevard?
On what street is the Dombrov Shtiebel?
Which University has a campus on 187th Street?
Cabrini Boulevard is just north of what street?
On what street is the Mount Sinai Jewish Center?
Hormones secreted are driven by what organ in the body?
What type of responsiveness can be used without a brain?
Reflexes only require one of what two structures in a body?
Which part of a computer does the brain most resemble?
Animals with a spine are called what?
Animals without a spine are called what?
The easiest way to learn about brain anatomy is by what?
Brain tissue is naturally soft, but can be stiffened with what liquid?
The two main areas of the brain are what colors?
What instrument can you use to examine the microstructure of the brain?
Grey matter of the brain is what color?
Axons send signals to other neurons by junctions known as what?
The neurotansmitter binds to what of a target cell?
An axon can connect to how many other cells?
How many synapses does the human brain supposedly contain?
The fruit fly has a brain that has how many synapses?
A synapse whose purpose is to excite the target cell are called what?
The primary job of the brain is what?
Axons grouped together are known as what?
An axon that can greatly increase speed of signals is wrapped in what?
Myelin is what color in the brain?
Most of the space in the brain is made up of what structures?
Grey matter of the brain consist of lots of what?
Creatures that have a diffuse nerve net are called what?
Bilaterians are animals that have what?
The Cambrian period was how long ago?
A nerve cord with an enlargement is called what?
What type of creature has a ganglion at the back end of the nerve cord as well?
A name for a group of primitive flatworms is what?
Some bilaterians without a brain are what?
Which two groups of invertebrates have complex brains?
Arthropods and cephalopods have brains that come from a pair of what?
The invertebrates with the largest brain are what two animals?
Which brains are easier to work on, vertebrates or invertebrates?
How long ago did the first vertebrate organisms appear?
During which scientific period did vertebrates appear?
Sharks appeared at about how many Mya?
The foremost part of the brain in mammals is known as what?
At how many mya did mammals first appear in time?
Do predators have larger or smaller brains compared to their prey?
In mammals, brain volume and body mass follows a power law with an exponent of what?
Which group of animals have brains 5-10 times larger than the formula predicts?
The forebrain during development is known as what?
The midbrain during development is known as what?
The hindbrain during development is known as what?
Which group of animals does the forebrain grow the largest?
During development, the brain is made up of three swellings at the front of what?
People who study the anatomy of the central nervous system are known as what?
The cerebral hemispheres of the brain are called what?
The thalamus and hypothalamus comprise what region of the brain?
The midbrain region of the brain is known as what?
Clusters of small nuclei comprise what parts of the brain?
The forebrain is everted in what type of fishes?
Which part of the brain has led to many distortions among different species?
A mammal's brain is how many times larger than a birds relative to body size?
A mammal's brain is how many times larger than a reptiles relative to body size?
The biggest difference between brains of mammals and other vertebrates is what?
What part of the brain most strongly differentiates mammals from other vertebrates?
The three-layered structure covering the cerebrum in non-mammals is known as what?
Mammals have a pallium that involved into what?
The hippocampus and amygdala are ares inside what structure?
The superior colliculus is related to what sensual control of vertebrates?
The larger part of the cerebellum in mammals is called what?
The Neocerebellum supports what other part of the brain?
Comparing brain sizes among different creatures is used most commonly by what?
What is the average EQ of a person?
Primates have an EQ in what range?
Primates have a visual processing network of how many brain areas?
The visual processing areas occupy how much of the surface of the neocortex or primates?
Planning, motivation, and attention are controlled by what area?
The prefrontal cortex is the largest in what animals?
The precursor of the nervous system is called what in vertebrates?
The neural groove is a hollow cord of cells with what in the center?
The forebrain splits during development into vesicles called what?
The vesicle that contains the cerebral cortex is which one?
The thalamus and hypothalamus are contained in which vesicle?
A growth cone of an axon is made up of a blob of what?
What two structures does a neuron extend when it is in place during development?
The infant brain contains more of what type of cells in the brain than the adult brain?
The olfactory bulb is related to what sense?
What area of the hippocampus plays a role in storing new memories?
Which type of cells in the brain are generated throughout your lifetime?
Neurogenesis is the process of what?
The electrical properties of neurons are controlled by what?
What type of signals do neurons transfer from one another?
GABA is the abbreviation for what?
Which of two neurotransmitters is usually inhibitory?
The neurostransmitter that usually excites targets is called what?
Tranquilizers affect which of the two common neurotransmitters?
An EEG of the brain stands for what?
MEG of the brain is an abbreviation of what?
What type of test is used to tell that a brain is active even during sleep?
What type of brain waves are seen in mammals during sleep?
What type of brain waves are sen when a creature is awake, but inattentive?
The function of the brain from an evolutionary-biological thought is what?
Computers were invented in what decade in history?
Neuroscience spawned from what field of science in history?
Who wrote the book, The Computer and the Brain?
When was John von Neumann's book, The Computer and the Brain published?
What is the project called that is trying to build a realistic, detailed computer model of the human brain?
What type of animal has a sense that adapted into sonar?
What type of animal uses infrared heat to sense?
The group of animals that can detect magnetic fields is what?
The group of creatures that can sense electric fields is what?
Light-receptive neurons are located in what part of the eye?
Vibration-sensitive neurons are found in what part of the ear?
Signals are sent from the thalamus to what part of the brain?
What part of the body is controlled by nuclei in the midbrain?
All the muscles controlled by motor neurons in the body are controlled by what?
Which motor areas of the brain control breathing and swallowing?
At the lowest level of the brain and spinal cord, are what areas?
The red nucleus controls what part(s) of the body?
A strip of tissue found at the edge of the frontal lobe is called what?
The primary motor cortex sends signals to the spinal cord through what?
The brain and spinal cord work together to control what system of the body?
What system in the body controls heart rate?
What system in the body controls salivation?
Most of the processes of the autonomic nervous system are called what?
Which system in the body controls urination?
The SCN of the nervous system is an abbreviation for what?
The suprachiasmatic nucleus is a small part of what part of the brain?
Which part of the arousal system controls the body's biological clock?
The RHT is an abbreviation for what?
THE SCN receives information from the optic nerves through what?
A group of neuron-clusters scattered in the core of the lower brain is called what?
Reticular neurons transfer signals to what part of the brain?
Damage to the reticular formation can cause what?
The SCN transfers signals to a set of areas that implement what?
There are two types of sleep called what?
What type of sleep involves dreaming?
The three types of brain activity that can be measured are what?
Slow wave sleep is also known as what?
During what stage of sleep do serotonin and norepinephrine levels drop?
The hypothalamus is located at the base of what?
In vertebrates, the most important part of the brain is what?
A collection of small nuclei at the base of the forebrain is called what?
The gland directly underneath the hypothalamus is which gland?
The pituitary gland sends hormones through what in the body?
What field of science studies the brain and the central nervous system?
What scientific field tries to understand the mind and behavior?
What field of science strives to diagnose and treat diseases of the nervous system?
Psychiatry is the branch of science that does what?
Cognitive science seeks to join what two branches of science with other fields?
The oldest known method of studying the brain is what?
What do neuroanatomists study?
What type of study uses medical imaging techniques to correlate changes in brain structure?
Until what century was brain studying mostly anatomical?
What do neurophysiologists study?
The most common tools that neurophysiologists use are what?
What type of receptors does the brain lack?
Electrodes are often glued to what like in EEG studies?
Computational neuroscience is concerned with what two studies?
What is the most common test subjects for studying of the brain?
Where was the oldest brain that was found?
How old was the oldest brain discovered thought to be?
The oldest known brain discovered was found in how old of a person?
The oldest brain found in a cave was from what gender of human?
The seal of the soul was debated to lie in what two organs of the body?
Aristotle thought the soul lied in what organ?
Who invented the atomic theory of matter?
The "father of medicine" is a name given to whom in history?
What philosopher in history argued for a three-part soul?
Work in the first half the 20th century in electrical properties of nerve cells were by what two main scientists?
Which decade in history was officially called the "Decade of the Brain"?
Multielectrode recording allows what?
Genetic engineering allows what?
During what century was multielectrode recording invented?
Genetic engineering was first discovered in what century?
What is a geographical term that roughly encompasses Western Asia?
The term near east was originally applies to the maximum extent of what empire?
The term Near East has fallen into disuses in what language?
What has replaced the term Near East?
How was the Ottoman Empire portrayed in the press?
The Balkan states were primarily what religion? 
When did the Ottomans strike at the Armenians?
What are the grounds on which the Ottomans struck at the Armenians?
What aroused the indignation of the entire Christian world?
When did "Near East" come into use to describe the part of the east closest to Europe?
In short, the term Far East appeared to name this area
"Near East" applied to this mainly known area
What was the jurisdiction of the Levant in? 
What was needed to set foot on most of the shores of the southern and central Mediterranean? 
What was one region included that was occupied by piratical kingdoms?
Where were the piratical kingdoms from? 
Why was Iran included in the collection of regions? 
What did the term Near East focus on in the 1890s?
The demise of what left considerable confusion as to what was to be meant by "Near East" 
The terms "Near East" and "Far East" referring to areas of the globe in or contiguous to the former British Empire and the neighboring colonies fit together as a pair based on what? 
When do the terms "Near East" and "Far East" appear together in journals? 
Who used the terms near Gaul?
The appearance of what culture using the terms appears in Linear B?
Usually the terms were given when referencing what?  
What divided Asia on a similar basis? 
"Scythia this side of the Himalayas" is located where? 
"India on this side of the Ganges" is located where? 
"Scythia beyond the Himalayas" is located where? 
Where did Asia begin? 
When was John Seller's Atlas Maritima?
What had "India Beyond the Ganges" become? 
China, Korea, southeast Asia and the islands of the Pacific were included in what? 
What was only an English translation of Latin Oriens and Orientalis, "the land of the rising sun"?
What year did Jodocus Hondius make his world map? 
Where was Elizabeth I from?
What was Elizabeth primarily interested in? 
Who did Elizabeth I collaborate with?
What was the goal of the first trading companies?
What company was charted in 1600 for trade to the East Indies?
What has pleased western historians?
What was always in question from the beginning of the Ottoman Empire? 
What was the Ottoman Empire created from?
How did the last Roman emperor die?
Where was the Roman emperor's capital?
Until what year did the words near east and far east not refer to any particular region? 
What brought a change in vocabulary?
The Russian Empire became more militarily active against who?
Who decided the two polities under attack were necessary for the balance of power? 
What empire began promulgating a new vocabulary?
When was a reprint of a letter sent to The Times appear in Littel's Living Age?
Who was the author of the letter sent to the Times?
What was Thomas Taylor Meadows replying to?
What was one of the earliest presentations of this vocabulary?
What was said must represent usage by that administration?
Who had formed the club that contained much of the colonial administration?
What remained popular in diplomatic, trade and journalistic circles?
What variation soon developed among the scholars and the men of the cloth and their associates?
There was a need to separate what from the terrain of the Ottoman Empire?
What did the Christians see the country as?
How did the scholars attempt their definition? 
When was the London Review?
Rawlinson, Layard and others were reviewed in what?
Who wrote The London Review of 1861?
What region was explicitly excluded?
What region has no mention?
Assyria, Chaldea, Mesopotamia, Persia, Armenia, Egypt, Arabia, Syria, Palestine, Ethiopia, Caucasus, Libya, Anatolia, and Abyssinia were all what?
What does Hogarth say in detail?
Hogarth makes no mention of what?
How is Hogarth's analysis?
When did the term "Near East" acquire considerable disrepute?
The term "Near East" acquired considerable disrepute in whose eyes?
What was the cause of the onus?
What was the cause of the Hamidian Massacres of Armenians?
When was Robert Hickens' book wrote?
Reports from who made the change evident?
Where did Sir Henry Norman travel in 1894
What book did Sir Henry Norman write after traveling to the Far East?
What year did Sir Henry Norman's book come out? 
Where did the Normans go off to instead of publishing the book?
When did Norman publish parts of his planned travel book?
What magazine did Norman publish his work in?
Who were liberators of oppressed Balkan states?
Who did Norman say "turned her back"?
What does Norman mean in the article when saying "Near East"?
"The East" refers to what?
Miller's words were considered what?
It was considered Europe needed what country?
What was Miller citing?
The Ottoman Empire had no choice but to develop their relationship with what country?
Who supported the Austro-Hungarian Empire?
Who did the British Empire side with?
The formation of the Triple Entente and the Triple Alliance partly caused what?
By what year were three empires gone? 
What year was Arnold J toynbee becoming metaphysical about the Near East?
Who was the Hegelesque historian of civilization?
Arnold J Toynbee believed what?
What was able to rise from the death of the Near East?
What notable nation was able to rise from the ashes of the Near East?
How did the Republic of Turkey align themselves?
Who was the founder of the Republic of Turkey?
Who was a former Ottoman high-ranking officer?
When was the term middle east common as a noun and adjective?
The middle east was not common in diplomacy and what other context?
Where did the "Far East" derive from? 
Where did the Ottoman Empire end?
Why did archaeologists count Iran as "The Near East"?
Where did the use of the term Middle East as a region of international affairs begin?
What was Iran known as to the west?
When did Thomas Edward Gordon publish "The Problem of the Middle East"?
What article did Thomas Edward Gordon publish?
The problem of the Middle East was published by who?
What threat caused Gordon to publish his article?
Who was a diplomat and military officer?
Who had not used the term middle east previously in publications?
Who was a member of American diplomatic and military circles?
What was Alfred Thayer Mahan concerned about?
When did Alfred Thayer Mahan comment on the trade routes?
Who did not connect with the soldier?
What did Mahan believe he was innovating?
What had already been there to be seen?
What is the basis of Simpson's unity?
The great whites were appearing as late as what time?
In whose works were the great whites appearing?
What was mainly of interest in America?
These regions were occupied by who?
Where where the yellow?
Where were the black?
When did Kenya become independent?
The color issue was not settled until when?
The Ottomans were portrayed as what?
Who is known as the saint of all British colonial officers?
What did Charles George Gordon spend his time between?
When did he win Ottoman confidence?
What did he become in his later career?
When did the term "Near and Middle East" hold stage?
What proved to be less acceptable to a colonial point of view?
When did Captain T.C. Fowle write of a trip he had taken from Karachi to Syria?
Who were the 40th Pathans?
In the book Fowle wrote, what is the entire region considered?
What prevailed with the disgrace of "Near East"?
What continues in some circles at the discretion of the defining agency or academic department?
What term was disgraced in diplomatic and military circles?
What sentiment persists even though racial and colonial definitions of the Middle East are no longer ideologically sound?
What definitions of the Middle East are no longer ideologically sound?
What are racial and colonial definitions of the Middle East considered?
When were terms such as "Near East", "Far East", and "Middle East" relegated to the experts?
Where did the new wave of diplomats often come from?
Where did archaeology on the international scene fall into?
What replaced the fallen empires of the 19th century?
What is the chief remaining nation to assign official responsibilities to a region called the Near East?
What has the state department been most influential in promulgating?
Who has abandoned the term Near East?
The Bureau of Near Eastern Affairs is a division of what?
What is perhaps the most influential agency to still use the term Near East?
Secretary Clinton also calls the implementation of official diplomacy of the United States what?
Who works closely with the definition of the Near East?
What is NESA?
What does NESA Teach?
What is WINEP?
What is WINEPS target countries as?
How does WINEP bundle the countries of Northwest Africa?
What does LoC stand for?
What is the Library of Congress?
The Library of Congress is under whose supervision?
Who formulates multiple regional divisions as is convenient for its various operations?
Who recognizes the "Middle East and North Africa" region?
The United Nations Statistics Division defines Western Asia to contain what?
The Food and Agriculture Organization describes its entire theater of operations as what?
What is a quasi-independent agency of the United States Government?
The CIA appears to have what?
Who appoints the director of the CIA?
Who oversees the operations of the CIA?
The Near East of the NESA is the same as the Middle East define in what?
What does NESA stand for?
Whose duties are defined as "support on Middle Eastern and North African countries?"
What does USAID stand for?
What is the independant agency under the Department of State for the purpose of determining and distributing foreign aid called?
What term does USAID not use?
The Foreign and Commonwealth Office of United Kingdom recognizes what?
What region does the Foreign and Commonwealth office of United Kingdom not recognize?
What consumed the Near East as far as the Red Sea?
What is a term of the 20th centrury intended to stabilize the geographical application of Near East to ancient history?
The ancient nations, people and languages of the enhanced Fertile Crescent will always refer to what?
What is the sweep of land from the Nile Valley through Anatolia called?
James Bennett Pritchard wrote what?
When did James Bennett Pritchard write his textbook?
Who was a British archaeologist?
Who excavated ancient Ur?
What do most universities teaching liberal arts have? 
What has had parallel growth of in the 20th century?
What are these resources collected for?
What does CSAD stand for?
Who founded the CSAD?
Where is Oxford University?
Where did a large percentage of experts on the modern Middle East began their training?
What is the meaning of Near East in numerous establishments and publications?
What is almost never mixed or confused with studies of the Ancient Near East?
What includes such languages as Sumerian and Akkadian?
What kind of cultures were the Hemudu and Liangzhu?
Where was the site of the Hemudu and LIangzhu cultures?
What year was there an analysis of the DNA recovered from human remains in Liangzhu culture?
Which culture were the Austronesian and Tai-Kadai peoples linked to in the DNA analysis?
What haplogroup did a DNA analysis of the Liangzhu culture reveal?
What was the initial power base for Xiang Liang and Xiang Yu's rebellion?
Who did the kingdom of Chu eventually fall to?
In Later Han, which Mount did control of the area return to the settlement below?
Who led a rebellion with Xiang Liang against the Qin Empire?
Which empire did Xiang Liang and Xiang Yu rebel against?
What was Nanjing formerly known as?
What was the former name of Hangzhou?
Besides Qiantang and Jiankang, what was the other major metropolitan center in the south?
What year was Qiantang raised in status and renamed Hangzhou?
How many major metropolitan centers were there in the south at the time?
During which war did the British navy defeat Eight Banners forces at Ningbo and Dinghai?
When was the Treaty of Nanking signed?
What became one of the five Chinese treaty ports under the terms of the Treaty of Nanking?
What did much of Zhejiang come under control of during the Taiping Rebellion?
When did Wenzhou become Zhejiang's second treaty port?
What type of resources does Zhejiang have a lack of?
What is Zhejiang's location vulnerable to from the sea?
What type of development has Zhejiang been an epicenter of?
Which part of Zhejiang is part of the Yangtze Delta?
What type of geography is Northeast Zhejiang?
What does Zhejiang consist mostly of?
What percent of Zhejiang is hills?
What is the highest peak of the province?
How high is Huangmaojian Peak in meters?
How high is Huangmaojian Peak in feet?
What does the north of the province lie just south of?
Where does the Grand Canal of China end?
What is a major river of the province in addition to the Qiangtang River?
What is a well-known lake of Hangzhou?
What is a well-known lake of Jiaxing?
How many prefecture-level divisions of Zhejiang are there?
How many county-level divisions of Zhejiang are there?
How many township-level divisions of Zhejiang are there?
What is the largest base of shooting films and TV dramas in China?
What is called 'China's Hollywood'?
How are the politics of Zhejiang structured?
Who is the highest-ranking official in the People's Government of Zhejiang?
Who is the Governor subordinate to?
What is the Zhejiang Communist Party of China (CPC) Provincial Committee Secretary provincially known as?
What type of party-government system are all governing institutions in Mainland China?
When was Tan Zhenlin's term as Zhenjiang's Communist Party Secretary?
Who was the inaugural Communist Party Secretary of Zhenjiang?
When was the so-called February Countercurrent?
When was Jiang Hua's term?
When was the case against the Gang of Four?
What is the province traditionally known as?
What is the main crop of the province?
What is the second main crop of the province?
What part of Zhejiang is a center of aquaculture in China?
What is the largest fishery in the country?
What is an important commercial port along with Ningbo, Wenzhou and Taizhou?
What bridge is between Haiyan County and Cixi?
What is the longest bridge over a continuous body of sea water in the world?
What kind of ports are Taizhou and Ningbo?
The Hangzhou Bay Bridge goes between Haiyan County and where else?
What is Zhejiang's own development model dubbed?
What is the Zhejiang model based on prioritizing and encouraging?
What direction is the economic heart of Zhejiang moving toward?
What was the annual real growth of urbanites in Zhejiang in 2009?
What was Zhejiang's nominal GDP in yuan for 2011?
What day of the week was September 15, 2011?
What village protested over the large-scale death of fish in a nearby river on September 15, 2011?
How many company vehicles did angry protesters overturn at the Zhejiang Jinko Solar Company?
How many more nights after the first day did protests last?
Who was the deputy head of Haining's environmental protection bureau at the time?
What kind of Chinese make up the vast majority of the population?
What varieties of Chinese do the largest Han subgroup speak?
How many members of ethnic minorities are there?
How many She people are there?
Where is the only She autonomous county in China?
What is another predominant religion of Zhejiang besides Chinese folk religions and Taoist traditions?
According to surveys in 2007 and 2009, what percent of the population believes in cults of ancestors?
According to surveys in 2007 and 2009, what percent of the population identifies as Christian?
What percent of the population identified as Christians in 2004?
What percent of the population may be irreligious?
What year did the government of Zhejiang recognise folk religion as 'civil religion'?
When did Buddhism arrive in Zhejiang?
What has an important presence in Zhejiang since its arrival 1,800 years ago?
What part of 2015 did the government of Zhejiang recognise folk religion as 'civil religion'?
More than how many thousand folk religious organisations were registered in Zhejiang in 2015?
How many years ago did Catholicism arrive in the province?
How many years ago did Protestantism arrive in the province?
Where are Protestants especially notable in Zhejiang?
What percent of Zhejiang was Protestant in 1999?
Which religion came to Zhejiang 400 years ago?
When did the rapid development of religions in Zhejiang drive the local committee of ethnic and religious affairs to enact measures to rationalise them?
According to the locality, in addition to "Three Rectifications and One Demolition", what was another name for these measures?
These regulations have led to the demolition of churches and what else?
What have these regulations led to the removal of from churches?
What was an exemplary case of all this?
How long ago did Islam arrive in Zhejiang?
What religion do the Hui Chinese living in Zhejiang practice?
How many of the Hui Chinese living in Zhejiang practice Islam?
What is practiced by the She ethnic minority in Zhejiang?
What religion came to Zhejiang 1,400 years ago?
How diverse is Zhejiang, linguistically speaking?
What do most inhabitants of Zhejiang speak?
Mandarin and Huizhou dialects are spoken on the border where?
Min dialects are spoken on the border where?
What type of geography is Zhejiang?
When was the People's Republic of China founded?
What has been promoted as the standard language of communication throughout China since 1949?
A majority of the population educated since what year can speak Mandarin?
What type of residents tend to be more fluent in Mandarin than rural ones?
Throughout history there have been a series of what in the area to allow for better communication?
What is Longjing tea also called?
Where does Longjing tea originate from?
What type of umbrellas is Hangzhou known for?
What type of fans is Hangzhou known for?
Zhejiang cuisine is one of how many great traditions of Chinese cuisine?
Which government's Ministry of Defence is mentioned here?
What does MoD stand for?
Who sets the defence policy in Great Britain?
For which part of the government is the MoD the headquarters?
What does the MoD wish to strengthen?
The UK consists of what two areas?
What does the MoD defend?
What are the threats that the MoD has identified?
What does the MoD manage?
During what years did the five Departments of State do the work of the modern Ministry of Defence?
What were the five Departments of State that did the work of the modern Ministry of Defence?
When did the defence functions of the Ministry of Aviation Supply merge into the Ministry of Defence?
All former Departments of State (except the Ministry of Aviation Supply) merged in what year?
Who is supported by civilian, scientific, and professional military advisors?
What is the Permanent Under-Secretary of State for Defence generally known as?
Where does the Permanent Secretary serve as the senior civil servant?
What is the role of the Permanent Secretary?
What is the name of the person who is the current Chief of the Defence Staff?
Who is the professional head of the British Armed Forces?
The professional heads of what three services support the Chief of the Defence Staff?
Which person in the Joint Forces Command supports the Chief of the Defence Staff?
How many Deputy Chiefs of the Defence Staff are there?
What are the three Deputy Chiefs of the Defence Staff?
Who represents the Defence Medical Services on the Defence Staff?
Who leads the Defence Medical Services?
One of the Assistant Chiefs of the Defence Staff is for Reserves and what?
The Personnel Chief is also known as what?
There is a Defence Services Secretary in the Royal Household of the what?
Who are two of the Assistant Chiefs of the Defence Staff?
In what year was there a Strategic Defence Review?
What paper was published in 2003?
Which part of the Britsh government were the two publications listed concerning?
In what concept is the MoD considered a leader?
Who was the PM of Britain in 2010?
Who was the president of France in 2010?
In which two countries is the UK installing military bases?
In which other country is the UK thinking about installing a military base?
What was the new threat that arose after the end of the Cold War?
What percentage of the defence estate makes up training areas and ranges?
What makes up the smallest portion of the defence estate?
What percentage of the defence estate is taken up by airfields?
Who manages the defence estate?
Barracks and camps are what percentage of the defence estate?
In what city are the headquarters of the MoD?
Who designed the headquarters of the MoD?
Who designed the statues that are on either side of the northern entrance to the MoD headquarters?
What is the headquarters of the MoD called?
Who made the Gurkha Monument?
What publication released a report about the Ministry of Defence in 2002?
What was the MoD accused of doing to the public?
What are the children of some families in the area of the testing experiencing?
When was the supposed germ warfare testing taking place?
When were millions of people supposedly exposed to e. coli and an anthrax-like bacteria?
The term "high definition" originally described televisions systems from what year?
Earlier television systems were based on what?
During which entire century were companies and nations trying to achieve true HDTV?
In what century were 4k, 5k, and 8k systems introduced?
What is the most current HDTV system development?
Who started trials in August 1936?
When was the Baird system discontinued?
Which country developed the 441-line system?
What prevented France's 819-line system from achieving the definition it was capable of?
Which system used interlaced scanning to correct the flicker problem of the 240-line?
What year did color broadcasts start in the US?
How many lines of resolution did the US NTSC color system have in 1953?
When did Europe begin color broadcasts?
The PAL and SECAM were color systems where?
How many lines of resolution were the European monochrome broadcasts?
How many major HDTV systems were tested by SMPTE in the late 70's?
Who tested the four major HDTV systems in the late 1970's?
Who released A Study of High Definition Television Systems?
In what year was A Study of High Definition Television Systems released?
What was released by an SMPTE study group in 1979?
What does DVB stand for?
When was widescreen HDTV transmission modes formally adopted?
In addition to the 625-line PAL system, what European system is considered a standard definition television system?
In addition to the NTSC system, what 525-line system is considered a standard definition television system?
525 and 625-line systems are now considered what?
In what year did France start transmissions using and 819 line system?
What country started transmissions using and 819 line system in 1949?
What did France start transmissions with in 1949?
Was France's 819 line system in color?
When was France's 819 line system discontinued?
In what year did NHK first develop consumer HD television with a 5:3 aspect ratio?
Who first developed consumer HD television with a 5:3 aspect ratio?
When did satellite test broadcasts of Hi-Vision start?
When did regular broadcasting of BS-9ch start?
When did regular testing of Hi-Vision start?
When was the MUSE system demonstrated in the US first?
What aspect ratio did the MUSE system use when demonstrated in 1981?
Which president declared it "a matter of national interest" to introduce HDTV to the US?
Which system was demonstrated in the US for the first time in 1981?
Which system was demonstrated in Washington to President Ronald Reagan?
Why did the FCC reject systems such as MUSE?
What was increasing and consuming a lot of bandwidth?
Who rejected systems such as MUSE as the new standard for the US?
What was one of the requirements for a new standard system in the US?
What was the existing system at the time?
What constraints kept HDTV from being widely adopted in the 90's?
What was HDTV not permitted to do in the 90's?
How much more bandwith was required from early HDTV commercial experiments than an SD broadcast?
Efforts were made to reduce analog HDTV to how much of the bandwith of SDTV?
Despite the reduced bandwith, HDTV format still had to be distributed how?
What kind of experiments required over four times the bandwith of a SDTV broadcast?
How many broadcasters did Japan have sharing a single channel?
Which country had successful public analog HDTV broadcasting?
What was particularly challenging in the early years of HDTV?
What accomplishment in early HDTV did Japan have?
What does ITU-R stand for?
What does DVB stand for?
What is the DVB?
What is the DVB's role?
Who standardizes HDTV specifications?
What did the Grand Alliance propose as the new standard for SDTV and HDTV?
Which standard were ATSC and DVB based on?
Who created the standard for DVB-2, DVB-C, and DVB-T?
Who proposed ATSC as the new standard for SDTV and HDTV?
When did ITU-R start trying to work towards setting a single international HDTV standard?
What did ITU-R start trying to do in 1983?
What was one of the issues with setting a single HDTV standard?
What was used as a conversion between the two main frame/field rates?
How many frame/field rates were primarily being used in 1983?
What aspect ratio was agreed upon due to the influence of widescreen cinema?
Who agreed upon the 16:9 aspect ratio?
What was a leading factor in the 16:9 aspect ratio being chosen?
Which encoding contains both progressive and interlaced content?
Which aspect ratio was the early favorite?
When was HDTV introduced in the US?
Who made HDTV official in 1993?
AT&T, Philips, Zenith, and MIT, among others, made up what group in the 90's?
When did the first public HDTV broadcast happen in the US?
What does ATSC stand for?
When did the first HDTV transmissions happen in Europe?
What event was the first HDTV broadcast in Europe?
When did Europe abandon standard transmission?
Where was the FIFA World Cup able to be watched in HDTV?
When did regular broadcasts start in Europe?
What event was first broadcasted on January 1, 2004?
The New Year's Day broadcast officially launched which channel?
When did test transmissions of HDTV begin in Europe?
Which European company launched HD1?
Euro1080 was a division of what former company?
What "chicken or the egg" stalemate prompted Euro1080 to broadcast HDTV channels?
What was Euro1080 hoping to kick-start by broadcasting HDTV channels?
How much did viewers have to pay for the HD1 channel?
What was on HD1 for 4 or 5 hours per day?
What format did the first European HDTV broadcast use?
What compression did the first European HDTV broadcast use?
What signal did the first European HDTV broadcast use?
What compression did Euro1080 later change to?
What signal did Euro1080 later change to?
Which European country first deployed HD content using the new DVB-T2 standard?
When did the UK deploy HD content using the new DVB-T2 transmission standard?
What transmission standard did the UK start using in December 2009?
What does DTG stand for?
How many HD channels did the Freeview HD service contain as of December 2013?
When was the digital switchover process completed in the UK?
Which service contains 10 HD channels and finished its roll out in October 2012?
How was the Freeview HD service rolled out in the UK?
What are the three HDTV parameters?
Which two parameters can be dropped if its value is implied from context?
When can the frame size or frame rate parameter specification be dropped?
When a parameter is dropped, the remaining numeric parameter is specified first, followed by what?
What three scanning rates do 50 Hz systems support?
Which system suports 59.94i, 60i, 23.976p, 24p, 29.97p, 30p, 59.94p, and 60p
SD television fractional rates were often rounded to what?
Strict notation is required with HD fractional rates to avoid what?
What is usually dropped for the commercial naming of an HDTV product?
What does 24p mean?
What does 50i mean?
When naming a commercial HDTV product, a frame rate can be specified without what?
Is there a single standard for HDTV color support?
Before being converted to RGB, colors are ususally broadcasted using what color space?
Colors are typically broadcast using YUV and then converted to what?
When transmitted over the internet, colors are typically to what?
What assumption is made with colors being transmitted over the internet?
At least how many times more linear resolution does HDTV have over SDTV?
HDTV increases the effective image resolution by not using what?
What does SDTV stand for?
HDTV handles what aspect ratio without using letterboxing or anamorphic stretching?
If more bandwith is required than is available, a very high resolution source my not be able to transmitted without loss of what?
The compression used in all HDTV storage and transmission systems will do what if resolution is too high?
A very high resolution source may require more of what?
A broadcasts optimum format depends on what two things?
For best fidelity to the source, what three things should match the source? 
For best fidelity to the source, the transmitted field ratio, lines, and frame rate should match what? 
The type of videographic recording medium used and the image's characteristics determine what?
PAL, SECAM, and NTSC frame rates apply to what definition televisions?
PAL, SECAM, and NTSC frame rates do not apply to what broadcasts?
In former PAL and SECAM countries, what frame rate does HDTV operate at?
In former NTSC countries, what frame rate does HDTV operate at?
At what rate is standard 35mm photographic film exposed and projected?
To be shown on SDTV in PAL-system countries, at what rate is cinema film scanned?
The technique in which with successive pair of film frames, one is held for three video fields, and the next is held for two, is called what?
The 3:2 Pulldown techniques gives what total time for two frames?
What is achieved by the 3:2 Pulldown technique producing a total time of 1/12 of a second for two frames?
What two formats are typically used to recorde non-cinematic HDTV video intended for broadcast?
Which format is typically used for internet distribution of HD video?
Most computer monitors operate in what mode?
1080i, 1080p, and 720p are often used on what kind of disc. 
In the US, what kind of tuner is needed for residents to receive free, over the air programming?
Laws regarding antennas were upated before what?
Who do these laws prohibit from banning the installation of antennas?
Laws about antennas keep home owners' associations and city government from banning what?
Most television sets sold since what year have an ATSC tuner?
HD content can be displayed by cable-ready TVs without using what?
Without using an external box, cable-ready TVs can display what?
What features allow the cable-ready TVs to display HD content without an external box?
What kind of built-in tuner will allow a cable-ready TV to display HD content without an external box?
What kind of card will allow a cable-ready TV to display HD content without an external box?
Roku and AppleTV are examples of what?
Internet downloads, Blu-ray videos, and Apple TV are examples of what?
Terrestrial broadcast and direct broadcast satellite are examples of what?
Digital cable and Roku are examples of what?
Why does the PlayStation 3 have extensive HD compatibility?
In addition to having a Blu-ray player the Xbox 360 also features what?
What high definition gaming platform did Nintendo recently release?
The HD capabilities of modern gaming systems has inspired developers to do what?
Sky HD's set-top box, TiVo's Series 3, and Dish Network's VIP 622 are examples of what?
Some cable boxes are capable of doing what?
What restriction does W-VHS recordings have?
What does D-VHS stand for?
When was the Hauppauge 1212 Personal Video Recorder introduced?
How does the Personal Video Recorder store content?
Recent systems can record a broadcast HD program in what format?
What uncompressed storage option was introduced in 2008?
W-VHS recorders are capable of recording what kinds of signals?
What kind of recorder is no longer produced for the consumer market?
In the secondary market, analog tape recorders are considered what?
Prior to 2004, what were US cable companies required to provide customers who rent HD set-top boxes?
When were boxes with "functional" FireWire no longer included in the FCC mandate?
Content is now protected by what encryption?
What can 5c encryption prevent?
In addition to being used to build things, what has wood been used for over thousands of years?
What kind of strong fibers are part of the composite of wood?
What's the matrix in wood made up of?
What one word describes the function wood provides to a tree or plant?
What does wood convey to leaves, roots, and other tissues of a woody plant in addition to water?
How many cubic meters of growing stock forest are there on the planet?
What percentage of the Earth's stock forest is commercial?
In addition to buildings, what is wood often used to make?
About how many cubic kilometers of the vast stock forest's wood were harvested in 1991?
In addition to being carbon neutral, what other adjective describes wood that makes it compelling as a renewable energy source?
What year were the earliest plants that grew wood discovered?
In which Canadian province were the oldest woody plants found?
If dendrochronology can't be used, what method would scientists employ to date wood?
How many millions of years old were the plants that were discovered in New Brunswick?
What has been the primary purpose of wood for millennia other than fuel?
What is often made of wood that provides shelter to people?
For clues about the climate of a place, we can look at variation in isotopic abundances or what other thing?
What could be made out of wood that could be used to fight off attackers?
What category of items often constructed from wood does a chair belong to?
Where does wood come from?
What forms in a tree to increase its diameter?
What is the process of trees growing out to get bigger around called?
What do many places have four of that would cause growth rings in a tree?
If a place has annual seasons, what are the growth rings on the trees there called?
If a growth ring has differences over one season, would the part nearest the tree's center be narrower or wider?
What name, besides springwood, is used for the part of a growth ring formed in the beginning of the growing season?
If the opposite of springwood is summerwood, what's the opposite of earlywood?
Is earlywood usually lighter or darker than the part of the growth ring that forms later in the season?
Is summerwood the inner or outer portion of a growth ring?
What is the sort of circular imperfection in a piece of wood called?
What property of wood does a knot usually reduce in the wood around it?
In what direction is wood often sawn so that a knot appears as a solid circle that the grain flows around?
Are knots usually lighter or darker than the surrounding wood?
The direction of grain in a knot can differ by as much as how many degrees from the regular wood?
Other than the base of a side branch, what tree feature causes a knot?
What shape is the knot formed by a side branch's base?
What measurement of a stem determines a knot's inner tip placement?
Because a knot's shape is conical, what shape does a cross-section of it have?
What will the lower limbs of a tree usually do during development?
For what length of time can a dead lower limb stay attached to a tree?
Rather than being joined to the limb that died, where do subsequent layers grow?
Are the knots that dead tree limbs form attached or not attached?
A detached knot will probably drop out of the wood when someone saws it into what?
What's the process in which knots are classified called?
Along with firmness, soundness, and form, what property of a knot is classified?
What property of knots does the amount of time a branch stayed on a tree while the stem kept growing affect?
What is wood's breaking strength susceptible to? 
Depending on the placement and size of a knot, what property of structural timber can be affected?
What do stiffness and elastic strength depend on more than defects?
What direction of compression in relation to its grain won't weaken wood with sound knots in it?
What positive visual component can knots sometimes add to decorative pieces?
What term is used to describe what knots can do to affect the finish of things made from wood even when they've been painted?
Is bleed easy or difficult to control?
The stain from a knot bleeding is usually brownish or what other color?
In what stage of processing does knot primer need to be applied for maximum effectiveness?
What's another word for "duramen"?
What is heartwood naturally resistant to?
How does heartwood formation occur due to its being genetically programmed?
What adjective describes fully formed heartwood?
Despite being considered dead, what can heartwood have one chemical reaction to?
In what part of a tree's cross-section is heartwood visible?
What simple color distinction can heartwood have that makes it stand out from living wood in a tree?
Along with insect infestation, what process can discolor wood and make it look like heartwood?
What kind of plants never form heartwood?
What is the living wood in a tree called?
What term is interchangeable with "sapwood"?
Is sapwood the younger or older wood in a tree?
What essential liquid is the sapwood tasked with carrying around a tree?
How much of the wood in a tree is sapwood at some point in its life?
Does a tree growing quickly out in the open have thinner or thicker sapwood for its size than the same kind of tree in a dense forest?
If a tree starts forming heartwood right away, will its sapwood layer be thin or thick?
What property of heartwood that has nothing to do with how important it is to trees got it its name?
Does a beech tree usually have thin or thick sapwood?
Does a sassafras tree typically have a thin or thick sapwood layer?
Would a thin or a thick sapwood layer be found in a pine tree?
What part of a tree is the cross-sectional area of the sapwood approximately proportional to?
Are more rings necessary if they're narrow or wide?
As a tree grows bigger, if the sapwood layer doesn't increase in volume, what will it become?
In what part of the tree trunk is the sapwood layer thinnest?
Along with the smaller diameter of the upper trunk, what factor leads to thinner sapwood higher up a tree?
What usually covers the whole trunk of a very young tree?
What evidence of the stubs of the limbs a tree loses can always be seen in the wood?
In a very old tree, are you more likely to find a lot of knots in the heartwood or the sapwood?
What hides the stubs of a tree's lost limbs from being visible later in its life?
Since knots are defects that weaken lumber, would the heartwood or the sapwood from the same tree be stronger?
What do broken limbs and deep wounds open a door for in a tree?
Decay can spread to all of what part of a tree?
What growth stage of insects bore holes into trees?
What part of a tree often stays impressively sound even when hundreds or thousands of years old?
What evidence do some insect larvae leave in a tree forever?
In what stage of its life does a tree usually grow the fastest?
As a tree ages, do its growth rings usually get wider or narrower?
What part of a tree opens and spreads out more as it matures?
Is wood production of a tree lessened or increased as it ages?
Along with nutrients, what do trees growing in forests have to compete for?
When a big tree is cut up, will the pieces of wood differ or all be the same?
In a large log, will the heartwood or sapwood usually be stronger and tougher?
If you need really hard, strong wood from a small tree, would it likely be better to use the heartwood or sapwood?
Besides big trees, what trees are more likely to have a range of different kinds of wood?
When trees have a visible difference in color between sapwood and heartwood, which is darker?
What is deposited naturally in heartwood that changes its color?
Is the color difference between heartwood and sapwood usually very subtle or conspicuous?
What type of properties of heartwood and sapwood is often the same even if their colors are very different?
Although heartwood and sapwood might be similar mechanically, if their colors are very different, what other type of difference would they have?
What type of tree has resin that makes it stronger when it dries?
What's the funny name for resin-saturated heartwood?
What is fat lighter practically impervious to in addition to termites?
If spruce is shot full of crude resin and dried, which of its properties is increased?
Since it's highly flammable, what do people often use little pieces of longleaf pine tree stumps for?
Which of the wood in a growth ring is usually darker?
Which property of a tree's wood that gives clues about its strength and hardness can be judged by it's color?
What category of trees show this difference greatly?
What type of woods might sometimes appear to have darker earlywood on a finished surface?
With the exception of earlywood/latewood difference in some types of trees, how much of an indication of strength is a wood's color?
What condition does an abnormal color usually indicate in wood?
What other property can you assume of wood that is diseased?
What causes the black checked pattern in the wood of western hemlocks?
What animals cause the reddish-brown streaks of color in hickory wood?
What's the name for the pretty coloring effect caused in some wood by rot-producing fungi?
Often the water in wood makes it more pliable and what else?
What material sometimes used for dog chews reacts similarly to wood because of its water content?
What material we use to write or print on, like wood, becomes softer and more pliable when wet?
When water content increases within certain limits in wood, does is have a less or greater softening effect?
What type of action does water create in cloth?
What will drying often increase in wood?
What color is also used interchangeably with "undried" for wood?
What type of wood can hold four times as much of a load when dried?
What type of "ultimate" strength is one of the two types increased the most by drying wood?
What property of wood is least affected by drying?
Is strength at elastic limit in endwise compression or stress at elastic limit in cross-bending increased more by drying wood?
Is the strength of the modulus of rupture or elasticity increased more when wood is dried?
What type of cells makes up most wood cells in coniferous trees?
Are hardwood or softwood species more uniform in structure?
What are the visible vessels in hardwoods commonly called?
What hardwood that starts with the letter "O" would have pores?
Besides oak, what's an example of a hardwood with prominent pores?
Is the structure of hardwood simple or complex?
What handles most of the water conduction in hardwoods?
Are the vessels in chestnut wood large or small?
In wood from a willow tree, what would you need to use to see the tiny vessels?
Besides ring-porous, what's the other class hardwoods are often divided into?
What species of hardwood are hickory and mulberry trees?
In what season do the growth-rings of ring-porous species form with larger vessels localized?
In what season does the part of the growth-ring with smaller vessels form in ring-porous species?
What fibers does the summer's section of growth-ring have more of?
Along with strength, what property do wood fibers lend to wood?
What kind of woods have pores that are uniformly sized?
What species do aspen, cottonwood, and poplar trees belong to?
With walnut, what's another tree in the intermediate group?
What capability is spread through the growth ring in ring-porous species?
Is maple wood diffuse-porous or ring-porous?
What kind of softwoods often have significant differences in their earlywood and latewood?
Is latewood denser or less dense than earlywood?
Does strength come from the walls or cavities of wood cells?
Are the cell walls of earlywood thick or thin?
What general size are the cavities in the cells of very dense latewood?
Comparing a heavy and a lightweight piece of wood from a pine, which would have a greater proportion of latewood?
What feature of a piece of pine with more latewood would be more clear and pronounced?
What type of tree has very little contrast between parts of its growth rings?
Is white pine easy or difficult to work with because of its texture?
What kind of pines have very deep, darkly colored hardwood that stands out against the light earlywood?
Having a high proportion of latewood isn't all that matters; what else is important?
What can we judge in wood just by looking at it?
What property of wood could we project some indication of by looking at its density?
What could we call some specimens with a high proportion of latewood that explains why they weigh less than specimens with much less latewood?
What facet of wood is affected to some degree by the place where the tree grows?
If you want wood that's easy to work with, what kind of growth would you want the tree to have?
What species of tree can be said to growth ring proportions that aren't determined just by their rate of growth?
What counterpart of earlywood are scientists still trying to explain the formation of?
While there is some relationship between where and how a tree grows, what can't anyone formulate to govern it?
What kind of woods always have very clearly marked seasonal growth?
What size pores form early in ring-porous woods' growing season?
When does the denser tissue the new pores abut come from?
Ring-porous hardwoods have a clear relationship between their properties and what other factor?
Is harder, heavier wood indicated by narrower or wider growth rings?
What kind of wood with a name that starts with "H" is a ring-porous hardwood?
If the growth rings are wider, was the growth of the tree slower or more rapid?
What is the only kind of wood that will definitely be harder and stronger when it grows faster?
Which specific type of wood within ring-porous woods have more fibers to make it strong?
When there is less latewood, what is diminishing?
Does slow or rapid growth make relatively porous, light wood?
What kind of oak has just 6-10% volume of large vessels in the log?
What kind of fibers are in the latewood of good oak, making it very firm?
What term is sometimes used for wood with wide rings?
Do young trees grow more quickly in open stands or in a closed forest?
What property is important to manufacturers who use "second-growth" hardwood?
What specific kind of "second-growth" hardwood is often used to make handles and spokes? 
What organization tested hickory to find out about its properties?
What kind of wood often has ring divisions that can't even be seen by looking at it?
In diffuse-porous woods, if the demarcation between rings is obvious, what type of difference within the ring might not be?
What adjective describes how our eyes function without a tool like a microscope to help?
What kind of wood has all similarly sized vessels?
What rate of growth in a tree will make the wood from it stronger than trees that grow very slowly or very quickly?
The capability of diffuse-porous woods to carry what substance is spread out in the growth ring?
What division of trees are diffuse-porous woods more similar in growth rate to than ring-porous woods?
Does uniformity of the texture and grain of wood usually result from much or little contrast between earlywood and latewood?
What's another term used for "conifer" wood?
What type of plants produce material that is referred to as "wood" even though it is technically not?
What monocot plant produces "wood" by the same name that's often used for flooring and veneer?
While we call bamboo "wood," what botanical family does it belong to?
Along with bamboo, what's the other monocot that's a major source of so-called "wood"?
Which property of wood reveals the most about its quality?
In addition to lumber strength, what important indicator of wood's quality can be determined using specific gravity?
What measurement is expressed in mass per unit substance?
When wood dries and shrinks, what happens to its density?
When wood is described as "green," what does "green" mean?
What should be anticipated because of the many factors that influence wood's density?
What specific type of growth has an effect on the density of wood?
Which part of a tree can have vertical or horizontal variation in its specific gravity?
Variation in what measurement is sometimes greater within one tree than from one tree to another?
What tiny object's source plays a role in determining wood density?
What term do we use for the wood that comes from pine trees?
What kind of wood does an oak tree have?
Is balsa a softwood or a hardwood?
What's an example of a softwood that isn't "soft," and is actually harder than a lot of hardwoods?
What's the scientific name for trees like the oak with broad leaves?
What kind of relationship exists between a tree's properties and its wood's properties?
What property of wood varies according to species?
What property of wood has a correlation to its density?
Is mahogany a hardwood or a softwood?
What hobby is balsa wood often used for?
What approximate percentage of carbon does wood have?
What element makes up about 6% of the chemical composition of wood?
About what percentage of wood is composed of nitrogen?
Which element in wood composes about 42% of its weight?
What element joins potassium, calcium, manganese, iron, and sodium to make a combined 1% of the chemical composition of wood?
What component of wood determines whether it is hardwood or softwood?
Which wood has lignin that comes primarily from one type of alcohol?
Which type of alcohol mainly becomes softwood lignin?
In addition to coniferyl alcohol, what other alcohol is in hardwood lignin?
Which kind of wood contains lignin derived from two main alcohol sources?
What's the name for the low molecular weight organic compounds in wood?
Along with fatty acids, what kind of acids are in the extractives in wood?
Wood extractives include resin and fatty acids, terpenes, and what other component?
What do conifers use rosin to protect themselves from?
Along with tall oil and rosin, what commercial product do we get from wood's extractives?
What type of wood is preferred as fuel?
What type of wood burns quickly and makes more smoke than hardwood?
What type of areas use more wood for fuel?
What benefit besides the cozy atmosphere would a wood-burning fireplace add to a home?
What wood is decay-resistant when wet?
What plumbing component was once made out of elm?
Until the late 19th century, what vessels were almost always wooden?
What significant purpose has wood been used for as long as humans have built shelters?
Other than boats, what do people often build with wood?
What term is used in North America for wood used in construction?
Outside of North America, if someone said "lumber," to what would they be referring?
What do people outside of North America call the sawn boards used for building?
What was the preferred wood for construction in Medieval Europe?
For modern solid wood doors, what wood is often used in addition to small-knotted pine or poplar?
What type of construction is often used now to build homes in much of the world?
In addition to residential applications, what type of buildings often have engineered wood components?
Along with decorative components, what type of building materials can be engineered from wood?
What industry benefits greatly from engineered wood products?
What might wood be used for in a building made from brick or other materials?
What crucial part of a house is often constructed from wood?
Wood might be used to construct what exterior component of a building?
Inside a building, what wooden things might you open to enter or leave rooms?
What holds together an engineered wood product?
Engineered wood products are often used in construction, but what other major type of applications do they have?
What requirements do engineered wood products meet?
What efficient type of unit does the process of "engineering" wood result in?
Wood fibers from wood strands, lumber, and what other source can be glued together to make larger units?
What category do composite panels, strand board, and plywood all fit into?
What's another word for glued laminated timber?
What does LVL stand for?
If current building trends continue, what material will be replaced by particle and fiber board?
About how many cubic meters of wood was used in 1991 to make products like glulam, LVL, and structural composite lumber?
What material results from chemically breaking down wood?
What's the abbreviation for medium-density fiberboard?
How is wood broken down into chips and fibers?
What type of flooring can be made from wood derivatives?
What widely-used product is almost always made of wood fibers?
What category of products usually made from wood includes chairs?
What wooden utensil could you stir a pot of soup with?
Which parts of tools are sometimes made out of wood?
What pieces of furniture that most people use every night can be made out of wood?
What special wooden utensils do many people use to eat Chinese takeout?
What could we monitor electronically that could help inform new methods of wood protection?
Development in the wood manufacturing industry include using lignin to make what substance?
Instead of rubber, what important part of a car might someday be replaced by components of wood?
What material might be developed from wood that could make clothes that resist wear and tear?
In addition to extracting components from wood, what might scientist do by adding components, for example, to make innovative products?
Along with sculptures, what type of art have people been making out of wood for centuries?
What did indigenous people in North America make out of the trunks of conifers?
What type of tree was often used for totem poles?
What city in Scotland would you visit to see the Millennium clock tower?
What museum exhibits the Millennium clock tower?
What kind of wood are clarinet bodies made from?
What expensive wood with a prized color is used to make the backs of violins?
What category of wood is often used for musical instruments?
What's the common name for Picea abies?
Along with resonance, what property of an instrument will be affected by the wood used to make it?
What type of instruments with a misleading name aren't always made completely out of wood?
What are woodwind instrument's reeds often made out of?
Is the Arundo donax a monocot or dicot cane plant?
What objects do musicians have to have in order to play woodwind instruments?
What wood is usually used for cricket bats?
Ash and hickory are often used for baseball bats to comply with the rules of what organization?
What is commonly used for the basketball courts the NBA plays on?
What wood has recently started being used to make baseball bats in addition to hickory and ash?
Compared to hickory and ash, what adjective might be used for a maple baseball bat?
What pieces of equipment for shooting arrows used to be wooden?
Which pieces of ice hockey equipment were once made out of wood?
When the golf club called the "wood" was actually made out of it, what type of wood was used?
What is the golf club known as the "wood" usually made out of today?
What other modern material has joined composites, carbon fiber, titanium, and aluminum to replace wood in the manufacture of sporting equipment?
What component of wood is degraded by bacteria that scientists are still trying to learn about?
What type of bacteria are present in Xylophaga?
What type of wood is it possible the bacteria in Xylophaga help break down?
How long was the wood submerged in water in the study that discovered the types of bacteria in it?
What bacteria starting with the letter "F" were found in wood after it was underwater for more than a year?
How long ago were rock paintings found in Somalia created?
Where are the most notable rock paintings located?
Along with animals, what is depicted on the rock paintings of Laas Geel?
Where does a notable rock painting of a man on horseback exist?
In what geographic part of Somalia are these rock paintings commonly found?
Along with the Hargesian culture, what culture was present in Somalia in the Stone age?
What undeciphered writings were found alongside the rock paintings?
During what period did the Doian culture thrive?
In what country is the oldest evidence of ceremonial burial in the Horn of Africa located?
From what millennium do the oldest cemeteries in the Horn of Africa date?
At what site were important paleolithic stone tools found?
In what geographic part of Somalia were important paleolithic stone tools found?
What economic activity in the Horn of Africa did the ancient Somalis connect to the rest of the world?
Along with myrrh and spices, what important luxury did ancient Somali merchants provide?
Along with the ancient Phoenicians, Egyptians and Babylonians, what ancient people regarded myrrh as a luxury?
What ancient land was connected to the modern Somali people?
What nation did the Land of Put have a close relationship with?
Who was a Queen of Egypt during the time when Punt and Egypt were close?
Along with houses of dressed stone, what ancient architecture may have been influenced by Egypt?
Near what headland was Mosylon located?
Along with Mosylon, Malao, Nikon, Sarapion, Opone and Essina, what city-state flourished in ancient Somalia?
Along with the Parthians and Axumites, who were the commercial competitors of the ancient Somalis?
What trade did the ancient Somalis and others compete for?
What body of water separated Somalia from the land where Islam was born?
In what location was Islam born?
What civilization was Mogadishu a part of?
What was another name for Mogadishu?
The trade of what luxury in East Africa was once centered on Mogadishu?
What dynasty ruled the Sultanate of Ifat?
What was the capital of the Sultanate of Ifat?
Along with parts of Ethiopia and Somalia, in what modern-day country was the Sultanate of Ifat located?
According to al-Umari, how many cavalry did the Sultanate of Ifat have?
Near what body of water did al-Umari say Ifat was located?
What Somali polity of the Middle Ages was known for its fortresses?
What state employed Abmad ibn Ibrahim al-Ghazi?
What was another name by which Abmad ibn Ibrahim al-Ghazi was known?
What state did Adal conquer?
What Somali leader received tribute from the Omani empire?
What states supported the Dervish State?
In what year did the British defeat the Dervishes?
What was the capital of the Dervish State?
In what year did Fascist Italy achieve full control of Somalia?
In what year did the Italian occupation of Somalia end?
Along with the Haud, what area of Somalia was given to Ethiopia by the British?
In what year did the British give the Haud to Ethiopia?
The Ogaden was given to Ethiopia on the basis of a treaty signed by the British with what Ethiopian leader?
In what year did Britain try to purchase Somali lands from Ethiopia?
What people constituted almost the entire population of the Northern Frontier District?
On what date did British Somaliland gain independence?
What was British Somaliland known as upon achieving independence?
What state formed the Somali Republic with British Somaliland?
On what date did the former British Somaliland and Italian Somaliland unite?
Who was the first President of the Somali Republic?
Along with Jama Korshel, who led the Supreme Revolutionary Council?
What was Jama Korshel's title?
What was the military rank of Salaad Gabeyre Kediye?
What name did the Supreme Revolutionary Council give to Somalia?
Along with dissolving the Supreme Court and parliament, what action did the Supreme Revolutionary Council take?
What did the new government nationalize along with land?
What international body did the new government join?
In what year did the new government enter the Arab League?
What organization would the Organization of African Unity later become?
What rate did the new government's programs significantly increase?
Along with Kenya, Djibouti and Somalia, in what Horn of Africa country do Somali people live?
In what geographic portion of Kenya can Somali people be found?
What is the name of the idea that believes all ethnic Somalis should live in the same country?
Along with the Soviet Union, what country supported Ethiopia in its war against Somalia?
What was the name of the conflict between Somalia and the Soviet Union, Cuba and Ethiopia?
In what year did Sanchez publish his study on Somali ethnicity?
What language group speakers are ethnic Somalis closely related to?
What haplogroup is present in a significant number of Somalis?
Based on the presence of the M78 subclade, where do some researchers think Somalis originated?
What percentage of Somali males had DNA containing the M78 subclade of E1b1b?
When did Richards publish his mtDNA research?
Along with Egyptians, Algerians and Somalis, what people commonly possess the M1 haplogroup?
On what continent is the M1 haplogroup believed to have originated?
Who authored an mtDNA study in 2005?
What family of languages is the M1 haplogroup associated with?
When did Hodgson publish his DNA study?
According to Hodgson, what ancestral people spread the Afro-Asiatic languages?
According to Hodgson, what people is mostly descended from Ethio-Somalis?
According to Hodgson, how long ago did the Ethio-Somalis diverge from other non-African ancestries?
According to Hodgson, where did the Ethio-Somalis originate?
In what year did Mahamoud publish his research?
In what geographic part of Somalia is Zeila located?
From whom were the early Muslims fleeing?
Along with the Shafi'i, to what sect of Islam do most Somalis belong?
What is the majority religion in Somalia?
A small minority of Somalis belong to what branch of Islam?
What is another name for a Qur'anic school?
What percentage of students at Qur'anic schools are female?
What government body regulates Qur'anic education?
Along with Minneapolis, London and Birmingham, what city contains a notable population of Somalis?
What is the name of the mosque under construction in Minneapolis?
Along with floods, what natural disaster often spurs Islamic fundraising?
Along with universities, the construction of what educational buildings are sometimes the focus of Islamic fundraising?
Along with the Horn of Africa, what is a notable location where Somali Islamic figures have been influential?
What is a basic social unit of Somali society?
In what geographical portion of Somalia is the tomb of the founder of the Dir clan located?
Of what clan is the Abgaal a sub-clan?
What practice is often used to bind different clans together?
According to a recent study, how many men of the Dhulbahante clan married women from the Hawiye clan?
According to a recent study, how many Dhulbahante men married women of a different Dhulbahante sub-clan?
To what clan family do the Ogaden belong?
What percentage of Dhulbahante men married women of the Majerteen or Ogaden?
What law gave Somali husbands and wives equal rights over personal property?
What was the official name of the country in which the 1975 Somali Family Law was passed?
In addition to giving spouses equal rights over their personal property during marriage, what did the Somali Family Law give them?
What is the biggest ethnic group in Somalia?
What percentage of Somalians are ethnic Somalis?
During what century did the nomad lifestyle decline among Somalis?
Why do many Somalis live in South Asia and Europe?
Along with Djibouti and Ethiopia, in what African country outside Somalia can Somalis be found?
What led to an increase in the number of Somalis leaving the country?
Along with the Middle East and North America, to what continent did the Somali diaspora go in the 1990s?
Along with Ottawa, Calgary, Edmonton, Montreal, Winnipeg, Hamilton and Vancouver, what Canadian city has a significant Somali population?
As of 2006, where did Somalis rank in terms of population by ethnicity in Canada?
About how many Somalis live in the UK?
What percentage of Somalis living in Britain reside in London?
As of 2014, how many Somalis lived in Sweden?
In 2014, how many Somalis resided in Norway?
How many Somalis lived in Finland as of 2014?
What country is Cedar Rapids located in?
Along with Saint Paul, what city constitutes the Twin Cities?
About how many Somalis moved to Minnesota ten years ago?
What area of Minneapolis contains a notable number of Somalis?
What is hawala?
What sort of meat is sold in Somali businesses in Minneapolis?
Near what city in Sudan do many Somalis reside?
In what geographical portion of Sudan do some Somalis live?
Along with businesspeople, what sort of Somalis live in Sudan?
In what Somali enclave in Kenya have Somalis invested over $1.5 billion?
In what province of South Africa do Somalis congregate?
What language family does the Somali language belong to?
What branch of the Afro-Asiatic language family does the Somali language belong to?
Along with Saho, what language is closely related to Somali?
Among the Cushitic languages, which is the most well-documented?
Before what year did studies on the Somali language exist?
About how many people in Somalia speak Somali?
In millions, about how many global Somali speakers are there?
Along with Greater Somalia ethnic Somalis, who speaks Somali?
Along with Northern and Maay, what is the third main group of Somali dialects?
What dialect is Standard Somali based on?
What is another name for Benaadir?
What dialect is spoken on Mogadishu?
In what geographic part of Somalia do the Rahanweyn live?
What is the most frequently used writing script for the Somali language?
Who introduced the Somali alphabet?
In what month and year was the Somali alphabet introduced?
Who created the Somali alphabet?
Who invented the Osmanya script?
Other than Somali, what is an official language of Somalia?
To what language family does Arabic belong?
In what neighboring country is Arabic also an official language?
What organization do both Djibouti and Somalia belong to?
For how long has Somalia had connections to the Arab world?
Civilizations from what geographic part of Africa influenced Somali culture?
Civilizations from what geographic part of Asia influenced Somali culture?
What Asian country notable influenced Somali culture?
Along with Northeast Africa, Southeast Asia and India, what locale had a significant influence on Somali culture?
Somali food contains influences from what region?
Along with textiles, wood carving and pottery, what ancient cultural activity still dominates Somalia today?
Who called Somalia a "Nation of Bards"?
Of what nationality is the person who called Somalia a "Nation of Bards"?
What is the profession of the individual who referred to Somalia as a "Nation of Bards"?
What is a notable game that is played in Somalia?
Along with sport, games, literature, dress and festivals, what is a notable Somali cultural tradition?
What scale is used by most Somali songs?
How many notes are in a hepatonic scale?
What is an exaple of a hepatonic scale?
Along with Arabia and Ethiopia, what land has songs that sound similar to those of Somalia?
What does midho mean in English?
In what decade were the first Somali feature films made?
In what year was the SFA founded?
Who was the representative of the Somali Film Agency in Rome?
What are riwaaydo?
What was the name of Said Salah Ahmed's first feature?
What is a notable characteristic of Somali art?
Along with wood carving, architecture and pottery, what is a notable Somali artistic tradition?
In what geographic region of Somalia are ancient rock paintings located?
What animals are depicted on the Mogadishan canopies?
In what area of Somalia can one find the tombs decorated with plants?
What do Somali women wear on their feet during Eid?
Along with triangular shapes, what are common henna designs in Somalia?
What do Somali women traditionally put around their eyes?
From what ancient region did kuul application come?
What activity is often held before Somali weddings?
What sport do Somalis most enjoy?
What is the name of the Somali national football team?
In what year did the Ocean Stars first compete in the Olympics?
Along with Liban Abdi, Ayub Daud and Abdisalam Ibrahim, who is a notable Somali football player?
Along with the Somalia Cup, what is an important Somali football competition?
Who came in fourth in the 2013 Open World Taekwondo Challenge Cup?
What medal did Faisal Jeylani Aweys win in the 2013 Open World Taekwondo Challenge Cup?
Where did the 2013 Open World Taekwondo Challenge Cup take place?
Along with Thai Boxing, in what has Mohamed Jama won a European title?
What is a koofiyad?
What do Somali men wear when they aren't wearing Western clothing?
Where is the macawis worn?
What piece of clothing is the macawis similar to?
Aside from the koofiyad, what do Somali men wear on their head?
What is the jellabiya?
Along with jellabiyad, what is the jellabiya called in Somali?
In what region do men commonly wear the jellabiya?
What is the regular garment of Somali women?
What is the guntiino normally made from?
What is the usual formal attire for Somali women?
Along with silk, saree fabric or chiffon, what might the dirac be made out of?
What is the underskirt of the dirac called?
What is the name of the headscarf worn by married women?
What is the name of the shawl that married women wear on their upper bodies?
Along with abaya, what is a traditional Arab garment sometimes worn by Somali women?
What is the jewelry worn by Somali women commonly made from?
Along with anklets, what pieces of jewelry are traditionally worn by Somali women?
What type of jewelry do Somali women wear at their weddings?
In what year was the Somali flag invented?
Who devised the Somali flag?
What was Mohammed Awale Liban by profession?
What is the star at the center of the Somali flag called?
How many points does the Star of Unity have?
What is the one culinary tradition that is present among all Somali regional cuisines?
What type of meat is never present in halal dishes?
What beverage is not halal?
Along with alcohol, what liquid is never present in halal food?
What is the English word for qado?
What is bariis in English?
What is the most popular variety of bariis?
When is the latest a Somali might eat dinner during Ramadan?
After what event during Ramadan is dinner served?
What is another term for xalwo?
Along with wedding receptions, when is xalwo often consumed?
What do the Somalis call frankincense?
What is the English word for cunnsi?
What do the Somalis call incense burners?
When did Somalis begin to render their language using the Latin alphabet?
Who is the most well-known modern Somali writer?
In what year did Nuruddin Farah win the Neustadt International Prize for Literature?
Who wrote Ignorance is the enemy of love?
Who won the 2010 Betty Trask Prize?
What is the Somali system of customary law?
In what century did the Xeer system begin?
In what region did the Xeer system develop?
What fact about Somali legal terms implies that Xeer developed locally?
In the Xeer system, what are judges called?
What does xeer boggeyaal mean in English?
What does the Xeer system call attorneys?
By what term are witnesses known in the Xeer system?
What does the Xeer system call cops?
Along with Somalo-Islamic architecture, what influences modern Somali architecture?
Along with the early modern and ancient, during what period did Somali architecture exist?
What material was used to make Somali cities?
What do Somalis call their ancient pyramids?
What were taalo used for?
What were ancient Somali houses made out of?
Ancient Somali houses were similar to houses in what country?
What is a notable stone wall built in ancient Somalia?
During what period was the Muslim faith introduced to Somalia?
Along with Arabian influences, where did architectural influences come from in the medieval period?
In the medieval period, what buildings were notably built atop older ruins?
Along with sundried bricks and coral stone, what construction material was widely used after the introduction of Islam?
Before Islam was introduced, what was a common building material in Somalia?
What is the academic study of the Somali people called?
Along with sociology, linguistics, historiography and archaeology, what field is part of Somali Studies?
Along with chronicles and records, what indigenous sources are used in Somali Studies?
What is the name of the annual gathering of Somali Studies scholars?
When did the International Congress of Somali Studies begin?
In what century did the Middle Ages begin?
What century saw the end of the Middle Ages?
What event marked the beginning of the Middle Ages?
Along with the Renaissance, what era occurred at the end of the Middle Ages?
What is the first period of the three that Western history is traditionally divided into?
What year marked the beginning of the High Middle Ages?
What event led to larger crop yields in the High Middle Ages?
What was the name of the economic system that organized peasants into villages owing labor and rent to nobles?
What was the name of the political system that gave rents to knights in return for military service?
In what year did the Crusades begin?
When did the Black Death end?
In what period of the Middle Ages did the Black Death occur?
What portion of the European population died in the Black Death?
What era occurred after the Late Middle Ages?
Along with controversy and schism, what upset the peace of the Church during the Late Middle Ages?
Along with Antiquity and the Middle Ages, what is the other major division of European history?
How many major periods is European history divided into?
What is another name for Antiquity?
Along with the Six Ages, what other scheme did writers in the Middle Ages use to divide history?
What writer referred to the Christian period as new?
Who wrote the History of the Florentine People?
When was the History of the Florentine People published?
Who first divided history into the ancient, medieval and modern periods?
What date is usually given as the beginning of the Middle Ages?
Who was the first writer to date the Middle Ages from 476?
When is the Middle Ages generally considered to have ended?
In what year did the Turks conquer Constantinople?
When did Ferdinand II die?
In what century did the Roman Empire achieve its greatest extent?
In what century did the revival of Persia occur under the Sassanids?
How much did the size of the Roman army increase in the 3rd century?
What did the need for increased revenue to pay for the Roman army lead to an increase in?
What is another term for the Roman landowning class?
When did Aspar die?
What year saw the death of Gundobad?
What notable Roman figure died in 408?
The loss of what led to the differentiation between the Western Roman Empire and the new kingdoms?
Rather than taxes, what did the new kingdoms use to support their armies?
People of what ethnicity settled in the Balkan Peninsula?
In what geographic region did most of the invaders settle in Gaul?
What is the collective name for languages derived from Latin?
What language was spoken in the Byzantine Empire?
What languages were spoken by the Slavs?
What author would Jerome rather read than the Bible?
In what year did Jerome die?
In what century did Gregory of Tours live?
Along with art, how was religious instruction commonly received in the late 6th century?
When was the death of Sidonius Apollinaris?
What was the focus of aristocratic culture during this period?
Along with gold, what luxury was present on the clothes of the elite?
Along with loyalty and honor, what virtue did the elite value?
In what society did women have status as abbesses?
In what country did Gregory of Tours live?
How many people might live in a large peasant settlement?
What was a way in which a free peasant might become an aristocrat?
In what century did written records of peasant life begin to appear?
Along with aristocratic writers, where do contemporary written descriptions of peasants come from?
What field produces most of the finding about peasants from this era?
About how many people lived in Rome at the end of the 500s?
What new use was found for Roman temples?
What group was notably persecuted after the Roman Empire converted to Christianity?
In what year did the Battle of Poitiers take place?
What Islamic dynasty followed the Umayyad?
What was the capital of the Abbasid state?
What dynasty ruled Egypt in this period?
What group conquered southern France from Muslim forces?
Along with Naples, what city still traded African goods in the 7th century?
What event led to African goods no longer being traded in Western Europe by the end of the 7th century?
What non-local goods have archaeologists typically found in Britain of this era?
During what century did gold coinage cease?
Coinage from what metal replaced gold coinage?
What was the Anglo-Saxon silver coin called?
What was another name for the denarius?
In what part of Europe were gold coins still minted?
What religious lifestyle arose in the Early Middle Ages?
Who was the pioneer of cenobitism?
Who composed the Benedictine Rule?
From what part of England did Bede come?
What was the title of the leader of a monastery?
Along with Austrasia and Neustria, what kingdom was originally part of the Frankish kingdom?
What dynasty ruled Neustria?
From whom did the rulers of the Merovingian dynasty trace their ancestry?
What was the title of Pippin?
What leader was victorious at the Battle of Poitiers?
On what date did Charlemagne assume the imperial title?
Of what class were most inhabitants of the Carolingian Empire?
About how many counts existed in the Carolingian Empire?
In what settlements did most inhabitants of the Carolingian Empire live?
Along with the British Isles, with what land did the Carolingians trade?
When were the Constantinian basilicas built?
In what part of the church was the monumental entrance typically placed?
What type of architecture did the Carolingian Empire bring back into use?
What is a notable architectural feature of the basilica?
How is the transept positioned in relation to the nave?
The importance of what military arm increased during the Carolingian era?
What region raised a militia army called the fyrd?
What Roman weapon began to be used again in the Early Middle Ages?
Along with the horseshoe, what invention important for cavalry emerged in this period?
Along with light cavalry, what military arm declined in importance during the Early Middle Ages?
What was the approximate population of Europe in 1347?
About how many millions of people lived in Europe in the year 1000?
During the High Middle Ages, what percentage of the European population consisted of rural peasants?
Along with manors, where did peasants in the High Middle Ages often live?
What was the term for the practice of giving incentives to peasants to cultivate new lands?
In what centuries did fiefs become hereditary?
In this period, who usually inherited fiefs?
What were castles originally built out of?
What group constituted the lowest nobility?
In what century were castles first built?
What group constituted the clergy along with the regular clergy?
What type of clergy were monks?
What percentage of the European population consisted of monks?
What social class did many members of the regular clergy come from?
From what class were many parish priests?
Along with gardening, animal husbandry and child-care, what work did medieval peasant women do?
Along with spinning, what income-producing work did peasant women engage in?
What did peasant women do when it was time for the harvest?
What role did women fill in the Church?
What sea were the Hanseatic cities located on?
Along with Venice and Pisa, what was a notable Italian maritime republic?
Who wrote The Travels of Marco Polo?
What accounting method was utilized in this period?
In what region was gold coinage first reintroduced?
What was the purpose of the Third Crusade?
Who took Jerusalem in 1187?
In what year did the Fourth Crusade occur?
What state was founded following the Fourth Crusade?
After 1291, where did the titular King of Jerusalem reside?
Along with the Baltic and Spain, in what area were crusades called?
Where was the Teutonic Order headquartered in 1309?
What military order was founded as a result of the Northern Crusades?
In what century did the Northern Crusades begin?
What century saw the end of the Northern Crusades?
What group opposed the nominalists on the subject of universals?
What ancient philosopher was rediscovered, leading to a revival of philosophy?
When did Peter Lombard die?
What was the name of the school of thought that combined theology and philosophy?
Who authored the Summa Theologica?
What does chansons de geste mean in English?
Along with The Song of Ronald, what is a notable chanson de geste?
Who wrote Historia Regum Britanniae?
What legendary figure was featured in the Historia Regum Britanniae?
Who was the subject of Gesta Friderici Imperatoris?
What invention led to advances in mathematics?
What influential astronomy text did Ptomely author?
In what language was Almagest originally written?
In what city was a medical school located that was notably influenced by Islamic medicine?
Into what language was Almagest translated in the 12th century?
Along with the astrolabe, windmill and distilled spirits, what was a notable technological advancement of the 12th and 13th centuries?
What was invented in approximately 1286?
Near what city were concave spectacles invented?
What fraction of land was under cultivation using the two-field system?
What fraction of land was under cultivate using the three-field system?
What invention allowed horses rather than oxen to be used to plow?
What invention led to an increase in efficiency in the farming of heavy soils?
In addition to requiring less pasture, what distinguishes horses from oxen?
Along with bridges, tithe barns and town halls, what notable new structures were built during this period?
What method, derived from the Romans, was traditionally used to build ships?
What new shipbuilding method was invented in this period?
What type of rudder was introduced during this period?
What type of sails were first used during this era?
In what century did Europeans become aware of gunpowder?
Who was recorded as using gunpowder in 1304?
Against whom was gunpowder used in 1304?
In what decade were siege cannon known to have been used?
What led to the increased use of armor in the 12th century?
In what century did the Gothic style first flourish?
In what century did the Gothic style cease to be used?
Along with Reims, where is a notable Gothic cathedral in France located?
What is a notable English Gothic cathedral?
Among which builders was the Gothic style first used?
Who noted that 14th century monks bought books in shops?
What form of art had the most prestige in this era?
When did Giotto die?
What were many pieces of secular art carved from in this period?
Along with Duccio, what Italian artist was a noted innovator in this period?
What monastic order did Bernard of Clairvaux belong to?
When did Bernard of Clairvaux die?
Along with Bari, what was a notable new pilgrimage site in this era?
Along with Rome and Jerusalem, what traditional pilgrimage site saw a greater number of visitors in the High Middle Ages?
Along with the Cistercians, what new monastic order was founded in the High Middle Ages?
When did the Black Death start?
How many million people died from the Black Death?
What popular uprising occurred in France during this period?
What English popular revolt took place during this period?
What Italian city experienced a popular revolt?
By the end of this period, about what percentage of Western Europeans were serfs?
At serfdom's greatest extent, what percentage of Western Europeans were serfs?
In what part of Europe did serfdom increase in this period?
Instead of work, how did most Western European peasants pay their landlords in this period?
What noble interest did city-dwellers start to mimic in this period?
In what year were the Jews expelled from England?
What year saw the expulsion of the French Jewish community?
Along with Hungary, where did many expelled French Jews relocate to?
In what year were Jews kicked out of Spain?
Along with Turkey, France and Italy, where did expelled Spanish Jews travel to?
Along with Aragon and Castile, what Christian kingdom was present on the Iberian Peninsula?
Why did kings increase the tax rate during this period?
What English representative body provided consent for royal taxation?
What French body was similar in purpose to the English Parliament?
What social class was harmed by the lengthy wars of this era?
Emperors from what dynasty recaptured Constantinople in 1261?
Along with the Second Bulgarian Empire and the Kingdom of Serbia, what polity controlled the former Byzantine Balkan lands?
What tribe of Turks emerged in 13th century Anatolia?
In what year did Bulgaria become a vassal of the Ottomans?
Who was defeated at the Battle of Kosovo?
What school of thought was Duns Scotus opposed to?
Before Roman law, what were areas of jurisprudence traditionally decided by?
What country did not see the increasing influence of Roman law?
Along with Castile and Poland, what country developed a law code in the Later Middle Ages?
What Platonic idea lost influence as a result of the work of Ockham and Duns Scotus?
Explorers in the employ of what nation discovered the Azores?
What leader sponsored the expedition that discovered Cape Verde?
What Portuguese explorer visited India in 1498?
What did Christopher Columbus discover in 1492?
What English monarch financed John Cabot?
Along with light cavalry, what military arm was used with increasing frequency in the Late Middle Ages?
What troops were uniquely successful in English service?
What influenced the increasing development of armor?
What weapons were notably employed by the Swiss infantry?
Along with crossbows, what was plate armor designed to defend against?
What was replaced by the spinning wheel?
What invention replaced laces on clothing?
What new type of windmill was invented in this period?
In what country did the blast furnace first appear?
Where did patent law originate?
Who carved the Pulpit in Sant'Andrea?
Along with being carved, how were altarpieces often decorated in this period?
When did Rogier van der Weyden die?
Of what nationality was Jan van Eyck?
What does incunabula refer to?
Along with the Renaissance, during what period were the Middle Ages disparaged?
What era did Renaissance scholars negatively compare the Middle Ages to?
How did scholars of the Enlightenment see the Middle Ages?
What did Enlightenment scholars consider to be inferior to reason?
What is Edward Grant a historian of?
Who argued that scholars in the Middle Ages were rarely coerced by the Church?
According to Grant, the medieval use of reason was the forerunner the revolutionary rationalism of what century?
During what century was it first proposed that people in the Middle Ages thought the Earth was flat?
Along with autopsies, what is it erroneously believed that the medieval Church forbade?
According to a misconception, what did the rise of Christianity destroy?
According to another misconception, what field of study was the medieval Church opposed to?
Along with Lindberg, who is a notable scholar of the Middle Ages?
What is phonology a branch of?
What kind of systems are the traditional focus of phonology? 
The study of sign language is a part of what?
What part of a language can phonology as a word also refer to?
What is another term for phonological system?
Aside from syntax and the phonological system, what else comprises a language?
What sort of language system is phonology?
What branch of linguistics is phonology distinguished from?
What kind of linguistics is phonetics considered to be a part of?
Phonology is generally considered a part of the theoretical side of what discipline?
When was the phonome's modern concept developed?
What subfield of modern phonology other than phsycholinguistics crosses over with phonetics? 
Whose publications started the theory of Natural phonology?
According to Stampe what is phonology based on?
Aside from being active what other condition can the universal phonological processes exist in?
Who is the number two natural phonologist?  
Who was the founder of natural morphology?
Who founded autosegmental phonology?
When did John Goldsmith share his work?
What did Autosegmental phonology morph into?
When was Government phonology first seen?
What is responsible for differences in surface realizations according to Government phonology?
Jonathan Kaye is an important person in what form of phonology?
What followed government phonology?
Where is government phonology popular?
What theory is seen more in the US?
What is Evolutionary Phonology an integrated approach to?
What is combined to sound patterns by Evolutionary Phonology?
What sort of approach did Evolutionary Phonology take?
What type of language study involves trying to deduce underlying phonomes?
Aside from finding out what underlying phonemes are there what does the phonological study of a language try to find out about the language?
What kind of speaker data does studying a language phonologically involve examining? 
What kind of linguistics describes how factors of languages change in history?
With the passage of time what particular things phonemic in a language are known to change?
In the past sounds that now belong to separate phonemes were allophones of what kind of phoneme in English?
How do speech perception and articulation findings and insights affect previous and more traditional ideas?
How does interchanging allophones of the same pheneme render words?
What does splicing words affect?
What are assigned to phonemes by different linguists?
What part of a human does language processing?
The phonetical similarity of what thing causes disagreements between linguists?
When did theoretical linguists turn away traditional phoneme concepts?
On what level do theoretical linguists consider basic units?
What is a name for the basic morpheme unit?
What is the act of analyzing morphophones called?
What kind of linguists are leaving the old methods behind?
What do phonemes differentiate? 
Aside from phonemes what is studied by phonology?
The study of syllable structure is part of what discipline?
Under what topic is suprasegmentals studied?
Aside from bleeding what is an order of rules that define how pronunciation of a sound changes?
Phonotactics, phonological alternation and prosody are topics contained in what discipline?
Stress and intonation are studied under what topic?
Instead of being language-specific what kind of tools are the principles of phonological analysis designed to be?
What other types of language have the phonological analysis principles been applied to?
What are the principles of phonological analysis able to be applied separately from?
In sign languages what are not represented as instances of speech sounds?
In computer terms, what does CPU stand for?
What are the devices called that are from an external source?
What are two things that a computer always has?
What were analog computers originally used for?
During what war were computers first used for military applications?
In computer terms, what does PC stand for?
During what war were the first digital computers invented?
Computers in today's age are based on what that make them much faster than earlier computers?
How much more powerful are modern computers versus early computers?
When was the first known use of the word "computer"?
In which book, was the term "computer" first used?
Who was the author of the book, The Yong Mans Gleanings?
From the end of what century, did the word "computer" take its well known meaning of today?
The earliest device to help count was what?
Calculi during the Fertile Crescent refers to what?
What was the abacus first used for?
When was the Roman abacus first used?
Where was the Roman abacus first used?
In medieval Europe was was placed on a table to help count money?
A checkered cloth on a table was used in medieval Europe to help count what?
What is thought to be the first mechanical analog computer?
When was the Antikythera mechanism discovered?
Where was the Antikythera mechanism found in 1901?
Where is the Greek Island of Antikythera located between?
The Antikythera mechanism was thought to be the first computer according to whom?
The sector, a calculating instrument, was invented during what century?
When was the tide-predicting machine invented by Sir William Thomson invented?
Who invented the first tide-predicting machine in 1872?
What did Sir William Thomson's tide-predicting machine use to function?
What type of mechanisms did the differential analyzer use?
In 1876 who lobbied for the construction of the differential analyzers?
During what decade were mechanical differential analyzers developed?
In the 1920s, who was the person who developed mechanical differential analyzers?
Who invented the concept of a programmable computer?
Who is considered the "father of the computer"?
During what century was the first mechanical computer invented by Charles Babbage?
What year did Charles Babbage find out that An Analytical Engine was possible?
Who invented the first analog computer in the form of a tide-predicting machine?
When was the first analog computer in the form of a tide-predicting machine created?
Who created the idea of the differential analyzer in 1876?
James Thomson was the brother of what famous figure?
Where was the differential analyzer built by H.L. Hazen?
The differential analyzer by H.L. Hazen and Vannevar Bush was first being built in what year?
The torque amplifiers of the differential analyzer were created by whom?
By what decade were analog computing devices rendered obsolete?
A Universal Machine is known as what today?
What part of the US military developed an electromechanical analog computer to use on a submarine?
When did the US Navy invent an electromechanical computer to use on a submarine?
What type of math did the Torpedo Data computer use to fire a torpedo at a moving target?
Who created the relay computer, the Z2?
When did Konrad Zuse invent the Z2?
What is one of the first electromechanical relay computers?
Konrad Zuse was an engineer with what nationality?
Who built the first Colossus in 1943?
When was the Colossus sent to Bletchley Park?
Who achieved success at cracking secret German military communications during World War II?
Where did the British crack secret German military communications during World War II?
What was the first electronic digital programmable computer in the world?
How many vacuum tubes did the Colossus Mark I contain?
How many tubes did Colossus Mark II contain?
The US-buils ENIAC stands for what?
What was the first electronic programmable computer built in the United States?
How many times could it add or subtract a second?
What was the limit of its high speed memory?
ENIAC was constructed by whom?
Where did John Mauchly and J. Presper Eckert build the ENIAC?
When was ENIAC fully operational?
What was the nickname of the Manchester Small-Scale Experimental Machine?
What was the first stored-program computer in the world?
Where was the Manchester Small-Scale Experimental Machine built?
Who built the Manchester Small-Scale Experimental Machine?
When did the Manchester Small-Scale Experimental Machine run its first program?
What was the prototype for the Ferranti Mark 1?
What was the first available computer for the public?
When was the Ferranti Mark 1 built?
Where was the Ferranti Mark 1 sent to after it was developed?
When was the LEO 1 computer first operational?
When was the bipolar transistor created?
When did transistors start replacing vacuum tubes in computers?
At the University of Manchester, who oversaw the building of a computer using transistors instead of valves?
The first transistorised computer was operational in what year?
What did the machine use to generate its clock waveforms?
Who built the Harwell CADET?
In what year was the Harwell CADET built?
The integrated circuit of a computer was the idea of whom?
Where did Geoffrey W.A. Dummer work at?
Where created the first practical integrated circuits?
Where did Jack Kilby work at when he created the first IC?
When was the first functional IC demonstrated?
What was Kilby's IC made of?
Noyce's IC was made up of what material?
What was the name of the first single-chip microprocessor?
Who created the Intel 4004 microprocessor?
Computing resources that are created in cell phones are called what?
How many tablets were sold in 2Q 2013?
Billions of instructions per second are called what in computer terms?
When a computer goes back and repeats instructions of a program over until an internal condition is met is called what?
What allows a computer to perform repetitive tasks without human intervening?
Which computer is the Harvard architecture modeled after?
A computer that stores its program in memory and kept separate from the data is called what?
Programming languages are translated into machine code by what?
Programming languages are translated at run time by what?
An ARM architecture computer can be found in what?
Assembly language that is translated into machine language is done by what type of computer?
An example of a 4GL is what?
What is the pro of 4GL over a 3G language?
Another name for errors in programs are called what?
Bugs are usually the fault of whom or what?
Who was the developer of the first compier?
Who first coined the term "bugs"?
What type of creature shorted a relay of Grace Hopper's computer?
What type of computer of Grace Hopper's was shorted by a moth?
When was Grace Hopper's Hardvard Mark II shorted by a moth?
The ALU of a computer stands for what?
Input and output devices are known as what term?
Besides the ALU, input and output devices, what are the other two main components of a computer?
A circuit in a computer part represents what?
In positive logic representation a "1" represents when a circuit is what?
In positive logic representation a "0" represents when a circuit is what?
What are other names for a control unit for a computer?
Reading and interpreting from a control unit is called doing what?
A special memory cell of a CPU is called what?
A register of a CPU keeps track of what?
What is a component that all CPUs have?
In what part can the program counter be changed by calculations?
Instructions that change the program counter are called what?
Loops are defined as what?
In some CPU designs there is tinier computer called what?
A microsequencer can be found in what other computer component?
The CPU is an abbreviation for what?
What 3 parts make up the CPU?
CPUs that are constructed on a single integrated circuit are called what?
Since when have CPUs been constructed with a microprocessor?
Boolean logic consists of what?
Computers that have multiple ALUs are called what?
How many numbers can a cell of a computer's memory hold?
What is the responsibility of giving significance to what the memory sees as nothing but numbers?
What part of the computer has memory cells called registers?
What is the typical range of registers for a CPU?
What type of memory can a CPU only read from?
What type of memory can a CPU read and write from?
What type of memory is always kept and kept the same?
A progam inside the ROM of a PC is called what?
Software stored in ROM is called what usually?
RAM cache memory is slower than what?
Devices that give input or output to a computer are called what?
A mouse is what type of peripheral device?
A printer is what type of peripheral device?
Hard disk drives are what type of peripheral device?
A keyboard is what type of peripheral device?
In computer terms, when a computer is switching rapidly between running each program in turn, is called what?
A method of multitasking that takes a "slice" of time in turn is called what?
A signal that stops a compute executing instructions is called what?
Multitasking would seemingly cause a computer to run in what fashion?
What do a lot of programs spend time waiting for?
Multiprocessor and multi-core computers have multiples of what?
How many CPUs do supercomputers typically possess?
What is the name of a computer that has many CPUs and much more powerful?
What system of the U.S. military's was the first large-scale system to coordinate information between several locations?
When were computers first used to coordinate information between many locations?
Who funded the linking of computers around the US in the 1970s?
ARPA is now known as what?
The network spread to be known as what today?
All devices that can process information can qualify being called what?
Vacuum tubes in early computers were replaced by what?
Transistors are typically made up of what today?
A computer that is made using pool balls is known as what?
What type of computer can break encryption algorithms quickly?
By what method do quantum computers solve encryption algorithms quickly?
Computer programs that can learn are studied in what field?
Parts of a computer that are real objects are collectively known as what?
Parts of a computer that are not material objects are collectively known as what?
Software stored in hardware that cannot be changed easily is called what?
What type of "ware" is a BIOS ROM in a PC?
A BIOS chip is located where in a computer?
What type of software is stored in a BIOS chip?
Processing data from input and output devices is typically done by what?
Where is the data from input devices sent to after being processed?
Do some countries have negative feelings towards the word "black"?
What is "black people" a term for?
Do all regions perceive that term "black people" the same?
Do some cultures not use the term "Black people"?
Can the term "black people" have different meanings?
Do all societies use the term "black" the same?
What factors can affect the classification of "blackness"?
Are mixed race people classified as black?
How is the term "black" defined in the United States?
What made up Mauretania?
Who conquered parts of Mauretania?
During what period did Mauretania exist? 
Where were the people of the region noted? 
What is Mauri in English? 
Where was the Arab Slave Trade?
When were the Arab Invasions?
Where were numerous dark-skinned communities? 
When did these communities begin?
Who are they descendants of?
Where does Dr. Carlos Moore work?
How do Afro-multiracials identify in the 21st century?
Who was the Egyptian President?
What ethnicity was his mother?
What ethnicity was his father?
What color did he refer to himself as?
Who was enslaved more often?
What did the Qur'an permit?
What were female slaves used for?
What is the term for a pregnant slave?
What does umm walad mean?
When did the Arab apartheid intensify? 
Who felt persecuted due to the apartheid?
Where did these people live?
Who controlled the government?
Who was the Canadian Minister of Justice?
How did Alan Dershozitz describe the Sudan?
Who argeed with Dershowitz?
Where did Irwin Cotler live?
What did the colonization of South Africa result in?
What was a result of these marriages?
What class were Africans and Mixed Race children considered?
Who was included in the Coloured group?
What does apartheid mean?
What act determined what class a citizen belonged to?
What test was used to determine if someone was coloured or black?
How did the pencil test work?
Who administered the "Pencil Test"?
Who was featured in the movie "Skin"?
What year was the movie "Skin" made?
At was age was Sandra Laing expelled from school?
What is Sandra Laing's ethnicity? 
How many generations of European Ancestors does Sandra Laing have?
Who was oppressed and discriminated against?
What era did this discrimination take place?
Who were "Coloured" people above in the class system?
Where were the "black" areas?
What laws did they introduce to support blacks?
Who does the term "black" people include?
What did South Africa's Constitution Declare to be?
Who makes the "Coloured" people feel "Not black enough"?
Who is favored more under the affirmative action policies? 
Who declared Chinese South Africans as "Black People"?
What year did this ruling happen?
Why was this classification made?
What Chinese people did not qualify for benefits?
Why did some Chinese citizens qualify for benefits? 
What is another way "Coloureds" can be distinguished from "Blacks"?
What languages are most common?
What are less common languages spoken?
What types of names do "coloureds" have?
What type of names do "blacks" have?
How many sub-Saharan Black Africans were enslaved?
In what time frame were these people enslaved?
Who enslaved these people?
Why were women slaves more popular?
Who was assimilated into the Arab slave owner families?
How many people in Yemen have African lineage? 
How many people in Oman-Qatar have African lineage?
How many people in Saudi Arabia-United Arab Emirates have African lineage?
Genetic studies have found which gene in Arab communities?
Who is seeking minority status from the government?
Where would they be represented if minority status is granted?
How are Africans classified in the Arabian Peninsula?
What types of communities have been reported in Iraq?
Who gave information on how blacks were classified in the Arabian Peninsula?
How many East African and black people live in Israel?
What percent of Israel's population is black?
When did they migrate to Israel?
Where did they migrate from?
How many non-jewish African immigrants live in Israel?
What have these immigrants sought?
Where are most of them from?
What languages do they speak?
Where are the non jewish immigrants from?
Who are the Siddi?
Who did the Siddi descend from?
What does the word "Siddi" derive from?
Where does the term Sayyid come from?
When was the "black power" movement in Sindh?
Who were the first inhabitants of Southeast Asia?
Where do the Negritos reside currently?
What does Negrito mean?
What language does the term Negrito come from?
What term is interchangable with Negrito?
What does the term "Moors" refer to?
What descent of Muslims does "Moors" refer to?
In Medieval and early Modern Europe what ethnicity were lumped together?
Where did "Moors" migrate from?
What kind of term is "Moors"?
What are Afro-Spaniards?
Where do Afro-Spaniards come from?
Which Spanish colony do Afro-Spaniards reside?
How many Afro-Spaniards currently live in Spain?
In 2001 how many black people lived in the UK?
What percentage of the population was "Black Caribbean"?
What percentage of the population was "Black African"?
What percentage of the population was "Black other"?
When did Britain encourage immigration of workers?
When did African states become independent?
Who offered many Africans a chance to study in their country?
How many students moved from Africa to Russia?
Why did students move to Russia?
Who has been referred to as "black people"?
What was the original term related to?
Since when have Indigenous Australians been referred to as black?
What does the term relate to know in reference to Australians? 
Which race was growing faster after the First World War?
What did people fear in 1930?
What did this menace undermine?
Who noted this particular fear?
Who is Dr. Cecil Cook?
Who did the government want raised as white?
What was the goal of removing mixed races from their homes?
What were the mixed race individuals kept from doing?
What was this process referred to?
When did human rights for Aboriginal people begin to improve?
What year was constitutional discrimination ended?
What else was included in the 1967 referendum?
What term was embraced during this period?
Who said the Aboriginal people started to embrace their ancestry?
Who wrote "Living Black?
What year was Gilbert awarded for his efforts?
What was Living Black about?
What award did Gilbert refuse in 1998?
What was the award in 1998 for?
What did the improvements in quality of life increase?
What has the reappropriation of the word "black" done?
In what year were there several cases that helped to redefine Aboriginal or Torres Strait Islander?
What well known boxer was criticized for question someone's blackness?
Which Journalist was sued for publishing discriminatory comments?
Who described slaves as negars?
Where was John Rolfe?
Where were slaves shipped to from West Africa?
What was the name of the African burial ground in New York City?
What does "Begraafplaats van de Neger" mean?
When did "nigger" become a pejorative word?
What term replaced negro as mainstream?
What term followed "negro" and "colored"?
What movement sprouted this change in rhetoric? 
Who led the Civil Rights movement?
How did black people identify in early America?
What was not acknowledged by English colonists?
How vast was the backgrounds of the captives?
How was the new African American identity defined?
Which colonists recorded more complete identities of the West Africans?
What type of skin pigment does "Black" refer to?
In the United States the term "black people" is an indicator for?
Where does the US base family history of African Americans from?
How are people defined as "black" or "white"?
Why did the use of "African" become an issue?
Why did blacks fear to identify as African?
What year did Black leaders call for this change in language?
What group decided to keep the "African" in their name?
What terms did African Americans use instead?
Who argued for Americans to use the term "African American"?
What year did Jesse Jackson make this argument?
Why did Jackson want this term to be used?
Who also argued for the term "African American"?
Why did some argue that "black" was the better term?
What did the "one-drop" rule do?
When was the "one-drop" rule put into place?
When was racial definition more flexible?
What war changed the way the United States looked at race?
When did Virginia adopt The Principle of Partus Sequitur Ventrem?
How is blackness described in the US?
What defines "blackness"?
What is the opposite of "blackness"?
How does one "act white"?
In what regards can one "act white"?
Who described Bill Clinton as "Black"?
Who was offended by Clinton being referred to as black?
Who is Toni Morrison?
Why were people offended by this comment?
What horrible event was on-going during Clinton's term that made people upset?
Who is Obama possibly an ancestor of?
Who is John Punch?
When was Punch indentured?
Why was he indentured for life?
Why were his children free?
How many Africans were shipped to the US between 1492 to 1888?
How many were shipped to South America and the Caribbean?
How many slaves were imported by Brazil?
How many slaves were imported by the British Caribbean?
How is black identified in South America?
How are people in Brazil classified?
What country has a complex way of acknowledging race?
How does one determine ethnicity in Brazil?
How are people evaluated in Brazil?
What type of skin color has a better chance of a good life in Brazil?
What are poor whites considered in Brazil?
What are wealthy blacks considered in Brazil?
What does Preto mean?
How much of the Brazilian population identified as black in 2000?
How much identified as mixed race?
How much identified as white?
How much of the Brazilian population had connections to African ancestry in 2007?
What has Brazil avoided?
What is happened in the US that did not happen in Brazil when slavery ended?
How do the US and Brazil vary after slavery has ended?
Who is the Brazilian Prime Minister for racial equality? 
In the US, how much of what white people earn, do blacks earn?
In Brazil, how much less do blacks earn compared to whites?
What rule is Brazil accused of practicing?
What does the one drop rule do?
What other patterns are consistent with unequal living standards?
What race has a very low rate of holding public office in Brazil?
How much of the population of Salvador, Bahia is black or mixed race?
When did the US institute the Voting Rights Act?
When did New Orleans elect it's first black Mayor?
What large hurricane hit New Orleans?
What do critics claim people of color have?
What has the Brazilian media been accused of?
What ethnicity of actors are mainly used for shows in Brazil?
What is another word for "Light Skinned"
What would scholars like the term "Negro" to include?
What does this aim to stimulate?
What does the term "pardo" include?
What does caboclos mean?
The Times is based in what major British city?
What year did the initial incarnation of The Times start?
What was the original name of The Times before changing its name?
The Times and its sister paper The Sunday Times are published by what company?
The Times, owned by News UK, is itself owned by what major corporation?
The Times and its sister paper The Sunday Times are published by what company?
What year did The Times change its name from The Daily Universal Register?
What year did The Daily Universal Register initially start?
What year did The Times of India start?
What year did The Strait Times (Singapore) start?
What year did The New York Times start?
What year did the Irish Times start?
What year did the Cape Times (South Africa) start?
What major typeface font was started by The Times?
Who was the creator of typeface font used by The Times?
In November 2006, The Times changed its font to what new font typeface?
How long was The Times printed in broadsheet format?
In what year did The Times change its broadsheet format to a compact size?
Traditionally, what political spectrum did The Times support?
What party did The Times support in 2001 and 2005 general elections?
In March 2014, The Times had an average daily circulation of how many people?
The complete historical file of the digitized paper of The Times is online and published by what publisher?
What political party has the highest readership of The Times?
The Times was founded by what publisher who also was the editor?
The Times was known as what name before it became The Times?
What year was the very first publication of The Times?
The first publisher and editor of The Times when to prison for what crime when printed in his newspaper?
Before the newspaper changed its name to The Times, how many editions were printed?
In 1815, The Times had a circulation of how many people?
Beginning in 1814, The Times was printed using what new kind of press?
The Times used contributions from significant figures to build what?
Who developed the new press type in 1814 for The Times?
The Times was the first newspaper to send correspondents to what kind of event?
Who was The Times first correspondent with an army?
Which war did The Times first cover using correspondents?
What major event did The Times reluctantly support in the nineteenth century despite being initially opposed?
The Times greatly supported what bill in 1832 which reduced corruption and increased the electorate?
Many demonstrations in the nineteenth century convinced The Times editorial board to finally support the repeal of what laws?
During the American Civil War, what classes of people did The Times support?
The Times favoured which political side of the American Civil War?
What year did the founder's grandson succeed his father as editor of The Times?
What is the name of the The Times founder's grandson who succeeded his father as editor?
In the 1850s, the Times was beginning to suffer from the rise in competition from what kind of press?
Which agency often used The Times for continental intelligence?
Which century was The Times first often relied upon for continental intelligence?
Continental intelligence conveyed by The Times was often superior to what?
Who was The Times' Chief Editor in 1914?
The Chief Editor of The Times in 1914 argued that the British Empire should enter what war?
What anti-Semitic fabrication did The Times endorse in 1920?
After publishing anti-Semitic editorials in 1920, what did The Times refer to Jews as being?
What was the name of the anti-Semitic article that The Time's Chief Editor published in 1914?
A Constantinople correspondent of The Times exposed what anti-Semitic document as a forgery?
Who was the name of the The Times Constantinople correspondent who exposed the anti-Semitic document as a forgery?
How did The Times respond to the exposing of anti-Semitic documents as forgery?
In 1922, who bought The Times?
In 1922, which estate sold The Times?
The Times gained much notoriety in the 1930s because of its advocacy of what?
Which The Times editor was closely allied with the government who practised German appeasement?
Which notable government official did The Times ally with in the 1930s whom practised German appeasement?
Who was the name of the Soviet double agent who was the correspondent for The Times in Spain in the late 1930s?
A Soviet double agent working for The Times in Spain was a war correspondent during what war in the late 1930s?
During World War II, the Soviet double agent who was corresponding for The Times in Spain in the 1930s later joined what agency?
In 1963, a notable double agent providing valuable and high-quality reporting for The Times during a war in the late 1930s eventually defected to which country?
Between 1941 and 1946, which left-wing British historian was Assistant Editor for The Times?
The Assistant Editor of The Times in 1941-1946 strongly supported what stance?
Which side did The Times support in the fighting that broke out in Athens in 1944?
Which major political figure condemned The Times in 1944 for not supporting the British Army?
During World War II, The Times was nicknamed what in 1944?
In what year did The Times resume printing news on the front page instead of small advertisements?
In 1967, what well-known family sold The Times to a Canadian publishing magnate?
In 1967, which Canadian publishing magnate bought The Times?
What is the name of the corporation that bought The Times in 1967?
Which other newspaper was brought under the same ownership as The Times in 1967 to form Times Newspapers Limited?
In 1979, which corporation was struggling to run The Times?
What crisis in 1979 caused near ruin to The Times?
What kind of demands were causing ruin to The Times in 1979?
What corporation bought The Times in 1981?
Who owned the major corporation that bought The Times in 1981?
During the acquisition of The Times in 1981, John Collier and Bill O'Neill were part of what group that did three weeks of intensive bargaining?
Which major journalist resigned as foreign correspondent of the Times in 1988?
The foreign correspondent who resigned from The Times in 1988 won how many major journalism awards?
The foreign correspondent for The Times who resigned in 1988, resigned for what reason?
What airplane was shot down in July 1988 that a famous foreign correspondent from The Times wrote an article about that later lead to his resignation?
What stance did The Times take that cause a famous foreign correspondent to resign in 1988?
In what year did The Times ceased its policy of using courtesy titles for living persons before full names on first reference?
What kind of style is now confined to the "Court and Social" page of The Times when referring to the use of courtesy titles?
When The Times ceased its policy of using courtesy titles, it continued to use them for what kind of name on references after the first?
In what year did News International begin producing The Times in both broadsheet in tabloid sizes?
When The Times began producing its newpaper in both broadsheet and tabloid sizes, which region did The Times withdraw its broadsheet from sale?
The Times is printed solely in what format since 2004?
In what year was the meeting of the House of Lords Select Committee on Communications that was investigating media ownership and the news?
In the 2007 meeting with the government, Rupert Murdoch, owner of The Times, stated that the law and the independent board prevented him from doing what?
What government committee was investigating Rupert Murdoch and The Times in 2007?
In May 2008, The Times switched from what plant to new plants in Broxbourne, Merseyside, and Glasgow?
In 2008, The Times switched to a new plant in Broxbourne, which is on the outskirts of what city?
In May 2008, The Times switched to new plants which allowed for what kind of feature to be printed on every page for the first time?
What major event took place in London in 2012?
What kind of front cover did The Times issue on 26 July 2012?
In 2012, The Times added what suffix to its masthead?
What is the name of the lifestyle column of The Times?
The Times features a puzzles section called what?
What is the name of the sudoku game in The Times?
What sports activity is featured in The Times on Mondays?
What kind of football game is featured in the Scottish edition of The Times?
What is the name of the section that features football on Mondays in The Times?
What is the name of the section of the Saturday edition of The Times that features travel and lifestyle?
Arts, books, and ideas are featured in what section in the Saturday edition of The Times?
An entertainment listings guide in the Saturday edition of The Times is called what?
What is the name of the notable contributor to The Times Magazine columns that became the Food and Drink Writer of the Year in 2005?
What is the name of the winner of BBC's The Great British Bake Off who is also a column writer in The Times Magazine section?
In what year did notable Times Magazine contributor, Gile Coren, become Food and Drink Writer of the Year?
Nadiya Hussain, a Times Magazine column writer, is known for being the winner of what BBC contest?
What is the name of the section that features columns touching on subjects such as celebrities, fashion and beauty, food and drink, homes and garden or simply writers' anecdotes?
Visits to The Times website have decreased by how much since October 2011?
What is the reason for the dramatic drop in visits to The Times website?
In April 2009, how many readers did the timesonline website have per day?
As of October 2011, how many subscribers does The Times' digital product currently have?
What year was Harold Evans appointed to editor of The Times?
The Times has a traditional rival with what other major British newspaper?
What is the name of the highest-selling tabloid daily newspaper in the United Kingdom?
What is the name of the highest-selling middle market British daily newspaper?
Which newspaper has a significantly higher circulation, The Sunday Times or The Times?
As of January 2013, The Times has a circulation of how many people?
As of January 2013, The Sunday Times has a circulation of how many people?
The Times commissioned what serif typeface in 1931?
Who is the creator of the serif typeface created in 1931 for The Times newspaper?
Who commissioned the change of the typeface of The Times in 1931?
What is the name of the typeface that Times New Roman is based on?
How many years has The Times stayed with Times New Roman?
At the 1945 general election, The Times adopted a stance that was referred to by what name?
What kind of political coalition did The Times support in 1974?
After 1945, The Times supported what party for 5 years afterwards?
From the 1970s until 1997, The Times supported what political party?
After 1997, The Times declined from making any party endorsements however, they supported individual candidates known by what name?
In the 2001 general election, The Times declared support for what political party?
What is the name of the political party's leader that The Times supported in the 2001 general election?
For the 2010 general election, which political party did The Times support?
What political party did the Tories have to form a coalition with in 2010?
What political party was re-elected by a landslide in 2001?
What is the name of the newspaper with the most varied political support in British history?
Which political party is The Times columnist, Daniel Finkelstein, associated with?
Which political party is The Times columnist, David Aaronovitch, associated with?
In what year did The Times make an endorsement for Barack Obama?
Who did The Times support in 2012 for the election of the U.S. president?
What kind of policy did The Times express reservation for when concerning the political stances of Barack Obama?
What film festival does The Times support that is also supported alongside the British Film Institute?
What festival is featured at Asia House, London?
The Cheltenham Literature Festival is supported by what major newspaper?
What is the name of the supplement that first appeared in 1902 as a supplement to The Times?
In 1914, a separately paid-for supplement for The Times was a magazine that featured what kind of content?
The editorial offices of The Times Literary Supplement is based in what location in London?
In what year did The Times Literary Supplement begin publishing online?
The Times began producing what kind of non-newspaper product in 1895?
What publisher prints The Times atlas?
What is the name of The Times' atlas?
What is the name of the travel magazine sold by The Times?
In what year was The Times' travel magazine first sold?
How many pages is The Times' travel magazine?
What is the name of Britain's best-selling travel magazine?
The author, Rex Stout, created a fictional detection that is fond of solving London Times' crossword puzzles that goes by what name?
In what part of the world did the fictional detective, Nero Wolfe, live in?
The fictional detective, Nero Wolfe, preferred what newspaper to American newspapers?
The fictional detective, Nero Wolfe, is described as fond of solving what kind of puzzle in the London Times newspaper?
The author, Ian Fleming, created a fictional character named James Bond who prefers to only read what newspaper?
What is the name of the spy and hero in Ian Fleming's books?
In what Ian Fleming novel is James Bond described as only reading The Times newspaper?
In what children TV series is there is a fictional character named Uncle Bulgaria that asks others to bring him copies of The Times found amongst the litter?
What is the name of the episode where the newspaper, The Times, is featured and plays a central role in an episode of The Wombles?
In the children's TV show, The Wombles, what character asks others to bring him any copies of The Times that they find amongst the litter?
Who laid the foundation stone of New Delhi?
In what year was the foundation stone of New Delhi laid?
Who designed the foundation stone of the city of New Delhi?
On what date was New Delhi inaugurated?
Who inaugurated the city of New Delhi?
What are the two terms colloquially used to refer to the jurisdiction of NCT of Delhi?
New Delhi is a small part of what larger territory?
Delhi and New Delhi are colloquially used to refer to what jurisdiction?
What is one name used to refer to the jurisdiction of NCT of Delhi?
What is one name used to refer to the jurisdiction of NCT of Delhi?
How many Indian cities have been selected to be developed as a smart city?
What is the name of the mission to develop Indian smart cities?
Who is responsible for India's smart city initiative?
What is one Indian city that has been selected to be developed as a smart city?
What city was the capital of India until December 1911?
What is the name of the city formerly known as Calcutta?
What is the name of the empire for which Delhi served as the political and financial capital from 1649 to 1857?
In the early 1900s, the capital of the British Indian Empire was shifted from Calcutta to what city?
In what part of India is Delhi located?
Who announced that the capital of India would be moved from Calcutta to Delhi?
On what date was it announced that the capital of India would be moved to Delhi?
Who laid the foundation stone of New Delhi?
Who is responsible for designing large parts of New Delhi?
On what date did inauguration ceremonies for New Delhi begin?
A temporary secretariat building was built in New Delhi in what year?
In what year what New Delhi inaugurated as the capital of India?
Housing for employees was built in what area during the 1920s?
What was the name of the last residential area built by the British Raj?
During what decade was the Lodhi colony built?
In what year did India gain independence?
In what year was Delhi converted into a union territory?
What is the name of the act that caused the Union Territory of Delhi to become formally known as the National Capital Territory of Delhi?
The enforcement of the legislation of the Constitution Act began in what year?
In 1956, Delhi was converted into what type of territory?
In what decade did New Delhi first extend significantly from Lutyen's Delhi?
What organization developed land to expand New Delhi in the 1950s?
What was the name of the enclave created by the Central Public Works Department?
In which direction did Chanakyapuri extend from New Delhi?
What was one use of the uses for the newly developed land of Chanakypuri?
What is the total area of New Delhi in square miles?
On what plain is New Delhi located?
The Delhi Ridge is also referred to by what name?
New Delhi is located on the floodplains of what river?
What seismic zone does New Delhi fall under?
What was the magnitude of the notable 2015 earthquake that shook New Delhi?
A 4.7 magnitude earthquake that affected New Delhi occurred on what date?
What was the magnitude of the earthquake that affected New Delhi on September 2011?
How many earthquakes occurred on March 5, 2012?
What is the geographical feature New Delhi lies on that is responsible for frequent earthquakes?
In what season does New Delhi's air pollution worsen?
What method was introduced in December 2015 to reduce New Delhi's air pollution?
New Delhi's alternate-day travel scheme allowed trucks to enter the city after what hour?
How long is the initial trial period for New Delhi's driving restriction scheme?
On what day of the week will travel remain unrestricted by New Delhi's alternate day driving scheme?
On what date did the Supreme Court of India enact restrictions on Delhi's transportation system to reduce pollution?
The Supreme Court restricted registration of some vehicles with engines of 2000 cc and over until what date?
All taxis in Delhi were ordered to switch to what type of fuel by March 1, 2016?
Which transportation vehicles were banned from entering New Delhi?
New restrictions on New Delhi's transportation system were enacted by the Supreme Court to accomplish what goal?
New Delhi is the capital of what National Capital Territory?
What is the national capital of India?
The local Government of Delhi and the Central Government of India jointly administer what city?
What city is the official capital of the National Capital Territory of Delhi?
What is the name of one government body that oversees the capital of New Delhi?
The government structure of the New Delhi Municipal Council includes three members from what government body?
What government body is responsible for nominating five members to the New Delhi Municipal Council?
What government official is responsible for nominating two members to the New Delhi Municipal Council?
The Chief Minister of what NCT is responsible for nominating two members to the New Delhi Municipal Council? 
What is the name of the government structure created for New Delhi that is comprised of ten representatives?
What is the official title of Delhi's head of state?
Who is responsible for appointing the Lieutenant Governor of the Union Territory of Delhi?
Which takes precedent when a law passed by Parliament conflicts with a law passed by Delhi's Legislative assembly?
What government body advises the president on appointing a Lieutenant Governor?
Which government position is given most of the executive powers over Delhi?
What is the name of the municipal government by which New Delhi is governed?
What government body is responsible for administering other urban areas of the metropolis of Delhi?
What is the name commonly used to refer to the entire metropolis of Delhi?
The New Delhi Municipal Government oversees what large Indian city?
What form of government is responsible for the municipality of New Delhi?
What British architect was responsible for designing much of New Delhi?
What are the names of the two central promenades around which New Delhi is structured?
Which of the two promenades is referred to as The King's Way?
Which promenade was formerly known as the Queen's Way?
The largest diplomatic enclave in India which contains 19 foreign embassies is located along which promenade?
Formerly known as the Viceroy's House, which large building is located at the heart of New Delhi?
The Rashtrapati Bhavan was formerly known by what name?
Connaught Place in New Delhi is modeled after what area of England?
How many roads lead out of the outer ring of Connaught Place?
The Delhi Flying Club was established in what year?
When established in 1928, which airport served as the base of the Delhi Flying Club?
In what year did the government close Safdarjung Airport due to security concerns?
In what year did the Delhi Flying club begin operations?
What type of aircraft was first used by the Delhi Flying Club after its founding?
What state-owned organization operates New Delhi's bus transport system?
Delhi Transport Company owns the world's largest fleet of buses powered by what type of fuel?
What city has the highest number of registered cars of any city in India?
What large metropolis has some of the highest road density in India? 
What type of vehicle transport system is owned by the Delhi Transport Corporation?
What Indian city is the headquarters of the Northern Railway?
How many main stations of the Northern Railway serve the New Delhi area?
What organization is responsible for building and operating the Delhi Metro system?
What is the total length of the Delhi Metro?
The Delhi Metro consists of how many stations?
What is the total length of the Delhi Metro?
How many stations are there on the Delhi Metro?
What is the name of the world's 12 largest metro system by length?
How many of the Delhi Metro's stations are located underground?
How many of the New Delhi Metro's stations are located at ground level?
What organization operates the Delhi Metro system?
The Delhi Metro Rail Corporation operates under the administrative control of what government body?
The Delhi Metro project was spearheaded by what Indian government figure?
Padma Vibhushan E. Sreedharan was popularly known by what nickname?
What major award was given to Padma Vibhushan E. Sreedharan for his contribution the the Delhi Metro?
What is the population of New Delhi?
What are the most common languages spoken in New Delhi?
What language is used for formal purposes by business and government institutes of New Delhi?
What is the literacy rate of New Delhi according to the 2011 census?
What city in the territory of Delhi has the highest literacy rate?
What percentage of New Delhi's population is Hindu?
What is the most commonly practiced religion in New Delhi?
What percentage of New Delhi's population is Muslim?
What percentage of New Delhi's population is Sikh?
What percentage of New Delhi's population is Christian?
What is the name of the holiday celebrated in India that occurs on Gandhi's Birthday?
What is the date of India's Independence Day?
On Indian Independence Day, the Prime Minister addresses the nation from what location?
On Indian Independence Day, kites are flown by citizens which symbolize what concept?
What New Delhi celebration showcases India's cultural diversity and military power?
What religious festival is also known as the festival of light?
What cultural event showcases dancers and musicians from all over India?
In what location is The Qutub Festival held?
The Spring Festival which is held each year in Delhi is also known by what name?
What is the name of the fruit related festival held annually in Delhi?
The Nipponzan Myohoji decided to build a Peace Pagoda in new Delhi in what year?
The Peace Pagoda built in New Delhi by the Nipponzan Myohoji contained what type of artifacts?
Which Japanese Buddhist organization built a Peace Pagoda in New Delhi in 2007?
The Peace Pagoda built in New Delhi by the Nipponzan Myohoji was inaugurated by which prominent figure?
What structure did the Nipponzan Myohoji decide to build in New Delhi in 2007?
The New Delhi town plan was chosen primarily to symbolize what?
The New Delhi town plan was influenced by what type of architecture?
What town plan was chosen with the chief consideration of displaying British power and superiority?
What is one type of architecture that heavily influenced the New Delhi town plan?
Approximately how long did it take to build New Delhi?
The architecture of New Delhi borrows from indigenous sources but fits into what tradition?
What historian is partially responsible for the use of indigenous features in the architecture of New Delhi?
Which government official urged that indigenous features be used in the design of New Delhi?
Many of the architectural elements of New Delhi borrow from what sources?
What year was the India Gate built?
The Indian Gate was inspired by what Parisian monument?
The India Gate commemorates how many soldiers of past wars?
Which Indian monument, inspired by the Arc de Triomphe, was built in 1931?
The India Gate commemorates the lost soldiers of what army?
In which location did Mahatma Gandhi spend the final 144 days of his life?
In which city is the Gandhi Smriti located?
On which date was Mahatma Gandhi killed?
In what location was Mahatma Gandhi cremated?
The Raj Ghat was designed by what architect?
Who was responsible for constructing the Jantar Mantar?
In what area of New Delhi is the Jantar Mantar observatory located?
The Jantar Mantar consists of how many architectural astronomy instruments?
What is the name of the observatory built in Connaught Place by Maharaja Jai Singh II of Jaipur?
What is one of the primary purposes of the Jantar Mantar observatory?
What is the name of the doll themed museum located in New Delhi?
What is the name of the major railroad related museum located in New Delhi?
The Supreme Court of India Museum is located in what major city?
The National Philatelic Museum is located in which large Indian city?
What is the name of the modern art museum located in new Delhi?
The Buddha Jayanti Park is located in which Indian city?
A notable New Delhi garden is located adjacent to what metro station?
The gardens of New Delhi are particularly stunning in which season?
New Delhi is well known for what type of beautifully landscaped feature?
What is the name of one of the largest gardens in new Delhi?
New Delhi played host to what major athletic competition in 2010?
New Delhi first hosted the Asian Games in what year?
The Asian Games were most recently held in New Delhi in what year?
New Delhi's bid for the 2019 Asian Games was turned down by the government for what reason?
New Delhi is the annual host of what foot-race?
What major tennis stadium is located in New Delhi?
What major sports venue in New Delhi bears the name of the former prime minister Indira Gandhi?
The Jawaharlal Nehru Stadium is located in which Indian city?
In which Indian city is the Siri Fort Sports Complex located?
The Dhyan Chand National Stadium is located in which major Indian city?
What is the name of the large commercial and financial district located in the northern part of New Delhi?
New Delhi's service sector has expanded largely due to skilled workers that speak what language?
What is one of the key service industries of New Delhi?
Prior to the expansion of the service sector, what sector was the largest employer in New Delhi?
The large skilled English-speaking workforce of New Delhi has been able to attract what type of organizations to the city?
According to the 2011 World Health Report, where does New Delhi rank in terms of economic activity?
New Delhi shares the position as the most targeted retail destination in Asia-Pacific markets with what other city?
What organization ranked New Delhi 39th in economic activity in 2011?
In which year was New Delhi ranked 39th in economic activity by the World Wealth Report?
Major cities like Jakarta and Johannesburg rank below New Delhi in what key statistic?
What was the gross state domestic product of Delhi for 2011-12?
The GSDP of Delhi increased by what percentage over the previous year in 2011-12?
In which fiscal year was the GSDP of Delhi estimated at Rs 3.13 lakh crore?
Did the GSDP of Delhi in 2011-12 increase or decrease from the previous fiscal year?
In what city is the Asian and Pacific Centre for Transfer of Technology located?
What major city is home to most regional UN offices in India?
What is one regional UN office located in New Delhi?
The regional office of the World Bank in India is located in what city?
The regional offices of the IMF, UNICEF, and UNESCO are all located in what major Indian city?
Who believe that Imamah is of the Principles of Faith?
On what day was Ali appointed as the prophet's successor?
What verse in the quran expresses the necessity to the appointment of the prophets?
Who must assign a successor after the demise of a prophet?
What must a prophet do?
Why did different sects come about within Shiism?
What great separation came to be from a dispute over the succession to Muhammad?
What does each Shia tariqah follow?
What is the literal meaning of tariqah?
What is it called when the last Imam or his unborn successor goes into concealment?
In Shia tariqah, what are the Twelvers commonly known as?
What are the Nizari Ismailis more commonly known as?
What are the Mustalian Ismailis commonly known as?
Which tariqah no longer exists?
Which tariah is known as the Fivers?
What are the Mustali Ismaili Shia Muslims also known as?
What do Bohras believe happened to Taiyab abi al-qasim?
Who are the Bohras led by in the absence of an imam?
What does a Dai-al-Mutlaq do?
Who is Dawoodi Bohra's present 53rd Da'i al-Butlaq?
Who do Muslims believe said "To whomsoever I am Mawla, Ali is his Mawla?
How many books can this quote be found?
What is the point of conflict between Sunni and Shia?
What does the work Mawla mean to Sunnies?
What does the word Mawla mean to Shia?
By what Quran verse to Shias believe that Imamah is a divine position?
What does the Quran verse 17:71 say?
Imamah is a position appointed by who?
What is an Imam protected by?
Who knows everything that is needed to get to the truth and goal?
Where does migration mainly occur?
Why do birds primarily migrate?
Which birds migrate?
What is bird migration?
What is a cause of death to birds during migration?
When was migration first recorded?
Who recorded the earliest records of migration?
Where was Johannes Leche from?
Which species of birds were recorded 3,000 years ago?
What is a major threat to migratory birds?
Which birds migrate the furthest?
Where does the Arctic tern migrate each year?
Where do Manx shearwaters migrate?
which bird migrates by circling the earth?
What is an example of a shorter migration?
What causes the timing of migration?
How do migrating birds navigate?
How else to migrating birds navigate?
What might help migrating birds navigate?
Who recorded early records of migration?
Where in the bible does it mention migration?
What bird is mentioned in the book of Job?
Who noted that cranes traveled from Scythia to the Nile?
Who repeats Aristotle's observations?
Where did Pliny the Elder repeat Aristotle's observations?
What kind of bird did Aristotle and Pliny the Elder write about?
When was migration finally accepted?
Who wrote A History of British Birds?
What year was Thomas Bewick's book published?
Where were Swallows seen flying?
Which directions were the Swallows flying?
Who describes an experiment with swallows?
Where did this experiment take place?
How did the experiment succeed?
How long did the birds stay alive?
Why do birds migrate?
What are non=migratory birds called?
How many species of birds are there?
How many bird species are long distance migrants?
Which direction do birds primarily migrate?
Along where do many birds migrate?
What is the most common directionof migration in autumn?
What is the most common pattern of migration in the spring?
Why do the birds fly north?
What is the primary motivation for migration?
Which birds will not migrate if they are well fed through winter?
When do the birds return to warmer regions?
what do the longer days of summer provide the birds?
What do diurnal birds produce as opposed to non migratory species?
What is hightened during migration?
Where do Eleonora's falcon breed?
What do Eleonora's falcon feed their young?
What preys on nocturnal passerine migrants?
What makes birds prone to parasites and pathogens?
What is partial migration?
Where is partial migration most common?
In Australia, what percent of non-passerine birds are partially migratory?
In Australia, what percent of passerine species are partially migratory?
What is leap frog migration?
Which sex of the chaffinches Fringilla coelebs migrate earlier?
Where are chaffinches Fringilla coelebs from?
When do the chaffinches Fringilla coelebs migrate?
How do most migrations begin?
What to the migrating birds usually follow?
What obsticals will migrating birds avoid?
What is a common pattern in North America migration?
What are the preferred routes for migration called?
What part of birds was found on an expedition to Mt. Everest?
Which birds have the highest rates of climb to altitude?
What kind of birds fly low over water?
What altitude range is most migration recorded?
Where do most in air collisions occur?
How do penguins migrate?
How far do penguins travel when they migrate?
How do Dusky grouse migrate?
How do Emus migrate long distances during droughts?
Where are Emus from?
Where do the pink-footed goose migrate?
Where do the dark-eyed junco migrate?
Where do the European pied flycatcher breed?
Where does the European pied flycatcher spend the winter?
How do young learn migratory routes?
What route does a migrating bird usually follow?
What geographical barriers to land birds try to avoid?
Why do migrating land birds avoid large water bodies or mountain ranges?
Why do broad winged birds avoid geographical barriers?
What do water birds avoid while migrating?
Where do brent geese migrate from?
Where do brent geese migrate to?
How do brent geese migrate?
What are waders called in North America?
Where do dunlin Calidris alpina migrate to?
Where do semiplamated sandpiper C. pusilla migrate to?
Where do western sandpiper Calidris migrate from?
What does successful migration depend on for some waders?
Where do migrants refuel?
Where is an important stopover location?
What is another stopover location?
Which bird has the longest migration?
How far do bar-tailed godwits travel to migrate?
Where do bar-tailed godwits migrate from
Where do bar-tailed godwits migrate to?
How much of the bar-tailed godwits bodyweight is stored as fat before migration?
Which seabird has the longest-distance migration?
Which bird sees more daylight than any other during migration?
How long did one Arctic tern take to migrate?
How far did the Arctic tern chick travel?
Where do tubenosed birds breed?
Which species are great wanderers?
How far did a Manx shearwater fly over it's lifespan?
Which bird broke a record in how far it flew over it's life?
How long did the Manx shearwater live?
How far will Puffinus griseus migrate each year?
What do some large broad-winged birds rely on to help them soar?
When do large birds of pray migrate?
What is one of the heaviest migratory funnels?
How much of their body weight do honey buzzards lose during migration?
How many birds funnel through Batumi, Georgia each year?
When do many insectivorous birds migrate?
Which kinds of birds land for a few days before resuming migration?
What are smaller insectivorous birds referred to?
How long do passage migrants stop and feed before resuming migration?
What is a benefit of nocturnal migration?
What is a cost of nocturnal migration?
How do nocturnal migrants compensate for loss of sleep?
What is another benefit of nocturnal migration?
What are many long distance migrants genetically programmed to do?
How do species that move short distances know when to migrate?
Why do mountain and moorland breeders move only altitudinally?
Where do the merlin Falco columbarius migrate to?
How far do British chaffinch more in their lives?
How many evolutionary origins do short distance passerine migrants have?
Which species have long-distance migrants in the same family?
Why have some specied progressively shortened their return migration?
What species has no long-distance migratory relatives?
What are the waxwings Bombycilla moving in response to?
Why are the waxwing Bombycilla not migrating for?
Where is there little variation in the length of day throughout the year?
Why does altitudinal migration occur in some tropical birds?
What are tropical birds preferred foods?
Where is it always warm enough for food supply?
For what reason would birds mor far beyond the normal range?
How many times did Bohemian waxwings come to Britain in the nineteeth century?
How many times did Bohemian waxwings come to Britain between 1937 and 200?
What years did Red crossbills invade England?
In which hemisphere does bird migration primarily happen?
Where do birds from high northern latitutes migrate to?
Why do birds migrate south in winter?
Which species of seabirds are more likely to migrate?
Why are seabirds from the southern hemisphere more likely to migrate?
What controls a birds migration?
How do birds navigate and orient themselves during migration?
What is a primitive trait present even in non migrating birds?
What is a complex phenomenon in regards to migration?
What is the primary cue for migration?
How do birds act in the period before migration?
What does Zugunruhe mean in English?
What do caged birds display that corresponds with migratory direction in nature?
When do caged birds change their preferential direction?
What is it called when males return earlier to the breeding sites than females?
What happens in polygynous species with sexual dimophism?
Why do males in polygynous species return before the females?
What is navigation based on?
What do many birds use as a compass?
What does using the sun for direction involve?
What else is navigation based on?
What is magnetoception?
When do long distance migrants disperse?
What do young birds form attachments to?
What else do young birds form attachments to?
What happens when the site attachment is made?
Where do migrating birds visit?
What are older migrating birds better at?
How was the migrating of ospretys and honey buzzards tracked?
What do the birds do to successfully perform long distance migration?
What are examples of day migrating raptors?
What two electromagnetic tools do birds use to find their destinations?
Where is the neural connection that is active during migration located?
What is Cluster N?
What is a young bird on it's first migration compared to?
How does the magnetic field help the bird at different latitudes?
How can migrating birds lose their way?
What is flying past their destinations called?
What location has become famous for bird overshooters?
What other location is famous for spring overshoot?
Where do bird overshooters end up?
What is it called when the genetic programing of young birds fail?
What is reverse migration?
What does reverse migration lead to?
How far out of range can rarities get?
What is it called when birds from one region join birds from a different region?
What kind of bird is most likely to abmigrate?
Who do abmigrating birds return with?
What is a re-introduction scheme?
What did they use to teach birds a migration route?
Which birds did they reintroduce to the US?
Which birds did they use as a trial run?
What do birds need to change to meet the demands of migration?
How often do birds molt?
How do birds store energy?
Why do birds need to molt?
When do birds molt?
How was migration developed?
What is highly labile?
What causes the behavioral adaptations necessary for migration?
What exists in nearly all avian lineages?
What percentage increase in flight distance will often be adaptive?
What kind of bird flies less efficiently?
What type of bird show circuitous migratory routes?
Where do Swainson's thrush fly from?
What is expected to have an effect on migration timing?
What have studies shown regarding climate change?
What else is climate change been shown to change?
What other species does migration help?
What is a greater threat of disease transmission?
What has been studied as a mechanism of disease transmission?
What has a role in the dispersal of propagules of plants and plankton?
What virus is maintained in birds without lethal effects?
Who takes advantage of migrating birds?
What do greater noctule bats feed on?
What do some birds of prey specialize on?
What is the oldest way to study migration?
How have swans been marked?
Who was scientific ringing pioneered by?
Since when have swans been marked?
What are other forms of studying migration?
How are orientation behavior studies traditionally carried out?
What shape is the cage in the Emlen funnel?
What is studied quantitatively inside the cage?
What does the bird leave on the walls of the cage?
Where does the homing pigeon vanish?
What is the name of the island on which Atlantic City is located?
In what year was Atlantic City incorporated?
What are the names of the two townships that became part of Atlantic City when it was incorporated?
How many other towns share a border with Atlantic City?
Which coast is Atlantic City located on?
What is the name of the first commercial hotel built in Atlantic City?
In what year was the first commercial hotel built in Atlantic City?
What are the names of the two avenues at which The Belloe House is located?
What are the two geographical features that Atlantic City is located between?
What were the two potential aspects of Atlantic City that originally attracted developers? 
What other US city was linked to Atlantic City by the Camden and Atlantic Railroad train service?
By 1874, how many passengers were coming to Atlantic City by rail each year?
What is the name of the lighthouse that is located on the Atlantic City coast?
Who is considered to be "Atlantic City's Godfather?"
In what year was the first boardwalk built in Atlantic City?
Why was the first boardwalk built in Atlantic City?
What year was the Great Atlantic Hurricane?
What was the historic length of the boardwalk before the Great Atlantic Hurricane?
Before the Great Atlantic Hurricane the boardwalk extended from Atlantic City to what other city?
The first road connected Atlantic City to which mainland town?
The first road that connected Atlantic City to the mainland was completed in what year?
How much of a toll was charged on the first road to connect Atlantic City to the mainland?
What was the name of the first road to the mainland that did not charge a toll?
By what year was demand so great that one railroad line could no longer keep up with the demand?
What was the name of the new railway that was constructed to transport tourists to Atlantic City after 1878?
What was the name of the hotel that took up a full city block?
Besides massive hotels, what else was appearing all over Atlantic City during this period?
What were the names of the four avenues that surrounded The United States Hotel?
When did Atlantic City go through a radical building boom?
What replaced many of the modest boarding houses? 
What were the names of two of the city's most distinctive hotels?
What happened to Atlantic City in the early part of the 20th century?
Where were the modest boarding houses located before they were replaced by large hotels?
What was the name of the hotel located at the corner of Illinois Avenue and the boardwalk?
What year was The Traymore Hotel begun?
Who was the owner of The Traymore Hotel?
How many stories was The Traymore Hotel after its renovation?
What was the name of the firm commissioned to build The Traymore Hotel?
What year did the Quaker-owned Chalfonte House open?
What year did the Haddon House open?
How many stories was the modern Chalfonte Hotel when it opened in 1904?
How many rooms were in the merged Chalfonte-Haddon Hall Hotel?
What was the name given to the 24 story tall, 400-room Claridge?
In what year was salt water taffy conceived?
Who was the creator of salt water taffy?
What happened to David Bradley's shop that led to the creation of salt water taffy?
Who did Bradley sell salt water taffy to for the first time?
Where did the water come from for the creation of the first salt water taffy?
What years do many historians consider Atlantic City's golden age?
What year was Prohibition enacted nationally?
During Prohibition what name was given to Atlantic City?
During Prohibition how high was Nucky Johnson's income?
How long did Prohibition last?
During the 1920s, who was the mayor of Atlantic City?
What three contributions to Atlantic City was Edward L. Bader known for?
What year did Edward L. Bader lead the initiative to construct the Atlantic City High School?
How much was the bond for that was to be used to purchase land for a Convention Center?
What year was Boardwalk Hall finished?
Who was a meeting organized for in 1929 in Atlantic City?
What family was Charles 
In what year was there a conference for organized crime figures in Atlantic City?
For which family was Charles "Lucky" Luciano a lieutenant?
What was Charles Luciano's nickname?
Who was a former Chicago South Side Gang boss?
What was Johnny Torrio's nickname?
Which Atlantic City neighborhood became particularly impoverished in the mid-to-late 20th century?
What was the biggest factor in the decline in Atlantic City's popularity?
What were two other locations people began to fly to instead of going to Atlantic City?
After the war, what form of transportation became more readily available to many Americans?
What two luxuries that people could have at their own homes led to a diminished interest in luxury beach resorts?
What event was hosted by Atlantic City in 1964?
Who was nominated for Vice President during the 1964 Democratic National Convention?
Who was nominated for President during the 1964 Democratic National Convention?
Who was the Governor of New Jersey in 1964?
Despite being in the midst of a long period of economic decline many felt that the Convention was only held in Atlantic city because of a friendship between what two men?
By what years were many of the great hotels suffering from high vacancy rates?
Prior to and during the advent of legalized gaming, what happened to many of the hotels in Atlantic City?
When were many of the large hotels demolished?
After the Ambassador Hotel was gutted what did it become?
Who purchased the old Ambassador Hotel in 1978?
In what year did New Jersey voters pass a referendum approving casino gambling for Atlantic City?
The owners of the Chalfonte-Haddon Hall Hotel converted it into what?
What was the name of the first legal casino in the eastern United States?
What year did Resorts International open?
How many casinos are there in Atlantic City today?
Atlantic City's tourism began to decline due to what failure?
Who did the Atlantic City Redevelopment Authority partner with in 1999?
Why did the Atlantic City Redevelopment Authority partner with Steve Wynn?
What was the project involving Steve Wynn nicknamed?
"The Tunnel Project" was later officially named what?
In what year did the tunnel open?
What was the name of Atlantic City's newest casino?
When did The Borgata open?
In what year was Wynn's plans for development scrapped?
The new roadway prompted a partnership between which two companies?
In what year did Morgan Stanley purchase land for a new casino resort?
How much land did Morgan Stanley purchase?
Who was named as the developer for Morgan Stanley's casino resort?
What percentage of ownership did Morgan Stanley hold in Revel Entertainment Group?
Who offered Revel $261 million in state tax credits?
How long had Atlantic City held a monopoly on casino gambling?
Who said that the state would consider a referendum to end the monopoly that Atlantic City holds on casino gambling?
When did Governor Christie say that the state would consider a referendum?
How much was casino revenue in 2006?
How much was casino revenue in 2013?
When did "Superstorm Sandy" strike Atlantic City?
"Superstorm Sandy" produced an all-time record low barometric pressure reading of what?
Although "Superstorm Sandy" left minimal damage to any of the tourist areas it did cause what two other things to occur?
What was the source of the misinformation concerning damage to the city's boardwalk?
Why was there a photo of the Boardwalk if it wasn't actually damaged in the storm?
According to the United States Census Bureau, what is the total area in square miles?
What is the area of land?
What is the area of water?
What percentage of the city is made up of water?
What organization provided data detailing the size of the city?
Besides Chelsea, City Island, and Great Island, what other community, locality, or place name is included in the city?
Besides Chelsea, City Island, and Venice Park, what other community, locality, or place name is included in the city?
Besides Chelsea, Venice Park, and Great Island, what other community, locality, or place name is included in the city?
Besides Venice Park, City Island, and Great Island, what other community, locality, or place name is included in the city?
Besides localities and place names, what else is located partically or completely within the city?
How many inches of precipitation does Atlantic City receive annually?
What is the average number of inches of snow received at the airport annually?
Atlantic City's lack of snowfall is due to its location in South Jersey and its proximaty to which body of water?
Atlantic City's lack of snowfall is due to its proximity to the Atlantic Ocean and its location where?
Atlantic City is different from the northern and western parts of the state in the winter due to its tendency to receive which type of precipitation?
How many people were residing in Atlantic City during the 2010 United States Census?
How many housing units were in Atlantic City during the 2010 United States Census?
During the 2010 United States Census what percentage of Atlantic City's population was Hispanic or Latino?
During the 2010 United States Census what percentage of Atlantic City's population was White?
How many families were residing in Atlantic City during the 2010 United States Census?
How many households were there in Atlantic City during the 2010 United States Census?
What percentage of households in Atlantic City had children under the age of 18 living with them?
What percentage of households in Atlantic City were comprised of non-families?
What percentage of households in Atlantic City were made up of individuals?
What was the average family size in Atlantic City?
What percentage of the population was under the age of 18?
What percentage of the population was 65 years of age or older?
What was the median age?
For every 100 females, how many males were there?
For every 100 females age 18 and over, how many males were there?
According to the 2000 United States Census, how many people were living in Atlantic City?
According to the 2000 United States Census, what was the population density?
According to the 2000 United States Census, how many housing units were there in Atlantic City?
According to the 2000 United States Census, what percentage of the population of Atlantic City were Hispanic or Latino?
According to the 2000 United States Census, what percentage of the population of Atlantic City were white?
How many households had children under the age of 18 living with them?
How many households were there in Atlantic City?
How many households were made up of individuals?
What was the average household size in Atlantic City?
What was the average family size in Atlantic City?
What was the median age of Atlantic City?
For every 100 females, how many males were there?
For every 100 females age 18 and over, how many males were there?
What percentage of the population of Atlantic City was under the age of 18?
What percentage of the population of Atlantic City was 65 years of age or older?
What was the median income for a household in the city?
What was the median income for a family in the city?
What was the per capita income for the city?
What percentage of families in the city were living below the poverty line?
What percentage of the population in the city were living below the poverty line?
As of September 2014, the greater Atlantic City area had one of the highest rates in the country of what?
What was the unemployment rate for the greater Atlantic City area, as of September 2014?
As of September 2014, what was the overall size of the labor force of the greater Atlantic City area?
Out of a labor force of about 141,000 what was the unemployment rate?
In 2010, who stated that a state takeover of the city and local government of Atlantic City was imminent?
What item were the regulations in Atlantic City compared to?
What was the name of the district that would encompass the boardwalk casinos, the marina casinos, the Atlantic City Outlets, and Bader Field?
According to a poll, what percentage of New Jersey voters opposed the takeover of Atlantic City by the state?
According to a poll, what percentage of New Jersey voters favored the takeover of Atlantic City by the state?
What year were the boundaries for the state-run tourism district finally set?
What were the three major things that the district would include?
Who would oversee all functions of the new district?
Who would make the changes within the district to attract new businesses and attractions?
What two qualities were mentioned in regards to new construction?
How many roadways will be included in the district?
What place is home to the Atlantic City Aquarium?
What place was originally left off of the tourism district?
Where was the residential neighborhood that was removed from the final boundaries of the district?
Who cast the lone "no" vote on the creation of the district citing Bader Field's inclusion?
What is Atlantic City known for?
How many large casinos are located in Atlantic City?
Approximately how many people did New Jersey casinos employ in 2011?
Approximately how many people visited New Jersey's casinos in 2011?
What two entities regulate New Jersey's casino?
How many casino closures took place in Atlantic City in 2014?
What was the name of the poorest performing casino in the city that ultimately closed in 2014?
What year did Trump Plaza originally open?
What was the name of Atlantic City's second-newest casino that ultimately closed in 2014?
What was the name of the first casino to close in 2014?
What did Trump Entertainment Group say they were considering doing with the Trump Taj Mahal?
What is the sole remaining property owned by Trump Entertainment Group?
In what year did executives at Trump Entertainment Group say they were considering selling the Taj?
Why did executives say they were considering selling the Taj?
Who spoke for the Trump Entertainment Group in regards to the Taj and what might be done in the future?
How many remaining properties belong to Caesars Entertainment?
What are the names of the three remaining Caesars Entertainment properties?
What type of bankruptcy did Caesars Entertainment file for?
What year did Caesars Entertainment file for bankruptcy?
Which unit of Caesars Entertainment filed for bankruptcy in 2015?
What was Boardwalk Hall formerly known as?
What is the Boardwalk Hall?
In what year did the newer Atlantic City Convention Center open?
How many sq ft of showroom space is included in the Atlantic City Convention Center?
What hotel is adjacent to the Atlantic City Convention Center?
What is Atlantic City sometimes referred to?
The names of many properties near Atlantic City are used in which popular board game?
Who learned the game of Monopoly and took it to Atlantic City?
What location was originally featured in the  Monopoly game? 
Who did Ruth Hoskins teach the game of Monopoly to?
What popular property in Monopoly was actually a misspelling?
What is the name of the original property that Marvin Gardens takes its name from?
Whose game did Parker Brothers model the board game after?
In what year did Parker Brothers acknowledge and apologize for a spelling error in the game?
Who copied Charles Todd's Monopoly board?
In general, what does immunology study?
Immunology studies the functioning of the immune system in which two states of being?
Name three types of immunological disorders?
Immunology studies the immune system in which three stages of existence?
What disciplines in medicine have particularly strong immunology applications?
The term immunology is derived from a Latin word that means what?
What are the major organs of the immune system?
Who originally discovered these parts of the immune system?
How do physicians study a patient's immune system organs in emergency situations?
Which portions of the immune system can be safely removed in these emergency cases?
The structure of immune system components can be described as what?
Are immune tissues typically fixed with specific organs usually?
What is one way the cellular structures of the immune system are housed in the body?
What is another way these tissues are housed within the body?
Which two fields of study are associated with immunology?
Immunology studies how which three areas impact one another?
When was the first written mention of immunity as it pertains to the body?
Which Greek historian made that notation?
When did immunology start to become codified as a scientific theory?
What is the basic, primitive part of the immune system known as?
Vertebrates also have what type of immune system component?
What is one type of adaptive immune system component?
Name the other type of adaptive immune system component?
The total immune system is generally composed of what types of structures?
Humoral immunology involves the interaction of what two elements?
What are antibodies comprised of?
What cells produce antibodies?
The term "antigen" is rooted in what two words?
Immunology is the study of what type of responses to antibodies and antigens?
In the field of immunology, what aspect is becoming more specialized?
What new areas are immunologists studying with more frequency?
The latest research into newer aspects of immunology is focused on what three elements of the body?
These three elements of the body are of new interest for what reason?
The study of diseases caused by immune system disorders is called?
What are three problems of the immune system studied by clinical immunology?
Where can these three elements occur in the immune system?
What else does clinical immunology concern itself with?
Why does clinical immunology extend to those areas?
What is a type of immune system disorder?
What are some examples of hypersensitivities?
What is the most famous immune system disease?
What kind of disease is AIDS?
Which types of cells are suppressed by AIDS?
What virus specifically suppresses those cells?
What medical scientist first proposed the clonal selection theory of immunology?
What triggers an immune response according to CST?
In CST, what triggers a destructive immune response?
What property of T cells caused modification of CST?
When was clonal selection theory first proposed?
What discipline can undergraduate students interested in general health study?
Immunology is a branch of what larger field of study?
The goal of an immunologist is to study what beings?
The biggest part of an immunologist's job is what?
What two conditions apply to good immunological study?
Most graduate schools specializing in immunology follow what organization's parameters?
What is the name of the immunology school at Mount Sinai?
AAI immunology courses include what two components?
What does the introductory AAI immunology course do?
The Langone Medical Center is part of what college?
What is the common name for MPEG-2 Audio Layer III?
What kind of audio is the coding format for?
Other than storage, what is the common audio format used for?
What does MP3 use to format it's data?
Where will MP3 files most commonly be found?
What does the compression target in the song?
The targetting focuses on what aspect that is beyond the ability of most people?
What is this method commonly referred to as?
What kind of model is used in this kind of compression?
These models ensure that the precision is reduced for the components that are what to human hearing?
Who designed MP3?
What was the first standard that this group had?
The first standard later developed into which standard?
When was the draft passed to have MPEG-1 Audio approved as a standard?
When was MPEG-2 Audio finally published?
What does the MP3 compression take advantage of?
What is the limitation in human hearing referred to as?
Who was the physicist to report that a tone could be rendered inaudible.
When were audio curves described by Richard Ehmer?
The initial work was aimed at determining critical ratios and what else?
What was first proposed in 1979?
Which country were the researchers located in?
Who was the first to produce hardware for speech?
What does LPC stand for?
What was reported in IEEE's Journal on Selected Areas in Communications?
What does OCF stand for?
What does PXFM stand for?
What was the name of the codec that OCF, PFXM and other contributes merged into?
Which competition did ASPEC win?
What was the first practical implementation based on?
What was the name of the first song used to develop the MP3?
Who was the artist of the first song used?
Who adjusted the song?
The song was listened to multiple times to try and refine what?
What particular aspect of the artists voice was he trying to preserve?
What was only incorporated into Layer III and not Layers I or II?
Who was the chair that oversaw the editing of the standard?
Who's responsibility was it to edit the standard for Layer I?
Who's responsibility was it to edit the standard for Layer II?
What was the name given to the proposal?
What did the joint proposal provide?
Other than Thomson Consumer Electronics, Fraunhofer Society and CNET, who else was a part of the joint proposal?
When were the algorithms approved?
When were the approved algorithms finalized?
What was the first started suite by MPEG?
What was the official name of the internation standard?
When was the international standard published?
Further work on MPEG was finalized as a part of which MPEG standard?
What was the official name of ISO/IEC 13818-3 better known as?
At what rate were the new sampling rates defined in comparison to MPEG-1 Audio?
Apart from cutting the frequency fidelity in half, what else was cut in half?
Allowing the coding of audio programs with more than two channels was a major aspect of what?
As MPEG-3 had a different meaning, what was the name given to the extension of MPEG-2?
Where was this extension developed?
The new sampling rates widened the scope of MP3 to be able to include what?
What is not an ISO recognized standard?
As MPEG-2.5 is unofficial, it is considered what kind of extension to the MP3 format?
What type of recording did Brandenburg use?
What did Brandenburg use the recording to refine?
What word describes the nature of the song used?
As a result of her song being used, Suzanne Vega is sometimes referred to as what?
Excerpts were taken from which reference compact disc to assess the subjective quality of the MPEG audio formats?
What was Jonathan Sterne's profession?
Which nationality was the hacker who acquired I3enc?
What did the hacker use to acquire the software?
The hacker re-wrote which element of the program?
How much did the new released program by the hacker cost?
Where did MP3s begin to spread?
Which audio player was released in 1997?
Who released the audio player?
What was the name of the first portable solid state digital audio player?
In which country was the first portable audio player developed?
Which website offered MP3s for free?
How many MP3s were offered for free by the website?
What kind of file sharing became popular due to the file sizes of MP3s?
How did people come into possession of MP3s?
Which network was the first large peer to peer file sharing network?
What kind of infringement resulted from sharing MP3s?
What name did the record companies associate with MP3 file sharing?
Who was the target of the record companies?
What happened to Napster?
What kind of MP3 file sharing continues on?
Beatport, Bleep and Juno records are examples of what kind of service?
What kind of music is sold by these companies?
Which format is used by the companies that sell the music legally?
A header and data block together make up what?
What is a sequence of MP3 frames called?
What is used to identify the begining of a valid frame of an MP3 header?
How many bits are needed to indicate that layer 3 is used?
MP3 files today contain what kind of metadeta?
Which standard does not include a specification for an MP3 encoder?
Example psychoacoustic models and rate loops can be foundin which part of the original standard?
What were implementers of the standard supposed to devise?
It is easy for a prospective user of an encoder to research the best choice because of what factor?
An encoder that is proficient at encoding at higher bit rates might be worse at what?
How many domain samples are taken during encoding?
Domain samples are transformed into what?
When are 192 samples taken instead of 576?
When 192 samples are taken instead of 576, it is done in an effort to limit what?
What accompanies a transient?
What kind of structure does a filter bank have?
Due to a specific kind of structure, what kind of problems are made worse?
What kind of resolution are the filter banks unable to provide an optimal solution for?
Combining two filter banks' outputs creates what kind of problem?
The need to code excess energy in the frequency domain decreases what kind of efficiency?
What is carefully defined in the standard?
What are most decoders?
The ISO/IEC high standard document states that the decompressed output produced from a given MP3 file will be the same within what standards?
Decoders are usually compared by examining which factor?
The efficiency of decoders is examined by seeing how much memory and what other process they use in the decoding process?
What is there no official provision for?
What is an example of an encoder that can attach additional metadeta?
Adding additional metadata allows players to handle gapless playback and deliver what?
For encoders and decoders, what is not defined?
A typical trade off when creating an MP3 file is between the amount of space used and what other factor?
What would an example of lossy audio encoding be?
Who gets to set the bit rate for an MP3 file?
What does the bit rate of the file actually mean?
If the bit rate is higher, the size of the compressed file will be what?
If the bit rate is too low, what might be audible in the reproduction?
Sounds that were not in the original recording are referred to as what?
Randomness and sharp attacks are two reasons that may make it harder to to do what to an audio file?
Other than pre - echo, what is another example of what can happen when audio is compressed?
What kind of sample can display a good example of compression artifacts?
How many bit rates does the simplest type of MP3 file use?
What does CBR stand for?
What does VBR stand for?
Aside from silence, which sections of music highlight parts that are easier to compress?
What value do users need to know when encoding their music to help avoid them having to do tests on each piece of music?
A listening environment is also know by which term?
Other than speakers and headphones, what other piece of equipment affects the listener's perceived quality?
Listening environment, listener attention, listener training and listener audio equipment can all affect what kind of quality?
Who gave students a test to determine their preferences?
Where was a test performed to collect data on student preference for MP3 quality?
Data showed that students' preference for MP3 quality music followed which trend?
What kind of sound did students seem to prefer?
What is the name of the study done by composer Ryan Maguire?
What did the study aim to isolate?
What is the track "moDernisT" an anagram of?
Where was an account of the study published?
Which year was the study published?
What sampling rate is used for CD audio?
What is the main source used for creating MP3 files?
Where can one find a greater variety of bit rates?
The common bit rate on the internet is 128 kbit/s using which compression ratio?
As technology advances, what is another higher bit rate that is beginning to spread?
The LAME encoder allows bit rates that are what?
Even though few MP3 players can play it, LAME also offers which option?
What is the highest bit rate the LAME encoder allows?
The ISO standard dictates that decoders only need to be able to decode streams that have how high of a bit rate?
What does the term CBR mean?
Which early MPEG layer used CBR?
The early software was restricted to which kind of bitrate?
What did more sophisticated MP3 encoders use to target an average bit rate?
What did encoders base the encoding rate for each frame on?
What kind of audio can a sophisticated MP3 encoder produce?
Which type of decoder must support bitrate switching on a per-frame basis?
What do encoders use when the goal is to achieve a fixed level of quality?
Using VBR instead of a constant bit rate encoding makes which part of encoding less predictable?
An average bit rate is used when who choses an average value for the encoder to use?
A partially full frame's ability to have part of the next frame's audio data is referred to as what?
What kind of audio is required to use a bit reservoir?
What is a possible result of handling the bit reservoir?
A bit reservoir allows for what kind of changes in effective bit rate?
A large benefit of a bit reservoir is that you can use it even while encoding what kind of stream?
What can scale factor band 21 be shortened to?
What is the maximum frequency that scale factor band 21 can go up to?
The encoder has to choose between less acurate representation in band 21 or which factor in all bands below band 21?
What does less efficient storage result in for VBR encoding?
What is a section of a file that contains metadeta referred to as?
What else can metadeta contain other than the title, artist or track  number?
What do MP3 standards not define?
What would be needed to support metadata and obviate the need for tags?
Other than the ID3v1, which similar standard format for tag exists?
What is the most recently introduced standard for tag formatting?
What is the second place in a file that tags are normally stored, with the first being at the beginning?
What is important to note about where the tags are stored?
If the MP3 decoders do not extract information from the tags, what do they do to them?
What is the name given to the standard for measure and storing the loudness of an MP3 file?
What is measuring and storing loudness of an MP3 file also known as?
What does the standard ReplayGain allow a player to automatically adjust?
What program can be used to modify files based on ReplayGain measurements?
MP3Gain is important because it allows players without what capability to have adjusted playback?
Where is the basic MP3 decoding and technology patent free?
What happened to the patents that caused them to be patent-free?
When will the technology be patent - free in the United States?
Between which years did most of the MP3 patents in the US expire?
What has many organizations claiming ownership of patents related to aspects of MP3 led to?
Legal threats and confusion made it difficult to ensure what about patents regarding MP3 products?
What was the danger of not correctly patenting products?
At what stage of the technology were these problems prevalent?
What became publicly available on 6 December 1991?
When can patents not be filed in most countries?
How long does it take for patents to expire after being filed?
How long can it take for patents to be approved after initially being filed?
When did patents required to implement MP3 expire in most countries?
How long does it take for patents to expire in the United States?
A patent issue much later than normally expected can be referred to as what?
What year is the latest that MP3 related patents will expire on in the United States?
Who holds the longest running MP3 patent in the United States?
Who administered the longest running MP3 patent in the United States?
What was Technicolor's previous name?
What patent does Technicolor claim to control?
What are Technicolor constantly in the process of doing?
When did the Fraunhofer institute send out a letter?
What did the letter claim would be required to distribute and/or sell decoders and/or encoders?
What does selling unlicensed products mean that the seller is doing?
What can products not use if they want to avoid infringing on patent rights?
Who was sued for patent infringement on MP3 technology?
Who initially sued to protect their patent rights?
What did Sisvel grant Thomson to end the lawsuit?
When did the majority of the patents held by Sisvel expire?
When does the last patent held by Sisvel expire?
What did German officials seize from SanDisk on September 2006?
At which show did SanDisk have their assets seized?
Which company was the Italian patents firm representing?
What happened after the injunction was successful?
The continuous back and forth regarding the decisions on patents was referred to as what?
Who sued Apple, Samsung Electronics and Sandisk in 2007?
Which court did the lawsuit take place in?
What action did the three companies being sued take?
What year did the lawsuits end?
What was the claim that the lawsuit was based on?
Which company allegedly inherited MP3 patents from AT&T-Bell LAbs?
What kind of patents were allegedly inherited?
How many patents did Alcatel claim Microsoft infringed on?
What subsequently happened after Alcatel was awarded damages?
How much money was awarded to Alcatel by a San Diego jury?
AAC, mp3PRO and MP2 are all members of the same technological family as which other lossy format?
What model type do all of the lossy formats roughly depend on?
Which company owns many of the patents that cover the other formats?
Opus and Vorbis are two explans of what kind of compression format?
Being open formats means that Opus and Vorbis can be used without what?
What are some benefits to some of the newer audio compression formats when compared to MP3?
How can one obtain an open compression format such as Opus or Vorbis?
What is a significant alternative to MP3?
What can lossless formats provide?
What is the downside of using a lossless format?
What is another example of a lossless format other than Apple Lossless?
What does FLAC stand for?
House music is characterized by what type of beats?
What are some subgenres of House music?
What are rhythms provided by in House music?
What are some differences between House and Disco music?
What type of music is House based on?
What instruments did disco songs incorporate from house music?
who produced Donna Summer's hit single "I Feel Love"?
what sort of music did Hi-NRG group Lime produce?
What year did Cerrone's "Supernature" get released?
What year was solid state survivor released?
What influenced House music?
What type of producer was Frankie Knuckles?
what did Frankie Knuckles use to create his compositions?
What was the name of Charanjit Singh's 1982 album?
What did Singh's album contain?
What year was synthesizing: ten ragas to a disco beat released?
What sort of arrangement did Charanjit Singh use on his 1982 album?
Who is Rachel Cain?
Who were Frankie Knuckles and ron hardy?
what was the nickname of frankie knuckles?
marshall jefferson got involved in house music after hearing whose music?
what was ron hardy's music released in?
who were the chicago radio jocks that played dance music in the early 1980s?
what style of music did man parrish play?
what style of music did afrika bambaataa play?
what style of music did kraftwerk play?
how did producers sometimes make edits of house music?
who produced the song "on and on" in 1984?
where was jesse saunders from?
who co-wrote the hit song "on and on" in 1984?
what type of bass synthesizer was a staple of the early house sound?
when was player one's "space invaders" released?
what producer was the first to produce deep house? 
where was producer mr. fingers' from?
when was mr. fingers' "mystery of love" released? 
when was mr. fingers' "can you feel it?" released?
When was Phuture's "Acid Tracks" released?
Who founded the group Phuture?
what instrument was Phuture the first to use in house music?
how long was phuture's "acid tracks"?
what type of drum machine did "acid tracks" use?
what radio station aired the Hot Mix 5 show?
what record labels helped popularize house music?
what song by marshall jefferson became a big house hit?
what european country were big house music hits being released in, in 1987?
where was house music from chicago-based labels considered a must-play?
what is the name of Chip E's 1985 house hit?
when was Chip E's hit "It's House" released?
the term 'house music' came from the labeling of records at what store?
who ran the D.J. International record label?
House is a regional catch-all term for what kind of music?
what was 'house music' once synonymous with?
What was the stage name of Larry Heard?
Why did the term house become popular? 
what are the Roland TR-808, TR-909, and TB 303 examples of?
synthesizers were used to create what house subgenre?
what was the real name of Mr. Fingers?
What is Juan Atkins an originator of?
What did Atkins claim the term house reflected?
Why were DJs inspired to create their own house records?
Who did House relay political messages to? 
Who did Frankie Knuckles once say the Warehouse club was for? 
Who was a famous house producer?
where was the warehouse club located?
what community was deep house popular with?
what was one of the earliest Detroit techno hits?
who started the Detroit techno development?
what was the nickname of juan atkins, derrick may, and devin saunderson?
who were the early b-boy hip-hop artists that inspired detroit techno?
who were the european electronica artists that inspired detroit techno?
who founded KMS Records?
what was the name of Blake Baxter's 1986 hit recording?
what was the name of Blake Baxter's 1987 hit recording?
what group released "Big Fun" and "Good Life" in 1988?
what was the 1989 hit theme released by KMS?
what is credited as the first house hit in the UK?
what did "Love Can't Turn Around" peak at in the UK charts?
what year did Farley Funk have his first UK hit?
What was the first house single to hit #1 in the UK?
What year did "Jack Your Body" hit #1 in the UK?
Who had a hit single with "jack the groove"?
what group's productions for Mel and Kim added elements of house to the europop sound?
what was the name of mel and kim's number-one hit single in the UK?
what tour boosted house in the UK in the late 80s?
when did the DJ International Tour take place?
what was the name of MARRS' number-one single in October 1987?
what was frequently an important element of UK house music?
Sample montages were a key difference between british house music and what?
who released the hit single "promised land"?
who covered and charted the single "promised land"?
who was the resident of the Ministry of Sound?
who did Justin Berkmann bring into the club to play?
what cities in the UK had major house scenes?
what helped to bolster house music in the uk?
what were the earliest and most influential record labels in UK house music?
what was network records also known as?
what type of dance music was later introduced alongside American house music?
what was a top club for house music in new york city?
who was a pioneer of the genre in america?
what hit house song did todd terry cover? 
what new influences led to a new house sound?
what was different about the bass-line in the hip-hop influenced house songs?
what label launched the careers of burrell?
what sound are the burrell's responsible for? 
how much can old vinyl releases of the burrells sell for today?
what label were the burrell's briefly with before their success?
what madonna single is credited as helping bring house music to the mainstream?
when was madonna's hit single "vogue" released?
what decade did house music hit the mainstream in the us?
who sang the hit single "vogue"?
how well did madonna's single "vogue" do in the us? 
What gospel/R&B-influenced group released "Time Passes On" in 1993?
who released the hit single "time for the perculator" in the us?
what was cajmere's alternate name?
what was the name of the label operated by dj funk in chicago?
what was the prototype of ghetto house?
where did the "chilling out" concept develop?
who released the album analogue bubblebath?
where was the band deee-lite based?
who released the track "little fluffy clouds"?
who transformed happy mondays' "wrote for luck" into a dance hit?
what act was passed in england in an attempt to ban large rave dance events?
what was the nail in the coffin for illegal raves?
when did the bill become a law? 
what single introduced dub and reggae into the house sound?
who recorded the hit single "release the pressure"?
where was a new type of club called Cream located?
what was a new subgenre of house in chicago, developed by bad boy bill and others, called?
george centeno, darren ramirez, and martin o. cairo developed a hard house sound in what city?
what was another name for hardcore techno from the netherlands?
who began opening "superclubs"?
Daft Punk began producing a new sound out of what european city?
When did Daft Punk begin producing a new sound?
Daft Punk, Stardust, Cassius, St. Germain, and DJ Falcon all came from what scene?
When was House Unity Day in Chicago?
Who proclaimed House Unity Day in Chicago?
In 2005, what anniversary was house music celebrating?
what was recognized as the original home of house music in 2005?
What event was organized by Chicago's Department of Cultural Affairs to celebrate house music?
Defected Records was at the forefront of what type of house music?
Roule and Om was at the forefront of what type of house music?
Dennis Ferrer produced what type of house fusion?
in what time period did fusion genres of house emerge?
Where did the Winter Music Conference take place? 
The Shambhala Music Festival was dedicated to what? 
where did house music gain popularity in the middle east?
what event led to an increase in popularity for house music in the middle east?
what large event in Miami was industry sponsored?
What was different about swedish progressive house music?
Sebastian Ingrosso, Axwell, and Steve Angello formed what successful trio?
What concept is characterized by abrasive leads and darker arpeggios?
Progressive house blended sounds were prominent in the song "Marry the Night" by what popular artist?
Big room house has found increasing popularity since what year?
There has been a reunification of contemporary house with what?
Why do many hip hop and R&B artists turn to house music?
What genre of artists has recently turned to house music to add mass appeal?
The terms uppercase and lowercase originated from the common layout which type of drawers?
Besides being a single word or two separate words, how can the words uppercase and lowercase be expressed?
In relation to the shelf the small letters were located, where were the capital letters?
Which characteristic of capital letters made it easy to remember.
What is the basis of capitalization standards for the sentence-style capitalization?
What is the popular capitalization structure and standard used by many British publishers and U.S. newspapers?
What is an alternative name for sentence-style capitalization?
Which popular global publisher utilizes sentence case for titles and headers?
Besides headlines, what is sentence-style capitalization often applied to?
Which century did the lower-case script for the Greek Alphabet originate?
Which century did the Greek alphabet acquire its quadrilinear form?
Overtime which type of letter forms were mixed increasingly into the Greek language script?
Which year is the earliest dated Greek lower-case text?
In which literature is the earliest dated Greek lower-case text?
In orthography and typography, what is the distinction between the letters that are in larger upper case and lower upper case
Minuscule is a term uses to describe which case of letter?
Capital letters refer to which case of letter?
Letter case is used to distinction betweem lowercase and uppercase letter in which common representation of certain languages?
Capitalization in English is universally standardized for which type of writing?
In English the first letter of a sentence is which type of letter?
What is capitalization commonly use to indicate in poetry independent of any grammatical feature?
How is the first letter of a first-person pronoun handled mid sentence in English?
The interjection "O" has been replaced by which more common and preferred word in English?
Originally alphabets were written entirely in which type of letter?
Rounder and simpler forms of letters came from writing quickly with which instrument?
Who developed the Carolingian minuscule script for handwriting?
Carolingian minuscule script quickly spread across which continent?
What is a common advantage of miniscule over majuscule handwriting?
What is often prescribed by the grammar of a language or by conventions of a particular discipline?
Which kind of purpose is uppercase reserved for in orthography?
Which is the most common variant of case in text?
Engineering design drawings typically utiilze which case of letter in labeling?
Why are uppercase letters preferred often times when space is restricted?
Papyri from Herculaneum dating before 79 AD have been to to be written in which hand writing?
Whicy papyrologist theorized lowercase letter actually developed from the fifth century uncials?
Which continents languages with few exceptions generally did not utilize case distinction until about the year 1300?
What was the initial difference between majuscule and minuscule letters? 
Which type of document was general unicameral because the writer used one type of writing but not another?
What is capitalization of significant words applied to in the United States besides titles?
Capitalization of significant words refers to which family of typographic conventions?
Which book of literature standards suggests capitalizing the first word and all nouns, pronouns, adjectives, verbs, and adverbs?
The use of bold fonts and capilization in titles falls under which unusual grammatical distinction?
What was the name of the nomad tribes that hunted bison?
Along which river did they hunt bison?
How did the Chichimeca survive?
The Chichimeca are the ancestors of what people?
The Jornado painted onto what surface?
Which city did Villa raid?
Which American president pursued Villa?
How long did the American troops pursue Villa?
In which city was Villa killed?
In which year was Villa assassinated?
Which nicknames were used to form the conservative and liberal elements?
Which was the third party?
In which year was the body installed?
Which party had gained control?
Who was the Durango governor?
In which region of the state did culture develop?
To what does Casas Grandes translate in English?
Which prehistoric culture did Casas Grandes stem from?
What city was the center of the Casas Grandes civilization?
To what does Cuarenta Casas translate in English?
Which state is the largest in the country by land?
What percentage of the country does it make up?
Which state borders Chihuahua to the direct west?
Which U.S. state borders to the northeast?
The Chihuahuan Desert is home to many of which type of animal?
Which type of reptile is most common in the desert?
Mephitis macroura is which type of mammal?
The state has great diversity thanks to the large number of what?
What type of life varies greatly with the elevation in the mountains?
The state is home to one of the largest variation species of which genus?
Several species of which type dot the steppe and transition zone?
Which city is known for its sand dunes?
The transition zone between east and west is called what?
Both types of climate zones in the eastern part of the state are what?
What type of land dominates in the eastern part of the state?
The state hosts populations of birds of both endemic species and what?
Cynanthus latirostris is what type of bird?
Aquila chrysaetos is what type of bird?
Which endemic species has symbolic significance to Mexicans?
Agriculture varies across the state because of the variation in what?
Which fruit does the state rank first in production?
The state produces lots of dairy which large processors of what dairy product?
The state ranks second in the production of what type of wood?
The state ranked second with over 150,000 metric tons of what metal?
What group continuously attacked Mexican settlements?
How many military colonies were established by the state?
The military colonies replaced what as population centers?
How many men per 1000 residents were mandated to defend?
The desert zone accounts for how much of the state's surface area?
The Chihuahuan Desert also extends into which neighboring Mexican state?
The desert zone's topography is mostly what shape?
Lower elevations and higher temperature are found in which region of the state; north, south, east, or west?
Which well-known river runs in the northern part of the state?
Canis latrans is what animal?
Ursus Americanus is what animal that is found in relatively small numbers?
The main cause of degradation has been what?
What type of snake is most popular in the region with many different species?
The last census in Mexico that asked for race was carried out in which year?
According to the census of 1921, what percentage of citizens were Mestizo?
The second largest group of people were whom?
What type of sensation is pitch?
What is pitch closely related to?
Each persons perception of sound is called?
What is the most common method of organization?
The pitch ratio between any two successive notes is?
All these different methods have what in common?
Pitch is the auditory attribute to what?
Pitch is a close proxy for what?
High pitch is what type of oscillation?
Low pitch is what type of oscillation?
This produces many modes of vibration that occur simultaneously?
A listener can hear how many frequencies at once?
Harmonics are an important class of what?
Integer multiples are collectively called? 
The pitch of complex tones can be?
A complex tone is composed of how many waves?
 The percept at 200 Hz is commonly referred to as?
the percept at 200 Hz is commonly referred to as the missing fundamental, which is often?
The just-noticeable difference, at which a change is perceived depends on what?
The jnd is typically tested by?
What is the range of perceptible pitch steps to human hearing?
Which drum has a higher perceived pitch even though they both have indefinite pitch?
Repetition pitch is caused by what phenomenon?
It is possible and often easy to roughly discern the relative pitches of two sounds of what?
The notion of pitch is insensitive to what?
The description "G4 double sharp" refers to the same pitch as what?
Human perception of musical intervals is approximately what?
Music theorist represent pitches using what kind of scale?
When did King Richard I begin his reign?
Which animal is the main motif of England's national football team?
What type of headgear originally appeared on the lions' heads on England's national football team motif?
In which year was the FA given an official coat of arms by the College of Arms?
Since 2003, England has topped their logo with a star to recognize their World Cup win in which year?
What color were England's first away kits?
What color are the socks traditionally worn in England's away kits?
Three times in 1996, England wore what color socks in their away kits instead of the traditional red socks?
In 2011, England introduced a new away kit in what color?
When a new edition of England's away kit has been introduced, the kit is sometimes worn during what type of matches?
In what year did Capello resign as England's football manager?
Capello resigned as England's football manager after a dispute over removing which player from team captaincy?
Who became the new manager of England's football team in May of 2012?
In which round of UEFA Euro 2012 was England eliminated?
A defeat by which team ultimately eliminated England from UEFA Euro 2012?
Which governing body controls the England national football team?
Which other team, besides England, is one of the  two oldest national teams in football?
In what year did England and Scotland play the world's first international football match?
What is the name of England's home field in London?
Who is the current team manager of England's football team?
In which place did England finish in the UEFA European Football Championship in 1968?
In how many UEFA European Championship Finals has England competed?
Where does England rank in terms of the number of UEFA European Football Championship appearances?
In what four years was England eliminated from the UEFA European Championship in the first round?
In which five years did England fail to qualify for the UEFA European Championship?
What event cause shipping activities to be suspended?
Petrochemical refineries and manufacturing plants were built due to the demand for what items during the war?
When was Ellington Field built?
When was the Brown Shipbuilding Company founded?
What was the policy created by President Roosevelt due to the boom in defense jobs?
What kind of refineries were built along the Houston ship channel?
To fill what type of demand were refineries built?
What world event caused this increased need for petrochemicals?
Why did thousands of new workers flock to Houston?
Which president created a policy of non-discrimination for defense contractors?
In what year did the space shuttle Challenger explode after launch?
Why did Houston's economy have problems in the late 1980's?
In the 1990's, what is something Houston did to try to diversify it's economy?
The petroleum industry has become a larger part of Houston's economy again for what reason?
What caused population growth to decline  in the 1980s?
When did Houston begin to regain its dependence on the oil industry?
What did Houston focus on after the 1990s recession to improve its economy?
When did Houston suffer an economic decline?
Which shuttle disintegrated in 1986 to cause a decline in the space industry?
What materials are underpinning the land surface of Houston?
Houston's geology was formed from river deposits from the erosion of what mountains?
The sand and clay deposited onto decaying marine matter transformed into what?
What is halite?
What type of farming is Houston's surface soil good for?
Besides sands, what are the foundations of Houston's land?
How deep are the clay and sands foundations of Houston?
What geological event caused the foundations of the land beneath Houston?
What agricultural crop was farmed in the rich soils on the outlying areas of Houston?
What did the decaying organics under the clay and sand deposits later form?
Houston ranked 3rd in which category by Forbes magazine in 2006?
How many offices have been established in Houston by foreign governments?
How many foreign governments maintain trade and commercial offices in Houston?
How many foreign banks operate in Houston?
How many nations do the 25 foreign banks operating in Houston represent?
When did the Houston area rank first in Texas for business?
How did Houston rank in the U.S. for business?
How many consular offices does Houston have?
How many foreign countries have trade offices in Houston?
How many nations do the twenty-five foreign banks represent?
What is the largest annual event held in Houston?
How long does the Houston Livestock Show and Rodeo last?
When is the annual Houston Pride Parade held?
What is some other annual events held in Houston?
What art festival held in Houston is one of the top 5 in the US?
What event is the longest running in Houston?
When is the Houston Livestock show and Rodeo held?
When is the Houston Pride Parade held?
What form of car parade is held in Houston?
Where does the Bayou City Art Festival rank in U.S. art festivals?
Who is the current mayor of Houston?
What form of government does Houston have?
Who are Houston's elected officials?
What does Houston's mayor also serve as?
Besides the general management of the city, Houston's mayor is also responsible for what?
What is the form of city  government in Houston?
What type of municipal elections are held in Texas?
Besides the mayor and controller, how many members are there on the city council?
Who is the mayor of Houston since the last election?
To what political party is Mayor Turner aligned? 
What commodity was Houston known for in 1860? 
What type of roads converged in Houston?
Which Civil War general used Houston as a headquarters?
For what battle was Houston used as an organization point ?
What was Houston known for by 1890?
What event caused 2.5 million people to evacuate through Houston?
The evacuation of the Gulf coast before Hurricane Rita was what type of evacuation?
How many people evacuated to Houston after Hurricane Katrina?
Fearing traffic problems, how many people refused to leave Galveston before Hurricane Ike?
When did Hurricane Ike hit the Houston area?
What is the largest city in the U.S. without formal zoning?
Besides parking requirements, what land use regulations does Houston have?
What is Houston's land use policies credited with producing?
What serious situation of 2008 was Houston spared?
How many building permits were issued in 2008 in Houston?
Of what is Houston a center?
What has the Houston ship channel served to promote into success?
Where does the Port of Houston rank in international commerce?
Where does Houston rate in the size ranking of world ports?
What lines begin or end in Houston?
How much area of downtown Houston does the Theater District cover?
What place produces live concerts, plays and comedy?
Where is Space Center Houston?
What tourist offerings does the Space Center have?
What is the Galleria the largest of in Texas?
Which stadium is located in east downtown in Houston?
Where in Houston is the Toyota Center located?
What was the first indoor stadium in the world?
What is the home of the Texans named?
What is the name of the stadium that hosts the Houston Astros?
Until 2010, which airline made Houston its headquarters?
Where is United Airlines' largest air hub?
With which airline did Continental Airlines merge?
How many daily flights did United Airlines offer from Houston?
In what year was Bush Intercontinental named a model by U.S. Customs?
What city has more Fortune 500 headquarters than Houston?
What part of Houston ranks first in the U.S. in international tonnage?
What is Houston's nickname? 
What is varied about Houston's population?
What city is the most diverse in Texas?
How much money does the University of Houston attract to Houston a year?
How many local jobs are produced by the University of Houston?
How many student graduate from the University of Houston per year?
Where do most university graduates stay after acquiring a degree?
Even after five years, how many graduates remain in Houston?
What event caused an increase in effort to promote the Houston port?
Where was oil found that promoted the development of the oil industry in Houston?
Near what Texas city is the Spindletop oil field located?
In what year did Houston's population reach 78,000?
Who approved the improvement project for the Houston ship channel?
What is the square mile area of Houston?
How much of Houston's total area is water?
In what topography is Houston located?
How is the vegetation of the area classified?
What kind of weather event is a recurring problem for Houston?
What is the political climate of Houston?
Who in Houston tends to vote Republican?
How do the working and minority areas vote in Houston?
What percent of Hispanics vote Democrat?
What percent of non-Hispanic whites vote Republican?
What Houston medical school ranks in the top ten U.S. medical schools?
How does MD Anderson Cancer Center rank in US hospitals dealing with cancer care?
What type of treatments does the Menninger Clinic offer?
What is the third largest acute care center in the U.S.?
Where is the Triumph Healthcare hospital headquartered?
Where did Houston rank for job creation in 2013?
How many jobs did Houston add for every one lost?
How many foreign companies relocated to Houston?
On what Forbes list did Houston appear in 2013?
What was Houston the first city to do regain after the recession caused job loss?
How many community colleges serve Houston?
How are the Houston Community College and Lone Star College systems ranked among educational facilities?
What college system serves most of Houston?
Which community college system serves the northwestern and northeastern areas?
What part of Houston does San Jacinto College serve?
What is the second airport that serves Houston?
What was the earlier name of Hobby Airport?
When was Houston International Airport renamed to Hobby Airport?
Which airline now offers international flights from Hobby Airport?
For what is Hobby Airport ranked in the top five performing airports?
What system of incorporation was used in 1837 by Houston?
What is the present day system being used by Houston for representation?
What highway is used to designate locations in Houston?
Beside older pre-World War II residences, what is found inside the Loop? 
What highway circles the outer areas of Houston?
How did Kiplinger's Personal Finance Best Cities rate Houston?
When did Houston receive a ranking in the top of Kiplinger's Best cities list?
Where did Forbes magazine place Houston for technological innovation?
Where did Houston place for Fortune 500 companies?
When was Houston ranked the best city for shopping?
For which sports team category does Houston not have a team ?
Since what year have the Houston Rockets been a Houston team?
When were the Houston Astros formed?
Until 1965 what were the Houston Astros called?
When were the Houston Astros in the World Series?
How many members did the original Houston city council have?
How many at-large positions were there originally?
What areas do at-large council members represent?
What population figure needs to be passed to add at large council members?
How many at-large council members were added in the 2011 elections?
What is the type of freeway system that serves Houston?
What encircles the downtown area of Houston?
What is the diameter of the downtown area?
What part of the freeway system is Beltway 8?
What is the diameter of the center of Beltway 8?
How does Houston's George Bush Intercontinental Airport rank for number of passengers?
How many destinations does George Bush Intercontinental Airport serve?
When did the U.S. Department of Transportation name IAH as fastest growing of U.S. airports?
Where is the Houston Air Route Traffic Control Center located?
What is Houston's primary airport?
What material were the gates of the Temple of Jerusalem made from?
How is Corinthian bronze made?
Where do archeologists believe that alchemy was first practiced? 
What metal was used to make surgical equipment in ancient India?
What is the name of the battery that was developed using copper in 248 BC?
What metal is used most often in electrical wiring?
What is the most important market for copper today?
How much of mined copper is used for cables and electrical wiring?
What metal are most overhead electrical wires made out of?
What is one property of copper that makes it so useful in electrical wiring?
What word means that bacteria won't grow on a substrate?
What has pure copper been replaced with in the building of ships?
Because of copper's biostatic properties where is a common use for copper?
In the aquaculture industry what is copper alloys commonly used to make?
Name a property that makes copper a good material to use in marine environments?
What group of the periodic table is copper in?
Name a property that copper, silver and gold have in common.
What makes copper bondings weaker than other metals?
How is copper normally supplied?
What is a weaker form of copper than fine-grained polycrystalline?
What are compounds that have a carbon-copper bond called?
What does organocopper compounds reactions toward oxygen form?
What is produced when copper compounds are treated with organolithium reagents?
Coupling products can be made by substituting Gilman reagent with what?
Which form of copper is shock sensitive?
Who used copper to produce art?
What is the photographic technology that uses copper called?
What famous NY city landmark is made from copper?
What famous explorers ships was one of the first to have it's hulls made of copper?
When did The Norddeutsche Affinerie electroplating plant first begin production?
What property of copper increases the efficiency of electrical motors?
What percentage of electrical consumption does motor systems use globally?
What percentage of electrical consumption does motor systems use in industry?
What does the acronym NEMA stand for?
By using copper motor rotor technology it is allowing industry to exceed what standards?
Name a compond that can mobilize sold copper?
What fungi can grow in copper metalliferous soils?
What fungus protects pine trees from copper toxicity? 
What fungus grows from gold mining solution?
What fungus helps to soften heavy metal sulfides?
What are copper compounds in liquid form used for?
What does copper wires along with zinc on roofs help to prevent?
What function does copper serve when used in textile fibers?
How is copper used with nickel?
What is used to treat structures for dry rot?
How long has copper been in use?
What percentage of copper has been extracted since 1900?
How much of mined cooper has been extracted in the last 24 years?
How much copper is estimated to exsist on earth?
What is a major source of cooper in modern times?
What did Romans use as money in the 6th through 3rd centuriesBC?
What became more important than the copper value for Roman coins?
Who had his own coins produced out of brass?
During the 6th through 3rd centuries BC how much copper was mined in Rome?
Cctavianus Augustus Caesar had his coins made out of what alloys?
What percentage of copper is used in electrical wires?
What percentage of copper is used in roofing and plumbing?
What percentage of copper is used in industrial machinery?
What property does combining copper with brass or bronze create?
What is a metal that copper is combined with to create a greater hardness?
In what form is copper extracted?
From what types of mines is copper extracted?
What percentage of copper do the deposits have that are extracted?
What country was the top producer of copper in 2005?
What is the name of the process being considered in Arizona that allows copper to be recovered?
What pigment color is natural to copper?
What property does the final patina on cooper have?
What mixture of compounds is the final patina?
What conditions effect the mixture of carbonate and sulfate in copper?
What can be done to copper to give it a certain look?
What are copper salts sometimes used for?
When ingested in large amounts what does copper salts produce in humans?
What is the minimum amount of copper rabbits should have in their diet?
What is a major benefit to rabbits having a higher concentration of copper in their diet?
What amount of copper salt is toxic in animals?
What is the alloy of copper and nickel called?
what is the alloy of copper and nickel used for?
What is the metal composition of a US nickel?
What extraordinary property does the alloy made up of 90% copper and 10% nickel possess?
What color is created when the alloys of copper and aluminium are combined?
What is the name of the componds that has more than one alcohol functional group?
What are copper salts used to test?
How is the presence of sugar shown by using Benedict's reagent and Fehling's solution?
What color does the copper salts turn to using Benedict's reagent and Fehling's solution if sugar is present?
What does Schweizer's reagent dissolve?
What is the level of copper in the human body?
How is copper absorbed in humans?
What is copper bound with when it is sent to the liver?
What protein carries the majority of copper in blood?
How can the body get rid of excess copper?
What has copper been used for since ancient times?
In recent times what is one interior use copper been expanded to include?
What is an important benefit to using copper as an architectural material?
How long has copper been used in building construction?
What is the benefit to using copper for things such as counter tops and hand rails?
Self-image, self-esteem, and individuality relate to what?
What aspect or type of identity does Weinreich single out?
What psychological concept does Weinreich state as between the past and future?
A person's identity is defined as the totality of what?
What group has shifted the focus of research in identity?
What does a researcher have to identify to carry out empirical research?
What researcher advocated for focus on the boundaries of ethnic groups rather than the cultural aspects of ethnic groups?
If identity is a virtual site, what do boundaries supply to the virtual site?
Boundaries are frequently used by researchers to help define what?
What is distinct from the self?
What can the literature of self-psychology offer insight into?
What have theorists shown interest in relating to the self-concept?
The I and the Me are two areas of interest in what?
Self-psychology is compelled to investigate how personal self relates to what?
What two factors are focused on when explaining an individual's actions within a group?
What are individual cognition and collective behavior are levels of?
What term have Anthropologists employed to refer to the Eriksonian idea of selfhood?
Modern concerns with ethnicity and social movements in the 1970's led what group to be more interested in identity?
Until recently, what approach was used to refer to qualities of sameness in relation to a person's connection to others?
What are the two types of group boundaries?
A marker that imposes restriction on the behavior of others is what kind of boundary?
A marker that people are ready and willing to associate with is what kind of boundary?
What boundary is given as an example that can be inclusive or exclusive?
What identity status paradigm emerged due to the work of James Marcia?
The Neo-Eriksonian identity status paradigm focuses on what twin concepts?
In the Neo-Eriksonian identity status paradigm, exploration and commitments determine what in large part?
What do many people gain from their identity groups?
People favoring those in their group over outsiders, is an example of what?
Belonging and discrimination are both important to researchers working in what tradition?
Distinction between in and out groups has been shown to affect people's evaluations of others in work related to what?
What approach takes the sense of self and belonging as a fixed thing?
The view that identity is based on a political choice of characteristics is rooted in what theory?
Primordialist and social constructionist views need to be understood in what contexts?
Various research traditions are using what lens to examine phenomena?
What stigma do correctional officers have to deal with?
The implications of identity and identity construction are discussed in what settings?
What are people in stigmatized jobs forced to create?
What are the two examples give for justifications and values for occupational choices?
What may a person display in terms of both exploration and commitments?
What is the permutation when a person lacks exploration and commitment?
What is the permutation when a person has not chosen goals in the past but is willing to in the future?
What is the permutation when a person is ready to make commitments but unable to commit?
What is the permutation when a person commits to identity choices?
Many scholars confuse identity as a category of practice and what other category?
What do many scholars demonstrate a tendency towards?
The idea that identity is made of components that are identified by individuals is what idea? 
Some scholars try to introduce new concepts to capture the fluid qualities of what?
What is it impossible to do with identity?
Who was one of the earliest psychologists to take an explicit interest in identity?
What distinction is sometimes referred to as the self?
The personal idiosyncrasies that separate individuals are called what?
What are the 3 names for the collection of a person's social roles?
In what tradition is Erikson's work to track identity formation throughout a lifetime?
Who formulated the classifications of strategic manipulator, pastiche personality and the relational self?
In what classification is a person who regards all experiences are role play and becomes alienated from his or her social self?
In what classification is a person who gives up the chance for a true self and adopts social perceptions of him or herself?
In what classification is a person who gives up their exclusive sense of self and defines him or herself only in terms of social engagement?
The strategic manipulator, pastiche personality, and relational self are linked to the rise of what culture?
What concept helps map and define people's experiences of self in society?
What is a volatile, flexible, and abstract thing?
Language, dress, behavior, and choice of space are affected by recognition by what group?
What do markers help create?
Markers can be used to exert what on other people?
What is the third fastest growing economy in India?
What is Himachal Pradesh ranked in the highest per capita of Indian States?
What enables Himachal to sell hydroelectricity to other states?
What three things is the economy of the state dependent on?
What other Indian states does it sell hydroelectricity to?
When did the Chief Commissioners Province of HP come into being?
When was the State of Himchal Pradesh Act passed?
When did Himachal emerge as the 18th state of the Indian Union?
When did Himachal Pradesh become a union territory?
Why did the  Chief Commissioners Province of HP come into being?
When did Congress secure an absolute majority?
How many seats did Congress win?
Who was sworn in as HImachal Pradesh's Chief Minister for a record sixth term?
Who administered the oath of office and secrecy?
Where was the oath of office and secrecy taken?
What is the state well known for?
The majority of all households in Himachal own a what?
What is considered pure and used as a ritual cloth?
What is Kullu famous for?
What are Kangra and Dharamshala famous for?
What tribes inhibited the area that now constitutes Himachal Pradesh?
What time periods did the Indus Valley civilization flourish?
Who conquered Kangara?
When did Mahmud Ghanznavi conquer Kangara?
Who marched through the lower states and captured and forts and fought many battles?
What does Himachal have a rich heritage of?
Has the demand increased or decreased for handcrafts?
What handcrafts do they include?
What declined under competition?
Has the demand increased inside or outside the country?
Who heads the Himachal Pradesh?
Who maintains law and order?
Where did the state place on population chart?
Who was 22nd of chart?
Who was top ranked in population strength?
Who was last in population strength?
What other religions form a small percentage?
Who are mainly Buddhists?
What is the Muslim population in Himachal Pradesh?
Where do Sikhs mostly live?
HOw much of the population do Sikh's make up?
When did the Gurkhas come into power?
Where did the Gurkhas come into power?
Who lead the Gorkas to siege Kangra?
In 1806 who did Gorkas defeat with the help of provincial chiefs?
Who rendered help to the British government during the revolt?
What does the Himachal legislature consist of?
Who presides over meetings?
Who is the Judiciary system made up of?
Who is the head of state appointed by the President of India?
How long are the terms of office?
Who has an active community of journalists and publishers?
What are the newspapers famous for?
What is available in Shimla and district headquarters?
What are the newspapers that are in Hindi and read widely?
What has grown significantly?
Who was elected as chief minister of the state of India?
How many seats did the BJP win?
Who is BJP's Chief MInister of Himachal Pradesh?
When did the BJP secure a landslide victory?
When was he sworn in?
What type of agriculture is in the state?
Who is the largest vegetable producing district in the state?
Where is seed potato mostly grown?
What is the district of Sirmaur famous for?
What is the state deficient in?
When was the state run Nehru Government Engineering College started?
What is the most renowned argricultural institues?
What are a few pioneer universities in the state?
What is Dr. Yashwant Singh Parmar University earned?
What is Doordarshan?
What is provided by BSNL and others throughout the state?
What is available in few cities?
Who are the cellular phone operators available?
What is All India Radio?
Where do 90% of the population live in Himachal Pradesh?
No single house is without?
What are the villages well connected to?
What is Himachal Pradesh rank according to the 2005 Transparency international survey?
What are the most visited places in the country?
What is nonverbal communication?
What is one example of nonverbal communication?
What is an example of a voluntary intent of a message related to nonverbal communication?
What is an example of an involuntary intent of a message related to nonverbal communication?
What percentage of human communication occurs through nonverbal facial expressions?
Why do fungi communicate?
How do fungi communicate with insects?
How many primary signalling molecules are known to organize different behavioral patterns?
What enables an organism to differentiate between self and other?
What is an example of "noise" that is filtered out through the interpretation processes?
What acts are included in communication between parties?
The forms of the acts included in communication depends on what?
What is one dimension that communication is typically described along?
What is one target of communication?
Who said that we should examine the impact a message has on the recipient of the message?
What is human communication defined as?
When does language learning primarily occur most intensively?
How many human languages are there?
What do human languages use to communicate with others?
What is an example of a language that is not restricted to properties of human language?
What is some factors in family communication that could affect communication between family members?
What are some time periods that family communication study looks at?
What does trusted communication in a family lead to?
How is animal communication defined?
What is the study of animal communication called?
What is the study of human communication called?
What are some fields of knowledge concerning the animal world that have been revolutionizes in the 21st century?
What field of communication has been investigated more thoroughly?
Who introduced the first major model for communication in 1949?
What did the first model for communication consist of?
What was the sender in the initial model?
What was the channel in the initial model?
What was the receiver in the initial model?
A simple model is also referred to as what?
What kind of message is sent in a simple model?
In what form is the information or content sent in a simple model?
How is information sent through a simple model?
What are the strengths of the simple model?
How are the sender and receiver connected in a slightly more complex form of communication model?
What is the model of communication in which the sender and receiver are connected reciprocally called?
What is communication viewed as?
What is something that may alter the intended meaning of a message?
What is something that may cause the reception and decoding of the content of a message to be faulty?
What is a form of communication observed within plants?
What part of a plant communicates with rhizome bacteria, fungi, and insects within the soil?
What is the meaning of the word neuron in Greek?
How do plants communicate to warn nearby plants of danger?
How are the plant roots able to communicate with rhizome bacteria, fungi, and insects within the soil?
What describes communication as creative and dynamic rather than discrete?
What ancient civilization did Harold Innis use as an example of his theory?
Who theorized that the types of media people use to communicate will offer different possibilities for the shape of society?
What did Harold Innis call papyrus?
What did Space Binding make possible for the ancient Egyptian civilizations?
Why do communications professionals typically specialize in only one or two areas of communication?
Good people skills is a qualification that is important to what profession?
What kind of companies may engage in only a few types of communications?
What is one of the most important qualifications for a communications professional to have?
What color are white grapes?
What gene makes grapes purple?
What shape do grapes usually resemble?
What type of food are grapes?
How many grapes are generally in a cluster?
What do people in France eat more of that in most western countries?
What kind of the wine is regularly consumed by the French?
What is the phenomenon that shows that the French have less heart disease, even though they eat more animal fat?
What is a potential health benefit from drinking alcohol?
What type of wine is fermented with grape skin?
What type of wine is fermented after the grapes skin has been removed?
What substance is absorbed by wine when grapes are fermented with their skins?
What type of wine is believed to have more health benefits?
What are grapes that are eaten raw classified as?
What are grapes that are used to make wine classified as?
What specie are table grapes and wine grapes?
What Classification of grapes are typically large and seedless?
What percentage of a wine grape is sugar when it is harvested?
How many seedless grape sources are there for commercial cultivators? 
How many varieties of seedless grapes are there? 
What species of grape are grown by Thompson Seedless? 
What type of climate are Benjamin Gunnels's Prime seedless grapes specifically cultivated for? 
What species of grape are grown by Black Monukka?
What are the most abundant polyphenolics in purple grapes?
What is the laboratory index of antioxidant strength in grapes known as? 
What content of a grapes skin can be affected by soil composition, climate, and cultivation practices? 
Why causes antioxidant strength to be higher in purple grapes?
What is the main phenolic in white grapes?
What church uses wine to celebrate the Eucharist?
When was Jesus Christ known to have used wine in celebration? 
Where in the Code of Canon Law does it say that wine must be natural and not corrupt?
What may a priest use in place of wine for consecration for health reasons?
What is the Catholic dogma known as that believes that consecrated bread and wine from the Last Supper literally became the body and blood of Jesus Christ?
What must an operator deviate from to harm the computer?
What is computer security also known as?
What is the protection of information systems?
What are the ways an operator can malpractice?
What is the practice that includes controlling physical access to hardware?
What were researchers in 2011 able to use as a successful attack vector?
In cars with built-in voice recognition features, what can the onboard microphones be used for?
Wifi, bluetooth, and cell phone networks are examples of what?
Assuming access has been gained to the car's internal controller area network, what is it possible to do?
What network is used to contact concierge and emergency assitance services as well as getting navigational and entetainment information?
How many organisations are estimated to maintain computer systems with effective detection systems?
What is the basic evidence gathered by that puts criminals behind bars?
The primary obstacle to the eradication of cyber crime is the excessive reliance on what?
What is the source of the quote?
Electronic theft of data is causing more loss than what? 
Technology that is used to implement secure operating systems is one use of what term?
What does EAL stand for?
What is the standard of EAL4?
What is the standard for EAL6?
What is an example of a system that meets EAL6?
When was Chine's network security and information technology leadership team established?
What country has a network security and information technology leadership team??
What is the act of surreptitiously listening to a private conversation?
Conversations that people eavesdrop on are typically between who?
Who has used programs such as Carnivore and NarusInsight to eavesdrop on the systems of internet service providers?
Eavesdropping on a closed system via the faint electro-magnetic trasmissions generated by the hardware has been referred to as what by the NSA?
What are machines that operate with no contact to the outside world called?
What are desktop computers and laptops commonly infected with?
Constructing a botnet to attack another target is an example of the activity of what?
Activity trackers are an example of what?
What could wifi, bluetooth, and cellphone network on devices be used as?
What could be remotely activated after a sucessful breach?
What does ACL stand for?
ACLs and capability based security are two security models capable of what?
A host computer tricked into indirectly allowing access to restricted files is known as what?
What must designers of systems that are ACL based do?
The confused deputy problem and the problem of not guaranteeing only one person has access are resolved by what?
In what year did over a hundred intrusions made into the Rome Laboraroty?
How were hackers able to obtain unrestricted access to Rome's networking systems?
How were hackers able to penetrate connected networks?
What is the Rome Laboratory?
Who does the Goddard Space Flight Center belong to?
According to goverment officials, what has the failure of the private sector to solve efficiently the cybersecurity problem created?
Where was the RSA Security Conference held?
Who believes that government intervention would affect innovation?
Who said "industry only responds when you threaten regulation"?
What is a virtual space free of any government intervention?
What is a potential attack vector for utilities such as the power grid?
What demonstrated equipment controlled by computers not connected to the internet can also be vulnerable?
When did the Computer Emergency Readiness Team investigate 79 hacking incidents at energy companies?
What department does the Computer Emergency Readiness Team belong to?
How did the Stuxnet worm infect industrial equipment?
Firewalls and exit procedures are considered what?
What is defined as a way of filtering network data between a host or network and another network?
What does a physical firewall consist of?
What type of machines normall have a firewall?
What compromises mainly preventative measures?
What has caused serious financial damage?
Data made public who is available to estimate the cost of an incident?
What is the amount of losses estimated from worms and viruses in 2003?
Who produces estimates of worldwide losses attributable to security breaches?
What is the underlying methodology of finding worldwide estimates for losses fur to security breaches?
Microchips vulnerabilities are introduced when?
What offers an alternative to soft-ware only computer security?
What can hardware be a source of?
What is required in order for hardware to be compromised?
Who said "Connectedness begets vulnerability?"
What organization does Jay Cross belong to?
What is the advantage of more critical infrastructure being controlled via computer programs?
What is the disadvantage of more critical infrastructure being controlled via computer programs?
Installing keyloggers and making operating system modifications are examples of ways unauthorized users for what?
Booting a tool or another operating system from a CD Rom can bypass what?
Disk encryption and Trusted Platform Module are designed to prevent what?
An unauthorized user with physical access to a computer can likely do what?
UI redress attack or User Interface redress attack is also known as what?
What is a malicious technique in which an attacker tricks the user into clicking on a button or link?
Where are the clicks meant for the top level page routed?
Where would a password typed on a seemingly authetic webpage be directed?
How istricking the user accomplished in clickjacking?
What is the name  of the movement that comporises a fairly broad spectrum of distinct but related philosophies? 
Who does Modern Orthodoxy assign a central role to?
What integrity is orthodox judaism trying to preserve?
What kind of work does orthodox Judiasm seek to transform the world with?
What is modern cutlture in conflict with?
How do orthodox women dress mosly?
what part of their body do married women cover with a scarf?
What is the Skullcap that orthodox men wear known as?
What are the fringes Orthodox men wear called?
What type of orthox men often grow beards and always wear black?
What is the written law of the Torah known as?
Who dictated the oral law to Moses?
What are the detailed explanations of how to apply and interpret the laws of the written Torah called?
What is the law that is considered the core of religious laws Orthodox Jews know today?
What is the origin of Jewish Law?
Where was Rabbi Azriel Hildesheimer from?
what was the name of the Rabbi of Altona?
What was the name of the manifesto that Rabbi Jacob Ettlinger produced?
How many rabbi's signed on with the manifesto Jacob Ettlinger published?
Where was Rabbi Samson Raphael Hirsch from?
When is a newborn boy's hair first cut?
What is done with the newborn boy's hair once it is cut?
What are grains and legumes known as?
What is the name of the prohibition against eating grains and legumes during Passover?
What text rejects the Ashkenazi prohibition against kitniyot?
Where was the written law and the oral law transmitted?
Who spoke the words of the Torah to Moses?
What were the laws contained in the written Torah known as?
Where is Moses miraculously transported to?
What law is held to be transmitted with an extremely high degree of accuracy?
What maintains a historical understanding of jewish Identity?
What does orthodoxy reject as a means of establishing Jewish identiy?
What is intermarriage typically seen as?
What does Orthodoxy strongly condemn?
What happens to most intermarried people in the orthodox community?
What do haredi Judaism and modern orthodox Judaism disagree about the application of?
what law is halakha to the Orthodox Jew?
Basic respect for human beings is known as what?
The sanctiy of human life is known as what?
What does halakha guide?
What is jewish law today based on?
what does the halakha represent to orthodox judiasm?
Where were the rules about the Torah revealed to Moses by God?
How many rules are jewish law derived from?
What law is considered to be no less the word of god?
What is the fertility rate among non-orthodox Jewish families??
What is the fertility rate among orthodox Jewish families?
What is the rate of intermarriage among orthodox Jews?
What is the intermarriage rate among non-orthodox jews?
how many raised on orthodox Jewish homes abandon orthodox Judaism typically?
Orthodox Jews subsciribing to modern orthodoxy tend to be what political alignment typically?
half of orthodox judiasm tends to lean to what political ideaology?
What political party is mostly supported by orthodox jews?
Haredi and Hasidic Jewry have a stronger connection to what country?
Haredi and Hasidic Jewry have an attachment to what movement?
What does the US national council for Young Isreal represent?
What is involvement with non-orthodox Jews known as?
What is a core beliefe that was recognized as important by orthodox Jews?
what is it important for both men and women orthodox jews to be able to do?
what is the name of the movement of liberalism?
what sometimes prefers a more lenient position on Dietray laws?
previous generations typically praciced a more lenient position in regard to what?
What are dietary laws known as?
When can the roots of orthodox judaism be traced to?
When did the German Jewry seek to reform Jewish belief?
what did orthodox jews seek to modernize?
what did the German Jewry reject about the Torah?
What do orthodox Jews express ambivalence towards?
What is the administration of the state of Isreal seen as?
What does the State of Isreal place emphasis on besides Militarism?
What does the State of Isreal place emphasis on in addition to Nationalism?
what is the Zionist administrartion of the state of Israel seen as according to the judaic way of life?
Tamudic schools are known as what?
what are the colleges married men study in called?
Haredi and Chassidic communities are threatened by assimilation and intermarriage so they do not do what with non-orthodox populaions?
Haredi Jews do not share what with other jewish sects?
What considers itself the only true heir to the Jewish tradition?
What do Orthodox Jewish movements consider all other non-orthodox moments?
What do Orthodox jewish groups characterize non-orthodox form of Judiasm as?
Orthodox Jewish groups reject what precedent?
Borough Park, Midwood, Williamsburg and Crown heights have particularly large communities of what?
Where is a sizeable and rapidly growing Orthodox community currently located besides New York State?
Where is the most rapidly growing community of American orthodox jews located?
Where do many American Orthodox Jews live?
Who did the modern orthodoxy arise from?
What do most Jews consider modern orthodoxy today?
the neo-orthodox movement holds that who's views are not accurately followed by the mordern orthodoxy?
What do Orthodox Jews turn to for guidance and practical application of jewish law?
there is a large degree of what amongst all orthodox jews?
What is the differences among regions in practices known as?
Why are the codes and responsa different in regards to details?
Who held the opinion that judiasm demands and application of torah thought to the entire realm of human experience?
What was Hirsch's approach called?
What was the Torah im Dereche Eretz aslo known as?
The Torah im Derech Eretz insisted that Jews should attempt to engage and influence what?
What type of cells do all animals have?
What is the extracellular matrix surrounding eukaryotic cells made of?
What is formed when the collagen and elastic glycoproteins surrounding eukaryotic cells are calcified? 
What are the intercellular junctions unique to animal cells?
How are cells held in place in plants and fungi?
What is the biological interaction where a predator feeds on its prey called?
The act of predation typically results in what for the prey?
What is the consumption of dead organic matter called?
Why do parasitic species lay their eggs on their prey?
The evolutionary arms race between prey and predator has resulted in what?
Ctenophora and the Cnidaria include what sea creatures?
The digestive chambers of the Ctenophora and the Cnidaria serve as what?
What are the 2 main germ systems in the Ctenophora and the Cnidaria called?
What are the Ctenophora and the Cnidaria animals sometimes called?
What differentiates placozoans from the ctenophora and the cnidaria?
What sets animals apart from bacteria  and most protists?
What are organisms called that digest food in an internal chamber?
What is another way in which animals are distinguished from plants and algae?
The blastula stage is a characteristic exclusive to what organism?
How long ago do some paleontologists believe that animals first appeared?
Fossils found in the Tonian period indicate the presence of what creatures?
Triploblastic worms were comparable in size to what other creatures?
When was the beginning of the Tonian period?
What produces tracks similar to the fossilized tracks discovered by paleontologists?
It is believed that animals evolved from what?
What are the closest known living relatives of animals?
What is the name of the supergroup that animals have been placed in by molecular studies?
The opisthokonts also include what other organisms?
Where does the name opisthokonts come from?
What are some examples of non-bilaterian animals?
What are animals whose body plans display bilateral symmetry called?
Animals in what group are thought to form a monophyletic group?
What groups is named after the trait of growth by moulting or ecdysis?
What are some animals in the Arthropoda group?
Organisms in the Arthropoda group have bodies that are divided into what?
What groups are relatives of the arthropods?
What is another name for roundworms?
Why is it more economical for scientists to study a small number of species?
Which organisms were among the first life-forms to be genetically sequenced?
Why are  the fruit fly and the nematode the most intensively studied metazoan model organisms?
Analysis of what genome has emphasised the importance of sponges, placozoans, and choanoflagellates  in explaining the arrival of 1500 ancestral genes unique to the Eumetazoa?
What are two of the most successful animal phyla?
What are some of the animals in Mollusca?
What are some of the animals in Annelida?
Why are the Mollusca and Annelida considered to be close relatives?
What are the phyla that have a ring of ciliated tentacles around the mouth called?
Animal phyla that are recognized for their lack of bilateral symmetry are thought to have come from where?
Which animal represents the oldest animal phyla?
How do sponges typically feed?
During what time were a series of phylogenomic studies conducted that found support for comb jellies as the basal lineage of animals?
What do deuterostomes and protostomes have in common?
In which group does the anus form first, with the mouth developing secondarily?
What is the process in which cells fill in the interior of the gastrula to form the mesoderm called?
What is the process in which the mesoderm is formed through invagination of the endoderm called?
What do deuterostome embryos undergo during cell division?
What is another name for flatworm?
What are some parasites included in the Platyhelminthes group?
What does acoelomates mean?
What are the flatworms closest relative?
Where are the rotifera most prominent?
How do most animals use the energy of sunlight?
What do plants use to convert inorganic molecules into carbohydrates, fats, proteins and other biomolecules?
What does photosynthesis convert the energy of sunlight into?
When an animal eats plants or another animal that has eaten plants, what happens to the reduced carbon compounds in the food?
What happens with the reduced carbon compounds in the food are broken down releasing stored solar energy?
What is the process of making beer called?
What is a building called that is used for making beer?
What is company that makes beer typically known as? 
What is beer classified as when it is made for non-commerical consumption? 
In what year was home brewing first allowed in the UK?
In breweries, what do you call a small vat that is filled with hops?
In what phase of brewing does hopped wort become beer? 
What substance settles and make beer clear after it ferments? 
How long does the fermentation process take in brewing beer? 
What substance is added to hopped wort once it cools after boiling? 
What is the main source of starch and most beer?
At what point does barley have it's hull broken up into pieces?
What takes the place of barley malt in gluten-free beer?
When is sweet wort separated during the brewing process?
Aside from barley, what is a another product founded beer that might contain gluten?
What is a brewery called that makes a small amount of beer?
What would you call a microbrewery that also has a restaurant or a pub?
In general, how much beer can a microbrewery make and still be classified as a microbrewery?
What city is home to the oldest known brewery in the world that is still active?
What year was The Benedictine Weihenstephan Brewery first licensed as a brewery?
What is the main source of the alcohol in beer?
What is the process during brewing in which sugar is metabolized into alcohol?
At what concentration can yeast no longer survive in alcohol?
What could decrease alcohol content during the brewing process?
Why would more fermentable sugars be added to be beer during the brewing process?
What type of alcohol is found in beer?
How is alcohol measured in the human body?
What type of alcohol is found in wine and distilled spirits?
What is it called when someone dies from inhaling vomit?
What could be caused by a 0.80% Blood alcohol content in a human?
What types of containers is beer generally sold in?
In addition to bottles and cans, How is beer often sold in bars?
In general, what is usually the alcohol content in most beer?
What festivals are a social tradition in many beer drinking countries?
What is a pub game that is popular in many beer drinking nations?
In what year did William IV adopt a purity law pertaining to beer?
What was the title of William IV in 1516?
What was the name of the purity law that regulated beer in 1516, and is still in use today?
Aside from water and hops, what is the only other ingredient allowed in beer?
Who was the Duke of Bavaria in 1516?
What is the main cause for the bitterness in beer?
What is the main goals for the sweetness of beer?
How is the bitterness in most beers generally measured?
The acidity of what ingredient acts as a preservative in beer?
What do you call the length of time that foam is on top of beer because of carbonation?
What is the first step of brewing when malted barley is mixed with hot water?
How is hot water referred to by brewers?
How long does the mashing step in the brewing process last?
In brewing, what do starches become during the mashing process?
What is it called when used grain is separated in the brewing process?
What causes fermentation during the brewing process when making a beer?
Which ingredient gives beer its flavor?
What vegetable is sometimes used as a grain source for beer in Brazil?
What is a popular grain source for brewing beer in Mexico?
In a recipe, what would you call the list of each source of starch in beer?
In what year were hops first known to be used in beer?
What name was Adalhard the Elder also known as in 822 AD?
In which century were hops first widely cultivated for making beer?
In which century did hops become the most popular flavoring for beer?
What would you call a mixture of ingredients used for brewing before the 16th century?
In what year was the name Porter first used for a dark beer?
In what year was the name stout first used to describe a dark beer?
What do you call a dark beer that is brewed with roasted malts or barley?
What type of yeast is used to make stout and porter beers?
In what country was Porter beer popular in 1721?
What percentage of beer was sold in cans in Sweden in 2001?
What company first created the full aperture can for beer?
In what year did Crown holdings create a can with a removable lid for beer?
What is it called when light damages beer that is not in a can?
What were cans originally believed to maintain in beer?
In addition to a lack of muscle tone, what is believed to be the main cause of the beer belly?
What condition was attributed to binge drinking in a 2004 study?
What is believed to be the glycemic index in beer?
What is the glycemic index in maltose?
What is a kettle called that is used to boil sweet wort after sparging?
How long is sweet wort boiled for after sparging?
What does boiling sweet wort destroy?
What affect do hops have in brewing when they brew for a long time?
What is generally used as starch in most beer?
How does grain become malted?
What kind of container is partially germinated grain dried in?
What happens to grain when it is soaked in water?
What does a grains starch become after an is malted?
What is the term used for the study of beer?
What is a professional called at a restaurant who advises customers about beer and food pairs?
What is a popular drinking game where beer is often considered?
What is the most popular alcoholic drink in most societies?
What year were hops first believed to be added to beer?
On what continent were hops first added to beer?
What was a Carolingian Abbot credited for adding to beer in 822?
Who was believed to have added hops to beer in 1067?
Where did Abbess Hildegard live?
What beer is better for the environment than bottled beer?
How many pounds of CO2 emissions are attributed to just one sixpack of microbrew?
What type of container can be used to transport draft beer, and is better for the environment that a bottle?
How much habitat is damaged from just one sixpack of microbrew?
How many square feet is 2.5 square meters?
What is beers primary active ingredient?
What disease can be caused by heavy alcohol consumption?
How many years are removed from an alcoholic's life expectancy?
What is the third leading cause of premature dying in the US?
How many deaths are believed to have been caused by alcohol?
What hormone can be triggered by the flavor of beer alone in males?
What year did the Neuropsychopharmacology journal publist a study about the effect on the brain of beers flavor?
What taste could significantly impact a man's desire to drink?
How many men were studied for tests on the flavor of beer in the Neuropsychopharmacology journal in 2013?
What word was dropped as a racial classification in this year's census?
What were people that had black and white ancestor classified as in this census? 
How were people with both black and American Indian ancestry recorded in this census? 
What is it called when a mixed race person in recorded as negro in this census, even if only a fraction of their ancestry is black?
Which parent was the deciding factor for how interracial persons were recorded in this census? 
In what year were census respondents first able to select more than one race? 
How many American reported being of more than one race in the Census 2000?
How many race categories were respondents able to select in the Census 2000?
What year was the last census before the Census 2000?
What organization recommended that race and ethnicity categories be combined into one question for the 2000 US census?
In what year are or racial categories first revised for the 2000 U.S. Census?
Prior to 1997, where were racial categories declared for the U.S. Census?
How did racial categories appear in the US 2000 census?
Who defines the concept of race in the United States Census?
What do the race categories in the US Census include in addition to race?
In addition to social and cultural characteristics, what else is taken into account for race classification in the US census?
How many ethnic categories are there in the US census?
In addition to Hispanic and Latino, what other ethnic category is included in the United States Census?
What association criticized the separation of race and ethnicity in the UScensus?
Members of what commission criticized the separation of race and ethnic city on the US Census?
In ethnic classification for the U.S. Census, What option do respondents have other than not Hispanic or Latino?
What country did President Frankiln Roosevelt have a good neighbor policy for in hopes of a better relationship?
In what year did a federal judge say that three immigrants from Mexico were not eligible to be citizens because of their race?
What US President wanted to treat Hispanic people as white by the federal government?
People of what descent were classified as white by the federal government at the suggestion of President Roosevelt?
In 1935, what race was a person required to be to become a United States citizen?
Who decided on the standards for the classification of race and ethnicity and federal data?
In what year did OMB revise the standards for race and ethnicity classifications?
What did OMB hope to provide with their revision on race and ethnicity in 1997?
How many races were people asked to mark on the US Census after OMB revised their standards in 1997?
How many races were people asked to report in the US census prior to 1997?
In what year were free persons first listed individually in the US census?
How were free persons listed in the US census prior to 1850?
In the 1850 US census, what was put into the color column for black persons?
If M was marked in the color column for a person in the 1850 census, How were they classified?
How were slaves listed in the 1850 US census?
What race selection did the census bureau consider getting rid of before the 2000 census?
In what year did the ancestery question stop appearing in the US census?
There were campaigns to try to get minorities to use what race category into 2010 census?
In addition to the Census, where else is the "some other race" selection an option?
What act has rules and regulations for bilingual election? 
What act has rules and regulations for meeting the credit needs of minority populations?
What act has laws about equal employment opportunities for ethnic groups?
In what year was the term race first used in the U.S. Census?
How often was a new questionnaire sheet used in the 1890 census?
How were residents listed in the census in 1890?
Why were different East Asian races divided in 1890 Census?
How many ethnicities or federal agencies required to use in data collection?
How would a person of Cuban origin be listed by the US Census Bureau?
Aside from Hispanic or Latino, what other ethnicity are federal agencies required to use?
In which ethnic category would a person of Mexican origin be listed by the US Census Bureau?
In what ethnic category would a person from Puerto Rico to be listed in the United States Census?
What color was predominantly used?
Which organization filed an accessibility lawsuit?
Other than the $100 bill, which other note is not going to be redesigned?
Who are currency readers meant to assist?
The redesign of notes is being planned by which organization?
What condition does a person have to meet to  be allowed by law on a coin?
Having portraits of leaders on coins was compared to who's policies?
When did modern day currency start getting the faces that they have?
Other than Greek and Roman mythology, who else was featured on the "heads" side of past coins?
What was the last coin to be converted to the modern day style of having historic Americans on the face?
Which year was it when paper money was first issued without the backing of precious metals?
What was the first war that caused paper money to be issued?
Which other war also caused a disconnect between paper money and precious metals?
The quick loss in value of paper money resulted in which phrase being hear?
The loss in value resulted in a clause being written in which article in the US Constitution?
What would zero inflation mean for the US dollar over time?
What would result in a slow declining of the value of the dollar over time?
Who is in favor of a zero inflation policy?
A zero inflation policy would limit who's influence and ability to react?
With a zero inflation rate, what would the central bank be unable to do other than control interest rates?
What is a "grand" sometimes shortened to?
What is another term other than "large" that means a stack of mutiple thousands?
What is a "C-note" a reference to?
Which note is occasionally called a "yardstick"?
What is another term for "bigface" notes?
What defined the US dollar?
What was the dollar based on?
How many grams of gold roughly were in an eagle?
Who made the decision to base the American Unit on the weight on the Spanish dollar?
What was the average weight of a new Spanish dollar in terms of grains?
What is specifically produced for collectors?
What is the percentage of silver in coins in the Silver Proofs?
When did the Mint being producing proof sets?
Other than the Silver Proof set, what other type of Proof set exists?
When was the production of Presidential dollar coins suspended?
What dictates that a receipt for expenditures of all public money must be published?
Which section specifically states that receipts for public money must be published?
Which currency are the sums of money in the "Statements" displayed in?
What is the unit of account of the United States?
What is the highest currently printed denomination of bill?
In which year were notes valued above $100 no longer printed?
When were bills above the $100 denomination withdrawn from circulation?
What use of higher value bills prompted Nixon to halt the use of said bills?
What was issued to halt the use of higher currency denomations?
What is the British equivalent of a "buck"?
In which century can the term "buck" be traced back to?
What kind of trade may have been the origin of the "buck"?
What was the nickname given to the Demand Note dollars that were used to finance the Civil War?
What color other than green was used on the backside of the original note?
What was the value of the U.S. dollar no longer anchored to?
Who's duty did it become to maintain the value of the U.S. currency?
What move did the Federal Reserve take that resulted in stagflation and the decline of the U.S. dollar?
What claimed that inflation and economic growth were linked?
How much value did the U.S. dollar lose between 1965 and 1981?
What was the look of the dollar based on?
In which century did the Spanish dollar start being used in Spanish America?
When was the United States Mint founded?
Outside of Mexico, where else was the Spanish dollar minted?
When were the Spanish dollar and Mexican peso no longer accepted as legal tender?
What was the name of the act introduced in the year 1900?
How much gold in grams was one dollar equivalent to?
How much was 1 troy ounce of gold worth?
Which year brought the end to silver being in dimes and quarters?
Which President confiscated gold coins?
Other than Florida, which other state got send error coins?
Where did error coins originate?
How much were error coins initially worth for collectors?
What were some amateur collectors duped into buying?
What do vending machines commonly only accept?
What power was Congress given by the Constitution?
What did Congress authorize the Federal Reserve Banks to do?
What are the notes issued by the Federal Reserve?
Where, other than any Federal Reserve bank, can notes be redeemed?
Since the 1970s, what is the only type of note that has remained in circulation?
What is the short term goal of open market operations?
What does the Federal Reserve target?
What is the federal funds rate?
What is the cajoling of certain market players to achieve specified outcomes also known as?
What does "open mouth operations" mean?
When was the Bretton Woods system established?
What was the fixed value of gold?
What was the value of the U.S. dollar linked to?
What did banks and investors do that devalued the dollar?
In which year was gold convertability terminated?
What kind of money is the U.S. dollar?
Although for some countries the dollar is not their official currency, how do they use the currency?
Other than the British Virgin Islands, what other area in the Caribbean uses the dollar as it's sole currency?
For countries that use the dollar as their paper currency, what other currency do they make?
What is an example of a U.S. coin that can be used as payment in some countries?
What are dollar notes made from now adays?
What is most common paper made of?
Since 1914, who issues the dollar banknotes?
How long do the current notes measure?
What size currency are the new smaller notes similar to?
When was the Mint Act passed?
How many grains of silver did the Mint Act define the dollar as?
Who suggested that the ratio of silver to gold should be fixed?
What market value were gold coins traded in relation to?
In what year did the shift in gold standard occur?
What are gold and silver coins valuable for now adays?
What are non primarily gold and silver coins valuable for?
What was the only coin with any silver content in circulation from 1965 to 1970?
What was the Kennedy half dollar replaced with?
How much was the experimental Stella coin valued at?
When were silver dollars first minted?
Who was featured on the copper - nickel dollar?
Which coin was introduced in 1979?
What did the new $1 coin minted in 2000 feature?
In which century were gold dollars minted?
What do coins, Federal Reserve Notes and deposits held by despository institutions make up?
What was the monetary base value in 1994?
How much did the monetar base value increase to in 2013?
What would the Federal Reserve buy to try and increase money supply?
How many times a year does the Federal Open Market Committee meet?
When was the Royal College of Chemistry established?
Which politicians donated funds to establish the Royal College of Chemistry?
Who was the first professor of the Royal College of Chemistry?
Why was the Royal College of Chemistry founded?
Who supported the Royal College of Chemistry?
When was the Royal College of Chemistry established?
What was not well taught that led to the founding of the Royal College of Chemistry?
Which country was ahead of the United Kingdom in the teaching of chemistry?
Which Prince supported the establishment of the college?
Who was the first professor of the college?
How many staff members did Imperial submit assessments of for the REF assessment?
In the 2014 rankings produced by Times Higher Education, what position was Imperial ranked for GPA?
How many units of assessment did Imperial submit?
How highly was Imperial ranked in "research power" in 2014?
How many staff members did Imperial claim to have in 2014?
What does REF stand for?
What was the percentage of Imperials research that was seemed to be 3*?
What did the REF give Imperial as an overall GPA?
What was Imperial's overall GPA rank according to the Times Higher Education?
Which day was the Imperial College Boat Club formed on?
How many alumni from Imperial were a part of the Gold medal winning GB8+?
What was the name of the coach of the Gold medal winning GB8+?
Which event has the Boat Club been highly successful at?
Which event did the Boat Club claim victory in for 2013?
What school was established in 1851?
Who established the Royal School of Mines?
A collection of miners, maps and mining equipment all belonged to what entity?
Which famous prince was a patron at the Royal School of Mines?
Which region did Prince Albert aim to make famous as an educational region?
Who granted Imperial degree-awarding powers?
In which year was the London Centre for Nanotechnology established?
The Londre Centre for Nanotechnology was a joint effort between UCL and which college?
What is the old name of the Imperial College Business School?
The Faculties of Life Sciences and Physical Sciences merged in 2005 to become which faculty?
In which area in London is Imperial's main campus located?
What is the area inside of South Kensington where Imperial is located known as?
In which decade did the expansion of the South Kensington campus being?
Who designed the Imperial Institue that was a victim of Imperial's expansion in the 1950s & 1960s?
Which landmark still remains from the Imperial Institue after Imperial's expansion?
Which centre provides electives outside of science for students?
Outside of doing it on their own time, what other motivation could students have to take non mandatory electives?
Which unit is a part of the Co-Curricular Studies that offers master's degrees?
Scientists seeking a master's degree might be interested in which other degree besides Science Communication from the Science Communication Unit?
What statistic did the average Imperial graduate rank the highest in for 2014?
Which type of graduate from Imperial earned the second highest average starting salary after graduation?
Who ranked different graduates according to their average starting salary after graduation in the UK?
Which prestigious newspaper ranked Imperial College as one of the top 10 most welcomed universities by job markets?
In which year did Imperial University claim the award for being voted the highest in the UK for Job Prospects?
What does the abbreviation STOIC stand for?
What is STOIC's modern name?
When was Imperial College Union's TV station founded?
Where was a cable link located that connected the Southside Halls of residence?
When was the station renamed to it's modern name?
Which famous automobile designer is considered a non - academic alumni?
Which famous author is considered an alumni for Imperial?
Which airline's CEO can be called a non - academic alumni of Imperial?
Which incredibly prestigious position did Huw Thomas hold?
Which hedge fund manager with a networth of over a billion is considered an alumni?
Who proposed a merger of many colleges in 1907?
What was the reasoning behind the proposal to merge many colleges?
When the merger was passed, what constituent college was created?
Who did the constituent college belong to?
Which document, granted by Edward VII, was officially signed on the 8th of July 1907?
In which year did Imperial merge with St Mary's Hospital Medical School?
Which school resulted from Imperial's merger with St Mary's?
Who did Imperial partner with to launch the Imperial College Press?
What year was the Imperial College School of Medicine formally established?
What is the name of the building that was opened by Queen Elizabeth II?
What portion of females reported that they were held back by managers?
In which year were these allegations raised?
After the 2003 incident, what was the next major year in which conerns were raised?
In which faculty were the methods used to fire people being questioned?
Who is the new President for Imperial College?
What is the official name of the student's union?
How many full time officers run the union?
How long is the tenure for an officer to run the union?
How many clubs, projects and societies is the union responsible for managing?
What kind of programmes do students work on for Project Nepal?
What kind of University is Imperial College London?
Who founded the Imperial College London?
Who opened the Imperial Institute in 1907?
Which document allowed the Imperial College London to be formed?
What was the focus of the Imperial College London?
Who discovered the first synthetic dye?
What did the scientist who discovered the dye do after discovering it?
What is the name of the first synthetic dye discovered?
The discovery of the synthetic dye is claimed by some histories to have sparked what event?
Which award is named after the discoverer of the dye?
What is the maximum length of the runway gymnasts sprint down before hurdling onto a spring board?
What is blocking using only a shoulder movement called?
What is one thing a successful vault depends on?
What may be added to a vault before landing in advanced gymnastics?
What is the maximum length of a runway?
Who gets to chose where a gymnast starts to run on the runway?
What position is the gymnast when in the air?
What are later added to the landing by advanced gymnasts?
What do successful vaults depend on other than speed of the run?
What does AGG stand for?
Why is AGG different than Rhythmic Gymnastics? 
Do athletes use apparatuses in the international AGG competitions?
What physical qualities are needed for rhythmic gymastics? 
What year was the Federsation of Aesthetic Group Gymnastics established?
What is the rope made out of that the gymnists uses in their routine?
How long is the rope?
What are at the ends of the ropes to help the gymnists hold it?
What other requirement is there for the rope?
When did FIG decide to nullify the use of ropes in competition?
Where was the FIG founded?
What year was FIG founded?
When was gymnastics included in the Olympics?
When were the first women's Olympic competitions held?
Where were the first women's Olympic competitions held?
How long is the run way in vaulting?
How man feet do vaulters land on?
What determines where a vaulter starts on the runway?
What is a round-off entry vault called?
What is the most common vault in elite level gymnastics?
How are gymnasts scored?
How is the start vaule determined?
What is this score called?
Deductions in execution and artistry are taken from what score?
What were added to scoring in 2007?
What does a typical pommel horse exercise consist of?
Single leg skills are found in the form of what normally?
What is the main staple of this event?
When does the routine end?
What are two ways that a gymnist dismounts?
What is a critical skill in terms of execution in scores?
Where do most injuries happen?
How do you avoid injuries?
What is a successful landing?
Individual routines start with what phases?
What does the gymnast do during the 10 bounces.
What is the maximum scroe for routines?
How can additional points be earned?
In high level competitions how many preliminary rountines are there?
What are the uneven bars?
What are these bars made out of?
Why are the bars not made of wood anymore?
How have the bars changed over the years?
How do gymnasts normally mount the uneven bars?
What does a higher flight phase result in?
What is vertical ground reaction force?
What else is an important aspect that affects linear and agular movements?
What kind of routines do general gymnastic groups perform?
What do the troupes consist of?
When was the first World Gymnaestrada held?
What was the first Sport Program recongized by FIG?
How many participants are there?
When did FIG decide that scores are no longer limited to 10 points?
What are the two different scores?
What score was added?
How much is a fall deduction?
What is a gymnast's difficulty score based on?
What do athletes perform for tumbling?
When was tumbling orginally contested at the Olympics?
Where are offical tumbling competitions allowed?
What year did FIG reconginze Trampoline and Acrobatic Gymnastics?
What are mens' rhythmic gymnastics related to?
Where did mens' rhythmic gymnastics develop from?
What is the aim of stick gymnastics?
What are the main focus?
How many mens' rhythmic gymnasts were in Japan in 2002?
Which zoo is one of the best in Europe?
What award did the Hanover Zoo receive four years in a row?
Which animal does the so-called swimming area have?
When did the Canadian-theme area in the Hanover Zoo open?
How many people visited the Hanover Zoo in 2010?
What does the NSDAP stand for?
After which year did the Lord Mayor join the NSDAP?
How many Hanoverian Jews were expelled in 1938?
Who assassinated the German diplomat Eduard Ernst vom Rath?
Which city was the German diplomat in when he got assassinated?
What kind of garden is The Great Garden?
What destroyed the palace?
Who constructed the two pavilions in the palace?
Other than the Nouveau Jardin, what is the other popular part of The Great Garden?
What is at the centre of the Nouveau Jardin?
What ended in the year 1837?
What was the name of William IV's heir?
Who did the throne of Hanover pass to instead of Queen Victoria?
What happened to the kingdom of Hanover in 1866?
In which battle was the Hanover army destroyed?
What plan was implemented in September 1941?
Which portion of the population underwent ghettoisation?
What occured on the 15th of December 1941?
How many Jews approximately lived in Hanover in 1938?
How many concentration camps were constructed in Hanover?
Where was Hanover originally founded?
What did Hanover possibly originally mean?
When did Hanover become a comparitvely large town?
Which city was Hanover connected to by the Leine?
What is one example of traffic that passed through Hanover?
Who imposed the Convention of Artlenburg?
How many French soldiers occupied Hanover?
Where did many soldiers from Hanover emigrate to?
What did the soldiers who emigrated form?
Who elevated Hanover to the Kingdom of Hanover in 1815?
What is the Berggarten?
What is the name of the area inside the Berggarten that hosts one of the world's biggest collection of orchids?
What historic landmark is near the entrance to the Berggarten?
What is the name of the first tropical aquarium in Germany?
Other than orchids and birds, what else is housed in the Orchid House?
Who does the nicname "Die Roten" belong to?
What is another name for the top football division?
What is the name of the stadium that the Hanover football team plays in?
Where did the reserve team for the main Hanover team used to play?
Which league does the reserve team Hanover 96 II play in?
What system of the body is related to emotion's physiology?
What sorts of people are more likely to be emotionally expressive?
What type of people hide their emotions?
What is emotion frequently responsible for driving?
Along with physical changes, what sort of changes do emotions sometimes cause?
What is the name of the theory Plutchik created?
How many main emotions exist in Plutchik's theory?
In Plutchik's theory, what emotion is the opposite of anticipation?
What emotion can be perceived as a combination of disgust and anger?
What does Plutchik see as the positive equivalent of disgust?
What was the name of the book that Darwin wrote on emotions?
Along with survival, what did Darwin see as the role of emotions in humans?
Through what process did Darwin believe emotions developed?
In what century did Darwin write?
Who argued that emotions arise from cognitive intentionality?
Along with evaluations and thoughts, what cognitive activity did theorists believe to be required for emotion?
In Lazarus' view, what could the cognitive activity be if it was not conscious?
What book by Prinz defended the perceptual theory?
What book on the perceptual theory was written by James Laird?
What is Laird's job title?
What is Jesse Prinz's profession?
What theory argues that conceptual cognition is not required for emotional meaning?
What discipline examines the role emotions play in culture?
What discipline makes use of ethnography?
What field of study studies the organizational role of emotions?
Who developed the concept of emotional labor?
Roughly how many people are part of EmoNet?
Along with anger, pride and happiness, what is an example of an emotional label?
Aside from increased perspiration, what is a physiological change related to emotions?
Along with smiling and frowning, what is an example of a facial or body movement caused by emotion?
Who developed a comprehensive theory related to human emotional arousal?
How many emotional categories did Turner recognize as being founded on human neurology?
Along with psychology, neuroscience, endocrinology, medicine, history and sociology, what field has engaged in research on emotion?
Along with dopamine, noradrenaline, serotonin, cortisol and oxytocin, what neurotransmitter or hormone influences emotion?
Along with the experience, function and origin of emotion, what aspect of emotion does current research attempt to explain?
What are emotional episodes defined in contrast to?
What other traits are emotional dispositions similar to?
What category is defined to contain pleasure, pain, motivation, moods and dispositions?
Who argued that physiological responses were insufficient to explain emotional experiences?
Along with the physiological response, what did Cannon believe was triggered by an emotional event?
Why did Cannon believe that physiological responses were insufficient cause for emotions?
Who developed a situated perspective on emotion along with Andrea Scarantino?
What factors did the situated perspective believe to be most important?
The situated perspective was influenced by what school of thought?
Along with infant and animal emotion, what did Scarantino and Griffiths believe the situated perspective could help to explain?
When did Broca publish his pioneering work?
Who published a work in 1937 on the relationship between emotion and the limbic system?
Along with the cingulate cortex and hippocampi, what structure is a notable part of the limbic system?
What is the thalamus a part of?
Who argued that an emotional stimulus triggered experiential and physiological responses to emotions at the same time?
What creatures did Bard experiment on?
Along with sensory and motor information, what information had to pass through the diencephalon before being processed?
Who researched the role of emotional phenotype temperaments on social connectedness?
From where do zygotes derive their genetic information?
What percentage of difference is there between the genetic material of humans and the genetic material of chimpanzees?
How many million years ago did the evolution of chimpanzees and humans diverge?
About how long ago did modern human beings first come into existence?
Along with mood, temperament, disposition and motivation, what is emotion often tied to?
What do some theories see as an important part of emotion?
Along with sweating and muscle tension, what might be a physiological response to danger?
Sweating is a product of the arousal of what system?
Who described the concept of a continuum of intensity?
What is Michael Graham's profession?
What is an example of an extreme form of fear?
What would be an example of mild shame?
What are non-intense feelings that lack a contextual stimulus called?
Who has argued that emotions are discrete?
How many basic emotions did Ekman recognize?
Along with anger, disgust, happiness, sadness and fear, what is one of Ekman's basic emotions?
What historical school claims that sentiments and meta-emotions can be learned?
According to the constructivists, what is an example of a learned meta-emotion?
Along with Germany, England, Spain and Australia, where has a research center on the history of emotions recently opened?
Along with class and race, what is regarded as an essential category of historical analysis?
In what decade did sociologists focus on the social relevance of emotion?
What emotions did Cooley regard as of paramount social importance?
Who studied rage and shame cycles in married couples?
Who developed the social bond theory?
Along with Cooley, from whose work did Scheff derive social bond theory?
What is the term for the strategies used by people to influence their emotional experiences?
What type of strategy involves avoiding a situation where unwanted emotions might be experienced?
Rational emotive behavior therapy is an approach used by what psychotherapy schools?
What sort of therapy might examine emotions based on components of facial expressions?
What system was examined to develop the neurobiological explanation of human emotion?
What classification of chemicals do dopamine, serotonin and noradrenaline belong to?
What chemicals may mediate emotions?
Reactive responses are present in the brains of what animals?
The neurobiological explanation is specific to what types of brains?
What discipline studies the role of emotions in neural mechanisms?
What fields studies the role of emotions in the treatment of human mental disorders?
What profession studies the role of emotions in providing holistic health care?
What is affective neuroscience a sub-field of?
What field studies the relationship between emotion and learning?
Who came up with the interaction ritual theory?
From what work of Durkheim's was interaction ritual theory derived?
In addition to Durkheim, whose work influenced the development of interaction ritual theory?
What is the term for a feeling of confidence to take action?
What is the term for the energy generated during group gatherings, such as totemic rituals?
Of what discipline is affective computing a branch?
What is the foundational document of affective computing?
In affective computing, what devices are used to collect data about the physical state of a user?
How does emotional speech processing determine a user's emotional state?
Along with subjective experience, cognitive processes, expressive behavior and psychophysiological changes, what is another notable emotional component?
With what emotional component did William James identify emotion?
What emotional component did behaviorists identify emotion with?
What academics identified emotions with physiological changes?
Who discussed emotions in the context of expressive body actions and cultural labels?
What model of emotion was developed by Scherer?
How many important emotional elements are present in the components processing model?
What processes drive the other components processing model processes?
What do psychologists use to visually map emotional experiences?
Along with valence, what is the other of the two dimensions used to map emotional experiences?
What is the term for the feeling of energy or enervation created by an emotional experience?
What is the term for the degree to which an emotional experience feels positive or negative?
What component of emotion provides its perceived energy?
What model described the opposite of approach as moving away?
What model described the opposite of approach as unmoving but with resistance and strength?
According to the Action Tendency Model, the opposite of approach is described as unmoving with what?
Along with behavioral inhibition, research on what trait resulted in support for the Action Tendency Model?
In what economics sub-field are emotions discussed?
What is a notable political science subfield where emotions are analyzed?
Along with criminal law, what facet of law considers evidence related to emotion?
Along with sociology and behavioral sciences, what discipline informs the field of criminology?
Along with risk perception, what do economists study emotion in relate to?
What emotion do many cultures discourage in women?
Some cultures attempt to regulate what emotion in boys?
The open expression of what emotion is generally frowned upon in most cultures?
What social institution is associated with the emotion of love?
What emotion do political campaigns appeal to in regard to terrorism?
Who was murdered on 6 August, 1936?
Besides being club president, what was Sunyol involved in to have caused his murder?
What was Sunyol called after his death?
What was club Barcelona considered to represent when on tour in 1937?
Where did half of the Barcelona team seek asylum in 1937?
To whom did Barcelona appeal to lift the transfer bad?
During what year was Barcelona not allowed to use  their transfer windows?
When was Zubizareta fired by the board?
What position did Zubizareta have?
After firing the director, what did Barcelona form?
What royal symbol appears on the club's crest?
Beside a palm, what tree appears on the crest?
When was a competition held to produce a team crest?
Who was the winner of the crest competition? 
What flag is on the team crest?
When FIFA ban Barcelona from buying players?
What was the FIFA  charge that Barcelona violated?
What fine did FIFA impose on Barcelona for the rules violation?
When did FIFA reject an appeal of the rules violation ruling?
What did the pending appeal allow Barcelona to do anyway?
When did Espanyol  offer a counter-petition against autonomy?
Which civil war group did some Espanyol supporters join?
What event is more relevant to Espanyol supporters than to Barcelona fans?
From what language did Espanyol translate their name?
How has the rivalry between Espanyol and Barcelona  changed?
When were the blue and red colors worn for a game by Barcelona?
When the colors were first worn, what team did Barcelona play?
What do the red and yellow stripes of the away kit symbolize?
What are Barcelona's most often used change colors?
From what source do Catalons think the red/blue colors originated?
Which sports team has the world's largest social media following?
How Ballon d'Or awards have members of the Barcelona team won?
How amny FIFA World Player of the Year have members of FC Barcelona won?
How amny of Barcelona's players were picked as the three best players of the year in 2010?
Where did Messi, Iniesta and Xavi learn their football in Barcelona?
How many times did Barcelona win the Pyrenees Cup?
From what area were the participants of the Pyrenees Cup competition?
When was the Pyrenees Cup play begun?
Who was Barcelona's first full time coach?
When was the last Pyrenees Cup played?
When was the Tower constructed?
For what purpose was the Tower first used?
On what road is the Tower located on?
What is the Everton club motto?
What does the Everton club motto, "Nil Satis Nisi Optimum," mean in English?
What is the name of the theme song that players walk out to on Everton matchdays?
Where did "Johnny Todd"--the theme song for Everton matchdays--originate?
What year did the Everton players walk out to a song other than "Johnny Todd"?
What was the reaction of the crowd to the Everton replacement theme songs in 1994?
What song did the Everton club replace its player walkout theme with in August 1994?
When was the Everton club founded?
In what decade did Everton experience a revival?
When was Everton's most recent trophy awarded?
How many league championships did Everton win in the 1960s?
What nickname is used for Everton's club supporters?
In which park did Everton FC originally play?
Where was the new Liverpool FC stadium located in 1879?
Who donated land to Everton FC in 1882?
Who was the chairman of the Everton FC in 1892?
Where did Everton FC relocate their games to in 1892?
Where did a group of fans demand that Everton remain within the city boundaries of?
In what year was it revealed that Everton had entered talks to build a new 55,000 seat stadium in Kirkby?
Who did Everton enter talks with to build a new 55,000 seat stadium in Kirkby?
What percentage of fans were supportive of Everton's plans to build a new stadium in 2006?
How many travelling fans did Everton bring with them to Benefica in 2009?
How does the Everton FC promote fans to purchase away tickets?
In what year did Everton take 7,000 travelling fans with them to an away game?
Aside from 2009, in what year did Everton FC bring the most fans with them to an away game?
Who is the Everton Football Club's biggest rivals?
What derby does Everton FC contest against Liverpool?
In what year was the Liverpool Football Club established?
Where did Everton FC move to that began their rivalry with Liverpool?
The Merseyside derby is also known as?
What year did the Everton FC release their UK pop song "The Boys in Blue"?
What position did the song "Here We Go" by the Everton FC peak at on the UK pop charts in 1985?
What was the name of the song that the Everton Football Club released in 1986?
Who originally sang the song "All Together Now" that was reworked and released by Everton Football Club in 1995?
How many times has the Everton FC entered the UK pop charts?
What year did the Everton Football Club "go blue"?
How did Steve Bloomer describe Everton's style of play in 1928?
What is Everton Football Club's semi-official club nickname?
What was Everton's nickname when they wore black before 1901?
What was Everton Football Club called after winning the 1995 FA Cup?
Along with West Saxon, Northumbrian and Mercian, what was one of the four main dialects of Old English?
What is a term that collectively refers to Northumbrian and Mercian?
Geographically, what river was Northumbria north of?
What river was the Mercian region south of?
Which of the Old English dialects covered the smallest geograhical region?
From what language did Old English borrow some words?
What individuals introduced the Latin alphabet to the speakers of Old English?
After the Norman Conquest, Latin words entered English via what language?
Before the introduction of the Latin alphabet, how was Old English written?
In what year did the Norman Conquest occur?
What is regarded as the greatest literary work in Old English?
About how many lines was Beowulf?
Who was Hrothgar a descendant of?
Who adopted Hrothgar's ancestor?
To what language group does Old English belong?
Along with Old Saxon, what language is closely related to Old English?
To what modern language is Old English similar?
In what century did the Latin alphabet replace the runic system in Old English writing?
For about how many years was Old English used?
In what century was Old English first used?
In what century did Old English cease to be used?
According to Albert Baugh, what was the period in which Old English was used?
About what percentage of Old English words are not present in Modern English?
From what Old English dialect is the standard for of Modern English descended?
From what Old English dialect did Scots derive?
Along with centralization, what reason is given for the lack of records in non-Wessex dialects after the unification of Alfred?
What modern dialect is sometimes regarded as being similar to that of the historical Kingdom of Wessex?
What trait does Old English possess that Modern English lacks?
Along with the nominative, genitive, dative and instrumental, what case did Old English possess?
The Modern English ending -'s is derived from what ending in Old English?
In Old English, noun endings vary on what basis?
Along with the present, what was a verb tense in Old English?
What were the three moods that caused verb variation in Old English?
Along with the first and second, what person influenced verb variation in Old English?
What is an example of a suffix used by Old English weak verbs?
How did Old English strong verbs express the past tense?
What is another name for Anglo-Frisian?
What language family did Common Brittonic belong to?
How was the Latin language brought to Britain?
In what century did Scandinavian settlement begin in northern England?
Along with the Angles and Saxons, what tribe spoke Anglo-Frisian?
What treatise was written by Pope Gregory?
What dialect did Alfred's government use?
In what century did Alfred unify Anglo-Saxon England?
When did Alfred the Great's reign begin?
What king unified the Anglo-Saxon realms in England?
Along with Northumbria, what kingdom was invaded by the Vikings?
Along with the part of Mercia not conquered by the Vikings, what other kingdom was combined with Wessex by Alfred?
What is the modern name for the West Saxon dialect of Alfred's time?
From what language was literature notably translated into West Saxon?
North of what river in Northumbria was the kingdom not overrun by the Vikings?
During what century did Cnut rule?
What was Cnut's nationality?
During what century did Scandinavians begin to settle in England?
What language was a source for English loanwords that are still used today?
Along with eastern England, what part of England contains many place names of Scandinavian origin?
What modern religion sometimes uses Old English?
What hobby champions the use of Old English?
Along with Tolkien, what modern scholar notably made use of Old English?
What Wikipedia project makes use of the Old English language?
What is a term for modern texts written in Old English?
What type of carrier is the largest?
What capability does a fleet carrier offer?
What purpose were excort carriers developed for?
What were most escort carriers built from?
What are the soviet aircraft carriers used by Russia actually called?
What type of aircraft carrier was the USS Bogue?
What type of aircraft was the USS Independence?
What advantage did light carriers have over escort carriers?
What was the expected serice life of the UK 1942 Design Light Fleet Carrier?
Who did the UK 1941 Design Light Fleet Carriers serve during the war?
When did Russia's United Shipbuilding Corporation expect to begin design work for a new carrier?
What year was the goal for Russia's new carrier to achieve initial operational capability?
What was Izvestiya?
Where was the Northern Fleets nuclear-powered aircraft carrier supposed to be stationed?
Where was the Pacific Fleets nuclear-powered aircraft carrier supposed to be stationed?
When did conventional carriers start recovering aircraft at an angle to port of the axial line of the ship?
What risk is avoided by aircraft by using an angled deck?
How many "waist" catapults can be installed with an angled deck?
How man bow cats can be installed with an angled deck?
What aircraft design feature improves launch and recovery cycle flexibilty?
Where are ski-jump ramps located on aircraft carriers?
What did ski-jump ramps allow STOVL aircraft to do that they couldn't do with a flat deck??
Who originally developed the ski-jump ramp?
What does a ski-jump ramp convert in order to be successful?
What does the ski-jump ramp prevent a fully loaded and fueled aircraft from doing?
What type of flight decks are aircraft carriers equipped with?
What purpose do aircraft carriers serve for aircraft?
Typically, what is the capital ship of any fleet?
What have the old converted cruiser aircraft carriers evolved into?
What do aircraft carriers allow naval forces to accomplish?
Which ship was originally known as being the capital ship of the fleet?
When did aircraft carriers begin being know as the capital ship of the fleet?
What type of carrier is capable of displacing 75,000 tonnes or greater?
Which ships are used for carrying and landing Marines?
What do Amphibious assalut ships need a large contingent of for carrying Marines?
Who is in the process of procuring two Canbera-class LHD's?
How large will the two Canbera-class LDH's be?
How many troops can be maintained on a Canbera-class LHD?
What is one primary role of the Canbera-class LDH?
How many helicopters is the LHD capable of launching?
What is the British Navy constructing to replace their three Invincible-class carriers?
What will the 2 Queen Elizabeth class ships be named?
When are the 2 Queen Elizabeth class ships due to become operational?
How many tonnes can the Queen Elizabeth class ships displace?
How large will the two Queen Elizabeth ships be?
Why do the constraints of constructing a flight deck affect the role of a carrier?
What are assisted launch mechanisms primarily used for?
What does CATOBAR allow for?
Why is STOVL used by other navies?
Why do almost all carriers using conventional aircraft have arrested-recovery systems?
What is the purpose of an arrested-recovery system?
What do aircraft do when landing in order to stop on a short distance?
What does a landing area angles off access allow an aircraft to do if if misses the arresting wires?
What can a "bolt" prevent an aircraft from doing?
What are 3 key personnel involved in the flight deck?
What are shooters responsible for?
What is the handler responsible for?
Where does the captain of the ship spend most of his time?
Who is the Flag Bridge area of the ship designated for?
What is the disadvantage of the ski-jump?
What cannot launch using a ski-jump due to their high loaded weight?
What do heavily laden aircraft sometimes require the assistance from?
Why is a ski-jump not included on mixed flight deck operations where helicopters are present?
How is the Russian SU-33 able to launch from the carrier Admiral Kuznetsov?
Why did China purchase the STOBAR carrier Liaoning in 1998?
What is Liaoning classifed as?
What is the Liaoning intended to help the navy practice with?
Why is Liaoning not assigned to any of China's operation fleets?
Why did the Chinese PLA Navy need 4-5 years for Liaoning to reach full capacity?
Who started construction of a 40,000-tonne Vikrant-class carrier in 2009?
What will power the Indian-made ship?
What will the range of the Indian-made ship be, carrying 160 officers, 1400 sailers, and 30 aircraft?
Who is constructing the Indian-made ship?
When was the Indian-made ship launched?
What were carriers used for in the early 20th century?
As of 3/3/2016, how many active aircraft carriers are there worldwide?
What is another name for the 10 large nuclear-powered carriers operated by the U.S. Navy?
How many aircraft can supercarriers carry?
Who owns the largest carriers in the world?
What is the definition of an "aircraft carrier"?
How may aircraft carriers be classified?
Who is Admiral Sir Mark Stanhope?
Who said, "countries that aspire to strategic international influence have aircraft carriers"?
What dramatically changed naval combat in World War II?
What drove the advent of carrier-launched aircraft as focal weapons?
Why were carrier-launched aircraft more effective than naval guns?
What was signalled in 1940 when HMS Illustrious launched an strike on an Italian fleet?
What event showed the vulnerability of carriers when forced into gun-range enounters?
What does EMALS stand for?
Who developed EMALS?
What do EMALS enable the launching of?
Who was impressed by the demonstration of EMALS by General Atomics?
How many in-service aircraft carriers are aimed for with EMALS?
What was the August 2013 launching ceremony in Yokohama held for?
How many helicopters can simultaneously land on Japan's largest military ship?
How long is Japan's largest military ship?
How many troops can Japan's largest military ship carry?
How much does Japan's largest military ship weigh?
What type of aircraft have no need to decelerate?
What does the angled deck separate the recovery operation area from?
What does V/STOL refer to?
What capability do helicopters use to move over the flight deck and land vertically?
What don't helicopters need because of having hover capablility?
What does LSO stand for?
Who does a conventional aircraft rely upon to moniter the aircraft's approach and transmit the data to the pilot?
What did LSO's use to signal corrections to the pilot prior to the angled deck designs introduced in the 1950's?
Which visual landing aids have provided information on proper glide slope since the late 1950's?
What are LSO's still being used to do?
What is a more fuel efficient way for STOVL aircraft to take off rather than vertically?
What kind of aircraft are capable of taking off vertically?
What landing aircraft have removed the need for arresting cables?
What do Russian carriers include for launching lightly loaded conventional fighters?
What do Russian carriers still use to recover?
What type of carrier is Admiral Flota Sovetskovo Soyuza Kuznetsov?
When was Admiral Flota Sovetskovo Soyuza Kuznetsov first launched?
What was Admiral Flota Sovetskovo Soyuza Kuznetsov renamed?
What is unique about Tbilisi?
What will be removed from Tbilisi in order to enlarge her below decks aviation facilities?
Which class of aircraft carriers is being constructed to replace the Invincible-class carriers?
What will the displacement be for the HMS Queen Elizabeth?
When is HMS Queen Elizabeth projected to commission?
When is Prince of Wales projected to commission?
Who is building HMS Queen Elizabeth and Prince of Wales?
When did two whisleblowers allege that Boutris  attempted to ground Southwest Airlines?
How many planes did the FAA managers allow to fly in 2006 and 2007 that were overdue for safety inspections?
How much did the FAA propose to fine Southwest for failing to inspect older planes?
What former chairman of the committee said it's investigation uncovered a pattern of regulatory abuse?
How many planes were allowed to be operated commercially although not in compliance with FAA safety regulations?
When did the aftermath of the Southwest Airlines inspection scandal happen?
who approved a mesaure to tigheten regulations concerning airplane maintenance prodecures?
What does the word 'customer' properly apply to?
how long was the "cooling off" period that the FAA inspectors or supervisers of inspectors must wait before they can work for those they regulate?
What epidemic did the FAA have to handle in the 1960s?
Who now takes responsibility for aviation security?
When did the FAA become more involved with the environmental aspects of aviation?
What is the altitude which the FAA regulates over?
When was legislation passed that gave the agency management of a new airport aide program?
When did the CAA begin to exptend it's ATC responsibilities?
What helped ATC controllers in their drive ot keep ahead of the postwar boom in commercial air transportation?
When did Congress give the CAA the task of administering the federal-air airport program?
What did the federal-aid airport program aim to help develop?
When did the agency acheive a semi-automated air traffic control system?
When was the Airline Deregulation act?
When did the nationwide strike by air traffic controlers union happen?
when did the FAA shift to a more step-by-step approach to providing air traffic controllers with more advanced equipment?
What helped operate radar in the new air-traffic control system?
When was the Air Commerce Act passed?
Who was charged with fostering air commerce?
What new branch was created and operates under the Department of Commerce?
Who assumed primary responsibility for aviation oversight?
Who was responsible for operating and maintaining aids to air navigation?
When did the Grand-Canyon mid-air collision happen?
when was the Federal Aviation Act passed?
What agency would now act like the CAA?
Who did the Federal Aviation Act transfer air safety regulation from?
Who was the FAA's first administrator?
When did the FAA decide to expand passengers use of portable elctronic devices during all phases of flight?
What mode must mobile phones be put into?
What phases of flight will passengers be able to use electronic devices?
Where must devices be put during actual takeoff and landing?
When did the US DOT combine major federal responsibilities for air and surface transport?
What did the Federal Aviation Agency change it's name to?
Who would the FAA administrator report to?
Who approves new programs and budget requests?
Who is the final person to approve the budget that is submitted?
What was the Areonautics Branch renamed to?
When was the Aeronautics Branch renamed?
When did the Buerau take over and begin to expant the ATC system?
What were the people who used maps, blackboards, and mental calculation to ensure the safe separation of aircraft traveling between cities called?
When did the FAA change it's long-standing approach to air traffic control candidates?
What was now favored instead of training and experince at flight schools?
Who could be an air traffic controller irrespective of experience now because of the rule change?
What did applicants now take that many of them found baffling?
What retired NASA Office of inspector general is outspoken about the FAA?
How much do penalties against airlines cost per violation?
A heavy penalty for violating FAA reulations could said to be do what?
What did the agency propose to find Southwest Airlines?
In what year did Blackpool and Blackburn become independent unitary authorities?
In what year was Simonswood transferred from Knowsley to West Lancashire
Which places were added to the new county of Cheshire?
Where were the boroughs of Liverpool, Knowsley, St Helens and Sefton included?
Which parish was transferred from Knowsley to the district of West Lancashire?
When did the administrative boundaries for the Duchy of Lancaster change?
What is the Duchy of Lancaster?
What does the Duchy of Lancaster operate as?
Who are appointed within the Duchy and County Palatine of Lancater?
Who exercises the right of the Crown in the County Palatine of Lancaster?
How many state grammar schools are in Lancashire?
How many state schools are in Lancashire?
How many independant schools are in Lancashire?
Who has the largest school population?
Who has the smallest school population?
What years did the Lancashire League competition run from?
Which county was once the focal point for many professional competitions?
Which year was the Lancashire County Cup abandoned?
What year did Rugby League start?
What are the biggest cities in Lancashire?
By the 1830's, how much of all cotton was processed in Lancashire?
Where was a center for tourist for the people of Lancashire's mill towns?
What week was most popular to visit Lancashire's mill towns?
When did Lancashire emerge as a major commercialand industrial region?
When was Liverpool and Manchester removed from Lancashire boundaries?
How many miles of land did Lancashire lose to other countries?
What is to the north of Lancashire today?
What is to the east of Lancashire today?
Who exercises sovereignty rights for Lancashire?
When was the administrative county of Lancashire created?
What is the area served by the Lord-Lieutenant called now?
Where is the ancient border between Lancashire and Yorkshire located?
Why is Lancashire smaller than its historical extent?
What area is covered by the Lord-Lieutenant?
What is most of the lowland in the county devoted to?
What is the higer ground in the county devoted to?
What is in the highest ground?
Where is the Lancashire Coalfield located?
where is Beacon Fell County Park located?
What does the Lancashire economy rely on?
Which direction does the M6 motorway run?
What road connects Preston to Blackpool?
Which road crosses the part of the county furthest south?
Where are the major settlements in the ceremonial county located?
Where is the Fylde coast?
Which part of the county is rural and sparsely populated?
How many people live in Lancaster and Morecambe?
What percentage of Lancashire is Asian?
Where was pop star Frankie Vaughan from?
How many bands were active in the Liverpool area in the 1960s?
What was the first act to break through in the UK, not from Liverpool or managed by Brian Epstein?
Where were Freddie and the Dreamers based?
Where were Herman's Hermints and the Hollies from?
Who was "The Ballad of Chevy Chase" composed by?
Where was Richard Sheale from?
What did the county share with it's national traditions?
What is Lancashire's long and productive tradition?
What is the finest border ballad?
When was Lancashire established?
When was the area part of Brigantes tribal area?
In what year did the northern parts of the country form the Brythonic kingdom of Rheged?
What is the Brythonic kingdom of Rheged?
When was the area incorporated into Northumbria?
How many people lived in Lancashire in 1971?
What is the most populous geographic county in the UK?
When was the administrative county abolished?
What incorporated the Furness exclave?
What did the southern part of Lancashire turn into?
Who was a local pioneer of folk song collection?
Who did the most to popularize folk songs of the county?
Who were the most influential fold artists from the region in the 20th century?
Who do the many folk clubs today cater to?
What is one of the regular folk festivals called?
What is the county flower of Lancaster?
Where can the red rose of lancaster be found?
What is on the traditional Lancashire flag?
What is on the official Lancashire flag?
Whos flag officially is a red rose on a white field?
In what year was Hugh Wood born?
Where was Sir Peter Maxwell Davies born?
When was the Royal Manchester College of Music founded?
When was the Royal Northern College of Music formed?
What did the Royal Manchester College of Music merge with?
What era was 250 million to 247 million years ago?
What geologic climate was found in the Early Triassic?
What landmass was still unbroken in the Early Triassic?
What percentage of extinction of species had recently happened??
What species had evolved after  the extinction and would become the basic predator in the Triassic?
What is the span of the Late Cretaceous period?
What weather trend ocured in the Late Cretaceous and Cenozoic periods?
What climate was restricted to the equatorial areas?
What type of weather changes did areas outside of the tropics experience?
What event ended the age of the dinosaur by causing a 75% extinction?
What was the span of the Late Triassic?
Besides moderate precipitation, what weather conditions did the Late Triassic have?
When did the first dinosaurs evolve?
According to theory, what did climate change in the Late Triassic cause?
What was the only archosaur to survive the fourth mass extinction?
What is the span of the Early Cretaceous?
What event of the Early Cretaceous caused the extinction of several species?
What species died out due to the expansion of coastal shallows?
What species dominated the seas?
What dinosaur spread to every continent?
What caused the sea to rise during the Jurassic?
Rising seas and displaced waters caused what  element along the coasts?
Pangaea beginning to break apart created what new sea?
What weather condition increased?
As humidity increased what land area decreased?
What is the span of years for the Early Jurassic?
Besides Ichthyosaurs and Ammonites, what was the other dominate species in the seas?
What was the highest order of species n land?
What other order evolved during the Jurassic?
What feature of the climate produced a more tropical world?
At what time was tectonic formation mild?
Where did the basic geological changes of this period occur?
What supercontinent split to form two smaller continents?
What was the northern continent split from Pangaea?
What was Pangaea's southern continent called?
What is the span of years of the Middle Triassic?
What continuing event began in the Middle Triassic?
From what had the ecosystem had to recover?
During the breakup of Pangaea, what sea was created?
What type of animal began to flourish and become increasingly large?
How many years did the Late Jurassic cover?
What did the separation of Pangaea cause to become extinct?
What is the extinction caused by the splitting of Pangaea called?
What caused the destruction of fern prairies and increasing shallows?
What did the rise in sea levels open in the seaways? 
What was the dominant plant species of the Mesozoic?
What is an example of a gymnosperm?
What are the dominate plant species on Earth now?
When did the Ginkgo evolve?
What famous tree species is believed to have evolved during the Mesozoic?
In what decade was digital telephony transmission made possible?
What is the minimum bit rate for compressed video and audio transmission?
What is an example of an early form of digital video and audio communication?
In what form did the first dedicated videoconferencing system appear as?
What company offered the first commercial videoconferencing system?
What controls the conferencing while its active on the signaling plane?
What is one example of what the signaling plane controls in a videoconferencing system?
Where does the videoconferencing system manage conferencing creation?
On what plane does the MC operate?
What generates output streams from each endpoint?
What technology has become more widely available and affordable?
What is an example of a personal videoconferencing system tool?
What has made videoconferencing accessible to many?
Videoconferencing freeware is widely available in what programs?
Videophone calls are different from videoconferencing in what way?
What is an example of a videophone call program?
What term is more used today to refer to calls between two units?
What are videoconferencing calls now more commonly known as?
What is another name for videophone calls?
In what decade did developers extend the capabilities of videoconferencing to more devices?
What allows people in remote locations the ability to video-conference with colleagues far away?
What is one example of an application that videoconferencing manufacturers have begun to offer?
What type of applications have videoconferencing manufacturers begun to offer?
What is an example of a place that videoconferencing can be used today?
What can videoconferencing offer students?
Who can benefit from two-way communication forums?
What is a major barrier to videoconferencing between some communities?
What is one example of how students can benefit from videoconferencing?
What is one experience that students using videoconferencing can achieve?
In what industry has videoconferencing become useful?
On what film was videoconferencing widely used?
What year was the movie Frozen released?
In what city were the songwriting team of Frozen located?
How many months did the songwriters work on the movie via videoconferencing?
What is a video-conference also known as?
What does a video-conference use that allows communication in live situations?
What is a multi-point control unit?
How does video-conferencing allow multiple parties to communicate with each other?
How many locations can one use videoconferencing for?
What year did one the first community service usages of videoconferencing take place?
What company helped in the creation of community service videoconferencing?
What is the videoconferencing product that both IBM and PictureTel worked on?
What does DIANE in Project DIANE stand for?
How many years did it take for Project DIANE to grow?
What enables videoconferencing to connect three or more remote points?
What is one type of MCU bridge?
In what way can an MCU be characterized?
What feature enables an MCU to allow for multiple parties to be seen on screen at the same time?
Where can an MCU be embedded?
In what decade was Internet video-conferencing made possible?
In what device was videoconferencing finally able to be used in?
In what year was CU-SeeMe, a desktop-based videoconferencing tool, developed?
In what year did the first public video-conference take place?
What South African city participated in the first public video-conference?
What is the software that performs audio and/or video compression?
How high can compression rates go?
What is one digital network through which a digital stream can be transmitted?
What does POTS stand for?
What do POTS do?
What is a common use of conferencing technology?
What profession utilizes videoconferencing technology to conduct online sessions?
What is one way that videocalling can be used?
What is a common use of conferencing technology?
What is one way that videoconferencing is useful?
What areas benefit especially from videoconferencing? 
In what US state did a rural area use videoconferencing to help reduce the number of transfers of sick infants to hospitals? 
How far away was the hospital from this rural area?
How much money did videoconferencing help this rural area save?
In what European country has VRS services become well developed?
What is one of the reasons why VRS services are not in most European countries?
What European country is a leader in providing VRS services to its citizens?
What country is a world leader in providing VRS services?
What year was the first HD video conferencing system displayed?
Who produced the first high definition video conferencing system?
Where was the first HD video conferencing system displayed?
What company introduced the first HD video conferencing system to the general market?
What was the resolution of the first HD video conferencing system?
What do systems with no MCU use in order to perform multipoint conferencing?
What is one advantage of using an H.323 technique?
What is one disadvantage of using the H.323 technique?
What is the H.323 technique also known as?
Why is the video and audio of the H.323 technique higher quality?
Who has the world's largest administrative judicial system?
What US Department oversees the World's largest administrative judicial system?
In what year did the SSA see a 55% increase in videoconferenced hearings?
When did the SSA open its largest videoconferencing-only center?
Where is the SSA's fifth videoconferencing only center located?
What does duel dating use to show the date?
What is the Old Style date mean?
What is N.S. stand for?
What are New Style dates?
Why use two consecutive year dates?
Who revised the Julian calendar?
When was the Gregorian Calendar introduced?
What calendar was used in the reform to create the Gregorian calendar?
What holiday was the inducement to revise the Julian calendar?
When did the First Council of Nicaea rule that Easter be celebrated by all Christians?
What was the percentsge of correction from the Julian calendar to the new Gregorian calendar?
What was the correction due to?
What change in date motivated the change in calendars?
To what astrological date was Easter tied?
What was wrong in the Julian calendar?
What kind of calendar is the Gregorian calendar?
How many days are in the Gregorian calendar?
How often is a leap day added to the Julian calendar year?
When does the Gregorian calendar omit 3 leap days?
On what day did both the Julian and Gregorian calendars add leap day?
What did Lilius first propose to correct in the calendar?
By how much is the Julian calendar too long?
How much difference does the extra 11 minutes make over 400 years time?
On what date was the original vernal equinox set?
By the time of Lilius where was the equinox falling?
On what date did most European countries set the start of the new year?
When did Scotland begin to use January 1 as the start of the new year?
When did the other British states and colonies set the year start date to January 1?
What act did Britain use to implement the use of the Gregorian calendar?
When did England finally change the tax year to 6 April?
Attempting to use Gregorian dates for earlier events  on the Julian calendar should be used with what action?
When was the Battle of Agincourt?
When are events usually shown as they appeared on the Julian calendar?
What other date is 25 October known for, that keeps the Battle of Agincourt on 25 October,1415?
In the Julian calendar when is the start of the new year?
Why would a knuckle -space count be used to determine months?
A knuckle count is a month of how many days?
The space between knuckles is what kind of month?
What are held together for a knuckle-space month count?
How many parts did the Gregorian calendar reform have?
What was the first reform concerning the calendar?
What was the second reform of the calendar?
What was calculated using the lunar calendar?
What did Lilius's calendar plan to reduce in every 400 years?
What calendar did Turkey use before 1917 for general purposes?
What calendar did Turkey utilize for fiscal purposes?
Where did Turkey start the fiscal year?
When did Turkey begin to use the Gregorian calendar for fiscal means?
When did Turkey start using the Gregorian calendar for all purposes?
How many days do you subtract to convert days from a calendar?
What does one need to remember about  the date of February 29 in the Julian calendar?
If you need a date of four days less, what do you subtract from the Julian calendar?
What is the difference in time between the calendars?
With what other difference did the Gregorian calendar concern itself?
When was the vernal equinox at the end of the third century?
In order to account for the full moon coming after the equinox, when was the equinox set?
How did the Gregorian calendar set these same of the full moon not preceding Easterconditions?
When did the Council of Trent agree to the corrected calendar?
To what time did the Council require the date of the vernal equinox to be set?
What did mathematicians of the time want to use to set the date of Easter?
What method was used instead of computations of the sun and moon?
Whose modified proposal was adopted?
When were the rights to publish the calendar granted?
Who awarded the rights to publish the calendar?
What problem caused the papal brief granting the right to publish to be withdrawn?
When were the rights to print the calendar withdrawn?
Where were the first calendars printed?
What other system of calculations are inherent in the Gregorian calendar?
Why is calculating the days of the Gregorian calendar not simple?
After each country adopted the calendar how did the weekly cycle continue?
What was the previous day's date by the Julian calendar?
What was the date of adoption for the calendar?
Who thought that the seasonal drift in the date of Easter unacceptable?
What even is tired to the date for Easter?
What did the Church of Alexandria use to calculate the date of Easter?
Where did the Church of Alexandria place the vernal equinox?
Until 342 when did the Church of Rome think the vernal equinox fell?
Who was the architect of the Gregorian calendar?
What did the architects of the calendar notice about the astronomical tables?
Whose solution to the discrepancies of the tables would have been agreeable to astronomers?
When did Pitatus offer his solution to the leap year problem?
What is the theory about leap year called?
What designation was added to British dates to differentiate them from countries not using the new calendar? 
When was the Calendar act enacted?
With what did the Calendar Act align the British calendar?
What did the use of Old Style and New Style cause?
What law did the British make to cause the use of the Gregorian calendar?
The Gregorian calendar is an improvement over what other calendar?
How many days must be skipped to align the calendar with mean solar days in a year?
What is the approximate error for every 3,300 years?
What is the error rate of the vernal equinox per every 7,700 years?
What was the error rate in the Julian calendar?
What Microsoft executive was in charge of 360 development?
What manufacturer was enlisted to design the 360's graphics processor?
Where did Peter Moor work before being recruited to help on the 360?
Original 360 Alpha dev kits used what existing system's hardware?
What CPU did the 360 use?
How many titles did the 360 have at launch in North America?
What title was the console's best seller in 2005?
How many copies did Halo 3 sell?
Halo 3 was released in what year?
Other than Call of Duty 2, how many games sold at least 1 million copies the first year of the 360?
What 3 video formats did the 360 support natively at launch?
Support for what video format was added in 2007?
How are music player controls accessed by 360 users?
What is one feature of 360 photo slide shows?
What is the name of the 360's online service?
What is the name of the feature that allows users to download games from Live?
What can people owning both a PC and 360 do?
What is the name of the 360's motion sensing camera peripheral?
The 360's multimedia capabilities transformed it from a game console to what?
What hardware defect code plagued the 360?
What is the flashing indicator of a general hardware error known as?
How did Microsoft react to general hardware error problems?
What other error code was eventually covered by this warranty extension?
Where did users see the flashing light error codes display on their 360s?
What was the original user interface for the 360 called?
Who designed this user interface?
The simple dashboard could be accessed by pressing what controller button?
How many tabs were on the 360 dashboard interface?
The tabs on the user interface were called what?
What was a classic title originally offered by the Xbox Live Arcade?
What was a new, original title originally available from Arcade?
What date did the Xbox Live Arcade launch on?
When was Arcade Live relaunched with 360 support?
What is the name of the online virtual arcade that launched in 2010?
At what conventions did Microsoft announce IPTV support through the 360?
Which Microsoft executive announced IPTV as "soon" in 2007?
Who was Microsoft's president of Entertainment & Devices in 2008?
What UK company did Microsoft partner with to bring IPTV to the 360?
What Microsoft executive announced the launch of version 2.0 of Mediaroom?
What XBox Live service allows users to buy games and downloadable content?
Which levels of Xbox Live membership may access the Marketplace?
What hardware is required to use the Marketplace?
What virtual currency is used to make Marketplace purchases?
Prepaid cards for Microsoft Points are available in what denominations?
What sales figure was the 360 the first console of its generation to surpass?
When did the 360 surrender its lead in total sales?
What console eventually passed the 360 in total sales?
During what 32-month later period was the 360 the best selling console?
When did the Xbox achieve 10 million units sold?
Besides online gaming and media distribution, what other feature made the 360 influential, according to TechRadar?
How many years after initial launch of the console was Kinect released?
Besides it's features, what did Kinect do for the 360 in terms of sales?
What is Kinect?
How did Microsoft modify the architecture of the 360 to reduce failure rates?
What was the root cause of hardware failures with the 360?
When the newer 360 S models have their power buttons flash red, it means?
How does the 360 S then react to an overheating situation?
How did Microsoft attempt to deal with potential heat-related expansion with GPU and CPU components?
What was the name of the 360's video store service?
When was this video service launched?
When do movies rented through this marketplace expire?
What resolution are videos sold through this service?
What sound standard is supported for the marketplace videos?
How did the original Xbox fare in Japan in general?
How many original Xboxes were sold in Japan between 2002 and 2005?
Between 2005 and 2011, how many 360 consoles were sold in Japan?
What two console manufacturers dominate the Japanese market?
Lackluster sales caused Japanese retailers to take what action with the 360?
How many major hardware revisions has the 360 had?
By what other name is the 360 S model known?
Which SKUs did the 360 S replace?
What component of the 360 S prevents overheating issues prevalent in prior versions?
What video input format is not supported by the 360 E?
How many launch titles did the 360 have in Japan?
What was the name of the Japanese developer that strongly supported the 360?
What was Mistwalker's first title for the 360?
Blue Dragon surpassed this sales figure in Japan?
What was Mistwalker's second 360 title to be released?
What PC operating system is required to stream content to a 360?
What modified AV protocol does the 360 utilize?
What codecs are supported for 360 streaming from uShare?
What video formats are supported for UPnP streaming?
What hardware device was merged with the video marketplace?
Where and when was the Zune HD marketplace announced?
The Zune video marketplace was merged with what Live feature?
What was the new name of this Live video store?
How many countries were slated for the Zune Marketplace launch?
What was the biggest war the US got involved with in the early 19th century?
What conflict caused Britain to blockade trade?
What uprising did Britain support in North America?
What country was the first the US ever declared war upon?
What was the initial US strategy in the War of 1812?
When World War I started, what was the official US position?
When did World War I commence?
What German war policy precipitated US involvement in WWI?
What year did the US enter World War I?
The United States built its army prior to joining the war in what way?
How many nations were against Iraq in the US-led coalition?
What precipitated the Persian Gulf War?
When did this precipitating event take place?
When did hostilities in the Persian Gulf War begin?
How many US veterans of the Persian Gulf War have been classed as permanently disabled?
When did the US send troops to the Philippines to battle terrorists?
Terrorists in the Philippines were linked to what larger terrorist organization?
Where did anti-terrorist fighting take place?
How many troops did the US initially send to the Philippines?
What was the name of the Philippine terrorist group the US was sent to help combat? 
What battle ended a British invasion from Canada in the Revolutionary War?
When was the battle of Saratoga fought?
What Prussian expatriate helped train the Continental army?
What two European countries entered the Revolutionary War against Britain?
What advantage did Britain lose when the European countries entered the war?
What was the US policy when France declared war on England in 1793?
What treaty with England conflicted with the United States' Treaty of Alliance with France?
Where did US ships and French privateers fight between 1798 and 1800?
What US President negotiated a truce with France to end the undeclared war at sea?
When was the Treaty of Alliance with France signed? 
What treaty ceded territory to the US extending west to the Mississippi River?
What three major tribes occupied these formerly British territories?
When was the Battle of Wabash fought?
What was the decisive battle in the Northwest territories against the native population there?
When was this deciding battle fought?
What country supplied troops to North Korea during the Korean War?
What country supplied advisors, pilots, and war materiel to North Korea?
What country was the principal ally of South Korea during the war?
What organization did all combatants on both sides of the war belong to?
Which two countries were the primary fighters for territory in the Korean War?
When did North Korean forces initiate attacks on US and UN forces in the Korean war?
What South Korean city did the US and ROK forces defend while building reinforcements?
What type of attack was used on Inchon?
Chinese troops attacked the UN forces when they crossed what river? 
What general was fired for defying President Truman's containment strategy?
What acronym was given to South Vietnamese troops?
What acronym was given to North Vietnamese army regulars?
By what name were fighters of the National Liberation Front known?
The VC operated in what geographic area?
The NVA was aided by military and financial aid from what two countries?
What two northern Vietnamese cities did the US avoid bombing at the outset of the war?
What was the major supply trail for the Northern Vietnamese forces?
What US commander's strategy caused a loss of public opinion in the US?
Who helped orchestrate bombing campaigns in the Vietnam War?
When did the US start bombing Hanoi?
When did fighting between Palestinians and the Lebanese begin?
When did US marines land in Lebanon?
When did a suicide bomber successfully attack the marine barracks in Lebanon?
How many marines were killed in the attack?
When did President Reagan withdraw marines from Lebanon?
What is the main reason the US-led coalition won a decisive victory in the Persian Gulf War?
US airstrikes on Iraqi air defenses and command and control facilities began when?
What faults in the Iraqi forces led to their rapid defeat?
Who ordered Iraqi forces to hold their ground despite air bombardments?
When did US ground forces attack Iraqi positions?
How long did ground combat operations last in the Persian Gulf War?
Who ordered the cease-fire that effectively ended hostilities?
What did some US Politicians think Coalition forces should have been allowed to have done?
Coalition nations did what with regards to invading Northern Iraq to precipitate the cease fire?
Why did Coalition nations fear the removal of Hussein from power?
What term is given to the attempt by the US and her allies to fight global terrorist groups?
What religious groups are primarily targeted by this war?
What is one prominent, specific terrorist group targeted by the War on Terrorism?
The War On Terrorism was caused by what event?
Since the start of the war on Terrorism, attacks on US service members have occurred in which two US states?
What demand did the US make before invading Iraq in 2003?
How many US troops participated in the invasion?
What country refused to allow forces to stage within it?
How long did the first phase of fighting last?
How long did the US and its coalition partners have to occupy Iraq?
What declaration established a no-fly zone over Libya?
What is the name of the Libyan leader opposed by US and UN forces?
What was the name of the military action against Libya?
What was the goal of this operation?
The Libyan conflict was primarily fought between which groups?
Where was the Barbary Coast?
Who sent pirates to capture merchant ships?
How did the United States initially deal with this problem?
What American naval officer led a raid that destroyed a captured American ship?
What city did William Eaton capture to end the first Barbary War?
What was the Confederate overall strategy to win the Civil War?
What was the Union's original war aim?
Who led the Confederate forces defending Richmond throughout the war?
How did the war effect both sides?
What early 20th century conflict sent tens of thousands of refugees to the US?
US forces were sent to occupy what Mexican City during the Revolution?
What was the name of the Mexican general who attacked an American city in New Mexico?
What foreign organization encouraged Villa's guerilla war against the US?
What US General led troops against Villa?
What general sentiment was the result of losses in World War I?
Congress refused to allow the US to join what organization?
What legislation was passed to discourage the country from getting involved in a foreign war?
Which US President sought to circumvent Neutrality acts to aid Britain?
What was the name of the 1940 program to send arms to Britain?
How many Americans served in the military in World War II?
How many American service personnel died in World War II?
What other country besides the United States became a super power after World War II?
What name is given to those Americans who served in World War II?
Both during and after the conclusion of  World War II, the United States formed a firm alliance with what country?
When did Britain declare martial law in a North American colony?
What colony was placed under martial law?
What were the first conflicts of the American Revolution?
Who appointed Washington to serve as commander in chief?
When did the colonies declare independence?
What quality made the US only a minor military power after the Revolutionary War?
Why was the US military so small initially?
The founding fathers had faith in what military groups?
What did early American leaders worry a large standing army would involve America in?
Early leaders also feared a large army would allow what internal conflict to take place?
What two tribes particularly resisted being confined to reservations?
What caused a spike in difficulties between settlers and indigenous peoples on the western plains after the Civil War?
Who were two of the military leaders tasked with overseeing American policy of putting Indians on reservations?
When was the Battle of Little Big Horn fought?
What US officer led the troops who were destroyed at Little Big Horn?
What was the name given to American soldiers in Europe in 1918?
What was the official name of the American army that went to fight in Europe in 1918?
Who had overall command of the American forces in Europe?
When did fighting on the western front end?
What was the name of the conditional surrender that ended fighting on the western front?
When was the Vietnam War fought?
Besides Vietnam, what other countries saw fighting in this war?
What was the name of the strategic bombing of North Vietnam?
When did American military involvement ramp up in Vietnam?
What congressional declaration gave President Johnson authority to send troops to Vietnam?
What conflict was supposed to have provided Iraqi forces with battle experience?
Some observers thought that the Persian Gulf War would have tank battles similar to what war?
What equipment did the Iraqi army possess?
Prior to the Persian Gulf War, where and when was the last major American military conflict?
What problem did the Iraqi forces have?
What organization captured significant segments of Iraq and Syria?
What legal ethos does ISIL operate under?
What actions did ISIL take against Western journalists and aid workers?
How did the US intervene against ISIL?
What was the goal of US and coalition airstrikes in Syria?
Where was the band Blue Cheer from?
What classic song did Blue Cheer cover?
What was the hit off Steppenwolf's self-titled debut lp?
What movie featured that Steppenwolf single?
The lyrics to "Born To Be Wild" contain the first reference to what hard rock style?
What Aerosmith ballad debuted at number one on the charts?
What was the title of AC/DC's 1995 double lp?
Bon Jovi's 1995 album was called what?
What commercially successful sub-genre emerged from the grunge movement?
When did Aerosmith's album Get A Grip come out?
What are two examples of glam metal bands?
What two genres cut into hard rock's popularity at the end of the 1980s and early 1990s?
What were some hard rock bands of the 1970s?
What style did some hard rock bands embrace in the 1980s?
What genre laid the roots for hard rock?
Who recorded "Rumble"?
When was "Rumble" released?
What were two of Dick Dale's better known songs?
What city's blues style produced hard rock precursors in electric blues?
What was the landmark hard rock album recorded by the Rolling Stones in 1972?
Which Led Zeppelin album featured the hit "Stairway to Heaven"?
What two hard rock songs are featured on Deep Purple's Machine Head album?
Who was Deep Purple's guitarist?
Who was the drummer for The Who?
Who was the original lead singer of AC/DC who died?
Who was the Led Zeppelin drummer who passed away?
What singer replaced Ozzy Osbourne in Black Sabbath?
What was Ozzy Osbourne's first solo album?
What are some thrash metal bands?
Guns N Roses released both Use Your Illusion albums in what year?
What band's debut was titled Shake Your Money Maker?
What was the title of Def Leppard's 1992 album?
Adrenalize followed what 1987 Def Leppard record?
Adrenalize topped US album charts for how long?
Who were three Chicago blues players who influenced hard rock?
Who recorded "You Really Got Me"?
"Shapes of Things" was a 1966 single by what band?
What garage rock classic was recorded by The Kingsmen?
When did the Rolling Stones release "(I Can't Get No" Satisfaction"?
What was the title of Nirvana's 1991 album?
What was the hard rock style that emerged in the early 1990s?
What are some grunge bands with a strong 1970s influence?
What 1990s hard rock band had a big stadium rock sound?
What element made Oasis unique among 1990s Britpop bands?
When did the Foo Fighters album In Your Honor come out?
Three Days Grace is from what country?
The band Jet is from what country?
What supergroup featured members of Foo Fighters, Queens of the Stone Age and Led Zeppelin?
What was the title of Buckcherry's 2007 hit single?
What instrument is usually at the center of a hard rock sound?
Rhythm guitar in hard rock usually plays what?
In hard rock, an electric guitar can also be used for what?
What carries the backbeat in hard rock drumming?
What instrument works in tandem with the drums to provide hard rock rhythms?
Who was the guitarist for the band Cream?
Who was the guitarist in the Kinks?
Who played guitar in The Who?
When did The White Album come out?
Keith Richards is the guitarist of what band?
By the late 60s, what term was synonymous with hard rock?
What heavy metal group introduced darker themes to the music?
What genre was an influence on extreme metal in the 1980s?
Hard rock is differentiated from heavy metal by containing more of an influence of what genre?
In heavy metal, riffs typically form what element of a song?
Led Zeppelin's first two albums both came out in what year?
What was the title of Deep Purple's hard rock 1970 album?
Black Sabbath's lyrics contained references to what cultural touchstones?
What is the title of Black Sabbath's 1970 album?
What is one band directly influenced by Black Sabbath?
what is the name of the region east of the Rocky Mountains?
who brought the term great plains into widespread usage?
what year was Nevin Fenneman's study?
what was theregion called before "the great plans"? 
what type of land is much of the great plans?
when did ranchers usually have a cattle round up?
in a cattle round up, what did ranchers do to the new calves?
from 1866-95 about how many cattle did cowboys herd?
what is the name of the line that divides the great plains?
about how much rainfall does the great plains get per year?
what do high winds in the area sometimes cause?
what type of climate does the eastern great plains fall into?
after about what year did railroads bring hunters to the great plains?
what animal did hunters kill off for their hides?
what farmers rushed in to settle the land with the help of the railroads?
what did the railroads offer the farmers that rushed in to settle the area?
who usually organized shared meals and potluck events?
around when did the great plains become productive for crop growing
what is the large underground layer of water in the great plains called?
what type of irrigation is used in the great plains?
what is the great plains?
where does the great plains lie?
what is the region known for?
who is the North American Environmental Atlas made by?
what countries is the Commission for Environmental Cooperation made up of?
what mainly opened the great plains for settlement?
what did the railroads make it easy to do?
who did the railroads sell cheap lands to?
who two new technologies were introducted in the 1930s?
about how long ago did the climate become favorable?
what animals did the grasslands provide a new home for?
what diet did the mammals switch to from browsing diets?
the spread of grasslands and what have been strongly linked?
when did the US pass the Homestead ACt?
how much land did the Homestead Act allow a person to claim?
how long did the person have to live on the land?
when was the Kinkaid Act brought about? 
the dominion act was passed in what year
What technology is used by night-vision devices?
What discipline uses infrared telescopes to see through molecular clouds?
What color shift indicates that space objects date from the early days of the universe?
What devices are used to observe insulated system heat loss?
Along with industrial and medical, in what applications is infrared radiation used?
At what wavelength does the human eye become significantly less sensitive to light?
What sort of light is generated by IR lasers?
Up to what wavelength does the human eye perceive IR LED sources as red?
Up to what wavelength does the human eye perceive certain intense lights as being dull red in color?
What objects are notably bright in near IR?
What is the term for the property that describes how a surface's thermal emissions deviate from the ideal of a black body?
How will the infrared image of an object with a higher emissivity appear in relation to one with lower emissivity?
Along with pyrometers, what devices can receive inaccurate results if emissivity is not set correctly?
What is used in infrared photography to capture the near-infrared spectrum?
What devices are often equipped with infrared blockers?
What is the technique that involves imaging with terahertz radiation?
What is another name for terahertz radiation?
What is a notable recent development in T-ray imaging?
Who discovered infrared radiation?
To whom did Herschel present his work on infrared radiation?
In what year did Herschel publish his work on infrared radiation?
What device did Herschel use to discover the infrared?
What did Herschel call the infrared spectrum?
What is another term for infrared homing?
What devices make use of infrared homing?
What is a common name for missiles that make use of infrared seeking?
Along with aircraft and people, what objects notably create and retain heat?
What does IR stand for?
What limits the sensitivity of infrared telescopes on Earth?
To somewhat avoid the water vapor in the atmosphere, where can an observatory be sited?
Along with aircraft, what object can be used to carry a telescope aloft?
What sorts of telescopes completely avoid water vapor in Earth's atmosphere?
What is the nearest wavelength to the radiation that a human eye can see?
Along with the emission peaks and vs. bands mechanisms, what other physical mechanism is used to define near-infrared?
In micrometers, when do common silicon detectors cease to be sensitive?
What is the lowest level of sensitivity, in micrometers, for InGaAs?
What is the term for transit energy flowing as a result of differences in temperature?
What type of heat transmission can propagate through a vacuum?
What object emits thermal radiation in the X-ray spectrum?
The visible, ultraviolet and X-ray spectra are all above what spectrum?
What irradiates clouds of gas in the galaxy and makes them glow?
What can be detected via infrared prior to their emitting visible light?
What objects emit less of their energy as infrared light versus visible light?
What sort of equipment uses the infrared spectrum in the absence of sufficient visible light?
What do night vision devices convert ambient light photons into?
Along with a chemical process, what type of process is used by night vision devices to convert infrared into visible light?
What is the IrDA?
What does the acronym LEDs stand for?
What is a term for when something is switched on and off?
What device is used to transform infrared radiation into an electric current?
Why does infrared not cause trouble for devices in adjacent rooms?
What letter represents the index of refraction?
What letter represents the extinction Coefficient?
What equations are used to figure out the index of refraction and extinction Coefficient?
Along with critical dimension and depth, what can the infrared light reflectance be used to determine in regard to high aspect ratio trench structures?
What reflectance is measured from a semiconductor wafer's surface to determine the index of refraction?
What is the name of the technique used in scanners to minimize the effects of dust and scratches?
Along with red and blue, what is the third visible color channel?
Along with replacement via inpainting, what procedure is used in infrared cleaning to remove the effect of scratches and dust?
Along with the visible light channels, what channel is used to locate scratches and dust in scanners?
Along with the surface of the Earth, what objects absorb radiation from the sun?
After Earth surface's absorbs radiation, in what spectrum is much of it re-emitted?
Along with water vapor, what atmospheric substance primarily absorbs the infrared emitted by the Earth?
What notable warming effect does the presence of infrared absorbers contribute to?
What term refers to  the variety and variability of life on Earth?
What types of variations does Biodiversity refer to?
What type of biodiversity happens near the equator?
Where on Earth is biodiversity the most abundnant?
Where is sea surface temperature the highest?
Who is the author of the biodiversity research paper?
Who commissioned the biodiversity research paper?
At what event was the biodiversity research paper presented?
What year did the United Nations Earth Summit define "biological diversity"?
What model correlates much better than the hyperbolic model?
What model is widely used in macrosociology?
What models imply that changes in diversity are guided by a first-order positive feedback?
What model implies a second-order positive feedback?
What can be accounted for by a feedback between diversity and community structure complexity?
What has some responsibility for offering variety in what we eat?
What is the variety of alleles within a single species?
When do we rely on agricultural diversity to replant the land with something new?
What can destroy a wheat crop?
What type of a society primarily grows monocultures?
What percentage of biodiversity has the planet lost since 1970
What year was they study done by the World Wildlife Fund?
What percentage accounts for the terrestrial wildlife gone?
What percentage accounts for the marine wildlife gone?
What percentage accounts for the freshwater wildlife gone?
What may unintentionally injure a species that depends on the species it replaces?
Where does the Prunus spinosa leaf much sooner?
What animal can its feeding habits disturbed by the Prunus spinosa?
What species struggle to with the introduction of new species?
What types of new species can be introduced?
What plays a vital role in harbouring floral and faunal species?
How many endemic floral species do forests harbor?
How many endemic faunal species do forests harbor?
What types of animals and plans are confined to a specific geographical area?
What types of activities are granted rights in reserved forests?
What global agreement gives sovereign national rights over biological resources?
What agreement commits countries to conserve biodiversity?
What agreement commits countries to develop resources for sustainability?
What is the process of collecting natural products?
What can typically cause mass extinctions?
What percentage of species is estimated to be extinct?
How many species have ever lived on earth?
How many species currently live on earth?
What is the estimated weight of the total amount of related DNA base pairs on Earth?
Who describes the "Evil Quartet"?
What describes habitat destruction, overkill, introduced species, and secondary extinctions?
What describes Habitat destruction, Invasive species, Pollution, human over-Population, and Over-harvesting?
What is the most authoritative classification in use today?
What funding organization uses the IUCN's Classification of Direct Threats?
What can threaten endemic species with extinction?
What are another names for genetic pollution?
What causes genetic pollution?
What are are side-effects of introduction and invasion?
What behavior causes swamping of a gene pool?
What is the estimate age of the Earth?
What era contains the earliest undisputed evidence of life on Earth?
What is the name of the era that predated life on Earth?
Where were the billion year old microbial mat fossils found?
Where were the 3.7 billion-year-old metasedimentary rocks discovered?
What suggests that the last few million years featured the greatest biodiversity in history?
Why are some scientists uncertain about the fossil record?
What is the estimate variation of the present global macroscopic species diversity?
What appears increase continually in the absence of natural selection?
What is becoming an international political issue?
What issue is closely linked with changes in biodiversity?
What changes in biodiversity have an effect on the climate?
What types of species disappear when a new disease is introduced?
What century started the increase of species invasions?
Who intentionally and unintentionally moves species around?
What invaders are causing changes in the Great Lakes region?
What invaders are causing changes along the North American Atlantic coast?
What limits the amount of life that can live at once on Earth?
What type of animal shows a logistic pattern of growth?
What type of animal shows an exponential rise in diversity?
What percentage of potentially habitable modes have Tetrapods not yet invaded?
What was the increase in population from 1950 to 2011?
What year started the increase of population to 7 billion?
What is the forecast plateau that the population will reach during the 21st century?
Who is the former chief scientific adviser to the UK government?
What farms use biologically destructive pesticides
What is one of the great agricultural challenges that farmers face?
What farmers use integrated pest management strategies?
What farmers are generally less dependent on capital, biotechnology and energy?
What types of parks receive special protection against damage or degradation?
Who selects National parks?
What is the goal of protecting National Parks from damage?
Who usually owns and manages National parks?
What activities are prohibited in national parks?
Who is the German Federal Environment Minister?
What year did Gabriel estimate 30% of of all species will be extinct by?
How many plant species are close to extinction?
2012 studies estimated what percentage of mammals could be extinct in 20 years?
What is systematically related to the numbers of species?
What animals are more sensitive to reduction in habitat area?
How is a standardized ecosystem formed?
What leads to biodiversity loss is some countries?
What animal unintentionally invaded the US waterways?
What animal intentionally invaded Hawaii?
What animals were not vulnerable to the mongoose?
What countries experienced unintended consequences from species invasion?
What term describes the number and variety of plants, animals and other organisms in existence?
What ensures the survival of human species by providing food, shelter, other resources to mankind?
What influences richness of biodiversity?
What term describes all the species of plants in existence?
Which scientist first used the term biological diversity?
What book first contained the term biological diversity?
What decade did the term biological diversity become common usage in science and economics?
Who introduced the term biological diversity to the scientific community?
What term was common before biological diversity?
What provides critical support for drug discovery and the availability of medicinal resources?
What percentage of US drugs are derived from plants, animals, and micro-organisms?
What field has biodiversity made critical advances in?
What percentage of worldwide drugs are derived from nature?
What popularized the use of conventional hybridization to increase yield?
What did the high yield strains become resistant to?
Who has been pushing for hybridization?
What caused the loss of biodiversity?
What is the ASCII based on?
How many specific characters are there in the ASCII code?
How many are non-printing control characters?
How many characters are printable characters? 
What is the space also known as what?
ASCII was incorporated into what other character set?
How many of the symbols are the same in the beginning of the ASCII and Unicode?
What set is backward compatible with 7-bit ASCII?
What casued the automatic paper tape reader to stop?
What caused the automatic paper tape reader to start again?
What was the warning signal called that warned the sender that there was impending overflow?
What two controls can be configured with 33 ASR?
What are glass TTYs also known as?
What did Gary Kildall clone to create CP/M?
When was the introduction of PC DOS?
What programming did IBM use in the 1970s?
What was IBM's PC DOS marketed as by Microsoft?
What does the "line feed" function do?
What character represents the "line feed" function?
What does character 8 represent? 
What does RFC 2822 refers to what kind of control characters?
What did some software do to the ASCII characters?
What interpretation became common in Unix systmes?
What do most other systmes use the DEL to mean?
What did other systmes us for "remove previously-typed input character"?
What do computers attached to the ARPANET use for line endings?
How were the connections supported? 
Who else adopted this practice from Telnet?
Why did Telnet define an ASCII as a Network Virtual Terminal?
What do computers using operating systems use for line endings?
When was ISO/IEC 646 published?
What was ASCII inteded to be?
When was ISO's first acceptance of an international recommendation?
What was causing the confusion and incompatibility of the code points?
What was the "escape" character originally intended for?
What does modern ESC code do?
What does ESC generally mean for graphical user interfaces and windowing systems?
What does EOF stand for?
What is still the conventional use of the ETX code?
What did older operating systems use to mark the end of the text?
What else is the end-of-text code known as?
What was ASCII developed from? 
What was the first commercial use of ASCII?
When did work on the ASCII standard begin? 
When was the first edition of the standard published?
When was the first major revision of the code done?
What was ASCII published as and when?
How many code positions were left unassigned for furture standardization?
When was the change to ASCII made official?
The lower case letters caused a differ in the patter, what did this cause?
What was the most influential device that interpretated the characters?
What was the Teletype Model 33 ASR?
When was paper tape popular?
Why was paper tape better than magnetic tape?
What code eventually became neglected?
Why were problems created when transferring files between systems?
Teletype machines had to have two codes to termanate a line, what were they?
Where does the name "Carriage Return" come from?
What side does the carriage have to be pushed to when starting a new line?
What is the official name of code 127?
What was code 127 labeled as for the Teletype?
Why did Teletype have the code for "rubout"?
Why is adding two characters at the ned of a line problemsome? 
What id Multics use to simplify plain text data?
What used carriage return(CR) alone as a line terminator?
Who adopted this practice from Multics?
When did Apple replace their CR with line feed (LF)?
What is the first step in the human digestive system?
What is saliva?
What is in saliva that starts to digest the starches?
What is the definition of bolus?
What is the action of the food morving down the esophagus into the stomach called?
What is the practive of coprophagia behaviours?
Why do some animals pass food through their gut twice?
What happens with these soft feacal pellets?
Are normal droppings also eaten? 
What are the two types of digestion?
When did external digestion develop?
What still uses the external digestion system?
What is the name of the tube that helps add in animal digestion?
Why is internal digection better than external?
What elements can transfer to plant cells?
Where do transferred genes enter?
What do bacteria use as carbon and energy sources?
What happens to infected plant cells?
What are endosymbionts of the bacteria?
Where are teeth found?
What are teeth used for?
What are teeth made out of?
What in human teeth enables proprioception?
What is the fourth and final stomach compartment in ruminants?
What is the abomasums close equivalent?
What does this site serve primarily as?
What happens to digesta when it moves to the small intestine?
What is also digested in the small intestine?
What does a earthworms digestive systme consist of?
What does an earthworm eat?
What helps the earthworm grab grass leaves and weeds?
What is the food coated with for easier passage?
What part of the earthworm helps churn and mix the dirt and food?
Where does the digestions of some fats start?
Where are fats mainly digested?
What happens when there is a presence of fat in the small intestine?
What does bile from the liver help do?
What is one molecule of fat?
What is digestion?
In some organisms, how are these molecules absorbed?
What are the two ways that food is broken down?
What is mechanical digestion?
What is chemical digestion?
What are three digestions phases?
Where does the cephalic phase occur?
Where are taste and smell stimuli sent to?
How long does the gastric phase take?
How is the gastric phase stimulated to start?
What happens in a chennel transupport system? 
What three protien subunites are in the chennel transupport system?
What does this secretion system transport?
What other method does Gram-negative bacters use to release material?
What happens with the pinch off part of the outer membrane?
What does the release of vesicles seem to demenstrate?
What virulence factors do some bacterial species have?
What muscle movements are used for digestion?
What does every stpe of digestion require?
What does needing energy to digest impose?
Over head charges influence what?
Where does digestion begin?
What is food formed into before it is swallowed?
Where does food go after the esophagus?
What is the action of food being moved into the stomach?
What does gastric juice consist of?
What is lactase?
What are lactoses component parts?
Where are glucose and galactose absorbed?
What percent of the population are unable to eat unfermented milk-based foods?
What is knon as when you are  unable to eat unfermented milk-based foods?
What is the firs phase in preparation for digestion  in mammals?
What is the cephalic phase?
What digestions begin in the mouth?
What happens in the stomach after the food is chewed and mixed with starches?
Where does absorption occur?
Where does protein digestion occur?
What are the three main enzymes that break down food?
What are digestive enzymes mostly secreted as?
What are dipeptidases broken down into?
What organ secretes chymotrypsin?
What tool did Hoover use to find bootleggers?
In what supreme court case was it ruled that FBI wiretaps did not violate the Fourth Amendment?
What Act did Congress pass to outlaw non-consensual phone tapping?
In what case was it ruled that evidence obtained by the FBI via wiretapping was inadmissible in court?
What is now necessary to tap someone's telephone?
Which president was the first to use wiretaps to find bootleggers?
What case centered around a bootlegger caught through phone tapping?
What did Congress pass to outlaw phone tapping?
What is now required to wire tap a citizen?
Is a warrant required before or after a wiretap?
Did the FBI reassign agents from counter-intelligence to violent crime?
What priority were violent crimes in the 1990s, according to the FBI?
Did the new priorities of the FBI mean cutting other departments?
Was terrorism considered a threat after the cold war?
What agency pioneered DNA testing?
What agencies were to blame for 9/11?
Did 9/11 lead to more FBI oversight?
Did many believe the FBI was resisting important changes?
Did the people believe they were served well by the FBI?
Where is the CJIS located?
When was the CJIS created?
What purpose does the CJIS serve?
Where is the data for the NCIC located?
Do states have access to CJIS?
Who is responsible for day-to-day FBI operations?
Who assists the FBI director?
What acts were passed relating to the FBI after 9/11?
Who used to brief the President?
Who now reports to the President?
What compiles data from around 17,000 law enforcement agencies?
What does UCR focus on?
Where was the UCR created?
What percentage of COINTELPRO resources were targeted at FBI labeled subversive groups?
Did the FBI target MLK?
What percentage of COINTELPRO resources were used to target white hate groups?
What were the key white hate groups targeted?
What was the term for the liberal groups appearing at this time?
What is the FBI comparable to?
What kind of agency is the FBI?
How many field offices does the FBI have in major cities?
Around how many offices does the FBI have in minor cities?
Who serves as the representative of the Director of National Intelligence?
What was the bureau's first task?
What act was the bureau initially tasked with enforcing?
What was the other formal name of the Mann Act?
When was the Mann Act passed?
When was the bureau renamed?
When did the FBI become concerned about Civil Rights?
What ties did the FBI believe civil rights leaders had?
Who did Hoover send an open letter denouncing?
What agency had Dr. T.R.M. Howard criticized?
What was the controversial domestic surveillance operation in this era?
When did a committee oppose the FBI's organized crime informant program?
How many innocent men did the FBI allow to be convicted?
What was the death sentence reduced to?
How many of the men died in prison?
How much was the US government ordered to pay in damages?
When did the FBI increase it's counter-terrorism role?
What prompted the FBI increase in counter-terrorism?
Where was the World Trade Center?
When was Oklahoma city bombed?
What did agents within the FBI do to investigations of the agency?
What FBI agent was killed during attacks on the World Trade Center?
What tower was Leonard W. Hatton Jr attempting to evacuate?
What did the FBI's new director want?
What was the new head of the FBI's top priority?
What part of the FBI did Mueller want to re-engineer?
When did the Washington Post publish excerpts from the book Spying Blind?
How many chances to disrupt the 9/11 attacks did the FBI dismiss?
What two agencies had a lack of co-operation?
What was to blame for the FBI's failure?
What did the FBI's decentralized structure prevent?
What increased the powers of the FBI?
What was one of the most controversial parts of the Patriot Act?
What new residential powers did the FBI now have?
Could the FBI inquire into library records?
Who's library records did the FBI look into?
When did the FBI lab first appear?
Where was the FBI lab?
Who uses the FBI lab services?
How much does the FBI charges for lab services?
Where is the second FBI lab?
When did the FBI begin the Trilogy project?
What project centered on upgrading FBI Information Technology Infrastructure?
Did the Trilogy project go over budget?
When did the FBI abandon the VCF project?
What group of people may apply to join the FBI after age 37?
What is the minimum age to join the FBI?
Is American citizenship required to be an FBI agent?
What is a SSBI?
Who conducts SSBIs?
Did the FBI keep files on Elvis Presley?
What activities was the FBI concerned with during the Vietnam war?
What kinds of treats were celebrities receiving?
What party was the FBI concerned with?
Who tipped of Bulger?
What act was the indictment under?
How long did Bulger remain at large?
Was Bulger on the 10 Most Wanted Fugitives List?
What did the revelations about Bulger cause?
What was Virgil Griffith focused on?
What part of the government was editing its own wikipedia page?
What was Griffith's tool designed to detect?
What did Griffith's tool help increase?
How as Griffith's wikipedia scanner viewed by wikipedia?
When did the FBI announce Robert Hanssen's arrest?
What was Hanssen arrested for?
When was Hanssen a spy for Russia/the SU?
How many life time sentences is Hanssen serving?
What much money did Hanssen receive in cash?
What agency is the domestic intelligence and security service for the US?
What organization is the FBI a subset of?
What Director does the FBI report to?
How many categories of federal crimes does the FBI have jurisdiction over?
Who was Director from 1924 to 1972?
How many years was Hoover the FBI director?
What laboratory was Hoover responsible for creating?
What was the other name for the Scientific Crime Detection Laboratory?
When did the FBI laboratory open?
What kind of work was the FBI focused on?
How many LEGAT offices does the FBI operate?
Why does the FBI operate LEGAT offices?
Do LEGAT offices conduct unilateral operations in host countries?
What do oversea operations require?
When did the Bureau begin compiling a custodial detention list?
When would the people on the custodial detention list be arrested?
Who were the majority of names on the custodial detention list?
When was Pearl Harbor bombed?
What group did the FBI continue surveillance on?
What was the Top Hoodlum Program a response to?
What did the Top Hoodlum Program gather information on?
After the RICO Act took effect what did the FBI start investigating?
What groups did Hoover deny the existence of?
Is the RICO Act still used today?
What spurred the FBIs technological upgrade?
What team underwent a technological upgrade in 1991?
What were CITAC and NIPC created to deal with?
What were computer viruses seen as a threat to?
Did the FBI increase electronic surveillance?
What precision did the FBI believe they could reach with chemical signatures?
How long was the National Academy of Sciences independent review?
What did the National Academy of Sciences independent review discover about the FBIs analytical model?
Why did the FBI stop doing bullet lead analysis?
What is the FBI's main tool against organized crime?
What act is the FBI required to enforce?
What organization does the FBI prosecute violations of the United States Civil Rights Act with?
What organization does the FBI share jurisdiction with?
What Substance act does the FBI enforce?
When does the FBI work with the US Coast Guard and US Customs and Board Protection?
When does the FBI work with the National Transportation Safety Board?
What organization in the US government investigates the largest array of crimes?
What organization did General Ashcroft assign to lead organization in terrorism investigations?
What are the FBI and ICE-HSI both members of?
Where are agents sent to become FBI Special Agents?
Where is the FBI Academy?
How long is the course required for all special agents?
What other groups does the FBI Academy train?
Did the FBI investigate Martin Luther King Jr.?
Who did MLK begin criticizing in the mid-1960s?
What group did MLK believe needed more attention from the FBI?
What did Hoover call MLK?
What kind of letter did the FBI send to MLK?
What is the goal of the NIBRS?
Who uses the NIBRS?
What is the NIBRS used for?
What does the NIBRS collect information on?
Does the NIBRS system or UCR system have more detailed data?
What Puerto Rican leader did the FBI spy on?
What party was Pedro Albizu Campos part of?
How many times was Pedro Albizu Campos convicted of attacks on US officials?
Who released the Campos operation to the public?
When was the Abizu Campos operation made public?
What office contains the FBI's administrative offices?
Who manages each FBI branch?
What is a FBI branch divided into?
Who heads an office or division?
Who leaders the sub-divisions of offices or divisions?
What was the electronic eavesdropping system used by the FBI during the Clinton presidency?
What did Carnivore monitor?
What was Carnivore renamed to?
When did the FBI abandon Carnivore?
What kind of software replaced Carnivore?
When did the FBI first appear in popular media?
What notable TV show was concerned with FBI investigations of the paranormal?
What is the TV drama 24 designed on?
Who is the movie Point Break Based on?
Who is the movie Donnie Brasco based on?
How many times did FBI agents first their weapons from 1993 to 2011?
How many times were FBI shots not justified?
How many people were wounded in the cases where FBI shooting was not justified?
How did Samuel Walker describe the number of unjustified shots fired?
On what was the shooting of an innocent Maryland man deemed justified?
Adolescene is viewed as what?
A thorough understanding of adolescence in society depends on what?
What is the purpose of adolescence?
What is the cultural purpose of adolescence?
What is the transitional period between childhood and adulthood viewed as?
Is adolescence a period of one transition or multiple transitions?
What transitions occur during puberty in addition to living circumstances?
Puberty causes what to happen in boys?
What releases testosterone?
What releases estrogen?
What causes puberty? 
A surge in hormone production triggers a number of physical changes during what stage of life?
Which gland secretes a surge of hormonal agents into the blood stream?
Which part of the body releases testosterone in males?
Which part of the body relesases estrogen in females?
An imbalance in sex hormones, tissue responsiveness, or obesity can cause what in boys?
How do a person's heart and lungs change during puberty?
Increased size and capacity of the heart and lungs result in what changes to the body?
Which sex tends to develop larger hearts and lungs?
Which sex tends to have more red blood cells than the other?
Which body system are a person's lungs a major proponent of?
Is a person's brain fully developed by the time they reach puberty?
The biggest changes in the brain during puberty occur in the parts of the cortex that process what kinds of information?
The brain reaches 90% of its adult size by the time a person reaches what year of age?
What parts of the brain continue to become more complex into the late teens?
The brain reaches what percentage of its adult size by the time a person is six years old?
Which neuromodulator is involved in regulation of mood and behavior?
Are the effects of serotonin limited to the limbic system?
Serotonin is a neuromodulator that is involved in regulation of what?
Which system in the brain determines rewards and punishments, emotional experiences, and social information?
Which two neurotransmitters cause adolescents to be more emotional and more responsive to rewards and stresses?
Deductive reasoning leads to the development of what type of thinking?
Are adolescents or children more bound to concrete events?
What type of thinking provides the ability to plan ahead and makes adolescents more skilled debaters?
Adolescents develop a more sophisticated understanding of what mathematical concept thanks to their increased hypothetical thinking abilties?
Are sexual actvity and risky behaviors more likely in boys that mature early or later?
Increased aggresiveness and early sexual maturation in adolescent boys are due to a surge of what?
Are early or late maturing boys generally taller and stronger than their friends?
What is one reason a late maturing boy may be less confident when comparing himself to others?
How is adolescence defined biologically?
How is adolescence defined cognitively?
How is adolescence defined socially?
Changes to sex organs, height, weight, and muscle mass are examples of which type of change?
Increases in knowledge and the ability to think abstractly are examples of which kind of change?
Who founded the University of California, Berkeley's Institude of Human Development?
What year was the University of California, Berkeley's Instutute of Human Development founded?
What was the Univerity of California, Berkeley's Institute of Human Development formerly called?
What year was the Oakland Growth Study initiated?
What year did data for the Oakland Growth Study stop being collected?
What is a male's major landmark of puberty?
At what average age does a male's first ejaculation occur?
What is a female's major landmark of puberty?
Besides heredity, what other factors contribute to when menustration begins?
Do girls who are malnourished start menustrating earlier or later than those with high-fat diets?
How can the ideal self be described in terms of the adolescent?
How can the feared self be described in terms of the adolescent?
Do adolescents demonstrate intended behavior moving towards the ideal or feared self?
What term is the beginning of menstruation given?
How many years does regular ovulation follow menarche?
What are two areas of the reproductive system that experience growth in females during puberty?
Do males or females appear physically mature before they are capable of reproduction?
What activity often results in a boy's first ejaculation?
What are primary sex characteristics?
What does the first stage of puberty involve for males?
After growth of the testes and scrotum, while male body part experiences growth next?
Which male body parts enlarge and develop at the same time as the penis?
Which part of the brain is involved in decision making and cognitive control?
Which area of the brain is important for controlling impulses and planning ahead?
Which part of the brain is important for evaluating rewards and risks?
Which are the first areas to be pruned during puberty?
Motor and sensory skills are examples of what kind of brain function?
What view towards cognitive development during adolescence did Piaget take?
Did Piaget believe that cognitive improvement was sudden and drastic or slow and steadied?
Besides the information-processing perspective, what is the other major approach to understanding cognitive change during adolescence?
The information-processing perspective towards cognitive development derives from the study of what?
Casual sexual encounters are often referred to as what?
Do most sexual experiences during adolescence take place within or seperate from romantic relationships?
Where do some adolescents feel is a safe place to seek out romantic relationships, try out dating and indentity exploration?
What seperates "heavy" sexual activity from other forms of affection?
For older adolescents, is sexual activity in a romantic relationship associated with lower or higher levels of deviant behavior?
What is the term used to describe thinking about thinking itself?
Are adolescents or children better able to understand that people do not have complete control over their thoughts?
The imaginary audience and personal fable peak at what age?
At what age does self-consciousness in general peak?
What questionaire has been used to measure the age in which adolescents should be able to engage in autonomous behaviors?
Do White or Asian parents tend to expect autonomy earlier than the other?
What has the teen timetable questionnaire been used to guage?
What is an example of a poor birth control method?
Are higher or lower levels of parental support associated with risky sexual behavior?
Is exploratory sexual behavior seen as similar or seperate to other aspects of identity?
Does having unprotected sex, multiple sexual partners, and poor communication increase or decrease individual and social risk?
Does research favor or reject the hypothesis that adolescents and adults think about risk similarly but hold different values and therefore come to different conclusions?
A priority in sexual attraction and dating can prove helpful in order to complete what reproductive advantage?
What does research indicate may affect risk-taking behavior throughout the lifespan?
When does the search for identity begin for most individuals?
What are some factors that make developing and maintaining an identity during the adolescent years a difficult task?
What are two main aspects of identity development?
What are the three general approaches to understanding identity development?
Do adolescents with a less privileged upbringing have a more or less difficult time developing their identity?
Identity achievement rarely occurs before what age?
Is there a final endpoint in identity development?
Evidence has supported which theorist's idea concerning stages of development?
Does self-examination begin early or late in adolescence?
Which theorist argued that not everyone fully achieves identity?
How do adolescents initially define themselves?
How is Moratorium defined?
Which researcher developed the current method for testing an individual's process along the stages of identity?
James Marcia divides questions into how many categories?
Which term is defined as one's thoughts and feelings about one's self-concept and identity?
Is there evidence to support a drop in self-esteem during adolescence?
Which type of self-esteem fluctuates rapidly and can cause severe distress and anxiety?
Which type of self-esteem remains stable throughout adolescence?
What is the most important function of friendship?
At what age does awareness of one's sexual orientation occur on average?
At what age does coming out to one's peers occur on average?
At what age does coming out to adults occur on average?
How many times higher is the suicide rate amongst LGBT adolescents than their heterosexual peers?
What are factors causing a hightened suicide rate amongst LGBT adolescents?
Are modern day teenagers exposed to more or less media than other generations?
How many hours of television does the average teenager watch per year?
Teenagers' views on body mass, loe self-esteem, and atypical eating patterns results in what?
How is "body dissatisfaction" defined?
What is the current divorce rate?
Does divorce usually result in more or less contact with the noncustodial parent?
What new theory states that traumatic events during adolescence have lifelong effects?
Does a parental divorce during childhood or adulthood have a positive or negative effect on a person during early adulthood?
How is culture defined?
Does culture affect all, some, or none of the aspects of an individual's life?
What is a challenge researchers face when studying culture and adolescents?
Should culture be directly connected to a nation or ethnicity?
How do adolescents use online technology?
To what does "channel" refer in terms if adolescent communication?
What is a potential negative effect of using newer online channels of communication?
What percentage of sexually active teenagers will contract an STI?
Girls ages 15 to 19 have higher rates of what STD than any other age group?
What ratio of all new HIV cases occur in those under age 21?
According to a survey by the Kaiser Family Foundation, what percentage of parents want schools to discuss contraception with their children?
What percent of the teenage population is affected by herpes and HPV?
In what year was the Convention on the Rights of the Child created?
What two countries have not legally committed to advancing an anti-discriminaory stance towards young people?
A person below the age of majority may gain adult rights through what process?
What is legally different for an individual who has reached the age of majority?
In developing countries, is it common for children to attend fewer or greater years of formal schooling?
Why, in developting countries, do children often attend fewer years of formal schooling?
According to family economic and financial education specialists, how do adolescents develop sound money management skills?
Which of the Five-Factor Model dimensions does not demonstrate an association with drinking motives?
Is alcohol use a positive or negative emotion control mechanism?
Which motivation for drinking alcohol results in low conscientiousness, lowered inhibition, and greater tendency towards aggression?
Drinking to cope with negative emotional states correlates strongly with what behavioral qualities?
What is the most commonly abused substance during adolescent years in the U.S.?
The heightened usage of what drug is most likely due at least in some part to the rising popularity of rave culture?
Aside from alcohol, what is the most commonly indulged drug habit during adolescent years?
From the late 1990s to mid 2000s, was drug use in teens on the rise or decline?
From which language does the word "adolescence" originate?
What is the Latin meaning of the word "adolescere"?
What is another term for legal adulthood?
Physical growth and cognitive development generally observed in adolescents can extend to what age?
Are girls reaching sexual maturation early more or less likely to develop eating disorers?
Nearly half of Americam high school girls hope to achieve what goal with their diet?
Are early or late maturing girls more exposed to alcohol and drug abuse?
Do early or late maturing girls have more unwanted pregnancies?
Who performs better in school: sexually experienced or inexperienced teen females?
Is change in bodily distribution of fat and muscle the same or different between males and females during puberty?
Do boys or girls experience a more significant increase in body fat?
Do boys or girls grow muscle faster during puberty?
What is the ratio between muscle and fat among post-pubertal boys?
What is the ratio between muscle and fat amoung post-pubertal girls?
What is a secondary sex characteristic change?
How many Tanner stages are there?
What was the occupation of the person who devised the Tanner categorization system?
Elevation of the breasts, development of pubic hair, and elevation of the nippes are examples of what type of changes?
Is deepening of the voice in males a primary or secondary sex characteristic?
Who was the first president of the American Psychological Association?
From the '50s to the '80s, was the field's focus devoted to describing patterns of behavior or explaining them?
What was the title of the publication that started the formal study of adolescent psychology?
Which theorist is known for his beliefs on evolution?
Do children or adolescents define themselves based on values, thoughts, and opinions?
Which idea is known as the ability of a person to have opinions and beliefs that are defined confidently, consistent, and stable?
How do children tend to define themselves?
Greater self-awareness, greater awareness of others, and the ability to consider multiple possiblities at once are examples of what kind of developments?
Which adolescent ethninticy is most often studied?
What social class of adolescents is most often studied?
The period of one's life that spans late adolescence and early adulthood is known as what?
Is an inner city or crime-driven neighborhood more or less likely to be detrimental to one's development?
Why are children from suburban communities more likely to participate in activies that benefit their identity?
Does communication with peers increase or decrease during adolescence?
Do children or adolescents tend to associae with friends of the opposite sex more?
How is adolescence defined socially?
Did adolescents report more sexual or social events to researchers?
Why do researchers believe the social event reporting by adolescents (rather than sexual activity) is important?
Holding hands with one's partner and telling others about a relationship are examples of what kind of adolescent event?
What are the three main types of autonomy?
How is behavioral autonomy defined?
Adolescent cultural differences are especially visible in which type of autonomy?
How is cognitive autonomy defined?
Is an adolescent's mental health at its best when their feelings of autonomy match closely with their parents or when they are at odds?
Is teenage alcohol drug use at al all-time high or low?
Do teens smoke marijuana or cigarettes more commonly?
Are male or female late adolescents more likely to smoke cigarettes?
What is one possible explanation for the shift towards marijuana and away from cigarettes?
Are motives behind teen alcohol use varied or uniform across different cultures?
What two reasons for adolescent drinking are shared across cultural contexts?
What percentage of Argentenian teens reported drinking to improve a bad mood?
What is the most common reason for drinking among adolescents according to surveys in Argentina, Hong Kong, and Canada?
In Hong Kong, did males or females most frequently report drinking to feel the effects of the alcohol?
Is adolescence usually accompanied by increased parental supervision or increased independence?
Do milestones such as driving a vechile, serving on a jury, voting, and marriage all have a common age of responsibility?
Is the end of adolescence and beginning of adulthood easily agreed upon or does it vary by country?
Does the amount of white matter in the brain increase or decrease over the course of adolescence?
Does the amount of grey matter in the brain increase linearly or follow an inverted-U pattern over the course of adolescence?
During which process are unnecessary neuronal connections in the brain eliminated?
Does the brain become more or less efficient as a result of synaptic pruning?
Who describes adolescence as the stage of life in which the individual's thoughts start taking more of an abstract form?
What is another term for congitive skills that enable the control and coordination of thoughts and behavior?
Which cortex is commonly associated with the coordination of thoughts and behavior?
Does Piaget believe that egocentric thoughts decrease or increase during adolescence?
Do adolescents or children understand puns, proverbs, metaphors, and analogies most effectively?
Children under what age often cannot comprehend sarcasm?
Are puns, proverbs, metaphors, and analogies lower-order or higher-order logic?
The appearance of more systematic, abstract thinking is a notable aspect of what type of development during adolescence?
Most injuries sustained by adolescents are related to what?
Do adolescents, adults, or both weight the potential rewards and consequences of an action?
Do adolescents or adults seem to give more weight to rewards?
Which theory proposes that adults and adolescents both weigh the potential rewards and consequences of an action?
When does differentiation appear fully developed?
Does the recognition of inconsistent content in one's self-concept typically bring distress or peace to an adolescent?
When adolescents begin to qualify their traits, what are they demonstrating?
In what year did Troiden propose a four-stage model for the development of homosexual sexual identity?
What is Troiden's first stage of development known as?
When does sensitization usually start?
In what stage is youth overwhelmed by feelings of inner turmoil regarding their sexual orientation?
Troiden's second stage is referred to as what?
Does intimacy between same-sex siblings increase or decrease during adolescence?
When siblings act as peers, what positive effects are possible?
At what stage to mixed-sex siblings generally experience an increase in intimacy?
Do adolescents associate with "cliques" on a large or small scale?
What are the positive effects that cliques may have on an adolescent?
How are cliques defined?
Do adolescents associate with "crowds" on a large or small scale?
What percentage of adolescents reporting having experienced physical violence in a relationship?
What percentage of adolescents reported experiencing psychological aggression?
Hitting, throwing objects, and slaps are examples of what type of aggression?
In heterosexual adolescent couples, is there a significant difference in the rates of male and female aggressors?
Does physical aggression decline or increase during high-school, college, and early adulthood?
Does adolescent participation in family work and routines have a positive or negative influence on feelings of self-worth, care, and concern for others?
How are household chores frequently divided?
What is one large determining factor in normative adolescent behavior?
Through what means does an adolescent develop a unique belief system?
The active seeking of new ideas rather than the unquestioning acceptance of adult authority is known as what stage of development?
What things are youth responsible for forming a set of beliefs about during adolescence?
Ceremonies, rituals, and confirmations are examples of what?
What percentage of adolescent homes have access to the internet?
What percentage of adolescents use the internet at least occasionally?
In the last decade, has the amount oftime adolescents spend on the computer increased or dereased?
What percentage of adolescents report using social networking sites?
What online activity has the largest number of reported adolescent particpation?
What is DIS?
What are some of the negative things adolescents are susceptible to?
What does the DIS focus on in adolescents?
What does the alcohol and illegal drug habits of teens tend to be shaped by?
What is one possible reasoning behind many students choosing to continue their smoking habits from middle school into late adolescence?
Do peer acceptance and social norms have a greater or lesser effect on behavior at the onset of adolescence?
What is the range of consentual age variance between jurisdictions?
Is the age that peope are allowed to marry universally decided upon?
What are other areas in which legal societal age varies?
What does West Antarctica most resemble geologically?
How was the Antarctic Peninsula formed?
During what eras was the Antarctic Peninsula formed?
What are the most common rocks found in West Antarctica?
Where has evidence of volcanic activity been discovered in Antarctica?
To what mountainous area is Antarctica geologically similar?
An uplift of what formed Antarctica?
Starting from the late Paleozoic era, when did Antarctica finish forming?
What are the most often found rocks in Antarctica?
What type of geologic activity occurred even after the formation of the ice sheets?
When was the Antarctic Conservation Act passed by the U.S.?
What type of penalty can importing plants and animals into Antarctica bring?
How many tonnes of Patagonian toothfish were illegally fished in 2000?
When did the Convention for the Conservation of Antarctic Marine Living Resources  come into force?
Over fishing of which species of fish helped promote regulations on fishing?
What is the main mineral found on Antarctica?
Where was coal first found on Antarctica?
What expedition discovered coal on Antarctica?
Where is iron ore found on Antarctica?
Where are oil and gas deposits located near Antarctica?
What type of research was Princess Elizabeth station built to study?
How much did the Princess Elizabeth station cost?
What unique characteristic does the Princess Elizabeth station feature?
From what country was the Princess Elizabeth station shipped?
Who is the leader of the station design team?
What type of ice originates on land and floats out to sea?
What events have occurred in recent decades to the ice shelves surrounding Antarctica?
Along what area has there been more collapsing ice shelves?
What could the displacement of ice cause?
What weather event would offset loss of ice shelves?
What can not grow extensively in Antarctica?
What does the climate of Antarctica inhibit?
hat is low and limited in Antarctica?
How many species of Mosses are there in Antarctica?
What has been an important atmospheric study since the 1970s?
When did scientists discover the hole in the ozone layer?
Where in Antarctica is Halley Station?
What chemical was discovered to have caused the hole in the ozone?
What agreement banned the use of CFC s?
What type of climate did Gondwana have during the Cambrian period?
In what hemisphere did west Antarctica share during the Cambrian?
Where was east Antarctica during the Cambrian period?
What was the climate of Gondwana at the beginning of the Devonian period?
Where was Gondwana located by the end of the Devonian period?
What is the southern most continent?
What is the size of Antarctica in square miles?
What is Antarctica's ranking among the continents?
How many miles long is Antarctica's coast line?
What is the highest peak in Antarctica?
How high is the Antarctic mountain Vinson Massif?
In what mountainous area of Antarctica is Vinson Massif?
What type of volcano was located in 2004 by researchers?
What is the Earth's most southern volcano?
What astronomical study is important research for Antarctica?
What is the supposed source of most Antarctica meteorites?
When was the first meteorite found in Antarctica?
What expedition found nine meteorites in 1969?
What location means that Antarctica get little solar radiation?
In what condition is most water in the Antarctica?
What is the usual condition of precipitation in the Antarctic?
What does the massed snow in Antarctica produce?
What are ice streams otherwise called?
Where did the first semi-permanent residents of the Antarctic area live?
In what year did the sealers start staying on South Georgia?
What was the profession of the residents of South Georgia?
What was the nationality of most whalers?
When did explorer Carl Anton Larsen become a British citizen?
What animal was greatly hunted during the 18th and 19th centuries?
What did  Sir James Weddell command?
For whom is the Weddell seal named ?
What is a very important species in the Southern Ocean?
Why is the krill so important to the Antarctic area?
When did the Environmental Protocol become effective?
What is the main concern of the Protocol?
What is seen as a major risk to Antarctica?
What group advises the Antarctic Treaty Consultative Meeting?
Besides conservation, what is the Environmental Protocol's goal to manage?
How do the meteorites found in Antarctica add to knowledge about the solar system?
From where in the solar system could the meteorites have come?
Beside rare types of meteorites, what other types of meteorites have been found in Antarctica?
About what nearby planet could the Antarctic meteorites hold data?
What do meteorites absorb that can be used to understand how old the meteorite is?
How much of Antarctica is covered by ice?
How much of Earth's ice is in Antarctica?
How thick is the ice that covers Antarctica?
How much of the Earth's fresh water is held in Antarctica?
What is the amount of precipitation per year in the interior of Antarctica?
What lake is thought to contain microbial life?
To what does the frozen surface of Lake Vostok resemble?
With what is Europa associated??
When did NASA go on an expedition to Lake Untersee?
For what was NASA searching?
Which of the the poles is colder?
How high is the continent of Antarctica above sea level?
How does the Arctic Ocean warm the Arctic?
What contributes to the Antarctic cold?
What does temperature do with elevation?
Who was the first person born south of the 60th parallel?
Where is the continental limit of Antarctica?
When was Palma born?
What was the Palma family sent to Antarctica to determine?
How many species of fungi have been found on Antarctica?
What type of fungi help shape rock formations in Antarctica?
How many of the extant fungi in Antarctica are lichen-forming?
What has the study of fungi in Antarctica shown about these organisms?
How is it postulated that Mars life might have evolved?
The entry of whom has caused some worry about the welfare of Antarctica?
What do environmentalists want enacted?
What kind of tourist limit has been asked for by environmentalists?
What have the authorities produced in response to these requests?
When did an Air New Zealand crash on Mount Erebus?
Which angel appeared to Mary?
What happened to Mary's body at death?
What did Gabriel announce to Mary at the Annunciation?
How was Mary related to Jesus?
Which goespel begins its story of Mary with the Annunciation?
When was the Assumption dogmatically define by the Catholic Church?
In which papal document was the dogma of the Assumption defined?
Which pope authored Munifentissimus Deus?
Other than the Roman Catholic Church, which church holds the doctrine of the Assumption to be true?
What is another name for the Assumption of Mary?
What was Zechariah's occupation?
Which tribe did Elizabeth belong to?
Who was Aaron's wife?
Which tribe did Elisheba belong to?
Who was the third son of David and Bathsheba?
Which Egyptian goddess do some scholars ascribe similarities to?
What type of goddess is Isis?
What kind of relationship do some scholars believe exists between Isis and Mary?
In which country is Ephesus?
Whose visions led to the identification of the House of the Virgin Mary?
Which disciple is known as "the Disciple whom Jesus loved?"
With whom is it believed that Mary lived with in Ephesus?
In which century was the House of the Virgin Mary found?
In which year was the Second Council of Nicea?
In which year did the Synod of Constantinople confirm the veneration of images of Mary?
Which icon is most venerated in the Orthodox Church?
What is the name given to artistic depictions of Mary?
In the Orthodox church, what types of icons are allowed to be venerated and prayed before?
Where is the site of the first Church dedicated to Mary?
Which goddess was worshipped in Ephesus before Mary?
Who was the author of the book, "Survivals of Roman Religion?"
Which Queen furthered the cult of Mary in the 6th Century?
Where was Mary rumored to have died?
Jesus was known as the "King of Kings" because of his lieage from who?
Which name is given to Mary because of her role as a protector of captives?
Who was the mother of Jesus?
Which New Testament book provides a basis for the term Queen when referring to Mary?
Who wrote polemics regarding Roman Catholic beliefs about Mary?
In which year was the Immaculate Conception dogmatized?
Which pope was responsible for the dogmatization of the Immaculate Conception?
What does Theotokos mean?
Where did Martin Luther preach a sermon on Marian devotion a month before his death?
Which color is traditionally used to portray Mary in paintings?
What rock was used as the source of blue pigment in paints in Medieval and Renaissance Europe?
From which country was lapis lazuli imported?
Lapis lazuli was thought to be more valuable than which precious metal?
Which ancient empire is thought to have started the tradition of portraying Mary in paintings using the color blue?
According to Nontrinitarian belief, what is Mary's relationship to Jesus?
Which Nontrinitarian theologian says that God cannot approach eveil spirits to redeem them?
Unittarians, Christadelphians and Jehovah's Witnesses are examples of what kind of church?
"Mother of God" is an example of what kind of title?
In Orthodox tradition, what comes next in precdence after The Theotokos in the order of the saints?
What are hymns to the Theotokos called in Orthodox tradition?
In the liturgical sequences of the Eastern Church, who is placed next in prominence after Christ?
What is Mary proclaimed to be in the Orthodox tradition?
What do the Orthodox believe Mary remained to be before and after she gave birth to Christ?
What is the mother church of the Angican Communion?
Which church in the United States is associated with the Angican Communion?
What practice differentiates the Angican Communon from Protestant churches at large?
What branch of Christianity does the Angican Communion fall under?
For what practice did the first Protestants criticize the Roman Catholics?
In which century did the Council of Trent occur?
Which Protestant churches still honor Mary?
During which historical era did Protestant interest in Mary almost disappear?
Marian veneration became associated with which Christians after the Council of Trent?
Which doctrine about Mary do Methodists reject?
Who was the founder of the Methodist movement?
What are the sources of beliefs about Mary held by Methodists?
The Methodist movement began in which church?
Which Marian doctrine did John Wesley uphold in founding Methodism?
To whom was Mary dedicated while still in the womb?
Which prophet cared for Mary?
What is understood to be the Holy of Holies in Islam?
Where did Mary reside in her chilhood?
What did God provide for Mary?
Who suggested that Jesus was the son of a Roman soldier?
What was the name of the Roman soldier said by Celsus to be the father of Jesus?
Origen was a Church Father in which Egyptian city?
In which century did Celsus suggest that Jesus' father was a Roman soldier?
For what purpose did detractors use the idea of Mary's virginity and the virgin conception of Jesus?
What is the literal meaning of Theotokos?
Which branch of Christianity gives a diminished role to Mary?
What is Mary called in Islam?
What is the basis for Mary's diminished role in Protestantism?
Which two Protestant churches, along with the Roman Catholic and Orthodox churches, believe that Mary is the Mother of God?
Which Gospel says that Mary fulfilled the prophecy of Isaiah?
What Hebrew word is used to describe Mary in Isaiah 7:14?
Until which century was the Virgin birth of Jesus held almost universally among Christians?
Which verse in Luke states that Mary had "no relations with man" before Jesus' birth?
Along with the Nicene Creed, which other Christian creed asserts the Virgin birth of Jesus?
What are Akathists?
How many of the Orthodox Great Feasts dedicated to Mary?
What is name of the Orthodox hymn devoted to Mary?
Which event on the Orthodox calendar is related to Mary and icon veneration?
What is the name given to the Annunciation in the 1662 Book of Common Prayer?
On what date do most Anglicans celebrate the Visitation of the Blessed Virgin?
What is another name for the feast of the Presentation of Christ in the Temple in the Anglican Communion?
On what date is the Presentation of Christ in the Temple celebrated by Anglicans?
On what day was the Annunciation tradtionally celebrated in England until the 18th century?
Which theologian described Mariology as "the heresy of the Catholic Church?"
Protestants hold that Mary had what relationship to Jesus?
Protestants reject what practices in relation to the Saints?
Protestants describe Mary as devoted to whom?
Who do Christians believe is prophesized in Isaiah 7:14?
Which verse in Matthew is believed to refer to Isaiah's prohecy of the Virgin Mary?
Which Gospel writer provided a version of the virgin birth that was different than Matthew's?
What is the English tranlation of the Greek word "parthenos?"
What is the meaning of the Greek word "heos?"
Who did Jesus say were his "brother, and sister, and mother?"
According to Jesus, who is "without honor except in his own town?"
What do some Biblical scholars claim that Jesus' family did with his message during his ministry?
What is the term used for veneration of Mary in Roman Catholic theology?
In what year was the hierarchy of latria, hyperdulia and dulia established?
Who is venerated in the Roman Catholic practice of dulia?
Which theologian wrote that Mary is considered to be "superior to all created beings," but is not to be the object of worhip?
What is the Roman Catholic term used to denote the worship of God?
On what date is the feast of the Immaculate Conception in the Latin Rite of the Roman Catholic Church?
Which pope proclaimed the Immaculate Conception of Mary?
In what year did Pope Pius IX make his Ex Cathedra proclamation of the Immaculate Conception of Mary?
According to the doctrine of Immaculate Conception, where was Mary when she first become filled with grace?
What is the Greek term that means the same thing as "original sin?"
What book is considered to be the source of many Orthodox beliefs regarding Mary?
At what age was Mary consecrated?
Which priest officiated at Mary's consecration?
While Mary lived in the temple, who was said to have fed her?
Where in Jewish literature is the story about Panthera found?
According to the Blackwell Companion to Jesus, for what purpose was the Toledot Yeshu written?
What is the meaning of the term "parthenos?"
During what historical period was the Toledot Yeshu written?
What event does Raymond E. Brown believe the Toledot Yeshu describes?
What is the second busiest airport in Australia?
What is another name Melbourne Airport is called?
What is Melbourne's main metropolitan train terminus called?
What is Melbourne's main regional train and coach terminus called?
What is Australia's busiest seaport for containerised and general cargo?
What airport serves Melbourne?
What is the main metropolitan train terminus called in Melbourne?
What is the main regional train and coach terminus in Melbourne?
What city is known to be home to Australia's most extensive freeway network?
What country has the world's largest urban tram network?
What passenger airport serves Melbourne?
What is the busiest seaport in Melbourne?
What is the name of the main metropolitan train terminus called in Melbourne?
Who has the most extensive freeway network?
What is the name of the coach terminus in Melbourne?
What is another name for Melborne Airport?
Which airport is the second busiest in Australia?
Which port in Melborne is the busiest seaport for containerised and general cargo?
What is Melborne's main metropolitan train terminus?
Where is the world's largest urban tram network located?
Between what year's did Victorian aboriginal groups dispossessed?
In 1844 how many Aborigines resident in squalid camps in Melbourne?
Who appointed five Aboriginal Protectors for the Aborigines of Victoria in 1839?
Who were the people that were power political and economic force in Victoria in 1845?
How many Aborigines were said to be resident in squalid camps in Melbourne in January 1844?
How many Aboriginal Protectors for the Aborigines of Victoria were appointed in 1839?
By what year did fewer than 240 wealthy Europeans hold all the pastoral licenses?
During what years were Victorian Aboriginal groups largely displaced from their land?
When was the gold rush over in Melbourne?
How did Melbourne grow as major port for exporting the agricultural products?
What was protected by high tarriffs?
By what year was the gold rush largely over?
What was one of the major agricultural products of Victoria around 1860?
What were some of the reasons the Aboriginal population continued to recline?
Which disease in particular caused the Aboriginal population to continue a decline?
The Aboriginal population declined by what estimated percentage by 1863?
When did severe depression hit Melbourne's city?
What went into liquidation in Melbourne around the 1890's?
When did new construction start in Melbourne?
When did Australia have a banking crisis?
During what decade did Melbourne suffer a sever economic depression?
How many limited companies went into liquidation during the 1890s depression in Melbourne?
How many "land banks" and building societies collapsed during the 1890s depression in Melbourne?
The Melbourne financial crisis was a contributing factor to what banking crisis in 1893?
When did new construction start to reimerge after the early 1890s depression in Melbourne?
What term is given to the slums established on the souther banks of the Yarra?
In what year was Melbourne Chinatown founded?
Which ethninticities contributed an influx of interstate and overseas migrants to Melbourne?
Which community is the longest continuous Chinese settlement in the Western World?
During the second half of what century did the Burke and Wills expedition give an indication of immigration flows?
In what year was a telephone exchange established in Melbourne?
When was the first electric light installed in the Eastern Market?
In what year was the first line of the Melbourne cable tramway system built?
In what building was the Melbourne Internation Exhibition of 1880 held?
Is the observation deck in The Rialto currently opened or closed?
On which of Melbourne's banks is the Eureka Tower located?
Which tower is Melbourne's second tallest?
What building is the tallest building in the old CBD?
What is the tallest tower in Australia?
To what areas has Melbourne dedicated substantial international investment?
In what areas has major inner-city urban renewal occurred?
Melbourne has sustained the highest population increase and economic growth rate in any Australian city according to what organization?
How many years did Melbourne sustain the highest population increase and economic growth?
What effect has the housing boom had on house prices and rents?
What is generating high demand for housing in Melbourne?
Which of Melbourne's suburbs have seen significant brownfields redevelopment in recent years?
What types of surburban development did Melbourne policies promote?
Who was Melbourne named by?
What year was Melbourne officially declared a city?
Who was Melbourne named in honor of?
What year did Melbourne cease in serving as the nations interim seat of government?
Melbourne became the capital of what colony in 1851?
In what year did Melbourne set a target to reduce carbon emissions to net zero?
Which city notably opted not to become carbon neutral in 2009?
By what year did Melbourne state it wished to be completely carbon neutral?
Does Melbourne have one of the largest or smallest carbon footprints in the world?
Who is responsible for regulating pollution in Melbourne?
Tasmania was formerly known as what?
How many acres did John Batman claim to purchase?
Current central and northern Melbourne was explored by whom?
How many elders did John Batman claim to have negotiated with?
On what date did Batman reach Melbourne?
What is locally referred to as the Australian Dream?
Do the Docklands, St. Kilda Road, and Southbank areas feature high-density or low-density forms?
Which year marked the start of the private automobile's popularity increase?
Is much of Melbourne's metropolitan area characterized as low-density sprawl or high-density sprawl?
When Victoria was established as a seperate colony, the need for what followed?
During what two decades were the Parliament House, Treasury Building, Victoria Barracks, State Library, and General Post Office commenced?
Melbourne's weath was due in part to what event?
Which writer's festival is home to Melbourne?
What type of work are The Mystery of a Hansom Cab, Monkey Grip, and The Slap?
What do the novels The Mystery of a Hansom Cab, Monkey Grip, and The Slap have in common?
Where are Peter Carey, Germaine Greer, and Thomas Browne from?
What occupation to Peter Carey, Germaine Greer, and Thomas Browne hold?
Which phrase was coined by George Augustus Henry Sala during a visit to Melbourne in 1885?
In what year did the land boom reach its peak of development?
In what year was a hydraulic facility established?
In what year was the APA Building completed?
What did Melbourne's hydraulic facilities help create that spurred high-rise developments?
How many of the top twenty high school sin Australia are located in Mebourne according to the Better Education ranking?
According to the Toyal Melbourne Institute of Technology, how did Melborne rank as a top university city in 2008?
How many public universities are located in Melbourne?
Is the University of Melbourne a public or private institution?
Has there been a recent increase or decrease in international students studying in Melbourne?
In what year were height limits lifted in the Melbourne CBD?
Which was the first new indoor mall in Melbourne?
What happened to many of the larger suburban mansions from the boom era?
Which two areas saw a significant renewal after the post-war period and significantly modernised the city?
In what year was Melbourne the host city for the first Olympic Games held in the southern hemisphere?
In what three years was Melbourne proclaimed the "World's Ultimate Sports City"?
Previous to Melbourne, where were all Olympic games held?
Where did the National Sports Museum reopen in 2008?
Which city is so far the southernmost city to host the Olympic Games?
In what year was the first plan for the city commissioned?
On what date did the official general post office open?
What was the first plan for the city in 1837 called?
What was the settlement originally named?
How many of the big four banks are headquartered in Melbourne?
Which two of the big four banks are headquartered in Melbourne?
Which city is Australia's second-largest industrial centre?
Which south-eastern suburb is home to Nintendo's Australian headquarters?
Melbourne is home to a research and development hub for which auto manufacturer?
What percentage of Melburnians speak only English at home?
What is the second-most-common language in Melborne?
The Melbourne statistical division population has grown by how many people each year since 2005?
What factors make Melbourne more attractie than Sydney for overseas immigrants?
Investment in what greatly accelerated the outward suburban sprawn and declining inner city population?
Which government sought to rapidly accelerate the modernisation of Melbourne?
The widening of what street helped to change the face of Melbourne into a car-dominated environment?
Did the 1969 Melbourne Transportation Plan change Melbourne into a more car-dominated or tram-dominated environment?
Did the rapid rise of motor vehicle ownership and highway developments lead to an increasing or declining inner city population?
Which city is often referred to as Australia's garden city?
Which Australian state was once known as the garden state?
Why is urban Melbourne divided into hundreds of suburbs?
Which act sets functions for Melbourne such as urban planning and waste management?
From where does the Victorian state government operate?
Contrary to other countires, are public transport, traffic control, policing, and education the responsibility of local or state government?
Which railway station was the busiest in the world in the mid-1920s?
On which street is the A.C. Goode House located?
In what year was construction on the Flinders Street Station completed?
Who designed the A.C. Goode House?
What style of architecture is the A.C. Goode House?
What are the two most popular sports in Melbourne?
When was the first official Test cricket match played at the Melbourne Cricket Ground?
Where is the Australian Football League headquartered?
How many of the Australian Football League's teams are based in the Melbourne metropolitan area?
Up to how many AFL matches are played each week in Melbourne?
Which port is Australia's largest container and general cargo port?
How far upstream to water taxis run along the Yarra River?
How many shipping containers did the Port of Melbourne handle during a 12-month period in 2007, making it one of the top five ports in the Southern Hemisphere?
Which is Australia's busiest port?
Where is Station Pier located?
How many people are employed by the ICT industry in Melbourne?
What percentage of Australia's ICT workforce is imployed in Melbourne's ICT industry?
In 2008, Melbourne overtook what city with the amount of money that domestic tourists spent in the city?
Domestic visitors spend about how much money in the city of Melbourne annually?
How many international visitors did Melbourne have in 2004?
Melbourne's population could overtake that of Sydney by 2037 or 2039 primarily due to what factor?
In how many scenarios will Sydney remain higher than Melbourne in population beyond 2056?
According to the first scenario projected by the ABS, how soon could Melbourne overtake Sydney's population level?
Which theatre was Melbourne's first live performance institution?
The Princess Theatre, Regent Theatre, and Forum Theatre are members of which of Melbourne's theater districts?
In what year did the Pavilion open?
Where are the Melbourne Recital Centre and Southbank Theatre located?
From what year does the Sidney Myer Music Bowl date?
When did Melbourne Heart become known as Melbourne City FC?
What are Melbourne's two ice hockey teams named?
In which river was the annual Race to Prince's Bridge held?
Where does the soccer club Melbourne Victory play home games?
Which basketball club in Melbourne plays in the NBL?
Does Melbourne have a high or low dependency on the automobile?
Which freeway spans the large Bolte Bridge?
How many private vehicles travel Melbourne's 13,870 miles of road?
Which freeway links Melbourne and Sydney?
What have Postcode 3000 and Melbourne 2030 aimed to do?
How many people did Carlton have per km2 between 2012 and 2013?
How many people did Fitzroy have per km2 between 2012 and 2013?
According to the Australian Bureau of Statistics as of June 2013, inner city Melbourne had a population density of how many people per km2?
Where are Million Dollar Minute and Family Feud based?
Where are Dancing with the Stars, MasterChef, and The Block filmed?
Neighbours, Kath & Kim, Winners and Losers, Offspring, and Underbelly are examples of what kind of media produced in Melbourne?
Which national news-based programs are based in Melbourne?
Which city is known as the game show capital of Australia?
How many airports does Melbourne have?
Which airport is the city's main international and domestic gateway?
Which airport is the second busiest in all of Australia?
What are the only forms of public transport to and from the city's main airports?
Which rail station was the world's busiest passenger station in 1927?
In the 1940s, what percentage of travellers used public transport?
In 2003, what percentage of travellers used public transport?
In what year was the public transport system privatised?
What was the target percentage of public transport mode share that was set by the state government in 2006?
Melbourne experienced rapid growth after 1851 due to the discovery of what?
Melbourne and which other regional cities became the wealthiest cities in the world during the Gold Rush era?
How much did Melbourne's population increase within months of the gold rush?
By what year had Melbourne overtaken Sydney as Australia's most populous city?
Where was the first federal parliament convened in 1901?
The Governor-General of Australia resided at the Government House in Melbourne until what year?
Where was the federal parliament moved after 1927?
On what date was the first federal parliament convened?
During which years did Melbourne experience an economic downturn?
The Australian Grand Prix moved to Melbourne from where?
Which city is the center of Australia's "rust belt"?
Which government in 1992 began a campaign to revive the economy?
Which body of water and township of the same name marks the border between Melbourne and Geelong?
Little River marks the boundary between Melbourne and which city?
Little River marks the boundary between Geelong and which other city?
Has Melbourne's air quality improved or declined since the 1980s?
What factors deplete Melbourne water supplies?
Which government announced a $3.1 billion Wonthaggi desalination plant in June 2007?
How many litres of water will the Wonthaggi desalination plant be capbale of treating per year?
What was the world's first feature film?
In what city was the world's first feature film shot in 1906?
Why were films banned by Victorian politicans in 1912?
What year were bushranger films banned by Victorian politicians?
In what "lull" year was On the Beach filmed?
What are the most common type of housing outside inner city Melbourne?
Is residential architecture in Melbourne defined by a single architectural style or an eclectic mix of buildings?
Are townhouses, condominiums, and apartment buildings found more prevalent in the metropolitan area or outside the city?
In which areas does Melbourne's diversified economy have strengths?
Which city is home to Australia's largest and busiest seaport?
Which company is the world's largest mining company?
Which city is home to Australia's second busiest airport?
How much money in trade does Australia's largest and busiest seaport handle?
Which city has the largest Greek-speaking population outside of Europe?
What is the most common surname in Melbourne's phone book?
Which city in Greece is Melbourne's sister city?
What is the secondmost common surname in Melbourne's phone book?
What are examples of Youth radio stations?
Which music stations strive to play under represented music?
Which radio station caters for gay, lesbian, bisexual, and transgender audiences?
Which station caters to sports fans and enthusiasts?
3MBS and ABC Classic FM play what type of music?
Who backed John's elder brothers?
Where did Henry travel to?
Who returned to Brittany?
Who was imprisoned?
When did Richard die?
Who was the sole surviving son?
Where was John crowned?
Whose army pressed up the Loire valley?
What principle did John's predecessors use?
What quality did Henry II and Richard possess?
What century were there contrary opinions expressed about the nature of kingship?
What did John suffer from?
What happened at the start of John's reign?
How long did the inflationary pressure continue?
When did John address problems with the English currency?
How did he address the problems with the English currency?
Who was Henry's favorite child?
When was John appointed the Lord of Ireland?
When did Richard I become king?
Who unsuccessfully attempted a rebellion against Richard's royal administrators?
When did war with France break out?
When was John excommunicated?
When was the Magna Carta peace treaty agreed upon?
Who won victory over Louis and the rebel barons?
When was Henry crowned King of England?
What was Henry promised as part of his future inheritance?
Who became the Duke of Brittany?
What was John's nickname?
How tall was John?
What did John build up?
Who became a connoisseur of jewels?
What did John do in fits of rage?
When did Hubert Walter die?
What lead to the king's excommunication?
Who said Pope Innocent was an ambitious and aggressive religious leader?
When did John make his first visit to Ireland?
How many knights accompanied John to Ireland?
How did John offend the local Irish rulers?
Who did Henry fight a short war with in 1183?
How did Henry the Young King die?
Who became the Duke of Aquitaine in place of Richard?
When did the war end?
Who refused to work with Puiset?
When was Longchamp isolated in the Tower of London?
Where did Walter of Coutances return to?
Where did the rebel barons congregate?
Who was the rebel baron leader?
What did John instruct Langton to do?
John moved south into where?
Who renewed the anti-French alliances?
When was the Treaty of Le Goulet negotiated?
What nickname did John's policy earn him?
The rebel barons invited who to lead them?
Who was Henry II's granddaughter?
What did John do once he contained Alexander in Scotland?
Who did John attempt to convince?
Where was Arthur imprisoned?
Who was kept imprisoned by John for many years?
What victory strengthened John's position?
Who deserted John in favor of Philip?
How was John's financial situation?
Who was declared the protector of Henry III after John's death?
Who gave up their claim to the English throne?
What agreement failed?
Until when did Henry III continue his attempts to reclaim Normandy?
What was one of John's principal challenges?
When did Richard sell many royal properties?
Where did John derive income from?
What was of particular importance to John?
When was the system of coroners first introduced?
Why was John motivated?
When did new interpretations of John's reign begin to emerge?
Who wrote an essay in 1945 that proposed a "new approach?"
Who suggested that Ireland was less stable by 1216 than previously supposed?
John remained what throughout his reign?
When did the king cross into Ireland with a large army?
During Richard's rule, what did John successfully do?
John felt Langton was overly influenced by what?
Who was barred Langton from entering England?
when did Innocent place an interdict on England?
John besieged what castle?
Who refused to advance with the king?
Who won the battle of Bouvines?
How long was the truce intended to last for?
Who made the first move in the war?
What did the rebels seize?
Who lead the rebellion against the 1211 settlement?
What was John's strategy?
Who suspected that the proposed baronial council would be unacceptable?
John appealed to who for help?
The failure of the agreement lead to what?
What did the king lose on his way to the west?
When did John face a stalemate?
When were the Crown Jewels lost?
Which historians were favourably inclined towards the king?
What praised John's "great renown" as a king?
When did political and religious changes alter the attitude of historians towards John?
What heavily influenced nineteenth-century fictional depictions of John?
Who played John in 1938?
Who was John depicted alongside?
Which historians wrote early in John's life?
How did historians feel about John's behavior under Richard's rule?
John attempted conversion of what in exchange for military aid?
When did popular representations of John begin to emerge?
What was Anthony Munday's play?
In The Troublesome Reign of King John, John portrayed the king as what?
Who was critical of John's performance as king?
What historian summarised the contemporary historical opinion of John's positive qualities?
John remains a recurring character within what culture?
Henry II wanted to secure the southern borders of what?
Who was Alais?
What castles did Henry II transfer into John's name?
Who was Isabella engaged to?
Hugh of Lusignan was an important member of what?
John treated Hugh with what?
How many galleys were available by the end of 1204?
54 vessels were built between what years?
Who was appointed "keeper of the galleys?"
Where did John visit every year between 1204 and 1211?
Who did John marry Joan to?
What did John use to increase his own territory and power?
When did a royal expedition to enforce agreements occur?
Where were Monastic communities allowed to celebrate Mass in private?
When was the Holy Viaticum for the dying authorised?
What threat was John worried about?
Where did John hold a council in January 1215?
Where did John recruit mercenary forces from?
John announced his intent to become what?
Who blamed John's family background for his cruel personality?
What documents trace a progressive and universalist course of political and economic development in England?
What period in the 19th century were historians more inclined to draw on the judgements of the chroniclers?
Where did Eleanor leave to?
John was taught by who?
John was assigned what whilst he was at Fontevrault?
John spent the conflict traveling alongside who?
When did Henry II appropriate the estates of the late Earl of Cornwall?
Who dismissed William FitzAldelm as the Lord of Ireland?
Who accompanied John?
Why was Philip forced to withdraw in the east?
Who was caught by surprised?
What did John inherit in England?
Who dealt with income and expenditure?
John followed in the tradition of who?
Who did John want to be appointed Archbishop of Canterbury?
Who did Innocent disavow?
Who did John force to change their support to John de Gray?
Where did many of the disaffected barons come from?
Who was appointed justiciar?
What was the final straw that precipitated the baronial uprising during John's final years as king?
When did John meet the rebel leaders at Runnymede?
A council of how many barons was created to monitor John's future adherence to the charter?
The peace agreement was renamed what?
What biographers argue that John was an unsuccessful monarch?
Modern historians have been over lenient towards what?
John Gillingham considers John what?
What hindered the competetive ability of Apple when it was introduced?
Where did Macintosh initially find success in the market?
Which platform, when improved in the 1990's, took market share from Macintosh?
What type of advantage did Intel's Pentium over Macintosh systems in the 1990's?
Who became the top PC manufacturer in 1994, leaving Apple in 3rd place?
How much did Apple spend to advertise in a special post-election issue of Newsweek?
What was the name of the big promotion Apple ran in the special edition of Newsweek?
What did Apple allow potential buyers to take home and try for 24 hours?
How were many computers returned during the Test Drive a Macintosh promotion that made them unsellable?
Who was the CEO of Apple during the Test Drive a Macintosh promotion?
What Macintosh first included an on-board MMU?
What was the first Mac to be "32-bit clean"?
What was the starting price of the Macintosh llfx when it was unveiled?
How many Apple II CPUS's did the new Macintosh llfx include?
How fast was the processor on the new Macintosh llfx?
Which Mac is known for improving the handling of color graphics?
Who did Apple pay expensive consulting fees to before doing in-house work?
What was established for bringing Apple's design work in-house?
Who was responsible for crafting a new look for all Apple products?
How did the Mac System 7 improve multitasking?
Who returned to Apple in 1997?
What did Steve Jobs order the OS version 7.7 to be branded as?
What did the branding of the Mac OS 8 effectively end?
What effect did Mac's decision to brand the Mac OS8 have on companies such as Motorola?
How much money did Umax lose when it exited the low-end Mac clone market?
What did dated architecture on the Mac OS line make necessary?
What programming language was the Mac OS initially developed in?
What language replaced Pascal for System 7?
What was the fuly overhauled successor to Mac OS 9?
Upon release, what interface allowed Mac users to sample Apple's new operating system and provide feedback for the actual release?
What is the only mainstream computer platform to successfully transition to a new CPU architecture?
What is the standard amount of RAM included with almost all current Mac models?
Which MacBook Pro port can transfer data at speeds up to 10 gigabits per second?
When was the iMac G5 released?
Which interface did Apple introduce that was capable of being operated by an Apple Remote or keyboard for accessing media stored on the computer?
What is the standard amount of RAM shipped with most Mac models?
What processors are used by the current Mac product family?
How many data transfer ports are included in most current Macs?
According to Apple, how fast can the Thunderbolt port transfer data?
Which technique was once used to boot an alternate operating system than Mac OS?
What was introduced that made using Mac OS alternative operating systems easier?
What were Open Firmware-based PCI Macs used as a convenience because of?
Where does Mac hardware boot directly to in all Intel-based Macs?
Where does Mac harware boot directly to in most PowerPC-based Macs?
Who was brought in to shape the marketing of Macintosh in 1982?
What role did Andy Cunningham and Jane Anderson have in the Macintosh launch plan?
Who introduced the "multiple exclusive" event marketing concept to Apple?
Which company first used the "multiple exclusive" event marketing concept?
What did the "multiple exclusive" event marketing concept create around a product?
Who initiated a successful price war among PC manufacturers in 1994?
Who did Compaq overtake in the price war of 1994?
What happened to Apple's market share with the release of Windows 95?
What unified Microsoft's MS-DOS and Windows products?
What significantly enhanced the multimedia capability of IBM PC compatible computers?
What percent of the desktop share in the U.S. did Apple have in 2003?
Who are IDC and Gartner?
What was Apple's market share in the U.S. by 2006?
What percentage of unit sale increase did Apple see from 2005 to 2006?
What was the estimated installed base of Mac computers in 2009?
When was the Macintosh SE released at the same time as?
What was the first compact Mac with a 20 MB internal hard drive and an expansion slot?
What was the starting price of the Macintosh SE?
What did the location of the SE's expansion slot potentially expose an upgrader to?
Who did Apple suggest users go to for performing updates on their SE's?
What is partially credited for the significant boost in sales of Macs in recent years?
What allows users to easily sync data between an iPhone and a Mac?
What consumer trend has hurt many personal computer manufacturers?
Which smartphone has hurt personal computer manufacterers the most?
What are the top two computing devices consumers are choosing?
When did Apple begin to favor aluminum in their design?
Which Mac used aluminum in it's construction?
Which material did Apple add with the 2008 unibody MacBrook Pro?
Are aluminum and glass considered to be environmentally friendly or environmentally harmful?
What has Chief Designer Jonathan Ive been able to eliminate in Mac notebooks?
Who began the Macintosh project in 1979?
What was Jef Raskin's profession?
What did Jef Raskin envision for a computer to be for an average consumer?
Why was the spelling of McIntosh changed to Macintosh?
What did McIntosh Laboratory, Inc. manufacture?
What year was Raskin hired by Apple?
Who did Raskin immediately hire to help him on the Apple project in 1979?
Who comprised the original Mac team besides Raskin?
Who eventually lead the project on the Mac team?
How many Macs did Apple sell worldwide during the 2009 holiday season?
What was Apples market share of all computer shipments in 2010?
What was Apples market share of all computer shipments in 2011?
What ranking was Apple in the PC global market share during 2014?
Who outperformed Apple in the 2014 PC global market share?
In 1987, what did Apple spin off its software business as?
Which series of applications was Claris responsible for inventing?
What did Claris rename the Informix Wingz spreadsheet program?
What was ClarisWorks renamed beginning with version 5.0?
When was ClarisWorks reincorporated back into Apple?
What two applications came bundled with Macs 2 days after "1984" was aired?
Why did many software developers choose not to redesign the Mac operating system and rewrite the programming code?
What year did Microsoft's MultiPlan migrate over from MS-DOS?
What year was Apple's Macintosh Office suite introduced?
What did Apple's "Lemmings" ad, which introduced Macintosh Office, do that made the ad unsuccessful?
According to NPD, who has generally dominated the premium PC market?
What was Macintosh ranked on the "list of intended brands for desktop purchases" for the 2011 holiday season?
Who did Macintosh displace from 2nd place on the 2012 holiday season "list of intended brands for desktop purchases"?
Who did Macintosh displace from 1st place on the 2013 holiday season "list of intended brands for desktop purchases"?
Which of Apple's products is focused on the ultraportable niche of PC's?
What part of the Mac's could not be expanded easily in 1984?
What did Mac's lack in 1984 and have no means to easily attach?
What did some small companies suggest Mac's 16 memory chips be replaced with?
How much more memory did Apple's Macintosh 512K, introduced in 1984, have than the original?
What was replaced in the upgrade that was offered for 128k Macs?
On what grounds did Apple sue Microsoft and Hewlett-Packard in 1988?
How was the lawsuit decided for Apple vs. Microsoft and Hewlett-Packard?
How long did the FSF boycott GNU software for the Macintosh platform?
What are some of the issues Apple cited in the lawsuit against Microsoft and HP?
What did the FSF feel that Apple was trying to monopolize on?
What did Apple's creation of too many similar models do to potential buyers?
What was the hardware manufactured by third parties for Apple's System 7 known as?
What did the Macintosh clones provide for consumers?
What did Macintosh clones succeed in increasing for Macintosh?
Who did the Macintosh clones hurt financially?
When did Apple begin shipping computers with CD-RW drives?
Who admitted that Apple was late to the party with writable CD technology?
What did Apple begin offering as standard features meant for playing DVD's?
Which Apple campaign did some people feel encouraged media piracy?
What is the name of one of Apple's unsuccessful products?
What was the name of Apple's first portable computer?
When was the Macintosh Portable first released?
What replaced the Macintosh Portable in 1991?
What was the 1993 PowerBook 165c Apple's first portable computer to feature?
Which generation of PowerBooks introduced trackpads?
What was Apple's Mac OS X based on?
Who did Apple make Maverick free to?
What computers is Maverick compatible with?
What brought better multi display support to Mac?
When was Mavericks introduced?
What desktop did Apple release after the discontinued Power Macintosh G3?
Why were sales of the Power Mac G4 Cube slow?
What did the Power Mac G4 have trouble overcoming after they dropped their price and upgraded their hardware?
When was the Power Mac G4 discontinued?
How did the actual sales of the G4's compare to the sales expectations?
Historically, what is near-absent in Mac OS X compared to Microsoft Windows?
When did Mac OS X experience a large increase in malware attacks?
How was Mac's malware seen by many Mac users in 2011?
How many users were affected by the increase in malware?
What were Apple support staff initially instructed not to assist with concerning malware?
What was the market share of OS X in North America by March 2011?
Being positioned as a higher end PC, what is it misleading to compare the Mac to?
Apple has remained profitable since what time?
According to market research, who does Apple draw it's customer base from?
Whose return to Apple resulted in the company's reorganization?
What did Apple begin to eliminate in 2002?
Why was the new iMac G4 considerably more expensive than the G3?
Who did Apple create the more affordable eMac in April 2002 for?
What was the main problem with the eMac's CRT?
After Apple's failed desktop sales, what products drove their sales growth?
In 2009, how many Macs sold were laptops?
What has helped Macs more directly compete with Windows on price and performance?
In 2010, what did Apple receive before other PC manufacturers?
What are the top-selling form factors of the Mac platform today?
What is the name of the most inexpensive Mac offered?
What did Apple consolidate in 1998?
What all-in-one product was created in 1998 through Apple's consolidations?
What did the iMac G3 do to the Mac reputation?
When was Mac's Xserve server discontinued?
What took the place of Mac's Xserve server?
Why did Raskin leave the Apple team in 1981?
According to Andy Hertzfeld, whose idea is the final Mac design closer to?
What did Steve Jobs offer Xerox to visit and see their latest technology?
Whose technology influenced the user interfaces of the Lisa and Macintosh?
What caused Steve Jobs to resign from Apple in 1985?
Whose technology did Apple take advantage of when introducing the Macintosh II?
What powered the Macintosh II?
How much did the Macintosh II sell for?
What marked the start of a new direction for Macintosh?
What was the Macintosh II's new modular design similar to?
What did Intel unsuccessfully try to push Apple to migrate to?
Which platform did Apple choose to use?
Who first rolled out Pentium processors in 1993?
How far behind was Macintosh set back compared to the new IBM compatibles?
When did Apple abandon Motorola CPU's?
What color was Apples new iMac, which was introduced in 1998?
What did the iMac replace most of Apple's standard connections with?
What did the iMac replace the floppy disk drive with?
What did the iMac need to use in order to write CDs or other media?
How many iMac units sold in the first 139 days?
When did Apple discontinue the use of PowerPC microprocessors?
Who announced the capability to run Windows XP on an Intel-based Mac in 2006?
How did hackers release their software for running Windows on Macs?
When did Apple announce software that would allow Windows XP to be run on Intel-based Macs?
What is the name of the software that Apple introduced for running Windows XP?
Who was initially reluctant to embrace mice with multiple buttons and scroll wheels?
What was the name of the 1st multiple button mouse introduced by Apple?
How many buttons did the Mighty Mouse have?
What did Apple introduce to take the place of a physical scroll wheel in 2009?
What Apple mouse 1st used multi-touch gesture recognition?
What type of software began to emerge following the release of Intel-based Macs?
At what speed do programs such as VirtualBox allow Microsoft Windows to run on Macs?
What is possible to run by using Boot camp, even though it is not condoned by Apple?
What do Macs lack that makes them unable to run many legacy PC operating systems?
What has been the best-selling ultra-portable over Windows Ultrabooks in the U.S.?
What earned the title as best all-around subnotebook/ultraportable?
What did the Air receive before other PC manufacturers?
Through 7/1/13, what percentage of all Ultrabook sales in the U.S. were MacBook Airs?
When was the competetive pricing of MacBooks especially effective?
What is another term for anti-aircraft warfare?
NATO defines anti-aircraft warfare as measures to reduce what?
Barrage balloons are an example of what type of weapons system?
What is the primary effort been for most countries when it comes to anti-aircraft warfare?
What does NATO ascribe naval air defence as?
When were sensors initially developed?
Radar was supplemented by what in the 1980s?
What country created an integrated system for ADGB?
What did the integrated system for ADGB link?
What agency stated that the arrangements were an air defence ground environment?
Which country had the most severe case?
This separate service  was known as what in the Soviet Union?
What two systems did Voyska PVO have?
What year did the PVO Strany become independent?
What was the arm that was the Air Defence of the Ground Forces?
When did Serbian troops notice enemy aircraft approaching Kragujevac? 
How many bombs did the three aircraft drop on the city?
Which private shot down one aircraft with a cannon?
What happened to the pilots that were in the aircraft shot down?
Which war was the cannon used in prior to this event?
What was the problem with AA gunnery?
Different things could affect what with the shell?
What was updated on the gunsight as a target moved?
Where was the barrel pointed when the sights were on a target?
What two things figured the fuse length?
What showed that aircraft could be a significant contribution to the battlefield?
In addition to Zeppelins, what attacked London for four years with air attacks?
The four year air attack was instrumental in Britain forming what?
The future of aircraft in war situations was important because of the growth in what two areas?
Where were most of the nations who had the strongest military after World War I?
Who wanted the British to keep using machine guns in World War I?
The military was not allowed to use anything that was bigger than what?
What was determined to be the smallest effective round in 1935?
What was lighter than the water-cooled pom-pom?
What is the Kerrison Predictor's official name?
What was under development in both the Soviet Union and Britain in the 1930s?
Why was Britain mainly interested in solid fuel rockets?
What were rockets called at this time?
How big was the rocket that was introduced to handle dive bombing attacks?
What size rocket was being developed at the end of the war?
What did the British get a license to build?
While light, the Bofors 40mm were powerful enough to take down what size aircraft?
What was produced to inspire people on the assembly line to work harder?
What was the movie made to inspire assembly line workers called?
Who started making an unlicensed version of the 40mm at the beginning of the war?
What kind of aircraft is used to intercept and destroy other aircraft?
What particular aircraft did the interceptor target most?
When were interceptors like the F-102 Delta Dagger first built?
When were interceptors like the F-106 Delta Dart not being built anymore?
The interceptors were no longer built because of the shift of the bombing role to what?
What is another possible weapon for anti-aircraft use?
When did personnel first start thinking about using lasers in combat?
What laser can currently be used in the type of role that was first thought of in the late 1960s?
The use of lasers in anti-aircraft warfare is currently considered what?
When do some people believe that lasers can play a more prominent role in air defence?
What is the air defence of a certain area called?
Armies as well as what group have operated area air defences?
What U.S. Air Forces operated area air defence?
What range do area defence systems have?
What was the objective of the MIM-104 Patriot Missile batteries during the first Gulf War?
Which country probably coined the term air defence?
What does ADGB stand for?
What year was the ADGB created?
Who is probably the one who coined the term archie for anti-aircraft guns?
What George Robey line is believed to have started the archie nickname?
What is the first purpose of air defence?
What is the second purpose of air defence?
What is the critical issue in air defence?
Projectiles must either be guided to the target or aimed where?
What two things must be considered in regards to the projectile and target?
What does NATO define as passive measures to protect people, buildings and equipment from air or missile attacks?
Which group is heavily responsible for passive air defence?
Passive air defence includes camouflage and what?
What was camouflaged during World War II?
Some airfield runways were painted green during what war?
How many guns or missile launchers are typically in a battery?
In addition to guns or missile launchers, what else comprises the battery?
Where do batteries typically get deployed?
Which missile batteries often have individual launchers several kilometres from one another?
Several dozen teams can deploy individually in small sections when what is handled by a specialist?
It was understood that ammunition needed to explode where?
In addition to high explosive, what else was used?
Airburst fuses could be which two things?
What were hydrogen filled balloons called?
What was used as targets in training practices?
What was the primary method for HAA fire?
Along with predicting the gun data from tracking the target, what else needed to be known about the target to enable the aimed fire?
Another assumption was that the target would maintain a steady course along with what other two factors?
Targets could be how many feet for the HAA to engage them?
What kind of fuses were needed?
When were improvements developed for these guns?
What year was the M1 version approved?
Only a few of the 105 mm static mounting AA guns were produced because work had started on which other gun?
When did work begin on the 105 mm static mounting AA gun?
What kind of guns did the United States end WW I with?
Which country's air defence and aircraft has been under integrated command and control?
What other group has also been under this integrated command and control?
Who will deploy their own air defence if their is an air threat?
What can be deployed as an offensive measure to refuse airspace use to an opponent?
What did the United States Army begin to develop after the first World War?
Who designed this cannon?
How many rounds did this cannon fire per second?
What replaced the Browning 37nn because of jamming issues?
What other US group was interested in the Bofors?
High altitude needs in Germany were going to be handled by what?
Who also collaborated in the design of the 75 mm gun?
Because higher performance was needed, Krupp's workers designed what?
Where was the first place the FlaK 36 was used?
What war was the FlaK first used in?
What was one of the most often seen weapons that was used both on land and sea?
What weapons system did American troops use but received minute attention?
How many of the M2HB guns were mounted together on the M45 Quadmount weapons system?
This system was a direct answer to what?
The combat batteries of an Army AAA battalion were often spread how far apart from each other?
What acted as a physical obstacle to anti-aircraft defence?
What were barrage balloons initially used as an obstacle to?
How was a barrage balloon tethered to the ground?
What did pilots have to do to avoid the barrage balloons?
What kind of success did barrage balloons have as far as bringing down aircraft?
What is an important number when it comes to guns engaging an aircraft?
What can be used to determine the maximum distance for an AA gun?
What is the term used to describe the height that a projectile would go to if it was fired vertically?
Few AA guns are able to fire which way?
The missile started being used more often instead of what weapon?
Small missiles were designed that could be mounted on what?
When did these missiles start to supplant gun-based SPAAG systems?
What are man-portable missiles better known as?
When were MANPADs introduced?
Smaller weapons are able to be used because of their low cost as well as what other factor?
Who designed the 40 mm autocannon?
When were the surface-to-air missile systems introduced?
Where were surface-to-air missiles first developed?
How can land-based SAMs be deployed?
What kind of weapons can usually be found on smaller boats and ships?
These weapons can be deadly to aircraft that is low if it is linked to what?
What type of ships are particularly well defended?
Carrier battle groups can launch what to intercept incoming threats?
What term is used to describe the altitude for a gun to shoot shells against a target that is moving?
Who adopted the use of the term, effective ceiling?
Along with other factors, how long must a target be engaged to have effective ceiling?
What affected the effective ceiling for heavy AA guns?
What was the standard weapon until the 1950s?
After guns firing ballistic munitions lost their appeal, what weapon took their place?
Which range did not use guided missiles?
Damaged aircraft can be out of action for days or what?
What is the largest calibre ground-based air defence guns?
When did the British see the need to add anti-aircraft capability?
Where did the New York times report say towers with guns should go?
What was built around naval installations?
Who manned AA guns and searchlights?
Who used motorised two-gun sections?
Who provided part of the air defence of the British Isles in WWI
Who protected airfields in WWII?
The United States Air Force helped protect the UK during what 'war'?
What year was ground-based air defence taken from RAF?
What was disbanded in 1955?
What helped with better fuse setting?
What was the first model of HRF (Height Range Finder) used by the British?
The HRF measured target distance and what else?
What was the HRF used with to set fuses?
The fuse length could be set using height reported by whom?
What kind of guns started attracting attention?
In addition to ammo proposals, what other need was articulated?
The impact and time types of what were analyzed?
As of 1910, who had published info available for gun designs?
What gun made the scene in 1910?
What two guns were propped up against a hillside to get the muzzles pointed up?
What anti-aircraft gun did the British Army begin to use?
What gun size was relined to take 13-pounder shells?
What was difficult to get set right on the new guns?
Where did most rounds shot at aircraft usually explode?
What treaty was supposed to stop Germany from having antiaircraft weapons?
When did covert antiaircraft training start in Germany?
When did the 10.5 centimeter FlaK 38 appear in Germany?
When did the design begin for the 12.8 centimeter FlaK?
What did the FlaK 39 have?
Poland and other European countries could not defend against what?
What battle marked the beginning of significant antiaircraft warfare?
What was under command of the Air Defence UK orgnisation?
The Air Defence UK grew to have how many antiaircraft corps?
What was formed in 1941 to protect airfields?
When was the successful test of the 3.6-inch HAA gun?
When did the 3.7-inch HAA gun become preferred?
What gun did the Royal Navy start using?
How long of a running time did the Number 199 fuse have?
What was introduced in 1939?
What was shown to be practically not possible during service trials?
How was target lead watched at short range?
Target area is relatively large at what range?
At long range what, in theory, could be used to set ranging calculations?
What small errors caused large errors in shell fall height and the time until exploding?
In the 1920s, which company developed the automatic 20 mm?
Which Switzerland company obtained the patent for an automatic 20 mm gun during the first World War?
Which company redesigned the rapid fire 2 cm FlaK 30?
What did Germany add to the 20 mm to make it more effective?
When was the first 3.7 cm FlaK 18 introduced?
Which military set up a large air defence network surrounding its larger cities?
What US system was created in the 1950s that included radar and computers?
The Skysweeper replaced the small guns that the Army was using, including which one?
What does NADGE stand for?
What did NADGE become?
What was the name of the mechanical computer that used automation?
What did the Predictor calculate after it was pointed at a target?
How did the Predictor display the information needed?
What two things did the operators of the gun have to do?
What other country designed similar systems to the Predictor?
What did the muzzle flashes of the firearms used by the infantry reveal?
Along with speed of the modern jet, what else limits target opportunities?
Heavier artillery systems were typically used for what?
Rocket research began prior to which war in some countries?
What unguided missile systems was fitted to warships?
When did the Bethnal Green disaster occur?
What was the US military's counterpart to the British Stooge to counter the attacks by Kamikazes?
Which country's research was ahead of all other countries for missiles?
Which weapon caused a major shift in anti-aircraft strategy?
Which company wanted to introduce missile systems during the second World War but was not successful?
What missile did the United States upgrade their defences with?
The introduction of the Nike Ajax missile caused what to disappear?
The introduction of what caused the larger anti-aircraft guns to disappear in the USSR?
Where can the future of projectile based weapons possibly be found?
Testing is being done on weapons to create as much damage as what missile at a much lower cost?
When did the United States Navy test a railgun?
How fast was the shell that the Navy fired from the railgun?
When is the railgun expected to be ready?
What are two types of fuses used for shells?
At shorter ranges a light weapon with what is used on fast targets?
What size of weapon calibers are better hitting at short range fast targets?
Smaller .50 caliber and 8 millimeter guns have been used in what?
Air defence in such places as a carrier group are built around what?
What protects the outer layer?
The next layer's surface-to-air missiles are carried by what?
What is the range in nautical miles of the RIM-67 Standard?
What is the rate of fire for a radar-controlled Gatling gun of 20 and 30 millimeter?
What is likely to entirely replace gun systems?
What is being lead to specialty roles?
What gun is used in the Dutch Goalkeeper CIWS?
What RIM weapon permits mid-flight course adjustments?
What weapon's system uses guns and missiles?
Contemporary air defence systems are usually what?
What are larger weapon systems usually mounted on?
Radars, command posts and other such things are usually mounted on what?
A mobile weapons system is likely to pop up where?
What systems are really geared toward mobility?
What military forces usually integrate air defnce as a separate arm or part of artillery?
Air defence in the US Army is part of what arm?
Air defence in Pakistan was separated from the Army in what year?
What type of countries have set branches for territorial air defence?
Who had a separate military force for controlling nuclear ICBMs?
What do armies tend to have in depth?
Angara and Patriot are two examples of what type of system?
Stinger and Igla are two examples of what type of system?
What does SPAAG stand for?
What kind of platform are Roland and SA-8 Gecko?
In agreement with NATO members, the US Air Force and which country has created tactics for air defence suppression?
The goal of what is to suppress opposing air defence systems?
As better weapons are created, what systems continue to improve as well to counter them?
What does AAAD stand for?
What does GBAD stand for?
What does SHORAD stand for?
What does MANPADS stand for?
What does SAGW stand for?
What was one of the quickest areas to evolve in military technology in the 20th century?
The evolution of air defence was in answer to the evolution of what?
In addition to radar and computing, what else did air defence want to exploit?
In addition to sensors and technical fire control, and weapons, what else did air defence evolution cover?
Air attacks headed by  Germany increased in 1915 in what area?
Who was tasked with the job to make improvements to the AA as a result of the German attacks?
What was used because of night attacks?
How many AA Sections were defending Britain by December 1916?
How many AA Sections were with the BEF in France during the same time?
What was many times unpopular with other troops?
What was mounted on poles by forces?
What type of weapon is thought to have shot down the Red Baron?
What made acquiring targets and aiming more required?
Heavy weapons shot at high-altitude targets and what shot at low-altitude targets?
What year did the British adopt the new Vickers instrument?
What was the Vickers device adopted by the British named?
What was the designation name of the Sperry device in the US?
What did the British designate the Sperry device as?
What replaced the UB 2?
When year did the Dambusters raid happen?
What did the new system designed after the Dambusters raid supposed to do?
What replaced the 50 millimeter gun that was not accurate?
What type of control system did the 55 millimeter gun use?
What was used to aim the guns after electrical commands were sent?
What was also utilized to control ground targets?
Along with the 88, what other AAA battalion gun made a good anti-tank weapon?
What did the Americans use at the beginning of the war?
What was the altitude range in feet of the stratosphere gun?
What decade were the 90 and 120 millimeter guns used until?
What did advanced ally technology showcase it could defend against?
Where did the US Army's 419th and 601st locate at to defend London?
Where did the US Army 419th and 601st relocate to as part of the Antwerp X project?
What city got attacked by more V-1 and V-2 missiles than any other?
What acquired and automatically tracked incoming targets?
In what war did the armed forces from Argentina use the SAM Roland?
What two units used the Rapier missile system?
What older system did the British naval use?
What new short range systems did the British naval use?
What was used in AA mountings on both land and water?
What can be deployed in fixed launchers but re-deploy at will?
What are the SAMs called that are launched by individuals in the US?
What does MANPADS mean?
How are targets aquired for non-ManPAD SAMs?
Short range missiles are replacing what weapons?
What continues to grow along with stealth technology?
What can detect stealth aircraft?
What can see stealth aircraft even with RCS?
What is the most notable SAM that can detect a stealth target?
How far away can the S-400 detect a target?
In what year was the daily newspaper Sudharma first published?
Where are Sanskrit Vartman Patram and Vishwasya Vrittantam published?
In what year did daily news broadcasts in Sankrit begin on state-run All India Radio?
Approximately how many weeklies, fortnightlies and quarterlies published in Sanskrit?
What is the broadcast time for Sanskrit news on the DD National channel?
What is the publication, Sudharma?
Where is the newspaper Sudharma published?
What language are many periodicals published in in India?
Since what year has there been a daily broadcast on All India Radio?
Where can the Sanskrit broadcasts be found online?
To what has the Central Board of Education of India relegated Sanskrit? 
Where has the Education Board ranked Sanskrit as a language option?
What grades in Indian schools have an option for Sanskrit study?
In what language states is Sanskrit considered an option?
In what other type of schools is Sanskrit also taught?
What English school offers Sanskrit as a language study?
Since what date has Sanskrit been offered as a language option in the U.S.?
What is the credit towards in study in the U.S.?
Who coordinates the study program of Samskritam as a Foreign Language?
What school in Australia offers Sanskrit as a study?
Under what type of tradition did Sanskrit begin?
After what language evolved was writing introduced?
What does Sanskrit not have of its own?
What feature of written text influenced the use of scripts?
Which writing systems have been used to write Sanskrit?
From what time has the Latin alphabet been used to transcribe Sanskrit?
What transliteration system is most common today?
How long has IAST been the standard system used for transliteration of Sanskrit?
What is used in transliteration for computer systems? 
What transliteration scheme is often used on the internet?
What language has influenced the languages of India?
From what dialect is Hindi descended?
Of what is Hindi considered to be in relation to Sanskrit?
What is the percentage of Sanskrit words thought to be in modern Indo-Aryan languages?
What language texts  are as much as 70% Sanskrit?
When is it thought that early speakers of Sanskrit came to India?
What is the relationship between Indo-Iranian and Baltic languages?
From what direction did Sanskrit travel to come to India?
Sanskrit came from the north west and traveled to what present day countries?
What is the theory called dealing with the transfer of Sanskrit to India?
What form of speech shows that Sanskrit and Prakrits existed together?
What type of speakers spoke Sanskrit?
For what did Brahmins use Sanskrit?
Until what period was high Sanskrit used?
How large of a group in society use Sanskrit?
What organization is trying to revive Sanskrit?
What kind of competitions does the All-India Sanskrit Festival have?
How many speakers of Sanskrit were there by the 1991 census?
Where in India is Sanskrit still spoken by the population?
Who originally gave Mattur village to Sanskrit scholars?
When was Sanskrit and Indian culture popular?
In what century was Indian culture accorded a more hostile reception?
How did the British academics show their feelings about Sanskrit?
What did British of the 19th century want India to be as soon as possible?
Besides assimilation of British culture, what else did the British consider Indians to be?
What is the main type of employment in Valencia?
What percentage of Valencia's workers are employed in industry?
What percentage of Valencia's workers are employed in the agricultural sector?
How much of Valencia's land is used for agriculture?
What are Valencia's agricultural areas mainly planted with?
How long did the English occupy Valencia?
At what battle were the Bourbons victorious?
Who ordered Valencia punished for supporting Charles?
What abolished Valencia's ancient charters?
Who resigned in protest against Philip?
When was the Valencian Golden Age?
Of what area was Valencia the largest city?
What building attracted merchants from other countries to Valencia?
Who borrowed money from Valencian bankers in 1492?
What was Valencia's leading industry?
What were Valencia's main food exports in the early 20th century?
When was an exhibition held that showed agricultural and industrial progress?
What architectural style was particularly successful?
What station was built in the Art Nouveau style?
What markets were built in the Art Nouveau style?
What percentage of Spanish exports does Valencia's port handle?
Valencia has the largest port on which coast?
Where does Valencia's port rank among Spanish ports in terms of total traffic?
What type of fruit is exported from Valencia?
What is the name of the cup that some Catholics think is the Grail?
Which pope used the Santo Caliz for mass in Valencia?
What century is the Santo Caliz from?
When was the Santo Caliz used for mass in Valencia?
According to legend, who took the Santo Caliz to Rome?
How many official languages does Valencia have?
What is very similar to Valencian and is considered another variety of the same language?
What language is official in Valencia besides Valencian?
How many schools offer education completely in Valencian?
When did Valencian regain its offical status?
What church holds some of Spain's greatest frescoes?
Who decorated the Saints John's dome?
Who destroyed the Jesuit college?
What was once headquartered in the former Dominican convent?
What was once a college for nobles and is now a place of secondary education?
When did the Byzantines invade the Iberian peninsula?
When were the Byzantines expelled?
What archdiocese was Valencia under during the time of the Visigoths?
Who took power in Valencia after the Roman administration was gone?
After the Byzantines left, who was stationed in Valencia?
What ruler attacked Valencia in 1238?
When did Valencia surrender?
Who was expelled from Valencia after James I's victory?
What were Valencia's new charters called?
What group did the crusaders who attacked Valencia belong to?
Who got rich from the Valencian orange crop and vineyards?
Who had suppressed the Valencian language?
What group still exists and promotes Valencian culture?
What poet was an early influence on the Valencian Renaissance?
Who founded Lo Rat Penat?
What TV program questioned the official account of the crash?
What happened at the same time as the crash, which may have contributed to the government downplaying it?
What evidence related to the crash remains missing?
Which paper published an article that raised questions about the handling of the investigation?
When did El Mundo's article with information about the crash investigation come out?
How far from Valencia is the Albufera?
In what park is the Albufera located?
How far from the sea was Valencia when it was founded?
Who founded Valencia?
From what entity was the Albufera bought?
How many inhabitants live within Valencia's limits?
How much did Valencia's foreign population rise from 2007 to 2008?
Where does Valencia's population rank among EU municipalities?
How much land is within Valencia's limits?
From which countries does the biggest rise in Valencia's foreign population come?
Who was the ruler of Valencia in 138 BC?
How many Romans lived in Valencia in 138 BC?
What road crossed Valencia's island in Roman times?
What is now located at the former centre of Valencia?
In Roman times, what two roads met at Valencia's centre?
What type of people often held Valencia's offices?
From where were Valencia's officials chosen?
What convent was close to the area where troops lived?
Until when was the Lonja used to quarter troops?
When democracy began in Spain, what did the kingdom of Valencia become?
Who led a coup in Valencia?
Whose message convinced much of the military to stay loyal?
When did Milans del Bosch surrender?
What law made Valencia the capital of its region?
During which decade did GE start manufacuring computers?
What was the name of GE's major appliance manufacturing plant?
In what year did GE sell its computer division to Honeywell?
What division of GE provides computer timesharing services?
What was the name of first business in the world to own a computer?
What was the name of the lamp manufacturer in East Newark which Thomas Edison an interest in?
Where was Edison Machine Works located?
Who provided financial backing for the Edison Lighting Company?
In what year did Drexel, Morgan & Co. begin to finance Edison's research and form Edison General Electric Company?
What was the name of the company that held the patents from Edison's research?
What is the business source of the majority of GE's revenues?
Besides ITT Corporation, which two companies tried to emulate GE, but failed by the mid-1980's?
How much of GE's revenues is derived from the financial services it provides?
In what other country besides the US does GE provide lending services?
Who composed GE's slogan "Imagination at work?"?
What was GE's slogan prior to "Imagination at work?"
In what year was the slogan "We Bring Good Things to Life" first used?
Which company designed the standard format for GE's marketing literature and website?
What is the name of the typeface family created for GE in 2014?
Based on year 2000 data, where is GE ranked among the largest corporate producers of air pollution in the US?
How many tons of toxic chemicals does GE release into the atmosphere each year?
According to which government agency is GE a leading producer of Superfund toxic waste sites?
Which two commercial businesses produce more Superfund toxic waste sites than GE?
Which organization identified GE as the fourth largest corporate producer of air pollution in the US?
In what year was General Electric formed?
In which US state was GE incorporated?
Which city was the home of GE's first headquarters?
Who led the Thomson-Houston Electric Company when GE was formed?
Where was the Thomson-Houston Electric Company based?
Which river did GE pollute with PCBs from its plant in Pittsfield, MA?
How many pounds of PCBs are estimated to be retained in the sediment behind Woods Pond dam?
How high have the levels of PCBs in the sediments behind Woods Pond dam been measured at?
What were the primary contaminants contained in the pollution discharged into the Housatonic River?
Which company produced the Aroctor 1254 and Aroctor 1260?
In what year did GE enter the renewable energy industry?
How much money has GE invested in renewable energy commercialization?
In what year did GE acquire Kelman Ltd.?
As of 2009, how many people did GE employ in its renewable energy initiatives?
When did GE announce an expansion of its business in Northern Ireland?
When did GE announce its Ecoimagination program?
Who was the CEO of GE when it announced its Ecoimagination program?
What type of technology related to water was to be developed under the Ecoimagination program?
Which newspaper printed an op-ed piece that questioned Immelt's credibility as a spokesman on environmental policy?
What type of locomotive technology was to be developed by GE under its Ecoimagination program?
Who led GE's effort to build the first turbosupercharges during World War I?
Which jet engine did GE introduce in 1941?
What was GE's rank among US corporations in the value of wartime production contracts during World War II?
To which company did GE hand off their work on Whittle's jet engines?
Which company is ranked as the largest engine manufacturer in the world?
In what time period did GE pollute the Hudson River with PCBs?
Who founded the Hudson River Sloop Clearwater and the Clearwater Festival to bring attention to the pollution caused by GE?
What does PCB stand for?
What designation did the EPA give to the site of GE's Hudson River pollution
What other types of pollution have contaminated the Hudson River watershed?
How much money has GE said it will invest in 2008 for clean technology R&D?
How many green products did GE bring to market via its Ecoimagination program as of October 2008?
What type of engine did GE bring to market as part of its Ecoimagination project?
What type of lamp was introduced by GE as part of its Ecoimagination initiative?
What was GE's new revenue target for its Ecoimagination program in 2010?
What was the name of the project introduced by GE at the 2011 Toronto International Fils Festival?
Which company was GE's partner in the Short Fils, Big Ideas project?
What type of system is Sligshot?
What prize was awarded to the winning amateur dirctor film at the 2013 Sundance Film Festival?
How many online views did the Short Films, Big Ideas campaign generate?
Where is GE's headquarters located?
On what street in New York was GE headquartered before moving to Fairfield?
In what year did GE move its headquarters to Fairfield?
Which television broadcast company is located in the same building as GE's main offices in New York City?
What was the former name of the Comcast Building, location of GE's main offices?
Which New York State Attorney General filed suit in US District Court to force GE to pay for the cleanup of chemicals dumped by their plant in Waterford, NY?
How much did GE agree to pay in claims for the pollution it caused in the Housatonic River and other sites?
How many tons of PCBs were claimed to have been dumped by GE's Waterford Plant in the 1983 lawsuit?
In which year was a settlement reached regarding GE's pollution of the Housatonic River?
What was the location of the pollution caused by GE in the Housatonic River?
When was the Continental Army created?
Who was the commander of the Continental Army?
From what country did Friedrich Wilhelm von Steuben come from?
What did Friedrich Wilhelm von Steuben teach the Continental Army?
What year did American forces start being stationed in Vietnam?
What caused American forces to deploy in large number in 1965?
What political structure did Vietnam have?
What was organized to replace the concept of U.S. Volunteers?
When was the National Army demobilized?
Who filled vacancies in the Regular Army?
The War of 1812 consisted of the U.S against whom?
In what year did the U.S. take control of Lake Eerie?
Who did the U.S. defeat to collapse the Indian Confederacy?
In the Battle of New Orleans, who defeated the British?
What political party did not have trust in standing armies?
Who was defeated at the Battle of the Wabash?
Who did the state militias have ongoing conflict with?
In what year was the Legion of the United States established?
In what year was the Legion of the United States renamed to the United States Army?
Where is the National Training Center located?
Where is the Joint Readiness Training Center located?
Where is the Joint Multinational Training Center located?
In what year was ARFORGEN approved?
In what states is Fort Bliss located?
What month and year did the U.S. join World War II?
Which military force attacked Pearl Harbor?
What is the month, day and year of "D-Day"?
What war lead to the capture of the Pacific Islands by the U.S.?
Who was responsible for the desegregation of the army?
What were National Guard members considered before 1903?
In what year did the Milita Act take place?
The Air Defense Artillery is a branch of what?
National Guardsmen are under the authority of who?
How many divisions are there in the U.S. Army?
How many brigade teams did the Army downsize to by 2015?
Who is the Army Chief of Staff?
By 2018, how many active Army members will there be?
How many Army Reserve members will there be by 2018?
What does the SAW in M249 SAW stand for?
What kind of gunfire is the M249 SAW generally used for?
What is the Mossberg 590 used for?
What gun do designated marksmen use?
What semi-automatic sniper do Snipers use?
How many MRAP vehicles has the Pentagon bought since 2007?
How many of the vehicles will be used for training?
How many of the 25,000 vehicles do they plan on getting rid of?
The Army will be keeping 5,681 of what vehicle?
What type of ambulance will the Army have 301 of?
What piece of the uniform has been replaced by the patrol cap?
Who was the Army Chief of Staff at this time?
What month and year was the black beret replaced?
If a soldier is in a unit in jump status, what color beret do they wear?
The rifle green beret is worn by whom?
How many military departments does the Department of Defense have?
What does SECARMY stand for?
What does CSA stand for?
At the end of 2016, how many soldiers were in the Regular Army?
How many soldiers were there in the entire U.S. Army at the end of 2016?
What year did the Korean War start?
Who walked out of the U.N. security meeting?
In what two countries did the American troops fight Communist forces?
In what year did the Korean war end?
In 1989, what did the Pentagon plan to reduce the army end strength to?
Which country did Iraq invade in 1990?
What operation began in January 1991?
How many troops were involved in Operation Desert Storm?
How long did Operation Desert Storm last?
What year was the U.S. army organized?
What group combined with the U.S. Army?
Who raised the United States Volunteers?
What is the active component of the U.S. Army?
What are the two reserve components of the U.S. Army?
What are UTAs?
The U.S. Army is organized under what title of the United States Code?
Who does the D.C. National Guard report to?
What does ASI stand for?
What is are combat medics duties?
Where do the officers go to complete their branch specific training?
If the officers want to advance their careers even further, where is that available?
What does the army use for facilities while they are deployed?
What is the abbreviation for a tactical operations center?
What does FOB stand for?
Where are the dining facilities called?
What are the barracks used for?
Which war had the most U.S. casualties associated with it?
What were the U.S. forces referred to as?
What state did not contribute any troops to the Union Army?
In what year did the army start using fixed-wing aircraft?
Who attacked New Mexico in 1916?
What year did the U.S. join World War I?
What date did the U.S. intervention in New Mexico end?
Who was the Secretary of Defense in 1967?
How many divisions did the Secretary of Defense cut the original 15 down to?
How many brigades did the Secretary of Defense increase the number to?
How many victims were killed in the attack on the Pentagon?
What aircraft was hijacked?
Did they crash into the eastern or wester part of the Pentagon.
Who was the highest ranking official killed in the attack?
What is the army replacing divisions with?
How will the brigades be structured?
Who can command any brigade?
What does HMMWV stand for?
What is the HMMWV also known as?
The M1A2 Abrams is an example of what?
What does MRAP stand for?
What was the date of the first action of the Franco-Prussian War?
On that date, which elements were assisted by Prussian artillery forces?
Who initially held a strong position during the battle at the border? 
Douay's initial success was credited by what?
What threatened the French avenue of retreat?
At the start of the war, which country did European public opinion champion?
In which city did many Italians attempt to proffer their services to the Prussian embassy?
What caused a dramatic shift in Italian sentiment toward the war?
To whom is the quote, "Rescue the French Republic by every means" attributed?
What army did Garibaldi gain command of in France?
What was public opinion in Paris strongly opposed to?
On what date did president Trochu resign?
Who replaced President Trochu?
In which French city was the surrender made official?
Who disregarded the surrender and launched a failed attack on the Germans?
What stunned neutral observers about the end of the war?
What outcome had most people expected from the war?
Whose strategic advantages were not appreciated until after the war over?
What German advantages were discerned by other countries in the aftermath? 
What is at least one German innovation that other countries would later adopt in other wars?
The effect of German victory and ensuing influence stems back to what factor?
What was the Prussian General staff quick to utilize at the onset of the war?
What was one factor behind the inefficiency of the French railway system?
What factor especially affected travel to the front in Alsace and Lorraine?
Who was responsible for dealing with chaotic train yards and unloaded wagons?
Who commanded the Prussian 12 Cavalry Brigade?
What did General von Bredow lead a charge against at the Battle of Mars-la-Tour?
What did von Bredow's Pyrrhic victory become known as?
What military tactic proved to be unsuccessful on the 1914 battlefields?
What was one of two factors that led von Bredow's narrow success on the battlefield?
In peacetime, what the approximate number of French soldiers?
Veterans of the French Army had prviously fought in which war in Italy?
The "Seven Weeks War" was between which two countries?
Who reformed the low numbers of troops by implementing universal conscription?
If a citizen was for some reason not conscripted, in what militia were they were registered?
What entity controlled the Prussian army?
Who commanded the General Staff?
What was the unique purpose of the Prussian Army during peacetime?
The officers of the General Staff were hand-selected from which place?
What new technologies in particular were courted by Moltke?
In whose cadidacy did the immediate cause of war reside?
What did France fear by an alliance between Prussia and Spain?
Who goaded the French into war by editing a telegram sent by William I?
What was the name of the famous telelgram?
What was the reaction of the French people to the deceptively crafted offense in the Ems Dispatch?
In which country was a war against France condsidered desirable?
What was the overarching Prussian motive in starting a war with France?
Who had no doubts that a Franco-German war was totally necessary?
Who did Bismarck feel needed to be viewed as the aggressor in the conflict?
In bringing the southern German states to align with Prussia, what tactical outcome was achieved?
On what date did the battle begin?
Who order the First and Second armies to advance against the French?
Which general opened the battle with artillery from the 25th Infantry Division?
Who did the battle first appear to favor?
Who was the commander of the First Army?
What army's defeats turned Gambetta to the Army of the North?
Who led the Army of the North?
Several smaller victories were acheived by the protection of what?
The belt of fortresses were in what area of France?
This position in the north allowed whose men to launch fast attacks against Prussian units?
What odds were at stake for the attack launched by the III Corps?
What town were the III Corps able to capture?
In capturing Vionville, what was further blocked in the west?
With battle at Metz, what factor shattered the efforts of III Corps?
The Germans recorded how many causualties in the battle?
Which prince ordered an artillery attack against Canrobert?
Which army's defeat compelled Prince Charles to attack?
As the Second Army pushed into Ravine, the XII Corps cleared out which adjacent town?
The surving soldiers of the 1st Guards Infantry Division launched a new attack against what?
Which army was forced to retreat to Metz and surrender two months later?
A blockade of what coastline was ordered by the French government at the start of the war?
The small North German navy had how many ironclads at their disposal?
What was the name of the only turret ship that was able to conduct operations?
How many ships was the French navy able to dispatch to sea?
In pursuing Prussian ships, what resource was quickly depleted?
Which battle was the second of three key French losses?
On what date did the battle of Spicheren take place?
Moltke had originally planned to kee Bazaine's army on what river?
Which general's zeal and lack of planning led to cutting off Prince Charles from his calvary?
Which town was the site of General von Steinmetz's grave error?
By late afternoon, what were the Prussian southern attacks at risk of?
Which Prussian general commanded the attack against the French at St. Privat?
What factor immobilised the Prussian Guard?
By nightfall a major component of the VII and VII Corps withdrew towards what Prussian position?
What did the Prussian Army hold in Paris on 17 February?
Under what provision was the Prussian Army permitted to have a victory parade?
To hounour the armistice, Bismarck allowed train loads of what into Paris?
France had to consent to pay how much in war indemnity?
An ensuing mass exodus from Paris saw how many people head for the countryside?
A series of Prussian and German victories took place in what part of France?
What seige did these victories lead to?
What battle was a result of the Prussian and German victories in eastern France?
Which army definitively defeated Napolean III?
On what date did the Government of National Defence declare the the Third Republic in Paris?
Some historians counter that Napolean III sought what?
Napoleon III belived he would win the Astro-Prussian war and win a conflict with what country?
It is also argued that Napoleon III thought a war would resolve the growing issue of what?
Before the war, French voters overwhelming supported what program of Napoleon III?
Who proposed that Emperor needed no war to increase his public appeal?
What did Napoleon III plan to relieve pressure from an expected German attack?
What country were the French hoping to be allied with?
What military strength could Denmark to France in a war?
What had Prussia been discovered building around big north German ports?
What did the French navy lack in engaging coastal defenses?
What was the Prussian Army composed of, instead of regulars?
Service was mandatory for all men sharing which feature?
Together, Prussia and Germany expected to amass how many soldiers?
What is an example of a German encirclement battle?
German tactics relied on what type of battle strategy?
What Prussian system was superior to the French example?
Prussian military officers were trained to exude what type thinking?
What commander of the General Staff held the expectaion of independent thinking in his officers?
What did the French dearth of an education and promotion system stifle?
Which military historian criticized the French system as being defective?
What aspect of the Chassepot was superior to the German needle gun?
What French weapon was considered a rough prototype of the first machine gun? 
How many barrels did the mitrailleuse feature?
What was the range of the mitrailleuse?
Treating the mitrailleuse like what rendered it far less effective
Which marshal was closest to Wissembourg?
How many divisions did MacMahon command?
Over how many miles did MacMahon's divisions cover?
Whose conduct made a bad situation worse?
What group did General Ducrot command?
Who was the Prussian Minister of War?
What was the time span that von Roon acted as minister?
He instituted a series of what regarding the Prussian military?
What was the first step in the reforms?
What was the second reform?
On what date did the Government of National Defence negotiate an armistice?
With whom did the French government negotiate?
What consequence of war were Parisians suffering?
Which French minister traveled to Versailles to discuss peace?
What was the date on which jFarve and Bismarck met?
At the start of the war, how many German troops were focused on the French frontier?
How many French troops were available to stand again the Germans?
What is the literal meaning of the Prussian word "Kreis?"
What did the French military numbers suffer from the most?
Where in Eritrea did Italian scientists find one of the oldest hominids?
How old was the hominid that was found in Eritrea?
What place in Eritrea is believed to have played a major part in human evolution?
What possible link is represented by the hominid found in Eritrea?
What is the importance pertaining to the age of the hominid that was found in Eritrea?
Who was James Bruce?
In 1770, who reported that Medri Bahri was a distinct political entity from Abyssinia?
How is The Bahre-Nagassi translated?
What determined whether The Bahre-Nagassi fought with or against the Abyssinians?
Which century marked the arrival of the Ottomans?
What is the abbreviation for the United Nations' Advisory Committee on Administrative and Budgetary Questions?
What does the acronym INTERPOL stand for?
Which league is Eritrea an observing member of?
Who ruled Aksum and also governed the port of Adulis?
How did the Aksumite rulers facilitate trade?
Which kingdoms did Aksum regularly enter the politics of?
Who did Aksum conquer in order to extend its rule over the Arabian peninsula?
Where was Ivory exported according to the Periplus of the Erythraean Sea?
Who prompted Eritrea to be federated with Ethiopia in 1950?
Which UN Resolution called for Eritrea and Ethiopia to be linked via a loose federal structure under sovereignty of the Emperor?
What would federal government control in Eritrea according to Resolution 390A(V)??
Which Eritrean wishes did Resolution 390A(V) ignore?
What did Resolution 390A(V) guarantee the population of Eritrea?
What did the Eritrea administration open to produce products such as buttons and construction materials?
How many factories were in Eritrea by 1939?
Who were the main employees in the factories of Eritrea?
Besides Eritreans, which other nationality increased its city population because of new industries?
How much did the number of Italians residing in Eritrea increase in 5 years due to factories being built?
What big cat is said to inhabit the mountains of the Gash-Barka Region?
In December 2001, how many elephants were seen in the vicinity of the Gash River?
What species did the elephants at the Gash River seem to form a symbiotic relationship with?
Which animal herds were thought to have fallen victim to the war of independence?
How many ecoregions make up Eritrea?
What is the highest point in Eritrea?
Where is Emba Soira located?
How high is Emba Soira?
What is the probably location in Eritrea where three tectonic plates are pulling away from each other?
How many elephants are believed to be left in Eritrea?
What type of snakes are common in Gash Barka?
Where in Eritrea can puff adder and red spitting cobra be found?
Where in Eritrea are marine species such as dolphin, turtles and manta ray found?
Which dog, previously found in Eritrea, is now considered extirpated from the entire country?
According to Human Rights Watch, how do the human rights in Eritrea compare to the rest of the world?
According to a 500-page UN Human Rights Council report, what was widespread behavior by state officials in Eritrea?
What type of state government exists in Eritrea?
According to many western countries, why have Eritrean authorities detained an unknown number of people?
In what year was the United Nations Human Rights Council report written?
Why have Eritrean government officials participated in numerous meetings with NGO representatives?
What did the Eritrean government ban in 2007?
What new movement is aimed at opening dialogue between the government and opposition?
Who, along with ordinary citizens, makes up the Citizens for Democratic Rights in Eritrea?
What are the main concerns Eritreans speak about in terms of female circumcision?
In the 2014 Press Freedom Index, what organization ranked the media environment in Eritrea as the worse of 178 countries?
How did Reporters Without Borders rank the media environment of Eritrea compared to totalitarian North Korea?
What type of media has been banned from Eritrea since 2001?
According to the BBC, which African country is the only one that has no privately owned news media?
According to Reporters Without Borders, where doesn't a single foreign news correspondent live?
Under which program did Eritrea develp and repair its transportation infrastructure during the war?
How long was the coastal highway between Massawa and Asseb?
What type of locomotives are sometimes used on the Eritrean Railway to cater to groups of enthusiasts?
What is the capital of Eritrea?
Which railway was rehabilitated under the Warsay Yika'alo Program?
What is the official language of Eritrea?
What was the most widely spoken language in Eritrea in 2006?
What does the Constitution establish of all Eritrean languages?
What languages serve as de facto working languages in Eritrea?
What language is used in Eritrean university education and many technical fields?
Where does the Italian influences on Eritrean cuisine come from?
What is Eritrea's popular alcoholic beverage Mies made out of?
What food item did Italians bring to Eritrea during colonial times?
How does 'Pasta al Sugo e Berbere' translate in English?
What is the main food, influenced by Italy, eaten in Eritrea's capital today?
What is the best know musical genre amongst the Tigrinya?
What is the Eritrean traditional instrument, the wata?
Who is the most popular Eritrean singing artist?
What is Helen Meles noted for?
Who, in Eritrea, have their own styles of music and  accompanying dance?
In 2010, what was conducted on mummified remains of baboons?
Who was determined to be the closest match for the baboon mummies?
What type of analysis did the scientists use to examine hairs from the 2 baboon mummies formerly preserved in the British Museum?
Where did the 2 baboons' mummified remains originate?
Where did researchers suggest that Punt was located?
What  domain were the Eritrean highlands under after the decline of Aksum?
What was the area in the Eritrean highlands named under Emperor Zaro Yaqob?
What was the capitol of Medri Bahri?
What were the main provinces of Medri Bahri?
What is the English translation of Medri Bahri?
Whose rise to power in 1922 brought profounc change to the government in Italian Eritrea?
When was Italian Eritrea significantly enlarged?
When was the birth of the Italian Empire declared?
What was Eritrea chosen to be by the Italian government during the Italian Empire?
What does Africa Orientale Italiana mean?
Who dissolved the Eritrean parliament in 1962?
Who waged an armed struggle for independence in 1962 after Eritrea was annexed?
What does the acroynm ELF stand for?
How long did the Eritrean War for Independence last?
What is the acronym for Eritrean People's Liberation Front?
What did disagreements following the Eritrean War result in?
What did the stalemate lead the President of Eritrea to urge the UN to do?
Who accused Eritrea of planting bombs at an African Union summit?
What supported the accusation that Eritrea planted bombs at the African Union summit?
What did Eritrea do when it was accused of planting bombs at the African Union summit?
How do most people dress in the larger cities of Eritrea?
How do both men and women often dress in offices in Eritrea?
What are zurias, the traditional clothes still worn by Christian highlander women in Eritrea?
How do women in the Muslim communities of the Eritrean lowland dress?
Who are the only women who follow the tradition of covering half of their faces, though not their hair?
Who occupied the Red Sea coast during the last interglacial period?
How old were the obsidian tools that were discovered by the Eritrean Research Project Team?
Where did the Research Project Team find the obsidian tools?
What Team was composed of Eritrean, Canadian, American, Dutch and French scientists?
What were the tools believed to have been used for by early humans?
When was the Aussa Sultanate established?
Where was the Aussa Sultanate established?
Who was the leader of Afar in 1734?
What did Kedafu establish in 1734?
What marked the start of a new and sophisticated polity that would last into the colonial period?
What did Emperor Haile Selassie seek to annex in the 1950's?
Why did the British and Americans want to cede most of Eritrea to the Ethiopians?
Who laid claim to Eritrea and Italian Somaliland in a letter to Franklin D. Roosevelt?
Who consistently requested that a referendum be held immediately to settle the question of Eritrean sovereignty?
Who did Ethiopians support in World War II?
How is the Eritrean highway system named?
What are T roads, the lowest level that typically serves local interests?
What are the three levels of road classification in Eritrea?
What are S roads, the mid-level that connects district capitals to regional capitals?
What are P roads, those that carry traffic between all major towns in Eritrea?
What percentage of Eritrea is estimated to adhere to Christianity?
What percentage of Eritrea is estimated to adhere to Islam?
What do unrecognized faiths and denominations in Eritrea have to undergo?
When did the Eritrean government begin to officially recognize certain churches?
What does the government's registration system require religious groups to submit about their membership?
What ages are officially compulsary for education in Eritrea?
What percentage of school-aged children are estimated to attend primary school?
What percentage of school-aged children are estimated to attend secondary school?
What is the student-teacher ratio in elementary schools?
What is the student-teacher ratio in secondary schools?
What meat does a traditional Eritrean stew consist of?
Which neighbor does Eritrean cuisine strongly resemble?
Why does Eritrean cooking tend to feature more seafood than Ethiopian cuisine?
How does the texture of Eritrean dishes compare to Ethiopian meals?
What ingredients fo Eritreans tend to use less of than Ethiopians?
What kind of uranium is sometimes used to shield radioactive materials in containers?
What is a strong source of radiation that is blocked by depleted uranium?
How is depleted uranium used in missile re-entry vehicles?
What trait causes depleted uranium to be used in gyroscopic compasses?
What type of alpha emitter is uranium?
What is another term for uranium ore?
Who isolated radium in uranium ore?
In what types of paints was radium first used?
What devices were painted with radium paint?
Along with red, blue, black, yellow and green, what was a notable color of uranium tile glaze?
What was the world's first artificial nuclear reactor?
In what state is the X-10 Graphite Reactor located?
Along with the X-10 Pile, what was the X-10 Graphite Reactor previously known as?
In what state is Argonne National Laboratory's Experimental Breeder Reactor I located?
On what date did Breeder Reactor I first make electricity?
Where does uranium rank among elements in terms of its abundance in the Earth's crust?
Where is uranium naturally formed?
Along with potassium-40 and uranium, the decay of what element is a primary heat source driving plate tectonics?
In what state is the Earth's outer core?
What isotope of uranium was the first to be found fissile?
When a nuclear chain reaction in uranium-235 doesn't result in a burst of heat, what does it result in?
How many nuclei does uranium-235 usually divide into when bombarded with slow neutrons?
What is used to slow a chain reaction in a nuclear reactor?
What does a neutron poison absorb?
What type of complexes does uranium(VI) form in nature?
The presence of what substance at alkaline pH makes it difficult to precipitate uranium as phosphate?
What is BSAR-1 a strain of?
How much economically viable uranium is there in ore reserves, in millions of tonnes?
How many millions of tonnes are uranium are regarded as mineral resources?
What was the price of uranium per pound as of May 2003?
In 2005, how much money was spent on uranium exploration?
How much money was spent to explore for uranium in 2006?
When was it observed that bombarding uranium with neutrons results in beta ray emission?
Who led the team that discovered that bombarding uranium with neutrons created beta ray emissions?
What was the name given by Corbino to the incorrectly designated atomic number 94?
What was the job title of Orso Mario Corbino?
Who was the aunt of Otto Robert Frisch?
In what medium does the Pourbaix diagram change when carbonate anions interact with uranium(VI)?
What notable carbonates are often water soluble?
What does a uranium(VI) cation form when it binds to two terminal oxides and three or more carbonates?
Along with arsenic, what metal is roughly as abundant as uranium?
Along with silver, mercury, tin and cadmium, what metal is uranium more plentiful than?
What is the most prevalent uranium ore?
What mineral sometimes contains uranium?
What types of rocks sometimes contain uranium?
What is the least prevalent major isotope of natural uranium?
What is the natural abundance of uranium-235?
What isotope of uranium is formed when 238U experiences spontaneous fission?
When uranium isotope is formed from the decay of neptunium-237?
What isotope is it theorized will form uranium-2343 after double beta decay?
About how many tonnes of uranium is theorized to be present in the sea?
What did ORNL call their material that performs surface retention on solid molecules?
The presence of what substance in sea water has resulted in low yields when attempting to extract uranium?
Where were ORNL's results verified?
When was HiCap announced?
What is the sole fissile isotope that occurs in nature?
What can be turned into plutonium-239 in a nuclear reactor?
What uranium isotope is produced from thorium?
Along with uranium-235, what isotope is noted for having a high fission cross-section for slow neutrons?
What is 238U?
What is OSHA?
What is the OSHA uranium exposure limit for an 8-hour workday?
What does REL stand for?
What is the NIOSH uranium exposure standard over an 8-hour workday?
At what level of exposure does uranium become imminently dangerous to health?
Along with UO2, what is the commonest form of uranium oxide?
What is the stablest uranium compound?
In what form is uranium most often used as fuel for nuclear reactors?
What was the first self-sustained nuclear chain reaction created by human beings called?
On what date was the first self-sustained nuclear chain reaction created artificially?
What project was Fermi working for?
On the campus of what educational institution was Chicago Pile-1 created?
How many metric tons of uranium oxide was used in Chicago Pile-1?
What percentage of uranium in nature is uranium-235?
What is the term for the amount of uranium-235 needed to sustain a nuclear chain reaction?
What is the most prevalent natural isotope of uranium?
What percentage of natural uranium is isotope 238?
Along with gas cooled reactors, what type of reactor doesn't use uranium-235?
Who discovered uranium?
In what year did the discovery of uranium occur?
In what city was uranium discovered?
What did Klaproth probably create when he dissolved pitchblende in nitric acid?
Who discovered the planet Uranus?
What percentage range of uranium oxide is usually contained in low-grade uranium ore?
Along with underground, open pit and in-situ leaching, what sort of mining is used to mine uranium?
In what country are high-grade uranium ores notably found?
In what province of Canada is the Athabasca Basin?
What is the average percentage of uranium oxide contained in the ores mined in the Athabasca Basin?
What was the uranium-based bomb made by the US in World War II called?
What was the codename of the plutonium-based bomb created in the Second World War?
On what date was Little Boy detonated?
What was the equivalent yield in TNT of the Little Boy bomb, in tonnes?
Over what city was Little Boy detonated?
As of 2005, what country was the largest producer of uranium oxides?
What percentage of world uranium oxide production is produced by Argentina?
What country produced 5.5% of the world's concentrated uranium oxide in 2005?
How many countries produced concentrated uranium oxides in 2005?
How many tonnes of uranium was Australia expected to produce in 2009?
Who was the Soviet Union's opponent in the Cold War?
How many nuclear warheads can be made with 540 metric tons of highly enriched weapons grade uranium?
What was the expenditure of the Material Protection, Control, and Accounting Program between 1993 and 2005?
What is another term for uranium that is enriched?
Approximately how many times did police capture shipments of bomb-grade plutonium or uranium between 1993 and 2005?
What is the color of U4+?
What state is represented by the UO2+ 2 ion?
Along with uranyl sulfate and uranyl chloride, what compound is formed by the UO2+ 2 ion?
What common complex is formed by the UO2+ 2 ion with organic chelating agents?
What microorganism can notably absorb a very high concentrate of uranium?
What is given to Citrobacter to cause it to absorb uranyl ions?
What lichen is known to absorb a uranium concentration nearly 300 times higher than the amount in the environment?
What protobacterium notably bioremediates ground water uranium?
What fungus is known to cause uranium content in its symbiotic plant roots to increase?
Between what percent fraction range of uranium-235 is uranium regarded as enriched?
In what year did the cost of uranium notably begin to increase?
What is the maximum uranium-235 isotope concentration for uranium to be considered depleted?
What was the price of a kilogram of depleted uranium hexafluoride in 2001?
How much did a kilogram of depleted uranium hexafluoride cost as of July 2007?
Along with the heart, brain and liver, what system is notably affected by exposure to uranium?
What is the main form of 238U decay?
What type of uranium compounds are uranium trioxide and uranyl nitrate?
At what temperature will grains of uranium metal spontaneously ignite in air?
What is the name of the most widely used enrichment process?
What compound is UF6?
What enrichment process was used by the Manhattan Project?
In the gaseous diffusion process, what is diffused through a silver-zinc membrane?
How does the weight of uranium-238 compare to that of uranium-235?
What is uranium's symbol on the Periodic Table of Elements?
What is the atomic number of uranium?
What color is uranium?
How many valence electrons are contained in an atom of uranium?
Of what series in the Periodic Table of Elements is uranium a part?
What non-metal elements does uranium notably not react to?
What coats uranium metal in air?
Along with nitric acids, what acids dissolve uranium?
What is a notable form uranium ore is converted into after extraction?
What reacts with finely divided uranium?
During what war was uranium-235 first used to create nuclear weapons?
From what isotope of uranium is plutonium-239 derived?
What is mixed with tritium and experiences nuclear fusion in a fission/fusion bomb?
What is another name for a fission/fusion bomb?
What does non-fissile mean?
What product of uranium was used as toner?
Along with uranyl formate, what product of uranium is used in transmission electron microscopy?
What light bulbs use lamp filaments containing uranium?
Along with leather, what industry uses uranium in dyes and stains?
In addition to wool, what is uranium salt a mordant of?
Of what nationality was Perrin?
In what county was the Oklo mine located?
How old are the ore deposits in the Oklo mine?
When the Oklo mine ore deposits came into being, what percentage of uranium on Earth consisted of uranium-235?
Where in the United States is there a nuclear waste repository?
What happens to a majority of ingested uranium?
Up to what percentage of uranyl ion can be absorbed when ingested?
About what percentage of uranium oxide is absorbed when ingested?
What does uranium have an affinity for?
Where does uranium accumulate in the body?
Who could wear a emblem of two crossed silver oak leaves?
What year was it replaced?
What was the emblem?
What kind of medal was replaced in 1974?
They continued to wear what the insignia of what?
Who are appointed to citizens of nations?
Where was Queen Elizabeth ll not Head of State?
What is honorary appointees are incorrectly referred to?
Who are examples of Sir of Dame?
What is an example of irish broadcaster?
Who was discontinued in the Commonwealth realms?
Who established a national system of honours and awards?
How were the different levels of award and honour reflected the imperial system?
What were the highest class?
Who was the most excellent Order of the British Empire?
When was the order of chivalry of British constitutional monarchy established?
Who rewarded contributions to the arts and sciences?
Who established the chivalry of british constiutional monarchy?
Who is the recipient?
From what year could the Sovereign appoint a person as Commander, Officer or Member of the Order of the British Empire?
Of what acts did the Members of the Order of the British Empire appoint?
When was the awards designated the Order of the British Empire for Gallantry?
What grade was determined?
Who would prefix Sir, and Dames Grand Cross?
Who would prefix Dame, to their forenames?
Who would prefix Lady to their surnames?
Such forms are not used by whom?
Who wouldn't use the title Sir of Dame?
Who has set honours awarded by the President of India?
What is referred to as the Padma Awards?
Who holds a republican position some consider to monarch of Britain?
What does the Padma Awards consist of?
What does not carry any decoration or insignia that can be worn on the person?
How many Knights are in The Order?
How many commanders are in The Order?
How many Knights and Dames Commander?
How many officers and members maybe be appointed per year?
Who has the highest numbers of the British Orders of Chivalry?
What are the Members of classes of the Order assigned to?
Who of the male members feature on the order?
Who are not assigned any special precedence?
Who can individuals derive precedence from?
Who can individuals can not derive precedence from?
What year did the Enlightenment begin according to French historians?
Recent historians begin the period of Enlightenment in the 1620's which was also the start of what revolution?
What was the French term for philosophers in the period of Enlightenment?
In what year did Louis XIV die?
In what year did the French Revolution begin?
In what decade did the scientific revolution begin?
Who developed some of the fundamentals of European liberal thought?
Thomas Hobbes ushered in the new debate of social contract theory through which work of his?
What did John Locke base his governance philosophy on?
What did John Locke base his governance philosphy in?
Which English philosopher wrote Leviathan in 1651?
Who developed the view that all legitimate political power must be "representative?"
Which of Hobbes' ideas led to the distinction between civil society and the state?
How does John Locke define mutual security?
What do Locke's idea of natural rights include?
Why did John Locke believe that one person cannot enslave another?
What was John Locke's one exception to denouncing slavery?
In which of John Locke's works are natural rights most famously defined and discussed?
Who dropped any passages dealing with miracles or visitations of angels from his work the Jefferson Bible?
The Enlightenment era religious commentary was, in part, a response to which war?
What did the Enlightenment mean for moderate Christians?
Did John Locke want to foster or avoid increased detailed debate on the essence of Christianity?
In which country did the Enlightenment become associated with anti-government and anti-Church radicalism?
Which of the Enlightenment's leaders did the British government give a knighthood and lucrative government office?
In which country did the government respond with hostility to the Enlightenment, even imprisoning philosophes?
Was government response to the Enlightenment uniformly positive or widely varied?
In which class did the Enlightenment reach deepest, expressing a nationalistic tone?
Who drafted the first technical dictionary?
What was the first technical dictionary drafted by John Harris titled?
Did the Lexicon Technicum focus on theological and biographical entries or science and technology?
What year was the Lexicon Technicum published?
In what language was the Lexicon Technicum written?
Where did the first English coffeehouse open in 1650?
According to Brian Cowan, was learning more or less formal in coffehouses as opposed to private institutions?
What term did Brian Cowan give Oxford coffeehouses?
Diderot, Voltaire, Mozart, Goethe, and Benjamin Franklin were all members of what secret network?
To whom was Freemasonry most attractive?
Freemasonry expanded rapidly to nearly every country in which continent?
Trying to apply Enlightenment thought on religious and political tolerance became known as what?
Which two Americans travelled to Europe during the Enlightenment and actively contributed to the scienific and political debate?
The ideals of the Enlightenment were incorporated into which two United States documents?
Did the scientific revolution precede or follow the Age of Enlightenment?
The basis of classical liberalism comes from whose philosophical concepts?
Whose philosophical concepts directly influenceed James Madison and thus the U.S. Constitution?
Who popularised Hume's philosophical concepts?
What did Locke, Hobbes, and Rousseau agree was necessary for a man to live in civil society?
Who wrote Discourse on Inequality?
Which theorist wrote Two Treatises of Government?
For what reason did Rousseau feel people joined into civil society?
From which state does Locke believe it is virtually improssible to break free?
Leaders of the Enlightenment that helped design laws and programs to reform the court system are called what by historians?
Which enlightened despot was so over-enthusiastic that revolts broke out and nearly all of his programs were reversed?
In what country was the model constitution of 1791 in effect for only one year?
From what country was Enlightenment leader Catherine the Great?
Did Mendelssohn and Spinoza judge religion on its moral fruits or logic of its theology??
What did Enlightenment scholars seek to curtail and thereby prevent another age of intolerant religious war?
Spinoza was determined to remove what from contemporary and historical theology?
Did Moses Mendelssohn advise to follow a specific organized religion, or to whatever one found most convincing?
Who did Voltaire say that France looked to for ideas of civilization?
What was the profession of James Anderson?
Who was the first modern geologist?
William Cullen and Joseph Black shared what two occupations?
Did rising efficiency in production and communication lower or raise the prices of consumer goods?
Was the variety of goods available to consumers increased or decreased by the economic and social change of the Industrial Revolution?
The context for the rise of the public sphere was the econoic and social change associated with what revolution?
A the economy and middle class expanded, what artistic profession had an increasing number of members?
Which economic class expansion led to the emergence of music magazines and reviews?
Women increased their presence in the amateur performers scene with what instrument, especially?
Which musican mediums were the majority of amateur music works published for?
By what century in France had the men of letters fused with the elites?
What was the term for the oppositional literary sphere of a "multitude of versifiers and would-be-authors"?
Could the London market support the large numbers of writers that were emerging?
Were men travelling to London to become authors paid well or poorly by the publishing-bookselling guilds?
Who is known for his statement that individuals have a right to "Life, Liberty and Property"?
Locke believed that the natural right to property is derived from what?
Locke's theory of natural rights influenced what French document?
Which king of Prussia saw himself as the leader of the Enlightenment?
Which Enlightenment theorist was extended an invitation to live at the palace after being iprisoned by the French government?
Who was the king of Prussia from 1740 to 1786?
Which venue created a unique environment in which people from many different walks of life could gather and share ideas?
Coffehouses were criticized by which group of people, fearing the possiblity of an environmentin which class was disregarded?
Which societal group believed they held a divine right to rule and resented the idea of their subjects convening to discuss political matters?
What societal group derived much of their power from the disparity between classes of people?
In what decade did the first Masonic lodges appear on the Continent?
The Freemason embodiment of what country's values was seen as threatening by Continental authorities?
Which lodge that met in the mid 1720s was composed of English Jacobite exiles?
Which lodges assigned themselves the duty to "initate the unenlightened"?
What is the masonic term for the deistic divine being who created a scientifically ordered universe?
Which venue represents a turning point in history during which people discovered that they could have enjoyable social lives within their communities?
Coffehouses were essential to what movement by becoming centers of free-thinking and self-discovery?
In what year was The Spectator published?
Which literary work used the fictional narrator Mr. Spectator to entertain and provoke discussion regarding serious philosophical matters?
Who was the major opponent to Freemasonry?
Which countries had a large Catholic element and therefore had confrontation with Freemasons?
Do American historians downplay or attribute the importance of Freemasonry in causing the American Revolution?
Who was the political enemy of the Patriots?
Were the Masons political or non-political in the American Revolution?
Which city in the mid-18th century became the center of an explosion of philosophic and scientific activity?
Who were the two leaders of Paris' philosophic movement?
Rousseau argued for a society based on what, rather than faith?
Which philosopher introduced the idea of a separation of powers in government?
Montesquieu's ideas were enthusiastically adopted by the authors of what American document?
Whose incomes did public concerts help support?
Handel gained considerable fame with performances of what two types of artistic work?
Which two composers are usually regarded as being the most in line with the Enlightenment ideals?
What style of music did Haydn and Mozart share?
What year was the Academy of Science in France founded?
Members of what group were considered to be the "most useful of all citizens?"
What percentage of clerics were members of the Academy of Science?
The Academy of Science was only open to which societal group?
How did elite Parisian scholars perceive themselves?
How can associationism be defined?
What was the predominant educational psychology from the 1750s onward?
Children were taught to memorize facts through methods that originated during which time period?
For which masterpiece did Cesare Beccaria become famous?
Into how many languages was Cesare Beccaria's Crimes and Punishments (1764) translated?
Which work established Francesco Mario Pagano as an international authority on criminal law?
In what year did Francesco Mario Pagano publish Saggi Politici?
What did contemporary sources claim was the purpose of the universiity in contrast to the societies?
Contemporary sources considered societies functioned for what purpose in contrast to universities?
By what year were there over seventy official scientific societies?
Who coined the term "the Age of Academies" to describe the 18th century?
The Enlightenment is frequently linked to the French Revolution of what year?
Who delineated the "consent of the governed" in Two Treatises of Government (1689)?
The "divine right of kings" was in direct conflict with which of Locke's philosophies?
According to Locke, the revolutions of the late 1700s and early 1800s were caused when what could not be resolved peacefully?
In what work did Ferguson explain how humans advanced from a hunting and gathering society to a commercial and civil society without "signing" a social contract?
In what year did Ferguson publish An Essay on the History of Civil Society?
How many stages of progress did Ferguson theorize?
Who, along with Adam Ferguson, criticized the idea of social contract theorists?
What century produced the first Russian univeristy, library, theatre, public museum, and independent press?
What did the Russian enlightenment focus on instead of societal enlightenment?
From whom did Catherine the Great receive assistance in her Enlightenment ideals via correspondence?
Which philosopher believed that the Enlightenment was ultimately born out of Protestant reaction against the Catholic counter-reformation?
Where did Betrand Russell believe views such as affinity for democracy against monarachy originated from?
Who does Betrand Russell started the schism that lead to the Enlightenment?
John Locke, Francis Bacon, and Isaac Newton where considered the the greatest men who ever lived by which American colonist?
Religious tolerance and the importance of individual conscience was particularly influential in the drafting of which American document?
Whom, along with Francis Bacon and John Locke, did Thomas Jefferson consider to be one of the three greatest men that ever lived?
From a historical standpoint, what was one of the most important features of the debating society?
Were debates only open to certain economic classes, or could all attend?
What were some of the issues discussed in addition to debates on religion?
What do Jonathon Israel claim caused the change that eventually led to the revolutions of the latter half of the 18th centure and early 19th century?
What does Israel argue Western civilization was based on until the 1650s?
Jonathon Israel rejects the notion that the revolutionary ideas were by products of what transformations?
What time period does Johnathon Israel focus on?
How was the public sphere defined?
During what centuries was the rise of the public sphere?
What term did Habermas give to describe the areas of political/social knowledge and discussion that were previously exlusive territory of the state and religious authorities?
The argument of the public sphere was founded on what?
The values of the bourgeois public sphere included holding reason to the supreme, considering everything open to criticism, and the opposition of what?
How did dictionaries and encyclopedias change in the 18th century?
What movement were dictionaries and encyclopedias trying to promote?
How did the content of encyclopedias change in the 18th century?
Encyclopedias in the 18th century tended to focus more strongly on what topics, rather than theology?
Which society in England also played a significant role in the public sphere and spread of Enlightenment ideas?
In what year was the Royal Society of London given a royal charter?
Whose method based knowledge on experiementation, which had to be witnessed?
Who were considered more reliable witnesses than the Oxfordshire peasants?
What two factors were taken into account in credibility in the Royal Society?
According to German historian Reinhart Koselleck, which two social structures left a decisive imprint on the Age of Enlightenment?
Which Scottish professor believes that Masons were not a major radical or reformist network in their own right?
Historian Margaret Jacob stresses the importance of the Masons in indirectly inspriting what type of thinking?
Daniel Roche claims that Masonry promoted what idea by only attracting men of similar social background?
The presence of whom in the French "lodges of adoption" formed in the 1780s was die to the close ties shared with aristocratic society?
What caused an increasingly literate population to develop in the Enlightenment era?
Instead of paying more for food, on what did people spend their money?
Which ideal endeavoured to make information available to the greatest number of people?
Who wrote the celebrated Philosophiae Naturalis Principia Mathematica?
Which work of Isaac Newton was published in Latin and remained inaccessible to readers without education until Enlightenment writers began to translate and analyze it in the vernacular?
For what do Circadian rhythms let an organism prepare?
What can an organism that uses circadian rhythms use to its advantage that others can not?
By better using resources, how does that improve an organism's chances of surviving?
By improving what processes does the use of circadian rhythms serve to benefit the individual?
What insect has been studied concerning the inheritability of rhythms?
What produces a self-sustaining rhythm?
When do the CCA1  and LHY function?
Which loop that consists of GI and ELF4 functions?
What was the previous belief of feedback in the gene loop?
What researcher showed that the gene  feedback loop serves as a repressor?
What is the Drosophila gene the cause of?
What is the Drosophila gene also known as?
What is Familial advanced sleep phase syndrome?
What kind of clock have genetic functions?
What does the body interpret from the gene feedback loop?
Whose work habits and environment prevents them from maintaining a regular sleep pattern?
What can the lack of regular sleep patterns cause?
What organizations cites this disruption of sleep patterns as a cause of accidents?
What has the NTSB conducted to find the cause of pilot fatigue?
Of what does the NTSB want to find a means of doing?
What is the earliest recorded instance of circadian rhythm?
What ship captain described daily leaf movements?
What tree leaves did Androsthenes describe?
What type of Chinese texts mention circadian process in humans?
When did the Chinese use diurnal rhythms to remember Acu-points?
What is the plant expression of circadian rhythm?
What do plants need to attract to their flowering?
 With what feature of environment do plants need to be in sync?
What does adaptive advantage allow for plants?
Where can an understanding of circadian rhythms of plants be an advantage?
What has the simplest known circadian clock?
With how many proteins can the circadian clock of Synechococcus elongatus are needed to reproduce its effect?
What type of feedback mechanism was previously thought to be needed to sustain the clock?
How long a rhythm were researchers able to sustain in the in vitro experiment?
What were the only proteins necessary to the circadian timekeeper experiment?
What chemical is absent or low during daylight?
When is the melatonin onset?
At its onset, what can be measured in blood or saliva?
The presence of what is a circadian marker?
What are the more reliable markers in determining sleep timing?
What physical factor must be continuously monitored during temperature studies> 
At what time does the average adult human reach his lowest temperature?
How long before wake time is the lowest temperature reached?
When does the temperature of morning type young adults reach its lowest?
What is the time of lowest temperature for evening type young adults?
Inside of what can the molecular circadian clock operate?
By functioning within a single, what is the system?
What section of the brain periodically releases hormones?
How are sleep and wake cycles as well as body functions coordinated?
What do body hormone receptors do with the body's organs?
What effect does jet-lag and shift-work have on the human body?
Animals that eat during resting periods show what body increase?
How does irregular eating during shift-work effect insulin?
Besides insulin sensitivity, what other effect does shift-work have on the body?
What type of work can lead to heart, hypertension and inflammation?
What do studies show has a bidirectional relationship with the circadian system?
What do abusive drugs effect in the circadian system?
What do drug abusers show in their circadian processes?
What can the disrupted circadian system cause?
What can disruption to genetics and environment in the sleep cycle cause?
What is theorized to have evolved with circadian rhythms?
What is thought that circadian rhythm evolved to protect?
From what did  DNA need to be protected in the earliest cells? 
One possible reason for the development of the circadian system is the need to counteract what ?
What environmental event occurred 2.3 million years ago?
What is the body clock gene in animals necessary to ensure?
What do mice without the clock gene become?
Beside obesity, how else does the lack of a circadian clock effect   the mice?
How certain is it that these circadian clock  effects are the same in humans?
What gene needs to be deleted to cause obesity in mice?
Where else beside the SCN cells are independent circadian rhythms also found?
What is the term for the independent clocks?
What is the SCN considered to be in comparison to the peripheral oscillators?
In what body gland are the peripheral oscillators located?
To what do oscillators in the skin respond?
Who is the world's oldest reigning monarch?
Than which queen has Elizabeth ruled longer?
How is Victoria related to Elizabeth?
In what year did Elizabeth pass Victoria's length of rule?
In the history of what is Elizabeth the longest reigning queen?
Who did England propose to affiliate with Wales to quell Welsh nationalism?
Why did Britain not want Elizabeth to associate with conscientious objectors?
What did Elizabeth join in 1946?
Who was the always the Prince of Wales?
Who wanted to name Elizabeth Princess of Wales?
When were Elizabeth and Philip married?
At what famous cathedral was Elizabeth married?
How many wedding gifts did Elizabeth and Philip receive?
Who designed Elizabeth's wedding gown?
What former King was not invited to the wedding?
Aside from her choice of Eden's successor, what crisis caused Elizabeth to be criticized?
What did Lord Altrincham accuse Elizabeth of being?
When did Macmillan resign?
Who did Elizabeth appoint as Prime Minister after the resignation of Macmillan?
When was a formal mechanism for electing the Minister adopted?
During the Australian constitutional crisis, what Prime Minister was dismissed?
Who dismissed Whilam from the post of Australian Prime Minister?
Who appealed to Elizabeth to reverse the dismissal of Whitlam?
What did Whitlam have in the House of Representatives?
What did Elizabeth decline to do in response to the appeal by Scholes?
What did Elizabeth celebrate in 2002?
When did Elizabeth's mother die in 2002?
What relative of Elizabeth died in February of 2002?
How many people in London attended each day of the the three day event? 
What group was surprised by the public's approval of the Queen?
When did Elizabeth open the Summer Olympics in Montreal?
When did Queen Elizabeth open the Summer Olympics in London?
For what event did Elizabeth appear in a film as part of the opening ceremonies?
What actor also appeared with Elizabeth in the film?
For what activity related to the film industry did Elizabeth receive a BAFTA award?
When was Elizabeth's coronation?
When was Elizabeth's Diamond Jubilee?
How old was Elizabeth's father at the time of his death?
How did Prince Philip's uncle, Lord Mounbatten, die?
In what year did Elizabeth's  son's ex-wife die?
When was the coronation of Elizabeth as Queen?
How was much of the ceremony of Elizabeth's coronation presented to the public?
What Commonwealth symbols were embroidered on Elizabeth's gown?
What is the emblem of England?
What people have a thistle for their Commonwealth emblem?
When did Elizabeth address the UN General Assembly?
What parliamentary session did Elizabeth open in 1957 while on tour? 
On a tour to Ghana in 1961 what did Elizabeth dismiss as a fear?
In 1964 what was reported that Quebec extremists planned ?
As what was Elizabeth portrayed in the 1950s?
Of what did Lord Altrincham say Elizabeth's speeches resembled?
What investiture featuring Prince Charles was televised in the late 1960s?
In the 1960s, what did Elizabeth begin wearing to events ?
What was the time after WWII heralded as?
Who was Elizabeth only sibling?P
When was Princess Margaret born?
Who was Marion Crawford to the princesses?
What was the title of the book written by Crawford about the princesses?
Where were the royal princesses educated?
At what age was Elizabeth when she went on her first solo public appearance?
Where did Elizabeth visit on her first solo public appearance?
In case of her father's absence, in what capacity could Elizabeth act? 
When did Elizabeth join the Women's Auxiliary Territorial Service?
In what capacity did Elizabeth serve in the Auxiliary?
Where did Philip serve during WWII?
What did Crawford report that some of the King's advisers thought of Philip?
To whom did Philip's sisters marry?
What did Elizabeth's mother call Philip?
What did Elizabeth's mother later say that Philip was?
What was the state of George VI's health during 1951?
On what date did Elizabeth's father, King George VI, die?
In what country was Elizabeth when George VI died?
When did the prime ministers of Britain and France discuss the idea of France joining the Commonwealth?
What did France sign instead of joining the Commonwealth?
To what was the European Economic Community the precurser?
When did Britain and France invade Egypt?
What did the Treaty of Rome establish?
When did the decolonization of Africa and the Caribbean accelerate?
How many countries got independence from Britain during decolonization?
When did Britain join the European Community?
What did the Rhodesian president declare in 1965?
In spite of sanctions by the international community, how long did the Ian Smith's regime last?
During what ceremony were shots fired at the Queen?
Who was the assailant who shot at Queen Elizabeth? 
Which of Elizabeth's sons served in the Falklands War?
Who was the intruder Elizabeth awoke to find in her bedroom?
What island's invasion angered Elizabeth?
What political feeling is still a minority view in Britain?
What state of affairs produced revelations and problems for Elizabeth?
In spite of criticisms what kind of approval ratings did Elizabeth have?
What institution was being criticized during the time of Charles and Diana's breakup?
When did Elizabeth write to tell Charles and Diana to get a divorce?
Until she became queen, what flower was on Elizabeth's coat of arms?
When did Elizabeth acquire her father's arms?
Besides personal flags,what other types of flags does Elizabeth have?
What type of flags are used in foreign countries?
When did Elizabeth start to bear a coat of royal arms?
In what city was Elizabeth born?
At the time of her birth, what was the rank of Elizabeth's parents?
What were Elizabeth's parents' titles after ascending to the throne?
How many children did Elizabeth's parents have?
What event caused Elizabeth's father to become King?
When she was born, where in the order of succession was Elizabeth?
Before Elizabeth's father who was next in line for the throne?
When did Elizabeth's grandfather die?
What event caused Edward to abdicate the throne?
What did Edward's proposed marriage to Simpson cause?
What name was it assumed Elizabeth would take upon her marriage to Philip?
What Prime Minister objected to the name change?
What name did Elizabeth keep as her married name?
What name was adopted for Elizabeth's male-line descendants who do not have royal titles? 
When did Elizabeth decree the use of Mountbatten-Windsor as the  surname? 
Who did Eden recommend that Elizabeth consult about appointing a new  Prime Minister?
What position did Lord Salisbury have in the government?
Who did Elizabeth appoint as Prime Minister?
What position did Lord Kilmuir have ?
Who in turn did Salisbury and Kilmuir consult?
When did Edward Heath ask Elizabeth to call a general election?
Where was Elizabeth when Heath advised that sh call for an election?
What did Elizabeth do after Heath adviser her?
What did Heath do after his party could not form a coalition with the Labor party?
Who did Elizabeth ask to form a government?
How many years has Elizabeth been Queen?
What celebration marks 60 years for Elizabeth as Queen?
What year marks Elizabeth's Diamond Jubilee?
Where did Elizabeth tour as a celebration of her jubilee?
When was the last time that a sovereign attended a peacetime cabinet meeting? 
What governmental style of monarch is Elizabeth?
How often does Elizabeth give interviews?
What type of political religious beliefs does Elizabeth seemed to support?
What is Elizabeth's ranking in the Church of England?
Apart from her membership in the Church of England, to what other church does she belong?
During whose reign was Elizabeth born?
What was Elizabeth's fathers title at the time of her birth?
What title and name did Elizabeth's father take upon becoming king?
Which Bishop of York baptized Elizabeth? 
What was Elizabeth's nickname when she was young?
When did Britain enter WWII?
Who recommended that the two princesses be evacuated to Canada?
Who rejected the idea of sending the princesses away?
Where did the two princesses live for most of the war?
When did Elizabeth make her first radio broadcast?
What entity did the British Empire slowly become during Elizabeth's reign?
In what year did Elizabeth become Queen?
What tour did Elizabeth take in 1953?
How many nations did Elizabeth visit on tour in 1953?
How many miles did Elizabeth cover on her world tour?
About whom was Elizabeth worried in the 1970s?
What was the subject under consideration in discussions in 1980?
What did patriation of the Canadian Constitution remove from the constitution?
What was retained in the constitution?
What did Trudeau say Elizabeth favored?
Who, in 2007, frustrated Elizabeth?
What issue of Blair's did Elizabeth admire?
When did Elizabeth attend a service at Armagm, in Ireland?
What service did Elizabeth attend in Armagm?
Who did Elizabeth surpass in longest lived British monarch?
What relation was Victoria to Elizabeth?
When did Elizabeth become the longest reigning monarch?
In age of monarchs, what is the rank of Elizabeth's reign?
What head of stat has served longer than Elizabeth?
When was Elizabeth's Silver Jubilee?
What increased in the 1980s?
What was the main subject of public criticism in the 80's?
What attribute of Elizabeth fell to  low in the 1990s?
What did Elizabeth start paying in the 1990 s?
What feature do Elizabeth's titles usually follow in each country?
What are the Channel Islands and the Isle of Mann?
What si Elizabeth's title in the Channel Islands?
What is Elizabeth's title on the Isle of Mann?
Once in conversation with the Queen, how is Elizabeth addressed?
What three factors do scientists believe are the cause of sexual orientation?
What is the favored influence as to the cause of sexual orientation?
IS there evidence that parenting and/or childhood play a role in determining sexual orientation?
Do scientists know the cause of sexual orientation?
What three factors do scientists believe are the cause of sexual orientation?
Do scientists believe that parenting and/or childhood play a role in sexual orientation?
Has science research figured out the cause of sexual orientation preferences?
What type of theories are favored by scientists studying sexual orientation?
Do scientist's know what can cause somebodys sexual orientation?
What can scientifically be considered the main factors in somebodys sexual orientation?
What cannot be considered a factor in sexual orientation due to the lack of evidence?
Which ideas do scientist lean towards causing sexual orientation?
What is sexual identity defined as?
What is sexual behavior defined as?
What does the term closeted mean?
What are the terms related to the degree to which a person's sexual attractions, behavior and identity match?
What is sexual orientation defined as?
What are the differences in sexual identity and sexual behaviour? 
Does a person have to show their sexual oreintation in their personal acts?
What is a term that can be used for someone who does not show their homosexuality openly? 
What word is used when somebodys sexual orientation, behaviors, and idenity do not match?
Which word is used when somebodys sexual orientation, behaviors, and idenity match?
What is one reason that a homosexual would engage in heterosexual behavior?
What is one reason that a homosexual would engage in heterosexual behavior?
What is one reason that a homosexual would engage in heterosexual behavior?
What is a possible scenario that can occur when a closeted homosexual is in a heterosexual relationship?
What is a possible scenario that can occur when a closeted homosexual is in a heterosexual relationship?
What are some things that can cause a homosexual person to be with the opposite sex?
Can a homosexual person still grow their sexual identiries while with the opposit sex? 
What kind of hardships can a homosexual face when admitting their ssexuality while in a heterosexual marriage?
Can a homosexual person hide their true idenitys?
How does the mental health profession approach efforts to change sexual orientation?
What do these policy statements suggest? 
What are some of the organizations that have released policy statements?
Are their any mental health proffesionals that have programs to change sexual orientation?
What policy statement has almost all proffesionals applied to their practices?
What are some professional associations that do not offer changing sexual orientation programs?
Who was the sexologist that published a scheme in 1896?
What did the published scheme attempt to do?
How did the scheme measure desire?
What were the two scales defined as?
How many points were on each scale?
When did the questioning of human sexual responses begin?
Who created the ten point scale on a persons sexuals desire?
What year did Magnus Hirschfeld create the ten point scale on a persons sexual desire. 
On Magnus's ten point scale what would a homosexual person be considered?
On the ten point scale what would an asexual person be considered as?
What was a concern of the Kinsey scale?
How are masculinity and femininity more appropriately measured?
What happens if the concepts are measured on the same scale?
What is the advantage of measuring these elements separately?
What is considered to be a problem with the Kinsey scale?
What did the research performed in the 1970s show about masculinity and feminity?
What would be possible if homesexuality and heterosexuality where measured on different scales?
What is another benefit of measuring sexuality on two scaless verses just the Kinsey scale?
How does research identify sexual population groups?
What is the understanding of the scales used?
Why might the scales fail?
How many components are used in assessment?
What does the research on sexual orientation use to determine who belongs in which sexual populaiton group?
What is the general idea regading these scales that are used?
What can cause problems with these scales that are used?
How many components are used in an assessment?
What myth did Bruce Voeller perpetuate in the 70's?
What were the calculations of this myth?
What message did Voeller deliver using this myth?
What comes along with defining how much of the population is homosexual?
What does knowing the sexual population influence?
Who was the cahir of the national gay and lesbian task force in the 1970s?
What myth did Bruce Voeller preserve in the 1970s?
Do men and women's patterns of arousal differ?
Are the patterns related to orientation?
What types of stimuli were found to arouse women?
What stimuli did men show no arousal towards?
Men's arousal patterns were found to be with?
What did a study on men and womens sexual arousal show?
Did women in the studys become aroused to heterosexual stimulation?
Did men have any arousal from non human videos containing sex?
What science terms are used to describe sexual attraction?
These terms are an alternative to what conceptualization?
What are these terms not attributing to the subject/person being described?
What are other terms that do not make similar assignments?
What are other terms used in the same vein as pansexual?
Which terms are used in describing sexual desires?
What are two other words for androphilia and gynephlia?
What are the terms androphilia and gynephial use for?
Early writers linked orientation to what concept?
What theorists agreed with this concept?
What two things became to be seen as distinct from one another?
What negative stereotypes have emerged from this understanding?
What did a majority of gay men and women experience in their childhood?
What did gender idenity become to be seen as?
What can be considered to be bad stereotypes to gay communities?
Who performed the studies that found most homosexual people having different degrees of gender issues?
What was thought of early lesbians and gay men?
Can a persons sexual interest change over different times in their life?
Until 1995 what had no studies done concerning sexual orientation?
What can possibly predict the future orientation a persons sexual idenity?
What do some lesbian woman see as important part of the sexual orientation?
When did part of the world health organization release a statement about curing homosexuals?
Why did the Pan American Health Organization release this statement?
What condition do they state cannot be linked to homosexuality?
What did the Pan American Health Organization reccomend for those who used treatment to stop homosexuality?
What does the Kinsey scale provide a classification for?
How does the classifiacation scheme work on the Kinsey scale?
What is the position on the Kinsey scale based on?
What positions does the KInsey scale not use?
What does SASO stand for?
Why was SASO created?
What did SASO find wrong with the KInsey scale and Klein Sexual Orientation Grid?
What is one of SASO's main goals?
How are the three component used to determine sexual orientation?
When did Savin WIlliams talk about the issues with these components?
What issues to Savin address during this talk?
Why does basing sexual orientation on one component cause problems?
What have scientists started spending the most time on?
How do scientiest measure brain activity?
How did both gay and straight men react to pictures of both naked men and women?
What was the only difference in the study between gay and straight men?
What can affect how a person is treated?
What percent of hate crimes did the FBI relate to sexual orientation bias?
When was the UK emloyment eequality (sexual orientation) regulations law take effect?
Under this law what does this state that is required by employers?
What do the majority of defintions surronding sexual orientation include?
What does a behaviorial component focus on when defining sexual orientation?
What do other people use to determine a persons sexual idenity?
When do scientists and professions agree that sexual orientation shows in a person?
What idea did Sigmund Freud bring to the table?
What does Sigmunds idea theorize?
Why did SIgmund believe all humans are born bisexual?
What does Sigmund believe we all as adults desire?
Even though Sigmund believed all people where born bisexual what did he not believe to be true?
Whar words may people use for sexual idenity?
What does the American Pyschological Association say sexual orientation refers to?
What terms does behavorial science use instead of using gender binary conceptualization?
What is androphilia used to describe?
What is gynephilia used to describe?
What does NARTH stand for?
What does NARTH consider itself to be?
What does NARTH disagree with?
What does NARTH state is wrong with the mainstream mental healths stand on conversion therapy?
What concerns did both the American Psychological Association and the Royal College of PSychiatrist have with NARTH?
What do the terms andophilia and gynephilia help prevent?
Why does psychiatrist Anil Aggrawal say androphilia and gynephilia are needed terms?
What can attempting to label members of the LGBT community cause?
What does MIlton Diamond say about the terms heterosexual, homosexual, and bisexual?
What advantages do the terms androphilia and gynephilia have?
What has the KInsey scaled been praised for?
What has the Kinsey scale been critisized for?
How many categories are used in the KInsey scale?
In a study by Masters and Johnson what did the find difficult about KIneys ratings?
What in somebodys past caused problems for the Kinsey scale?
How many questions does the SASO contain?
What do six of the questions asses?
What do the other six questions asses?
What questions corresponds to the homosexual ones?
What can the scales for sexual orientation be used for?
What will cause the amount of homosexuality to vary?
Out of sexual attraction, sexual behovior, and sexual identity which will show more accurately the amount of homosexuals in a population?
Which chromosome is responsible for produlcing male differentiation on defect female development?
What is the differentiation process driven by?
What results in sexual differences in males and females?
What have scientist began to test due to the fact that adrogen results in sexual differences?
Who created on of the earliest sexual classification schemes?
When did Karl Heinrich Ulrichs develop this classification scheme?
Was his classification scheme meant for males or females?
What three categories are used in Ulrichs scheme?
What did these three categories correspond with?
What did both Weinrich and Weinberg critisize the KInsey scale for?
What caused valuable information to be lost while using the KInsey scale?
Why was collapsing the two values into one score a problem?
How could Kinsey have avoided losing this crucial information?
Besides behavior and reactions what else could have been used in the KInsey scale?
What questions did Sell consider the most important on the KInsey scale?
Why did Sell consider the questions regarding sexual attraction the most important?
Rather than define sexual orientation as sexual idenity or behavior what did Sell define it as?
What reflects the prevalence rates varying?
What does it mean when someones sexualiity is fluid?
What did Diamond find about the women?
What did women acknowledge who considered themselves as lesbian or bisexual?
What makes it difficult to determine if someone is homosexual or not?
Why do researches in homosexual studies argued that it is a social and historical constuction?
Which philosopher argued homosexuality did not exist as an idenity in the eighteenth century?
In what year did Michel Foucalt publish The History Of Sexuality?
What did he state was an invention of the modern state?
What was a crime in the eighteenth century that could cause severe punishment but was mostly ignored?
What do some researchers argue about the idea of sexual orientation?
What have studies found about women and their believed sexual orientations?
What did the studies reveal about men and their declared sexual preference?
What does research show about sexual orientation?
What can being openly gay be hindered by?
What group of the LGBT community are the most researched?
What social systems can greatly influence someone realization of their sexual preference?
What does the american culture put a large emphasis on?
What is a common way to determine a persons sexuality?
When deteerming sexual preference this way what is the passive role associated with?
When determining sexual preference this way what is the active role associated with?
How much is known about lesbians and bisexual women in these cultures?
What do researchers generally believe causes sexual orientation?
What biological factors do they believe plays a complicated part in sexual orientation?
What do they believe about sexual orientation?
What differences hace scientist found in certain studies?
What can these results be caused from?
What concept is sexual orientation argued as?
What is causing contreversy as to the concept of sexual orientation?
What is the notion of sexual orientation in west defined as?
What does Bruce criticize the labels heterosexual and homsexual as?
What does Bruce Bagemilh write about the labels homosexual and heterosexual terms?
What can impact accurately assesing sexual identity?
What does the Centre For Addiction and Mental heal along with the American Psychiatric association state about sexual orientation?
What does the FBO effect stand for?
What does this theory entail?
What does research show about the FBO effect?
What does MIH stand for?
What does BBB stand for?
What other name does the KInsey scale go by?
When was the KInsey scale first published?
Why was the KInsey scale developed?
What did KInsey state as his reasoning for the scale?
Who else was featured in The sexual behavior of the human male?
What does KSOG stand for?
Who invented the KSOG?
Why did pritz klein come up with the KSOG?
What kind of scale does the KSOG use?
What are sexual attraction. behavior, and idenity components of?
What do individuals typically experience?
What is there little coherent relationships between?
Who wrote the paper "Whos Gay? Does It Matter?
What does RItch SAvin-Williams propose in this paper?
What did he propose to measure attraction?
What else does Savin-Williams suggest?
What components does he believe shoud be used in studies?
What do these studies suggest?
How is this reflected in the studies?
What are some dimensions of sexual orientation?
What do mens sexual orientations tend be focused on?
What do researches believe must be taken into account for women in these studies?
What can make a person believe they know someone elses sexual orientation?
What is a term for someone who tries to determine someones sexuality?
What have somes studies show when researching how someone uses "gaydar"?
What did research in 2015 suggest was an alternate label for gaydar?
What is part of the reason for the varying estimates of the bisexual population?
What is one way a study can view bisexuality?
What is another way studies can view bisexuality?
What do historians and researches argue about concerning the emotional and affectionate activities?
What can be assumed in english speaking nations when two men kiss?
What do some cultures have formal ceremonies for?
What sales model did Dell use for a long time?
Who were the main driving force behind PC sales?
Where were consumers going to buy devices other than online?
What market presence did Dell lack?
What was one city that Dell tested retail stores in?
What industry was getting smaller?
When did Dell fall behind Lenovo?
What other American company fell behind Lenovo with Dell?
What PC was taking corporate customers from Dell?
What company was Dell behind in profits in 2012?
What type of Dell media has appeared on TV, on the internet, and in magazines?
One of Dell's marketing strategies is what kind of shipping?
What year did Dell cut its prices to keep its market share?
By how much did Dell cut it's margins when it cut its prices?
Where does Dell take most of its purchases for its products?
What department did Dell launch an internal investigation on?
What was the minimum amount of earnings that would be restated by Dell's investigation?
What year did Dell's internal investigation begin?
Who did Dell agree to not buy processors from?
How much did Dell pay in fines to settle fraud charges against it?
What decade did Dell begin to sell things other than PCs?
IBM, Hewlett Packard, and Compaq were the major providers of what?
What servers did Dell create that they tried to break into the market with?
What year did Dell's enterprise revenue make up a large chunk of its profit?
Which company did Dell exceed as a server provider?
What market made up the majority of Dell's sales?
What advantage did Dell hold in the PC market?
What operation did Hewlett Packard and Acer make more efficient to compete with Dell?
Where did Dell miss out on sales due to relying on the internet?
What company stated that Dell was preventing itself from innovating?
What hedge fund group was pressuring EMC into restructuring?
How much has Dell's value increased since they went private?
What news source published revenue estimations between Dell and EMC?
What year did Dell go private?
In what foreign country did Dell open plants in 1995?
What percentage of Dell notebooks are assembled in their asian plants?
How much did Dell spend to construct a new plant in India?
How many PCs was Dell's Indian plant slated to make in 2007?
Who is the founder of Dell?
How many board members does Dell have?
How many committees are appointed by the board of directors at Dell?
Which Dell committee handles accounting issues?
Which Dell committee keeps the company from violating antitrust laws?
What decade did Dell sell electronics through big box stores?
what year did Dell stop selling products through physical retailers?
What store did Dell sell electronics at in 2003?
What year did Dell begin selling products at retailers again?
Who is the largest electronics retailer in the US? 
What was Dell the first IT company to establish?
What year did Dell enact its global consumer recycling program?
How much electronics did Dell recycle by 2009?
What year was 78 million pounds of Dell equipment recycled?
What percentage of Dell electronics from the previous seven years were recycled?
What decade did Dell switch to PSUs and boards that had differently wired connectors?
With what kind of parts were consumers able to upgrade their Dell systems with?
What year did Dell revert its power connectors to industry standard ones?
What part of their motherboards does Dell not reveal the specifications of?
When did Michael Dell found his company?
How much did Dell receive as capital from his family?
What school did Dell go to and later drop out of while he ran his business?
What year did Dell design its own computer?
How much did Dell profit in its first year?
What did Dell enjoy from 1997 to 2004?
What company did Dell overtake as the largest PC manufacturer?
How much were Dell profiting in 2002?
What company did Compaq merge with in 2002?
What company was the fastest growing in the early 2000s?
What was the name of Dell's change campaign?
Who relinquished his position as CEO to take a seat on the board?
Michael Dell removed employee bonuses from what year with his new incentive?
Who replaced Jim Schneider as Dell CFO?
How much of Dell's revenue was its PC division?
Who was Dell's main business rival?
How much did Dell spend on acquiring different divisions?
What happened to Dell's revenue and share price in the post-PC market?
What city is Dell's Texas facility in?
What year was Dell's Tennessee facility opened?
What state was the Dell plant that received $280 million in incentives in?
What continent did a lot of work from Dell's plants get transferred to?
What subsidiary of Dell remains operating in Florida?
What year did Dell come under fire from the Taiwanese Consumer Protection Commission?
What percent lower was Dell selling its notebooks in Taiwan?
What did dell sell for $19 in Taiwan?
How much did Taiwan fine Dell for its practices?
What year did Dell plan to sell PCs at retailers?
What was one retailer that were going to sell Dell PCs?
Who convinced Michael Dell to not use retailers to sell PCs?
What position at Dell did Kevin Rollins eventually attain?
What year did Michael Dell bring in Lee Walker to the company?
What did Lee Walker recruit members to Dell for?
What year did Walker retire?
What was Morton Meyerson's position at his former company?
What country's PC market was Dell reliant on?
What percentage of Dell's profits were desktop PCs being sold to commercial and corporate buyers?
What year were Dell's PC profits shrinking?
What operating system was slated to be the next system upgrade for corporate clients?
Which division of Dell were unsuccessful in developing mobile devices?
The release of what electronic had a negative impact on Dell?
What Dell product was a commercial failure?
What line of high end electronics did Dell create that failed to compete with Apple products?
What year did Dell see its first decline in holiday sales?
What did Dell have a poor reputation for?
Where did Dell move its call centers?
Which Dell employee was moved from head of manufacturing to head of customer service?
How much had Dell spent by 2006 on improving customer service?
What was the value of Dell's buyout deal?
What year did Dell announce its buyout deal?
What was the value of the loan that Dell received from Microsoft?
What was the value of the second largest technology buyout?
How much space did Dell lease in Texas?
How many senior executives were slated to work in the building Dell leased?
What year did Dell announce its plans to sublease its building?
Where did Dell move its headquarters back to in 2003?
What was the total amount of space that Dell leased in Las Cimas 1 and 2?
What Texas city was Dell's headquarters previously in?
How many employees worked at Dell's Texas headquarters?
What year did Dell announce that it was moving most of its employees out of Texas?
Where was the board room located at Dells Arboretum building?
How many customer support employees did Dell move to Round Rock in 1994?
What kind of hardware support does Dell provide?
What kind of customers does Dell provide support to for major outages?
What kind of support does Dell provide using a computer's service-tag?
What is the alternate name for the Dell Solution Station?
What Dell service offers certified technicians to tackle commercial technical support?
What Dell service offers remote desktop management?
What is the name of the Dell service that gives home-users a support queue?
What year did Dell lose its tech lead to Hewlett-Packard?
What was HP's growth during the third quarter of 2006?
What was the rate of decline that Dell experienced in PC shipments?
What was Dell's market share at the end of 2006?
What does Dell aim to reduce by creating energy efficient products?
How much does energy efficiency save Dell per year?
What is the largest contributor to Dell's energy efficiency savings?
How many PCs does Dell employ energy management software on?
What process begins after a death sentence is handed down at trial?
In a direct review, what type of court looks at the record?
How many possible outcomes are there of a capital sentencing direct review?
In a direct review, what court has its record reviewed by the appellate court?
What percentage of convictions survive direct review?
Who was executed by firing squad on January 17, 1977?
In what state was Gary Gilmore executed?
On what date was John Spenkelink executed?
In what state did Jesse Bishop's execution occur?
How was Charles Brooks, Jr. executed?
What was a common nickname for the electric chair?
What color was Alabama's electric chair?
What state notably had electric chair malfunctions?
Due to electric chair malfunctions, what method of execution became preferred?
Prior to the popularity of lethal injection, what was the preferred method of executing criminals in America?
What state has had only a single execution?
When was the last person executed in the District of Columbia?
When did Oregon reinstate the death penalty?
In what year did an Oregon referendum succeed in restoring the death penalty, only to be shot down due to a court ruling?
What state notably abolished the death penalty and then reintroduced it, but didn't use it again?
In the United States, how many murders are there for each execution?
How many murder convictions occur in the US per execution?
How many states in the US have the death penalty?
What state has the highest rate of death sentences per person?
What does Alabama law allow judges to do that isn't allowed in other states?
What territory's constitution says "The death penalty shall not exist"?
What US state prohibits the death penalty in its constitution?
How many US states have passed laws outlawing the death penalty?
Under what jurisdiction can capital offenses still be committed in Puerto Rico?
In what year was the death penalty suspended in the US?
What Supreme Court case resulted in capital punishment being suspended?
Who was executed on June 2, 1967?
What amendment to the United States Constitution forbids cruel and unusual punishment?
In what year was the suspension of the death penalty in the United States ended?
How many executions occurred in 1999?
What was the number of people executed in 2015?
In what year did the reauthorization of capital punishment occur?
How many people have been executed in the United States since 1976?
Which state has the largest number of people awaiting execution?
In November 2008, who was on death penalty without a murder conviction?
Who did Demarcus Sears kidnap?
In what state was Gloria Ann Wilbur murdered?
In what year was Demarcus Sears convicted of kidnapping?
A jury in what state sentenced Demarcus Sears to death?
When a prisoner is given a death sentence in a state, what is the first step of collateral review?
About what percentage of capital convictions are overturned due to state collateral review?
In 2010, how many death sentences were overturned due to reversals from courts or appeals?
What is an example of an issue that is raised in collateral review?
In what case did the Supreme Court allow Section 1983 to be used to challenge a method of execution?
In what year was Hill v. McDonough decided?
What amendment of the Constitution does cruel and unusual punishment violate?
What case notably upheld the use of a method of lethal injection?
Along with Section 1983, through what means can a convict on death row challenge his execution?
How many people were killed in the largest mass execution in US history?
On what date did the largest mass execution in American history take place?
In what state did the largest American mass execution occur?
What was the ethnicity of the people executed in the second-largest mass execution in US history?
In what year did the Admiralty Court hang 26 pirates in Newport, Rhode Island?
What act restricted the scope of federal habeas corpus?
How may state prisoners seek to have a death sentence overturned in federal court?
In what courts can federal habeas corpus suits be brought?
If prisoners use federal habeas corpus to present evidence that they're innocent, what must the evidence be?
Along with New Jersey, what state commuted all life sentences when bills to repeal the death penalty were passed?
The governor of what state commuted four death sentences in January 2015?
Who was governor of Maryland in January 2015?
In what state's supreme court was State v. Santiago decided?
How many people had their sentences commuted by State v. Santiago?
In what court was Bigby v. Dretke decided?
What court heard the case Penry v. Lynaugh?
What amendment to the Constitution did Penry v. Lynaugh address?
What sentencing factors did Bigby v. Dretke consider?
In what year was Tony Chebatoris killed?
When was Michigan's fourth Constitution ratified?
In what city was Tony Chebatoris executed?
In what year was there a failed Michigan constitutional amendment to allow the death penalty?
What article of the fourth Michigan Constitution forbids laws allowing capital punishment?
Under what federal statute are offenses punished by lethal injection?
According to what law are federal prisoners executed according to the procedures in place in the state in which they were convicted?
In what month and year was Juan Garza executed?
Who was executed by the federal government on March 18, 2003?
In what state is the Federal Correctional Complex in Terre Haute?
In what year did the American Law Institute create a death penalty framework for the Model Penal Code?
In what year did the American Law Institute change their mind about their contribution on the death penalty to the Model Penal Code?
What goal did the ALI's study say could not be reconciled with the goal of individualized execution decisions?
In what year was Coker v. Georgia decided?
For what offense did Coker v. Georgia forbid the death penalty?
Along with Georgia, what American jurisdiction allowed people to be executed for the rape of an adult prior to Coker?
What ruling forbid the government from executing child rapists?
Prior to Kennedy v. Louisiana, how many states criminalized child rape?
In what year was Nebraska's death penalty statute ruled unconstitutional by a state court?
What state's court ruled capital punishment unconstitutional in 1984?
In what case did the Kansas Supreme Court rule that the death penalty is unconstitutional in Kansas?
What method of execution did the Nebraska Supreme Court rule unconstitutional?
After electrocution was outlawed, how were Nebraska death row inmates executed?
What death penalty drug ceased to be manufactured in 2011?
Up until 2011, who manufactured sodium thiopental?
What is the nationality of the company that makes pentobarbital?
Along with anti-death penalty advocacy, why has there been a shortage in drugs for lethal injections in the United States?
The EU outlawed the export of products that could be used in what activity?
In what year did the most polled American support capital punishment?
What percentage of polled Americans opposed the death penalty in 1966?
In a 1977 poll, what percentage of respondents preferred life imprisonment to the death penalty?
In a 2006 poll, what percentage of polled Americans preferred the death penalty to life without parole?
What is a notable capital crime in Louisiana?
In what state is extortionate kidnapping a capital offense?
Along with Alabama, where is hijacking an aircraft a death penalty offense?
In what state is armed robbery a capital crime?
In what states is perjury leading to death a capital offense?
Along with Marshall, who believed that the Eighth Amendment forbade the death penalty?
Along with Stewart, what Supreme Court justice was concerned about racial disparity in death penalty enforcement?
Aside from Stewart, what justice believed that the death penalty could be constitutional?
Between 1973 and 2015, how amny prisoners were acquitted or received pardons or commutations of their death sentences due to possible innocence?
What percentage of murderers in the United States are given a death sentence?
How many murderers in Nevada were given a capital sentence?
What state notably executes 40% of those given the death penalty?
How much higher is the rate of execution in Texas versus the national average?
What percentage of murderers in California are given the death penalty and subsequently executed?
Under the Drug Kingpin Act of 1988 and Federal Death Penalty Act of 1994, about how many crimes were punishable by death?
What body passed the Drug Kingpin Act of 1988?
What is another term for the act of spying for another country?
Along with treason and espionage, what non-death offense is still a federal capital crime?
Who was executed on January 17, 1977?
By what method was Gary Gilmore executed?
Aside from Gary Gilmore, how many people were executed in the United States between January 17, 1977 and 1984?
What tactic did inmates on death row use to delay their executions?
In what month and year was Troy Davis executed?
Who was the Death Penalty Information Center director?
What organization did Brian Evans work for?
How many execution methods are currently used in the United States?
What was the most common historical method of execution in the United States?
In what state did the last burning at the stake take place in the US?
Who was the last person hanged in chains in the Untied States?
When was execution by beheading ended in Utah?
What percentage of American death row prisoners are African American?
What percentage of people executed in the United States since 1976 have been African American?
What percentage of American prison inmates are African American?
What percentage of homicides were committed by Asians between 1980 and 2008?
What percentage of the American population is Hispanic?
On what date was Fred Adams hanged?
Where was Bethea hanged?
What was Roscoe Jackson's nickname?
In what state did the hanging of Adams take place?
How many people witnessed Timothy McVeigh's execution?
What institution does James Liebman work for?
What does James Liebman teach?
According to Liebman, about what percentage of death penalty habeas corpus petitions were successful between 1978 and 1995?
According to Tabak, what percentage of habeas corpus petitions were granted to death row inmates between 1976 and 1991?
In what year did Liebman announce his findings?
Who was executed on March 30, 1960?
What method of execution was used on James W. Rodgers?
In what state was Rodgers executed?
On what date was George York executed?
Which state executed James French?
About how many American juveniles have been executed since 1642?
In what year was Thomas Graunger executed?
Since 1976, how many Americans have been executed for crimes committed as juveniles?
How old was George Stinney when he was executed?
What method was used to execute Leonard Shockley?
What state employed Robert Patton in May 2014?
As of May 2014, what was Robert Patton's job title?
What race was Clayton Lockett?
What gas did Oklahoma decide to use for executions in 2015?
What was Clayton Lockett's cause of death?
Along with gender, geography and race, what bias do some opponents of the death penalty see in its administration?
According to opponents of the death penalty, what does the death penalty cheapen?
According to death penalty opponents, on whose moral level does execution place the government?
What do death penalty opponents argue that capital punishment isn't effective at doing?
Who do death penalty opponents believe may sometimes be executed?
Along with South Dakota, what state rejected a death penalty abolition bill in 2010?
Who did Idaho execute in 2011?
Who was executed on October 30, 2012?
Since 1976, how many prisoners has Nevada executed?
Since 1976, in what year was a prisoner executed in Wyoming?
How many drugs are used to administer lethal injection?
What lethal injection drug is manufactured by Hospira?
When did Hospira cease to manufacture its lethal injection drug for the United States?
In what country does Hospira manufacture sodium thiopental today?
What EU law forbids products used in torture to be manufactured in the European Union?
Who attached a Game & Watch D-pad to the Famicom prototype?
What was installed on the front of the console so the joystick could be used?
Why were the controllers hard-wired to the console with no connectors?
Where were the game pad controllers copied from?
In June 1989 who was Nintendo of America's vice president of marketing?
In 1990, what percentage of American households owned an NES?
What was the slogan for the Nintendo brand?
What outsold the NES in Europe and South America?
Where was Nintendo not available?
Which cartridges were shaped slightly differently?
Which interface did the NES use?
Which interface did Famicom use?
Various companies in Japan did what to their games for certain specifics?
With the NES at its end, which competing consoles with less strict licensing terms were supported?
Who was an example of a 3rd party publisher?
Nintendo relied primarily on what for its support?
Rivals in what self-identified era enjoyed much stronger 3rd party support?
Which company distributed the NES to the UK, Italy, and Australia?
When did Nintendo take over European distribution?
Which three countries share the PAL A region?
What two versions of the NES were released in the UK, Italy, and Australia?
What were the two turbo controllers Nintendo made for the NES?
What did the Turbo feature allow players to do?
Which controller had a non-adjustable Turbo feature?
Which two accessories were featured in the movie The Wizard?
The NES Max also did not feature what?
What year did Nintendo release the Famicom Disk System?
Where could the disks for the game be obtained?
How were the disks purchased?
What were the storage disks used for?
What was the total capacity of a disk?
When was the system originally supposed to be released?
Retailers in what test area reported a miserable failure of sales?
When was the second time Nintendo test marketed the NES?
When was the nationwide release of the NES?
Where was the system released to two separate marketing areas?
One region comprised the entirety of mainland Europe save for which country?
Who released cartridges in mainland Europe?
Who handled distribution in the other region?
When did the European brance finally directly distribute throughout Europe?
Who did Atari attempt to force ceasing production of games for its system?
Nintendo actively encouraged  the involvement of what?
Nintendo's measures for third party game developers were also adopted by which later manufacturers?
Companies did what in an effort to circumvent Nintendo's console authentication?
Why did the companies circumvent the authentication system?
Where did unlicensed games feature a dongle?
What did Nintendo do to curb unlicensed game sales?
What was the console's most common problem?
The 10NES would reset the system how often?
What disrupted the communication as well?
What was one example of what users did to combat the blinking problem?
When did Nintendo release a cleaning kit?
How many units of the Famicom were sold in Japan by the beginning of 1985?
What was this system to be called in North America?
What magazine stated that Nintendo could be errant in their anticipated product success?
Which console featured a top-loading design?
The design of what was modified slightly?
the original design of the controller was what shape?
What was the new design shape of the controller?
How long were standard NES controller cables?
What year did Nintendo's market surpass all computer software?
Who reported that Nintendo sold 7 million NES systems?
When did Compute! report the number of systems sold at 7 million?
The 7 million sold almost equated to which console's five year span?
Nintendo charged producers hefty sums to make what?
What did companies do instead of making FDS games?
Many FDS disks lack what?
What broke frequently and needed replacement in the machine?
How long did Nintendo service drives and offer replacement disks?
The Zelda games were manufactured in what color cartridge?
What is the standard color of all other cartridges?
What color were cartridges produced by Nintendo for internal use?
What was distinctly made by Nintendo, Konami, and Acclaim?
What was the opening lyric from the Duck Tales theme show?
What was Nintendo accused of?
Why was Nintendo accused of antitrust behavior?
Who interviewed retailers as part of their investigation?
Who began probing Nintendo's business?
How much were the vouchers worth that Nintendo sent out?
What was the first NES emulator?
What was the first English available emulator?
What platform was NESticle available for use?
When was NESticle released?
Who designed the Famicom system?
The plans called for how many bits as a feature?
Who was the Nintendo president at the time?
When was the test model constructed?
Early Famicom games were written on what computer system?
What was the light gun controller called?
What was the name of the auxiliary port used to connect additional devices on the Famicom?
How were the special controllers connected to the NES?
What year did the video game market crash?
The crash was caused in part by the confusion and misrepresentation of what in video games?
What specifically was misrepresented on game products?
Nintendo's marketing strategy aimed at what aspect of the consumer via realism?
How much was the selling price equivalent to in today's money?
How much did the Deluxe NES sell for?
How much did the console sell for bundled with just the Super Mario Bros. game?
Super Mario Bros was paired with which game in the Action Set?
The Basic Set sold for how much at release?
What thrived after the NES was discontinued?
What feature does the PocketFami have?
The NES was duplicated on which medium in order to make clones easy to produce?
Nintendo produced toys and what other item before its game system?
Nintendo's era was compared with who as another video game manufacturer?
Nintendo required what from its software developers?
What did licensing lead to regarding games?
Atari created NES products under which name?
What did Nintendo sue Tengen for?
Tengen reverse engineered the lockout chip to develop what animal monikered prototype?
Tengen got a description of Nintendo's chip from whom?
Who developed Nintendo's PPU?
How many kb of Video RAM did the PPU have?
The system has how many colors available on it?
How many grays could be used as well?
What is the standard display resolution of the NES?
What was Nintendo's euphemism for "video game system?"
What did Nintendo use instead of the word console?
What was the term used by Nintendo instead of "video games?"
What was printed on all licensed games and accessories by Nintendo?
The seal of quality took on what eventual name?
How were the Famicom controllers attached to the console?
The second Famicom controller lacked START and what other button?
What did the second Famicom controller have as a unique feature?
What shape were the A and B buttons on the earliest Famicom controllers?
What shape did the A and B buttons eventually become?
When did Sega finally permit third-party publishing?
What was the name of the 1st company Sega permitted?
Nintendo was the sole manufacturer of what component for third-party developers?
As cartridges couldn't be returned to Nintendo, the developers took on the entirety of what?
What year was there a shortage of DRAM and ROM chips?
To address the shoddy hardware, what popped up across the United States?
What did the repair centers promise?
What was done to have the privilege of working on an NES for repair?
The HVC-001 featured which kind of mod output?
The HVC-101 lost the RF and adopted which output for use in North America and Europe?
The Super NES had how many pins in its proprietary connector?
The re-released NES-101 model in North America went back to what perceived primitive output?
How much does the NES unit weigh in pounds?
How large was the typical television recommended for the device?
Where was the Television meant to be placed?
What's the name of the feature on the front of the front of the NES test device?
According to Sergio DellaPergola, what percent of Jews worldwide do Ashkenazi Jews's make up?
During what century did Ashkenazi Jews make up around three percent of the Jewish population worldwide?
Prior to which major event were there approximately 16.7 million Jews in the world?
During what year did Ashkenazi Jews account for 92 percent of Jews worldwide?
How many Jews were there in the world just prior to the Holocaust?
From the 11th century until 1931, the population of Ashkenazi Jews grew by what percent?
Who made rough calculations and implied that Ashkenazi Jews make up less than 74% of the Jewish population worldwide?
The present-day population of Ashkenazi Jews is thought to be between which two numbers?
In which tractate of the Babylonian Talmud is the name Gomer given as Germania?
Ashkenaz is linked to Scandza/Scanzia, which is viewed as what?
Saadia Gaon identified Ashkenaz with the Saquliba or what territories?
Who identified Ashkenaz with the Saquliba or Slavic territories?
Even though Gomer is rendered as Germania in the Yoma tractate of the Babylonian Talmud, in other rabbinical literature it was identified with what?
Who expelled the Jews from his Merovingian kingdom in 629?
Does the archeological record suggest that there was a rather large or small population of Jews in Gaul and Germany?
In antiquity, most Jews in Gaul or Germany probably occupied what two roles?
In what year did Jewish communities exist in Brittany?
During the Middle Ages, some Jews assimilated into the dominant Greek and Latin cultures by doing what?
Culturally, an Ashkenazi Jew can be identified by what concept?
Is there a larger or smaller number of Jews that speak Yiddish today than in the past?
What does Yiddishkeit mean in the Yiddish language?
In the past most Jews prayed in what language?
In the past, while most Jews prayed in one language, they used which other language in their secular lives?
For what period of time were the Ashkenazim a reproductively isolated population in Europe?
A 2013 study of Ashkenazi mitochondrial DNA was conducted by what university?
In an ethnic sense, Ashkenazi Jews can trace their ancestry to Jews who settled where?
In the last 50-60 years, have more or less Ashkenazi Jews intermarried with people outside of their community?
Human geneticists argue that genetic variations have been identified that show high or low frequencies among Ashkenazi Jews?
In the past have relations between Ashkenazim and Sephardim tended to be warm or cold?
What did Saadia Marciano do with the Israeli Black Panthers?
How did the Ashkenazim view north African Sepharadim and Berber Jews?
Who led the Israeli Black Panthers?
Where was Saadia Marciano from?
What percentage of the modern Ashkenazi genome could possibly be of European origin?
Is the percentage of admixture in the modern Ashkenazi genome higher or lower than previously thought?
Were Ashkenazi Jews found to be a more or less genetically divergent population than Russians, Orcadians, French, and Basques?
In one study it was found that the Ashkenazim were more or less diverse than their Middle Eastern relatives?
Were the Ashkenazim thought to be a subset or superset of their assumed geographical source population?
The custom of designating areas of Jewish settlement with biblical names meant that Spain was referred to as what?
The custom of designating areas of Jewish settlement with biblical names meant that France was called?
The reference to France as Tsarefat was taken from which biblical passage?
How did Byzantium and Syrian Jewish letters refer to the Crusaders?
Following the Carolingian unification, the term Ashkenazi came to refer to the Jews of what two places?
Did Charlemagne's expansion of the Frankish empire bring about a brief period of upheaval or stability in Francia?
Charlemagne's expansion of the Frankish empire created opportunities for Jewish merchants to settle where?
Charlemagne granted the Jews freedoms similar to those enjoyed under which previous empire?
When Jews began to return to Frankish lands many took up occupations in which two fields?
Which language emerged as a result of language contact with various High German vernaculars during the medieval period?
The lack of assimilation of Jews in central and eastern Europe lies in part to the fact that they lived almost exclusively in what?
A lack of assimilation of Jews in central and eastern Europe is also attributed to males taking part in what type of system?
In central and eastern Europe it is thought that Jewish scorn for the life-style of their neighbors increased due to what?
Besides living in shtetls, maintaining a strong system of education for males, and scorning the life-style of their neighbors, Jews in central and eastern Europe also did what?
Who noted that Ashkenazi Jews lived in Jerusalem during the 11th century?
Another piece of evidence of German communities in the holy city in the second half of the 11th century is due to what items being sent from Germany to Jerusalem?
Mystic Rabbi Elijah of Chelm is from what century?
In the story told by mystic Rabbi Elijah of Chelm, one of the German's family members rescued Jews in Palestine and carried them back to where in order to repay a previous favor?
For religious Jews, what does Minhagim mean?
What type of Jew is required to follow the customs of their ancestors without the option of picking and choosing?
For religious Jews, what does Halakha mean?
For religious Jews, "Ashkenazic" refers to what two things?
Reform Judaism originated among what type of Jew?
Most of the Ashkenazi Jews moved away from Europe either immigrating to North America, or other English speaking areas but most to which place?
For most Ashkenazi Jews, Yiddish was replaced with what language?
What two groups continue to use Yiddish in daily life?
What percentage of the US population is comprised of Ashkenazi Jews?
What percentage of the top 100 world chess players come from the Ashkenazi Jewish community?
What percentage of Nobel award winners from the United States in the 20th century have been Ashkenazi Jews? 
About how many Fields Medal winners have been Ashkenazi Jews?
About how many of the world's chess champions come from the Ashkenazi Jewish community?
Researcher Gil Atzmon suggests that Ashkenazim branched off from other Jews around the time of what?
The destruction of the First Temple was how many years ago?
It is estimated that 400 families left Northern Italy around what year?
Ashkenazi families that left Northern Italy went where?
In the late Middle Ages, the Ashkenazi population shifted in which direction?
In the late Middle Ages, as the Ashkenazi population shifted it moved from what location?
In the late Middle Ages, as the Ashkenazi population shifted it moved into which location?
In the late 18th and 19th centuries, Jews who returned to German lands experienced what?
Recent studies have found that contemporary Jews (excluding Indian and Ethiopian Jews) have a close genetic relationship to the people of what area?
The genome-wide genetic study carried out in 2010 by Behar et al. examined the genetic relationships among which Jewish groups?
The genome-wide genetic study carried out in 2010 by Behar et al. examined the genetic relationship between Jewish groups and what other population?
The history of Jews in Greece goes back to which era?
Which Greek historian knew of the Jews?
The Synagogue in the Agora of Athens is dated to the period between which two dates?
What did the Greek historian Herodotus refer to the Jews as?
The Greek historian Herodotus listed the Jews as the levied naval forces in service to whom?
According to Daniel Elazar at the Jerusalem Center for Public Affairs, at the end of the 11th century, what percentage of the world's Jewry was Sephardic?
According to Daniel Elazar at the Jerusalem Center for Public Affairs, at the end of the 11th century, what percentage of the world's Jewry was Ashkenazi?
By 1931, Ashkenazi Jews were what percentage of the world Jewry?
In Israel, the term Ashkenazi is now used in what manner?
In Israel, the term Ashkenazi is now used to refer to whom?
Are Jews of mixed backgrounds more or less common today?
By tradition, when a Sephardic or Mizrahi woman marries into an Orthodox or Haredi Ashkenazi Jewish family she raises her children to be which type of Jew?
When an Ashkenazi woman marries a Sephardi or Mizrahi man it is expected that her children will take on which kind of identity?
A convert generally follows which practice?
When did the Dreyfus affair occur?
In what years did large numbers of Jews arrive in France?
What three factors led to large numbers of Jews moving to France?
By the 1930s, Paris was noted for which two things related to Jews?
What is the Siddur?
The term Ashkenazi also refers to what?
The nusach Ashkenaz refers to what in Hebrew?
Two other major forms of nusach among Ashkenazic Jews are what?
Nusach Ari is used by whom?
How many types of genetic origin testing currently exist?
When did efforts begin to try and identify the origins of Ashkenazi Jews through DNA analysis?
What does Y-DNA show?
What are the three types of origin testing?
Autosomal DNA is what?
A 2006 study by Behar et al, suggested that what percentage of the current Ashkenazi population was descended from "founder lineages"?
A 2006 study by Behar et al, suggested that a large percentage of the current Ashkenazi population is descended matrilineally from how many women? 
The women that a large percentage of the current Ashkenazi population is descended from are also known as what?
The founder lineages were likely from what type of mtDNA pool?
When did the idea that the Ashkenazi may have come from Khazar stock come about?
Did Eran Elhaik, from Johns Hopkins University School of Public Health argue for or against Khazar descent?
What did a 2013 study of Ashkenazi mitochondrial DNA find in regards to the Khazar descent idea?
What year marked the onset of the Crusades?
As Jews were expelled from England, France, and parts of Germany they head into which three countries?
What year were the expulsions from England?
What year were the expulsions from France?
After expulsions from England and France, Jewish migration headed in which direction?
What is the name of the Rabbi mentioned in relation to the Genesis Rabbah?
What are the three German tribes or German lands talked about by Rabbi Berechiah?
Rabbi Berechiah's view is based on what?
What is the name of the Midrash compilation?
After emigration from the west, did Jewish communities in places like Poland have a stable or unstable sociopolitical environment?
What precipitated the development of the Hasidic movement?
Massive western emigration occurred around what time?
Ashkenazi Jews have made up the majority of the American Jewish community since when?
Religious Ashkenazi Jews living in Israel follow the authority of whom in certain matters?
What is the Knesset?
Religious Ashkenazi Jews look to the authority of the chief Ashkenazi rabbi in which matters?
What two things were mentioned as contributing to bringing younger Jews together in North American cities?
What do many Ashkenazi Jews study outside of the Yeshiva framework?
Which new trend has been associated with the Jewish Renewal movement?
Most people with the surname Ashkenazi, hail from which particular community?
Some people with the surname shorten it to what?
What famous person is mentioned as having the surname Ashkenazi?
A 2013 study estimates that what percentage of Ashkenazi maternal ancestry comes from women indigenous to Europe?
A 2013 study estimates that what percentage of Ashkenazi maternal ancestry comes from women from the Near East?
A 2013 study estimates that what percentage of Ashkenazi maternal ancestry comes from women of undetermined origins?
How many geneticists carried out the 2013 trans-genome study?
What did the 2013 trans-genome study find in regards to Ashkenazi Jews and Khazar origins?
How many universities and academies participated in the 2013 trans-genome study?
The most well supported theory on the origins of the Ashkenazim is one that details a Jewish migration through which modern day country?
The historical record attests to Jewish communities in southern Europe since what time?
Many Jews were denied full Roman citizenship until what year?
Who gave Jews the right to full Roman citizenship?
When did Hai Gaon refer to questions that had been addressed to him from Ashkenaz?
Who is Hai Gaon thought to be referring to when he says Ashkenaz?
In the latter half of the 11th century, Rashi refers to what two things?
When did France expel its original Jewish population?
By the time of the French Revolution there were how many distinct Jewish populations?
All studies agree that genetic overlap with what location exists in both lineages?
What year did David Goldstein report that unlike male Ashkenazi lineages, the female lineages in Ashkenazi Jewish communities did not seem to be Middle Eastern?
In a 2006 study, how many autosomal SNPs were used?
In what year was Athanasius consecrated?
How old was Athanasius when he became the Patriarch of Alexandria?
Did Athanasius want to be the Patriarch of Alexandria?
Did the people want Athanasius as their bishop?
How long after the Council of Nice did Saint Athanasius die?
Was Saint Athanasius willing or unwilling to fill the vacancy?
In what year was he consecrated?
Where did Athanasius remain for 6 years while living as a monk?
What is name of one of the compositions composed by Athanasius while he lived as a monk?
Who took over after Athanasius?
Who influenced George of Cappadocia to become the new ruler?
To where did Saint Athanasius withdraw?
Who influenced the appointment of George of Cappadocia?
How long did he spend in the desert?
What is one thing he wrote during this time?
Who was appointed to rule the see of Alexandria?
Who succeeded Emperor Constantius?
Who succeeded George of Cappadocia?
In what year did Athanasius return to his episcopal capitol?
In what year did Emperor Constantius die?
How did George of Cappadocia die in prison?
Were the Arians united in their oppostion?
When did Athanasius re-enter the capitol?
Who succeeded the Emperor Constantius?
Who then succeeded George?
What happened to the usurping bishop, George?
What party benefited from the accession of Valens?
Valens issued a decree banishing the bishops that were deposed by who?
What saint fled from Alexandria on 5 October to a country house outside Alexandria?
Valens' banishment of Athanasius created the greatest consternation in what city?
What did the decree of Valens do?
When the people in the city were concerned about Athanasius, what did the prefect do? 
What did  Athanasius do to protect himself?
How did Valens get him to return?
Were the pretend baptisms real?
As a child, Athanasius imitated what ritual?
What work did the Bishop suggest for Athanasius?
Why was Athanasius instructed to stop pretend baptising?
What made Arius's belief about Jesus different from Alexander's?
Was this differing view common among Christians of the day?
What other leaders believed this?
What eventually happened to Arius?
In what year did Pope Julius die?
Did Liberius sympathize with Athanasius?
Where the men armed who arrested him?
What was the outcome of the Council of Milan?
What was  Athanasius doing when he was arrested?
Who had a policy of condemning Athanasius?
What was Athanasius doing the next time an arrest was attempted?
Where did Athanasius flee to after this attempt?
In which work did he refer to Constantius as a precursor of the Antichrist?
What did he write during this time?
Where did bishops of the West meet?
What belief was accepted by Constantius?
What was the belief that was approved at this council?
What did the orthodox leaders believe?
What did the Arians agree upon at Sirmium?
What position did Ecdicius hold?
Did he think he would be gone a long time?
Who was jealous of Athanasius's influence?
What did Julian try to do to Athanasius?
Did Athanasius tell the people to protest?
When did he write his first works on Orthodox Christianity?
Which of the two first works addresses pagan practices?
How did he believe Jesus came into the world?
Which of his works addresses redemption and the Son of God?
What did he do when he thought he might be made Bishop?
Who did the Catholics of Alexandria want as their Bishop?
When did Alexander ask to see Athanasius? 
Was there someone else that was preferred as Bishop?
Was Athanasius well liked by everyone?
What was he accused of doing to a church?
He was accused of selling grain for what reason?
What did the term Arian mean to him?
What did he call his detractors?
What was he known as soon after he died?
What day is he celebrated in the Eastern Orthodox Church?
How does the Eastern Orthodox Church refer to him?
What do the Protestants call him?
What is his feast day in Western Christianity?
What famous event happened in 303?
What writing mentions the Arian accusation that Athanasius was under aged?
At what age was a man eligible to be ordained at Patriarch of Alexandria?
Did the followers of Meletius obey the guidelines of Nicaea?
What was Athanasius accused of planning against the Arians?
What was the verdict of the accusation?
What was his punishment?
Who was he accused of harming?
Did Athanasius speak Greek?
Did he understand Hebrew?
Did he know all of the Old Testament?
What did students learn in the school in Alexandria?
What translation of the Old Testament did he study?
Who did he have to thank for his ability to come back to Alexandria in 345?
Were the people glad to have him home?
In what writing did he recount his time in exiles?
What happened when Constans died?
Did the new emperor agree or disagree with the Arians?
What did Athanasius do to avoid speaking to Alexander on his deathbed?
Who did the Alexandrian people want to be their Bishop?
Did the Bishops have someone else in mind?
Who did Alexander ask for when he was dieing?
Who tried to bribe Liberius?
How much warning was Liberius given before his exile?
Where did Liberius go?
Did bribery work in convincing Liberius to believe the Arians?
What did Liberius have to promise to do in order to return?
At what point could Athanasius return to Alexandria?
Who provided for his protection while he was in Rome?
Who became Patriarch in Alexandria while Athanasius was away?
How did the people of Alexandria know when to celebrate Easter?
Who declared Athanasius to be exiled again?
Why did the Bishops condemn Athanasius?
What happened to the Bishops who did not take the oath?
Did the Pope agree with this order?
Did the Emperor agree to a new trial for Athanasius?
What oath did the Bishops have to take at the trial?
What happened to Bishop George?
What happened to Bishop leaders who did not agree with the doctrine?
When did Athanasius return to his position as Patriarch?
Who joined him when he formed a council to encourage unity among Christians?
What Christian beliefs did Emperor Valens adhere to?
Where did Athanasius during his latest exile?
For how long was he exiled this time?
Where did he hide during this time?
Who convinced Valens to let him return to Alexandria?
Who standardized the books of the New Testament?
What books were used before his decision to standardize?
How many books are listed that should be included but were not?
How many books are in the New Testament?
Have those books changed over time?
Did Athanasius feel that it was important to believe that Jesus was the Son of God?
Did his place more value on his Faith or where he was living?
Did he think that the people that had exiled him were true believers?
Where did Athanasius think Faith resides?
Who was the Festal Letter written for?
How did the people  know that Alexander had chosen Athanasius as his successor?
How old was Athanasius when he was chosen as Patriarch?
Who came to Alexandria to confirm the choice?
Did all the people want him as Patriarch?
How long after the Council of Nicae did Alexander die?
Did all Arians believe the same things?
Were Arians also Origenists?
Did the bishops consider themselves Arians?
What did the Council of Nicaea decide about Arianism?
Did Arians have one set of beliefs?
To what golden event was Seattle the portal?
Which large technology giant established its home base in Seattle?
In what area was the Klondike Gold Rush located?
What was Seattle's first primary money maker?
What was the airplane company that helped Seattle return to economic stability? 
What group of settlers established a site at Pioneer Square?
When was New York Alki established?
by what name did Charles Terry and John Low first name their settlement?
What was the Chinook enhanced name of Terry and Low's settlement?
What site was eventually abandoned when the settlers moved back in with Denny?
At what date did the name Seattle first appear on official papers?
What famous Indian appears on the seal of Seattle?
When were the first land allocations made in Seattle?
At what date was Seattle incorporated as a town?
What type of governing body did Seattle have in 1869?
After lumbering, what was Seattle's second big economic boom?
What event ended the Gold Rush?
What was the start of the depression that stopped the Gold Rush?
For whom was Seattle the main port of supply ?
What company did James E. Casey found in 1907 with a borrowed $100?
What type of theater did Alexander Pantages start in Seattle?
When did Pantages open his movie houses?
Who was Pantages competitor in the theater business?
Who was the architect who built a number of theaters in the Seattle area?
Which of Seattle's famous, and still extant,  theaters did Priteca disign?
When did Boeing move its headquarters to Chicago?
Before 2001, where was Boeing headquartered?
What did Boeing separate from its headquarters facilities?
Besides the Renton plant, where else are airplanes made for Boeing?
To whom is the Boeing credit union open?
When was ship building the economic master in Seattle?
What was the first general labor strike in the 20th century?
When did the General Strike happen in Seattle?
What major strike in 1934 damaged Seattle's maritime economy?
What violent act happened in Seattle's Chinatown in 1983?
What type of establishment was Wan Mee?
Which huge tech corporation moved its headquarters the Seattle area?
What item for sale in 2000 Seattle was some of the most costly in the US?
About what time did the big tech boom in Seattle fizzle?
What water mass is located west of Seattle?
What land area is west of Puget Sound?
What lake is to the east of Seattle?
Where is Seattle's prime harbor?
Because Elliott Bay is salt water, what kind of port is Seattle?
What large company moved its headquarters to South Lake Union in Seattle?
When did Amazon begin its latest expansion?
How much of their income do half of Seattle's population have to spend on housing?
How many new people move to Seattle each year?
Where does Seattle rank in rush hour traffic?
What hazardous geologic area does Seattle inhabit?
What type of land area is at most risk of earthquake damage?
What was the magnitude of the Nisqually quake?
On what date did the Nisqually earthquake occur that damaged the Pioneer Square area?
What is the amount of magnitude possible on the Cascadia subduction zone?
What other famous city, besides Seattle, lies on seven hills?
What type of land area does Capital hill, First Hill, and Beacon Hill constitute?
What artificial geological feature was added to Seattle in 1909?
Where is the highest place in Seattle?
Where was Harbor Island built?
During which month does Seattle get more precipitation than other US cities?
When does Seattle get it lowest levels of precipitation?
In the lower 48 states, which city receives some of the least sunny days that any other?
What weather feature is highly unusual in Seattle?
About how many days a year is thunder a reported weather event in Seattle?
What is a very significant part of Seattle's weather system?
Of what is the Convergence Zone comprised?
From where do the two streams of air come?
What mountain Range splits the wind stream in the west of Seattle?
What bad wind and rain event was not caused by the Convergence Zone?
How many more people does Seattle expect to have by 2040?
What change in building heights did Seattle make to increase population density in its downtown ?
Who wanted to grow Seattle by 60% by 2040?
How much increase in population has the inner Seattle city had since 1990?
What was the downtown Seattle population in 2009?
How much did Seattle's foreign born population expand between 1990-2000?
What other group of people does Seattle have the largest percentage of in the US?
From where in China did most of the first immigrants come?
How many Vietnamese residents are there in Seattle? 
What is the population of Cambodian immigrants in Seattle?
Before they moved to Chicago, what was the biggest company headquartered in Seattle?
For what did Forbes rank Seattle the most expensive?
Where in the Seattle area does Boeing have manufacturing plants?
Which past mayor of Seattle has been criticized for favoring the rich of industry at the expense of the people? 
What type of businesses did Nickles want to attract to Seattle?
By a UCLA study,how many Seattle residents identify as gay, lesbian or bisexual?
How does the numbers in the gay community rank compared to other US cities?
What city ranked higher in population in the gay community?
What is Seattle's percentage of same sex households?
What is Seattle's ranking for same sex households as compared with the rest of the US?
How many theater companies does Seattle have in residence?
How many equity theaters does Seattle have?
What Seattle theater was built in 1926?
To what type of theater are the two dozen live venues in Seattle associated?
To what type of theater is Seattle second to New York?
How old is Seattle's Symphony Orchestra?
What Seattle organization is one of the top ballet schools in the US?
In what venue does the Seattle symphony perform?
Where do the Seattle Opera and Pacific Northwest Ballet perform?
What structure was originally at site of the McCaw Hall?
What is Seattle's present nickname?
What did Seattle call itself at the time of the Goodwill Games?
To what distinct feature of the area does Emerald City refer?
Since Seattle is near Alaska, what is the city called?
From what company does Seattle get its nickname Jet City?
What Seattle fair lasts 24 days?
What is Seattle's gay pride parade called?
How many Independence Day celebrations does Seattle have yearly?
When are Seafair events held in Seattle?
What is the focus of the Bumbershoot festival?
When did Seattle host the national Poetry Slam Tournament?
What poetry festival was first held in 1997?
How often is the Seattle Poetry festival held?
How often does Seattle send to the National Poetry Slam?
To what style of poet does Seattle consider itself home?
When did the first art gallery open in Washington state?
What was the name of the first art museum in Washington?
When did The Seattle Art Museum open its doors?
Besides the museums, what other art offering does SAM operate?
Aside from publically operated museums, what other type of person galleries does Seattle offer?
What anime convention is held in Seattle?
What is focus of the Penny Arcade Expo?
How many bicyclists attend the Seattle to Portland Bicycle Classic?
What festival does Seattle have for the transgender community?
What is Seattle's festival for the Polish community?
How many times have the Seattle Seahawks played in the World Series?
Who did the Seahawks beat to win the Super Bowl?
What team defeated the Seattle Seahawks to win Super Bowl XLIX?
What is the Seattle soccer club named?
With what team do the Sounders share Century Link Field?
What is Seattle thought to be politically?
What did the people of Seattle vote to legalize in 2012?
What other political hot issue did voters in Seattle vote to legalize in 2012?
 What do residents of Seattle believe in matters of religion?
How does Seattle compare in church attendance to the rest oF the US? 
How many people in Seattle vote Democratic?
For whom did the residents of Seattle vote in the 2012 presidential election?
What party members win most state and national legislative elections?
Who was Seattle's , and the nation's, first female mayor?
What is the sex of the majority of Seattle's city council?
Of what Congressional district is Seattle a part?
To which states' election laws are Seattle's law and ballots similar?
Who is the representative for Seattle's district?
When was McDermott elected to office?
Who is the present mayor of Seattle?
What percentage of the Seattle population has a bachelor's degree?
How was Seattle ranked on literacy in 2005-2006?
What is the national average of obtaining a bachelor's degree?
How much of the Seattle population have high school diplomas?
What is the national average of high school diploma holding citizens?
What type of radio stations abound in Seattle?
Where has KEXP pioneered in Radio?
What are KUOW and KPLU radio stations?
With what educational facility is KEXP-FM aligned?
What radio station is operated by the public school system?
What is the Seattle newspaper as of 2010?
Who sells the newspaper Real Change on the street?
In what venue does the Seattle Post-Intelligencer publish?
In what year did the Seattle Post-Intelligencer  first publish?
What is the LGBT newspaper called?
What is Seattle's bus line called?
What service runs between South Lake Union and Westlake Center?
What organization runs the largest line of ferries in the US?
How does the Seattle ferry line compare to the rest of the world?
To what two islands does the ferry service connect?
What kind of hospital is Seattle Children's?
Besides serving Washington, Idaho, and Montana, what northern state uses Seattle Children's?
What entity operates Harborview?
In what neighborhood is the Fred Hutchington Cancer Research Center located?
Where is the Veterans Affairs Hospital located?
What is mainly used for transportation in Seattle?
What road was built in 1953 and later damaged by an earthquake?
What is planned to replace the Alaska Way Viaduct?
When is the tunnel now expected to be finished?
What was the original projected cost of the viaduct replacement tunnel?
What educational institution is at home in Seattle?
Where can a student find to study art in Seattle?
What is the purpose of the University of Washington Outreach?
In what year did Time magazine choose Seattle Central Community College as community college of the year?
Beside the public universities, what other type of institutions provide education in Seattle?
On what type of transportation system has Seattle begun to focus?
From what kind of transportation has Seattle been moving away?
What measure was passed by Seattle voters in 2006?
By what year do plans call for the completion of a rail line to Bellevue?
Which former mayor backed the expansion of rail lines from downtown to Ballard?
Which three processes does phychology recognize as memory?
What happens to information during the encoding process?
What is the second memory stage?
What is the third process that happens during the memory process?
What does short-term memory depend on?
What did conrad find about test subjects?
What does Conrads finding seem to mean?
What was Conrads deal with?
Why can't some memories be held onto forever?
If a memory that is stored in with long term-memories, how long can you possibly rememeber it?
What is the capacity of long term memory?
If you knew a telephone number one week ago, but have forgotten it now, where was this memory stored?
Which part of the brain does short-term memory seem to rely on?
Which part of the brain does long-term memory rely on?
How much information can the hippocampus store?
How long does sensory  memory to to store information?
Can we control what is stored in our sensory memory?
Who did the first studies on exploring a new idea of sensory memory?
What did Spellings' findings reveal?
How does short term memory encode information?
What did Baddeleys test subjects have touble doing?
How does long term memory encode information?
What is episodic memory?
If someone where to recall a wedding they had went to a year before, which type of memory would be used?
What are some catgories of retrospective memory?
If a memory is triggered by a time, which kind of memory is this?
What is something somebody can use to remember something?
If Bob realized he needed to mail his mother a letter after seeing the postal office, which kind of memory did he trigger?
Was Hebb's thought of the relationship between short and long term memory true?
Which drugs seemed to help someone remember earlier events?
What relationship does excitement and memory share?
Bob was in a car accident and couldn't remember his wifes name, what part of his brain could have been damaged?
Is it important to know how information is coded in the brain?
Have researchers learned anything studying plasticity?
What has most of the research on memories revolved around?
What do cognitive neuroscientists believe memory is?
What suggests that memory has two different components?
What showed that memory exists even before that memory is known to the person?
What is an engram trace?
What is another term for procedural memory?
If bob remembered how to bake a cake after seeing this on television what memory is he using?
What set of skills is reliant on procedural memory?
If Bob does throws 15 more free throws than he did last week, how many more explicit memories has he gained?
Which model explains why bob has an easier time reading a book, and then discussing it rather than reading two books?
Which concept is criticised for being unworthy and too broad?
Which part of memory allows us to go about our daily lives?
Does a 6 month old have short term memory?
What age can an infabt recall steps in an order?
What part of a two step sequence can a 6 month old remember?
What part of the brain is not fully developed in infants which can cause the memory differences in ages?
When remembering your first day of school or first dance, which memory are you using?
Which type of memory enables us to remember knowledge of the world?
When fondly remembering your memory, which type of memory are you using?
Which type of memory is used when remembering something that we've seen?
In 1960 did people believe an infant was able to remember things?
What is the minimum age researchers think a child begins to have memory?
Does a persons memory capacity increase with age?
Who has a better memory retention a 6 month old or a 9 month old?
What role does the amygdala play in memory?
Can you pin point certain areas of the brain to certain memories. 
What changes can be linked to learning and memory?
What is the hippocampus's relationship to memory?
Does it matter how long someone is exposed to stress to have an impact on their memory?
Whar does research show happens to blood glucorticoid levels during stressful events?
Do the people studied in different research perform as well after stress as they did before becoming in contact with stressful situations?
What neurons are damaged during stressful events?
What can make someone more prone to memory loss as they age?
What will a person often do with extremely stressful memories?
What is the cause of neuron loss due to stress?
Can one increase their brain efficency?
What can a person do to increase their brain efficiency?
In a study performed with 17 subjects, what relationship did healthy changes and brain efficiency have?
What is a term to describe memory loss?
What diseases can have a major imact on memory?
Is amnesia only seen in one form?
What happens to a person whose autobiographic memory is damaged?
Does excersice have any role on cognitive brain function?
Is a child who excercies likely to perform better in school?
What positive things can happen to your brain when you excersise?
What type of excercise has shown the best benefit for the brain?
What can cause a person to have fake memories?
Who performed a study that showed the similarirty of imaginging doing something and then later remembering actually doing that task?
What did a similar study done by Garry find?
What is the most widely used way in learing?
What is the Zeigarnik effect?
What does memorization mean?
What learning tool did Cosmos rosselliius write about?
What is the spacing effect?
When was the first federal population census taken in the US?
What were the two categories for race in the census?
Who all was identified by name in the house holds?
What were Indians categorized as after they were included as others?
When was the first US federal population census taken?
How were enumerators instructed to classify residents?
Was every resident listed by name?
when did any changes to counting procedures  happen?
Were all residents counted together or separately?
When did the US begin to take census?
At what point were all members of the household named on a census?
What does mulatto mean?
Who were considered "free people of color"?
Where would a Native American live to not be counted in the census?
The Census Bureau had gone from two categories to how many by the 1990s?
By 2002, what percent of African Americans had multiracial ancestries?
Why were there more immigrants in the US?
How had the Census Bureau changed its collection of data?
What is one of the many outcomes of the Census data?
How many different ethnic categories were listed on the modern census?
Can people self identify as more than one ethnicity on the US census currently?
Do some ethnic groups have concerns about census changes?
How is some federal assistance allocated to certain groups?
Twelve or more categories for race and ethnicity were in the Census by when?
When did laws allow for more immigrants?
How many African Americans identify as multiracial on the Census of 2002?
What type of federal assistance depends on Census data?
Americans with African ancestry have always been classified as what race?
What were slaves and others of African ancestry classified by what term?
Melungeons are generally classified as white but what are they genetically what other races?
What did many with European ancetry "marry white" and want to be part of the white society?
Which Americans have been historically classified as African American or black?
What caused lower classification status for African Americans?
How did many multiracial Americans attain social and economic advantages?
What are some historical reasons multiracial Americans have been classified as black?
What is the group called who are genetically sub Saharan and European but are classified as white?
What does it mean to have "marred white"?
What were those with Sub-Saharan African ancestory classified as?
What were slaves and Africans classified by?
What is the effect of there no longer being a stigma on interracial marriage?
What has caused more people of mixed races to the US?
When was there a period of formal racial segregation?
Who was elected and was the first multiracial president of the United States?
Why were Americans allowed to start checking more than one box to identify their race in the Census in 200?
Who was the first multiracial president elected in the US
When did the US begin to experience a growing multiracial identity movement?
Who are "mestizos"?
When did the US census start to allow residents to mark more than one ethno-racial identity on the census form?
What has brought more mixed race people to the US?
What was it once considered socially advantageous to do?
What is an example of the multiracial identity movement at work?
What does the first multiracial president identify as?
When did the census begin allowing multiple boxes to be checked?
When was an African American president elected?
What were put in place to prevent the mix of races?
Why did the anti-miscegenation not insure that there was no interracial mixing?
Where was there greater numbers of Latinos and Asian residents?
When were the laws against marriage between Asians and Europeans lifted?
What races were prohibited from official relationships with whites?
When were anti-miscegenation laws passed?
Were Latino residents also prohibited from marrying whites? 
Did these laws change behavior of white slaveholders and other powerful white men?
Which region has greater numbers of Latino and Asian residents?
In the western US, who were not allowed to have relationships with whites?
When did laws stop banning marriage between whites and asians?
Who were taking slaves as concubines?
When did the numbers of free people of color increase dramatically?
How were the laws in New York abolished?
How long did it take for states like New York to abolish all slave laws?
Who in the south were urging their churches to free their slaves in the south?
When were the last slaves freed in New York state?
When did the number of free people of color begin to increase in the North and South?
Who implored slaveholders to free their slaves?
What caused many slaveholder to free their slaves?
What is it called when it takes several years for slaves to be freed in a program?
The last slave in New York was freed when?
What caused Quaker and Methodist preachers to want to free slaves?
In 1810, how many black people were considered free?
What caused many men to free slaves from 1782 to 1810?
What is the one-drop rule?
What did some courts call the one-drop rule?
What is a hypodesecnt rule?
When was the one-drop rule in effect?
What is the one-drop rule?
Why were laws like the one drop rule enacted?
What made the one drop rule stricter than rules in the 19th century?
In the early 1900s, what was did black mean in southern states?
Prior to the 1900s, what was the socially accepted rule for racial interpretation?
What rule means multiracial people are given status of the socially subordinate group?
What was the rule used in law in the 1900s called?
What was the rule in the 1800s called?
Approximentally how many Americans identified themselves as multiracial in the 2010 US census?
Why did muticultural Americans hid their heritage?
Before the mid-20th century were people open about their muticultural heritage and why or why not?
Are all muticultural Americans aware of their cultural heritage?
What is the accepted definition of "multicultural" ancestry?
Approximentally how many Americans identified themselves as multiracial in the 2010 US census?
What is the accepted definition of "multicultural" ancestry?
Why did muticultural Americans hid their heritage?
Which cultural do multicultural people usually identify with?
Are all multicultural Americans aware of their heritage?
What does it mean to be a mutliracial?
How many multiracial people in the US were there in 2010?
When did people stop hiding mutliracial heritage?
What are people most likely to identify themselves as?
Would DNA show a higher number or lower number of mutliracial people than those reported in the census?
What does it mean to be a mutliracial?
How many multiracial people in the US were there in 2010?
When did people stop hiding mutliracial heritage?
Who were considered "white Indians"?
Who had Indigenous "Country wives"?
Who lived in native communities, speaking the language and participating in the affairs of tribes?
Why were some multiracial children sent to Europe?
Where were legal wives usually kept?
Who were not identified by name on the census before the civil war?
Who was Thomas Jefferson in a relationship with?
Not recognizing white fatherhood for multiracial slave children cause what to be lost?
Who will not reveal full ancestral data to mixed race people?
Who brought Christian missionaries to Hawaii?
What cause royal Hawaiian females to find themselves ugly?
What are some examples of how a noble person should look before Christians came?
What did westerners call the women of Hawaii?
When would white men marry the paler and thinner Hawaiian ladies?
Who are blamed in this paragraph for Jim Crow laws?
When did Virginia add the one drop rule to their laws?
Why were laws limiting people of color passed?
What had popularity in the early 20th century that caused rising racial discrimination?
What fact was ignored by enacting one-drop rule laws?
A person is not a member of a racial minority if ancetry does not what?
Who are consdered to have the most physical differences?
What are groups other than blacks considered to be?
Who says genetic tests can't tell the difference between different Native American nations?
What are geneticists looking for?
What is there genetic evidence of?
How do some mixed raced people feel?
How many racial choices are there on standardized tests?
How many race choices may someone check?
What does the "other" box do?
When do mixed race individuals feel marginalized?
What usually played a larger role than laws regarding a person's race?
Where did people not ask about racial background?
What were the hallmarks of free citizens?
Whos acceptance decided inheritance issues?
The President's father is from what country?
What community still has some effects of slavery?
What must Africans who recently immigrated do?
Who argue for a term other than African American to describe recent immigrants?
When did multiracial people start to organize for more inclusive racial identifiers?
What was the response to the idea of identifying people as biracial or multiracial?
What could have cause loss of power via the use of the term biracial and multiracial?
Who are some of the opponents of biracial and multiracial as identifiers?
What determined a child's social identity?
What heritage system do Southeast tribes use?
What were multiracial children with a tribal mother considered to be in tribes of the Southeast?
What race did the Omaha view a multiracial child with a white father to be?
How could a white child be considered a member of the Omaha tribe?
Who was a doctor?
Who did the relative of the doctor marry?
Who was the doctor related to?
Who met their husbands at the Hampton institute?
What tribe was Eastman related to?
Who said many African Americans have NAtive American heritage?
Who disproved Sherrel's hypothesis?
Who hosts a TV series on the genetic history of African Americans?
What jobs did the earliest Europeans who mingled with natives hold?
Who started marrying or having unions with native women after settlment increased?
Why did Chesapeake Bay colonists begin to buy slaves?
Who first imported slaves to New York?
Who freed some of the early slaves?
President Thomas Jefferson had a relationship with who?
What was the name of the Smithsonian-Monticello exhibit that discussed their relationship?
How long were Jefferson and Hemmings in a relationship?
Which child of Jefferson identified as black?
How much of the children of Jefferson and Hemmings were white?
Where did most Chinese men enter the US?
Who imported Chinese laborers?
What cause wives to be unable to move to the US with their Chinese husbands after 1882?
What did racial bias generally mean for Chinese people?
What did Chinese laborers do after they left that line of work?
What office is responsible for the census form changes?
When did the OMB change racial guidelines for the census form?
What did the OMB vote to allow on the 2000 census?
When were the OMB racial directive made mandatory for every government form?
What was the result of a child having an African mother?
What is the rule that allows children with white fathers to be slaves?
Who was the first African American to gradute from Vassar College?
What makes a person mulatto?
What does a person have to have to be an octoroon?
Why did Steele think people were not attacking Barrack Obama?
What does Condoleeza Rice prefer to term people as?
What did President Sarkozy think Secretary of State Rice was?
Who is Charles Kenzie Steele Jr?
Why did Steele say what he did?
When was the wedding of Rolfe and Pocahontas?
What did English laws not exclude people with some native blood from being?
Who married Indigenous women early on?
Where did Rolfe marry Pocahontas?
Who was an ancestor of the First Families of Virginia?
What has helped geneologists researching slaves?
What were slaves usually not allowed to do?
What replaced written records for black families?
Who caused the Census Burea to drop the terms free people of color and mulatto?
When were the terms mulatto and free people of color taken off the census?
Who did colonists ask for help in returning runaway slaves?
When was a treaty with the Iroquis made to return slaves?
What asked for the return of slaves who married indigenous americans or spoke their language?
How did natives and Africans come to know each other?
Why did natives consider Africans to have a 'Great Medicine'?
What are many Latin American migrants?
What do latinos consider a light skinned mulatto to be?
Who is overlooking darker skinned latino multiracial people?
What does the typical latino in media look like?
Before 1920, how would a person be white by law?
What year was mulatto left off the US Census?
Who is responsible for the Census Bureau discarding the mulatto category?
Who wrote an article in the New York Dail News about Obama?
What did David Ehrenstein call Obama in 2008?
What did Ehrenstein say Obama does for white people?
What was the title of Crouch's article?
What does the "mixture" heading mean?
What year did the US Census write in response category have a code-listing?
Bi-racial would be coded as what?
How many race options were there?
What is considered to be neglected in American history?
When is it recorded that Africans and natives interacted earliest?
Where did Africans escape and mate with naitves?
Where did Ayllon lay down a Spanish colony?
How many slaves were at San Miguel de Gualdape at its inception?
When did people lobby for allowing more than one category to be selected on legal forms?
How did the public react to the categories of "bi-racial" and "multiracial"?
Which political leaders spoke out against the proposed designations?
What did they fear would happen?
Who married Sacagewea?
Who made up most unions between Europeans and natives?
What factor affected the ability of a child to be in a tribe?
What nations are considered matrilineal?
How could a white child be considered a member of the Omaha tribe?
What brought African Americans together?
Who made it next to impossible to learn about their heritage for African Americans?
Slaves were not allowed to do what?
What did Indigenous Americans not do that makes it difficult to trace their heritage?
What factors did not affect racial solidarity amoung African Americans?
What stock character lived with her white father until he left the picture?
Who was the first to use the tragic octoroon?
What story was written by Child in 1842?
What does the tragic octoroon point out?
Who used the figure of the tragic octoroon?
Who identified the active substance?
Who developed the method to obtain epinephrine in a pure state?
Who marketed epinephrine?
What trade name was epinephrine marketed under?
As an inhaler, what was epinephrine used to treat?
Who developed the method to get epinephrine in it's pure form?
What could epinephrine treat?
When did epinephrine stop being available in the United States?
What trade name was epinephrine marketed under?
In what year was epinephrine discovered?
What was the trade name of epinephrine?
Who first discovered epinephrine?
What is epinephrine used to treat?
In what year was Primatene Mist no longer sold in the United States?
Who developed Amphetamine?
Who synthesized Amphetamine for asthma?
What are common side effects of Amphetamine?
When were tricyclic antidepressants developed?
What were some uses for Amphetamine?
Ephedrine was used as an oral medicine for what illness?
In what year was amphetamine first tested on asthma patients?
What was the trade name of amphetamine as a nasal decongestant?
In what year did the American Medical Association approve amphetamine for medical use?
In what decade were tricyclic antidepressants created?
What is diabetes caused from?
Why was insulin therapy delayed?
How can diabetes be induced in dogs?
Before insulin, what was the life expectancy of diabetics?
Who discovered that pancreatic extract reversed symptoms of pancreas removal?
Diabetes is caused by the removal of what organ?
Left untreated, how long were diabetic patients were expected to live?
What could be adjusted in a sample of pancreatic extract to produce purer insulin?
To purify insulin, Banting and Best sought the assistance of what company?
Minkowski and von Mering did surgical tests on what animal?
What is phenobarbital used for?
Who discovered a reaction that induced sleep in dogs?
What sleep aid was marketed in 1904?
What is amphetamine used for today?
Why was barbiturates and amphetamines restricted?
What compound was discovered to induce sleep?
What was the first trade name of diethylbarbituric acid?
What is phenobarbital mainly used to treat today?
In what year was phenobarbital discovered?
What was Veronal used for when Bayer put it on the market?
Who developed Arsphenamine?
What was the first effective treatment for Syphilis?
What complications are associated with Syphilis?
What is Amphetamine's market name?
Where is the Institute of Experimental Therapy located?
Bacterial infections could be treated with medicines containing what kind of dye?
What was the name of the first synthetic bacterial drug?
Arsphenamine became the first treatment for what previously incurable disease?
In what year was arsphenamine discovered?
What was the commercial name of arsphenamine?
Who manufactured "Elixir Sulfanilamide"?
What was one of the things the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act do?
What year did Congress pass the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act?
What drug killed 100 people in 1937?
What is Diethylene Glycol commonly used for now?
What company manufactured Elixir Sulfanilamide? 
What drug killed over 100 people in 1937?
Diethylene glycol is mainly used today as what liquid?
What law did Congress pass following the Elixir Sulfanilamide incident?
The name "elixir" implied a solution in what liquid?
When was the first effective treatment for Tuberculosis discovered?
50% of tuberculosis-infected people died within 5 years where?
What drug effectively treated Tuberculosis?
Who was Eli Lilly's work based off of?
Where was Tetracyclines discovered?
What was the first treatment for tuberculosis?
What percentage of patients infected with tuberculosis died within 5 years?
In what year was streptomycin discovered?
Many more antibiotics were made following the end of what war?
What company funded the research that led to the discovery of streptomycin?
When was the Polio vaccine created?
Who announced that SV40 was not associated with cancer?
Who identified the SV40 virus?
What was a complication of the SV40 virus?
Who funded the Polio vaccine?
In what year was the polio vaccine created?
Who created the polio vaccine?
What virus caused tumors in most mammals?
Who identified the SV40 virus?
SV40 was present in what vaccine?
How much was the settlement GlaxoSmithKline agree to?
What was one of the causes of the health-care fraud case?
When did GlaxoSmithKline plead guilty?
What drugs were related to a kickback scheme?
What drugs were used for off-label uses?
In what year did GlaxoSmithKline pay a $3 billion dollar settlement?
How much was the largest healthcare fraud case in the US settled for?
What company was sued for promoting medicines for unlicensed uses and bribing doctors?
What is the Physician Financial Transparency Report part of?
Where can you obtain information about the Sunshine Act?
What information is collected by Centers for Medicine & Medicaid Services?
When did Centers for Medicine & Medicaid Services have to start collecting information?
The Physician Financial Transparency Reports was part of what other act?
In what year were Medicaid and Medicare required to disclose information about their relationships with doctors and hospitals?
Where can financial relationships between Medicaid, Medicare and pharmaceutical companies be found?
What is expected when the relationships are made public?
What disease had the biggest decline of deaths?
What was responsible for the decline in spreading diseases?
What period was the report issued in 1958 cover?
Who issued the report in 1958?
What were eight diseases examined for?
How much did the mortality rate of common bacterial infections decline between 1946-1955?
How much did the mortality rate of tuberculosis drop between 1946-1955?
Who issued a report describing the effects of antibiotic developments?
In what year was the FTC's report issued?
How much did treatment for each patient in Africa cost?
Who backed the South African government which caused the case to be dropped?
Who brought litigation to South Africa?
How many signatures were collected by MSF?
When was litigation brought to South Africa?
How many companies sued South Africa for its Medicines Act?
South Africa's Medicines Act allowed for the generic production of what kind of drugs?
How much did ARV drugs cost patients yearly?
How many signatures were collected supporting public health rights?
What Act forbade misbranded drugs?
What caused a Tetanus outbreak?
What act allowed premarket approval for drugs?
When did the Pure Food and Drugs Act get implemented?
Who restricted the federal government's enforcement powers?
What was the name of the law that required premarket approval for producing drugs?
What law banned the interstate distribution of mislabeled food and drugs? 
In what year was the Pure Food and Drugs Act passed?
Who adopted the Doha Declaration?
What did the TRIPS agreement accomplish?
Why are patents criticized?
What did the Doha Declaration do?
When was the Doha Declaration adopted?
What has been accused of reducing access to medicines in developing countries?
The Doha Declaration allows for what ways for monopolies to be bypassed?
When did the World Trade Organization adopt the Doha Declaration?
How much money was recovered through the False Claims?
What are some of the schemes used to defraud the health care system?
What is pharmaceutical fraud?
Who had the biggest fraud case settlement?
What provision rewards "whistle-blowers"?
What kind of fraud financially benefits a drug company?
Who is affected by pharmaceutical fraud?
How much money lost to pharmaceutical fraud was recovered in 2010?
Which act allows whistleblowers to recover money lost from pharmaceutical fraud?
What drugs reduce the risk of death and other events in people with high blood pressure?
Who conducted the review on Thiazide Antihypertensive drugs?
What were Thiazide Antihypertensive drugs used with?
What do ACE inhibitors do?
In what year did Cochrane release the report?
What reduces the risk of new onset kidney diseases and death?
What type of drugs reduced the risk of strokes and heart disease for people with high blood pressure?
In what year was thiazide antihypertensive drugs shown to help those with heart problems?
Who put out a report in 2012?
What has been argued restricted innovation?
What was a recommendations brought about from the report?
What is one thing excessive regulations causes?
What can be used to evaluate new approval processes?
What is excessive drug regulation said to suppress?
In what year was a report made to reduce the burdens of drug development?
What was argued to be holding back new knowledge for treating diseases?
Who discovered Hydralazine?
Why were the researchers recognized in 1975?
Who developed Chlorothiazide?
What is  Chlorothiazide used to treat?
What was the main shortcoming in the drug Hydralazine?
What was the name of the first oral vasodilator?
What is the most used antihypertensive drug today?
Beyer, Sprague, Baer, and Novello received what award in 1975?
In what year was hydralazine discovered?
Chlorothiazide helped reduce the mortality rate among those with what disease?
What act needed provisions?
Who led the congressional hearings?
What were the major issues that needed to be addressed?
What caused a need for more regulation?
When did this push occur?
Congressional hearings emerged addressing revisions to what act?
Who led the Congressional hearings in 1959?
Did the US Congress call for more or less regulation of pharmaceuticals?
What did the first measles prevent in it's first 20 years?
Who originally created the measles vaccine?
How much did the occurrence of serious diseases shortly after the release of the measles vaccine?
When did the Rubella vaccine come out?
Who recreated the measles vaccine?
In what year was the measles vaccine made?
Who helped refine the measles vaccine?
In what year was the mumps vaccine made?
How much did rubella, measles, and mumps infections drop after vaccination?
Measles vaccinations helped prevent how many estimated cases of the illness?
When did the Kefauver-Harris Amendment become a law?
What did this new law require?
What did the National Academy of Science's study discover?
How long after the National Academy of Science's study did a study on over the counter drugs occur?
What brought up enhancement of drug regulations?
When did the Kefauver-Harris Amendment became law?
What federal agency regulated the advertising of prescription drugs?
Drugs made between which years had to be tested before going to market?
What percentage of drugs were shown to be ineffective after an FDA study?
What law prohibited birth control?
When was Enovid first approved?
What increased due to the availability of birth control?
Who created the first oral birth control?
In 1965, how many women were on the birth control pill?
Discussing contraception sometimes led to prosecution under what laws?
What was the name of the first oral contraceptive?
By 1965, about how many American women were taking Enovid?
When did the FDA approve Enovid?
Birth control was prohibited in most countries before what war?
Who received the Laser-Debakey Clinical Medical Research Aware?
How much money did Merk make in 1995?
How many patients received Zocor?
What study did Merk sponsor in 1994?
What did the study reveal after 5 years?
What was the brand name of simvastatin?
Patients treated with Zocor had their cholesterol reduced by how much?
How much did Zocor reduce the chance of dying from a heart attack?
How much money did Merck make from sales of Zocor and Mevacor?
Endo received what award in 2008?
What is a drug discovery?
Who is usually responsible for early stages of drug discovery?
What is used to manipulate pathways?
What is involved in drug discovery?
What focuses on metabolic pathways?
What is the name of the process in which possible drugs are discovered?
What groups carry out most early drug discoveries?
What kind of technology studies the understanding and manipulation of disease states and pathogens?
Most drugs have been found by isolating what from traditional remedies?
How much does it cost to develop a new drug?
How many approvals of new drugs happen every year?
Who is responsible for approval or rejection of new drugs?
How many drugs were approved in 2007?
Who reported the stable average rate in 2012?
What does NMEs stand for?
How many pharmaceutical drugs were approved on average since 2001?
What is the approximate cost of developing a new drug, including the costs of failure?
What has been the stable approval rate of new drugs?
What drugs are the least expensive to develop?
What accounts for nearly half of the costs to develop drugs?
What is the consequence in the value chain?
What happens when companies outsource?
What is re-formulations of active ingredients referred to?
Investing capital can increase drug development costs by how much?
What kind of companies have had a more important role in drug development?
What firms tend to outsource drug development?
Why was Mevastatin never marketed?
Who discovered Mevastatin?
What is HMG-CoA responsible for producing?
Where did Endo discover ML-236B?
What was discovered in long term studies?
In what year was mevastatin discovered?
Who discovered mevastatin?
What organism produces mevastatin?
What enzyme helps produce cholesterol?
Who conduced an investigation on doctors?
Billions of dollars have been paid by which companies?
How much was discovered to have been paid to doctors by drug companies?
What was the reason these companies have to pay fines?
How many doctors have been paid by varies companies?
A ProPublica study found that some doctors were being paid how much money for speeches?
Half of the top earners were mostly in what field?
Drug manufacturers paid off doctors a total of how much money?
Why are collaborative agreements important?
How do large corporations show vertical integration?
What are large companies relying on outside organizations for?
What are smaller organizations responsible for?
What type of integration do large corporations often do?
What type of integration do smaller organizations do?
What type of agreements are made to research potential new drugs?
What type of organizations are multinational corporations increasingly rely on?
Who is the core guide?
Who is responsible for approving drugs in the United Kingdom?
After an approval in the United States, when does an approval occur in the United Kingdom and other countries?
Who decides how NHS will allow drugs?
Who does the evaluations for drugs in the United Kingdom?
What UK firm approves pharmaceutical drugs?
What UK organization evaluates drugs? 
What firm in England and Wales decides if the NHS allows drugs?
What is the name of the core guide for pharmacists and clinicians?
What is subject to the Orphan Drug Act?
What is given to companies who develop drugs for "orphan diseases"?
Why are these companies rewarded?
What size of disease populations are subject to the Orphan Drug Act?
What is one financial benefit to researching orphan drugs?
What is the length of time of market exclusivity of an orphan drug?
What is a term for rare diseases in some territories?
NICE decides the availability of drugs in which two countries?
What is the name of the organization in Scotland that decides the availability of drugs?
What threshold must a drug pass before it is approved?
How much money did the top ten bestselling drugs make in 2013?
What was the name of the top-selling anti-inflammatory drug in 2013?
What was the bestselling drug in history?
How much money did Lipitor make before the patent expired?
In what year did Pfizer's patent over Lipitor expire?
How long do drug exclusivity rights usually last?
Governments grant permission to market drugs after how many years?
What enables a drug's owner to recover R&D costs?
What kind of drug is produced by competitors once a patent expires?
What decade was the pharmaceutical industry's "golden era"?
The safety and efficacy of new drugs must be approved by what organization in the US?
What type of filing is used before beginning human trials?
How many phases of human trials may be done after IND approval?
What type of application is filed after completing three phases of human trials?
What type of risk assessment results in approving the drug to go on the market?
"Drug reps" are usually hired by what type of firms?
What law regulates drug marketing in the US?
Who do drug reps market to?
Drug reps have been accused of giving what to health professionals?
Drug marketers have hired who as paid consultants?
What publications can drug ads be commonly found?
In what year was Ali killed?
Who killed Ali?
Who made peace with Muawiyah I?
Where was the capital of the Umayyad dynasty?
What form of tax were Christians required to pay?
Who was the mother of Yazid?
What was Maysum's religion?
What opposition movement was based in Arabia and Basra?
Who sent an army in 683 to stop the opposition movements?
In what battle was the Medinese opposition movement defeated?
Where is the Kaaba located?
Where did Muawiyah fight Ali?
Who was appointed arbitrator by Ali?
In what battle did Ali fight the Kharjites?
What did the term Kharjites mean?
What tax did non-Muslims pay in the Umayyad period?
What was another term for Muslims who were not Arab?
Along with Christians and Jews, what was a major non-Muslim religious group under the Umayyads?
When did Uthman die?
What tribe did Ali belong to?
What does Fitna mean?
Along with being his cousin, what relationship did Ali have to Muhammad?
Where was the capital before Ali changed it?
What group murdered Uthman ibn al-Affan?
Who was Marwan I related to?
Who adopted Muhammad ibn Abi Bakr?
Who was the great grandson of Muhammad ibn Ali Bakr?
Where did Ibn al-Zubayr flee to in 680?
Who did Al-Husayn send to Kufa?
What did Ubayd-Allah bin Ziyad rule?
Who did Ubayd-Allah bin Ziyad murder?
When did Muhammad bin Wasim sail to Pakistan?
Along with the Punjab, what did Muhammad bin Wasim conquer?
At what battle did the Hindus of India defeat the Umayyads?
Who was a notable king in this period from the Pratihara dynasty?
To what dynasty did Vikramaditya II belong?
Where was the Dome of the Rock built?
In what year was the Dome of the Rock finished?
During whose reign was the Dome of the Rock constructed?
Who was the son of Sarjun?
Along with Rhodes, what Byzantine possession did Muawiyah occupy?
Who group of Christians rose up against Muawiyah?
What did Muawiyah found in North Africa?
Who appointed the governors in the Umayyad empire?
Where was the government of the Umayyads based?
Along with army leaders, police and civil administration, what did the governor control in his province?
What was the main city of Tokharistan?
What was the central part of Transoxiana called?
In what year did the Day of Thirst occur?
Who was the leader of the revolt of 734?
What notable battle occurred in 731?
What group were the Hashimiyya a sect of?
Who led the Hashimiyya movement?
Who was named successor by Abu Hashim?
Of what clan were the Abbasids members of?
What year saw the death of Abu Hashim?
When did the Umayyads begin to occupy Iberia?
What was the final year that the Umayyads held Narbonne?
What was Marwan II's name before he became caliph?
Who defeated the Arabs at the Battle of Tours?
In what year did the Berber Revolt begin?
What was the name of Muawiyah's wife?
What tribe did Muawiyah's wife belong to?
Where was the Kalb tribe based?
What was the religion of Muawiyah's wife's tribe?
What was the ethnicity of the Kalb tribe?
What Umayyad ruler is regarded as especially just and pious by Sunni scholars?
For whom did Umar end the jizya?
In what year did Umar ibn Ad Al-Aziz die?
What was Umar ibn Ad al-Aziz's cause of death?
What group did Umar ibn Ad Al-Aziz grant liberties to?
Who became leader of the Khurasan Hashimiyya in approximately 746?
What symbol did Abu Muslim use in his revolt against the Umayyads?
Where did Marwan die?
Who was the Umayyad governor of Khurasan who was defeated by Abu Muslim?
When did the Hashimiyya conquer Kufa?
In the later Abbasid era, what branch of Islam did Iran adhere to?
What notable work of Islamic history was written in Iran during the later Abbasid period?
What group was notably disliked in Iran after the Persian Empire fell?
Who first brought a postal service into Umayyad lands?
Along what highway did Umar bin Abdul-Aziz build caravanserais?
In dirhams, what was the yearly cost of the Iraqi postal service when Yusuf bin Umar was governor?
Along with horses and camels, what animals were used by the postal service?
In kilometers, how far apart was each stage of the Umayyad highways?
What nation lost the Battle of Yarmouk?
Who was the Byzantine leader at the Battle of Yarmouk?
Along with Syria, where did the Muslims extend their control after the Battle of Yarmouk?
Who was the father of Yazid ibn Abi Sufyan?
Along with Muawiyah, Abu Sufyan ibn Harb and Yazid ibn Abi Sufyan, what notable Muslim participated in the Battle of Yarmouk?
What were non-Muslim groups under the Umayyads called?
Along with Berbers, Zoroastrians and Christians, what notable non-Muslim group existed in the Umayyad Caliphate?
Along with Jews, what non-Muslim religion produced notable theological works under the Umayyads?
What is another name for people who recently converted to Islam?
Who argued that the Umayyads regarded Islam as a particularly aristocratic faith?
What sorts of families did the Umayyads show favor to?
What Christian saint was also an Umayyad administrator?
What tax collectors did the Umayyads often leave in place after they conquered regions?
In addition to criticism received for employing non-Muslims, for what notable reason did some Muslims criticize the Umayyads?
What Arabic term did the Umayyad caliphs use to refer to themselves?
Where was the Abbasid court based?
What is the Arabic term for kingship?
What was the tradition Arabic title used by caliphs?
What does khalifat Allah translate to in English?
What is used asphalt turned back into?
How much of yearly acquired asphalt is reclaimed?
What percentage of new roadways are surfaced with asphalt?
During what action is asphalt often reclaimed?
For what reason is asphalt removed from a road? 
How many asphalt upgraders operate in Alberta?
What synthetic product is produced by upgraders?
Besides crude oil, what does the Suncor Energy plant produce?
Where is a sixth upgrader being built in Alberta?
How much of the production of the Redwater plant will into diesel fuel?
What ancient group used bitumen extraction?
When were the first published reports of bitumen extraction in Albania?
What government had exploitation rights for bitumen extraction?
When were the Ottoman rights given to the Simsa company?
When was management of Albanian bitumen acquired by the French?
How are the words bitumen and asphalt frequently used?
Where is bitumen the usual term for refined residue from crude oils?
What group likes the term bitumen instead of asphalt?
What is a naming term for asphalt?
What is asphalt called outside of the US?
What is the name of the world's greatest deposit of bitumen?
Where are the Athabasca oil sands located?
What formative period  produced bitumen?
How old are the Athabasca deposits?
What percentage of recovery of bitumen is by oil wells?
When did Richard Tappin Claridge patent asphalt for use in pavement?
When was the first British patent for the use of bitumen?
Where had Claridge previously seen asphalt used as pavement?
What friend of Claridge's was helpful in introducing asphalt for use in pavements?
What type of pavement techniques had already been tried by a competitor of Claridge?
Since what date has asphalt been used for road paving in the US?
In front of what NJ building was the street paved with asphalt in 1870?
What natural substance was used in early road pavings?
From what Virginia  mines was asphalt obtained for early street pavings?
For what purpose was asphalt used in swimming pools and baths?
In what year was asphalt used for uses aside from road paving?
In what places were asphalt used as waterproofing?
For what reason was asphalt used in the flooring of buildings?
When was Claridge's asphalt the most often used? 
Many of what were granted in France, but denied in Britain?
Who experimented with bitumen extraction techniques to make shipping easier?
What researcher patented a hot water oil process to separate bitumen?
When did Ells begin using bitumen as a paving in Alberta?
Who constructed the Bitumont oil separation plant?
For what was most of the the Bitumont plant's output was used for waterproofing?
What does mixing bitumen with water create?
What percentage of bitumen is found in bitumen/water emulsions?
What are the two types of bitumen emulsions?
What are some bitumen emulsions blended with to make a low-cost product?
What kind of asphalt pavements an cold-mix asphalt resemble?
Besides fuels and paving, what accounts for most of the other use of bitumen?
What lacquer is bitumen used to make for iron and steel production?
Why is Japan black used for outdoor paint?
Besides weather resistance, why else is Japan black used in paints?
What product is bitumen used in manufacturing as a sealant?
What language originated the word bitumen?
What does the Sanskrit word translate as?
To what English word does the Latin translate?
 Through what language did bitumen pass to reach English?
To what word does the Anglo Saxon translate?
To what similar substance can asphalt be confused?
For what was coal tar used in road paving?
What is the common word is used to describe the combination of tar and macadam?
What use has pushed out the need to produce roads with coal tar?
Instead of tar, what does the La Brea Tars Pits contain?
In what year did Claridge acquire patents for the use of asphalt?
From what French mine did Claridge offer asphalt?
What did Claridge's formation of a company with distinguished backers help inspire? 
In what famous place did Claridge first begin to lay and test the use of asphalt pavement?
By 1838 how many companies beside Claridge's were offering asphalt?
What is done to crude bitumen to promote its movement through pipelines?
What is the natural gas condensate used to dilute bitumen?
What is the synthetic crude additive to bitumen called?
What is the usually sold standard blend of bitumen and oils named?
In what uniform use was Western Canadian Select meant to excel?
What component is added to bitumen to improve it?
To what other paving material is Selenizza added?
What purpose does Selenizza have in the drilling industry?
In what form is Selenizza offered?
How is Selenizza shipped?
To what type of aggregate did asphalt used to refer?
What is the mixture of bitumen and minerals called?
When mixed wit clay, what is bitumen called?
With what word in America, is bitumen used interchangeably?
What is the geological term for asphalt?
Which of Claridge's two tar macadams was the more successful?
When did Claridge's company liquidate?
What world event caused the end of Claridge's company?
What was the subsidiary company that lead Claridge into ruin?
What kind of money did Claridge  invest in attempting  to save his companies?
What is the biggest use of asphalt?
How much is the percentage of use of bitumen for roads is there in the US?
How much bitumen is in usual concrete mixtures?
What percentage of concrete mixes is aggregates?
How many concrete plants are in the US?
Who did Victoria marry?
What is her nickname that she was given because her children married into royal families across the continent?
In the later half of her reign, what happened to her popularity?
What year did Prince Albert die?
How many children did she have?
How many children did Queen Victoria and Prince Albert have?
What was the year of Alberts death?
Queen Victorias Golden and Diamond jubilees were a time of public what?
What was the name the first cousing that Victoria married?
What was the nickname given to Queen Victoria because all of her children married into noble families?
What was the name of the first cousin that Queen Victoria was married to?
Whatyear did Victoria marry Prince Albert?
How many children did Victoria and Albert have?
What year did Prince Albert die?
Due to Victorias mourning over Alberts death, what political party gained strength?
When did Queen Victoria get married?
What was the name of Victoria's husband?
What was Queen Victoria's nickname?
When did republicanism gain strength during Queen Victoria's reign?
How many children did Queen Victoria and Prince Albert have?
Who did Victoria marry?
When were Victoria and Prince Albert married?
How many children did Victoria and Prince Albert have?
What was Victoria's unofficial title?
When did Prince Albert die?
Who was extremely protective over Victoria?
What system of rules kept her isolated from other children?
Who was the Dutchess' rumored lover?
What was Victoria's dog's name?
During her free time, what did she play with?
Who did Victoria share a bedroom with when she was a child?
What languages did Victoria take lessons in?
What was the only language Victoria spoke at home?
Who was Victoria's mothers lover?
What is the formal name given to the system of rules Victoria was raised under?
What system did Victorias mother raise her under?
Who was Victorias mothers comptroller?
Who was rumored to be Victorias mothers lover?
Who was the Duchess's suspected lover?
What was the name of Victoria's childhood dog?
What was the Kensington System?
How did Victoria describe her childhood?
What languages did Victoria study? 
What was the name of Victoria's King Charles Spaniel?
What are some of the languages that Victoria studied?
What system was in place to raise and educate Victoria; while also rendering her weak and dependent?
Who was the Duchess' comptroller and cohort?
Who was included in the list of people that the Duchess and Sir John Conroy didn't want the Princess Victoria associating with?
Who was Victoria's eighth child?
What anaesthetic helped her give birth to her eighth child?
What did Victoria suffer from after he pregnancies?
Why did medical professionals advise against using an anaesthetic during childbirth?
What did Albert complain about Victoria?
What was the name of Victoria's eighth child?
Hysteria and loss of control after the birts of many of her children were likely caused by what?
What was the name of the new anesthetic given to Victoria for the birth of Leopold?
What year did Victoria give birth to her final child?
What was the name of Victoria's final child?
When did Victoria give birth to her eigth child?
What was the name of Victorias eighth child?
What was the name of the new anesthetic used during leopolds birth?
What year was victorias final child born?
What was the name of Victorias final child?
Who was Victoria's eighth child? 
When was Victoria's final child, Beatrice, born? 
What was the new anastethetic Victoria used in her last two childbirths? 
Why did members of the clergy oppose the use of chloroform? 
What did Albert complain about in letters to Victoria after the birth of her children? 
What was the name of Victoria's eigth child?
What was a new anaesthetic being used for childbirth in Victoria's time?
What was the name of Victoria's ninth child?
Why did members of the clergy oppose the use of chloroform for childbirth?
After nine pregnancies, what could Victoria have been suffering from that would make her sad and depressed?
During which year did Victoria's mother die?
How did Victoria realize that her mother deeply loved her?
What was Albert ill with?
What did Victoria blame Albert's death on?
What was Prince of Wales attending to in Dublin?
What year did Victoria's mother die?
What year did Albert die?
Who did Victoria blame for her poor relationship with her mother?
Who took on most of Victoria's duties while she grieved her mothers death?
What illness was Albert suffering from while he helped Victoria through her grief?
When did Victoria's mother die? 
What disease was Albert diagnosed with? 
When did Albert die of his illness? 
What was Victoria's nickname following Alberts death? 
Who was the Prince of Wales suspected to be having an affair with? 
When did the Duchess die?
Who did Victoria blame for the problems between herself and the Duchess?
What caused Prince Albert's death?
Who did Victoria blame for Prince Albert's death?
What gossip did Prince Albert hear about their son?
What year did Gladstone return to power?
How old was Gladstone in 1892?
What year did Gladstone retire?
What position did Victoria appoint Lord Rosebery?
What year did Gadstone return to power?
Who replaced Lord Rosebery the year following his appointment?
How old was Gladstone when he returned to power?
What year did Gladstone retire?
Who did Victoria appoint to replace Gladstone?
How old was Gladstone after the general election in 1892? 
What radical MP did Victoria object to being appointed to the cabinet by Gladstone? 
Who did Victoria appoint to Prime Minister after Gladstone retired in 1894?
Who replaced Lord Rosenbery after only a year of government? 
How long did Lord Salisbury remain as Prime Minister?
Who was returned to power in 1892?
Who did Victoria appoint as Gladstone's succesor?
How did Lord Roseberry fare as Prime Minister?
Who replaced Lord Roseberry as Prime Minister?
How long was Lord Sailsbury Prime Minister?
Which two people helped lift Victoria's body into the coffin?
What item from her wedding was Victoria dressed in inside her coffin?
What color was her dress?
Who's dressing gown was placed by her side?
A plaster cast of what part of Alberts body was placed in the coffin with the Queen?
Where was the funeral of Queen Victoria held?
What clothing was Queen Victoria laid to rest in?
What year did Queen Victoria die?
What was placed in the Queens left hand when she was placed in her coffin?
What did Victoria wear upon her death in her coffin? 
Whose lock of hair was concealed in her left hand by flowers? 
When did John Brown give Victoria his mother's wedding ring? 
When was Queen Victoria's funeral held? 
Where was Queen Victoria laid to rest after her death? 
Where was Victoria laid to rest?
When was Queen Victoria's funeral held?
What was hidden in Queen Victoria's hand by her father's family?
How was Victoria dressed for burial?
Who placed Victoria into her coffin?
Who was considered Victoria's best and kindest advisor?
Who did Victoria describe as sensible, kind, and amiable?
Who introduced Albert to Victoria?
What Uncle was Victoria's favorite adviser?
How old was Victoria when she met Albert?
Who introduced Victoria and Albert?
What qualities did Victoria believe Albert posessed when she met him?
Whom did Queen Victoria consider her "best and kindest adviser"? 
Who was Victoria not ready to marry at age 17?
What was Victoria's opinion of Albert's appearance? 
Who did Victoria credit for her relationship to Albert?
What did Victoria think of Albert at 17 years of age?
What were Albert's best qualities?
How did Victoria find Albert's looks?
How old was Victoria when she was introduced to Albert?
What did the Queen commission Sir Robert Peel to do?
In what year did Melbourne resign?
Which party was Sir Robert Peel a part of?
What is the name of crisis where the wives of the Tories were replacing the wives of the Whigs?
What year did Melbourne resign?
Who voted against the bill to end the constitution of Jamaica?
Who did the Queen commission to form a new ministry?
Who returned to office after Peel resigned?
The removal of the Queens bedchamber ladies became known as what?
Who resigned their position in 1839? 
Why did the Radicals and Tories oppose the bill about the constitution of Jamaica?
What Tory did Victoria commision after Melbourne resigned his postion? 
After Queen Victoria refuse to replace her ladies with wives of Tories, what did Sir Robert Peel do? 
Who did Victoria reappoint to the position after the Bedchamber Crisis? 
What did the Radicals and Tories do that made Melbourne resign?
Which group was resisting the abolisment of slavery and were subsequently removed from power when the bill was voted down?
Who did Robert Peel want to replace the ladies of the bedchamber with, instead of wives of Whigs?
Why did Peel resign his comission?
Who returned to office after Peel resigned?
Where was Orsini from?
Who did Orsini try to assassinate?
What happened in June 1859?
What position did Derby hold?
What was the date of an attempted assasination on Napoleon?
What was the name of the person that attempted to assasinate Napoleon?
What was the name of the French military port that opened on 5 August 1858?
Where was the bomb that Orsini used to attempt to assasinate Napoleon made?
Who resigned due to the attempt on Napoleons life?
Who survived an assasination attempt by the Italian refugee Orsini in 1858?
Who resigned their position following the scandal due to Orsini's bomb being made in England? 
What new military port in France did Victoria and Albert visit after the crisis in 1858?
Why did Victoria repremend Derby following her visit with Napolean III? 
Who did Victoria recall to office following her disappointment with Derby in June of 1859? 
Who attempted to assassinate Napoleon?
When did Orsinin attempt to assassinate Napoleon?
How did Orsini try to assassinate Napoleon?
When did Victoria ask Palmerston to resume his office?
Where did Victoria visit that led her to reprimand Derby for the state of the Royal Navy?
Who died in 1865?
Who resigned in 1868?
How long was Disraeli in office?
Who was Disraeli's rival?
What political view did Gladstone hold?
What year did Palmerston die?
Who let the ministry for a very short time after the death of Palmerston?
Who returned to power after Russels brief rule of the ministry?
Following Alberts death, what was the first year that Victoria attended the State opening of Parliment?
Who replaced Derby after his resignation?
What year did Pamerston die? 
What event did Victoria attend in 1866 for the first time following Albert's death?
What Act by Victoria granted the ability to vote to working men, but not women? 
Who replaced Derby when he resigned in 1868? 
What Liberal replaced Disraeli after only a few short months in office? 
When did Palmerston die?
Who was ultimately returned to office after Palmerston's death?
When did Derby resign?
Who was Derby's replacement?
How long did Disralei last in office?
How many kings and princes were invited to the Golden Jubilee?
What year anniversary does the Golden Jubilee celebrate?
Who accused Karim of spying?
What was Munshi lying about?
What year was Victoria's Golden Jubilee held?
Who did Ponsonby report the Munshis lies about his parentage to?
What was the name of the waited that was promoted to Munshi?
Whio was Equerry Frederick Ponsonby's father?
Who discovered that Victoria's new Munshi lied about his parentage?
When was Queen Victoria's Golden Jubilee? 
What was Abdul Karim teaching Queen Victoria after his promotion? 
Who was Karim accused of spying for by Victoria's family? 
Who discovered that Karim had lied about his parentage to Victoria? 
What day did Queen Victoria celebrate her Golden Jubilee at a dinner with kings and queens from other nations? 
When was Victoria's Golden Jubilee?
What is the point of the Golden Jubilee?
Who was promoted from waiter to Munshi?
Why did Victoria's family disapprove of Abdul Karim?
How long was Karim in the Queen's employment?
Who was the first reigning monarch from Britain to set foot in Spain?
What year did Queen Victoria first set foot in Spain?
What year did Victoria stop her annual visits to Spain due to the Boer war?
Where did Victoria visit instead of Spain during the Boer war?
What year did Victoria's second son Alfred die?
Where did Victoria stay in Spain in 1889? 
What war prevented Queen Victoria from taking her annual trip to France in 1900?
What country did Victoria visit instead of France during the Boer War? 
Which of Queen Victoria's children died in July of that year? 
Where did Victoria often go for holiday?
In 1889, what was Victoria the first reining monarch from Britian to do?
Why did Victoria visit Ireland in 1861?
Why was Victoria advised not to visit France in April of 1900?
What tragedy did Victoria face in July of 1900?
In 1830, what part of England did Victoria travel to with Dutchess of Kent and Conroy?
What town did Victoria visit in the center of England on her trip with the Dutchess of kent and Conroy?
What years were journeys similar to the Queen trip to Melvern Hills made?
Willam was concerned that Victoria would was being portrayed as what because of her trips to central England?
Who was annoyed that Victoria was welcomed at each of her visits to central England?
Who was annoyed at how well recieved Victoria was on her tours of the countryside of England and Wales? 
Where did Victoria become seriously ill during one of her trips? 
Who did Victoria dislike so much she banned him from her presence once she became Queen? 
What position did Conroy try and fail to get Victoria to appoint him to during her illness and later? 
Who took Victoria on a trip to Malvern Hills in 1830?
Who was Victoria convinced to make her secretery when she was very ill?
How did Victoria feel about all of the trips?
What annoyed the King about the way Victoria was received at her stops?
Why did the King dislike Victoria taking the trips?
When she was made Queen, what did Victoria do about Conroy?
What year was the Indian Rebellion?
What company was dissolved after the Indian Rebellion?
What company ruled much of India before the end of the Indian Rebellion?
Who did the Queen condemn in the Indian Rebellion?
What ruler was dissolved after the Indian Rebellion in 1857?
Who encouraged Victoria to issue an official statement on the conflict of the civil war in India? 
What happened to the British possesions after the Rebellion of 1857? 
What statement was replaced in her proclamation about the civil war? 
Before 1857, who controlled most of India?
What caused the British East India Company to lose control of India?
What happened to the assets of the British East India Company after it was removed from power?
How did the Queen view the Indian Rebellion?
What did Victoria believe that an official proclamation transferring control from the company to the monarchy would do?
What year did Victoria fall down the stairs at Windsor?
After her fall down the stairs, what health issue was Victoria plaged with thereafter?
Who died 10 days after Victorias fall down the stairs?
How was Victoria notified of her youngest son leopolds death?
Who was Victorias private secretary during the years following her accident at Windsor?
When was Queen Victoria get injured after taking a fall down some stairs? 
Who did Queen Victoria write a biography about that was never published? 
Where did Victoria's youngest son, Leopold die? 
Victoria initially opposed Beatrice's marriage to what man? 
Where did Beatrice meet and fall in love with Prince Henry? 
What caused Victoria's rheumatism?
Who died 10 days after Victoria's accident?
What did Victoria begin working on after Brown's death?
Who was opposed to Victoria writing a biography of Brown?
What happened in Victoria's life on the day after the one year anniversary of Brown's death?
What blood clotting disease did Victorias youngest son have?
How many of Victorias daughters were carriers of the blood clotting disease that Leopold had?
It was believed that Victorias true father was a hemophiliac and not who?
What is the sex of carriers that always suffer the blood clotting disease haemophi;ia B?
How old was Victorias father at the time of her conception?
What disease did Victoria's youngest son have? 
Which two of Victoria's daughters also were carriers for the blood clotting disorder? 
Who was Queen Victoria's father rumored to be instead of the Duke of Kent?
What disease affected Leopold and was carried by two of Victoria's daughters?
Which Royal haemophiliacs are said to have descended from Victoria?
Which of Victoria's daughters were carriers of haemophilia?
What is a big factor on whether or not an offspring will spontaneously develop haemophilia?
In how many births do spontaneous cases of haemophilia arise?
Who was Queen Victorias father?
What year did Victorias Father die?
How old was Victoria when she inherited the throne?
What year did King George III die?
What nationality was Queen Victorias mother?
What was the name of Victoria's father? 
When did the Duke of Kent die? 
What was Victoria's mother's name?
At what age did Victoria inherit the throne, upon the death of her father's three eldest brothers?
Who was Victoria's father?
Who raised Victoria?
When did Victoria inherit the throne of England?
Why did Victoria inherit the throne?
What kind of government did England have at the time?
What was Victorias place in line of succession to the throne when she was born?
What year did Victoria's father and grandfather die?
What year did Victorias Uncle George IV die?
What was th elength of time between the deaths of Victoria's father and grandfather?
What year did the Duke of York die?
What place was Victoria in the line of succession after her birth? 
Whose infant daugheters both died, leaving him without an heir to the throne of England? 
When did George IV die? 
What was the Regency Act of 1830?
Who distrusted the Duchesses capability to reign in Victoria's place until she became of age? 
Where did Victoria fall in the line of succession?
Who came in line for the throne before Victoria?
What happened when Victoria's Uncle George IV died?
Who was Victoria's last surviving uncle?
Who was to act as regent if George died while Victoria was still a minor?
On what date did Victoria turn 18?
On what date did William IV die?
How old was William IV when he died?
What was the exact time that Victorias Uncle, the King, died?
What is the name given to Victoria on official documents?
When did Victoria turn 18?
When did Victoria become Queen upon William IV's death? 
What name was Victoria referred to as on only the first day of her reign?
How old was Victoria's Uncle, King Willaim on his death? 
Who informed Victoria of her Uncle's passing and that she was now to become Queen of England? 
What caused Victoria to become the Queen of the United Kingdom?
Who came to tell Victoria that she was to be Queen of the United Kingdom?
What name did the first official documents of Victoria's monarchy have her listed as?
How old was William IV when he died?
Where did she receive the news that she was to be queen?
What was the marital status of Victoria when she became the queen?
Whi did Victoria have to live with because she was unmarried?
Victoria and her mother had differences over what system?
Victoria and her mother had differences over her mothers reliances on who?
Where was Victorias mother assigned to live?
What did Victoria and her mother disagree on? 
Whom did Victoria's mother continue to rely on, despite Victoria's displeasure? 
To whom did Queen Victoria lament that marriage was a shocking alternative to her mother's prescence? 
Where did both Queen Victoria and her mother reside after she became Queen? 
Where did Victoria live at the beginning of her reign?
Why did Victoria live with her mother at the beginning of her reign?
What could have allowed Victoria freedom from living with her mother?
How did Victoria feel about having to be married in order to escape living with her mother?
How did Victoria feel about the prospect of having to live with her mother, no matter how far away in the palace they put her?
What was the name of the man that tried to shoot Queen Victoria?
Why did Francis fail to kill Queen Victoria?
On what date did John Francis try to shoot Queen Victoria?
Where was Queen Victoria when Francis tried to shoot her?
What happened to Francis after his attempt to shoot Victoria?
Who made two unsuccessful attempts on Queen Victoria's life in 1842?
What was John Francis's eventual sentence for the attempt on the Queens life? 
Who shot at Queen Victoria on July 3, days after John Francis's sentence was commuted? 
Who fired a shot at Queen Victoria's carriage in 1849?
What person recieved a seven year transportation sentence for striking Victoria on the head with his cane? 
Who escaped Victoria's guards after attempting to fire a shot at her?
What happened to John Francis after his second attempt to fire on the Queen?
What did John William Bean try to fire at Queen Victoria?
What were the consequences of John William Bean's attempt to fire at the Queen?
When did William Hamilton fire a powder charge at Victoria's carriage?
What political party was Russells ministry?
What was president Bonapartes name changed to?
What was the name of the foreign secretary that Victoria found offensive?
To whom did Victoria complain about Palmerston?
What year was Palmerston removed from office?
What position did Lord Palmerston hold?
What scandal prompted Palmerstons removal in 1851?
President Bonaparte was declared what in France? 
Who briefly replaced Russell as Prime Minister? 
What did Victoria express her displeasure at to Russell about Palmerton? 
Who was the Foreign Secretary of Russell's ministry?
To what party did Russell and Palmerston belong?
What replaced Russell's administration?
What happened to President Bonaparte in 1852?
Whom did Palmerston fail to gain approval from befoe announcing the support of the British government of Napoleon's coup? 
The Dutchesses brother Leopold was the King of what country?
What year did Leopold become King of the Belgians?
Who was the nephew of leopold?
Who was Alberts father?
How did Victoria describe the physical appearance of Alexander?
Who disapproved of the proposed marriage between Victoria and Albert?
Who was the man William IV wanted Victoria to wed instead? 
Prince Alexander was the second son of whom? 
What did Victoria think of her suiter, the Prince Alexander of Orange? 
How did Victoria feel about Albert?
Who wanted to see Victoria and Albert marry?
Who opposed Victoria marrying Albert, or any Coburg?
Who did William IV feel was a suitable husband for Victoria?
What health issue did Flora hastings develope that began to ruin Victorias reputation?
What was the job of lady Flora Hastings in Victorias household?
What was Flora hastings abdominal growth rumored to be?
Who was rumored to be the father of Flora Hastings "pregnancy"?
What year did Victorias reputation begin to suffer?
What lady in waiting was at the heart of a 1839 court scandal?
What was the cause of Lady Flora's death in July? 
With whom did Lady Flora consipire against Queen Victoria? 
What was Queen Victoria called after Lady Flora's death due?
Who, in Victoria's court, was accused of having a pregnancy outside of mariage?
Who was believed to be the father of Lady Flor's "baby"?
What did Victoria think of Lady Flora?
Why did Victoria hate Sir Conroy and Lady Flora?
What was actually the cause of Lady Flora's "pregnancy"?
What year was the Third French Republic established?
Where was the republica rally held that called for Vuictorias removal?
Who spoke against Victoria at the rally in Trafalgar Square?
In 1871, Victoria became seriously ill with an abscess on what part of her body?
Who lanced and treated the abscess on Queen Victorias arm?
How was the republican sentiment in Britain changed?
Where was a rally calling for Queen Victoria's removal held? 
What cutting edge treatment did Joseph Lister use to treat Queen Victoria's illness?
What disease nearly took the Prince of Wales life? 
WHat was a new antiseptic being used to treat abcesses in the 1870's?
What helped to boost the rebublicians in 1870?
When did the Third French Republic come onto the scene?
WHat was a new antiseptic being used to treat abcesses in the 1870's?
What disease was contracted by the Prince of Wales that nearly ended his life?
Who spoke against Victoria at Trafalgar Square?
After what event did the Prince of Wales' health begin to improve?
What year was Queen Victorias first pregnancy?
Who attempted to assasinate Victoria while she was riding in a carriage?
How old was Edward Oxford?
Who was riding in the carriage with Victoria when Oxford attempted to assasinate her?
How many times did Oxford fire the gun at Victoria and miss?
Who tried to assassinate Queen Victoria while she was pregnant with her first child?
Queen Victoria and Prince Albert had how many more children after Victoria's birth? 
When was Queen Victoria's first daughter born? 
What year was Albert Edward, Queen Victoria's first born son born? 
What major life event was Victoria facing when she also had to contend with her first assassination attempt?
When was Victoria's first assassination attempt?
What did the first assassination attempt do for Victoria's reign?
What was Edward Oxford charged with after his assassination attempt?
What happened to Edward Oxford to after he was found guilty of high treason?
Who did Victoria try to convince Disraeli  to act against during the Russo-Turkish war?
What impact did Victorias threats have on the impact of the Russo=Turkish war?
What Disraeli policy did Victoria endorse?
Who lost the Disraeli general election in 1880?
Who returned as prime minister when Disraeli lost the general election in 1880?
What caused Queen Victoria to threaten to abdicate five times? 
What ended the Russo-Turkish War?
Why did Queen Victoria want to take over other countries? 
Who was elected Prime Minister after Disareli lost the election in 1880?
To whom did Queen Victoria dedicate a memorial after his death for grateful service? 
What position did Victoria take on how to be a successful and top notch power?
Who won the 1880 general election?
What conflicts can be attributed to Disraeli's stance on foreign policy?
What did Victoria place to memorialize Disraeli?
who was britains closest ally since the Crimean war?
When did Napoleon iii visit London?
Where did Napoleon Meet Victoria and Albert?
Napoleon accompanied Victoria and Alber to what city diring the visit?
Victoria and Albert were the guests of honor at a large ball that took place where?
Who was Britains's closest ally following the Crimean War?
What did Napoleon III and the royal couple visit? 
When were Napoleon I remains returned to their resting place at Les Invalides? 
How many guests attented a ball at the Palace of Versaille with Napoleon III and the royal couple in attendence?
Where did Napoleon III meet Victoria and Albert, before accompanying them to Paris?
When were Napoleon I's remains interred in his mausoleum?
Who was Britian's closest ally after the Crimean War?
Where were Victoria and Albert honored guests at ball thrown by Napoleon III?
When did Napoleon III visit London?
What was the name of the manservent that Victoria had in the 1860's?
Where was John brown, Victorias manservant, from?
What kind of a connection was rumored to exist between Victoria and John Brown?
What was the nickname given to Queen Victoria when rumors of a relationship with John Brown arose?
What was the name of the 1997 movie depicting the relationship between Victoria and John brown?
What country was Queen Victoria's manservant with whom she was rumored to have a romantic interest?
What was the name of the movie that told the story of Queen Victoria's romance with John Brown?
What artist painted the Queen and Brown which hung in the Royal Academy?
In what memior written by Queen Victoria was John Brown praised?
Which manservent was Victoria's most trusted ally?
Which movie was made about the scandalous affair that Victoria was believed to have had with John Brown?
Which book did Victoria publish that did nothing to take away from the rumors about her and John Brown?
Who did the Queen feature in her book that drew so much criticism?
Where did Victoria spend the Christmas of 1900?
Where was osborne House that Victoria spent christmas at located?
What had caused Victoria to be lame?
Why was Victorias eyesight clouded?
What was the date of Queen Victorias death?
Where was Osborne House located?
When did Queen Victoria die? 
How old was Queen Victoria upon her death? 
Who was Queen Victoria's successor after her death? 
Who did she wish to see on her deathbed, making it her last request? 
Where did Victoria usually spend Christmases?
What caused Victoria limited mobility later in life?
Whaen did Queen Victoria die?
How old was Victoria when she died?
Who was Queen Victoria's successor?
What Act did Disraeli push through Parliment in 1876?
In 1876 Victoria held what title?
What year was the Public Worship Regulation Act passed?
What Church did Victoria consider herself aligned with?
In a general election of what year was Disraeli returned to power?
What removed Catholic Rituals from Anglican services? 
Which church did Queen Victoria consider her favorite? 
Who published the Royal Titles Act of 1876?
When was Queen Victoria named the Empress of India? 
Where was the new title of Empress of India proclaimed? 
When was Disraeli returned to office?
What change, supported by Victoria, did Disraeli make to the Anglician liturgy?
Where did Victoria really align herself when it came to religion?
What allowed Victoria to become the Empress of India?
Whic act, passed by Disraeli, allowed him to alter the Anglician liturgy?
What kind of monarchy was formed under Queen Victoria?
Reforms to what system increased the power of the house fo commons?
As Victorias rule became less polital, what values were emphasized?
What type of monarchy was established as time went on in Victorias rule?
How did the reforms of Britains voting system affect the House of Commons? 
What was most important as the monarchy under Queen Victoria shifted from political to symbolic? 
What idea was solidified to which the increasing middle classes in Britain could identify with?
What was Queen Victoria's reign considered? 
What kind of government was Victoria's reign leaning towards?
What increased the power in the House of Commons?
Who paid the price for the reforms of the voting system?
Rather than political, what was Victoria's monarchy seen as?
What was a monarchy that the more middle clas could get behind and support?
What year did Gladstone resign?
Gladstone resigned after what was defeted?
Victoria blamed Gladstone for the death of who?
Who replaced Gladstone after he resigned?
How long did Lord Salisburys government last?
What man was Gladstone blamed for after his death at Khartoum?
Who replaced Gladstone for only a few short months? 
What did the bill Gladstone failed to pass state, much to Queen Victoria's pleasure? 
Who defeated Gladstone yet again in the general elction?
Why did Gladstone resign in 1885? 
When did Gladstone resign?
Why did Gladstone resign?
How did Victoria feel about the resignation of Gladstone?
Who's death did Victoria blame on Gladstone?
Who replaced Gladstone?
How many words a day did Victoria write?
What year did Victoria begin keeping a journal?
How many volumes was Queen Victorias journal?
Who was Victorias youngest daughter?
What did Beatrice do to her mothers diaries after her death?
How many journals did Queen Victoria write in her lifetime?
What did Beatrice do with the journals after she transcribed and edited them? 
Who was appointed as Queen Victoria's literary executor upon her death? 
Who transcribed Queen Victoria's journals from 1832 to 1861? 
What biographer said Queen Victoria wrote an average of 2500 words a day in her journals?
How avid of a writer was the Queen?
How many volumes did her journal span?
What did Beatrice do with her mother's journals?
Who was Victoria's literary executer?
What did Beatrice do with the origional volumes of her mother's diaries?
What concept determines relationships between Grand Lodges?
What must two lodges be in, in order to inter-visit?
What, besides Recognition, must happen between two Grand Lodges in order for them to be considered in amity? 
What can be causes of one Grand Lodge withdrawing Recognition from another?
What are the members of a Grand Lodge called?
Gran Lodges are in what when they are in Masonic Communication with each other?
What concept is used to determine relations between Grand Lodges?
What does each Grand Lodge maintain?
What is not allowed when Grand Lodges are not in amity? 
What are the two most common reasons one Grand Lodge will withhold recognition from another?
When did ceremonial regalia first appear in the Masonic culture?
How long have historians been seeking information about the Masonic movement?
What kind of an oath do Masons take when they join?
What is the oldest written document about Freemasonary?
When was the Regius Poem written?
When did Masonic historians star seeking the origins of the Masonic Movement?
What are the old Masonic document referred as?
The Old Charges are dated from when to when?
The duties of its grades is an example of what historic documents?
Why did the Grand Orient de France conclude that Freemasonry shouldn't require religious belief?
What was removed from the Freemasonry constitution?
Who withdrew recognition from the Grand Orient de France?
What was a possible condition that made the United Grand Lodge of England withdraw it's recognition of the Grand Orient de France?
How was the belief of the existance of God and the immortal soul replaced in the constitution?
What year was it ruled that Freemasonry was not a religion?
What Grand Lodge had a withdrawal of recognition by the United Grand Lodge of England?
What was a motivation of the Grand Lodge of England's objection?
Who disputed the Lausanne Congress of Supreme Councils?
When were the first constitutions for Freemasonry printed?
Who composed the first printed constitutions for Freemasonry?
Which group was specifically excluded from Freemasonry in the printed constitutions?
What was created for women as Freemasonry began to spread?
When was the idea of the Lodges for Adoption abandoned?
When was the dawn of the Grand Lodge era?
Who composed the first printed constitutions for Freemasons?
Who is excluded from Freemasonry?
What were lodges called that included women?
Who abandoned the including of women in Freemasonry experiment in the early 19'th century?
What are some Protestant objections to Freemasonry?
What are Catholic objections to Freemasonry?
Who is generally accepted as the voice of Freemasonry?
Who do the Protestant anti-Masons believe is the absolute authority on the use of mysticism, Satanism and occultism in Freemasonry?
What was Albert Pike actually more of an expert in?
What religion alleged Freemasons as Satanic?
What religion alleged Freemasons as unnatural and irrational? 
Who was controversial among Freemasons?
Who has spoke for all Freemasons?
Albert Pike's opinions were grounded in what?
What put English Freemasonry at risk?
What did the Unlawful Socities Act ban?
When was the Unlawful Socities Act implemented?
What was each private lodge required to provide to the Clerk of Peace every year?
Who did the Grand Masters call upon to explain that Freemasonry was not an unlawful society?
English Freemasonry almost came to a halt in what year?
Why did English Freemasonry almost come to a halt in 1799?
What act was made in 1799 banning any meeting of groups that had to take an oath or obligation?
Who gave the Freemasons an exemption of the Act of 1799?
What year did parliament rescind the exemption of 1799 given to the Freemasons?
What are two things that anit-masonry usually associated with?
What year did the Ba'ath Party make Freemasonry a felony?
Who wrote that it was not suprising that the blame for 9/11 was trying to be blamed on a masonic world order?
According to  Professor Andrew Prescott, how long has antisemitism gone together with anti-masonry?
In some countries, anti-Masonry is related to what?
Who change the Iraqi legal and penal code in 1980?
Who suggested the September 11 attacks on the United States were inspired by a masonic world order?
What do most masonic rituals consist of?
What is the first degree of Masonry?
What is the second degree of Masonry?
What is the final degree of Masonry?
What things come with each new degree in Freemasonry?
The bulk of Masonic rituals consist of what?
What comes after the degree of Entered Apprentice?
What is the first of degree ceremonies?
What is the final degree in the Freemasons?
What annual ceremony do Freemasons have?
Whao has always opposed Freemasonry?
Why does the Catholic Church oppose the Freemasons so strongly?
Who issued the first Papal prounouncement against Freemasonry?
When was the first Papal prounouncement against Freemasonry made?
What was the most recent Papal prounouncement agasnst Freemasonry?
Who has the longest history of objection to Freemasonry?
What law banned books favoring Freemasonry?
The Roman Catholic Church objection to Freemasons are based on what?
What pope first issued Papal pronouncements against Freemasons?
What pope most recently issued Papal pronouncements against Freemasons?
What action is forbid by the Orthodox Greek Church to Freemasons?
What is the official stance on Freemasonry by the Greek Orthodox Church?
What would happen if someone in the Greek Orthodox Church became a Freemason?
When did the Orthodox Church of Greece proclaim being a Freemason was an act of apostacy?
Which other major religions hold the same beliefs, on Freemasonry, as the Orthodox Church of Greece?
In what year did the Orthodox Church of Greece declare that being a Freemason constituted an act of apostasy?
Freemasonry cannot be compatible with what according to the Orthodox Church?
Freemason cannot partake in what until they repent according to the Orthodox Church of Greece?
What belief is required of a candidate by the Grand Lodge?
Are candadites required to express belief in a specific religion?
Which branch of Freemasonry does not require a belief in a supreme being?
Which branch of Freemasonry accepts atheists?
Which branch of Freemasonry only accepts Christians?
Most Grand Lodges require a candidate to declare a belief in what?
Freemasons most common in Scandinavia only accept who as members?
What Freemason group accept atheists?
The Grand Orient de France is considered what type of Freemasonry?
What is Exclusive Jurisdiction?
What happens if two Grand Lodges try to establish themselves in the same area?
What can happen if two over-lapping Grand Lodges are in Amity and decide to share jurisdiction?
If two over-lapping Grand Lodges are in Amity and decide to waive Exclusive Jurisdiction, who must the other Grand Lodges recognize?
What must other Grand Lodges do if two over-lapping Grand Lodges cannot agree to share the territory?
What concept only recognizes one Grand Lodge in a given geographical area?
In what year did the Grand Lodge of New York Split into two separate rival factions?
When can Exclusive Jurisdiction be waived?
When was Maria Deraismes initiated into Freemasonry?
Why did Deraismes resign from Freemasonry?
What led to exclusively female bodies of Freemasons in England?
Who, along with Maria Dersaismes, started a mixed gender masonic lodge?
Who brought the message of mixed gender, practicing masonic lodges to the English speaking?
Who resigned from the Freemasons for their lodge to rejoin their Grand Lodge?
Maria Deraismes and who else started a mixed masonic lodge?
What year was Maria Deraismes initiated into the Freemasons?
What year was an all-female masonic lodge created?
What year was the all-female masonic lodge cast aside?
What do Islamic anti-masonics link Freemasonry to?
Why do muslim anti-masonics believe that the Freemasons want to destroy the Al-Aqsa Mosque?
What is another group that anti-masonic muslims link to zionism?
What are most of the arguements by anti-masonic muslims centered on? 
Who's interests are the muslin anti-masonics afraid that the Freemasons are protecting?
What do many Islamic and anti-Masonic argue about Freemasonry?
Some Muslims argue that Freemasonry promotes what?
What article states that Freemasonry work in the interest of Zionism?
How many Freemasons are believed to have been killed under Hitler's Nazi Regime?
What kind of prisioner was a Freemason considered to be?
What identifier did the Nazis make the Freemason prisioners wear?
Who was responsible for creating antisemetic and anti-masonic propaganda?
Where is most of the informaton about Freemasons persecuted in the Holocaust located?
What is the Relch Security Main Office also called?
Who was responsible for ideological tasks of the written records?
How many Freemasons were killed under the Nazi regime?
Where are the origins of Freemasonry?
What were the fraternaties of stonemasons origionally responsible for?
Where did the degrees of Freemasonry derived from?
What are the degrees of Freemasonry?
Freemasons trace their origins to what?
How many grades are there in medieval craft guilds?
Craft Freemasonry is also known as what?
Members of Craft Masonry are called what?
How are Freemasons invited to join a lodge?
How does one become a Freemason?
Can women ask to be a member of the Masonic Lodge?
How can you find a lodge to ask to be a member of?
Candidates for Freemasonry must do what before being initiated? 
Candidates are normally introduced to the lodge by whom?
Now days, many interested people find a Masonic Lodge using what?
Candidates are never what to a Masonic lodge?
What usually follows an initial inquiry of a candidate?
How large is the membership of Freemasonry?
What is the largest single jurisdiction of Freemasonry?
How many members does the UGLE have?
What are the membership numbers of the United States?
How many members does the Grand Lodge of Scotland and the Grand Lodge of Ireland have, together?
How many members are in Freemasonry?
What lodge has the single largest single jurisdiction of Freemasonry?
How many members are in the Grand Lodge of England?
The Grand Lodges of Scotland and Ireland have how many member?
The United States has how many Freemason members?
Are masons allowed to divulge the secrets of each degree?
How are oaths taken?
In what branch can books, other than scripture, be used for the purpose of oath taking?
What can be considered a Volume of Sacred Law?
Masons swear to protect their brethren unless they what?
Most lodges have the oath taken on what?
Mason swear at each degree to do what?
Where were the earliest known American Logdes located?
What is the earliest that lodges appeared in America?
When was a Provincial Grand Master for North America appointed?
Where did other American Lodges obtain their authoriisations from?
When did the lodges without prior authorisations apply to be recognized?
Where were the earliest lodges in America?
Who was the Collector for the port of Pennsylvania in 1715?
A Provincial Grand Master for North America was first appointed when?
The Provincial Grand Master for North America was base where?
How long have Masonic Lodges been in Iraq?
How many lodges existed in Iraq in the 1950s?
What is the greatest penalty that a Freemason in Iraq could face now?
When were all the lodges in Iraq forced to close?
When was a Scottish Lodge formed in Iraq?
When did Masonic lodges start in Iraq?
Who opened the first Lodge in Iraq?
When was the first Scottish Masonic lodge opened in Iraq?
All Masonic lodges were forced to close in Iraq in what year?
Who introduced the death penalty to Freemasons living in Iraq?
When was the United Grand Lodge of England Formed?
The Grand Orient de France and the United Grand Lodge of England continued in amity until when?
What year did the Supreme Council of the Ancient and Accepted Scottish Rite of Louisiana appear in the jurisdiction of the Grand Lodge of Louisiana?
In what year was a new code to the Canon Law issued by the church?
Who clarified the new code of Canon law of 1983?
Do Freemasons allow Catholics into their fraternity?
Judges and police officers had to disclose their Freemason membership in what years in England?
Who ended the English Masonic disclosure policy in 2009?
Justice Secretary Jack Straw ended the Masonic disclosure law on what grounds?
What is the basic organizational unit of Freemasonry?
Name examples of usual formal business that Freemasons have at their lodge.
What usually happens at the conclusion of a lodge meeting?
When does a candidate swear to fullfil his obligations as a Mason?
What does a candidate swear on?
How many degrees must a Mason swear to keep the secrets from outsiders?
Are Freemasons free to explore the craft?
What concept is based on adherence to Masonic Landmarks, basic membership requirements, and tenets and rituals of the craft?
Is each definition of regularity the same throughout all Masonic Lodges?
When can a Grand Lodge declare another lodge as irregular?
All Freemasons are progressively initiated, passed, and raised in three degrees of what?
The initiations are part allegory and part what?
What is the final of the three steps of Freemasonry?
Who was the chief architect of the Temple of Solomon?
How many versions of the Hiram myth are there?
The Grand Lodge of England is also know as what?
When was the Grand Lodge of England founded?
The Ancient Grand Lodge of England was formed on what date?
The United Grand Lodge of England was formed on what date?
Lodges that could not endorse the GLE were later called what?
When did the French try to create co-masonic lodges?
When did the United Grand Lodge of England recognize the two female Masonic lodges?
What did the french lodges promote to try to get women accepted into the Freemasons?
Do Anglo-American grand lodges accept women as members today?
What English Archbishop was a member of the Freemasons?
What former Archbishop of Canterbury has reservations about the Freemasons?
What year did Dr. Rowan Williams apologize to the Freemasons?
Dr. Rowan Williams was also Bishop of what?
Freemasonry was linked to scandal in Italy due to what?
The Propaganda Due Lodge was chartered by who?
When did the Grande Oriente d'italia charter the Propaganda Due Lodge?
The Propaganda Due Lodge was also know as what?
When did the Grand Orient d'italia expel Licio Gelli and revoked the charter of P2?
What was the population of Israel in 2016?
How many citizens in Israel are Jewish?
How many citizens in Israel are Arab?
Israel defines itself as what?
Where is Israel's economy ranked?
Where is Israel's standard of living ranked in Asia?
What is the "Land of Israel" known as in Hebrew?
According to the Torah, God promised the land to how many people?
When was the first Kingdom of Israel established?
Who conquered Judah?
How many Judeans did Zerubabel return to Judah?
How many Judeans did Ezra lead?
When did the conflict between Judeans and Greeks erupt?
What was established in the Maccabean Revolt?
Who dominated the society?
When did the Jewish presence dwindle in the region?
Who conquered the country in 628?
What was evolving over Roman paganism?
When did Maimonides visit Jerusalem?
Who issued a call to the Jews to emigrate to the Land of Israel?
Who was the founder of the Ayyubid dynasty?
When was the Jewish community strengthened by rabbis?
Who was the 13th-century Spanish rabbi and recognised leader of Jewry?
What did Nachmanides write?
When was control passed to the Mamluk sultans of Egypt?
What two centres of Mamluk power was the country located?
When did the Mamluk Sultan Baybars convert to the Cave of Patriarchs?
What was the first wave of modern Jewish migration to Ottoman-ruled Palestine known as?
When did the First Aliyah begin?
Who is credited as founding political Zionism?
What is the Jewish Legion?
When did the League of Nations grant Britain a mandate over Palestine?
What does Haganah mean in Hebrew?
What country experienced conflict with the Jewish community after World War II?
When was the King David Hotel bombing?
When did the British government announce it would withdraw from Mandatory Palestine?
What is the UNSCOP?
When was the UNSCOP formed?
What was the last to be under an International Trusteeship System?
Who aided the immigration to Israel?
The immigration was in accordance to what?
When did the Mossad LeAliyah Bet disband?
The population of Israel rose from 800,000 to what between 1948 and 1958?
What ideology did some immigrants believe in?
Between 1948 and 1970, how many Jewish refugees relocated to Israel?
What were temporary camps known as?
How many immigrants lived in these tent cities?
Who signed a reparations agreement with West Germany?
When did Egypt close the Suez Canal to Israel?
Who was Israel frequently attacked by?
What did the war result in?
Who refused toe recognize Israel?
When did Egypt mass it's army near the border with Israel?
What became the administrative boundary between Israel and occupied territories?
When did the Coastal Road Massacre occur?
Who secured southern Lebanon?
Where were the PLO bases located?
When did Israel annex the Golan Heights?
What is the Capital of Israel?
Who provided incentives for Israelis to settle in the occupied West Bank?
When did the First Intifada break out?
How many people were killed in the violence?
PLO supported who during the Gulf War?
Who led Israel in the 1990s?
What did Benjamin Netanyahu sign?
Who was elected Prime Minister in 1999?
Who visited the Temple Mount?
When did Ariel Sharon become prime minister?
How many Palestinian fatalities were they by 30 April 2008?
When did the Israeli Air Force destroy a nuclear reactor in Syria?
Who announced its own ceasefire? 
How long did the operation in Gaza in November last?
Where does the Jordan Rift Valley lie?
What's home to 57% of the nation's population?
How big is the sovereign territory of Israel?
What river runs along the Jordan Rift Valley?
What is the largest makhtesh in the world?
Israel has the largest number of what per square meter in the basin?
What is the result of tectonic movements within the Dead Sea Transform?
What does the tectonic disposition lead to?
When did the most catastrophic earthquakes occur?
How many residential buildings did not meet construction standards?
How often do earthquakes that lead to serious loss of life occur?
Israel developed what?
What does Israelis take advantage of?
Who leads the nation in solar energy use?
What was Israel's population in 2016?
How many African migrants entered Israel by June 2012?
How many Israelis live in urban areas?
How many Israeli citizens lived in West Bank settlements?
How many Israelis lived in Golan Heights settlements?
When were Israelis evacuated from Gaza Strip?
What's the homeland for Jewish people?
Approximately how many Israeli Jews are born in Israel?
What percent are Jewish intermarriage rates at?
What are the two official languages of Israel?
How many Israelis speak French?
How many Russian immigrants arrived in Israel?
Muslims make up how much of the Israel's population?
Druze makes up what percent?
2% of the population in Israel are what?
How many public universities does Israel have?
How many private colleges does Israel have?
What is the oldest university in Israel?
What kind of court system does Israel have?
Where is the Supreme Court located?
What is the highest tier?
What legal traditions does Israel combine?
What principle is it based on?
What is Israel's Basic Law?
How many metropolitan areas are there?
What metropolitan area has the largest population?
What is the population of Beer Sheva?
Who declared the annexation of the Golan Heights and East Jerusalem?
What was captured by Israel in the Six-Day War?
Where did Israel withdraw and disband its military forces?
Israel views East Jerusalem as what?
What emphasises the inadmissability of the acquisition of territory by war?
What is the principle of normalization of relations with Arab states?
The Gaza Strip was occupied by who from 1948 to 1967?
Who occupied the Gaza Strip after 1967?
When did Hamas assume it's power in the Gaza Strip?
Who were the first two countries to recognize the State of Israel?
Who regards Israel as it's most reliable partner in the Middle East?
How much did the United States provide in military assistance?
How much did Germany pay in reparations to the Israeli state?
What prime minister helped relations?
What aims at bringing EU and its neighbours closer?
When did India establish full diplomatic ties with Israel?
Who's the most pro-Israel country in the world?
Israel is the second-largest military trading partner of India after who?
How much does Israel spend on foreign aid?
When was MASHAV established?
Israel has a history of providing what?
How many delegations of IDF search and rescue units between 1985 and 2015?
How many doctors did Israel send to Haiti?
How many patients did Israeli doctors treat in Japan?
What age are most Israelis drafted into the military?
How long do women serve in the military?
What citizens are exempt from military service?
The military relies on what?
What is one of the most crucial weapons in Israel's military history?
The success of what program has made Israel one of seven countries capable of launching satellites?
Israel is widely believed to possess what?
What is armed with nuclear Popeye Turbo missiles?
All homes in Israel are required to have a room called what?
What two countries have a higher defense spending to GDP ratio than Israel?
What percentage of it's GDP was spent on defense in 1984?
What was Israel's Global Peace Index rank in 2015?
Who is considered the most advanced country in Southwest Asia?
When did Israel join the OECD?
Where does Israel rank in number of startup companies in the world?
Imports to Israel totaled what in 2012?
Israeli exports reached what in 2012?
What are the leading exports in Israel?
Israel is a leading country of what development?
Israel is ranked 1st in the world in what?
What companies built their first overseas research and development centers in Israel?
What investor bought Iscar?
When did United States begin to provide foreign aid to Israel?
What was Israel's debt surplus in December 2015?
What are the days of working in Israel?
Friday is considered what?
Several proposals have been raised to do what?
Israeli universities rank where in mathematics?
How many Nobel Prize-winning scientists has Israel produced?
Israel leads the world in what research papers per capita?
How much is Israel's water technology industry worth?
What's the largest desalination plant in the world?
How much drinking water is produced by Israel's desalination programs?
How many homes in Israel use solar energy for hot water?
How much electricity does the country save per year?
When did Better Place shut down?
What coordinates with all Israeli space research programs?
Futron's Space Competitiveness Index ranked Israel what in 2012?
When did Israel launch it's first satellite?
How many kilometers of paved roads does Israel have?
How many buses have scheduled routes in Israel?
How much cargo do railways transport per year?
What is the country's main hub for international air travel?
What is the country's oldest and largest port?
How many international airports are in Israel?
What is an important industry in Israel?
How many tourists visited Israel in 2013?
What is the most popular tourist attraction in Israel?
Where does Israel's diverse culture stem from?
Life revolves around what in Israel?
Work and school holidays are determined by what?
Israeli literature is primarily written in what?
When is the Hebrew Book Week held?
What is Israel's top literary reward?
Shmuel Yosef Agnon shared the Nobel Prize with who in 1966?
What Israel-Arab satirist is internationally known?
Who wrote the novel The Secret Life of Saeed the Pessoptimist?
What Israeli orchestra has been in operation for more than seventy years?
What three internationally acclaimed musicians were born in Israel?
Who hosts its own international music festival every summer?
What the nation's canonical folk songs known as?
What became a symbol of the Zionist reconstruction?
What's a flourishing field in Israel?
What internationally acclaimed violin virtuoso is from Israel?
Who was awarded first prize in the all-Arab oud contest in Egypt in 2003?
Who is the head of the advanced degree program in Arabic music?
What is one of Israel's most important culturural institutions?
What is an interactive museum on the campus of Tel Aviv University?
What is the largest art museum in the north of the country?
What styles of cooking has Israeli cuisine adopted?
What common ingredients are in Israeli cuisine?
Schnitzel, pizza, hamburgers, French fries, rice and salad are also very common where?
What are the most popular spectator sports in Israel?
What is the country's premier football league?
What is the premier basketball league?
When did Israel host and win the Asian Nations Cup?
When did the Israel national football team qualify to the FIFA World Cup?
What were the last Asian Games that Israel participated in?
What's a leading sport in Israel?
What city has become a national chess center?
Who won the Chess Cup in 2009?
What mathematician advance Greek Science?
What period saw the rise of New Comedy?
When was the Battle of Actium?
When did Alexander the Great die?
What period saw the rise of the Septuagint?
dd
dd
dd
dd
d
What ruler's death in 323 BC marks the beginning of the Hellenistic period?
In what year did the Battle of Actium take place?
What kingdom did the Romans take over the year after the Battle of Actium?
What type of poetry debuted in the Hellenistic period?
What ancient religion did Greece embrace during the Hellenistic period?
What signified the emergence of the Roman Empire?
What event is the recognized beginning of the Hellenistic Period?
Who advanced Greek Science?
When was the final defeat of the Ptolemaic Kingdom?
Who was the Roman emporer?
Where did the Roman Empire move to in 330 AD?
What term defines the influence of Greek culture?
When did the capital of the Roman Empire move to Constantinople?
Which era refers primarily to just Greece?
Who moved the Roman Empire capital in 330 AD?
Rome's final conquest of Greek lands followed which war?
What is the period called that comprises all Greek influence?
How much of the conquered world was affected by Greek influences?
How often did Greek population and natives mix?
What term implies that Greek populations were a majority in the regions they settled?
I couldn't could up with another question. But i need to fill this space because I can't submit the hit. 
What is the earliest, most credible source of the Hellenistic period?
Where was Polybius from?
Where was Polybius forced to go as hostage?
What years do Polybius books cover?
What League was Polybius a statesman?
When did King Philip the II annex Thessaly and Magnesia?
Who annexed Thessaly and Magnesia?
When was the Battle of Chaeronea?
Who formed the League of Corinth?
Who was Philip II planning a campaign against when he was assasinated?
Who did Diadochi plan to marry?
Who was Alexander's sister?
Who was the leader in Asia Minor?
Along with Antipater and Craterus, Antigonus I Monophthalmus invaded which region?
Peithon, Seleucus, and Antigenes murdered whom?
When did Antipater die?
Who did Antipater declar as his successor?
When did Cassander invade Macedonia?
Who ordered Eumenes' execution?
Who sentenced Olympias to death?
How many talents did Diadochi steal from Ectabana, Persepolis and Susa?
Who defeated Demetrius Poliorcetes?
When was the Battle of Gaza?
Who ordered the death of King Alexander IV?
What year did the Argead Dynasty end?
Which son did Antigonus send to regain control of Greece?
When did Demetrius take control of Athens?
Who bestowed the title of king to Demetrius Poliorcetes?
What battle did Demetrius Poliorcetes defeat the fleet of Ptolemy?
What region was fought over in the Battle of Salamis?
Who saved Lysimachus in Phrygia?
Who lost in the Battle of Ipsus?
When was the Battle of Ipsus?
After Antigonus was killed, what region did Seleucus take over?
After Antigonus was killed, what region did Ptolemy take over?
When did Cassander die?
When did Demetrius seize the Macedonian throne?
Who captured Demetrius?
What year was Seleucus killed?
At what battle was Seleucus killed ?
What was the capital of the Ptolemaic Egypt?
What was the capital of Seleucid Syria?
Alexander and Antioch were centers of what culture?
What leaders conquests widened the horizons of the Greek world?
What particular demographic emigrated to the new Greek empires?
When was the Lamian war?
When did Demetrius Poliorcetes capture Athens?
Who was Demetrius Poliorcetes' father?
Athens allied with what region to eliminate Macedonian rule?
When was the Chremonidean War?
When was the Aetolian League formed?
When was the Achaean League formed?
Byzantium, Chalcedon, Heraclea Pontica and Tium formed what league?
What system delegates military and foreign affairs to the central government and local affairs to the city states?
What league freed Corinth?
What did Rhodians build to commemorate their victory over Demetrius Poliorcetes?
What period did Rhodes prosper?
What military force helped Rhodes maintain their independence?
What years were Rhodes under attack by Demetrius Poliorcetes?
I couldn't could up with another question. But i need to fill this space because I can't submit the hit. 
What war did Antigonus II fight Athenians?
What mines decreased in production under the Antigonids?
How large was the Macedonian army under the Antigonids?
Who taught Antigonus II?
Who did Antigonus II defend against?
When did Doson die?
Who took control when Doson died?
Which ruler had the last, best chance of uniting Greece?
What was Philip V known as?
When was the Peace of Naupactus?
What years did Queen Teutra reign?
From where did Illyrians import there weapons and armor?
What type or ornamentation was featured on the Illyrians shilds and war belts?
What tribes inhabited the Balkan Coast?
What tribe covered most of the republic of Macedonia?
What region was the center of the Odrysian Kingdom?
Who used Thracians and Agrianes as light cavalry?
What fraction of Alexander's army was made up of Thracians and Agrianes?
What language was spoken by the Odrysians?
Which kings wre among the first to be Hellenized?
Who ran the Hellenistic states of Asia and Egypt?
Where did Hellenistic monarchs put most of the tax revenues?
Who handed out gifts in the promotion of Greek culture and religion?
What type of estates did Hellenistic monarchs run their kingdoms?
Who were the small core in the Hellenistic states of Asia and Egypt?
Who was appointed satrap of Egypt after Alexander's death?
When did Alexander die and Ptolemy assume his position?
When did Ptolemy declare himself King Ptolemy I?
What nickname did Rhodians give Ptolemy?
Where did Ptolemy settle his most of his veterans?
Whose tradition did Ptolemy take on as leader of Egypt?
What god did Ptolemy I create?
Cyprus and Cyrene were run by whom?
By using a central government that taxes heavily, Ptolemy ran his country akin to which bureaucracy?
Apis and Osiris combined to make which god?
The Syrian was were fought between Ptolemy II and whom?
What region was fought for during the Syrian wars?
Who won the great battle of Raphia?
When was the great battle of Raphia?
Who did Ptolemy IV defeat in the great battle of Raphia?
Till what year did Ptolemy's family rule Egypt?
All the male rulers of Egypt took what name during the Ptolemy dynasty?
Cleopatra, Arsinoe or Berenice were common names for whom?
Who was the last and most famous queen of the Ptolemy dynasty?
How did Cleoptra die?
The Seleucid Empire was mostly dominated by whom?
What are Seleucid garrisons called?
What are Seleucid military colonies called?
Who defeated Antiochus III at Raphia?
What year did Ptolemy IV die?
Who married Stratonice?
When did Stratonice marry Ariarathes III?
Who was Stratonice's father?
Cappadocia began it's realtionship with Rome under whom?
What year was Ariarathes V defeated?
What kingdom was Hellenistic and on the southern coast of the Black Sea?
Who founded the Kingdom of Pontus?
When was the Kingdom of Pontus founded?
When was the Kingdom of Pontus taken over by the Roman Republic?
What was the official language of the Kingdom of Pontus during the reign of Mithridates VI Eupator?
Who ruled when the Kingdom of Pontus' was at it's biggest?
Who called themselves King Mithridates Eupator Dionysus?
What hairstyle did Mithridates IV copy from Alexander?
Who did the Macedoniankings claim Mithridates IV descended from?
Pontus was defeated in what wars?
Orontid Armenia was given to Alexander the Great after he took control of what area?
Who did Alexander apoint to govern Armenia?
Armenia became a vassal state of what Empire?
What year did Armenia split into Greater Armenia and Armenia Sophene?
Who attacked Armenia when they became too distant from Seleucid rule?
What Arab State lied between the Sinai Peninsula and the Arabian Peninsula?
What was the capital of the Nabatean Kingdom?
Who allied with the Nabatean Kingdom to fight against the Seleucids?
Under whose reign did Nabatean culture begin to show Greek influence?
What century did Aretas III Philhellene reign?
What independent kingdom was formed out of the Maccabean Revolt of Judas Maccabeus?
What years did the Hasmonaean Dynasty exist?
Who was the last Hasmonean ruler?
Who was Antigonus II Mattathias captured by?
When was Antigonus II Mattathias executed?
Bactria was led by what king from 255-246 BCE?
When was Diodotus II overthrown?
What leader overthrew Diodotus II?
The Greco-Bactrian kingdom was invaded by what Seleucid leader?
Antiochus III married his daughter off to whose son?
Who stated that the Greco-Bactrians had connections through the silk road?
When did Demetrius, son of Euthydemus invade north-western India?
Whose death signifies the beginning of confusing documentation of Greco-Bactrian history?
Who was the last Greek to clearly rule Bactria?
Who was the first Indo-Greek king who did not rule from Bactria?
Who succeeded or ruled alongside Apollodotus I?
Who succeeded Antimachus II?
What religion did Menander I convert to?
What was Menander I refered to by in Buddhist texts?
When did Menander die?
What kingdom forced the Indo-Greek kingdom to the east?
Around 70 BC, Arachosia and what other region where taken over by tribal invasion?
I couldn't could up with another question. But i need to fill this space because I can't submit the hit. 
I couldn't could up with another question. But i need to fill this space because I can't submit the hit. 
What does "sarvajnaa yavanaa" mean?
Who said "The Yavanas, O king, are all-knowing; the Suras are particularly so."?
Who wrote the Brihat-Samhita?
Who said "The mlecchas are wedded to the creations of their own fancy."
Who said "The Greeks, though impure, must be honored since they were trained in sciences and therein, excelled others...."
What period was Hellenistic culture at it's height?
Even though some regions were not ruled by Greeks, they still were influenced by which culture?
Hellenism or Philhellenism reached the frontiers of what kingdom?
What did the Greeks call Bahrain?
Where was the central point of pearl trading?
Which of Alexanders commanders were the first to visit Bahrain?
Alexander planned to colonized the eastern bank of the Persian Gulf with what ethnicity of colonist?
Tylos worshipped Zeus in the form of what Arabian sun-god?
Carthage was on the coast of what country?
What Hellenistic practices heavily influenced Carthaginian culture?
Who reformed the military in Carthage in 550 BCE?
What Greek style was the core of Carthage's military?
What Spartan mercenary helped reform Carthage's military?
Rome dominated what peninsula?
Greek cities were absorbed by what republic?
Rome fought against the Carthaginians in what war?
Sicily was won by whom in the First Punic war?
In what region did the Romans aim to re-bolster the influence after the Second Punic war?
Whose refusal to end wars with Attalid Pergamum and Rhodes led to the Second Macedonian War?
What year did the Second Macedonian War begin?
What battle signaled the end to the Second Macedonian War?
What empire won the Second Macedonian War?
Who was the final king of the Attalid dynasty?
When did Attalus III die?
Who willed Pergamum to the Roman Republic?
In what year was the final Greek resistance?
Who led the final Greek resistance?
Who tried to invade Egypt in the famous line-in-the-sand incident?
Which Roman proconsul ablished the Seleucid rump state?
Who was the last Ptolemaic monarch?
At what battle was Mark Anthony defeated?
What region did Augustus take on as his personal fiefdom?
Who is most responsible for the preservation of Hellenistic culture?
What museum and ilbrary was the center of Hellenistic culture conservation?
Where did most of the great literary figures of the Hellenistic period study?
Which city held the most prestigious seat of higher education?
What library was estimated to have 700,000 volumes?
Which city became a major center of book production?
What island has a famous finishing school for diplomacy and politics?
What replaced Babylon as the metropolis of the lower Tigris?
Philip II and Alexander's court army spoke a version of what language?
Attic Greek developed into what lingua franca?
Ai-Khanoum was situated on what kind of routes?
Who led Hellenization practices by founding new Greek cities and colonies?
Susa weddings were an example of how Alexander mixed Greek culture with what other culture?
Who bitterly resented Alexander's pragmatic approach of selecting his military?
Alexander suffered from what mental disorder?
Native populations in the Hellenistic world were discriminated by what peoples?
Hellinistic Gymnasiums could only be used by whom?
What are the areas of concentration from where Greek culture eminates?
What percent of the Seleucid empire were comprised of native elites?
Menander converted to what religion?
Egyptianized Greeks in the Ptolemaic kingdom started to exist by which century?
Greeks adopted what from local cultures?
A colonist far from the Mediterranean and low in social rank would be more likely to do what?
Greco-Macedonian elites remained commited to what culture?
Who did Greeks look down upon?
Who was the first Ptolemaic ruler to learn the Egyptian language?
What Egyptian god was worshipped in Athens?
Zeus was paired with which local god?
Aphrodite was paired with which local god?
Isis was paired with what local god?
What practice did the Ptolemies adopt in which they dubbed themselves god-kings?
What theism is practice of putting your self on the level of gods?
A long lived cult in Erythrae worshiped which dead leader?
Where was Alexander's tomb located?
The Hellinistic age marked the rise in what type of religion?
Who declared the centrality of humanity and agnosticism?
What is the view "that the gods were simply ancient kings and heroes" called?
Who thought that gods were distant and uninterested?
Rulers brought the concept of divinity to where?
How would people ward off misfortune in Hellenistic times?
What is the complex system based on the sun, moon, and planets movements that determine your personality?
Astrology was associated with which cult?
What does Tyche mean?
What was the trajectory of Astrology during Hellenistic times?
Menander is one of the few remaining pieces of what time of liteary work?
What is the only play that remains in it's entirety from the New Comedy era?
What is the name of the collection that holds fragments of works from 150 authors?
What two years are debated as the date in which Menander was born?
Who did Hellenistic poets wish to court?
Who wrote hymns equating Ptolemy II to Zeus and Apollo?
Who said "Big book, big evil"?
What was the name of Callimachus' catalog at the library of Alexandria?
Who wrote Argonautica?
What city remained the center of philosophical thought?
What does ataraxia mean?
What does autarky mean?
What does apatheia mean?
Who promoted freedom from pain as the ultimate goal?
Who said social norms and material possesions were unnatural and useless?
Which group embraced hedonism?
Who founded Stoicism?
Who rejected Academic Skepticism in favor of Neoplatonism?
The Royal patrons of Alexander's successors supported what type of science?
What city was especially important to Hellinistic science?
What century did Alexandria become scientific research hub?
Philip II used a dense military formation called what?
Were Hellenistic armies smaller or larger than traditional Greek armies?
The Thorakitai used what type of oval shield?
From whom did Seleucus receive war elephants?
What kind of elephant did the Ptolemies use?
What was the largest ship constructed in Antiquity?
Who invented the Polybolos?
What type of weapon is the Polybolos?
Who heavy was the Helepolis siege tower?
How long was Demetrius Poliorcetes siege of Rhodes?
Emotion is called what in Hellenistic art?
Character is called what in Hellenistic art?
Who is the artist that drew grapes so lifelike, birds flew up and pecked at them?
The ideals of Hellenistic art are sensuality and what?
What painting epitomized the female nude?
Which Greek painter experimented in chiaroscuro?
Were Greek temples built in the Hellenistic period larger or smaller than classical temples?
Who rebuilt the Apollo at Didyma in 300 BCE?
What is a Greek royal palace called?
What is the first example of Hellenistic period royal palace?
Who said "then art dissapeared"?
The discovery of what tombs raised the profile of Hellenistic art?
Hellenistic art is describe as decadent mainly due to it following which style  period?
What century do the terms Baroque and Rococo come from?
What century of scholars considered the Hellenistic period a decline in culture from classic Greece?
How did 19th century scholars view the Hellenistic period?
The viewpoint that the Hellenistic period represented a decline in culture was proven to be meaningless and what?
Of what ancestry was Napoleon?
How did Napoleon save the French government in 1795?
How old was Napoleon when he was given command of the Army of Italy?
Where did Napoleon lead his troops in 1798?
Against whom was Napoleon's first military campaign waged?
Where was Napoleon born?
When was Napoleon banished from Corsica?
At what age did Napoleon receive command of the Army of Italy?
Who did Napoleon fight his first military campaign against?
When did Napoleon command his military expedition to Egypt?
When did Napoleon engineer a coup?
What victory in 1800 secured Napoleon's political power?
What document restored the religious privileges of the Catholic Church?
When was Napoleon named Emperor of the French?
What did Napoleon eliminate in October 1805?
Napoleon's political power was secured by his victory at which 1800 battle?
At the Concordat of 1801, Napoleon restored the religious privileges of what entity? 
When did the French Senate declare Napoleon Emperor?
Napoleon's victory at which battle led to the end of the Holy Roman Empire?
The results of which battle allowed the British to blockade French coasts?
What country did Napoleon invade to extend the Continental System?
How long did the Peninsular War last?
With what victory did Napoleon dissolve the Fifth Coalition against France?
How many people did Napoleon rule by 1811?
When, before Napoleon, had Europe last seen the same level of political consolidation?
What region did Napoleon invade in an effort to extend the Continental System?
Who did Napoleon declare King of Spain in 1808?
How long did the Peninsular War last?
Napoleon's victory at which battle resulted in the destruction of the Fifth Coalition?
By 1811, what was the population of Napoleon's Empire?
What nation did Napoleon invade in 1812 to enforce his blockade?
The 1812 invasion of Russia resulted in the collapse of which military unit?
In what year was the Sixth Coalition formed?
In addition to Russia, the Sixth Coalition consisted of forces from which two nations?
In what year did the Allies capture Paris and force Napoleon's abdication?
Where was Napoleon put under house arrest?
What historical event brought about the fall of the Robespierres?
When did the Thermidorian Reaction take place?
At the time of his house arrest, Napoleon was serving with what military entity?
After his house arrest, who was the commissar that Napoleon sent a letter to protesting innocence?
After his marriage, Napoleon left Paris to lead what army?
In which series of battles did Napoleon eliminate the forces of Piedmont from the war?
When did the French victory at Rivoli occur?
Up to how many Austrian soldiers died at Rivoli?
Around how many casualties did the French suffer at Rivoli?
In what year were the French defeated in Southern Germany by the Archduke Charles?
After Napoleon's attack, the Archduke pulled back his forces to defend which city?
What was the first noteworthy confrontation between Napoleon and the Archduke Charles?
When did the Battle of Tarvis take place?
Approximately how close did the French incursion into Leoben come to reaching Vienna?
What was Napoleon's favorite strategy?
How many prisoners did Napoleon's army capture in the Italian campaign?
How many cannons did Napoleon's army capture in the Italian campaign?
In what area did the French army display superior technology to its opponents?
How many standards did Napoleon's army capture in the Italian campaign?
Before landing at Alexandria, Napoleon succeeded in evading what military entity?
On what date did Napoleon land at Alexandria?
What battle did Napoleon fight against the Mamluks?
What was the name of Egypt's dominant military class?
Roughly how many Egyptians lost their lives in the Battle of the Pyramids?
In what battle did the British fleet seize or destroy most of the French vessels in Egypt?
Who led the British during the Battle of the Nile?
In what year did Napoleon lead his army into Damascus?
During the battles in Damascus, the attack on which city was know for its brutality?
Approximately how many troops were in the army Napoleon led into Damascus?
What was historian Martin Lyons' term for the political system created by Napoleon?
 What was the name of the constitution drafted by Napoleon?
  After his election to First Consul, where did Napoleon take up residence?
 What percentage of the vote was recorded as approving Napoleon's constitution?
 What was the real number of people that took part in the plebiscite that passed Napoleon's constitution?
From what direction did Napoleon elect to invade Italy?
 What direction did French invasions of Italy normally come from?
Around how long did it take Napoleon to push Austria out of Italy in his first experiences there?
How long did it take Napoleon to drive Austria from Italy in 1800?
According to Alfred von Shlieffen, what was the object of Napoleon's 1800 Italian campaign?
What 1802 treaty between Britain and France ended the Revolutionary Wars?
What year was the Treaty of Amiens signed?
In what year did French voters approve a constitution making the Consulate permanent?
What percentage of the French vote approved Napoleon's new constitution?
What position was Napoleon granted in Article 1 of the new French constitution?
What was the name of the assassination plot against Napoleon also known as the Infernal Machine?
 When did the Conspiration des poignards take place?
What  family was supposed to have supported the January 1804 assassination plot targeting Napoleon?
 What was another name for the Conspiration des poignards?
The kidnapping of the Duke of Enghien violated the sovereignty of what locale?
The imperial system Napoleon created was based on what model?
What did Napoleon use to justify his creation of an imperial system?
Napoleon wrote his family's succession into the constitution in an attempt to prevent the restoration of what former ruling family?
Napoleon was elected Emperor of the French by more than what percentage of voters?
About how many voters participated in the election that made Napoleon Emperor of the French?
On what date did Napoleon's coronation occur?
How many crowns were used in Napoleon's coronation ceremony?
Other than France, what country was Napoleon crowned king of?
When was Napoleon crowned King of Italy?
Where was Napoleon crowned King of Italy?
What is the name of the political body composed of German states established by Napoleon in 1806?
When was the Confederation of the Rhine formed?
The existence of the Confederation of the Rhine brought about the end of which imperial power?
 Which Prussian ruler chose to go to war with France for control of Central Europe?
What other royal figure strongly influenced Frederick William III's decision to go to war with France?
In what 1806 proclamation did Napoleon begin to impose the Continental System?
 What was the system Napoleon imposed though the Berlin Decree?
When was the Berlin Decree issued?
In what year was the Battle of Eylau?
In what 14 June conflict did Napoleon win a decisive victory over the Russians?
Where did the agreements that gave Napoleon time to structure his empire take place?
One of Napoleon's primary goals was to enforce the Continental System against whom?
Napoleon chose to focus his attention on which country that flouted his trade restrictions?
In what year did Portugal experience defeat in the War of the Oranges?
After the Franco-Spanish loss at Trafalgar, John VI resumed relations with what nation?
Napoleon left Iberia for Central Europe to deal with whom?
Approximately how many French troops were kept in Iberia during the Peninsular War?
During the Peninsular War, in what country did guerrilla warfare frequently occur?
By what year did the Allies force the French out of the Iberian peninsula?
 In what year did the invasion of Russia take place?
Who was the Prussian ruler who at first  claimed he would help Austria in its battle with France, but later refused to?
The finance minister of Austria predicted that if the country kept its large army mobilized, the national treasury would be bankrupt by the middle of what year?
 Which Archduke warned that Austria wasn't prepared for an additional conflict with Napoleon?
On what date did the Austrian government secretly decide on going to war with France?
On what date did the main Austrian army arrive at the Marchfield?
 Who led the main Austrian army?
On what date did French forces make their first significant attempt to cross the Danube?
How many soldiers did Charles initially lead against the French at the Battle of Aspern-Essling?
Around how many casualties did the French experience at the Battle of Aspern-Essling?
Approximately how long did Napoleon take to prepare another Danube crossing after his defeat at Aspern-Essling?
On what date did the French begin the re-crossing of the Danube?
 Approximately how many French troops met Charles at the Battle of Wagram?
How many Austrian troops did Charles lead at the Battle of Wagram?
How long did the Battle of Wagram last?
What was the name of the campaign by the British in Holland that created a second front in the war?
The Walcheren Campaign was intended to relieve the military pressure on whom?
 On what date did the British army arrive on Walcheren?
What was the popular name of the disease that caused many casualties during the Walcheren Campaign?
When did the British withdraw from Walcheren?
What meeting did Napoleon and Czar Alexander participate in in 1808?
In what year did the Congress of Erfurt take place?
 Where did Napoleon and Czar Alexander first meet?
In what year did Napoleon and Czar Alexander first meet?
Violations of what Napoleonic policy by Russia led to tensions between Russia and France?
To avoid direct fighting with Napoleon, the Russians retreated into which country?
Where did the Russians try to resist Napoleon and get defeated?
In what month were the Russians defeated at Smolensk?
What methods used by the Russian army made it hard for the French to find food?
Outside what city did the Battle of Borodino occur?
On what date did the Battle of Borodino take place?
Approximately how many Russians were hurt, killed, or captured in the Battle of Borodino?
 Around how many French were killed, injured, or taken prisoner in the Battle of Borodino?
Who won the Battle of Borodino?
When Napoleon entered Moscow, he expected an offer of peace from whom?
What was the name of the governor who ordered the burning of Moscow?
How long did Napoleon stay in Moscow before leaving?
What 1812 event turned Napoleon's attention back to France?
Approximately how many French men and horses froze to death on the night of 8/9 November?
The Allies suggested peace terms in which set of proposals?
When were the Frankfurt proposals made?
The Frankfurt proposals allowed Napoleon to retain what position in France?
The Frankfurt proposals sought to reduce France to what?
 Who told Napoleon that the Frankfurt proposals were probably the best terms the Allies would offer?
The Allies took back their offer to Napoleon in what month?
In what year did Napoleon attempt to resume peace talks?
Which peace initiative did Napoleon refer to when he attempted to make peace in 1814?
The new Allied demands for peace insisted France return to its boundaries of what year?
In the new Allied peace proposal, what territory would France have been forced to surrender?
In which treaty was Napoleon exiled?
What is the name of the island Napoleon was exiled to?
In what sea is Elba located?
The allies permitted Napoleon to keep what title?
When Napoleon was exiled, where did his wife and son go for shelter?
What military unit was charged with intercepting Napoleon?
On what date was Napoleon contacted by the 5th Regiment?
 When Napoleon suggested to the 5th Regiment that they kill him, how did they respond?
 Ney had told Louis XVIII that he would carry Napoleon to Paris in what kind of container?
 After fleeing France, where did Louis XVIII go?
Where did Napoleon return and find that the populace and government had turned against him?
 On what date did Napoleon abdicate?
 How many days after his abdication did Napoleon leave Paris?
 On what date did the Coalition forces arrive near Paris?
 When Napoleon left Paris, he went to the palace formerly belonging to whom?
When were the diaries of Napoleon's valet published?
What was the name of Napoleon's valet?
 What was the possible cause for Napoleon's death suggested in a 1961 Nature paper?
In 1961, who suggested the possibility that Napoleon died from ingestion of arsenic?
What condition was Napoleon's body in when it was moved in 1840?
What substance used in Napoleon's treatment is it suggested prevented his stomach from expelling arsenic compounds?
What do those who think Napoleon was poisoned cite as a symptom that would suggest this?
According to Patrick Knize, what conclusion does the type of arsenic found in Napoleon's hair shafts suggest?
In what year was the article describing the type of arsenic found in Napoleon's hair published?
Studies published in 2007 and 2008 dismiss what possible cause of Napoleon's death?
Studies published in 2007 and 2008 support what possible causes of Napoleon's death?
 A 2008 study supporting the original autopsy findings related to Napoleon's death analyzed samples of what substance taken from Napoleon and his family?
The 2008 study related to Napoleon's death found that hair collected from Napoleon's hair as well as that of his family and contemporaries, had arsenic levels approximately how many times higher than current averages?
When was Napoleon crowned Emperor?
 Where was Napoleon crowned Emperor?
Who crowned Napoleon Emperor?
When did Napoleon marry Marie Louise?
What did Napoleon abolish in Spain in 1813, during his brother's rule there?
What is the name of the 1801 document that aimed for reconcilliation between revolutionaries and Catholics?
Along with Napoleon, who signed the Concordat of 1801?
The Concordat of 1801 strengthened the position of which church as the majority church of France?
 What is the exact date on which the Concordat of 1801 was signed?
What were the Organic Articles a part of?
The Concodat restored significant power to what position?
Despite the Concordat, the balance of the relationship between the church and state had swung in whose favor?
Other than Napoleon, who else found the Concordat to be of use?
 The children of France were given a catechism that taught them to love and respect whom?
In what year did Napoleon say that skilled rulers were able to both control and use priests?
According to critics, what was the reason Napoleon won many battles?
 When did Napoleon win victories at Austerlitz and Jena?
 In what year did the Russian campaign take place?
Who argues that Napoleon's triumphs at Austerlitz and Jena increased his self-grandiosity?
What did Napoleon do at cards, though he repaid losses?
What was the name of the first central bank in France, that Napoleon established?
What was the name of the agreement that Napoleon arrived at with the Catholic Church?
What other document was presented along with the Concordat of 1801?
What did the Organic Articles regulate in France?
What is the name of the empire Napoleon dissolved that later led to unification in Germany?
Who learned from Napoleon's innovations?
 Napoleon's use of artillery led to its increased importance after what year?
Who rejects the theory that the increased use of artillery by the French was due to declining quality of infantry and numbers of cavalry?
What did Napoleon use as the initial means of breaking down enemy defenses, rather than the traditional reliance on infantry?
How have many historians described Napoleon's foreign policy ambitions?
As late as what year were the Continental powers willing to give Napoleon most of the gains and titles he had acquired?
Who continue to debate whether Napoleon was an enlightened despot, or a megalomaniac?
Some scholars maintain Napoleon's excessive aggression and pushing caused what to collapse?
Who put a stop to the lack of law and presence of disorder in post-Revolutionary France?
Napoleon's decision to reinstate what practice in France's overseas colonies has caused controversy regarding his reputation?
Who considered Napoleon to be a tyrant and a usurper?
Napoleon's role in which revolution has caused controversy regarding his reputation?
Who charge that Napoleon was untroubled by the prospect of war and death for thousands?
After the fall of Napoleon, many countries retained what system of law?
Outside Europe, Napoleonic Code has been used as the basis for certain parts of what?
How can the memory of Napoleon in Poland be characterized as?
Poland views Napoleon in a positive light partially based on his opposition to what country?
One reason Poland views Napoleon favorably is due to his abolition of what form of indentured servitude?
Napoleon is viewed by some as a founder of what modern nation?
What is the name of the empire Napoleon dissolved?
How many German states were there before Napoleon began to reduce their numbers?
How many German states remained after Napoleon reduced their numbers?
How much did Napoleon sell the Louisiana Territory to the United States for?
What is the largest private foundation in the world?
Where is the Bill and Melinda gates foundation based? 
What was warren Buffett's estimated net worth in 2008 
How many shares of berkshire hathway was pledged as a donation 
In 2013 Buffett announced another donation to the foundation for how much 
What did the foundation announce in November 2014
What does the OA policy for publications and data do ?
What does the Trust invest
What is the goal of the Trust investments 
What are some of the negatives of the investments 
What type of company's are  critiscized
As a result of the critics what did the company announce 
What did the foundation announce in March 2006 
What is the International Justice Mission
What would the grant allow the IJM to do 
What was the WSH program launched in 2005
When did the WSH become a full fledeged program
What efforts have the WSH taken 
What did the foundation decide in 2009 
WHy did the foundation make the switch 
What has been the focus since 2011
What models have been delivered
What is the purpose of the new overview
What did the foundation announce in 2011
What is need in the developing world 
What does data collected by unicef and Who show
How many people have no sanatation facilities
What country is the worst violator
When was reinvent the toilet launched 
What is the aim of reinvent the toilet 
WHat program compliment reinvent the toilet 
What was excluded by the funding schemes 
What countries have received grants 
How much were the grants for 
What is reinvent the toilet trying to develop
What compliments the challenge 
What does the Omni processor do
What did the foundation decide not to fund
WHy did they decide not to fund abortion
Before 2013 the foundation gave how how much to planned parenthood
what is the US libraries initiative 
How much of the worlds population can reach the internet
what have the grants provided public libraries
what is a key aspect of the gates foundation in the US
What do these efforts include
how much did it spend in 2009
What is 1 foundation goal 
One way to increase college graduation by the foundation is 
how did they work on college financing 
What has been funded as part of the education initiatives
what do the millions in grants given to news agencies do 
Critics don't like the foundations use of media why 
Where does the foundation list grants 
who founded teach plus 
Why were the gates foundation educational reforms critcized
What are several of the gates backed policies 
Have the policies been criticized 
What two entities was the foundation split into in october 2016
When must the trust resources be spent
What does warren Buffet stipulate his berkshire hathaway  shares be used for in the 10 year period after his death 
Who founded Northwestern University?
What year was Northwestern founded?
In what year did Northwestern University began teaching?
What year were women allowed to attend Northwestern University?
Where did Northwestern University opened an additional campus at in 2008?
What was Northwestern's founding purpose in 1851?
When did instruction begin at Northwestern?
When were women first admitted to Northwestern?
How many acres is the modern-day Northwestern campus in Evanston?
What programs are offered at Northwestern's Quatar campus?
Which great lake is Northwestern located along?
What is the name of the city located 12 miles north of Northwestern?
How many founders did Northwestern University have?
What type of church is Northwestern University associated with?
What was the date that lay down the foundation for Northwestern University?
How many ministers founded Northwestern University?
What denomination did the all of the founders associated with?
In what environment was the foundation for Northwestern University planned on May 31, 1850?
Who granted a charter to the Trustees of the North-Western University in January of 1851?
What was the religious affiliation of all 9 founding members of Northwestern?
How many of Northwestern's 9 founders were ministers?
Which church did the 9 founders of Northwestern affiliate the university with?
What was the name of the first building opened in 1855?
What did Northwestern sell to raise funds for it's first building?
Who received free tuition after buying the $100 perpetual scholarships?
Who did Northwestern merge with in 1873?
Who was Northwestern's first dean of women?
What sports team did Northwestern field its first of in 1882?
Which already existing schools did Northwestern affiliate itself with in the 1870's and 1880's?
What is the oldest law school in Chicago?
What organization invited Northwestern to become a member in 1917?
What type of member was Northwestern of the Big Ten Conference?
What type of campus did Northwestern begin construction of during Walter Dill Scott's presidency?
What was the orginal name for Northwestern's Ryan Field?
What merger was proposed and rejected in 1933?
What was Northwestern one of the first six universities in the U.S. to establish in the 1920's?
What first-ever game did Northwestern host in 1939?
Which war transformed many colleges, including Northwestern?
Between 1939 and 1949, how many military officers and personnel were trained on the Evanston and Chicago campuses?
Under what Bill did enrollments surge after the war?
What center was founded by Melville J. Herskovits in 1948?
In 1978, what famous attacks occured at Northwestern?
In 1999, who uncovered information that exonerated death row inmate Anthony Porter only 2 days before his scheduled death?
What Northwestern program is responsible for exonerating more than 10 men?
In 2003, where did Governor George Ryan announce that the sentences of more than 150 death row inmates would be commuted?
What was President Arnold R. Weber able to do with Northwestern's finances as the government's support of universities declined in the 70's and 80's?
How did Northwestern create 84 additional acres in the 1960's?
Which campus holds the undergraduate schools, the Graduate school, and the Kellogg school of Management?
What is noticably different between Northwestern's North and South Campuses?
Which campus is home to the fraternity quads?
Which campus is home to the music and art buildings?
What is the name of the Chicago Transit Authority's elevated train through Evanston?
What was Chicago's Purple Line train route named after?
Which train stations are within walking distance of the southern end of campus?
Which train station is close to the northern end of campus?
What is the name of Northwestern's football stadium?
In 1920, how many acres were purchased for $8 million for a new central Chicago campus?
What style did architect James Gamble Rogers use for the principal buildings on the new Chicago campus?
Who donated $8 million in 1923 for the construction of the Montgomery Ward Memorial Building?
What two schools were housed in the Montgomery Ward Memorial Building?
Which building became the first university skyscraper in the U.S.?
What branch did Northwestern open in Education City, Doha, Qatar?
What bachelor's degree is offered at NU-Q through the Medill School of Journalism?
Who provided the funding for the construction and administrative costs for NU-Q?
How long is the NU-Q branch of Northwestern scheduled to operate through an agreement in 2016?
What bachelor's degree is offered at NU-Q through the School of Communication?
In 2009, who named Northwestern as one of the top 10 universities in the country in purchasing renewable energy?
How much of the university's total annual electric bill is represented by the green power commitment?
What grade was given to Northwestern on the 2010 College Sustainability Report Card  by The Sustainable Endowments Institute?
Which EPA club is Northwestern University included in?
Who sponsored the Green Power Partnership?
Who governs Northwestern?
How many members are on Northwestern's Board of Trustees?
Who does the Board of Trustees delegate it's power to?
How many presidents, excluding interrims, has Northwestern had?
Who has a staff of vice-presidents, directors, and other administrative assistants?
Which 4-year program comprises the majority of enrollments at Northwestern?
Who sets individual degree requirements at Northwestern?
How many quarters are undergraduates required to complete on campus to graduate?
How many courses do undergrads typically take each quarter?
How many weeks is one academic quarter at Northwestern?
In the fall of 2014, which school did 40.6% of undergraduates enroll in?
In the fall of 2014, which school did 21.3% of undergraduates enroll in?
In the fall of 2014, which school did 14.3% of undergraduates enroll in?
In the fall of 2014, which school did 11.7% of undergraduates enroll in?
In the fall of 2014, which school did 5.7% of undergraduates enroll in?
What City College initiative did Northwestern announce signing on with in 2016?
Who encouraged local universities to increase opportunities for students in the public school districts?
Through the Chicago Star Partnership, what is provided to students from Chicago public schools that meet further educational criteria?
Which mayor influenced the Chicago Star Partnership?
How many libraries are on the Evanston campus?
How many volumes does the University Library contain?
How does the University Library rank among North American university libraries?
What does the Google Book Search project help libraries with?
What is the largest African collection in the world that is part of the Northwesern library system?
When was Northwestern elected to the Association of American Universities?
Which of Northwestern's schools are among the most academically productive in the nation?
In 2014, how much research funding did Northwestern receive?
Who discovered the drug that was ultimately marketed as Lyrica?
How many companies were started through Northwestern's Innovations and New Ventures Office?
Where is the home of the Center for Catalysis and Surface Science?
Where is the home of the International Institute for Nanotechnology?
Where is the home of the Materials Research Center?
Where is the home for the Institute for Policy Research?
Where is the home of the Buffet Center for International and Comparative Studies?
How much money has the traditional Northwestern Dance Marathon raised for children's charities?
What do students do during the traditional Primal Scream event held before finals week every quarter?
What is the popular name for Northwestern's traditional Armadillo Day?
When is Armadillo Day held every year?
What name is freshman orientation known as?
What do students traditionally do at the beginning of each football game kickoff?
What football game tradition has since been discontinued?
What color does the Clock Tower glow after a winning football game?
What noise do students make when the opposing team has control of the football?
How long does the Clock Tower remain purple after a winning game?
What 30 hour event raised more than a million dollars for charity in 2011?
What is the name of the Halloween celebration to which over 800 local children are invited?
What is the name of the Northwestern program for students interested in community service?
What is the name of the university's group service-learning expedition in Asia, Africa or Latin America?
What does NCDC stand for?
What percentage of undergraduates were affiliated with a fraternity or sorority in Winter 2013?
How many fraternities does Northwestern recognize?
How many sororities does Northwestern recognize?
What is the name of the Residential College that houses students with an interest in science and engineering?
Which dorms are commonly referred to as Plex?
What is the name of Northwestern's main student newspaper?
Who is The Daily Northwestern entirely directed by?
What is the name of Northwestern's undergraduate yearbook?
Who owns The Daily Northwestern?
What undergraduate satirical magazine was founded in 2009?
What is the name of the scholarly legal publication at Northwestern School of Law?
What type of journal does the Law Review strive to publish?
How many issues does the Law Review publish each year?
Who publishes the Northwestern Journal of Technology and Intellectual Property?
Who makes the editorial decisions for The Northwestern University Law Review?
What journal was founded in 2008 that features articles by professors and law students?
Who funds The Northwestern Interdisciplinary Law Review?
How often is The Northwestern Interdisciplinary Law Review published?
Who publishes The Northwestern Interdisciplinary Law Review?
What is the name Northwestern's humor website formed in 2011?
What do many of the writers staffed by Sherman Ave write under?
Which website publishes the well known "Freshman Guide"?
What is the publication that is dedicated to the analysis of current events and public policy?
How many college campuses does Politics & Policy reach worldwide?
Who completely runs Politics and Policy?
Who partially funds Politics and Policy?
How often is Politics & Policy published?
Where do Northwestern's basketball, wrestling, and volleyball teams play?
What is the nickname given to Northwestern's athletic teams?
What was the official nickname of Northwestern's athletic teams prior to 1924?
What was the unofficial nickname of the Northwestern athletic teams prior to 1924?
What name did the student body unsuccessfully try to rename the Wildcats in 1972?
Who is the mascot of Northwestern Athletics?
What was the first mascot of Northwestern Athletics?
What was the name of Northwestern Athletics's bear cub mascot?
Who did the athletic team blame for it's first losing season?
What did the athletic team do with Furpaw after they lost the first season?
How many appearances has Northwestern's football team made in the top 10 AP poll since 1936?
How many consecutive games did Northwestern lose during it's longest losing streak between 1979 and 1982?
What was the first bowl game Northwestern appeared in after 1949?
What was the first bowl won by Northwestern after the 1949 Rose Bowl?
In 2006, which Northwestern linebacker became the youngest Division/FBS coach at the time?
What were 2 former Northwestern basketball players charged and convicted for in 1998?
What did federal prosecutors indict four former players for in a separate betting scandal?
What did an autopsy reveal was in Rashidi Wheeler's system after he died during a practice?
In 2006, what prompted the women's soccer team coach, Jenny Haigh,  to resign?
After the death of Rashidi Wheeler in 2001, which athletic programs were investigated for stimulants and other banned substances?
Who founded the Amsterdam based comedy theater Boom Chicago?
Where did actor Warren Beatty attend school?
Where did actor Charlton Heston attend school?
Where did director Gerald Freedman attend school?
Which alumni was a co-creator of "The Young and the Restless", and "The Bold and the Beautiful"?
How many Pulitzer Prize laureates attended the Medill School of Journalism?
Where did NBC correspondant Kelly O'Donnell attend school?
Where did bestselling author George R. R. Martin earn his B.S. and M.S.?
How many Emmy awards did alumni Elisabeth Leamy receive?
Which CBS correspondant graduated from The Medill School of Journalism?
Which graduate of The Feinburg School of Medicine was the Roswell Park Cancer Institute named after?
Which graduate of The Feinburg School of Medicine performed the first successful American open heart surgery?
Which graduate of The Feinburg School of Medicine co-founded the Mayo Clinic?
Which graduate of The Feinburg School of Medicine founded the American College of Surgeons?
Which graduate of The Feinburg School of Medicine was the first physician in space?
What is another name for Xiamen dialect?
What is the main dialect spoken in Xiamen?
During what dynasty did the Xiamen dialect develope?
What city took over Quanzhou's position as the main port of trade in SE China?
Why did peasants from Zhangzhou travel north to Xiamen?
How many phonemic tones do Hokkien dialects have?
What is another name for phonemic tones?
What type of variations are there between the Quanznou and Zhangzhou tone system?
What patterns do Taiwanese tones follow?
What is the pattern used un Taiwanese tones determined by?
The Amoy dialect is a hybrid of what two dialects?
Besides Amoy, what is another hybrid of Quanzhou and Zhangzhou?
What is Taiwanese in Northern Taiwan based on?
What is Taiwanese in Southern Taiwan based on?
In Singapore, the varient of Hokkien has a significant amount of loanwords from where?
Where did the language of Min and Wu dialects originate?
Chinese spoken in Wu was influenced by Chinese spoken where?
Many middle chinese words have retained their meanings in Hokkein but not in what?
Where did Hokkein originate?
What year was the Opium war?
What is another name for Xiamen?
What port became one of the major treaty ports after the Opium War?
What dialect did western diplomats learn to communicate with the Hokkien speaking people in China?
When did Taiwanese Hokkien have a fast change in development?
What year did Taiwan begin teaching Hokkien in schools?
What year did it become mandatory to teach Hokkien in Taiwan schools?
What is the name of the standard Hokkien pronunciation and romanization guide?
What year did the Ministry of Education develope tai-lo?
How was the proposal taken from mainland and aboriginal groups?
What was the fate of the proposal to make Taiwanese the second official language?
What year was it proposed to make Taiwanese the second official language?
Hoklo objected to the proposal because it would increase what tensions?
What party wanted to make Taiwanese a second official language?
What is Montevideo classified as?
What rank did Montevideo hold in Latin America during 2013?
Montevideo is the hub of commerce and higher education in what area?
Montevideo is the chief port of what area?
What is the population of Montevideo?
Who organized the Spanish expedition?
What date did the Spanish force the Portuguese to abandon the location?
Who was one significant early italian resident? 
What year was the Spanish governor expelled?
What year did Portugal invade the recently liberated territory?
What was Juan Antonio Lavalleja's band caled? 
What year was Uruguay consolidated as an independent state?
Manuel Oribe and Fructuoso Rivera fought against what empire?
Manuel Oribe and Fructuoso Rivera fought under whose command?
Who represented Oribe's Blancos?
Who represented Rivera's Colorados?
What did Montevideo suffer between 1843 and 1851?
How did the British and French supply the city of Montevideo??
What year did the Colorados defeat Oribe?
Who was the Admiral of the German pocket ship?
Where did the famous incident involving the German pocket battleship take place in?
When year did the Battle of the River Plate take place?
The city of Montevideo has an average elevation of what?
How far is to the neighboring capitol of San Jose de Mayo?
How far is to the neighboring capitol of Canelones?
How many political municipalities has the city of Montevideo been divided into as of 2010?
What is the head of each Municipio called?
Who elects the mayor of the political municipalities? 
How many inhabitants did Montevideo have in 1860?
The population quadrupled by 1880 due mainly to what?
What happened to the population by the year 1880?
What had the population grown to in 1908?
What kind of company does ANCAP run?
What kind of company does ANTEL run?
How many guest rooms does the Sheraton have?
How many suites does the Sheraton have?
How many rooms does The Radisson Montevideo have?
What is the heartland of retailing in Uruguay?
What city has become the centre of business and real estate? 
What year was Montevideo Shopping  built?
When did World Trade Center Montevideo officially open?
What was the first building to be inaugurated? 
When was World Trade Center 2 inaugurated?
When was World Trade Center 3 inaugurated?
What was intended to be a platform for the development of business activities?
The square contains a sculpture by what renowned Uruguayan sculptor? 
How much space is World Trade Center 4 projected to have?
Who planned the first set of subsidiary forts?
When were the first set of subsidiary forts planned?
the subsidiary forts were established to stop what?
Where were the Spaniards emanating from?
What overlooks the bay of Montevideo?
What replaced the observation post in 1802?
When did construction of the fortress begin?
When did construction of the fortress finish?
What suffered when the military junta took over power in Uruguay?
Rimer Cardillo was one of the country's leading what?
Who made the National Institute of Fine Arts?
The National History Museum of Montevideo is located where?
What houses the Museo Romantico?
How many houses has the Historical Museum annexed?
What is the center of traditional Uruguayan food and beverage in Montevideo?
What is a torta frita?
Where is Arcadia located?
Where is Shannon Irish pub located?
What is the major annual festival in Montevideo?
What is the annual Montevideo Carnaval part of?
What does Tablados mean?
What does Desfile de las Llamadas mean?
What is the main methodist educational institution in Uruguay?
When was the Montevideo Crandon Institute founded?
What is the first academic institution in South America where a home economics course was taught?
Where is the Christian Brothers of Ireland Stella Maris College located?
When was the Christian Brothers of Ireland Stella Maris College established?
What is regarded as one of the best high schools in the country?
Who is the headmaster of the Christian Brothers of Ireland Stella Maris College?
How long have humans used domsticated poultry ?
What have people use domesticated poultry for besides food ?
Why did humans feel that addtional breeding tatics were necessary in poulty? 
Has breeding changed the original characterictics of the animals ?
How popular is poultry as a consumable among humans ?
What are male chickens called ?
How are male chickens able to be identified ?
What do chickens normally consume when in the natural wild environment?
Do chickens fly like other birds?
From what birds are chickens decended from ?
When did the poultry business boom in the United States ?
How can you normally identify a cock when recently hatched?
How has breeding helped in the pultry industry?
Are there any purebreed lines for poultry today?
What breed of chicken is named after a town in Java ?
How are bantams different from other chickens?
Do bantams lay regular sized eggs ?
How long ago was the sport of fighting chickens been around?
What is the termed used to define the game of fighting chickens called?
Do chickens die in the sport of cockfighting?
Have theere been any types of chickens who were really good at cockfighting?
Do people bet on the cockfighting or is it just for entertainment?
How can you identify a duck from other poultry?
What do you call a male duck?
How can you identify a drake from a the female of the species?
What does the diet of cultivated ducks consistof ?
Do all ducks fly south for the winter?
How long have ducks possibly been in domesticated domicile with humans?
How far behind the east society was the western culture in domesticating ducks?
How did Lucius Columella recommend that one go abbout the business of domesticating ducks.?
When did ducks begin to appear in the books of Western Europeon Society ?
What breed of duck is considered the first?
What are the outcomes of the breeding of ducks for humans?
What variety is the most common the the United States and the U.K.
Why is the Pekin duck the favored of the western world?
Why is duck more common than other poultry in the east society ??
When was the greylag goose first domesticated by humans?
What other name is the swan goose know by ?
Where is it believed that the greylag goose was first domesticated in theworld?
do domestic and wild geese have the same apperearance ?
What types of geese are used for human consumption?
What types of geese are used most efficiently for their egg production?
What is the down feathers of geese most commonly used for ?
Why is the meat of geese considered fatty ?
How many species is the recent day turkey suspected to have embarked from?
When were turkeys first used in a domestication setting?
What other purposes have the domesticated turkey been used for aside from food?
When and with what culture did domesticated turkey start to appear in the United States ?
What type of accomidations are domesticated turkey normally grown in?
What type of conditions are used to increase the weight and profitability of commercial turkeys?
At what age is the average turkey considered ready for the initial step of the commercial food process?
How much more does a average commercial  turkey weigh in comparison to its wild turkey cousins ?
What the average for the amount of  turkeys are consumed in the U.S on Thanksgiving Day?
Where can quails typically be found in the wild?
What is the typical diet consist of for qails ?
From what country do most domesticated  quails today descend from ?
Why did the Japanses begin to breed quails in teh 20th century?
When did the quail egg business begin to really become an economic driven industry?
What caused a marked sownturn in the production of quail eggs following the industry boom?
How many eggs can be laid by the present day decendants of the Japanese quail?
Are quails used for any purpose other than human consumption ?
What continent is the evolution of guinea fowl credited to?
Who first domesticated the guinea fowl ?
Aside from consumption how are Guinea fowl  useful to humans.
What are Guinea fowl  also praised for accomplishing for humans?
What is the gourmet title given to pigeons ?
From what variety of pigeon does the squab decen?
Are squabs treated differently from other piegons by humans aside from consumption?
How often are pigeons able to breed for the consumption process ?
What is the most popular type of poulty that is farmed?
How many birds are routinely raised in the world for the consumption process?
How is the cost of the price for animal feed related to the poulty cost for consumers?
Before industrialization how were chickens normally cared for?
What is the major significance of chickens to women in underdeveloped countries?
What is the benefit to chickens of being in a free-range farming location?
What is yarding in relation to the pultry industry?
What is the most intensive type of enclosure system used in the poultry business?
How are eggs collected in teh battery cage system?
What is the average size of chickens used extensively for it's meat production raised in an intensive environment? 
How long does it take for an broiler raisedin an intensive environment very to reach optimum size?
What is the death rate among chickens who are intensivley breed to be broilers?
Do chicken raised in the intensive broiler method suffer from health condions?
How long does it take for a chicken raised in a less intensive envionment to reach optimal broiler size?
What are some of the major concerns with intensive breeding programs?
What harsh measures do farmers use to prevent the chickens from harming themselves or others?
What are some of the major concerns with extensive breeding programs such as free range ?
What is considered the most alarming setting for chickens to be raised in?
Is there a pplace where lovers of the chicken are able to see some of its best attributes ?
In such competitions what are the chickens juged on? What attibutes are considered viable?
Are there breed standards used for the competitions?
From where does the idea of a poultry tournament orginate?
Jo w common is the consumtion of poultry in the world?
How many animals of the poultry variety are raised for consumtion each year?
What type of enviornment is poultry most commonly raised in?
How many industry models are followed for the production process of poultry?
What is the Europeon model of the poultry business ?
How many ducks did China produce for consumption in 2011?
What other countries are important to the duck husbandry business?
Who is the largest producer of duck meat among the western nations?
What is the market percentage held by the country that controls the biggest share of the global market for goose and guinea fowl meat
When is it possible for baccteria is enter into poultry before you get it home?
What percentage of poultry is tainted with Staphylococcus bacteria?
Are the bacteria that is found on poultry easy to get rid of?
What considerations do consumers need when using safe handling procedures with poultry regardless of cooking method used??
Is the Avian flu a risk only to animals?
What portion of the world is considered to be most at risk for the rapid spread of the avian flu?
Can the avian flu be sread from wild birds to birds kept in husbandry?
What are poultry eggs used for aside from consumption?
What is the major difficulty faced in using poultry to cultivate vaccines?
How long does it take for the flu vaccine to be fully ready for deployment into the population ?
In order to make a vaccine , what do viruses require that bacteria does not?
What new technology is being used in teh vaccine making process that will make vaccines safer and eaier for most consumers?
What is the nutitional value to humans of poultry and poultry products?
What is the fat and protien content of a 100g ram serving of baked chicken breast contain ?
How much healthy fat in in the average serving of poultry?
Does chicken contain fat?
In what year did Arsenal first create a crest for the team?
What part of the Arsenal crest is sometimes mistaken for chimneys?
After the team moved to what city were the cannon left off the crest?
What nickname prompted a return to the canon on the club crest?
In what year was the canon image further refined on the Arsenal crest?
What Latin motto was added to the crest in 1949?
In 1949 what new addition was done to enhance the Arsenal club crest?
What legal stance did Arsenal use to win a law suit against a merchant?
In what year did Arsenal produce a remodeled crest that could be copyrighted?
 Who did Arsenal supporters think should have been consulted before announcing the new crest?
What style of logo did Chapman introduce in the 1930s?
Of what is the early logo of Arsenal an example?
Where is the Art Deco style badge design used prominently?
What Arsenal club nickname sometimes appeared on club shirts?
When was the white canon logo replaced with the club crest?
What has the color of the Arsenal  home shirts been?
In recognition of what event was the color red adopted for Arsenal shirts?
What was the early name for the Arsenal FC?
Which founding members were responsible for the red shirts?
What was the color  of the early uniforms' shorts and socks?
What early team copied the Arsenal's red current color in 1909?
What team in 1938 used the same style of kit, but in green?
By coping the Arsenal team kit exactly, what nickname was given to Sporting Clube de Braga?
For how long have the Arsenal inspired copy-cat clubs worn their uniforms?
What was Sporting Clube de Braga's original color?
When did Arsenal FC leave Highbury stadium?
When did Arsenal Stadium at Highbury first become the club's home?
What architect designed the original stadium at Highbury?
In what decade was Arsenal Stadium overhauled?
When was the Arsenal stadium bombed?
What type of clubs does Arsenal have?
Which fan club is closely allied to the Arsenal club?
What supporters club is more loosely tied to Arsenal?
What fan group wants more ownership rights in the Arsenal club?
What is a common chant of Arsenal supporters?
What individual is the biggest shareholder on the Arsenal board?
What percentage of shares in Arsenal did Kroenke own by 2011?
Who is Arsenal's Chief Executive?
Who is Kroenke's chief competitor for Arsenal stock?
In what year did Kreonke achieve take over of Arsenal stock?
Why was Arsenal's match on 22 Jan. 1927 at Highbury a first?
What team did Arsenal play at the time of the radio broadcast in 1927?
When was Arsenal's match the first to be televised live?
To what first broadcast did Arsenal provide match highlights?
In what form was Arsenal's broadcast of a 2010 match against Manchester United?
What are variations on Dutch used in Belgium sometimes called?
What is the Dutch language officially called in the Netherlands?
What would someone in Belgium call the variation of Dutch spoken in Flanders?
What is the Dutch name for the "Hollandish" dialect of the language?
If "Vlaams" is "Flemish," what would English speakers call "West-Vlaams"?
What Old Germanic term was used to describe the non-Romance languages that developed in Europe?
What language was used for writing and by the Catholic Church instead of the language "of the people"?
The word "theudisk" was first found in a text from what year?
What year were the Oaths of Strasbourg written?
What word was used in the Oaths of Strasbourg for the oath's Germanic section?
In what century was a differentiation made to clear up confusion about West Germanic languages?
What West Central German dialect of Dutch contains the name of a U.S. state?
What's the native Pennsylvania Dutch word for the language?
In what decade did people in New Jersey stop speaking Jersey Dutch?
Dutch people didn't have an officially established word for the "Dutch" language until what century?
What word meaning "Low Dutch" was sometimes used to distinguish Dutch from Germany's language?
Instead of "German," what word used to refer to the language of the country of Germany?
What does "Hoogduits" translate to in English?
Now that "Nederlands" is used for Dutch in Dutch, what do Dutch speakers call German?
How many different versions of a Germanic language were spoken in the Low Countries?
Which Germanic dialect was spoken in the eastern region?
Which dialects are referred to as "Old Dutch"?
Was the transition from Old Dutch to Modern Dutch gradual, or did it happen quickly?
Which Germanic dialect was spoken in the north and west of the Low Countries? 
Which language tree groups Dutch with English?
What group of languages have to comply with Grimm's law?
In what age did the sound patterns that distinguish Germanic languages develop?
Along with Grimm's law, what's the other rule for Germanic-sounding speech called?
What does a language need to share with the group in order to be classified as Germanic?
Into how many groups are Germanic languages usually split?
In what historical period did the different types of Germanic languages stop being collectively understood?
What group of Germanic languages includes Dutch, English, and German?
What's the West Germanic dialect spoken in the North Sea region called?
Which dialect group included most Frankish tribes?
What's another term for "Frankish"?
What city is closest to the Bergakker inscription?
To which century do some researchers attribute the Bergakker inscription?
What word found in Roman writings became "wad" in modern Dutch?
What does the Dutch word "wad" mean in English?
What's another name for Old Frisian?
What's another name for Old English?
What language stayed very similar to the language spoken by Franks?
What period is the Bergakker inscription from that shows characteristics of the Old Dutch language?
What's another name for Old Dutch that demonstrates its difference from German Franconian?
Are written records of Old Dutch rare or common?
What Frankish document contains the oldest recorded instance of Dutch?
What creature is swimming in the Dutch phrase "Visc flot aftar themo uuatare"?
Where did the monk who wrote the most famous Old Dutch sentence live?
What historically significant Dutch document begins with the phrase "Forsachistu diobolae"?
What language did Middle Dutch come from?
What year do some researchers say marked the point when Old Dutch morphed?
Rather than a single language, what group sharing origins in Old Dutch does the term "Middle Dutch" refer to?
Would a text written in Middle Dutch be readable or unintelligible for a Dutch speaker today?
What court in Dijon prior to 1477 had a hand in standardizing Dutch?
Which two Dutch dialects had the greatest influence in the Middle Ages?
Which century marked great progress in Dutch standardization brought on by Antwerp?
What year did the Spanish conquer Antwerp?
What was the first Dutch Bible translation called?
What was the old name for the geographical region that's now Belgium and Luxembourg?
What people ruled the Southern Netherlands after the Austrians?
What year did the Netherlands and Belgium agree on a treaty to accommodate each other's language?
What was the name of the treaty that brought the dialects of Belgium and the Netherlands together?
The commonality between Dutch spoken by people in the Netherlands and Dutch-speaking Belgium can be compared to the relationship between British English and what language?
What's the "cheesy" name for East Low Franconian?
What language has the most in common with the East Low Franconian dialect of Dutch?
Along with German and English, what standardized West Germanic language is similar to Dutch?
Non-standardized languages similar to Dutch include Yiddish and what other West Germanic language?
As opposed to Dutch, what language was influenced by the High German sound shift?
What dialect of Dutch is spoken in Drenthe?
What's the name of the river that marks a dialect divide in the Netherlands?
Although Dutch Low Saxon is similar to Low German, it's synchronically included with which language?
Which Dutch province is only partially comprised of speakers of Dutch low Saxon?
When did cities like Diventer and Zutphen start becoming more linguistically diverse?
What organization researched the use of regional Dutch dialects and found their usage declining?
What percentage of adults in the Netherlands spoke a dialect or regional language in 1995?
How many primary school aged children were found to speak a dialect or regional language by 2011?
What's the most commonly spoken regional language in the Netherlands?
In 2011, what percentage of Dutch adults spoke Frisian?
What's the Dutch word for "money"?
West Flemings pronounce the Dutch "g" as a voiced glottal frivative, which would be represented by what letter in standard Dutch?
What other European language has a mute "h" like the West Flemings do?
What word that means "hero" would a West Fleming speaker probably pronounce the same as "geld"?
If a West Fleming speaker were being extra careful to avoid the silent "h," they might over-correct into what sound?
What's the West Flemish word for "no"?
How would you tell a West Flemish speaker "yes"?
What piece of a sentence does West Flemish match the case of a "yes" or "no" to?
Would linguistic differences make it difficult or easy to point out someone who moved from a different region of the Netherlands?
Which is easier for a non-native speaker to imitate: grammar rules or sound shifts?
What Dutch dialect is so distinct that it's often considered a language variant?
What kind of governmental boundary does dialect distribution transcend, reflecting medieval divisions?
What province is Zeelandic Flanders in?
What area that abuts Belgium still has some older people who speak West Flemish?
Along with Limburgish, what other Dutch dialect is spoken down into a lot of the southern Netherlands?
What dialect is considered a sister language to Dutch?
Which Dutch dialect is so distinct that it's often called a daughter language?
Afrikaans is mostly derived from the Dutch spoken in what century?
The Dutch influence on Afrikaans was seasoned with languages from what country?
What two-word phrase describes the relationship whereby Dutch and Afrikaans speakers can understand each other?
What percentage of people in Belgium speak Dutch?
What country in Europe has the highest percentage of Dutch speakers?
What region in France is experiencing Dutch language death?
What's the name of the institution that ensures Dutch is monocentric?
How many different major dialects of Dutch are there?
What town in Germany has always had mostly Dutch speakers?
About how many people around Calais, France speak Dutch every day?
It took until the end of what century for people in French cities like Gravelines to finally switch over to French from Dutch?
Which church often preached in Flemish prior to World War I?
In what area of France is Calais located?
In what country other than France did Dutch lose most of it usage in the 19th century?
In France and Germany, what languages will often be substituted by native speakers of Dutch dialects?
In what segment of the population is the decline in usage of Dutch most prominent?
Other than France, what country does not give Dutch legal status as a language?
What language did France and Prussia ban from use in education in the late 19th century?
About how many students in Belgium are studying Dutch?
How many primary school students are learning Dutch in Nord-Pas-de-Calais?
What country has the most universities offering courses in neerlandistiek?
How many universities in France offer neerlandistiek courses?
Besides North Rhine-Westphalia, which German state has the most pupils of Dutch?
For how long have there been Dutch speakers in Indonesia?
In what profession is Dutch often required in the Dutch East Indies?
What institution in Jakarta still teaches Dutch?
About how many pupils in all of Indonesia study Dutch as part of their coursework?
In addition to students pursuing law degrees, what other course of study often includes Dutch?
Towards the end of what century did it become important for more people in Dutch colonies to speak Dutch?
What VIP segment of the population in Dutch colonies learned Dutch to participate in business and government?
What was the Dutch government afraid of doing if they taught their colonies Dutch?
Leaders wanted to hang onto knowledge of the Dutch language because it's the language of what?
What became the official language of Indonesia after they declared their independence?
What's the Indonesian word for "office"? 
What term describes the literally translated Indonesian versions of Dutch terms that have become standard?
What is the Indonesian calque for the Dutch word that literally translates as "animal garden"?
What Dutch word for a hospital was calqued into the Indonesian "rumah sakit"?
About what percentage of residents of Suriname speak Dutch?
What language would you hear teachers speak if you attended school in Suriname?
When did Suriname officially become independent from the Netherlands?
What year did Suriname join the Dutch Language Union?
What's the common language that around 20% of Suriname's people speak?
What's the year that Jersey Dutch was last spoken, according to records?
What Dutch-based language popped up in the area of Albany, New York?
What's a more accurate name for Pennsylvania Dutch since it's not a Dutch dialect?
Which Dutch dialect was once spoken in the U.S. Virgin Islands?
In what country were the Berbice and Skepi dialects spoken?
In what decade did European Dutch yield to the local dialect in South Africa?
At the high end, what percentage of Afrikaans words come from Dutch?
What South African document from 1983 doesn't list Dutch as an official language?
What section of the constitution was changed by Act 8 of 1925 to include Afrikaans with Dutch?
What pressure influenced the shift in South Africa from the use of European Dutch in the 1920s?
Approximately what percentage of South Africans are native Afrikaans speakers?
Which country has 11% of households who speak Afrikaans?
How many of the South Africans surveyed in 1996 said they speak at least a little Afrikaans?
About how many South Africans speak Afrikaans as their primary language?
Approximately how many people in the world speak Dutch as a second language?
What linguistic event in English could we parallel with the Dutch lowering of diphthongs?
In what decade did the Dutch diphthong lowering occur?
The lowering of diphthongs is intriguing partly because it's associated with what single gender?
What researcher posited that the lowering of diphthongs is "natural"?
Which language, in addition to German, did Stroop use to compare Dutch with when stating that the diphthongs "should" have lowered?
What word did Stroop use to describe the static stage of diphthong pronunciation?
What classes in the 16th century sneered at the pronunciation of Dutch by rural people?
What distinct kind of British English does Stroop say has a similar function to Polder Dutch?
What phenomenon of Dutch pronunciation was brought about by the attitudes of the elite in the 16th century?
What specific type of diphthongs were the less educated Dutch speakers in the countryside using in the 16th century?
How many genders does standard Dutch use for both natural and grammatical gender?
What gender does the majority of non-Belgian Dutch speakers use instead of the masculine and feminine?
Apart from the common gender in non-Belgian Dutch, what other gender do speakers use?
The common/neuter system used in Dutch is a lot like the system used in what other language category?
In its simplified inflectional grammar, what language is Dutch similar to?
What's the Dutch word for "my"?
Over what span of time have the rules for written Dutch become less complicated?
What part of speech does Dutch mostly use cases for?
Which parts of speech aren't normally case-specific in Dutch?
In what century long before Dutch did most West Germanic dialects probably lose case inflection?
What case no longer used in Dutch is still present in German phrases like "Der Herr des Hauses"?
How would you say "the man of the house" in Dutch?
What word described standalone expressions that retain some outdated convention as an exception?
Which word in the phrase "het jaar des Heren" is a weak noun with a genitive ending added?
In what type of Dutch clause does the subject usually follow the conjugated verb?
What's the English type equivalent for the Dutch word order that is an interrogative pronoun/expression, then a verb followed by a subject?
What type of clause has the same word order in Dutch as a tag question?
What never changes in a subordinate clause in Dutch?
What is the literal translation of the Dutch phrase, "Kun jij je pen niet vinden?"
What language besides Dutch uses the dative case instead of the accusative for pronouns?
In the lone exception to the dative case, which pronoun is prescribed for the third person plural direct object?
When did the grammarians first draw the line between third person plural pronouns for Dutch?
Since most Dutch speakers don't bother with the hen/hun rule, which of the two most often gets used?
When speakers get confused about whether to use hen or hun, what interchangeable unstressed form would they probably use?
How would a Dutch speaker say "doghouse"?
Is Dutch like or unlike English in its treatment of compound nouns?
"Tree house," which is two words in English, would be what single word in Dutch?
What language is like Dutch in allowing compounds to be any length?
In English, what usually separates newer compound nouns written in open form?
What percentage of loanwords are present in Dutch vocabulary?
What language has exerted the most influence on Dutch vocabulary since the 12th century?
What language does Dutch get its second highest percentage of loanwords from?
Together, what percentage of Dutch loanwords comes from High and Low German?
In the loanword sharing between Dutch and English, which language got the higher percentage of loanwords?
What was Buckingham Palace orginally known as?
Who was Buckingham Palace was originally built for?
Which king acquired the Buckingham House in 1761?
What was Buckingham House known as when Queen Charlotte resided there?
Which two architects were commissioned to enlarge Buckingham in the 19th century?
For whom was Buckingham house originally built?
Who bought Buckingham House in 1761?
Who enlarged the house in the 19th century?
When did the palace become the London residence for the monarchs?
Which river runs underneath the palace?
The site of the palace was once owned by which queen consort in the late Saxon times?
Who did William the Conqueror give the site of the palace to?
The site was passed to monks from which abbey?
The site of the palace formed part of which Manor in the Middles ages?
What was the name of the village that grew at Cow Ford?
Who gave the site to the monks of Westminster?
What was the name of the manor that previously existed on the site?
Which property tycoon inherited the property in the late 17th century?
Which village had fallen into decay?
Who established a mulberry garden on the property?
What product did the mulberry garden produce?
Who suggests that the mulberry garden is likely a place for debauchery?
What about the palace was subject to speculation in the 17th century?
Which village had fallen into decay but the 17th century?
Who sold off part of the Crown Freehold?
What type of garden did James I create?
What did the mulberry garden produce?
Who built the first house on the site?
Which owner developed much of the garden still seen today?
What was Lord Goring's garden known as?
Under which king did the Royal Family regain the freehold title of the property? 
Which king failed to execute Goring's freehold document before fleeing to London?
Who owned the first house built on the site?
Who developed what is much of today's garden at Buckingham?
What was the name of Lord Goring Garden?
Which king fled to London leaving allowing the Royal family to keep it's freehold on the property?
Who was the first monarch to reside at Buckingham Palace?
Who died before the palace was completed?
Buckingham became a principle residence for the Royal Family in which year?
What was the problem with chimneys in the palace?
At the end of which year were most of the design problems of the palace rectified under Prince Albert?
When did Buckingham officially become the principle royal residence?
Who was the first monarch to reside there?
Who died before seeing Buckingham Palace's completion?
What was the problem with the palace's chimneys?
Who dealt with the design faults of the palace?
Who designed the new wing for the palace in 1847?
The new wing was built by whom?
What is the East front of the palace known as?
The East Front contains what famous feature?
Who designed a new wing for Queen Victoria and Prince Albert when they felt they needed more space?
Who built the new wing?
What is considered the public face of the palace?
What other wing was built during this time?
Which of Nash's students designed The Ballroom?
The palace frequently hosted which type of events prior to the death of Prince Albert?
Which composer played at Buckingham on three occasions?
Which piece of music by Johann Strauss was first performed at Buckingham in honor of Princess Alice?
Queen Victoria hosted which type of balls?
Before Prince Albert died what sort of entertainment was held at Buckingham?
Which composer played there on three occasions?
Who performed Alice Polka in honor of Princess Alice?
What type of balls did Queen Victoria hold?
When year did Prince Albert die?
What forced the Queen to return to London?
What was the fate of Buckingham after the left?
Where were court functions held upon the Queens return to London?
When did Prince Albert die?
What did Queen Victoria do in response to his death?
Which house did Queen Victoria stay at after she left Buckingham?
What happened to Buckingham after Queen Victoria left?
Where did Queen Victoria hold court functions during this time?
The 1855 Room is name for which European emperor?
Which room is named for visit of Tsar Nicolas I of Russia?
Guests attending the Queen's Garden Parties will mostly likely see which room?
Where are the suites located that the Queen and Prince Phillip use?
Which rooms are used for less formal entertaining such as luncheons or private audiences?
What is the name of the slightly less luxurious staterooms located underneath the State Apartments?
What type of entertaining are the semi-state apartments used for?
Who is the 1844 Room named after?
Who is the 1855 Room named after?
Where are the Queen and Prince Phillip's apartments located?
Where did many of the fittings for the new east wing come from?
When was the new east wing built?
What is the theme for the new east wing?
The red and blue Chinese Luncheon Room has what as a main feature?
Who designed the chimney piece in The Yellow Drawing Room?
What was Blore building between 1847 and 1850?
Many rooms in the new east wing are in what style?
Parts of the Brighton Banqueting and Music Rooms from Brighton Pavilion make up which Buckingham Room?
Which room has the famous balcony used by the royals?
What is the main theme of the Centre Room?
Which Queen enhanced the Chinese theme of the Centre Room in the 1920s?
The lacquer doors in the Centre Room were brought from Brighton in which year?
The Principle Corridor features which type of doors?
Which room feature the famous balcony?
Which designer did Queen Mary work with to enhance the Centre Room?
The Principle Corridor has which type of doors?
What year were the lacquer doors brought from Brighton?
What is the official dress code today at Buckingham Palace?
Which Queen tried and failed to raise the hemline of her dress after WWI?
Which King was horrified to see the Queen's hemline raised a few inches?
The hemline of daytime skirts were allowed to rise after which year?
The knee breeches men formerly wore to the palace were of what era's design?
From what century were men's knee breeches worn at Buckingham designed in?
What were women obliged to wear in their hair?
Which queen wanted to shorten her skirt's hemline?
Which King was horrified to see the raised hemline on the Queen?
What is the dress code today at Buckingham?
Where do Investitures take place?
What year was The Ballroom built?
Which room has The Ballroom replaced in terms of both use and importance?
What is the largest room in the palace?
What does the Queen stand on during Investitures?
Knighthood is given by being dubbed with what object?
What is the largest room in the palace?
The Ballroom replaced which other room in terms of importance and use?
Where do State Banquets take place?
In what month does the Queen entertain the diplomatic corps?
What is used to set the dining table for formal dinners?
When was the Grand Service made?
For whom was the Grand Service made?
Where do state banquets take place?
When are state banquets held?
What is the dining table laid with for state banquets?
Who was the Grand Service originally made for?
Who designed the Royal Mews?
Where is the Gold State Coach housed?
Who designed the Gold State Coach?
When was the Gold State Coach first used?
The Royal Mews houses which type of animal?
Who designed the Royal Mews?
Where is the Gold State Coach kept?
Who designed the Gold State Coach?
In what year was the Gold State Coach first used?
What animals are kept in the mews?
Who lived at Buckingham Palace during WWI?
Where were valuable items from Buckingham Palace taken during WWI?
The king refrained from doing what during the war?
In what year was the north-west pavilion turned into a swimming pool?
Who persuaded the king to lock the wine cellars during WWI?
Buckingham Palace was untouched during which war?
Where were valuables evacuated to during the war?
What did the King give up during the war?
Who convinced the king to lock the wine cellars?
What was the north-west pavilion converted into in 1938?
How many times was the palace bombed in WWII?
What was destroyed in 1940?
Which monarchs were in residence at Buckingham Palace during WWII?
The bombing of Buckingham Palace showed what to the public?
What was destroyed in one of the bombing that hit the palace in WWII?
The King and Queen were filmed doing what after a bombing?
The royal family was seen as sharing what with their subjects after the bombings?
What is the date of the Battle of Britain Day?
What did Ray Holmes think the German pilot was going to bomb?
What type of airplane was the German craft Holmes rammed into?
After the war what did Holmes become?
What year did Ray Holmes die?
What is September 15, 1940 known as?
What did Ray Holmes believe the German pilot was targeting?
What did Holmes do to stop the German Plane?
What type of aircraft was the German Plane?
When did Holmes die?
What type of energy makes an incandescent light bulb glow?
Which part of the incandescent light bulb is heated?
What part of a halogen light bulb supplies electric current?
What provides the electricity to most light bulbs?
Which type of light bulb uses inert gas?
Are incandescent bulbs more or less efficient than most electric lighting?
What percentage of energy does a standard light bulb actually convert to visible light?
Which is more efficient: compact fluorescent or LED lights?
How long does a typical incandescent light bulb last?
What happens to the energy that an incandescent bulb does not convert into light?
What law did Australia make about incandescent light bulbs?
How is the United States treating incandescent light bulbs?
What does the acronym CCFL refer to?
What does the acronym CFL refer to?
What does the acronym LED refer to?
Who patented an incandescent light bulb in Russia in 1874?
What did Lodygin use as a burner in his lamp?
In what year did Lodygin demonstrate a lamp at the World's Fair?
What did Lodygin change his name to after moving to the USA?
When did Lodygin invent his first lamp?
When did Edison begin research into incandescent lighting?
With what material did Edison make his first filament?
How long did Edison's light burn during his first successful test in 1879?
What type of wood did Edison use in his improved filament?
What was the name of the first ship to use Edison's lamp?
Who founded Electro-Dynamic Light Company?
Who was the chief engineer at the United States Electric Lighting Company?
Where did Electro-Dynamic Light Company install its first lights?
When did Electro-Dynamic Light Company install its first lights?
Which company was organized first, Electro-Dynamic Light Company or United States Electric Lighting Company?
Who developed a heat-treating method that allowed carbon filaments to be molded into shapes?
When did Latimer patent his "Process of Manufacturing Carbons"?
Which company purchased Latimer's patent?
Who employed Latimer when he developed his first patent?
What does the acronym LER refer to?
What is the maximum LER possible?
In how many ways can one define luminous efficacy of a light source?
What is the definition of radiant luminous efficacy?
What does the acronym LES refer to?
What is the purpose of white-balancing?
Of incandescent lights, fluorescent lights and LEDs, which has the best color-rendering performance?
What is the color rendering index of an incandescent light?
Why do incandescent lights have superior color rendering?
What is the highest possible color rendering index score?
Do fluorescent lights have a higher or lower luminous efficiency than incandescents?
How can luminescent light sources be modified to resemble the appearance of incandescents?
Why are luminescent light sources not ideal for photography?
What appliance requires more energy due to the use of incandescent lighting?
Do incandescent lights have a longer or shorter life than other lighting sources?
What are some factors to consider in calculating operating costs of lighting?
Do incandescent lights emit more, less, or the same amount of light as they age?
What is more cost-effective, heat from incandescent bulbs or heat from a building's heating system?
Do incandescent light bulbs use more or less energy as compared to CFLs and LED lamps?
How much does the incandescent light ban in Europe contribute to the economy each year?
How much energy does the incandescent light ban in Europe save each year?
How much CO2 emissions does the incandescent light ban in Europe save each year?
How are laws written that bring about a ban of incandescent light bulbs?
Is the environmental performance of CFLs better or worse than that of incandescents?
Which type of light bulbs is considered most cost effective and robust?
What are some objections to banning incandescent bulbs?
What substance in CFL bulbs raises health concerns?
Do CFLs consume more, less, or the same amount of energy as incandescent bulbs?
Which company introduced hybrid incandescent bulbs?
How much more efficient are Halogena Energy Saver bulbs compared to incandescents?
What company first marketed light bulbs using the reflective capsule technique to increase energy efficiency?
What is the theoretical maximum efficiency of reflective capsule bulbs?
What is the maximum efficiency of reflective capsule bulbs as tested in labs?
What is the name of the air-tight glass enclosure in an incandescent bulb?
What is the filament made of?
How many conductors are present in the bulb's base?
What prevents air or gas leaks from a light bulb?
What function do small wires in a light bulb's stem perform?
What is the powdery substance in coated glass light bulbs?
How is kaolin placed inside a light bulb?
What is the effect of a kaolin coating on the light cast?
How are Christmas colored light bulbs created?
How does kaolin create a more gentle light?
What is the name for a base with one or more contacts at the tip and one at the shell?
What is the name for a lamp base with one or more contacts on the base and a shell used as a contact or used only as a mechanical support?
What is the purpose of contacts in the lamp socket?
What is the range of power ratings for incandescent bulbs?
Which types of lamps use screw terminals for connection to wires?
What is a potential problem with the use of gas in a light bulb?
What are the ideal chemical properties for the gas in a light bulb?
What is the purpose of the gas in a light bulb?
How do gases prevent evaporation of the filament?
What type of machine manufactures glass light bulbs.
How many bulbs does the average ribbon machine produce per hour?
How is the filament attached to the bulb?
How is the evacuation tube sealed?
What blows the glass bulbs into their characteristic shape?
What company invented the tantalum light filament?
In what year was the tantalum light filament invented?
What were the major advantages of the tantalum light filament?
Who purchased the rights to the tantalum light filament from Siemens?
When did GE cease production of the tantalum light filament?
What was the problem with manufacturing the tungsten filament?
Who developed the ductile form of tungsten?
When was the ductile form of tungsten invented?
When was the tungsten filament introduced?
What other materials were combined with tungsten?
How long is a typical uncoiled tungsten filament for a 60-watt bulb?
What is the advantage of a coiled-coil filament over a straight filament?
What positive effects does a slower-evaporating filament enable?
What is the typical diameter of the filament on a 60-watt bulb?
Why does inert gas reduce efficiency?
What affects the thermal conductivity of a gas?
How does the molecular weight of a gas relate to thermal conductivity?
Why is xenon gas not more widely used?
What is the advantage of using inert gas in a light bulb?
What determines how fast a tungsten filament evaporates?
What is the typical goal for the life of a tungsten filament bulb?
Which types of lamps may have particularly short lives?
What is the typical tradeoff in light bulb design?
What darkens a conventional bulb over its lifetime?
What is the IEC guideline for an unacceptable level of light loss?
What are the primary causes of light loss?
Where in the bulb is evaporated tungsten deposited when inert gas is used?
Where in the bulb is evaporated tungsten deposited when a vacuum is used?
How does water vapor inside a light bulb affect lamp darkening?
Why does water increase lamp darkening?
What is an example of a substance that is added to light bulbs to reduce this effect?
How much water is necessary to result in this darkening affect?
Does the halogen bulp increase, reduce, or have no effect on filament evaporation?
How does the halogen bulb decrease darkening over time?
Does a halogen bulb operate at a higher or lower temperature than an incandescent?
How does the size of a halogen bulb compare to an incandescent?
What is the most common situation when a halogen bulb is used?
What did an alternate version of the incandescent lamp substitute for a wire filament?
What was a common application for this type of bulb?
When was this style of lamp developed?
What displaced this style of lamp?
What does a power factor of 1 mean?
What principally determines the wattage of an incandescent bulb?
What determines the resistance of the filament?
How close do incandescent lamps come to pure resistive loads?
All other things being equal, how does wattage affect light emitted?
What determines the resistance of a filament?
What does a "T" rating symbol on an electrical contact mean?
How long does it take a typical 100-watt bulb to achieve 90% of its brightness?
How does the cold resistance of tungsten filament lamps compare to the hot resistance?
What is the resistance of a typical lit 100-watt incandescent bulb?
Which company introduced standard base sizes for incandescent lamps?
In what year were standard base sizes introduced for incandescent lamps?
What are some common technical standards for lamp bases?
What is the typical base type for automotive lamps?
What is the typical base type for halogen lamps?
What level of voltage reduction is required to double the life of an incandescent bulb?
When did light bulb manufacturers establish a cartel to limit bulb life?
When did authorities break up the light bulb cartel?
What was the artificially low limit on bulb life placed by the cartel?
What is an example of a good application for a long-life bulb?
When did the "Centennial Light" begin burning?
How much light does the bulb emit?
When did the long-lasting bulb in Texas begin continuing illumination?
Where did the Texas bulb begin its life?
How many lumens per watt does a typical 100-watt, 120-volt lamp produce?
How many lumens per watt does a typical train light produce?
How does filament size relate to voltage level?
What made power distribution economically viable in Edison's lamp?
How many inventors came up with electric lamps before Thomas Edison?
How did Edison achieve a higher vacuum than other inventors?
Which historians wrote about the advantages of Edison's lamp over other early versions?
What can clothing provide during hazardous activities?
What type of surfaces can clothing protect from?
What does clothing keep toxic materials away from?
What can insulate against cold or hot conditions?
What type of radiation can clothing provide some protection from?
What obvious improvement does clothing bestow upon the wearer?
In what type of climate does clothing protect against sunburn and wind damage?
What property of clothing is important in cold climates?
What has seasonal and regional aspects?
What type of material tends to be worn in warmer seasons?
What variety has there been in the materials of clothing throughout history?
What is an article that is carried rather than worn that isn't regarded as clothing?
Jewelry isn't considered clothing because it's usually worn purely for what reason?
What are footwear and hats both considered?
What is an example of something that serves a function other than protection?
What does clothing protect from things which may injure it?
Rain, snow, and wind are what class of things clothing protects the wearer from?
Clothing that is too sheer will offer less what?
What type of hazard is noxious chemicals?
What type of clothing do doctors wear to protect their surroundings?
What is an example of clothing that was once seen as exclusively for males?
What gender's clothing is often more practical?
What can males typically bare in more places?
What would be unlikely to raise eyebrows if a woman were to wear it?
What is a common opinion about men wearing women's clothing?
Who was allowed to wear gamrents dyed with Tyrian purple in ancient Rome?
Who was allowed to wear feather cloaks and palaoa in old school Hawaiian society?
What right were lower caste women required to pay a tax to acquire?
What country once only allowed their emperor to wear yellow?
What can peer pressure influence?
How was the earliest clothing kept on the body?
What does clothing materials do more quickly compared to stone and bone?
Who has identified needles from about 30,000 B.C.?
Where have flax fibers which may have been used in clothing found?
What dates back to 36,000 BP?
What group of people debate when humans stated wearing clothes?
What type of analysis has been conducted on human body lice?
What do lice require human clothing to do?
What may have the invention of clothing happened with?
What about the origin of clothing remains unanswered?
What had somewhat became an international style by the early 21st century?
Cultural dissemination has continued over the what?
What have Western corporations penetrated?
Who has been spreading Western culture and styles?
Who donates discard Western clothing to people in poor places?
Safety reasons may be why someone wears this type of clothing.
Leotards are an example of what type of garment?
What does spandex soak up?
What's an example of a form fitting garment?
What type of sport is wrestling considered?
Changes keep happening because new cultural stuff meets these type of innovations.
What have researchers in science labs been making?
What elementary force can some specialized fabrics generate?
What can garments made with kevlar resist?
Stain-resistant fabrics are coated with chemicals to reduce what?
What type of conditions do many garment works endure?
What type of clothing is frequently the product of sweatshops?
What is a feature of sweatshops beyond lack of benefits and representation?
Poor conditions found in developing countries may also be found in what type of nations?
What type of immigrant often staff sweatshops?
The abolishing of the MFA made what possible?
What did the MFA put quotas on?
What is often identified as the reason for less than ideal working conditions for garment workers?
What treaty tries to set standards for worker safety and rights?
What country has failed to ratify sections 87 and 92 of the ILO?
What have humans used for clothing since prehistoric times?
Indigenous people in what zones use fur for warmth and protection?
Using animal fur as clothing was once considered what?
Who considers animal fur to be cruel and unnecessary?
What's the four letter name of an animal liberation group?
What's the point of ironing clothing?
What type of clothing is believed to look neat, fresh and clean?
What material doesn't easily wrinkle?
Permanent press materials have been treated with what?
What does polytetrafluoroethylene suppress?
What releases formaldehyde?
What can cause contact dermatitis for some people?
What government office found high levels of formaldehyde in non-wrinkle clothing in 2008?
How many ppm is a safe limit for direct skin exposure to formaldehyde?
How many months of washing did a 1999 study look at?
What American professional baseball team is located on the North side of Chicago, IL?  
What league are the Chicago Cubs in?
Where do the Chicago Cubs play their home games?
Who currently owns the  Chicago Cubs?
When did the Chicago Cubs play their first game?
What year did the Chicago Cubs' name become official? 
What other team besides the Chicago Cubs is tied for being the oldest currently active U.S. professional sports club?
What year did the cubs record a Major League record of 116 wins?
What is the winning percentage the Cubs posted that still stands today?
Who was the first team to play in three consecutive Fall Classics?
How many world series have the Cubs appeared in?
Who did the Cubs began play as?
When the Cubs started playing, who was their owner?
Where did the White Stockings play their home games?
Who assumed ownership of the Cubs after Hulbert died?
What year did the White Stockings capture their third consecutive pennant?
While Anson led the Chicago cubs how many National League pennants did they win?
What did the Chicago Cubs become know as by 1890?
Who was the first player in history credited with collecting 3,000 career hits?
Who did Spalding sell the Cubs to in 1902?
Who nicknamed the franchise the Cubs in 1902?
Who holds the longest championship drought in North American professional sports?
Who wrote the poem Baseball's Sad Lexicon?
Who obtained a large block of the Cub's shares in 1914?
Who assumed majority ownership of the Cubs franchise by the 1916 season?
Who did Albert Lasker bring in to be his partner of the Chicago Cubs?
Where did the Cubs move to after leaving the West Side Grounds?
What year did Hack Wilson have one of the most impressive seasons in MLB history?
How many games in a row did the Cubs win in a row during 1935?
What year did the Cubs win the NL pennant?
Who had been a key player in the 1945 season?
What season was Phil Cavarretta a key player for the Cubs?
Who was fired during spring training in 1954 after admitting the Cubs were unlikely to finish above fifth place?
What contest shift the Cubs' Fortunes? 
What had the contest between the Cubs and the St. Louis Cardinals been dubbed as?
How many game-tying home runs did Sandberg get against the Cardinals at the Sandber Game?
Why did the cubs need to host their home games at an alternative site?
Where was it rumored that the Cubs could home their home games?
Comiskey Park was the home to what team?
Who had the home field advantage in 1983?
What year did most media outlets pick the Cubs to win the World Series?
Who was acquired in a trade with Florida for Hee-seop Choi?
Who was the mid-season deal for?
Who did the Cubs trade to the Texas Rangers for Mike Olt, C.J. Edwards, Neil Ramirez, and Justin Grimm?
Who did the Cubs send to the New York Yankees for minor leaguer Corey Black?
When did Theo Epstein made the decision to fire Dale Sveum?
How many seasons did Dale Sveum spend with the Cubs before getting fired?
When were the Cubs and New York Giants involved in a tight pennant race?
Who were the Cubs involved with for a tight pennant race on September 23, 1908?
Who was the runner on first base?
When was game three of the World Series between the Cubs and the New York Yankees?
Who allegedly hit a home run to the Center?
When did Babe Ruth retire?
When did Hack Wilson set a record of 56 home-runs and 190 runs-batted-in?
Who Broke Lou Gehrig's MLB record of 176 RBI?
When did Manny Ramirez get his 165 RBI?
What was Wilson named by the Baseball Writer's Association of America? 
When did protesters run into the outfield and try to set fire to the U.S. flag?
What stadium did protesters try to burn the U.S.  flag?
Who grabbed the flag before protesters could light it on fire?
When did Sammy Sosa explode into pursuit of Roger Maris' home run record? 
Who was in pursuit of Roger Maris' home run record?
Sammy Sosa was in pursuit of beating whose home run record?
What award did Sammy Sosa win?
What is the longest championship drought in all four of the major North American professional sports leagues?
The championship drought has led to the Chicago Cubs being know as what?
When was the last time the Chicago Cubs appeared in the Fall Classic?
When was the last time the Chicago Cubs win a World Series championship?
Who began spring training in Hot Springs, Arkansas in 1886?
Who is the founder of Spalding Sporting Goods?
Whittington Park, Majestic Park, and Fogel Field were all built where?
Where is the Cubs' current spring  training facility located?
How many seats are in the Cubs' Sloan Park training facility?
When did Sloan Park open?
Who had a majority interest in Cataline island  in 1919?
What did Wrigley construct on the island to house the Cubs in Spring training?
When did the Cubs choose to leave Catalina Island?
Where was the former location in Mesa?
How many square feet does Fitch Park provide?
When was the spring training home of the Oakland Athletics built?
Who manned the Cubs radio and TV booth for parts of five decades?
What was Jack Brickhouse's trademark call?
What did Jack Brickhouse do when he approached his retirement age?
How long was Harry Caray's tenure  with the Cubs?
How did Caray become a well-known Chicago figure?
How long had Caray been a St Louis Cardinals icon?
Who did Harry hand-pick himself?
Who did Caray often playfully quarrel with?
Why did Caray often playfully quarrel with Stone?
What does the crowd sing during the 7th inning to honor Caray's memory?
What company purchased the  Cubs in 1981?
How much did Tribune Company purchase the Cubs for?
How long were the Cubs ran under the Wrigley family?
What was "Baseball's Sad Lexicon" also known as?
Who wrote "Baseball's Sad Lexicon"?
What poem did Franklin Pierce Adams write? 
What is the official Cubs team mascot?
What is the official Cubs team mascot's name?
When did Clark make his debut?
What did "The Bear-man" wear as an outfit?
During what season were "cubbie-bear" mascots outside of Wrigley on game day?
Who played Billy Cub?
What is another unofficial well-known mascot?
What is Ronnie known for to Wrigley Field visitors?
What did Harry Caray dub Wickers?
Where is Wrigley Field located?
What is the area surrounding the ballpark typically referred to?
What have many apartment buildings  surrounding Wrigley Field built on their rooftops?
When did Tom Ricketts and Crane Kenney unveil plans for a five-year funded renovation of Wrigley Field?
How much money has been funded to the renovation of Wrigley Field?
How big is the jumbotron going to be?
What nickname has been given to the fans who sit in the bleacher section at Wrigley Field?
Who heads the current group?
What did Bud Light dub the bleacher section?
What year did a group of Chicago Cubs fans form the Emil Verban Society?
Where were the Emil Verban Society founders based in?
Who currently heads the Emil Verban Society?
What year was the single "Hey Hey! Holy Mackerel! (The Cubs Song)" produced? 
What was the name of the album several members of the cubs recorded?
What did The Cubs Song incorporate?
When was Take Me Out to a Cubs game released? 
How many songs are on the Take Me Out to a Cubs Game album?
When was Harry Caray's final performance of "Take Me Out to the Ball Game"?
What film depicts the Chicago Cubs defeating a baseball team from Miami in the 2015 World Series?
What team failed to make it to the playoffs in 2015?
What day were the Cubs swept by the New York Mets in the NLCS?
What is an entrenched constitutional principle in Germany?
In Germany, foreign affairs is under the exclusive purvey of what? 
What is an example of what states retain authority over?
The states defend their interests at the federal level through what?
Whose consent do the states need to make international treaties?
Who redrew Germany's internal borders after World War II?
No single state comprised of how much of the population after World War II?
After WWII how many states initially remained in Germany?
Former German territory that lie east of the Oder-Neisse Line went under which countries administration?
How many made to establish new states in the territories  lying east of the Oder-Neisse Line?
What was the German constitution later amended to say about the citizens of the 16 states?
Article 23, before it was rephrased allowed what?
Which state was Article 23 used to reintegrate? 
The amended article 23 now defines the participation of the Federal Council and what else?
When did the debate on delimitation begin in Germany?
Who was the father of the Weimar Constitution?
How many states was the German Reich to divided into?
Until 1933 how many configurations in the German states occurred? 
When did Pyrmont join Prussia?
In the revision of Article 29, what was a binding provision for a new delimitation of the federal territory?
How much of the population must have been in favor of the revision?
What was required in each territory or part of a territory whose affiliation was to be changed? 
Which paragraph stated that reorganization should be completed within three years after the Basic Law had come into force?
In what negotiation did France offer to establish the independent Saarland?
In the 23 October 1955 Saar Statute referendum, what percentage opposed the formation of the Saarland?
What was the Saar Statute referendum voter turnout?
Which political figure supported the Saar Statute referendum?
Paragraph 6 of Article 29 states that a referendum, in the event of a successful petition should be held within how many years?
What did the Hesse state government due when the May 5, 1958 deadline passed?
When was the Hesse state government's complaint dismissed?
On what grounds was the Hesse state government's complaint dismissed
Every rural district is subdivided into what?
Every urban district is what in its own right?
How many municipalities are there?
What is the smallest administrative unit in Germany?
What are town rights called?
Municipalities have how many major policy responsibilities?
What article grants the municipalities "the right to regulate on their own responsibility all the affairs of the local community within the limits set by law.
Under Article 28(2) local governments can justify what?
What is one way municipalities develop the economic infrastructure?
At the beginning of the conflict, where were South Korean forces pushed back to?
In 1950, what country got involved in the war?
How many times did the control of Seoul change?
On land, where was the last two years of the war fought?
What type of combat was seen for the first time in the history of war?
How many Japanese forces were in Korea in 1945?
Where were 723,000 Koreans sent to work?
Who did Japan collaborate with to help control the citizens of Korea?
By 1945, what percentage of Koreans made up the Japanese labor force?
What army were Korean men conscripted into?
What job were Colonels Dean Rusk and Charles H. Bonesteel III given?
What order was the division of Korea included in?
What two areas was Korea divided into?
What was a factor in deciding where to divide the occupation zones?
Who had to agree to the US's decision to divide Korea at the 38th parallel?
What is the civil disobedience caused by the railroad worker's strike called?
When was the Daegu Uprising?
How many people attacked the Yeongcheon police station?
When did the Pusasn railroad strike begin?
How did the USAMGIK respond to the uprisings?
What did the Joint Commission's lack of progress cause the US government to do?
Why did the Korean Communists and the Soviets refuse to cooperate in the elections and creation of independent Korea?
When was the South Korean general election held?
What problems did the elections face?
Who held parliamentary elections on August 25, 1948?
What country helped North Korea invade South Korea?
When was the People's Republic of China created?
What caused a problem within the Korean Communist Party?
Who led the faction that challenged Kim-Il-sung?
Who did China pledge to support if a conflict should occur between North and South Korea?
What country did China see as a threat to the People's Republic of China?
Where was it believed that that fight against Communism would take place?
To show their strength in the international Communist movement, what did China do?
Who did America support during the Chinese Civil War?
Who had to agree to send reinforcements for Stalin to give permission for the invasion of Korea?
Who did the Soviets not want to engage in conflict?
What concern did Mao have about the South Korean invasion?
Who needed Soviet financial and military aid?
What did Mao's assistance allow North Korea to accelerate?
Who did the Soviets send to North Korea?
Where did the conflict in South Korea begin?
What were the generals sent to North Korea collectively called?
When did the generals finalize their attack strategy?
Who primarily initiated the clashes along the 38th parallel?
What group trained the Republic of Korea army?
What general had a lot of confidence in the Republic of Korea's army?
Who wanted to take over North Korea?
Who was the diplomat that visited Korea?
Who provoked a conflict by crossing the 38th parallel?
Where did the fighting begin?
Who claimed to have taken control of Haeju?
Who questioned the claim that South Korean did not provoke the KPA?
Who was the Korean People's Army trying to execute?
Who, along with members of the South Korean government, fled South Korea?
What bridge were refugees attempting to cross when it was blown up by the South Korean Army?
How many South Korean National Assemblyman pledged their allegiance to Seoul?
What did South Korea do to cause members of the South Korean military unit to become trapped near the Han River?
What day was the city of Seoul captured?
What country was believed to provide a counterbalance to China's and the Soviet Union's involvement in Korea?
Which President decided to intervene after realizing that Japan's security would be affected by the hostility in Korea?
Why was South Korea important to the US?
What affected America's response to the situation in South Korea?
Who condemned the actions of North Korea?
Which permanent member of the UN Security Council boycotted council meetings in protest of Taiwan's seat in the United Nations?
What resolution encouraged Security Council Members to send military assistance to the Republic of Korea?
Who accused the United States of beginning an armed intervention in South Korea?
What did UN Security Council Resolution 82 accomplish?
How many infantry divisions did N. Korea have engaged in the war?
What was the maximum number of North Korean troops engaged in the war?
How many reserve soldiers did North Korea have?
What type of naval ships did the South and North Koreans have?
What was the problem with the ROK Army?
Who declined the ROK's request for tanks?
In what country did the US maintain air forces and garrisons?
Who reported that South Korea's military was not ready for combat?
Which Secretary of State did President Truman hold discussions about how the US would respond to the invasion of South Korea?
What did the US not want to see repeated?
The US involvement in the Korean War was important to achieving what goal?
What report discussed the United States's goals for containing communism?
The North Korean invasion of South Korea was compared to what event?
Why was the US naval blockade not feasible?
Why was the US not able to provide an adequate response to the Korean invasion?
Who was tasked with reorganization and deploying of the US military?
Who was forced to retreat back to the Pusan Peninsula due to unpreparedness?
Who stated that winning the war does not excuse putting US troops into a bad situation?
What battle is considered the US's first significant fight in the Korean War?
Which infantry division was involved in the Battle of Osan?
Where was the 24th Division forced to retreat to what location?
At what Battle did the 24th Infantry Division suffer major losses?
In what country is the US's Task Force Smith located?
How did the KPA hurt the Republic of Korea's intellectual core?
Who was held responsible for the actions of the KPA?
Where did the Eighth United States and ROK get pushed back to?
What body of water provided a natural border to the UN command-controlled Pusan perimeter?
How much of Korea was under the control of the United Nations?
Why did Zhou Enlai want a commitment the Soviet Union to commit to supporting the Chinese troops?
Where did North Korea predict that MacArthur would enter Korea?
Who helped North Korea prepare for war by surveying the country?
Where did the Chinese military deploy troops in preparation for the arrival of US troops?
Even though it was predicted that the Korean War would end in August, who was less than optimistic about the prediction?
Who initially opposed General MacArthur's landing plan?
What Corps included 40,000 men from the 1st Marine Division?
Who coordinated the efforts of the ROK Army, Marine Corps and the US Army to stage a successful battle?
Who was sent to Korea to act as an advisor to Kim Il-Sung?
Why did Kim Il-Sung redeploy his military troops?
Who was not being briefed on the operational plans or the number of troops in combat?
When was it advised for North Koreans to attempt to defeat the opposing forces at Inchon?
What emergency session was called by Stalin?
How many troops made it back to the KPA lines after retreating?
Who was held responsible for the defeat of North Korean troops?
Who reclaimed the Seoul?
What city was left vulnerable by North Korea's quick retreat?
What memorandum stated the circumstances for engaging in conflict above the 38th parallel?
Who controlled the newly restored government of the Republic of Korea?
Who sent a message to MacArthur giving him the authority to proceed past the 38th parallel?
Who executed people who were believed to be loyal to North Korea?
What year did the executions stop?
Who vowed to intervene if the US was to engage in conflict North of the 38th parallel?
The tactics Zhou Enlai advised the North Koreans to use during their withdrawal was the same the Chinese used to escape event?
Who believes that the North Koreans only appeared to fail to effective execute their withdrawal plan?
What may have been North Korea's goal in the way they rapidly withdrew from South Korea?
Who's control did the Chinese Communists escape in the 1930's?
What did President Truman do to prevent hostilities between the People's Republic of China and Taiwan?
What year did China decide to enter the war?
What provoked China to join the war?
Where did Mao Zedong declare that he would intervene in the Korean conflict?
Who did the PVA 13th Army Group force out of northwest Korea?
Whose death was not a direct casualty of the war?
Why did the X Corps leave Hungnam?
What effect did the death of General Walton Walker have on the troops?
What is the Third Phase Offensive also known as?
Why goals were accomplished the the KPA and PVA's use gongs during these attacks?
How did some UN troops react to the use of noise?
What did the PVA and KPA gain by using the tactics during the Third Phase Offensive
Who was commanding the U.S. Eight Army at the time of the Third Phase Offensive?
What to be achieved by the Sancheong-Hamyang and Geochang massacres in South Korea?
Who's attack resulted in victory at Hoengseong?
What is considered to be the the Korean War's equivalent to Gettysburg?
What did the French Battalion's efforts do to the PVA forces?
How many PVA soldiers fought in this battle and lost?
What Operation was initiated after the successful Operation Roundup?
What the the goal of the operation that followed Operation Roundup?
What signified the end of Operation Killer?
How many times was Seoul captured in a year?
Other than the drastic decrease in population, what other issue did the people in Seoul face?
Why did Stalin send two air forces divisions and other assistance to the Chinese?
What issues plagued the PVA throughout the war?
What was a great concern of many Chinese troops?
What was Zhou's ineffective response to the issue plaguing the PVA?
What did China introduce to the war in 1951?
Who was relieved from his duties as Commander in Korea?
Who did not have faith in MacArthur's claim that victory was the only respectable outcome?
What mistake did MacArthur make regarding the 38th parallel?
What did Truman want to see happen in Korea?
Whose involvement in the war was found to be in violation of the Constitution?
Where did armistice negotiations occur?
What did the UN Command want to achieve with the armistice talks?
What tactics were used by the PVA to coax the UN Command to continuing the war?
Was there a cease fire during the talks?
Who directed the armistice negotiation for the Chinese?
Did the UN troops or Chinese troops experience more war casualties?
What did Zhou Enlai do as a result of the significant amount of Chinese casualties?
What was the purpose of the Shengyang meeting?
Did the actions of the Chinese fix their problems?
Who believed that neither side would see a victory at the end of the Korean War?
What meeting was conducted to discuss the PVA's problems?
What actions were taken to help the PVA?
Who ended up in charge of logistics as a result of the restructuring of the PVA?
How long did the armistice talks last?
What issues stalled the armistice talks?
What was deemed unacceptable to North Koreans and the Chinese during POW negotiations?
When was the armistice agreement finally signed?
What was established to deal with the issues surrounding prisoners of war?
Who did the US elect as president during the Korean War?
Who approved the Korean War armistice that officially declared a ceasefire?
What area was created by the parties involved in the Korean conflict?
Along with the Joint UN Commands, ROKA and KPA, what country also still patrols the demilitarized zone?
What was one of the first things that the newly-elected Dwight Eisenhower did after the election?
Where is the capital city of Kaesong now located?
What area is directly north and south of the 38th parallel?
When was the Armistice Agreement signed?
Was there ever an official peace treaty after the war?
Who believes that they were victorious in the war?
What was the point of Operation Glory?
How many US service members were exchanged during this operation?
Where are the remains of the 416 unidentified soldiers who died in the Korean War?
How many remains were recovered from the Sino-Korean border between 1996 and 2006?
Why is North Korea insisting that the 1953 armistice was violated?
When did North Korea call an end to the armistice?
In 2013, who what country did North Korea declare war on?
What weapon does North Korea claim it now has the ability to use?
How does the United States view North Korea's threats? 
What form of attack was an effective measure of slowing Korean armor?
What weapon did the the KPA use that was successful early in the Korean conflict?
What helped the UN forces and shifted the war in their favor?
What actions of the UN also helped them improve their results during the war?
How many tanks were in the North Korean tank corps?
Why were naval skirmishes not really seen in the Korean War?
Who pretty much gained and maintained control of the sea?
Who dominated any battles that may have taken place at sea?
Where was the last sea battle of the Korean War?
What type of ships did the US spend most of its time sinking?
What weapon posed a significant threat to US navy ships?
How many US warships were damaged by gun fire and mines?
Where were the majority of US naval patrols of Korea?
Who denied having anything more than an advisory role in the Korean War?
Who ignored the direct participation of the Soviet Union to prevent expanding the Korean War to the Soviet Union?
What may have occurred if the war was expanded to the Soviet Union?
What did the Soviet pilots start doing when accused of playing an integral role in the Korean War?
Who feared engaging in direct conflict with the United States?
When was Royal Shell Group Created?
When was the Royal Dutch Petroleum Company founded?
When WAS the "Shell" Transport and Trading Company founded?
The Royal Dutch Shell Group was created through the merger of which two rival companies?
What was the main reason for the creation of the Royal Dutch Shell Group?
In what year was the Royal Dutch Shell Group created?
In what year was the Royal Dutch Petroleum Company founded?
Why was the Royal Dutch Petroleum Company created?
Aside from biofuels what other renewable energy activities is Shell involved with?
How many countries does Shell operate in?
How much oil per day does Shell produce?
How many services stations does Shell have?
In how many countries does Shell have operations?
How many barrels of oil equivalent does Shell produce per day?
Shell has how many service stations worldwide?
What is the name of Shell's subsidiary in the United States?
Shell has minor renewable energy activities in which two areas?
What percent of ownership did the merger award the Dutch branch?
What prevented a full-scale merger of the two companies?
What was the primary function of the Anglo-Saxon Petroleum Company?
The new firm operated as what type of company?
What percent of ownership of the new company was awarded to the British?
In what year was it announced that the Shell Group would move to a single capital structure?
What was the name of the Shell Group's new parent company?
On what exchange was the Shell Group's new parent company primarily listed?
Where was the Royal Dutch Shell plc headquartered?
What was the cause of the period of turmoil prior to the announcement that the Shell Group would move to a single capital structure?
What is a cause of severe environmental issues in the Niger Delta?
Many pipelines owned by Shell in the Niger Delta are described as what?
Shell has accepted responsibility for keeping its pipelines in what condition?
In contrast to its acceptance of responsibility for keeping the pipelines new, Shell has denied what?
Environmental and human rights groups have created action plans to do what?
The name Shell is connected to what company?
What was the purpose of the created of The "Shell" Transport and Trading Company?
What did the younger founder of The "Shell" Transport and Trading company discover while collecting seashell specimens in the Caspian Sea area?
By what year did the company have a fleet of oil tankers operating in the Caspian Sea region?
The company operated a refinery on what river for several decades?
What is Shell's primary business?
The development of what two types of exptertise established the core competencies on which the company was founded?
One of the most important business in which Shell is involved is what?
Each business now seeks to become what type of unit?
The business model that provided significant economies of scale and barriers to entry is called what?
Shell was traditionally considered what type of business worldwide?
Shell operated companies in how many countries?
A good deal of technical and financial direction for the upstream came from what entity?
What types of companies existed in a few major oil and gas production centers?
What did Shell announce in April 2010?
What happened in several countries in response to Shell's April 2010 announcement?
In June 2013, Shell announced a review of its operations in which country?
What did Shell indicate was a reason for the strategic review of operations in Nigeria?
What company was the owner of the 7-Eleven brand in Scandinavia?
In what year did Royal Dutch Shell and Reitan Group announce an agreement?
How many service stations did Royal Dutch Shell and Reitan Group agree to re-brand?
Shell announced it was in the process of doing what in April 2010?
In October 2010, Shell sold what to St1?
Shell Oil Company's United States business throughout its early history is described as what?
On which exchange was Shell Oil Company's U.S. stock historically traded?
Shell Oil Company historically had little direct involvement from what entity in the running of its American businesses?
In what year did Royal Dutch Shell make a bid to purchase approximately 30% of Shell Oil Company's shares?
What did Royal Dutch Shell's bid to purchase Shell Oil Company's shares lead to?
What percent of its stake in Woodside Petroleum did Shell sell in June 2014?
Shell became a major shareholder in Woodside after a takeover attempt was blocked in what year?
Who blocked the takeover attempt?
What percentage of shareholders voted to approve the 2014 buy-back?
What percentage of shareholder votes was need to approve the 2014 buy-back?
Shell purchased what in 2005?
What did Shell initate after its 2005 purchase?
What executive initially led the Artic drilling project?
What caused the delay in drilling after Shell's 2008 purchase?
Shell's plans to drill in the Artic led to protests from which particular environmental group?
What conditions caused the delay of drilling in mid-2012?
What worsened the situation at the end of 2012?
What amount had Royal Dutch Shell invested in the project by the end of 2012?
In what year did drilling in the Arctic region begin?
Why was the Kulluk oil rig being towed to Washington?
What caused towing crews and rescue service to lose control while the Kulluk rig was in transport to Washington?
On January 1, 2013, the Kulluk was grounded off the coast of which island?
Following the incident, which magazine contacted Larry McKinney?
Larry McKinney explained that a two-month delay in drilling could do what?
Following what event was it uncertain if Shell would recommence drilling?
In February 2013, Shell Corporation announced that it would pause what?
Shell Corporation announced what in January 2014?
Which Shell Corporation executive explained the reason for the January 2014 announcement?
For what particular reason did protesters criticize the company's environmental record in the 1990s?
What entity supported Shell during the 1990s protests?
Following the reversal of its decision, Shell published what?
In 1996, multiple groups filed lawsuits to hold Shell accountable for what?
Shell was accused of participating in the execution of which southern Nigerian tribal leader?
In what year did Shell agree to settle the lawsuits filed in 1996?
For what amount did Shell agree to settle the 1996 lawsuits?
In contrast to its agreement to settle the 1996 lawsuits, Shell refused to do what?
A 2010 leaked communication revealed that Shell claimed to have inserted what into which entities?
The same leaked communication revealed Shell claimed to know what?
About what did the Shell executive boast in relation to the leaked communication?
Documents released in 2009 showed that Shell made regular payments to which entity?
For what purpose did Shell make regular payments to the entity cited in the documents released in 2009?
How many Greenpeace activists boarded Fennica and Nordica in March 2012?
How many countries did the group of Greenpeace activists represent?
What types of vehicles were the Fennica and Nordica?
Why were the Fennica and Nordica chartered?
What was the main concern of Edward Itta?
How do creators of content protect their work from infringement?
What are the rights of a content creator that has their work protected?
Who is protected by copyright laws?
You wrote a song that was based on an original work, what is this called?
What is it called when someone uploads a video to YouTube without the creators permission?
How do creators of content protect their work from infringement?
Who is protected by copyright laws?
What is it called when someone uploads a video to YouTube without the creators permission?
You wrote a song that was based on an original work, what is this called?
What terms are often linked to people who illegally use or distribute content that is not their own?
What means the same as robbery or illegal violence at sea?
What kind of property is copyright used for?
What is the difference between robbery and piracy?
In the 1980's, the Supreme Court ruled that infringement does not equal what?
What did the Royal Charter give to the Stationers' Company of London?
How does Article 12 of the 1886 Berne Convention for the Protection of Literary and Artistic Works use the term piracy?
What would happen if you imported a copyrighted work into a country where the original is protected by copyright law?
When was the Agreement on Trade-Related Aspects of Intellectual Property Rights enacted?
Piracy has been more recently described online in relation to what?
What is a possible cause of copyright infringement?
Who did Texas software company Apptricity write software for?
How many users were paid for in 2004?
How much was the lawsuit settled for?
Who is an example of a major anti-piracy organization?
Who made clear the motivations of the filmmakers?
Who encourages watching movies at a theater as making money from the film?
What is restricted to ensure the largest number of people see a movie at the theater?
What is restricted unless the film has a traditional theater release?
What researchers conducted a study in the early part of May 2014?
How many people were part of the study?
What was the age range of people studied?
Who did downloaders want to help by avoiding studios and record companies?
In the U.S., where is copyright infringement contested?
Who did MGM studios file a lawsuit against?
In 2005, who did the Supreme Court rule in favor of?
What did P2P file sharing services market themselves as?
What studio's case decision was NOT overturned?
Who can be assigned a contract to enforce a copyright in some jurisdictions?
What do outside lawyers take infringers to court for?
What do critics usually call these lawyers?
What do these lawsuits have in the U.S.?
When was United States v. LaMacchia contested?
At the time, what infringement could not be prosecuted under criminal copyright law?
What loophole did the ruling give rise to?
If there is no profit involved, what would happen to criminal charges of fraud?
What federal law did the United States pass in 1997, in response to the LaMacchia Loophole?
What is the maximum prison time for infringement under the new law?
What is the maximum monetary fine under the new law?
How much were statutory damages raised by?
What was the law called that let people be immune to prosecution?
What directive in 2001 let European Union countries to enact laws that allowed making copies for personal use?
What was the directive NOT intended for?
Compensation to the rights-holder is generally a levy or what else?
What is an example of a country that has no levies collected?
What are examples of general purpose storage devices?
What includes Internet portals, software and games?
What examples provide virtual information?
News, universities and libraries and archives are examples of what?
What is an important element of the World Wide Web?
Who did early court cases focus on?
What could be sued for under civil or criminal law?
What was the result of early law on online liability?
When were the first laws of liability passed?
What law enacted in the U.S. in 1998 gave online intermediaries limited statutory immunity?
How is this law characterized in the U.S.?
In the E.U., what are the governing principles for ISP's?
What is it called when intermediaries cannot be given an order by governments to monitor what happens on their services?
What was attempted to be amended in 2009 to support new ways to prevent copyright infringement?
What do certain type of intermediaries NOT do?
What protocol do intermediaries use that include a torrent tracker?
What do Torrent files NOT contain?
What is a torrent site that uses magnet links to share peer-to-peer?
What is the legal status of secondary liability?
What makes peer-to-peer networks different than other online providers?
What was the initial purpose of the BitTorrent protocol?
What are the reasons for more complex network configurations in peer-to-peer software development?
What does Article 10 of the Berne Convention call certain uses that limit copyright?
Where are minimal quotations commonly used?
What categories do works that would normally be considered infringing fall into?
What do these statutes represent?
What are these statutes essential to?
What is it called when a law disallows copyright owners from denying a license for certain uses?
What are two examples of this licensing?
What happens if a royalty is paid to the copyright owner or representative?
What country has fair dealing laws?
Where was the Public Relations Consultants Association Ltd v Newspaper Licensing Agency Ltd case contested?
Whose copyright were news aggregators infringing on?
When was the second part of the case decided?
What did the courts rule was NOT infringement?
If a work must include a degree of originality, what else must it contain to be protected?
What is NOT protected?
What makes a copy of an original idea infringing?
What limitation is only embodied in case law, rather than statues?
Which country needs a similarity requirement to determine if the work was copied?
What test might courts require software to pass to determine if it is protected or infringing?
What has software case law determined about R&D, effort and expense put into creation?
Who takes different steps to prevent infringement?
What is the major focus of these steps?
What kinds of legislation are a strategy for preventing infringement?
What does DRM and anti-circumvention laws do?
How have governments lowered infringement rates?
Besides upholding international treaty, what else have countries done specifically to digital works and uses?
What law in the US considers digital transmission of audio to be licensed if certain conditions are met?
What else does this law provide to service providers?
Who does this law target?
How long is a movie typically released in theaters for?
During this time, how are digital versions of the movie transported in data storage devices?
What can be done to a movie to only allow it to show at certain times?
What can be coded to films to find the source of illegal copies?
What inferior versions of movies are available for piracy during the theatrical run of a movie called?
Who did a study in 2007 regarding the five countries with the highest rates of software piracy?
Which country had the lowest rate of software piracy?
Which region had the highest loss?
How much did the EU lose?
Where was the lowest amount of U.S. dollars lost?
Who reported that piracy took $12.5 billion from the U.S. economy?
How much money have retailers lost?
How many production-level jobs were lost?
Which government lost $422 million in potential tax money?
What was the estimated total value of pirated software in 2010?
Who accounted for over half the total?
 What did the established markets receive for the first time?
What country has the highest retail value of software?
What percentage of software in Africa is illegal?
On what peninsula is Greece located?
How many geographic regions make up Greece?
How long is the coastline of Greece?
How many of Greece's islands are inhabited?
What is the tallest mountain in Greece?
Who was the first person to bring all of Greece together?
Who was the son of Philip of Macedon?
Greece came part of what empire in the 2nd century BC?
When was the Greek Orthodox Church started?
What year is considered the beginning of modern Greece?
Greece is one of the members who founded what organization?
Which political philosophy does Greece follow?
When did Greece join the Eurozone?
Greece has the biggest economic power where?
Humans in the Balkans have been dated to what year?
Evidence of the earliest humans were found in what subterranean formation?
The Franchthi cave has evidence of what 3 ancient eras?
Greece has evidence of Stone Age people during what time period?
What activity led to Greece having some of the earliest Stone Age settlements?
When did the Olympic Game begin?
The literary work "The Odyssey:, was written by whom?
What year is considered the be the last of the Dark Ages?
Magna Graecia is Latin for what term?
In what year is Democracy considered to have begun?
In 500 BC, Greece was ruled over by who?
What battle did Persia lose in 490 BC?
The Spartans made their last stand at what battle location?
The battles between the Greeks and Persians are known as what?
After the Persians left Europe, the time period that followed was called what?
Who controlled Macedon after Alexander died?
The Roman Empire became more controlling of Greece starting in what year?
Macedon lost what war in 168 BC?
In what year did Greece become a part of Rome?
The end of Antigonid rule began in what year?
What Roman Emperor became the ruler of all of Greece?
What saying by Horace became famous?
What famous Roman figure visited Greece in 66 AD?
What famous Grecian author inspired later authors and their works?
What hero of Rome studied Greek philosophy and science?
In what language was the first book of the Bible conceived?
What religion did early Greece practice?
The Olympics were last held in ancient Greece in what year? 
Paganism was forbidden by what Roman Emperor?
Which Emperor closed the school in Athens?
When did the Slavs invade Greece?
What invading marauders caused havoc in the Balkans during the 4th century.
After the Slav's invaded, the government only controlled what areas?
Greece was split into sections of different rulers in what year?
Constantinople once again became a capital  in what year?
The Grecian islands in the 14th century were under the control of who?
In 1261 Constantinople was the capital for which empire?
A lot of Greece was lost by whom in the 14th century?
At the start of 15th century, the biggest Byzantine city was what?
Constantinople was overcome by who in 1453?
The Ottomans controlled mainland Greece in what year?
Who had a large impact on the Renaissance? 
The Ottomans took which islands from the Venetians?
In what year were the Ionian Islands captured by the French?
Who gained control of the Ionian Islands in 1809?
The Ottomans controlled what islands b y the end of the 15th century?
The Venetians had control of which two islands in the 15th century?
Due to discrimination, some Christians converted to what religion?
What is the name of one of the churches that ruled over the Christian population?
Which empire thought that Christians were inferior?
Greece's Dark Ages is thought of as what time periods?
Greek merchants ruled the trade industry in which century?
Who published Greek documents that espoused Greek independence?
Rigas Feraios was killed by Ottoman assassins in what year? 
In which year did the Society of Friends begin?
The Society of Friends goal was what?
The Society of Friends was also known by what name?
The first of several revolutions began when?
War was started with the Ottomans when?
In what year did the Greeks take Tripolitsa?
Who was the leader of the Greek revolt in 1821?
The Greek and Ottoman Navy fought in which waters?
Turks and Egyptians attacked Greek island in what years?
In 1893 Greece announced what?
To pay off the people they owed, Greece had to accept what?
The people of Greece that had higher education saw what dialect as beneath them?
A hot topic in Greece in the 19th century was what?
What divided Greece into two political groups?
How many governments did Greece have in World War 1?
When Greece entered World War I, on whose side did they fight?
Greece's multiple governments came together in what year?
How many Greek refugees came from Turkey?
Pontian and Cappadocian refugees were relocated to where?
Demotic speaking Greek refugees were placed where?
Who founded the PASOK?
What does PASOK stand for?
In what year did Greece rejoin NATO?
Earthquakes hit both Greece and Turkey in which year?
Greece joined what later became the European Union when?
How tall is Mount Olympus?
The tallest mountain in the Pindus range is what?
How tall is Mt. Smolikas?
Where does the Pindus mountain range end?
Islands in the Aegean Sea are formed by what?
What is the deepest gorge in the world?
The Saronic gulf is near what city?
The Cyclade islands are located where?
The North Aegean islands are located where?
The Dodecanese islands are located where?
The Sporades islands are located where?
Greece's climate is mainly of what type?
Greece's climate is affected by what range?
East of the Pindus mountains, the climate is drier due to what?
Greece's plant distribution belongs to what?
How many ecoregions occupies Greece?
The Pindus and Balkan ecoregions are known as what?
The Crete ecoregion is known as what?
The Illyrian ecoregion is known as what?
The constitution was amended to reduce the President's power in what year?
Who has the most political power in Greece?
The Prime Minister is elected by who?
Who formally names the Prime Minister?
How many members are in Greece's parliament? 
How often are elections help for parliament?
Parliamentary statutes are put into effect by who? 
In May 2012, who started the parliamentary elections?
What led to the loss of power of traditional Greek parties? 
Who became the second major party after the elections?
What caused the second election of 2012? 
Who is the head for Greece's foreign policy?
Who is the present Minister of Foreign Affairs?
The goal of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs is what?
Greece is though of as what kind of power?
Greece has how much strategic importance?
What type of military service does Greece require?
Can females be drafted into the military?
What is the length of military service required of men?
At what age might men required to serve in the National Guard?
How many regions exist in Greece since 2011?
How many municipalities exist in Greece? 
What went into effect on January 1, 2011?
What is the one autonomous area in Greece?
Where is Mount Athos located?
The largest sector of Greece's economy is what?
What percentage of the economy is Greece's service sector?
What percentage of the economy does agriculture comprise?
How many tourist visited Greece in 2009?
Greece holds what rank among most visited countries in the world?
Greece's economy is what size?
What rank does Greece hold as an Albania investor?
What rank does Greece hold as an Bulgaria investor?
Greece is the largest foreign investor of what area? 
OTE is known as what?
What classification does the Greek economy hold?
Greece help found what economic organizations?
When was Greece accepted into the European Union?
When did Greece start using the Euro as its currency?
What was Greece's former currency?
What was used to hide debts?
Swaps allow Greece to do what?
What other country hid its debt through swaps?
What can legally be overcome with swaps?
Where is the Greek Merchant Navy ranked?
How many ships does the Greek Merchant Navy have?
Where does Greece rank in number of tankers?
Where does most of Greece's visitors come from?
How many of Greece's visitors are from Europe?
What is the single nation with the most visitors?
Which part of Greece is the most visited?
Northern Greece gets how many visitors?
How long is the Greek railway system?
A current railway upgrade plans to do what?
A new modern rail connection has been made between which two cities?
Greece has been a member of what agency since 2005?
Greece and ESA signed their first agreement in what year?
When did /Greece apply for ESA membership?
Greece is ranked as what member of ESA?
Greece became a full ESA member when?
How many Greek natural citizens are Catholic?
How many Roman Catholic immigrants are in Greece?
How many Protestants live in Greece? 
How many churches does the biggest Protestant denomination have?
How many Jehovah's Witnesses are in Greece?
When did the Greek Language dispute take place?
When was the Greek language Katharevousa created?
Which language was considered the language of the people?
What language was made the only official variation in 1976?
From which language did Dimotiki evolve?
What is the language spoken by most Greeks?
Greeks who speak the Pontic dialect came from where?
Which Greek dialect is barely spoken currently?
From which language did the Tsakonian language derive? 
Muslims make up how much of the Greek population?
Minority languages have been reduce due to what?
In parts of the country, Romani is spoken by who?
What groups are called Vlachs?
In 2001, how many Greek residents were not citizens?
In 2001, what was the population percentage of resident non-citizens?
From where did most non-citizen residents come? 
What is the total Albanian population in Greece?
Greece is a major destination for what to enter?
In 2012, most illegal immigrants entered Greece from where?
Immigrants arriving by sea are coming mainly for what reason?
How many immigrants arrived by sea in 2015?
What percentage of sea immigrants asked for asylum in Greece?
Where did Greece culture begin?
What do historians credit with revitalizing Greek culture?
The evolution of Grecian culture has evolved over what time period?
Greeks were pioneers in many scientific fields that require what?
What did Greece's political philosophy affect?
Ancient Greece was the birthplace of what?
Which disciple of Plato was considered the most important?
Plato's philosophy attempted to explain life from what standpoint?
Aristotle's philosophy was based from what standpoint? 
What is the name of two schools of philosophy?
What are two works by Homer?
During what time period did Homer write the Iliad and the Odyssey?
Who were two major lyrical poets?
When did drama first begin in history?
What is the name of one sweet dessert in Greece?
What is one of the flavorings commonly used in Greek Mediterranean food? 
What is one of the sweet spices Greeks like to use with meat?
Greek vocal music goes back how far in history?
What is one of the musical instruments used in ancient Greece? 
During ancient Greece, at what age were boys taught music?
The Eastern Orthodox Church resisted what change in music?
Music without any form of instrumental accompaniment is known as what? 
One type of music derived from Byzantine is called what?
What are the two cycles of the Greek folk song?
Between what centuries was the akritic cycle of Greek song created?
Which Greek song cycle expresses the life of the Greeks?
Who is one 20th century Greek composers that has had an impact on modern classical music?
What is one of the famous movies Greek composers has scored?
Who is one of the Greek composers known for their film scores?
Who is one of the notable Greek opera singers in the 20th century?
How many time has Greece participated in the Eurovision Song Contest?
In what year did Greece win the Eurovision Song Contest?
What Greek song won the Eurovision Song Contest in 2005?
Who performed the song, My Number One, in the 2005 Eurovision Song Contest?
Where was the 51st Eurovision Song Contest held?
Greece is the birthplace of what sporting event?
The first Olympic games was recorded in what year?
Where were the first Olympic games in 775 BC held?
During the Olympic parade of nations, who is always called first?
What ranking does Greece hold in all-time summer Olympics gold medal count?
What ranking did the Greek national football team hold in 2014.
Greek was crowned the European champions in what event?
How many national teams have won the UEFA European Championship?
How many teams are in the Greek Super League?
Who is one of the most successful teams in the Greek Super League?
The Greek Men's national volleyball team has won how many bronze medals?
The Greek Men's national volleyball team came in what place in the Olympic games?
What Greek volleyball club is the most successful in the country?
Who is the only Greek volleyball club to win European titles?
Where did the mythical Greek gods live?
The main gods of ancient Greece known as the what?
The most important of the ancient gods was who?
Zeus was married to which goddess?
Who was Zeus's sister?
Greek law says that every Sunday of the year is a what?
How many official Greek mandatory public holidays are there?
How many Greek national holidays are there each year?
What is one of the holidays regulated by law as optional?
Alexander III was the son of whom?
Alexander III invaded what empire after his father was killed?
What year did Alexander III Invade Persia?
The Persian Empire was conquered by Alexander by what year?
In which year did Alexander III die?
Who coined the name "mammal" from the scientific name Mammalia?
What do all female mammals have in common when they have children?
How many mammals were known to exist up to 2006?
How many families did mammals consist of as of 2006?
How many species of mammals do not have a live birth?
Which group consist of the most mammals?
Which group do humans belong too?
Which group do cats and dogs belong too?
Who defined mammalian as the crown group mammals?
By Rowe's definition, when did he start to exclude animals?
Which group do marsupials and placentals belong to?
Which group are Ambondro's closely related to?
Which two groups are closely related to therian mammals?
How many years do momotremes and therian mammals go back?
About what year do synapsid date back to?
Who wrote the "Principles of Classification and a Classification of Mammals?
Simpson laid the systematics of mammal origins and was taught universally up until the end of what century?
Which new concept has greatly taken over Simpsons much debated theoretical systematization?
In 1997 who revised the classification of mammals?
Where did the two authors work together as paleontologist? 
From whom did McKenna inherit the project from?
Through Molecular studies, what was used to suggest new relationships among mammal families?
During these Molecular studies, which three major groups of mammals shared a common ancestors from the Cretaceous period?
Afrotheria,Xenartha, and Boreoeutheria deprives from which two lineages?
From which period did the first known amniotes arise from?
From which group did amniotes descendents of?
Two important Amniotes  lineages became distinct, what was the name of that distinction?
Sauropsids would later include which other animals into its group?
What is a distinct trait of Synapsids?
From which dinosaur group did Therapsids descend from?
Around what time did Therapsids become the dominant land animal?
At which group did Therapsids end with?
What is the oldest know fossil among the Eutheria group? 
How long ago does oldest know fossil date back to?
In what time period did early animals share some features with marsupials?
Which lineage were some of these early marsupial features were lost?
When is it believed that the earliest know hair was said to exist?
When was it suggested that foramina premaxillae could contain the first know hairs?
Which major time period were these suggested hairs from?
Which group of animal has a lower body temperature that marsupials and placentals?
Which time period is suggested that cynodonts had a high metabolic rate?
Why is it necessary for smaller animals to have an insulative covering?
When air enters both the oral and nasal cavities, where does it flow through?
Increasing pressure on the diaphragm thus increasing air output more frequently is usually caused by?
A result of air being sucked into or blown out of the lung thats moving its pressure gradient is referred to?
Where did the term Bellows Lung come from?
What is the typical thickness of the epidermis?
What is the main function of the epidermis?
How much more thicker is the dermis to the epidermis?
What is the dermis mainly consist of?
What does the Hyperdermis consist of?
What is another name used for mammalian hair?
Which color of hair is most common among mammalian taxa?
Besides Camouflage being a reason for having certain hair colors, what other reasons have been discovered? 
What is the common mammal group that gives birth to live young?
How many species of mammals lay eggs?
Which mammal that has the bill of a duck lays eggs?
The platypus has sex chromosomes more related to which other non-mammal?
Which sub class are most viviparous mammals in?
Viviparous mammals today are in which two main infraclasses?
What is present in all non-placental mammals?
Which part is larger relative to the brain in primates?
Which non-primate has the ability to learn and perform new task?
Mammals with smaller brains tend to be in what class in the food chain?
What is the name given when zones of gradation exits?
What is the given name of a lion and tiger hybrid?
What is the marketed name given in the meat industry when you involve a european or indian domestic cattle mixed with an American bison?
What is the given name of a offspring from two different animals?
The Spanish Armada suffered a defeat in what year?
What was the first year the London merchants were granted permission to sail the Indina Ocean?
Who did the London merchants petition to get permission to sail the Indian Ocean?
how many ships sailed Torbay?
who returned to england after sailing around Cape Comorin?
 in this paragraph the Spanish Armada suffered a defeat in what year?
how many ships sailed  from Torbay?
What did the Queen give them for suceeding?
What was the name of the Royal Charter?
What did this charter give them?
Who commanded the the voyage between 1601 and 1603?
Who led the third voyage?
Who commanded the the voyage between 1601 and 1603?
Who commanded the second  voyage in 1604?
What was the rank of the person who commanded the third voyage?
what was the name of the company that traded with East Indies?
how many years did the Merchants of London has a monoploy on trade?
Where was the first factory in south India?
In 1609 the charter was renewed for what period of time?
what would happen if the trade did not return a profit for at least 3 years?
why did King James I licence other trading companies from england?
Where was the first factory in south India?
What initially moved King James 1 to grant subsidiary licences to other trading companies in England?
how many years did the Merchants of London have to become profitabl when their charter was renewed by king james?
in 1720 what % of  import goods were from India? 
Who passed the acts that effected the profits of East india company
Who argued against parliament on the trade issue that involded the East India Company
what was the type of  Revolution that allowed Britian to move ahead of its European rivals?
What was the name of William Henry Pyne book from 1808?
What became the largest player in the British global market according to William Henry Pyne?
What country was the home to the Industrial Revolution?
The industrial revoluntion gave raise to the access to what type of material?
what is the acronym for the East india company?
In 1750 how many regular troops did the  EIC  have? 
in 1778 most of the troops that the EIC had were from where?
what year did the EIC have 26,000 troops in their employ
how many Anglo Maratha wars were there?
What empire ended after the three Anglo- Maratha wars?
With the formal end of Maratha Empire the EIC created a  firm hold on what country?
Was the Maratha Empire ended quick or gradual?
what country  took over the fort of Ahmmadnagar that then became part of the cause for the Maratha Emprie to end?
What was the name of EIC military company?
what was the  highest rank an Indian could be in the EIC army
While in EIC army  the British officer outrank the indian officer they  both promoted based on?
in British indian a jugde had to come from where to oversee the  legal system?
The highest ranking persons title in British india is?
The highest ranking person's title in British india is?
Did EIC have a monopoly over the governement or trade in british india 
Other then money what did it cost the EIC to have the control in trade the had in British India
The name of the Act that was a failure in creating bourdaries for the Crown and the EIC for being subjective?
after the Pitt act the Crown began to focus more on _______ efforts of its people in it territories?
what was the  name of the person who was once a large  shareholder in EIC and talk to the issues with with the new Regulating bill in 1793?
Was the new Regulating Bill of 1793 passed or defeated?
by the middle of the 19th century how much of the worlds population was effected by EIC and it trade?
To EIC in Malaya what state  was the forth most improtant settlement?
during this time the relationship change between Britian and the EIC. the EIC became more of a what to the crown??
when EIC become more like a regularised subsidiary  did they have greater or less accountability to the Crown
What Lord helped the EIC through his politics, take control over all of india?
in the past the deals under the crown strained the finances of EIC  now as they expained throughout India what was the biggest strain on their finances
what treaty  allowed the Eic in to the then kingdom of nepal?
While the EIc took over all of India there were, two exception the first being Punjab, what was the Second?
EIC reached out to parliament for help with finances. this lead to which Act?
in 1803 was act of parliament supported by  EIC? 
the 1803 act created what dock program?
The goal of the East in dock company was  first what?
What was the name of the export dock of the EIC after the 1803 act?
in 1838 what company did the  East india dock company merge with? 
What does DEUS INDICAT mean?
what type of flowers did Gules use?
after the DEUS INDICAT what type of sea animals were pictured?
in the above quote how many ship and masts were indicated?
What animal was listed as part of the four fleur-de-lis in the above quote
During what war Did the EIC get letter of marque for its vessels
Why did EIC want tthe letters of marque most?
With out the letters of marque what wepon did  they have to protect themself that was a part of their ship?
The Earl of Mornington would have how many ___ guns on the EIc ships?
What was the most notable naval victory EIC  had?
what general played the biggest role in the capture of the seven Dutch East Indiamen?
Where were the 7 Dutch Easteast indiamen capture?
In 1797 how did the  Woodford  get to safety without firing one bullet?
in 1797 who was the captian of the Woodford that is first listed of the 5 captians?
Which state is not a member of the Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN)?
Which country is considering joining the Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN)?
What was Southeast Asia commonly known as before?
What type of issue exist over the territories in the South China sea?
Which country is Christmas Island governed by?
Which country has stated that it might join ASEAN?
What does ASEAN mean?
Which two Islands governed by Australia are considered a part of ASEAN?
Which state is not a member of ASEAN?
What country is Nicobar Island apart of?
What part of New Guinea is also considered to be apart of Southeast Asia?
What island in India is also considered to be geographically a part of Southeast Asia besides Nicobar Island?
What is the Seven Sister States of India geographically apart of?
Which Island is geographically considered a part of Southeast Asia?
Which countries are culturally a part of Southeast Asia?
Which islands were a part of the Spanish East Indies?
How many years ago did Homo sapiens reached the Southeast Asia region?
Which type of people might have migrated from Taiwan into Southeast Asia?
What country did the Austronesian people arrived at first?
Which group became extinct after living in the region for about 12,000 years?
When did the Austronesian people arrive in indonesia?
Where did the Austronesian people settle down in Indonesia?
Which people became extinct after the Homosapiens arrived?
How long ago did the Homo floresiensis live before they became extinct?
Which kingdom during 200 BCE that is located in Java and Sumatra exist?
What nationality were the traders that came to archipelago?
What country did the merchants the traders did trade with come from?
How long did the Indian influence date back to for the Malay-speaking world?
What religion besides Hinduism became well established in the Malay Peninsula?
Which Hindu kingdom existed around 200 BCE?
Which traders came to the archipelago for trade?
The Java Dwipa kingdom was well-known for what?
Which religions were well established in the Malay peninsula by the beginning of the 1st century CE?
Apart from the Indian traders, who else discovered the Malay peninsula for trade?
Which Indianised kingdom was based in eastern java?
Which ruler reigned between 1350 to 1389?
How long did the Majapahit Empire last?
How far did the Majapahit Empire's influence stretch?
In the 15th century, the ruler of which port embraced Islam?
Where did the traders from Yemen settle?
Which missionary helped to spread Islam?
Which religion proved a positive force among the ruling & trading classes?
Name the largest country in Southeast Asia.
Geologically what is Indonesia's region most active for?
Name the line that splits the Indonesian Archipelago?
What region comprises of the Wallacea?
Which country has created a system of national parks & preserves?
Which species in Java face extinction?
What is the concern in Southeast Asian region due to development & population expansion?
Where on Earth is the highest marine activity recorded?
Which areas are composed as the Coral Triangle?
Which area is called the heart of the world's Coral reef biodiversity?
Name the largest species of fish in the world.
What percentage of plant and animal species extinction is predicted in the 21st century?
Where has haze been predominant?
How is a haze formed?
What agreement has the Southeast Asian countries signed to combat haze pollution?
When did the 2 worst haze pollution occur in Southeast Asia?
Name some important commodities that originated in Southeast asian region?
Who developed the spice trade initially?
Which European traders moved into Indonesia?
The origin of which community can be traced to the 16th century?
The rise of Chinese population saw a rapid increase during which revolution?
When did the Chinese revolution start in Southeast Asia?
What is the name of the network through which the Chinese communities were connected with?
What reserves are abundant in Southeast Asia?
Which region manufactures textiles, heavy industrial products & high-tech electronic goods?
Of the Southeast Asian countries, which country has  the largest economy?
Which sector is the Southeast Asia heavily dependent on?
Of the Southeast Asian countries, which one's key economic development is based on Tourism?
According to which entity can tourism be a tremendous development tool & means to preserving the cultural diversity of the planet?
Who was the regional leader in tourism in 1995?
From 2000, Cambodia has surpassed other ASEAN countries in generating GDP on which sector?
What is the approximate area of Southeast Asia?
Among the Southeast Asian countries, which one is densely populated?
Which Island in Southeast Asia is densely populated?
name the largest ethnic group in Southeast Asia.
Which ethnic groups dominate in Indonesia?
The Tagalog, Cebuano,Ilocano & Hiligaynon groups are significant within which country in Southeast Asia?
The ethnic groups Malays & Chinese are predominant in which country?
Which religion is widely practiced in Southeast Asia?
Among the Southeast Asian countries, which country has the most populous Muslims among them?
Roman Catholic population is predominant in which Asian country?
What percentage of the population in Southeast Asia practice Islam?
East Timor is predominantly catholic due to which European rule's history?
Arabia has a strong influence in which Southeast Asian country?
Singapore & Vietnam shows which influence predominantly?
The Indian influence is evident in which country through the Tamil migrants?
Where did the Southeast Asians introduce their dance?
Which dance was famous for strong feet & hand movements?
The Khmer Empire was influenced by what?
What were the favorite forms of entertainment in Southeast Asia?
Art & literature in Southeast Asia is influenced by which religion?
The UNESCO has recognized which show as a Masterpiece of Oral & Intangible Heritage of Humanity
Which country despite converting to Islam has retained many forms of Hindu practices, culture, art & literature?
Which form of writing extended before the invention of paper?
What were the alphabets of Southeast Asia?
What other forms of writing materials were used during this period?
In what direction were the writings on a palm leaf?
The sections of the palm leafs were bound by what material?
What is professional wrestling abbreviated as?
What are a couple of styles of combat based on?
Who are live events held by?
What is professional wrestling?
What kind of style does wrestling show?
How are the actions conducted?
What are the fan encouraged to do?
How is the end result of the match planned out?
What part of the world has wrestling become less popular in?
Where did wrestling originally come from?
Where was wrestling later showcased in North America?
What is wrestling now thought to be?
What did television do for wrestling?
Where does the money made from wrestling come from?
Where large places are some of the major wrestling shows held at?
What has the internet been utilized for in wrestling?
what wrestling shows occur yearly?
In which decade did wrestling start becoming very popular?
What is one popular wrestling film?
What award was The Wrestler nominated for?
What are the names of a couple wrestling documentaries?
Where does wrestling keep coming up as a subject?
Who confessed that wrestling was not competition?
How have people reacted to the revelation that wrestling is purely entertainment?
How do many U.S. states handle wrestling?
How do the wrestlers treat the audience?
How does the audience being acknowledged by the wrestlers impact the show?
What can the audience do during a show?
What kind of conflict can arise during a show?
Which of the wrestlers are the bad guys?
Who wins in a wrestling match?
How could a wrestler win in the past?
How can a wrestler win in modern times?
In what instance will a match be declared a draw?
How long can a title match be?
What happens when a wrestler has a fall against them?
What kind of rules does a poly-sided match usually have?
What usually happens when two or more wrestlers are involved?
How can a champion lose a championship?
What determines how the referee acts?
What is a common rule about referees? 
How can a wrestler gain an advantage by using a referee? 
What kind of referees are occasionally used?
What are famous referees directed to do?
What material is within a wrestling ring?
What is around the ring?
What is used for protection in the ring?
What does a "tag" entail?
What are two things that can be done with tagging?
How long does a wrestler have to leave the ring once they are tagged out?
What happens in a fatal four-way?
What was the most common type of match before the fatal four-way? 
Why are tagging rules made?
At what point can a count be started? 
What might a partially conscious wrestler do? 
What happens during a pin attempt?
What is a common offensive move to break a pin attack?
What can the referee consider a pin attempt to be, even if the attacker is still on top of the pinned wrester?
What is a pinning method that isn't allowed?
How often are illegal pinning methods seen by the referee?
What are the illegal pinning methods called?
Can illegal pinning methods result in being disqualified? 
What happens with an illegal pinning move when it is seen by a referee? 
How can a wrestler willingly submit?
What is the move called where all limbs are incapicitated? 
What can a wrestler do to show a willing submission?
Several well-known wrestlers were famous for winning with a move called what?
What move did Tazz make popular?
What legitimate sport related to wrestling began to become popular?
Many holds will leave what body parts free?
When must contact stop between wrestlers?
How might a wrestler attempt to break a submission hold?
How long does a wrestler have to get themselves free of the hold?
What happens if the wrestler doesn't break a hold?
How does a referee check for a knockout?
What happens if all wrestlers are down?
If all wrestlers are down, how long do they have to rise? 
What kind of match has to end in a knockout?
What is another name for a knockout?
In what case can a referee choose to end the match?
What is one reason that a wrestler may not be able to continue?
Why couldn't Shawn Michaels defend himself? 
Where did Chris Jericho win in 2008?
What are a couple other ways to write countout?
What happens during a countout?
What will some wrestlers do to take advantage of the countout? 
What is the trick of sliding in and then back out of the ring called?
What else is disqualification called?
How can a wrestler be disqualified? 
In what case can a countout and disqualification be done away with entirely? 
What are the usual reasons for an automatic disqualification? 
What must the referee do to rule the match at an end via disqualification?
In what case can a referee's decision be overturned?
What is it called when a ref is knocked out?
What can wrestlers do when a ref is out? 
What is one way a match can end?
What is one reason a draw can result?
What usually happens regarding a championship during a draw?
What is another name for a one hour draw?
What is the point of a match?
Higher attendance and more ticket sales can be the result of what?
Though the contest is staged, what can garner more interest from the crowd? 
What do most wrestlers do, as far as how they act?
What is the name of one wrestler who acts like a cartoonish character? 
The Rock's persona is seen as what? 
What is common apparel in lucha libre? 
What is the popular way for wrestlers to refer to one another?
Other than a company, who else can own a character?
How can a wrestler get around changing their ring name entirely?
What else might a wrestler do to obtain their ring name?
What are other names for a protagonist?
What will an antagonist usually do?
What is a wrestler whose persona is somewhere between the two norms called?
Who is generally the audience favorite? 
What might a character do with their persona?
What did Hulk Hogan become? 
Who has the most turns in the WWE?
Who is a wrestler who never turned? 
What did Stone Cold Steve Austin start as? 
What was The Rock's original character? 
What did Steve Austin become? 
Who helps out a wrestler with poor speaking abilities?
What sometimes happens with managers?
Who else can perform the manager role?
Who might participate in a love triangle story? 
What do most matches have?
What is it called when the protagonist loses?
What do they call it when a protagonist wins? 
What can be wagered in a match? 
What are rivalries often called?
How long might a feud last?
How long did the feud between Ric Flair and Ricky Steamboat last? 
What is an example of a popular feud?
What supernatural things have been portrayed in matches?
What can be used in a wrestling story? 
What romantic drama might be used in a story? 
What happens behind the scenes of a match?
Who else do bookers focus on? 
Who might they use a lower ranked title on?
What occurs when a wrestler enters the ring?
What does the music playing indicate? 
What typically happens when a match is won?
What happens with many wrestlers?
Who won the women's title in 1937?
What did Mildred Burke form?
What year did June Byers retire? 
What year did Mildred Burke retire? 
What does a mixed tag team consist of?
When did mixed tag teams start? 
What happened when a tag was made? 
What isn't uncommon in lucha libre?
When were intergender singles bouts fought on a national scale? 
Who was the first woman to hold a belt that wasn't exclusive to women?
What was the record before it was stripped? 
Who stripped the previous record? 
A wrestler may have a small person called what?
What else can a little person do in the match?
Who was Dave Finlay often helped by?
What else did Finlay do with his little person?
What happened to Hornswoggle?
Who are the most well-known wrestling bears?
What animal has been a part of wrestling for a long time?
What condition are bears usually brought in in?
Who do the bears fight?
How many states have banned bear wrestling as of 2006?
What does every match have?
Who is usually included in stories? 
What are the possibly outcomes of a story? 
What is Doink the Clown's persona like?
What might happen during interviews?
How do characters differ in Mexican wrestling?
How are Mexican wrestlers different? 
What do American wrestlers depend on? 
What else is lucha libre known for?
How does lucha libre's tag team matches differ? 
How is Japanese wrestling similar to American?
How does Japanese wrestling differ? 
What does Japanese wrestling combine?
What is the emphasis placed on in Japanese wrestling? 
What is a common background for a Japanese wrestler? 
What is expected of newcomers? 
What were wrestlers expected to do for decades? 
How did wrestlers have to act in public? 
What effects can wrestling have on the wrestlers? 
What do the fans have?
What sometimes happens with fandoms? 
Where have some wrestlers appeared?
What do some fans like to do?
What has the internet done for wrestling fans? 
Many companies who handle wrestling footage have been founded since what decade?
What companies did WWF purchase in 2001? 
What kind of notoriety have wrestlers achieved?
What did the Rock 'n' Wrestling Connection do?
What are some other career paths wrestlers embarked on?
What other areas has wrestling garnered interest from?
What areas of study is wrestling talked about in?
What did Heather Levi write?
What college has a course about the cultural impact of wrestling?
What is wrestling sometimes called?
What is wrestling to people during a peaceful time?
What role does wrestling fill?
Who has studied the lives of wrestlers?
When did Beyond the Mat come out? 
Who hosts Real Sports?
Who are a few wrestlers who have had memoirs written about them?
What are the risks of wrestling?
What is the ring commonly made of?
What are common injuries in wrestling?
What other injuries have been connected with wrestling?
Chris Benoit was involved in what tragic event? 
What does the film's quantum efficiency limit? 
What speed of film is produced by insensitive film? 
What leads to lower quality images?
What types of film are considered fast films?
What effect does highly sensitive film have on images?
Which cameras were first of their type to adopt the ASA scale?
What were updated Weston values based on?
How were Weston values changed to ASA values?
Beginning with which year was the Weston to ASA conversion not necessary?
Until what year did other models use the original Weston scale?
Which company adopted the ASA scale in 1946?
Beginning what year were cameras built with the ASA meter?
How did older models convert to ASA scale?
How was the ASA scale shown on models built after 1946?
What were recommended film values lined up with after 1946?
In what year were big changes made to the ANSI?
What did the 1960 changes to film speed measures lead to?
Which other system were these changes applied to?
In what year was the BS system modified?
What safety factors were done away with beginning with the modifications to the standards?
What is the effective f-number proportional to?
What is used to discover the right exposure parameters?
What variables help the photographer produce the desired effect?
A lens with a setting of f/1.4 lets how much to hit the focal plane compared with a setting of f/2?
In the APEX system, the increment that doubles the exposure is called what?
What determines the effect on the emulsion after exposure?
In what range of exposures does reciprocity usually work?
How is the exposure of film changed?
How are ways of finding an emulsion's sensitivity possible?
What happens outside the 1/1000 second to 1/second exposure range?
What are two examples of films that are marketed with speeds above their true ISO speed?
What speed of film is the Ilford Delta 3200?
Which two companies produced E6 films meant for "pushing"?
What is the base speed of Ektachrome P800/1600 and Fujichrome P1600?
What type of films are Ilford Delta 3200 and Kodak T-MAX P3200?
What types of cameras have proven to be much more sensitive to light than film?
What ISO equivalent speeds can digital cameras obtain?
What is responsible for these vast increases in speed?
What is one thing that limited speeds of older digital hardware?
What does the higher speed do for the images produced?
How many techniques are available because of ISO 12232:2006?
What techniques did CIPA DC-004 provide?
What factors affect the exposure index rating?
What does the standard of ISO 12232:2006 specify?
In what year did Kodak start using a different way of characterizing two sensors?
Which methods are required by CIPA DC-004?
In what year did the three EI techniques from ISO 12232:1998 largely stop being used?
With what cameras can earlier techniques not be used?
What nation's cameras does the CIPA DC-004 apply to?
What does the DC-008 change?
Which ratios are employed to calculate noise-based speed?
What is the noise-based speed?
How are the two ratios found?
What is a definition of signal-to-noise ratio?
What factors influence the noise-based speed?
What is the range for exposure latitude?
What is another speed that can also be reported by the camera?
When should the noise-based speed be used?
Why should noise-based speed be rounded down to a lower standard?
What does the standard specify?
What measures might the user "ISO" setting correspond to?
What did the 1998 version of ISO 12232 not permit?
What types of sensitivity ratings can be specified by a camera?
What standards changed what Japanese camera makers have to specify?
In what year was CIPA DC-004 introduced?
Why can't Mexico City become a state?
When did people become able to vote for representation?
What political party controls the Mexico City legislature? 
What was Mexico City's old affiliation with the nation of Mexico?
How are officials elected to the legislature? 
What is a common nickname for Mexico City?
How did mexican nobles spend money in Mexico City?
When did the construction of exuberant houses slow down?
When did Mexico gain independence? 
How long was the war?
What was the first battle of the Mexican Independence war called? 
What was the battle cry of the war?
When did the war begin?
When was most of the urbanization completed? 
The extensive modernization started with what?
What was built during the modernization?
What famous street was built during this period of modernization?
What was turned into a monument after the war? 
Who was the man behind the modernization of Mexico City?
Why wasn't Diaz's plan completed? 
What was the overall design plan of Mexico City?
What was the main construction project in the Profirian/French style?
How many of the industrial jobs in the county were based in Mexico City in the late 20th century?
What did the countryside workers make to live in? 
What did the shantytowns create?
What day of the week did the major earthquake strike Mexico City?
How strong was the powerful earthquake that hit Mexico City in 1985?
What month did the 8.1 earthquake hit Mexico City in 1985?
Why did the one-party government struggle after the major earthquake in 1985?
Who led the rescue effort after the earthquake of 1985?
What is the minimum height in meters of the region Mexico City is located in?
Where is Mexico City located?
How high do the mountains get in Mexico City's region?
Why is Mexico City vulnerable to flooding?
How does the city prevent flooding?
When did draining of Lake Texcoco begin?
How much water is there, approximately, in the lake Mexico City is on?
How much has the city fallen?
What does Mexico City rest on?
Where are most of the trees located in Mexico City?
How much rain falls on Mexico City?
When is it warm, yet does not rain?
When does the majority of the rain fall in Mexico City?
When is it coldest in Mexico City?
What mostly controls the rain in Mexico City?
What happened to the dikes the Aztecs built?
Where does the lake still remain?
Who first built the dikes in Lake Texcoco?
What made up Lake Texcoco?
Where is the lake located in Atenco?
How bad is the ozone in Mexico City?
Carbon Monoxide levels are about 3 times lower now than in what year?
What city is similar to Mexico City in terms of pollution?
When Mexico one of the worst cities in terms of pollution? 
Who decides safe levels of o-zone in cities?
If Mexico City was declared a state, how many states would be in the federation?
What event caused the citizens to reconsider how the government of Mexico City was set up?
What do people call the leader of Mexico City?
Who declared the "Mayor" of Mexico City?
What state does Mexico City belong to?
When did the Federal District receive more power? 
When did citizens receive the right to elect the head of the Federal District?
How is the leader of Mexico City now established?
What gave the Federal District more autonomy? 
What is the local government of Mexico City called?
How is the local government of Mexico City formed?
What is the proportionality voting referred to in Mexico City?
How many representatives make up the Federal District?
What is the maximum percentage of seats a single party can control?
How many seats of the uninominal elections did the PRD get in the 2006 elections?
Why does the government prevent more than 63% of a party to control the legislature? 
How many boroughs make up Mexico City?
How are the heads of the boroughs elected?
How were the heads of the boroughs originally established? 
Who provides the city services?
When did election of borough heads begin?
What do new cars in Mexico need to have?
When did the underground rail system begin construction?
How many people ride the Mexico city subway system each day?
How many days of the year in 1991 was the air pollution a serious health risk?
What is one way the government helps with the "Crush" of the rush hour riding of the subway system?
Who privatized the airlines of Mexico?
Who signed NAFTA for Mexico?
What did NAFTA do to the businesses in Mexico City?
Where did the factories of Mexico City move to most commonly?
How many people live in the Federal District? 
What is the overall population of Mexico City in 2008?
What was the migration rate of Mexico City from 95-2000?
Compared to other cities in Mexico, Mexico City's growth is?
What countries do most of the South American immigrants come from?
Where do most of the Asian immigrants come from?
When did Filipinos start migrating to Mexico City?
How large is the metro system of Mexico City?
When was the Mexico City metro system first opened?
How many lines are in the metro system?
How many people ride the metro system each day?
How many stations are in the Mexico City metro system?
How do people know which days to not drive their car?
How many cars were still restricted in 2003?
When were new emisson standards enacted?
How can cars get exempt from the restrictions?
What is the name of the parking meter system in Mexico City?
Who operates the parking meters?
How much money a month do the parking meters bring in?
What are the hours of Mexico City Parking meters?
How many parking meters were installed as of October 2013?
When did Mexico City lost most of its artifacts? 
When did the complex art of Mexico City begin?
What holds most of the old art of the Mexico city region?
What are the main artifacts that have survived? 
When did the Museum of Remembrance and Tolerance open?
What main event inspired the Museum of Remembrance and Tolerance?
The exhibit inaugurated by the Dalai Lama opened when?
What is the main subject of the Museum of Remembrance and Tolerance?
How many people does the National Auditorium hold?
What main languages are supported by shows at the National Auditorium?
What year was the National Auditorium voted best in the world?
How can you see the Grand Opera of New York in Mexico City?
How many states does Mexico have?
What are some international cuisines offered in Mexico City?
What other specific types of food does the city offer?
What university is the largest of the continent?
How many students attend UNAM?
What percent of scientific research is done at UNAM?
What worldwide ranking does UNAM hold?
What is the main campus of UNAM called?
What are mobile markets in Mexico City called?
How is the retail market of Mexico City?
What is a common way stores are distributed in Mexico City?
What is the spectrum of gods you can get in Mexico City?
Similar tianguis might set up shop where?
What is the most basic way a street vendor might sell their goods?
Street vendors might sell their goods in official places as well as where?
Where is the Chapultepec Zoo located?
When was the Chapultepec Zoo opened?
What sets the Zoo San Juan de Aragon apart from the others?
How big is the Zoo Los Coyotes?
How many animals inhabit Zoo Los Coyotes?
How many crimes occurred around the turn of the latest century? 
Why might more than 500 crimes have occurred each day at the turn of the century instead of the officially reported number?
What Mexican mayor tried to crack down on crime immensely? 
What is one way the city tried to combat crime?
What is the ratio of cops to citizens in Mexico City?
Approximately how many of the world population speak German as a native language? 
Of the population that speaks German as a native language how many of them consider themselves to be German?
How many of the worlds population claim German ancestors?
what is the total number of Germans both native speaking and heredity in the world?
Where in Brazil is most of the German descendants located?
How many native German speakers in the world are there?
How many native German speakers consider themselves German?
How many people in the world claim to be from German ancestry?
What emperor forced the Germanic tribes to the east side of the Rhine?
In what did Emperor Augustus order the conquest of the Germans? 
The Romans suffered a horrible defeat in there conquest of the Germans in what battle? 
Roman's adoption of what religion would greatly influence the German society? 
Through what act would Roman and German customs become intertwine? 
Which Roman emperor ordered the conquest of the Germans?
What religion did Germans adopt?
What battle did Germans defeat the Romans?
What period in history do we see the emergence of German culture?
The kingdom of Germany formed within what outer established empires?
When was the Title King of the Germans first used?
Who coined the phrase "king of the Germans"
Who was given the prilavage of being called the first King of the Germans?
When did a German ethnicity emerge?
When is the title of rex teutonicum first used?
Who first used rex teutonicum?
When is ein diutscher first used?
What does ein diutscher mean?
The Expansion of Germany  by the Catholic Church into the areas of the Slavs and balts is know as what?
What was the name of the group that waged war in the Baltic?
Who was the Old Prussians ethnic group related to?
Although conquered the Persian language lived on till when?
Who is a famous German that  name has Slavic origins?
When was the Prussian language extinct?
What happened to the Slavic people of the Baltic?
Who led the German expansion?
What famous German military strategist has a name with Slavic origin?
What let to the assimilation of Baltic and Slavic populations?
German's domination of trade in the Eastern Europe was credited to what?
Because of the increased trade what places became the hubs of German culture?
What was promoted due to wealth and power of the German families?
the holy roman empire due to its many different conquests was seen as what type of society?
What helped the Germans dominate trade?
What is the German work for German town law?
Was the Hanseatic league exclusively German?
What other ethnicities, besides German were part of The Empire?
By what time period had many of the Jewish  population joined the Holy Roman Empire?
The Jewish populations upon migrating into the German society mingled languages to form what new language? 
What cause the tolerance and mixing  into German Society to end for the Jews?
What language did many of the Jews speak after the crusades? 
What language did the Jews speak prior to assimilating into German culture?
After assimilating to German culture, what language did the Jews adopt?
When did Jewish assimilation end?
What happened to the Jews during the crusades?
What was one of the main factors that caused the dissolve of the Holy Roman Empire?
What assured  Europe would remain the same preventing Germany from becoming one country?
When was the Crimean War?
When was Germany's unification? 
What prominent Jewish German  sought German unification in the mid 19th century?
What was the cause of the final dissolution of the Holy Roman Empire?
What two countries emerged as competitors after the Congress of Vienna?
Who led the way for the Congress of Vienna?
In what decade was German unification?
Who was Eduard Lasker?
When did France attack Prussia? 
Who won the Franco-Prussian War?
When was the German Empire founded?
What regions was excluded from the German Empire?
What was the primary religion of Germany?
When was the German empire created?
Who was excluded from the German Nation State?
What religion was a majority in Germany?
What did many people in Germany still want to do?
What leader tried to unite all people considered themselves "German"
Who resisted the uniting of people under Hitler?
The Swiss has viewed themselves as their own country since what year?
Who welcomed the idea in area such as Sudetenland and Poland?
Who headed the Nazis?
Who resisted the Nazi idea of uniting all Germans from the get go?
Since when had the Swiss viewed themselves as a different nation?
When was the Peace of Westphalia?
Who wanted to unite all of the Germans all over the area?
With the conclusion of World War 2 what did most Eastern Europe countries do with their German citizens?
How long did many of the Germans live in the eastern Europe countries before being expelled? 
Approximately how many Germans were expelled from their home after world war II?
After World War II where were Germans forced to relocate to?
How many Germans were expelled after WWII?
After what war were Germans expelled from their territories? 
Where were Germans that were inhabiting other lands expelled to?
What is credited with the origins of the German identity?
How was early German culture developed?
What man is credited with the emergence of the German nation?
When did the popularity of the German nation increase?
What is credited with creating the Origins of a German identity?
Who developed the concept of a German Nation?
When did the popularity of a German identity arise?
Who was Johann Herder?
Residence that speak German as their mother tongue and  families have been in place for generations are often consider?
What is the name given to Germans who family left but came back to the lands?
What is the name of  gven to the population that lives outside of current Germany boundary but still within historic Germany?
What are refugees from Germany that still speak German referred to?
People who have generations of family in Germany, and look and speak German are classified as what?
Who are people of German ancestry but have lived in other parts of Europe, then returned to Germany?
What are people who have ancestral roots in Germany, but now live outside of Germany called?
What are people called who have left Germany but still speak German?
What is the native language of Germans?
What languages is German related to?
How many natives speak German?
What is the most commonly spoken language in the European Union?
What is the dominant language of science?
How many German Americans are there?
How many Germans live in Brazil?
How many people in the world have German heritage?
America is home to what percentage of German decedent people?
In what year was the never ending story made?
What award did Nowhere in Africa win in 2002?
In what year did The Lives of Others win the Academy Award for Best Foreign Language?
How often is the Berlin International Film Festival held?
What was the first year of the Berlin International Film Festival?
What percentage of Germans are Roman Catholic?
What percentage of Germans are Evangelical Protestants?
What religion is the North and East part of Germany?
Where is there a non-religious majority?
What year was the turning point for Germany in the Nation Brands Index?
What year did BBC reveal that Germany is the most positive influence in the world?
what percentage have a negative view of Germany?
What percentage of people have a positive view of Germany?
In what century did the Pan-Germanisms origins begin?
What movement came out of the French Revolution?
Who was threatened by Nationalism?
Who ruled central and Eastern Europe during the 19th century?
Where was Johann Tillmann from?
How many Puritans were in the initial group that settled New Haven?
What group sold the land to the Puritans?
The Quinnipiacs were under attack by what group?
What is the name of the religious leader who co-led this founding group?
What is the name of the London merchant who co-led this founding group?
In what year did the Puritans survey New Haven Harbor?
From what colony did the original 500 Puritan settlers originate?
Who was the religious leader of the original Puritan settlers?
In what year did the original 500 Puritan settlers arrive in the New Haven harbor area?
From what native tribe did the original Puritan settlers purchase land in exchange for the offer of providing protection?
What year begin the founding of New Haven Harbor?
Where did the settlers came from?
What was the name of the Native Americans that sold them the land?
In comparison to Massachusetts what where settlers hoping to establish in New Haven Harbor?
Who was the religious leader that lead the pilgrims to New Haven Harbor?
How did New Haven colony differ from Connecticut colony in regard to religion?
What was the name of the settlement before it was called New Haven?
What was the name of the area north of New Haven changed to in 1678?
What was the town center of the Connecticut colony?
What type of government did the Puritan settlers establish?
By what year did the Puritan settlers rename the area from Quinnipac to Newhaven?
In what year was the northern area of New Haven renamed Hamden?
What colony was located to the north of New Haven Colony, centered around the area known as Hartford?
What did New Haven Colony not permit that principally distinguished it from Connecticut Colony?
In 1678 what was  the new name of the Northern part of New Haven?
New Haven Colony was separated from the Connecticut Colony which was located where?
What made New Haven different from the other colonies in Connecticut?
Where was the headquarters of the New Haven Colony located?
What is the name given to the celebrated date of 23 April 1775 in New Haven?
Who was the captain of New Haven's Second Company, Governor's Foot Guard?
How long did the march from New Haven to Cambridge, Massachusetts take Arnold and his men?
Who was the influential New Haven general that hoped to avoid conflict with the British Parliament as the American Revolution loomed closer?
What date is still commemorated by Powder House Day in New Haven?
What was the name of the Second Company in New Haven that was the first to enter the inaugural struggle with the British?
Under whose leadership did the Governor's Foot Guard break into the powder house to arm themselves?
Toward what area did the New Haven militia march for three days following the powder house incident?
Power House Day is celebrated on what day in New Haven?
What is the name of infamous historical person who played an important role on Power House Day? 
Where was George Washington planning to go after staying in New Haven?
What is the name of the New Haven Militia that fought on during Powder House Day?
What is the name of the General who led the raid against New Haven on July 5, 1779?
Who was the president of Yale at the time of the attack?
Why did New Haven fair better than other invaded cities?
What was the size  of the invading force?
Who was the governor of New York under which the loyalist and British raid of New Haven took place?
The students of what New Haven university formed an ad-hoc militia to confront the Redcoats?
Who was the professor of Yale Divinity School that led the student militia to confront the Redcoats?
On what date did the loyalists and Redcoats land in New Haven Harbor to commence a raid on New Haven?
Who was the president of Yale that provided diary accounts expressing disbelief over the commencement of the revolution in New Haven?
What is the name of the general that lead British regulars to New Haven Harbor?
At the time what was the population of New Haven Harbor?
A group of militia from a very famous modern town in Connecticut came to fought in the Harbor, what was the name of their town?
The militia that fought in New Haven was lead by who? 
Who is the Yale graduate, inventor, and arms manufacturer that had a large positive impact on the New Haven economy in the late 18th century?
What invention, for which he is primarily known, did Eli Whitney develop in New Haven?
What is the area near Hamden that was renamed for Eli Whitney?
What was the nickname given to Connecticut due to the large number of arms manufacturers that arose in the state? 
In 1836, who invented the automatic revolver in Eli Whitney's gun manufacturing plant?
What is the name of the inventor that created the cotton gin in New Haven?
What is the name of the main road that connects New Haven to Hamden?
What was the company that was responsible Connecticut rise as a manufacturing economy? 
The rise of gun factories within Connecticut earn the state what name?
In what year was the first automatic revolver invented?
What major war stimulated the New Haven economy by way of industrial goods purchased through the New Haven Arms Company?
What was the New Haven Arms Company later renamed?
The increase in immigrants from what country in southern Europe had a notable impact on the population growth in New Haven in the early 20th century?
What ethnic group currently comprises approximately half the population of East Haven, West Haven and North Haven?
What area of New Haven was known for being the center of the Jewish community?
What was the original name of the famous rifle manufacturing companies in New Haven?
In modern day New Haven who makes up for majority of the demographics in terms of ethnicity?
The Civil War had many effects after the war, what was the main effect for New Haven?
What New Haven mayor is responsible for projects that placed the city among the forefront of urban renewal in the U.S. circa 1954? 
What major U.S. interstate runs along the Long Wharf section of New Haven?
What New Haven thoroughfare runs between Interstate 95, downtown, and the neighborhood known as The Hill?
What area of New Haven was Route 34 originally intended to service?
What did the western portion of Route 34 ultimately become?
What was the name of the mayor that lead the urban development project in New Haven 1954?
What was of the major urban development that affected several New Haven neighborhood?
During this redevelopment process what happen to the West part of Route 34?
In approximately what year did revitalization most recently begin to occur in downtown New Haven?
What specific area of downtown New Haven enjoyed a notable increase in apartments in condominiums at the beginning of the current century?
What specific service sector has substantially increased in downtown New Haven in recent years?
In addition to Stop & Shop, what new supermarket is located one block from the Green and is poised to serve the growing downtown population?
In the 21st Century what has happen to most of Downtown New Haven in terms of retail?
What has happen in New Haven Green during the 2000s?
Including to the growth, what market chain have expanded nearby Downtown New Haven?
What multi-use project in New Haven is the largest residential building in Connecticut?
What park is anticipated to extend to downtown New Haven?
For what area are a new boathouse and dock being planned?
What is the city landmark demolished in 2007 that the city ultimately wish to redevelop?
What is the name of building project is taking place in Gateway Community College downtown?
The New Haven Harbor is receiving what kind of adjustment?
The city of New Haven wants to redevelop/build what sort of structure?
In terms of infrastructure, what is being develop in the downtown area?
What type of bridge is replacing the old Q Bridge?
In what year did the U.S. Supreme Court entertain a lawsuit filed by 18 New Haven firefighters against the city of New Haven?
What was the distinguishing issue of the lawsuit over which 18 white firefighters in New Haven sought relief from the U.S. Supreme Court?
What was the name of the case in which the U.S. Supreme Court ruled that the city of New Haven had violated the Civil Rights Act of 1964 by denying any firefighter a promotion? 
In what year did low scores of black firefighters on a promotion test issued by the New Haven Fire Department ultimately halt promotions for all firefighters of any race in the city?
How many of the 18 white firefighters received promotions via district court order to the city of New Haven following the U.S. Supreme Court ruling in favor of the petitioning firefighters?
What was the decision from the 2009 Supreme Court Case?
The Court case was involve between which two parties?
What did the city do after the fail test scores for promotions?
Out of how many of the white fireman got a promotion afterwards?
Funding was awarded to Connecticut in 2010 and 2011 to build what line with a southern terminus in New Haven?
At what terminal in New Haven was the Hartford Line slated to originate?
What location provided the northern terminus for the Hartford Line?
What is the name of the corridor in western Massachusetts by which federal authorities sought to improve trip times and the amount of the population served in both New Haven and Springfield? 
In what year was the "Knowledge corridor high speed intercity passenger rail" slated for construction?
What is the name of the train line that connects Connecticut and Massachusetts together?
Where is the starting point of the terminus line in New Haven?
The purpose of the train line is to connect Connecticut and Massachusetts to what state north?
When does the Knowledge Corridor line begins it's construction?
Generally how fast are these trains?
In addition to the New Haven Harbor, what additional natural element is a prominent geographic feature of the area, flanking the northeast and northwest boundaries?
Which trap rock ridge was altered to accommodate the east-west portion of the Wilbur Park Crossway?
What was the name of the group that once utilized West Rock as a hideout, known colloquially as "The Three Judges?"
What is the name of the war monument located at the peak of East Rock?
What is the name for the popular feature that ascends the cliffside of East Rock?
What is New Haven best known for in terms of the main landmark and structure?
In terms of economy and geographic landscape what is the used for the two trop rocks ridges north nearby the city?
The West Rock is also used for what sort of infrastructure?
What does the Eastern Rocks offer as a park on the other hand?
By how many rivers is the city of New Haven drained?
Which New Haven river releases into West Haven Harbor?
Into what local body of water do the Mill and Quinnipiac rivers discharge? 
Into what larger waterway do the West Haven Harbor and New Haven Harbor recess as embayments?
What is the name of the western river in the city of New Haven?
The eastern river bears the name of the Native American Tribes that once live in New Haven, what is the name?
The two eastern rivers meets in which of New Haven Harbor?
These two harbors are part of what estuary?
Are all of New Haven's smaller stream active through all four seasons?
On what type of city plan was New Haven laid out upon the founding of the area?
For what environmental initiative is the city of New Haven known, primarily for instituting the first of its kind in America?
What was the nickname given to the city of New Haven due to an indigenous tree which largely perished in the mid-20th century?
What was the cause of the sudden extinction of many of the elms in New Haven?
What public area in New Haven was named a National Historic Landmark in 1970?
What was New Haven's nickname?
Due to the replanting of trees the center of the city is called what?
In what year did it became recognize as a landmark?
In the original plans of the city, how many city block were designed?
Because of it's trees New Haven is known for being first to implemented what in the US?
Approximately how many residents make up the population of downtown New Haven?
What downtown New Haven restaurant was cited by the New York Times, Esquire and Wine Spectator for its outstanding Spanish cuisine?
Downtown New Haven contributes approximately what amount of the overall tax base for the area?
Downtown New Haven contributes approximately how many jobs to the city?
How many people live in downtown New Haven?
In terms of economy the downtown portion is responsible for what?
Of the downtown area what gets the most positive media coverage?
What has help the most with the continuous growth within the area?
What area of New Haven comprises the area centered around the business district and New Haven Green?
What is the historic water-front neighborhood located in the southern area of New Haven?
What east-central neighborhood in New Haven is home to a large number of Italian-Americans?
What is the name of the neighborhood in New Haven that rests between the Mill and Quinnipiac rivers, and is comprised primarily of an immigrant community?
What is the name of the district nearing the harbor of the city?
Though the Green is the popular center of the city, there is another district, what's the name?
If you were to go northern part of New Haven, what district would you find?
Between two of it's rivers lies a district with a heavy immigrant population, the name is?
Wooster Square is known for what roots?
What Fortune 1000 company, also the largest Catholic service organization in the world, is based in New Haven?
What prominent producer of electrical equipment, also a Fortune 1000 company, is based in Greater New Haven? 
What publicly traded bank, also the second largest in Connecticut, is based in New Haven?
What is the name of the New Haven-based business faction of the infamous Skull and Bones Society?
In what year did the Southern New England Telephone Company, formerly the District Telephone Company of New Haven, establish operations in the area? 
New Haven contains one of largest religious service organization in the world, it's name?
Within the New Haven metropolitan area contain a Fortune 1000 company located in Orange, the name of the company?
What is the name of the second largest bank found in Connecticut?
As one of the oldest telephone companies, the SNET started in what year?
In modern day SNET operates as what in New Haven?
What is the most prominent religion in New Haven?
Under what immediate jurisdiction of the Catholic Church does New Haven fall?
How many yeshivas are located in New Haven?
With what religious movement do many Puerto Ricans in New Haven associate?
In addition to Jews, what other religious community comprises a large share of the non-Catholic population of New Haven?
In terms of religious affiliation, what is the most prevalent religion in the city? 
There are several religious group that have seem rise in demographics, one of which is popular among African Americans being?
However Christianity can be found within the city, particularly which neighborhoods?
What former U.S. president was born in New Haven?
What New Haven institution did former U.S. president Bill Clinton and Hillary Rodham Clinton both attend?
What former U.S. vice president graduated from Yale University?
Prior to 2008, in what year did the last election occur in which neither major party had an individual on the ticket with a connection to New Haven and Yale University?
Who was the President pro tempore of the Senate in 1801 that was native to New Haven?
Which former U.S. president have been born in New Haven?
Multiple president have studied at this popular college, you can guess the name of the university?
Serving in President Obama's cabinet, this man has also studied at Yale, can you guess who?
Yale University is heavily affiliate with our presidential candidates since what year?
What is the title of the political science book, written by a Yale professor, that explores New Haven politics and history throughout the 1950's?
Who is the author of "Who Governs? Democracy an Power in An American City"
What penultimate work by Alexis de Tocqueville makes mention of New Haven's original theocratic government?
To which prominent conservative, that authored God and Man at Yale, did New Haven provide residence in 1951?
Who is the author of The Fifteenth Ward and the Great Society?
What is the name of popular book discussing the politics of New Haven published in the 50s?
What famous french historian mention the city within his book Democracy in America?
New Haven was the home to author that wrote God and Man at Yale, the writer's name was?
What is the name of the book published in 1966 that had focus on the city politics in relations with President Johnson's policies?
What New Haven trial is known to be the longest in the history of Connecticut?
In what year did the New Haven Black Panther trials take place in New Haven?
Who was the co-founder of the Black Panthers that was placed on trial in New Haven?
What day marked the beginning of New Haven being overwhelmed by 12,000 individuals protesting the Black Panther trials? 
In what central New Haven location did protesters of the Black Panther trials congregate?
What political movement group is known in within city among non whites?
How many attended the trials of the Black Panther in 1970?
The protest of trial result in what specifically?
The protest also initiate the start of criticizing what presidential administration?
What was the name of one of the party's leader that also happen to be on trial?
In what year did the U.S. Supreme Court agree to hear a lawsuit originally filed by 20 white and Hispanic firefighters seeking relief from the city of New Haven?
What was the primary legal issue at the center of the suit filed against New Haven by firefighters?
In what year did the city of New Haven deny all firefighters promotions citing the poor performance of black firefighters on performance tests ?
What was the name of the 2009 case in which the U.S. Supreme Court awarded relief to New Haven firefighters against the city of New Haven?
Which Supreme Court Justice was a graduate of Yale Law School and was currently undergoing the nomination process at the time of the 2009 lawsuit filed by firefighters against the city of New Haven? 
The 2009 Supreme Court Case which had the City of New Haven versus who?
What was the date of the final ruling?
The actual name for the case was what?
The court cast was rather popular due to which person on the case?
Upon reaching a verdict the summary statement was that city denied the firefighter a promotion because of what?
Who is the famous comic strip author of Doonesbury that attended Yale University in New Haven?
For which long-time New Haven resident and former Yale student is Doonesbury named?
What was the Charles Pillsbury's nickname during college?
What is the name of the international law theory, grounded in jurisprudence framed by a sociological normative approach?
What sitting Connecticut U.S. senator graduated from Yale University in New Haven?
Which past U.S. senator had lived in New Haven and graduated from Yale?
The term, the New Haven Approach was what exactly?
What is the name of the Green party member that also studied at Yale?
Analysis by what organization detailed that municipality-based rankings may be inaccurate? 
What constant in two cities can create disparities in analysis by way of distribution over differing land areas?
Neighborhoods and blocks, as opposed to municipalities, are both examples of what?
What research organization did an city analysis on New Haven?
The organization stated that analysis should be based on comparison of neighborhoods within the city and not what?
According to the institution what leads to inaccurate analysis of the city?  
What private university is located in downtown New Haven?
What community college is located in downtown New Haven?
What state university is located in New Haven?
What school serves as the largest employer of New Haven?
In what year did Gateway Community College open its newly consolidated downtown campus?
Where is Yale University located.
What the name of a state university also located in the city?
Before relocating to downtown area, New Haven has a community college that used to be located where?
Other than Yale, New Haven has another private college in the city, it's name?
When was the new Gateway Community College open?
What private school, with the notable distinction of being the fifth-oldest educational institution in the U.S., was founded in New Haven?
In what year was Hopkins School founded in New Haven?
What is the name of the environmental charter school located in New Haven?
What are the names of the two Achievement First charter schools located in New Haven?
What magnet school in New Haven is centered around arts education?
As one of the oldest school which was founded in 1660, what is it's name?
In terms of schools how old is it historically compare to others?
How many charters schools are available in New Haven?
What scholarship is awarded in New Haven by Yale University to public school students meeting specified criteria?
What is the cumulative GPA necessary for a student to be eligible for the New Haven Promise scholarship?
How many hours of community service must a student perform in order to be eligible for the New Haven Promise scholarship?
What is the minimum attendance rate for a student to be eligible for the New Haven Promise Scholarship?
In what year was the New Haven Promise scholarship initiated? 
What is the name of the scholarship is funded by Yale?
In terms of requirement what sort of service would one needs to fulfilled in order to apply?
When did the scholar project begin?
Currently how many students total have been approve by the program?
What distinction was afforded to New Haven in 2014 by Livability.com?
How many Zagat-rated restaurants are located in New Haven?
What city in Connecticut has the highest number of Zagat-rated restaurants?
How many restaurants can be accessed within a two block radius of New Haven Green?
What website gave critical acclaim to New Haven for the city's food?
How many restaurant are located in the center of New Haven's city?
There are about how many Zagat-rated restaurants located in the city?
Within the cities there are markets that focus on what sort of cuisines?
What landmark New Haven fast food establishment is located on Crown Street?
In what year did Louis' Lunch begin serving fast food in New Haven?
Who is the founder of Louis' Lunch in New Haven?
What body of the federal government credits New Haven resident Louis Lassen with inventing the hamburger and steak sandwich?
Which New Haven resident patented a cast iron stove using grid irons in 1939?
Louis' Lunch is popular for serving what?
What specifically how does Louis' Lunch cooks its' food?
When was Louis's Lunch found?
In addition to Yale Reparatory Theatre, what are two additional major theatre houses located in New Haven?
What is the name of the student-run group at Yale University provides theatrical productions in New Haven?
What New Haven performance venue is hosted by Southern Connecticut State University?
What was the original name of the College Street Music Hall?
In what year did the newly renovated College Street Music Hall reopen? 
What theater sits on Yale's campus?
The Southern Connecticut State University has it own theater as while, it's name?
What theater is currently under renovation in the city?
What school in New Haven is known for it's theater being used by both students and church?
Yale also has a theater managed by its' own student, then name?
At what New Haven museum is an original copy of the Gutenberg Bible housed? 
What New Haven landmark serves as the nation's oldest college art museum?
What New Haven museum offers the largest collection of British art available outside of the UK?
What museum is located in Hamden on Whitney Street and dedicated to a notable New Haven inventor?
With what major university are the majority of museums in New Haven associated? 
Which museum feature the original copy of the Gutenberg Bible?
Yale claim to have the oldest college art museum in the United States, what is the name of the place?
There is a museum on Whitney Avenue that contain a variety of historical treasure, what is its' name?
What is the name of the museum that specifically focus on a single inventor located the city?
What is the name of a prominent contemporary art gallery on Orange Street in New Haven?
What are two contemporary art galleries located in downtown New Haven?
In what area of New Haven are Kehler Liddel, Jennider Jane Gallery, and The Hungry Eye Gallery located? 
What New Haven gallery is housed in the Erector Square complex located in the Fair Haven neighborhood? 
For what annual New Haven art event, held in early October, is the Erector Square complex used? 
What is the name of the art gallery that hosts multiple artist locally and around the world?
This gallery contains works of artist such as The Hungry Eye, what is name of the place?
The Erector Square complex is a gallery that is located where?
During which month is the complex particularly active? 
What public area in New Haven is home to free concerts in the summer?
What musical festival was initiated in 1982 in New Haven?
In what year was the New Haven Jazz Festival cancelled, thereby precluding it from being one of the longest running free outdoor festivals in the U.S.?
Who sponsors the New Haven Jazz Festival?
What is the name for the concerts held on New Haven Green throughout the month of July?
What popular events that place in New Haven Green area?
When did the first Jazz Festival made it debut?
In general how many people attend these music concerts?
After being cancel in 2007, what organization currently support New Haven Jazz Festival?
To what annual art festival is the city of New Haven home?
What was the inaugural year of the New Haven St. Patrick's Day parade?
In what historic New Haven neighborhood does the St. Andrew the Apostle Italian festival take place?
What annual festival, celebrated on New Haven Green, memorializes the New Haven's passage into the Revolutionary War?
In what year did Film Fest New Haven begin?
What international event celebrating art is hosted in New Haven?
As one of the oldest and largest traditions, how long have the city been celebrating Saint Patrick's Day?
Which event takes place every year in Wooster Square since the beginning of the 20th century?
What organization was responsible for the planting of several cherry blossom trees in 1973?
In general how many people attend  the yearly Wooster Square Cheery Blossom Festival?
What is the name of the major daily editorial newspaper for the city of New Haven?
What is the civic news forum that specifically reports on downtown New Haven? 
What weekly entertainment print news source for New Haven is backed by The Register?
Channel 65 is New Haven's home to what PBS affiliate? 
What weekly publication in New Haven is issued by Yale University? 
What is the main newspaper company for New Haven?
The other newspaper, New Haven Advocate is run by which company?
There is newspaper company within the city that runs monthly, it's name ?
What is the name of the tabloid that is run by mainly college students?
In terms of news and sports does New Haven receive television broadcasting from other cities?
What 1995 mayor of New Haven sought to reinvent the area into a northeastern hub of art and culture?
What sports complex was shuttered in New Haven by the DeStefano administration in 2002? 
What was New Haven's last professional sports team?
What indoor sporting complex in New Haven was constructed by the DeStefano administration in 1998?
What is the approximate seating capacity of the New Haven Athletic Center?
Who was the mayor for the city in the late 90s?
Due to the heavy upkeep, DeStefano decided to close what major infrastructure in the city?
When was the last time New Haven had a professional sport team?
In terms of capacity how big was the new constructed New Haven Athletic Center?
In what year did New Haven host the Special Olympic Summer World Games?
What major tennis event take place annually every August in New Haven?
What is the name of the tennis complex, cited as one of the largest worldwide, located in New Haven?
What is the nickname of the historic football rivalry between Yale and Harvard hosted annually in New Haven?
What year did New Haven became a host for the Specials Olympics?
The city also host a large international tennis event, when does it usually take place?
"The Game" is a special event that focus on what sort of rivalry between the colleges?
What is the name of major road race that places within the city?
New Haven served as home to what two notable 19th century architects?
What division of Yale University is credited with nurturing the architectural component of New Havens economy?
Who is the notable artist of the Beaux-Arts school responsible for designing both New Haven's Union Station and New Haven Public Library?
In what year did New Haven commission the City Beautiful plan?
Who is responsible for designing Ingalls Rink at Yale University in New Haven? 
New Haven is also known for a very notable architecture institution, it's name?
Who was the architect that design the New Haven Free Public Library?
What was the name of the building that was feature in America's Favorite Architecture list of 2007?
How many properties in New Haven are featured on the National Register of Historic Places? 
In 1868, which famous author is reported to have declared New Haven's Hillhouse Avenue to be "the most beautiful street in America?"
Of the three churches flanking New Haven Green, which is home to a notorious 17th century crypt?
What famous American traitor has a first wife buried in a 17th century crypt in a New Haven church flanking New Haven Green?
What structure of Yale University, listed on the National Register of Historic Places, holds the distinction of being the oldest building on campus?
According to the National Register of Historic Places how many historical sites are there in New Haven? 
In what year was the famous The New Haven Green founded?
What tourist spot can be found directly underneath the New Haven Green?
Yale University also contains a historical site within it campus, the name of it?
What structure was ordered to be built in New Haven in 1776 to protect the port at the outset of the Revolutionary War?
In what year was Black Rock Fort captured by the British in New Haven and incinerated? 
After which revolutionary war hero and New Haven native was Black Rock Fort rechristened upon reconstruction in 1807?
What two fortifications distinguished the second Fort Hale built in New Haven during the Civil War?
In what year did the U.S. Congress afford Connecticut the deed to the site at Fort Hale in New Haven?
Black Rock Fort was built in response to what event in the 18th century?
The fort was destroy during the fighting only to be rebuilt in what year?
Why exactly was the fort rename to Fort Nathan Hale?
During the Civil War, New Haven needed to be further fortify incase of another invasion, what structure did the city built?
The federal government pass the ownership of the fort to the state of Connecticut, what year was this?
What cemetery in New Haven is situated next to the campus of Yale University and has been designated a National Historic Landmark? 
In what architectural style is the gateway of Grove Street Cemetery notably designed?  
What Beaux Arts structure on New Haven's Chapel Street was built on the site believed to formerly feature the home of Roger Sherman?
What former U.S. president is believed to have stayed in New Haven at the home of Roger Sherman?
Which notable New Haven resident inventor, credited with the cotton gin, is buried in Grove Street Cemetery?
What is the name of the historical site that site next to Yale's campus?
What is Grove Street Cemetery famously known for?
Roger Sherman once lived in Chapel Street, in modern day what is the name building that sit in its' place?
George Washington once paid visit to Sherman's house, what year was this?
Throughout the Roaring Twenties, what public beach in New Haven was a favored destination for tourists?
Which famed professional baseball player is known to have visited at Lighthouse Point Park in New Haven during the 1920's?
What notable New Haven attraction constructed in 1847 was located at Lighthouse Point Park?
In what year was New Haven's Lighthouse Point carousel constructed? 
In what year was Five Mile Point Lighthouse decommissioned upon construction of Southwest Ledge Lighthouse? 
What popular tourist site was particularly active during the 20s?
In 1847, a new landmark was constructed at the park, what exactly was it?
After 1877 another lighthouse was build to replace File Mile Point, what was its' name?
Is Southwest Ledge Light still active today?
What form of public transportation preceded the current New Haven Division bus routes?
What decade ushered in the operation of horse-drawn carriages in New Haven? 
What advancement was made to New Haven trolley lines in the mid 1890's?
What mode of public transportation in New Haven phased out the trolley service in the 1920's and 1930's?
In what year was the final trolley route in New Haven converted to a bus line? 
Buses in New Haven uses what kind of route for their service?
Before 20th century, what was the form of public transportation in the city?
What further ideas for public transportation is the city currently considering?
In what year were trolleys finally replaced completely by buses?
What rail trail is slated to run between downtown New Haven and Northampton, Massachusetts? 
What historic trail does the Farmington Canal Trail follow? 
What canal lies adjacent to the Historic New Haven and Northamption company trail?
What proposed bike path, projected connect every major city on the eastern seaboard, is part of the Farmington Canal Trail?
What is the name of the trail that runs from to New Haven all the way to Eastern Massachusetts?
Part of the rail trail is also accessible by what form of transportation? 
Segments of the Farmington Canal is also part of which bicycle trail?
In terms of length, how long is the East Coast Greenway trail if it stretches from Maine to Florida?
In what year did Orange Street receive the first bike lane in New Haven?
For which New Haven neighborhood did the Orange Street bike lane provide a connection to downtown? 
In addition to Orange Street, what is a bike route recommended for use by the city of New Haven?
In what year were bike lanes added on Dixwell Avenue and Howard Avenue? 
When was the first bicycle lane created in New Haven? 
The lane stretch from East Rock park to what part of the city?
What year did New Haven finally integrated bike lanes to most of the city?
How is it possible to located the direction of bike lanes within the city?
What downtown New Haven expressway spur intersects at exit 1 of 1-91?
What is another name for Connecticut Route 15, which provides an alternate route from traveling on 1-95/1/91?
What thoroughfare in New Haven features the only highway tunnel in Connecticut?
What is the name of the highway tunnel on Route 15 in New Haven? 
Through what neighborhood in New Haven does Route 15 run? 
Oak Street Connect crosses which interstate highway?
Connecticut Route 15 is next to which highway?
What is the name of the only highway tunnel in Connecticut?
What east-west artery in New Haven serves Union Station? 
What road leading northwest from downtown New Haven comprises both Route 10 and Route 63 at various points?
What two major thoroughfares lie to the north of New Haven towards Hamden? 
What northeast avenue in New Haven is signed as Route 17?
What western road provides access from New Haven to the city of Derby?
Where does U.S. Route 1 runs in terms of direction within the city?
What is the name of the route that heads north of downtown?
What city does the western route 34 leads to?
What is another surface arteries that is located west of downtown New Haven?
In what harbor is the Port of New Haven located?
How many trucks does the Port of New Haven have the daily capacity to load?
In addition to ground service, what other function is available at the Port of New Haven for offloading truck cargo?
Approximately how many square feet of interior storage is available at the Port of New Haven?
Approximately how many acres of outside storage does the Port of New Haven offer?
The name of New Haven harbor?
In terms of scale how big is the harbor?
How many forklift are available for use in it everyday production?
How many transport vehicle can the harbor actually hold?
Yale and New Haven are conjointly attempting to build the area into a research hub for what two industries?
What large site is run by Yale, in conjunction with New Haven and the state, situated three blocks away from Yale's Science hill campus?
To what corporation did the multi-block site comprising Science Park formerly belong?
In addition to Yale employees and financial services, companies in what industry can currently be found in the functioning areas Science Park?
What is the name of the collaborated project between Yale University, Connecticut and New Haven city? 
The area of Science Park was originally filled with what?
Although some of the Science Park area is used by multiple institutions and groups, what remains left over Winchester's and Olin company?
At what former lodging facility in New Haven were scenes from the 1950's classic, All About Eve, filmed?
What Fred Astaire film depicts the reported history of New Haven theaters as "tryouts" for Broadway?
What Spielberg movie provided a fictional account of the slave ship mutiny trials that took place in New Haven?
What movie produced in 2000 investigated conspiracy theories surrounding the notorious Skull and Bone Society in New Haven? 
What is currently located at the site of the old Taft Hotel in New Haven?
What was the name of the movie that once film in the corner of College and Chapel streets?
The fim Amistad uses references to New Haven in the movie, who was the director of Amistad?
New Haven was feature in what movie regarding secret society and conspiracy theories? 
What 2003 movie featuring Julia Roberts was filmed in New Haven?
What Spielberg franchise was filmed in New Haven in 2008?
What year were the streets of downtown New Haven redesigned to resemble for the filming of the Crystal Skull?
How many New Haven locals were cast as extras throughout filming of the Crystal Skull?
In what New Haven landmark was the 2009 Robert De Niro movie, Everybody's Fine, filmed?
What was the name of popular movie film in New Haven featuring Julia Roberts?
The recent Indiana Jones movie feature how many of the local citizen in film?
Union Station was as a part of a set on a film, what was the name of the movie?
In what Fitzgerald classic does the fictional protagonist make repeated references to New Haven?
Who is the fictional Yale University alumnus, and ostensible former resident of New Haven, featured on The Simpsons? 
What fictional New Haven resident is featured in the novella, The Odd Saga of the American and a Curious Iceland Flock?
At what New Haven university is The Gilmore Girls hypothetically set, at least in part? 
The city of New Haven was often referenced several time by a character in a very popular novel which name was?
The Simpson has a character that was set to graduated from Yale University, can you guess his name?
What relations does the television show Gilmore Girls have to New Haven city?
What infamous Doors frontman was once arrested in New Haven?
At what venue was Jim Morrison arrested in New Haven?
What Morrison song pays homage to his New Haven arrest while mentioning the town by name?
What 1991 film depicts the 1979 Morrison arrest in New Haven?
A popular 70s rock band group once played in New Haven, which result in an accident with one of it member, the man name was?
What was the song sung that lead to the arrest of Morrison?
The event in 1967 later lead to inspiration of what movie in 1991? 
The movie The Doors however did not film at New Haven, instead where did they film the reenactment? 
How many students attend BYU on campus?
How many of the students are also members of the Latter Day Saints Church?
What portion of students are native Utah residents?
Where is Brigham Young University?
What is BYU's ranking among private universities?
How many students currently attend BYU on-campus?
Where is BYU's main campus?
What is BYU's ranking among private universities?
How many of BYU's students are native Utah residents?
What percentage of BYU students are from Utah?
What percentage of BYU students are members of the LDS Church?
How is BYU's size ranked among all private university's in the U.S.?
What does LDS stand for?
Who owns and operates Brigham University?
For what reason to many student's postpone their enrollment to BYU?
What is the source of much of BYU's funding?
How many women at BYU do missionary work?
What is the average amount of time men serve as missionaries?
What is the basis of the behavioral code at BYU?
What is a significant portion of the BYU's operating costs subsidized by?
What percentage of men delay their BYU enrollment to serve as a Mormon missionary?
What percentage of women delay their BYU enrollment to serve as a Mormon missionary?
How does the cost of attending BYU compare to the cost of attending similar universities?
What do all students at BYU agree to abstain from consuming?
What is BYU's main focal point?
What foreign city holds a branch campus of BYU?
What institution controls BYU?
Where are BYU's sibling schools located?
How many master's programs does BYU have?
How many colleges make up BYU at its main campus?
How many satellite campuses are run by BYU?
What is BYU's parent organization?
Where does CES sponsor BYU's sister schools?
When was the first property for what would become BYU acquired?
Who was responsible for acquiring BYU's first building?
Where was Brigham  Young's school originally believed to be located?
Who began the school that previously existed at the site where BYU is now located?
What year can BYU's origin be traced to with a building called Cluff Hall?
Which president of the LDS church purchased the Lewis Building after hinting at the building of a school?
What type of influences did Brigham Young hope to avoid with BYU?
What is the commonly held founding year of BYU?
Who did Brigham Young hope to educate via BYU?
In what year was Brigham Young Academy split into two separate schools?
What was the name of the land purchased by BYU in 1904?
How old was George H. Brimhall when he completed High School?
What topic was excluded from being taught at BYU?
Who was chosen to head BYU?
In 1903, which two institutions was Brigham Young Univesity replaced with?
Who we responsible for the giant "Y" that is embedded on a mountain near the campus?
At what age did BYU's elected president in 1904, George H. Brimhall, receive his high school education?
What brief crisis rose in the school at the time of Brimhall's presidency that caused the crises' theory to not be taught for a time?
What property was George Brimhall responsible for purchasing for the campus?
What sort of credentials did Franklin S. Harris have?
Who was responsible for getting BYU acknowledged as an official university?
What was purchased to accommodate more students?
Which president was responsible for the most amount of growth to the campus?
How much did the student body expand under Howard S. McDonald?
What type of degree did BYU's appointed president of 1921, Franklin S. Harris have that no former BYU president had?
Which BYU president was responsible for BYU becoming fully accredited under all major organizations?
What event prompted BYU Pres. Howard S. MacDonald to purchase a portion of an Air Force Base to house a sudden influx of students?
How much did the studen body of BYU increase under the term of Pres. Ernest L. Wilkinson to become the largest private school at the time?
How many new LDS Church wards were added during Wilkinson's presidency?
Who was responsible for the BYU's first campus outside of the U.S.?
Which BYU president suffered from a terminal illness?
Who succeeded Rex E. Lee?
Who is responsible for the university's expansion into law and management schools?
What did Jeffrey R. Holland believe to be BYU's strongest asset?
Which new BYU school was added under Pres. Dallin H. Oaks in 1971?
In which foreign country did Jeffrey R. Holland open a BYU campus during his presidency?
What annual event at BYU is carried out in memory of former president Rex E. Lee, who built the Museum of Art on campus?
What was believed to be one of the schools greatest strengths by Pres. Jeffrey R. Holland?
What is the name of the BYU campus in Jerusulem?
What percentage of applicants did BYU accept for it's summer term and fall semester in 2013?
What was the average GPA for the accepted students in 2013?
What percentage of accepted BYU students went on to enroll in 2010?
What is BYU's ranking in colleges with the most freshman Merit Scholars?
How many freshman at BYU were Merit Scholars in 2006?
What percentage of the student body of BYU has some proficiency in a second language?
What can be attributed to BYU's high percentage of second language proficient students?
How many languages are offered as courses at BYU?
What designation does BYU's Russian language program hold?
Who chose BYU as the location of the national Middle East Language Resource Center?
How manys students take advantage of BYU's study abroad programs?
How did the Institute of International Education rank BYU in 2009 compared with U.S. universities that offer study abroad opportunities?
Which foreign BYU campus was closed in 2000 due to security concerns?
When was the BYU Jerusalem Center reopened for students following it's closure in 2000?
What was the most recent conflict that affected the closure of BYU Jerusalem Center from 2000-2007?
What is the largest and longest-running university-run foreign film program in the U.S.?
What is the name of BYU's foreign language living experience?
As part of the Foreign Language Student Residence program, what do students commit to speak while in their apartments?
How many native speakers are in each apartment building in the Foreign Language Student Residence program?
Which BYU building features films in several languages?
In what year did BYU draft a new Statement on Academic Freedom?
The new Statement on Academic Freedom allows students to analyze and discuss Church doctrine but does not allow student expressions that do what?
What cannot be violated because the expression is dishonest according to the new Statement on Academic Freedom?
How many professors have been disciplined according to the new Statement on Academic Freedom?
Who claimed that infringements on academic freedom are distressingly common and that the climate for academic freedom is distressingly por?
Which system is BYU part of?
Who acts as chairman of BYU?
What board do the members of the BYU Board of Trustees also belong to?
When did BYU have a separate board of trustees?
How does the President of BYU report to the Board?
How many photographs are in BYU's Museum of Peoples and Cultures?
How many visitors does BYU Museum of Paleontology receive each year?
From which period does BYU Museum of Paleontology hold many artifacts from?
Who found many of the fossils displayed in BYU's Museum of Paleontology?
Which BYU building is one of the most attended art museus in the Mountain West?
How many people does the de Jong Concert Hall seat?
What building is named after Earl and Kathryn Pardoe?
What building was named after prominent Utah theater figure Philip N. Margetts?
Who was the Nelke Theatre named for?
What type of theater is Nelke Theatre primarily used for?
What is BYU working to increase by installing various speed drives on all pumps and fans?
Who spearheaded BYU's recent campaign to begin recycling plastics?
How long after student campaigning did BYU begin recycling plastics?
What type of waste event is a top priority at BYU for becoming environmentally sustainable?
What is BYU replacing it's incandescent lighting with?
What BYU group is known as one of the best formation ballroom dance teams in the world?
What dance championships have been held at BYU for several years?
How is BYU's collegiate ballroom dance program rated worldwide?
What types of dancing are performed by BYU's The Living Legends?
How many NCAA varsity teams does BYU have?
What is the name of BYU's fight song?
Why are many BYU athletes older than other schools' players?
When does BYU refuse to play athletic games that got the attention of the sports networks?
What violation can lead to a player being expelled from a sports team?
What is the stated mission of BYU?
What did Brigham Young instruct Karl G. Maeser to not teach even the alphabet without?
What type of institution do BYU leaders consider it to be at heart?
What two types of education does BYU strive to excel in while combining?
What phrase have some Latter-day Saints used in reference to BYU's mission as ambassador to the world for the LDS Church?
Who has expressed dissatisfaction with the nickname "The Lord's University" in the past?
What perception do some feel that the nickname "The Lord's University" gives about university officials?
What do the leaders of BYU say "The Lord's University" represents instead of being in reference to its current state of being?
What does BYU mandate of it's student members of the LDS Church to be?
Who are both LDS and Non-LDS students required to provide an endorsement from upon submitting their application?
How many BYU campus rooms are used for the purposes of LDS Church congregations?
How many congregations meet on the BYU campus every Sunday?
Approximately how many people attend church services on BYU's campus?
At what age, since 2012, are men allowed to serve a mission after high school graduation?
At what age, since 2012, are women allowed to serve a mission after high school graduation?
How long is a full-time mission for males?
How long is a full-time mission for females?
What percentage of graduates had taken a hiatus from their BYU studies to serve as an LDS missionary?
What group did President Maeser create that sent teachers to student's homes to verify they were following the school's moral rules?
When was the BYU Honor Code actually created?
What was BYU's Honor Code mainly used for upon its creation?
In what year was the Honor Code expanded to include other school standards, such as rules regarding drug use?
Who must sign a comitment to live by the honor code as part of the application process?
How was BYU ranked by The Princeton Review for having the happiest students and highest quality of life in 2008?
What parts of the sometimes "too nice" BYU culture is often caricatured?
What does BYU's high rate of enrollment by LDS members result in regarding LDS cultural norms?
What is one of BYU's characteristics that is most often pointed out through reputation?
What percentage of BYU's class of 2005 were married?
What is the national marriage average among college graduates?
What is the average age that BYU students marry according to a 2005 study?
What type of marriage is highly valued by LDS members?
Who rated BYU as the #1 stone cold sober school in the nation for several years?
How does BYU feel about being rated the #1 stone cold sober school?
How do robberies at BYU's Provo compare to the national average?
Who rated BYU as the #1 safest college campus in the nation?
What BYU environment seems to surprise many visitors to BYU as well as to the Utah Valley?
How many television production studios is BYU Broadcasting Technical Operations Center home to?
How many radio studios is BYU BYU Broadcasting Technical Operations Center home to?
How many television control rooms is BYU Broadcasting Technical Operations Center home to?
Which BYU station offers content in both Spanish and Portugese?
Which BYU station is available via cable throughout some areas of the U.S.?
What is former alumnus Paul D. Boyer known for being?
What did former BYU graduate Harvey Fletcher invent?
Which famous clothing company was BYU alumnus Matthew K. McCauley CEO of?
What was BYU graduate Clayton M. Christensen known as?
Which Nobel Prize winner graduated from BYU?
Where did best selling author Stephenie Meyer graduate from in 1995?
Which former Miss America graduated from BYU?
Which former co-host of CBS's The Early Show graduated from BYU?
Which award winning ESPN sports writer graduated form BYU?
Which former CBS News correspondent graduated from BYU?
What does MI stand for?
WHat percentage of people suffer from atypical symptoms?
What is the most common symptom of MI?
How long can the pain of MI last?
What can the discomfort of MI feel like?
What can ECG confirm?
What type of blood tests are used?
How do most MIs come about?
What is the main mechanism for MI?
Name one test used to recognize MI?
What can be used for immediate treatment for MI?
Nitroglycerin can be used to help what?
WHat does NSTEMI stand for?
When is bypass surgery recommended?
What should be used for individuals with shortness of breath?
What is the most common symptom of MI?
What does ischemia refer too?
What does the pain usually stem from with MI?
What is a tell tale sign of someone experiencing a cardiac chest pain?
When might an individual experience shortness of breath?
What does diaphoresis refer to?
What might cause an individual to lose consciousness from MI?
What sorts of departments might one see in a major department store?
Who started influencing department stores in the 1970's? 
Other than at the check-out lanes at the front of a store, where may customers check out?
When did the idea of a "consumer society" begin? 
What social group grew as a result of the industrial revolution? 
Who was Josiah Wedgewood?
What is one explanation for the rise of retail stores in earlier history?
What group of people were suddenly free to go shopping without fears of being judged or reprimanded? 
Who became the predominant shoppers for individual households in the nineteenth century? 
What business in Manchester claims to be the first department store? 
What did Kendals change it's name to in 2005? 
What year did the Manchester institution begin?
Who acquired the Manchester store in 1919? 
Where was The Grands Magasins Dufayel built? 
What were employees taught that made a shopping experience different? 
What sort of stores were The Grands Magasins Dufayel compared to? 
How were these stores different than most during that time?
Where was the "Marble Palace" built in 1846?
What policy did the Marble Palace introduce? 
How many departments did the new store have, built in 1862?
What selling methods did the Marble Palace use?
What customer services did the Marble Palace offer? 
Who opened the original "modern" department store in America?
What feature made Wanamakers different from other stores at the time? 
How were important documents and money transported throughout the store? 
When was electric lighting first installed and used in the store? 
In what state was Wanamakers established? 
In what year was Marshall Field and company established? 
When did Marshall's convert to the Macy's name? 
What made Marshall's such a good example for other stores?
Where was Marshall's European buying office located? 
What free service did Marshall's provide customers until changing their name to Macy's? 
What occupation did David Jones have?
Where did David Jones and Charles Appleton meet? 
Where did Appleton begin a store in 1825?
What was the store in Sydney called after Jones moved to Australia? 
When did the partnership between Jones and Appleton end?
What were some of the original Australian department stores? 
When did Sydney Myer come to Australia? 
Where did the Myer Retail Group open it's first store? 
What type of department stores are Myer and David Jones? 
What department store brand is now out of business in Australia? 
What business was the Hudson's Bay Company originally involved in? 
What department store chain did Hudson's Bay Company own until it dissolved in 2013?
How many stores did Woolco operate before selling their shares to Walmart? 
Currently, what department store is most popular in Canada? 
What is one type of competition department stores face? 
What types of stores have created even more competition? 
What factor lead to a decrease in department store shoppers?
In what year were department store sales beaten by larger stores?
What year did Lane Crawford open? 
Who established Lane Crawford? 
What was the store's original target customer base?
Who opened the first Chinese-owned department store? 
What are the 3 main department store companies in Denmark? 
Currently, what is the largest department store chain in Denmark? 
Where is Magasin's "flagship" store located? 
How many stores does Salling have in Jutland? 
What cities influenced how department stores in Germany operated? 
What department store was taken over by Nicolas Berggruen in 2010?
What major department store operates in Berlin? 
What store is a part of the Metro AG?
Where did the Metro Department store originally begin?
When did Seibu, located in Jakarta, re-open? 
Where did Galeries Lafayette open in 2013, inside Indonesia? 
What store led the Indonesian markets until 2010 when it closed? 
What store did Parkson buy in 2011? 
Where did Centro open it's first store of 2014?
Who did Lotte partner with? 
Where is the "Lotte Shopping Avenue" located? 
What was Makro re-labeled as after it's purchase? 
When did Ireland begin to see a growth in its middle class?
What department store was founded in 1853?
In what city was Delany's New Mart opened? 
What was Delany's originally called? 
In what year was the store destroyed? 
What Mexican department store typically caters to high-end goods?
What company is responsible for over 100 stores in the country? 
What company operates Sears Mexico? 
What chains typically cater to bargain shoppers? 
What sorts of goods do the most popular department stores in New Zealand offer? 
What city is Arthur Barnett in? 
Where is H & J Smith's flagship store?
Where are H & J Smith stores typically located? 
When was Laidlaw Leeds first established? 
When was the first department store in the Philippines opened?
Who opened some of the first department stores in the Philippines? 
Where were some of the original Philippine stores located?  
What historical event led to many department stores in the area being destroyed? 
When were the companies Shoemart and Rustan's established? 
What department store in Puerto Rico is named after an American city?
When is the Mall of San Juan expected to open? 
How many tenants are expected to set up shop in the Mall of San Juan?
What two major retailers have plans to do business in the mall once it opens? 
When was Saint Petersburg established? 
Who founded a shopping mall reserved for the most elites of society? 
What famous author described parts of the mall in his books?
What historical site still operates within the mall? 
What group was established in 1921 in response to the clash between socialism and consumerism? 
When did GUM begin to decline and lose power? 
Who formed the State Department Stores, AKA GUM? 
When did they first establish the organization?
What department store chain operates the most stores? 
Where is the "field of distribution" most often associated with?
What store was the largest department store in the world in 2010?
Where is the largest department store in the world located?
What is the former name of John Lewis Newcastle? 
What is the world's oldest department store? 
Who partnered with William Alder Dunn to open the first store? 
What was the location of the first store? 
When did John Lewis purchase and take over the Bainbridge store?
When did Garfinckel's begin operating in Washington? 
In what year did Garfield's go bankrupt?
How many major department stores did Baltimore have at the time? 
By what year had most local stores been assimilated into larger chain operations? 
In what year did Hudson's address the issue of parking within cities?
What was the store called in Southfield? 
In what year did the Hudson's skyscraper close? 
What company purchased the Northland Center in 2006?
What was the Northfield Center renamed after it's purchase by another company?
Who opened Dayton's Dry Goods?
In what year was Dayton's Dry Goods established? 
When was the Southdale Center opened? 
What store did the Dayton-Hudson Corporation purchase in 1978?
In what year did Horne began doing business?
In what city did Horne begin their operations?
What company purchased Horne's in 1972?
How many Horne's stores did Federated Department Stores buy in 1994?
Which constitution gave legislative power to protect intellectual property?
When was the Paris Convention?
When was the Berne Convention?
When did the Paris and Berne administrative secretariats merge?
What name did the merged secretariats adopt?
Who grants a patent?
Who is a patent granted to?
How many requirements does an invention need to fulfill for a patent?
An invention is a solution to what type of problem?
What is a patent offered in exchange for?
What is the stated objective of most intellectual property law?
What do patents create an incentive for inventors to do?
Which view treats intellectual property as another type of "real" property?
Which recent law stresses international harmonization?
How much was the worth of intellectual property to the U.S. economy in 2013?
How many Americans did intellectual property create employment for in 2013?
Where has IP become a recognised asset class?
How many intangible assets are not being leveraged in the UK?
What is caused by using or selling a patented invention without permission?
Where does the safe harbor to use a patented invention for research generally not exist?
What type of law handles patent infringement cases in the US?
What type of law handles patent infringement cases in China?
What type of law handles patent infringement cases in Russia?
When was the ACTA trade agreement signed?
Which countries signed ACTA?
Which doctrines allow limited use of copyrighted works?
What is the common term for copyright infringement?
What occurs when someone uses a trademark that is identical or confusingly similar to a trademark owned by someone else?
What does registering a trademark provide?
Where is a trademark protected without registration?
How is trademark infringement addressed in most jurisdictions?
How is trademark infringement addressed in a few jurisdictions?
Which term is criticized as vague?
Critics criticize what type of validity of the term 'intellectual property'?
Which term is criticized as having abstract overreach?
Who founded the Free Software Foundation?
Who said the term 'intellectual property' should be rejected altogether?
Who said the term 'intellectual property' "operates as a catch-all"?
How does Stallman advocate referring to copyrights, patents, and trademarks?
Stallman thinks what type of IP historically served as a censorship system?
What does Stallman think copyright served as a regulatory model for?
What does Stallman think was meant to be optional and experimental?
What does Stallman think copyright was supposed to trade temporarily for public benefit?
Who pointed out that "if copyright were a natural right nothing could justify terminating this right after a certain period of time"?
Who is one advocate of copyleft?
Who has objected to the idea of IP because "property" implies scarcity?
Having no natural scarcity makes IP different from what kind of property?
How much can IP be duplicated without diminishing the original?
What can be harmed by pharmaceutical patents?
IP benefits concentrated interests to whose detriment?
Whose interests are harmed by expanding IP?
Developments in nanotechnology are being undermined by what type of IP?
What type of monopolies does IP create?
What type of creativity is excluded from the US definition of IP?
What doesn't current US IP law recognize the uniqueness of?
Requiring written records enforces what kind of bias?
The Western bias is that what form is more authoritative?
What is the American film industry's trade organization?
The Motion Picture Association of America is which industry's trade organization?
Which country is the world's largest producer of films?
The MPAA has advocated strong protection of what kind of rights?
What does the recording industry call piracy?
What type of company was Napster?
What law enforces digital rights management systems?
Which articles of the EU Copyright Directive address circumvention of copyright protection?
When was the Conditional Access Directive passed in the EU?
When was the Agreement on Trade-Related Aspects of Intellectual Property Rights ratified?
What type of law handled IP rights before 1994 in TRIP signatories?
What type of IP did the TRIP agreement harmonize the definition of?
What is any sign which is capable of distinguishing one business's product from another business's?
What is the longest Contiguous Coastline in the US 
What level is most of the land in florida 
What is the florida climate 
Some animals and reptiles native to Florida 
Name a National Park in Florida 
What did Spain trade Florida for
Who did the Spanish take from Florida to Cuba 
What road did the British construct 
What river does the Kings road cross 
What were the names of the 2 British colony's in Florida 
Who was given Florida land grants 
Where did a large number of British Colonist come to florida from 
The first Permanent Colony in Florida is Now known as 
What did the Colonist cultivate 
What legal system was introduced by the British in Florida 
Did Florida send Representatives to Philadelphia for the Declaration of Independence 
What legal system is still used by florida 
Where did English and Scotch Irish descent move to Florida from 
Backwoods settlers of Northern Florida are known as 
Were the Spanish able to police the backwoods settlements 
What led to the rebellion in 1810 
What did the rebellion lead to 
What is known as the Bonnie Blue Flag
What did the rebels overthrow during the rebellion
What was an issue in the early 1800's 
What did congress pass in 1830 
Who did Seminoles harbor 
What was the name of the treaty of 1832
What is Florida's nickname 
What is central Florida known as 
Hours of annual sunshine in florida 
What is found in Florida 
What did the last glacial period provide 
What are the Everglades 
How much sink hole damage did Florida suffer recently 
What is the population of Florida 
Where did florida rank in population growth 
What is the center of the Florida population
What state did Florida pass in population recently 
What percentage of the population considers themselves American 
In the 1980 census the largest ancestry group in Florida was 
As of 2010 what percentage of Florida was white / non Hispanic 
What percentage of florida was white Non Hispanic in 1970 
What do many white long term floridian families identify with 
Most  white  Florida Immigrants descend from 
What percentage of the Florida population in 2010 was Hispanic 
What Origin makes up most of the Hispanics in Florida 
What percentage of Cuban Americans live in Florida 
What is percentage of Puerto Ricans in Florida 
What percentage of Florida was African american in 2010 
what percentage of florida was black in the early 1900's 
What did many black migrate from florida 
Where does the African population in florida have ancestry roots 
Voter demographics of florida in the 1950's 
what did the voting rights act provide for 
what president signed the voting right act 
What party dominated florida politics from 1930 to 1960 
Does Florida benefit from taxes
What party political party dominates Florida now 
How does Florida vote in presidential elections 
What do these candidates that Florida supports pledge  
The first post- reconstruction era republican elected to florida 
What is Cramer credited for 
Who was Claude R Kirk 
Who was Edward j Gurney 
What did the Democrat party do in the 1970
What did democrat voters do in 1998 
What are snowbirds 
What party dominates South Florida and Miami 
which party dominates most of the rest of florida 
What is the make up politically of florida's fastest growing area 
The area is viewed as what politically
The vote in this area since the late 20th century decides what 
What has reappointment done to florida 
What was challenged in 2012 
How did the Florida supreme court rule on the challenge 
Why did the 2 districts have to be redrawn in 2014 
How many were ruled to be redrawn in 2015 
What was the court vote on the new congressional map in 2015
What was the mortgage delinquency rate in 2008 
How many vacant homes in Florida in 2009 
What percentage of  personal income was spent of Housing in florida  
Where did housing spending ranking nationally 
What did Hurricane Andrew cause Florida to do 
What did Govenor Bush Realize
What industry was targeted 
Who chose to expand their corporation in Florida 
What architectural styles are in Florida 
When did the art deco area of Miami boom 
What does Florida have the largest collection of 
What train line connects florida to the North 
Where does the Auto train originate 
Who does sunset limited service 
Two othe ramtrak trains that serve Florida 
What is headquartered in Daytona 
Name another race in florida 
What is the 24 hours of Daytona 
What does St Pete feature for a race 
Tim Staffell left the band Smile in what year?
What band did Tim Staffell join after leaving Smile?
What was the name of the college Tim Staffell attended when he met Farrokh Bulsara?
In what year did Smile change their name to Queen?
What was the English first name Farrokh Bulsara adopted?
John Deacon played what instrument?
In what year did John Deacon join Queen?
What did Freddie from Queen change his last name to?
What song inspired Freddie from Queen's surname?
On what date did Queen play their first show?
Who designed Queen's logo?
What was Freddie Mercury's zodiac sign?
Which zodiac sign did Deacon and Taylor share?
What was Brian May's zodiac sign?
The early Queen logo resembled the coat of arms of what country?
Who offered Queen a management deal in 1972?
Which singer used Trident studios in addition to Queen and the Beatles?
What was the name of Trident's subsidiary?
Where was Queen spotted before entering discussions with Trident?
In what year did Queen enter discussions with Trident studios?
In what year was Queen's first album released?
What was the name of Queen's first album?
What was the lead single from Queen's first album?
Which Queen song ranked as the 31st greatest guitar song in a 1998 Rolling Stone article?
Which critic called Queen's debut superb?
What was the name of Queen's second LP?
What year was Queen's second album released?
Who designed the cover of Queen's second album?
Who wrote the song Seven Seas of Rhye?
How long is the song The March of the Black Queen?
What was Brian May diagnosed with after collapsing in 1974?
What was the name of Queen's third album?
What Queen album was released after Sheer Heart Attack?
Queen's Sheer Heart Attack reached what number on the United Kingdom charts?
What was the name of the venue where Brian May collapsed?
Which song was Queen's first US hit?
Queen's song Now I'm Here reached what number on the British charts?
What Queen song is known as an early speed metal song?
What music style was found along with camp and vaudeville on the song Killer Queen?
Killer Queen reached what number on the Billboard Hot 100?
Who created the costumes for Queen's 1975 tour?
What country did Queen play in for the first time in 1975?
Queen had a bitter split with what management company in 1975?
What manager of Led Zeppelin tried to sign Queen?
Whom did Queen eventually sign with after rejecting the Swan Song records contract?
Which Queen album was released in 1975?
Queen's 1975 album took it's name from a movie from which comedy act?
How long was Queen's The Prophet's Song?
Which Queen ballad featured a harp and overdubbed harmonies?
Which Queen song was number one on the UK charts for nine weeks?
What is the third best selling single of all time in the UK?
What Queen single sold a million copies on two separate occasions?
In what year did Queen's A Night at the Opera Tour begin?
Queen's 1975 tour included Europe and what three countries?
What Queen album was released in 1976?
What was the major hit from Queen's 1976 album?
Which heavy Queen song is a favorite at live shows?
Which comedian invited Queen to visit him in 1977? 
Which Queen members layered their voices on Somebody to Love?
Where did Queen host a free concert in 1976? 
Who organized a free concert by Queen in 1976?
How many people helped Queen set a 1976 attendance record?
Which US venue did Queen sell out in 1977? 
Which British venue did Queen sell out in 1977?
Queen's sixth album was released in what year?
How many times platinum did Queen's News of the World go?
Queen's News of the World contained which two rock anthems?
Queen's News of the World Tour took place in what year?
In what year did Queen release the album Jazz?
What number did Queen's Jazz reach on UK charts?
What number did Queen's Jazz reach on the Billboard 200?
What were the two hit singles off of Queen's album Jazz?
Queen rented what venue for a music video in 1978?
Who organized the Concert for the People of Kampuchea?
In what year was Queen's Live Killers released?
How many times platinum did Queen's Live Killers go in the US?
Queen's Crazy Little Thing Called Love was an ode to which singer?
In what year did Queen play the Concert for the People of Kampuchea?
Queen performed several sold out shows at what US venue?
Queen recorded the soundtrack to what show?
What Queen song won the award for best Pop/Rock single?
Which musical artist suggested Queen release Another One Bites the Dust as a single?
Which Queen album kicked off the 1980s?
What album did Queen release in 1982? 
Where did Queen record their 1982 album? 
What was the name of Freddie Mercury's personal manager?
Queen left what label before signing with EMI?
On which season of Saturday Night Live did Queen perform?
Which Queen tour was the first to feature Spike Edney?
Queen's Spike Edney plays what instrument?
Who fined Queen for donating to a school for the deaf and blind?
Where did Queen play during the height of Apartheid?
What date was Live Aid?
Where was Live Aid held?
How big was Live Aid's TV audience?
How long was Live Aid's stadium audience?
Who organized Live Aid?
The audience at Live Aid clapped to what Queen Song?
Which magazine interviewed Brian May about Live Aid?
What medium helped Queen fans get used to their songs before Live Aid?
When did Queen end their contract with Capitol?
After leaving Capitol, who did Queen sign with?
What year was Freddie Mercury's final public appearance with Queen?
Which Queen album was released in 1991?
Which movie featured Queen's Bohemian Rhapsody?
What year did Queen get a boost in North American sales due to being featured in a movie?
In what year did Queen win an MTV award?
How high did the album Classic Queen chart on the Billboard 200?
How many times platinum did Classic Queen go in the US?
What was Queen's final album featuring Mercury vocals compiled from earlier recordings called?
How many copies worldwide has Queen's 1995 album sold?
In what year was a statue dedicated to Freddie Mercury unveiled in Montreux?
Where was Queen's studio located in Switzerland?
Which two members of Queen performed together at several charity concerts?
Who performed with Brian May in 1998 at a benefit concert?
Where did Queen play in 2003 with a famous opera singer?
Which artist provided vocals for the Queen song found on the soundtrack to A Knight's Tale?
What year was Queen's third greatest hits album released?
Who performed a rap version of Another One Bites The Dust?
Alive version of Somebody to Love featured what artist?
Which artist guested on a live version of Queen's The Show Must Go On?
In 2003 Queen performed for what Nelson Mandela hosted benefit?
Paul Rodgers joined Queen in what year?
Paul Rodgers used to be the lead singer of what two bands?
Which retired Queen member did not join the reunion?
In what year was Queen inducted in the UK Hall of Fame?
Between what years did Queen and Paul Rodgers first embark on a world tour?
Where was the first leg of Queen's mid 2000s tour with Paul Rodgers?
What is the name of Queen's drummer?
Where did Queen receive the inaugural VH1 Rock Honors?
On 20 May 2009 which Queen members performed We are the Champions on American Idol?
What was the name of the Greatest Hits compilation Queen released after the split from Paul Rodgers?
Which two American idol contestants performed a duet with Queen on American Idol?
What day in 2009 was Queen's Absolute Greatest released?
Which artist presented the Global Icon Award to Queen in 2011?
Which artist performed with Queen at the 2011 MTV Europe Music Awards?
Where were the BMI awards held in 2011?
What band was worried Queen would steal their live performance bassist?
Which Queen members were appearing on American Idol in the late 2000s?
Where was Queen's final concert with Freddie Mercury held in 1986?
Queen and Adam Lambert played two shows where in July 2012?
Elena Pinchuk has what kind of a foundation?
Where did Queen perform with Adam Lambert on 3 July 2012?
When did Queen + Adam Lambert perform at the iHeartRadio Music Festival?
Where was the iHeartRadio Music Festival held in 2013?
On what show did Queen announce they would be touring with Adam Lambert?
When was the first Queen tour with Adam Lambert scheduled?
Who did Queen members say they were open to making a regular member of the band in 2014?
Which guitarist inspired Queen?
What gospel singer did Freddie Mercury cite as an inspiration?
Queen's sound has been described as a mix of Led Zeppelin and what other band?
What nationality were the rock groups that influenced Queen?
What band named after a floating vehicle influenced Queen?
Which Queen song inspired audience clapping?
Which two Queen songs were written with audience participation in mind?
What kind of metal has Queen been associated with?
What 70s style of pop music was Queen associated with?
What was the name of Brian May's signature guitar?
What year was Brian May's signature guitar made?
Which producer influenced Queen's feedback heavy sound?
What engineer helped with Queen's feedback heavy sound?
How many vocal overdubs are in Queen's Bohemian Rhapsody?
What song was voted the UK's favorite hit of all time in 2002?
What Queen song was inducted into the Grammy Hall of Fame in 2004?
Which Queen video was credited with launching the MTV video age?
A 2005 poll stated that which band's performance at Live Aid was the best ever?
How many number one singles did Queen release?
How many number one DVD's has Queen released?
How many albums has Queen sold worldwide?
When was Queen inducted into the Hall of Fame?
How many number one albums has Queen released?
How many Queen bootleg sites were discovered in 2001?
Where did Queen rank on Rolling Stone's 100 Greatest Artists of All Time in 2001?
In 2010 VH1 ranked Queen at what number on their Greatest Artist of All Time List?
What country is a popular site for Queen bootlegs because it is outlawed?
When was Queen's London production scheduled to end in 2006?
Where was Queen's 2006 London production held?
When did Queen's 2006 London production actually end?
What is the longest running show at the Dominion Theatre?
What is the second longest show at the Dominion Theatre?
Which music video game featured a plethora of Queen songs?
Who collaborated with Freddie Mercury on the song Under Pressure?
Which member of Queen discussed a possible Queen Rock Band video game?
What Heavy Metal band had a video game in which Queen was featured?
ho sang a version of Queen's Somebody to Love in 2004's Ella Enchanted?
Which actress recorded a Queen song for 2006's Happy Feet?
Which movie featured a cover of Queen's The Show Must Go On?
Which film had Robbie Williams performing a cover of Queen's We Are the Champions?
On what date in 2006 did May and Taylor of Queen appear on American Idol?
What month and year was the season  finale of American Idol?
Who were the season 8 finalists on American Idol?
On what date did Queen's May and Taylor appear on UK X-factor?
Which Queen song was featured in the autumn of 2009 on Glee
What Queen song did the Glee choir perform in June 2010?
What Queen song was performed on a May 2012 episode of Glee?
What Queen song is featured on Glee's The Graduation Album?
Who was originally chosen to play Freddie Mercury in the movie bearing his name?
Who was the replacement to play Freddie Mercury in the film of the same name?
Who is writing the Freddie Mercury film?
Which actor is producing the Freddie Mercury film?
In what year did Queen perform at Live Aid?
Where can you trace back the origins of Presbyterianism back to?
What does the Presbyterian church typically emphasize?
Which act created the kingdom of Great Britain?
Where do most presbyterian churches trace their history back to?
When did the reformation during the roots of Presbyterianism take place?
Which group did Presbyterian churches union with?
What other religion has history as being part of Presbyterian?
Which frenchman greatly influenced Presbyterianism?
In what year did the parliament of Scotland adopt the Scots Confession?
Which book was touted for establishing regulations for church and government?
What do Presbyterians put importance into?
What do their studies consist of?
What is the Presbyterian government known as?
What are the responsibilities of the elder pastors?
When the congregation issues a call for service by a pastor, who has to ratify it?
Who elects the ruling elders?
In very large congregations, what do the elders delegate?
There's a group of officers in the congregation, what other names are they also known by?
Which group from the Presbyterian church in rank is above sessions?
What responsibilities so Presbyterians have?
What are the area of responsibilities made up of?
In the American and Ireland Presbyterian church, which step is generally skipped?
Which step was recently abolished by Scotland?
Presbyterianism is based on this type of tradition, what is it?
Confessional churches express this form of confession, what is it named?
What is not a sole matter individually in a confessional church?
How is theology carried out in a confessional church?
What traditions do some Presbyterian churches only adopt as their doctrinal standard?
Many Presbyterian churches in America have adopted this doctrine as their standard, what is it?
The Presbyterian church in Canada has retains which Doctrine in its original form?
To the church of Scotland, what is the sub standard doctrine?
Who was one person who did not fully believe the struggle of conscience?
The Free Church in Scotland  has something in place that only a few churches have implemented, what is it called?
Which book has the Presbyterian church of America adopted?
The Book of Confessions reflects the inclusion of another confession, what is it called?
Which statements did these other documents include from the Westminster Standards?
I what year was the The Theological Declaration of Barmen document created?
The Presbyterian denominations from the British Isles were inspired by these principles in what document?
When was the Directory of Public Worship developed?
Which government enacted the Directory of Public Worship teachings into law?
What did many Presbyterian churches introduce as a result of modifying prescriptions? 
What is favored by most American Presbyterian churches that is semi-formal service for the "lords Day"?
What do reformed Presbyterians practice?
Among the emerging Protestant and Evangelical churches what are clergy moving away from?
A Cassock and Surplice typically consisted of?
Which movement was representative of the ecumenical past?
Presbyterians had to distinguished between "Church" and "Meeting house" What was "Church" referring too?
What did "Meeting house" refer to?
What were churches called before the 19th century?
Early churches were extremely plain, what did most churches not have in them?
What did Presbyterian churches have in them?
What is the alter called in the Presbyterian church?
What is the alter area refered to as in the Presbyterian church?
What is a decorated cross called in a Presbyterian church?
What did the Celtic Cross represent?
In what year was the Church of Scotland recognized as a Presbyterian institution by the moncarh?
Which group was formed when ministries seceded from The Church of Scotland in 1733?
What year were most Presbyterians in Scotland reunited?
Which two groups were involved in the reuniting of Scotland's Presbyterian churches?
In what year was the Presbyterianism church formed in England?
Who was the first known Presbyterian in England?
Between what years were the ordinances enacted Presbyterianism as the polity of the Church of England?
In what year did Salter's Hall controversy, occur that would lead to a split?
When did the result in English Presbyterian congregations becomingUnitarian in doctrine?
When was the earliest Presbyterian churches founded by Scotland in England?
In what year during the Presbyterian movement in England was referred to as the "Disruption"?
What is the largest Protestant denomination in Northern Ireland?
What is the largest denomination of the entire Ireland Island?
How many Scottie Presbyterians moved to the northern counties in Ireland?
When was he Presbytery of Ulster formed?
Around when did Presbyterian missionaries arrived in New Mexico?
The established Presbyterian church in New Mexico provided an alternative to which religion?
Who brought Catholicism into New Mexico?
Which  services to most African Presbyterian churches offer?
The Southminster Presbyterian Church in Pittsburg has partnerships with churches in which two countries?
Which two missionaries help bring Presbyterian churches in the south eastern states?
Korean Presbyterian missionaries being sent over seas are second in numbers to only which other country?
What is the name of the largest Presbyterian missionary organization in Korea?
Which muslim country does Korea have a Presbyterian church in?
What year was the largest Presbyterian denomination brought to Mizoram?
Before Mizoram, what was the name of the group of  missionaries that  ventured into east india?
Where did the Welsh Presbyterians build there first church?
How many members make up the Presbyterian church in Australia?
Which Australian church follows the traditions of Scotland Presbyterians?
Most of the churches in Australia merged in which years?
In what year did the Presbyterian Church of Australia , the Congregational Union of Australia , and all the Methodist Church of Australasia merge?
In what year was ordination of woman ministries recsinded?
The approval of women elders which was given in 1960 has been rescinded in all of the Australian states except one, which state did not?
What is the name of the largest denomination of Presbyterian church in Vanuatu?
From which country did the Presbyterian Church of Vanuatu originate from?
What is the largest denomination church in Vanuatu?
Missionaries from which country started The Presbyterian Church in Vanuatu?
Which two towns have Presbyterian people, but no churches?
When was the German Mediatisation?
When were the mediatisation changes confirmed?
Which kingdom acquired some Thuringian territory?
Who led the unification of Germany in 1871?
Which city became the capital of Thuringia after World War 1? 
When did nazis gain power in Thuringia?
Who was the minister of the Interior for Thuringia in 1930?
How many delegates did the nazi party win in 1930?
Who did Frick remove from the police force?
Who did Frick replace republican police with?
Why is Thurnigia's landscape shaped by human influence?
What type of nature is common in the highlands of Thuringia? 
What is the original natural vegetation of Thuringia?
Where do most landscape problems come from?
What has been the aim for the Thuringian forests since 1990?
Since when has environmental damage in Thuringia been reduced?
What is one thing that helped to improve condition of forests, rivers and air?
What has been done to former Uranium surface mines around Ronneburg?
What are today's big environmental problems?
What is causing the salination of the Werra river?
Where was Thuringia in the Middle Ages?
What was the result of the Ostsiedlung movement?
When did population growth in Thuringia peak?
In what year did many cities in Thuringia lose half of their population?
How many municipalities are in Thuringia? 
How many municipalities in Thuringia are classified as towns?
How many towns have populations greater than 30,000?
What was the latest a town was established in Thuringia?
What is something more important to Thuringia than most areas of Germany?
How much of Thuringia's territory is in agricultural use?
What is the largest fertile area of Thuringia?
Where do they grow tomatoes in Thuringia?
Which regions value agriculture most?
How far back does Thuringia's industrial sector go back?
What was the result of the economic transition after the German reunification in 1990?
Where in Thuringia are there fewer industrial companies?
When did traditional industries like glass and toy making collapse?
Where in Thuringia did BMW get it's start in the 1920's?
Where is the GDP of Thuringia?
For how long was Thuringia one of the weakest regions in the EU?
What has helped to improve Thuringia? 
When will government subsidies to Thuringia end?
When did the unemployment rate of Thuringia peak?
What is the current state of unemployment in Thuringia? 
How do wages in Thuringia compare to their neighbors?
What do many Thuringian workers do to earn better wages?
What has lead to a lack of workers in some sectors?
What is Thuringia's traditional energy supply?
Where does Thuringia get it's lignite?
How is most of Thuringia's clean gas consumption carried out?
What are Thuringia's most important renewable energy sources?
What is Hohenwarte Dam?
Which hospitals are being expanded?
Why are there too many hospital beds?
What is the focus of Thuringia's research center, Jena?
Which universities are known for their historic and cultural aspects?
How is most research in Thuringia funded?
What must a species do in order to be classified as a predator?
How would you describe a predator that primarily eats plants?
A predator must do what to the prey after it is killed? 
A species that uses a host body to survive and reproduce is classified as a what?
How would you describe a diet of a species that eats primarily dead organic material? 
What does an herbivore eat?
Do detritivores have a direct impact on "donor" organisms?
What term is given to an organism that is being hunted?
What term is given to the biological interaction where a predator feeds upon prey?
What is the key characteristic of predation?
What do detritivores eat?
What is the key characteristic of predation?
How many synergetic qualities are there in the predator-prey mechanism? 
Proximity and the ending of life is called? 
If the prey is not killed the predator-prey interaction is called? 
Instead of what predators eat, how else can they be classified?
Certain death is involved with true predation and what other classification?
The study in which ecologists examine the way predators interact with their prey is called what?
What do household animals prey upon? 
Name an exemplar of an predator that uses digestion to kill and gain nutrients from it's prey.
To be classified as a predator, what action must be performed?
What requirement must a true predator fulfill?
What is different about a true predator?
All types of predators do what?
How do ambush predators hunt?
What do box jellyfish use to hunt their pray?
Animals that consume parts of their prey are considered to be
Prey that can regrow leaves or arms have learned to deal with what?
Give an example of a predator that specializes in eating autotrophic species
Give an example of an animal that feeds off of other animals for reproduction? 
What is an organism that grazes upon other animals?
What is an organism that can regrow lost arms?
Do grazing organisms often kill their prey?
How do grass and kelp deal with being grazed upon?
Species that rely on few or a single prey are called?
Predator and prey relationships that improve fitness for both species are classified as this type of relationship.
Give an example of an animal that will travel several miles in a single day.
What plant associated with kissing during the holidays is also parasitic? 
How are parasites distiguished from grazers?
How many hosts do parasites typically have?
How should parasite classification be viewed instead of as four isolated forms?
What does the term symbiosis mean?
This species relies on other species to provide a reproductive host for their offspring.
It is believed that parasitoids account for what percentage of the total insect population? 
During a parasitoid-host interaction what will happen to the host?
What is the term given to organisms living and feeding on their host?
How many organisms in the insect species are Diptera or Cleoptera parasitoids?
Which type of wasp is a well-known example of a parasitoid?
How do the larvae of the parasitoid wasps kill their prey?
Species that aren't considered specialized are called what? 
Predator and prey interactions that involve specialization result in a balance called?
When a specialized species resorts to foraging and eating other diets, it's like because it's primary food source is?
What do specialized predators and prey rely on to get the upper hand? 
What are some predators that will kill and eat nearly anything?
What term is used for predators and prey being well suited to hunt and evade each other?
What is the purpose of an evolutionary arms race?
If scavengers' food becomes scarce, they may turn to what type of diet?
Dead animals that died as a result of natural causes or non-fatal injuries are called?
Why are species can be difficult to classify because they?
What are plants that eat both living species and consume sunlight for energy called? 
What are organisms called that show carnivory and herbivory?
What can make classification of predators problematic when using a food pyramid?
Why would carnivourous plants be difficult to classify into a food pyramid?
Would it be easy or difficult to classify organims that eat parasites in a food pyramid?
Intraguild species consumer other species within?
Who proposes the concept of the "survival machine?"
The argument of the "survival machines" proposes that what two species are competing for the same genes?
Intraguild species may try to consume each other because they are?
Who described predation by describing competing genes within the predator?
To what part of the prey does Richard Dawkins refer to as the "survival machine"?
What are intraguild predators?
Which version of evolutionary theory is easiest to use when explaining predation as competition?
What term is used to decribe predators that prey on their own competition?
What is the title of a predator that maintains balance with an ecosystem?
What is the driving force for maintaining an equilibrium within an ecosystem?
When a keystone species is lost another species might become?
What is increased by keeping a single species from being dominant in an ecosystem?
Predators that prevent others from becoming dominant are called what?
What changes to a keystone predator can seriously affect an ecosystem's equilibrium?
What animal's food sources were greatly affected with the loss of wolves in Yellowstone National Park?
Broader ecological impacts can occur when an apex predator is removed, in the case of Yellowstone, this includes alteration to the?
Loose soil from lack of trees along the river bed resulted in?
The removal of what animal from Yellowstonw National Park affected beaver populations?
How did the removal of wolves from Yellowstone affect beaver habitats?
Why were plant populations affected after wolves were eliminated from Yellowstone?
How did wolves in Yellowstone help beavers eat well?
At most there are how many step of predator-prey interaction? 
What is the first step of the predator-prey interaction?
How does the prey improve their evolutionary abilities through predator-prey interaction? 
Who doesn't benefit from the predator-prey interaction? 
How many stages can predation be divided into?
What are the four stages of predation?
What dilemma has resulted in many predatory adaptations?
In predation's four stages, in what stage is consumption?
Which adaptation helps both predators and prey?
What term is used for an adaptation that enables species to blend into the background?
Camoflauge consists of what else, in addition to color?
Ogranisms use camoflauge to blend with their habitat and what else?
What is the phenomenon where an organism looks like another species called?
Which organism looks like a bee but cannot sting?
A moth that has markings resembling an owl's eyes is an example of what phenomenon?
What is a defensive way that mimicry can be used?
How can predators use mimicry?
What makes predation successful?
Treating the hunt as a cost-benefit scenario is referred to a what?
In optimal foraging theory, how are costs and benefits measured?
What hunting style allows chimpanzees to prey upon colobus monkeys?
What is an example of co-coperation between predators of different species?
What is a species that does not perform social predation?
What are some species that use social predation to prey on animals much larger than themselves?
Well-fed animals in captivity can become friends with prey animals due to what motivation?
Why would cats and dogs potentially become companions in captivity?
Captive animals can distinguish co-inhabitats from what other group?
What are some predators of the electric eel?
What defense does a zebra have against predators?
What defenses does a domestic cat have against predators?
The electric eel uses electric shock for defense and what other purpose?
Is a species always the antagonist in a mobbing attack, or can it play roles on both sides?
Which bird is an example of being both a predator and defender in mobbing attacks?
Will birds often mob animals that do not pose a threat?
Crows will cooperate with small birds to drive away what predators?
What do predators depend on for survival?
Prey that is eaten is simply replaced by anohter when the population is close to what?
Predators lower what aspects of their prey?
What physical disadvantages do humans have against other apex predators?
For how long have humans been using stone tools and weapons?
What are humans' primary competitors?
What is one known istance of cannibalism?
With what species do humans hunt in partnership?
What two apex predators do not have a small population size?
Do apex predators generally have a large or small population?
Which principle states that if two species ecologicl niches/ overlap, both species are likely to be in competition with one another?
What other factor is relevant to the competitive exclusion principle?
When a predator hunts too much of its prey, causing both populations to dissappear, the phenomenon is called what?
Are predator's effects on prey easiest to see in the short-term or long-term?
The rise and fall of predator and prey populations are similar to what, in the US economy?
How can natural predators benefit crops?
How are predators beneficial to agriculture?
If removing an introduced species entirely isn't a posibility, what is the next best outcome?
Predators are used in conservation to reduce what type of species from the environment?
Captain America, Thor and Ultron all inhabit what fictional milieu?
Fictional placements within this setting are modeled off what?
Spiderman's fictional city is based off what real American location?
What Marvel character's stories are set in an area resembling the American Southwest?
Which two groups of Marvel crimefighters are based in a fictional version of New York City?
What was the cover date on Marvel Comics #1?
Who was Marvel/Timely's first true full-time editor?
Besides Simon, who co-created Captain America?
What is the name of the character created by Carl Burgos?
In what issue was Namor, The Sub-Mariner introduced?
Marvel's first team of superheroes was known by what alliterative name?
What was the issue date when this superhero team debuted?
What Marvel executive helped change the focus of Marvel's stories and characters?
In the Marvel Universe, the public treated conferred what response on the Fantastic Four?
What is Marvel's best-selling comic?
Who joined with Stan Lee in creating the Fantastic Four?
What historic era did the Fantastic Four initially inhabit?
What traditional superhero element did the Fantastic Four initially do without?
None of the Fantastic Four had what hidden element so common to other superheroes?
The emphasis on relatable settings and character motivations in Marvel's 1960s comics is called what?
What actual US cities have fictional equivalents in Marvel's comic milieu?
What Marvel hero is related to a tiny insect?
The shared milieu inhabited by all Marvel heroes and villains is known as?
Which two comic book titles were the precursors to the widening of this overall setting?
How many comics did Marvel sell during 1968?
What company was distributing Marvel's titles at that point?
To whom was Marvel sold in 1968?
What wholly-owned affiliate of this company did Marvel operate within?
What distributor took over Marvel's titles in 1969?
What situation allowed Marvel to expand into more adult-themed genre stories?
What were two of Marvel's comic heroes in fantasy, swords and magic settings?
What waterfowl character had his own satire series of comic books?
In what year did Marvel's sales overtake rival DC?
How were some of Marvel's genre titles published in the 1970s?
What was Marvel's self-hosted comic book convention called?
What artist's return to Marvel was announced at this event?
What Marvel character was specifically created to appeal to the UK market?
When was the first Marvel-sponsored comics convention?
When did Marvel's British-themed superhero first appear?
Who took over as head of Marvel in 1978?
What is an example of a bad practice eliminated under Shooter's regime at Marvel?
What noted artist and writer made brought Daredevil to the forefront during the 1980s?
What team of artist and writer helped popularize the Uncanny X-Men line of comics in the 1980s?
Secret Wars was an early example of what Marvel comics story trope?
What 1990s comic line featured futuristic, sci-fi stories?
What was the name of the specialty comics line created by Clive Barker for Marvel?
In what year did Marvel introduce trading cards based on their characters?
What trading card company did Marvel team up with to license these trading cards?
What studio helped to relaunch and revamp classic marvel teams The Fantastic Four and the Avengers?
What two Marvel veterans founded Image?
How was the setting for the Image versions of Marvel characters different from the official comics?
How long did the Image run of Marvel characters last?
What three titles were part of the darker, grimmer Marvel Knights comics?
What was the business state of Marvel by 2000?
When did Marvel withdraw from the Comics Code Authority?
What in-house standards system did Marvel replace the Comics Code with?
What was the first book published under this new ratings system?
What was the name of the adult themed comics imprint for Marvel with more explicit content?
What entertainment company purchased Marvel at the end of the 2000s?
When was the sale of Marvel to this entertainment conglomerate announced?
What was the sale price of Marvel?
What is the readership market share enjoyed by Marvel and DC comics?
In 2010, Marvel switched to what distributor for bookstore comic book sales?
When did the Marvel Adventures line cease publishing?
Infinite Comics is related to what comics media platform?
What are two new titles under the Marvel NOW! line of comics?
Marvel NOW!, Infinite Comics, and Marvel AR are under the umbrella of what in house business endeavor?
What does the AR in Marvel AR stand for?
What TV network shares a parent with Marvel?
What series on this network was given a Marvel graphic novel?
What is the Marvel and Disney line of comics called?
What was the first title published in that joint line of comics?
What movie sci-fi franchise returned to Marvel in 2015?
What publisher did Marvel first license its characters to for novelization?
What was the first novel published under this deal?
What was the name of the short-lived Marvel novelization book publisher during the 2000s?
In 2005, Marvel dropped it's own publishing rights for novelization and instead partnered with what publisher?
Marvel Press was relaunched in what year?
What Disney theme park will become the first to feature Marvel-specific attractions?
Because of a prior contract, what two Disney parks are barred from featuring Marvel characters?
The contract with what non-Disney studio prevents some parks from using Marvel characters?
What Marvel movie featured Star-Lord and Gamora?
What movie features the characters Baymax and Hiro?
The United Kingdom ruled what empire?
Which empire was the largest in history, at its height?
When did 458 million people live in the British Empire?
How much of the world's population did the British Empire rule in 1922?
How many square miles did the British Empire rule in 1922?
In which centuries was the Age of Discovery?
Which countries pioneered European exploration of the globe?
When did England become Great Britain?
Which countries began colonizing because they envied the empires of Portugal and Spain?
Which country combined with England to form Great Britain?
When was John Cabot's voyage commissioned?
Who commissioned John Cabot's voyage?
Where was Cabot trying to find a route to via the North Atlantic?
Where did Cabot make landfall?
Which explorer did Cabot make a mistake similar to?
What had turned England and Catholic Spain into implacable enemies?
When did John Hawkins and Francis Drake attack Spanish and Portuguese slave ships?
Where did John Hawkins and Francis Drake attack Spanish and Portuguese slave ships?
Who gave their blessing to further privateering raids against Spanish ports?
Which author was the first to use the term "British Empire"?
When did Humphrey Gilbert first set sail for the West Indies?
When was Humphrey Gilbert's second attempt to set sail?
What was Humphrey Gilbert's second destination?
Who was Humphrey Gilbert's half-brother?
What colony did Walter Raleigh found?
What was James I's name/title before taking the English throne?
When did James I negotiate the Treaty of London?
Which country did England negotiate the Treaty of London with?
In what century did the English East India Company form?
What period ended towards the end of the 18th century?
When was England's first permanent settlement in the Americas founded?
Where was England's first permanent settlement in the Americas?
Who led England's first permanent settlement in the Americas?
When did the Somer Isles Company take over managing Bermuda?
What did England rename New Netherland to?
Which company had monopoly of the trade to supply slaves to the British colonies of the Caribbean?
When was the British slave trade abolished?
How many African slaves did Britain transport to the Americas?
The triangular slave trade was between Africa, the Americas, and which British cities?
What was the death rate during the Middle Passage?
King Philip renounced his right to the throne after what treaty?
Which country did Britain acquire Newfoundland and Acadia from?
Which country did Britain acquire Gibraltar and Minorca from?
Which colony allowed Britain to control the Atlantic entry and exit point to the Mediterranean?
What was the Spanish term for permission to sell slaves in Spanish America?
British relations with which area became strained in the 1760s-1770s?
What was the American colonists' anti-tax slogan?
When did the US declare independence?
When did France enter the American Revolution war?
When did Britain recognize American independence?
What book by Adam Smith was published in 1776?
The growth of trade between the US and Britain after 1783 seemed to confirm whose views?
In the 'second' British Empire period, Britain refocused on which areas?
What had been Britain's most populous overseas possession?
Who argued that colonies were redundant?
How many British loyalists moved from the US to Canada?
New Brunswick was split off from which province?
Which act created the Upper Canada provinces?
What language did most of Upper Canada speak?
What language did most of Lower Canada speak?
How many convicts per year had Britain been sending to the American colonies?
Where did Britain switch to sending their convicts after the loss of the American colonies?
Who discovered Australia in 1606?
What had the Dutch East India Company initially named Australia?
When did the first shipment of British convicts leave for Australia?
When was the Slave Trade Act enacted?
What abolished the British slave trade?
Which colony was the official British colony for freed slaves?
What abolished slavery throughout the British Empire?
How long of an 'apprenticeship' did slaves need to have before being fully freed?
How many square miles of territory were added to the British Empire between 1815 and 1914?
How many people were added to the British Empire between 1815 and 1914?
Who was Britain's last serious rival after Napoleon?
What was the period of Britain acting as the world's police called?
Britain's dominant position in world trade over some countries' economies has been called what?
What illegal trade was the British East India Company involved in?
How many chests of opium did China confiscate in 1839?
The First Opium War led to Britain seizing what island?
Which dynasty outlawed opium trade?
When did China outlaw opium trade?
When did Britain pass the Regulating Act?
When did Britain pass Pitt's India Act?
When did Britain pass the Charter Act?
The British East India Company was dissolved by which act?
Who was crowned the Empress of India?
Britain competed with which country to fill the Asian power vacuum in the 19th century?
When did Britain first invade Afghanistan?
What was the British-Russian rivalry called?
Britain feared Russia would invade what country/territory?
Russian victories against which countries increased British fears?
When was it proposed to unify Upper and Lower Canada?
The Act of Union unified Canada into a territory by what name?
When was the British North America Act passed?
When did Australia achieve self-government?
When did New Zealand achieve self-government?
Which British Prime Minister first supported home rule of Ireland?
The first Home Rule bill would have given Ireland less self-control than what other territory?
When was the Easter Rising?
When was a Home Rule bill passed?
The passed Home Rule Bill wasn't implemented because of which war?
Which country seemed like Britain's most likely threat in the early 20th century?
Which country did Britain ally with in 1902?
Which country did Britain ally with in 1904?
Which country did Britain ally with in 1907?
When was the Gallipoli Campaign?
Which British Prime Minister recognized the Dominions' contributions in 1917?
The Gallipoli Campaign fought against which country?
The Imperial War Cabinet was created by which British Prime Minister?
How many people were in the Dominions' armies?
When was the Treaty of Versailles signed?
How many square miles did the Treaty of Versailles add to the British Empire?
Which countries' colonies were given to the Allied powers in 1919?
What modern-day country is South-West Africa?
How many people did the Treaty of Versailles add to the British Empire?
When did Britain sign the Washington Naval Treaty?
The Great Depression helped which countries' governments become more militaristic?
When Britain had to choose between its Japanese alliance or the US, which did it choose?
British imperialism was being reconsidered in light of which territories' independence movements?
When was the Government of India Act passed?
What event stoked fears of communist plots in India?
In what region was the Amritsar Massacre?
The Chauri Chaura incident led to the end of what movement?
When did Egypt regain formal independence from Britain?
When did Egypt stop being a British client state?
What treaty was signed in 1936?
When did Iraq gain independence from Britain?
Britain became more pro-Arab in the 1930s at the expense of which race?
When was the right of Dominions to determine their own foreign policy recognized?
Which treaty did Canada ignore?
When was the Balfour Declaration issued?
When was the status of Dominions as equal autonomous communities given legal force?
When did Ireland issue a new constitution?
When was France occupied by Germany?
When was the Atlantic Charter signed?
Which British Prime Minister signed the Atlantic Charter?
Which US President signed the Atlantic Charter?
Which country first entered World War 2 after France's defeat?
Which country attacked British Malaya in 1941?
Which country attacked Hong Kong in 1941?
When was the ANZUS Pact formed?
Which countries were in the ANZUS Pact?
Which territory had been compared to Gibraltar?
How much money did the US loan to Britain after WW2?
When did Britain finish paying back the US loan?
When did the US make a large loan to Britain?
Though the US and the Soviet Union were both against colonialism, what was the US more afraid of?
How many people outside the UK were under British rule in 1945?
What race was the majority in Palestine in the 1940s?
When did Britain announce plans to withdraw from Palestine?
Which entity decided to partition Palestine into Jewish and Arab states?
Where did many Jewish refugees want to move because of the Holocaust?
When did the Malayan Emergency begin?
When did Britain give the Federation of Malaya its independence?
When did Singapore leave the Federation of Malaya?
What race was the majority of Singapore's population?
When did Brunei get its independence?
What party regained power in Britain in 1951?
Which party was Winston Churchill in?
Who ruled Egypt in 1952?
When did Sudan receive independence?
Britain wanted to retain control of the Suez Canal to help its importance in what region?
When was the Suez Canal nationalized?
Who became British Prime Minister after Winston Churchill?
Which country did Eden conspire with to cause an attack on Egypt?
Who decided to sell US reserves of the British pound to cause the pound to collapse?
What country did Britain convince to attack Egypt?
Where did 'Britain's Waterloo' occur?
Who referred to 'Suez Syndrome'?
When did Britain retake the Falkland Islands?
From whom did Britain retake the Falkland Islands?
A British minister thought which country was becoming an 'American satellite'?
When did Britain withdraw from Aden?
When did Britain withdraw from Bahrain?
When did Britain withdraw from the Maldives?
Who was Harold Wilson's Defense Secretary?
Where did Britain's army attack in 1961?
What was the last British colony remaining in Africa?
When was the second-to-last British colony in Africa granted independence?
When was the Unilateral Declaration of Independence of Rhodesia?
What new country did the Lancaster House Agreement recognize?
Where was the Mau Mau Uprising?
Which British territory received independence in 1961?
Which British territory received independence in 1962?
When did Barbados get independence?
Which islands decided to return to British rule after receiving independence?
What was Britain's last American mainland colony?
When was Canada given full control of its constitution?
When did Rhodesia become Zimbabwe?
What were the remaining British territories called in 1981?
What were the remaining British territories called in 2002?
Which 1980s war victory helped Britain seem more like a world power again?
How many overseas territories does Britain still have?
When did Britain decide to call its territories the British Overseas Territories?
Which country besides Britain claims Gibraltar?
Which country besides Britain claims the Falkland Islands?
Which country besides Britain claims the South Sandwich Islands?
In which countries did the British Isles provide most of the founding settlers?
Where did many Indians move to?
Many people of which ethnicity moved to Malaysia, Singapore and the Caribbean?
When did many former colonies' citizens begin immigrating into Britain?
What is are the main themes of present-day botany?
How can botany be applied to combating world hunger?
How can botany be applied to the construction industry?
Is botany a narrow science?
What led scientists to believe that plants should be classified according to something other than just sexual system?
In what year to Candolle introduce the Candollean system?
On what did Candolle base his classification system?
What did Darwin introduce that changed classification systems?
What is transpiration?
What influences water evaporation on leaves?
What influences the rate of gas produced by plants?
What enables the regulation of plant growth?
What can auxin plant hormones also be used as?
What enables scientists to better study plants now?
What opened the door to plant genetic engineering?
Who introduced the idea that cells could be grown in vitro?
What kind of relationships does systematics aim to discover?
What does phylogenetics use to determine plant categories?
What did the Angiosperm Phylogeny group use determine a phylogeny of flowering plants?
Modern Morphology recognizes the structural dynamics of what?
Why are plants important to human life?
What is the process that converts sunlight to energy?
What is used to rebuild cells?
What vital element is a byproduct of photosynthesis?
What do plant roots prevent?
What is the study of ancient, fossilized plants?
What organism is credited with starting the oxygen-rich atmosphere on Earth?
What can scientists learn from the fossil record?
What was the first organism to produce oxygen through photosynthesis?
what parts of algae are unique to them?
From what ancient oxygen producing plant are chloroplasts descended?
What color is chlorophyll?
What organelles are unique to algae?
From what ancient source are chloroplasts descended?
What color does a plant with chlorophyll appear to be?
What is the function of ATP and NADPH molecules?
When is the raw form of glucose formed?
What is stored in the chloroplast?
What is used instead of glucose in sunflowers?
Why is table sugar produced?
What polymer is used to strengthen cell walls?
What weakens cell walls?
What gas is in lower concentration now due to plants?
What polymer is found in spores and pollen?
What polymer is a major part of wood?
What is the study of the chemicals that plants produce?
Hemlock is what kind of chemical produced from a plant?
Where do some medicines and recreational drugs come from?
Where did aspirin originally come from?
Where does morphine come from?
How is charcoal made?
Besides fire, what else is charcoal used for?
Plant oil is used for what kind of fuel?
Rayon comes from what plant product?
On what do plants depend in their environment?
How do plants interact with other species in their environment?
What is the collection of plants in the environment called?
What are groupings of similar plants?
How can historical changes in the environment be detected?
How can climate changes be determined from soil?
What atmospheric gas can be determined from fossilized leaf sizes and shapes?
What causes lower growth in plants?
What does ozone depletion allow?
Does inheritance work differently in plants?
What plant did Mendel use to demonstrate inheritance?
What other plant was used in the discovery of different genes?
Are plants and animals genetically the same?
Why do plants develop bulbs?
What do plants do when the environment makes fertilization especially difficult?
How different are the children produced by asexual parents?
What is the term for asexual cloning?
Does apomixis only occur in the parent?
What can cause the doubling of chromosome pairs?
Are the plants produced by this error, able to reproduce?
Can these plants cross breed with the parent population of plants?
What happens to these new plants if they are able to reproduce?
What is a yellow example of a sterile,hybrid plant with no seeds?
What was the first plant to have its genome sequenced?
In what year was this genome sequenced?
Why was this plant chosen for sequencing?
Why is sequencing done on plants?
What results from  sequencing of DNA pairs?
Why is a plant chosen for the study of its cells?
What mechanism can be studied through chromosome sequencing?
What common plant has been used for studying the production of sugar?
What simple plant has been used to study plant cells?
How can a bacteria in the soil affect a plant?
How can scientists use bacteria in the study of plants?
How are genes transferred to a plant by scientists?
What is this kind of introduction and transfer used for?
Who developed the procedures used in this transfer?
What does epigenetics study?
How do DNA changes affect plants?
When DNA has different markers, how it that presented in plants?
What is a result of changes in DNA markers within a plant species?
Are the changes then presented, permanent?
What process causes changes in plant cells?
What is the original cell of the plant?
How are the different cells formed?
How is it determined, which cells will be formed?
Does cell division end in plants?
What happens when a plant remains totipotent?
Why do phloem sieve tubes stop forming?
Why are plants able to stop and start dividing cells?
Are lignified cells able to continue dividing?
Are all algae different from land plants?
What algae is the ancestor of true plants?
Are all species of algae similar?
To what species of algae is Charophyta related?
What does the plant use for internal processes?
Where do plants get their energy?
How do animals use plants?
Is respiration in animals similar to photosynthesis in plants?
What is the basis of plant physiology?
How is water transported into plants?
IN what form are mineral acquired by the roots?
From where does the plant get the required minerals?
Where is sucrose produced in a plant?
How are hormones moved around a plant?
When was the theory of plant hormones introduced?
To what did Darwin compare the top of the plant radical?
Why did Darwin feel plants had something comparable to a brain?
What do auxins do?
What can plant callus be coaxed into doing?
What are cytokinins responsible for in plants?
Where are cytokinins produced?
How is bud development determined?
How is the height of a plant determined?
What acid slows or stops cell division?
What is the study of the inside of plants?
What is the study of the outside of plants?
How are plants different from animals?
Where do plants store their DNA?
Are the vacuoles of plant cells larger or smaller than animal cells?
What makes up the bodies of vascular plants?
Do roots contain chlorophyll?
What makes a plant non-vascular?
How much of a non-vascular plant is involved in photosynthesis?
How are sporophytes generated in liverworts?
What are the stems used for in cacti?
For what are leaves used?
What are angiosperms?
What kind of plants are gymnosperms?
What kind of leaves are large and flat?
What is the main grouping of a plant know as?
What is the most narrow grouping of a plant?
Do different countries refer to plants by different names?
What part of the name is always capitalized?
How is the entire name usually presented in scientific texts?
What does the phylogeny of a group represent?
How are the relationships within the group determined?
What would be an indication of a shared inheritance in two cacti?
What are areoles?
What was the first plant grouping based on DNA sequencing?
What can be learned from DNA sequencing of plants?
How has technology improved the study of botany?
What have scientists learned about angiosperms from DNA sequencing?
Where was Madonna born?
In which year did Madonna move to New York City?
Which record label did Madonna sign with in 1982?
What was the name of the album she released in 1983?
Name Madonna's Grammy award album in 1998?
Name a film role that Madonna acted in.
Which movie earned Madonna a Golden Globe Award?
Name one of Madonna's other business ventures?
What is the name of the entertainment company that Madonna founded?
Which year did Madonna sign a $120 million deal with Live Nation?
How many records did Madonna sell worldwide?
Madonna is recognize as the best selling female music artiste by who?
How many certified albums does Madonna have?
Since 1990, how much did Madonna make in her concerts?
Who is one of the founding members of the UK Music Hall of Fame?
Which name did Madonna adopted as her confirmation name?
Which disease did her mother passed away from?
Where was Madonna raised?
What was Madonna's mother's reaction to her questioning about her illness?
Who did Madonna turn to for comfort during her mother's illness?
How did the Ciccone siblings behaved towards anyone brought to their home to replace their beloved mother?
Who did Madonna tell in an interview that as a young girl, she was lonely and always searching for something?
Afraid that Tony would be taken from her, what does she do?
When did Madonna drop out of college?
Which restaurant did Madonna work in New York City?
Where did Madonna take dance classes at in New York City?
How much did Madonna have when she first went to NYC?
What did she also work as for other established artists?
Which year was Patrick Hernandez's world tour held?
Who did Madonna started seeing when she worked as a back up singer/dancer during Patrick Hernandez's tour?
What was the name of the band which Madonna and Dan Gilroy started?
When did Madonna leave the Breakfast Club?
After leaving the Breakfast Club, who did she formed the band Emmy with?
What was Madonna's debut single called?
When was "Everybody" released?
What was the name of the second single called?
Who produced Madonna's debut album?
Madonna's dance singles reached which number in the "Hot Dance Club Songs" by the Billboard Magazine?
Who was the boyfriend that Madonna moved in with?
Who remixed most of Madonna's album tracks?
Which song was Madonna's first global hit?
When was Madonna's album released?
Which number did Madonna's album peaked at the Billboard 800 six months later?
Who did Madonna's look and style of dressing influence?
When did Madonna's style become a fashion trend?
Who is the stylist and jewellery designer that created Madonna's look?
When did Madonna achieve global recognition?
How long did "Like a Virgin" stayed on the Billboard 100?
Madonna was criticized for her performance of which song in the VMA?
What was Madonna wearing during the performance of "Like A Virgin" at the VMA?
Her video of "Material Girl" was an imitation of which singer's song, "Diamonds are a girl's best friend?"
When did Madonna married Sean Penn?
When did Madonna audition for a dance role in the show "A Chorus Line?" 
When did Madonna enter mainstream films?
What is the name of the romantic drama film that Madonna starred in?
When did Madonna appear in the comedy Desperately Seeking Susan?
What is the name of Madonna's two new singles?
What song did the comedy Desperately Seeking Susan promote?
When was Madonna's first concert tour in North America?
Who were the opening act for Madonna's concert The Virgin tour?
When did Madonna have nude photos taken of her in New York?
How much was Madonna's nude photos were finally sold for?
When was the Live Aid Charity Concert held?
When was Madonna's third album released?
Who was the album True Blue dedicated to?
Madonna's album topped in how many countries chart worldwide?
What award did Madonna receive for her role in the film Shanghai Surprise?
Name a soundtrack in the film Who's That Girl?
When did Madonna sign an endorsement deal with Pepsi?
With Madonna's new video, Like A Prayer, the blasphemy that she portrayed in the video led to what consequences?
Who co-written and co-produced the song, Like A Prayer?
How many copies did Like A Prayer sell worldwide?
When was Madonna named "Artist of the Decade" by MTV, Billboard and Musician Magazine?
In the film Dick Tracy, who did Madonna starred as?
Madonna's role in Dick Tracy led to which award nomination?
Who earned an Academy Award for the song "Vogue" and "Sooner or Later?" 
When did Madonna and Beatty's relationship end?
Who did Madonna have a relationship with while shooting the film?
What is Madonna's compilation album called?
How many albums did it sell worldwide?
What is one of the title of the songs that was released in the Immaculate Collection?
Why did MTV ban the video for Justify My Love?
Justify My Love reached which number in the US charts?
Who did Madonna play in the role A League Of Their Own?
What is the film's theme song?
When did Madonna open her own entertainment company, Maverick?
How much was the royalties paid to Madonna for the music proceedings?
What was the name of the erotic thriller that shows scenes of sadomasochism and bondage?
When was The Girlie Show World Tour?
What was Madonna dressed in for the tour?
In which country did Madonna rubbed the country's flag between her thighs that anger the public?
What did Madonna give to Letterman to smell in his late night show that created an uproar?
What did the critics call Madonna after the Letterman show?
Which biographer described her song "I'll Remember" as trying to clean up Madonna's image?
The song "I'll Remember" was recorded for which film?
What was Madonna's sixth album named?
The single "Take A Bow" was at the Hot 100 for how many weeks?
Who was the fitness trainer that Madonna was involved with?
Who from Times magazine gave an excellent critique of the film Evita?
What award did Madonna win for the film Evita?
When was Madonna's daughter born?
What is the name of Madonna's daughter?
When did Madonna's relationship with Carlos Leon ended?
What is the name of Madonna's seventh album?
What year was "Ray of Light" released?
Which electronica producer did Madonna team up with for Ray of Light?
Which type of music was popular during the 90s?
How many Emmy awards did Ray of Light won?
Who listed Ray of Light as "The 500 Greatest Albums of All Time?"
How many albums did Ray of Light sell worldwide?
Which single in the album made it to the UK number one?
The single Ray of Light debut at which number of the Billboard Hot 100?
Which edition of the Guinness Book of World Record states that no female artist sold more records than Madonna?
Which film project did Madonna leave because of differences with the director?
Who was the director of Music of the Heart?
Which film did Madonna record the single Beautiful Stranger for?
Which award did Madonna win for the single "Beautiful Stranger?"
Who is Madonna's second husband?
When did Madonna marry Guy Ritchie?
When was Rocco John Ritchie born?
What type of birth complications did Madonna suffer at birth?
When did Madonna's Drowned World Tour start?
Which film did Madonna starred in that was directed by Ritchie?
When did Madonna appear in the play Up For Grabs at the Wyndhams Theatre?
What was Madonna's title song for the James Bond movie?
Die Another Day reached which number in the Billboards Hot 100?
What is the name of the exhibition installation that Madonna teamed up with fashion photographer Chris Klein called?
What was Madonna's ninth album called?
When was American Life released?
American Life reached which number at the Hot 100?
How many copies did the album sell worldwide?
Madonna and Maverick sued which company for poor bookkeeping and mismanagement of resources?
Warner filed a countersuit stating that who lost 10 of millions of dollars on its own?
Warner resolved the dispute by buying whose shares?
Maverick became a wholly owned  subsidiary of which company?
When was the Re-Invention World Tour kick off?
HOw much did the tour earn?
What was Madonna's documentary called?
When was Madonna inducted into the UK Hall of Fame?
When did the Confessions Tour start?
How much did the Confessions Tour make?
Why did the Russian Orthodox Church and Federation of Jewish Communities of Russian asked members to boycott the concert?
It was confirmed by IFPI that Madonna officially sold how many albums worldwide?
What was the charity that Madonna was involved in when in Malawi?
When did Madonna adopt David Banda?
What was Banda suffering from when Madonna first met him?
What was the name of Banda's biological father?
When was the adoption finalized?
What song did Madonna release for the Live Earth series of concerts?
Madonna had a new 10 year, $120 million record deal with which company?
What was the documentary Madonna produced and wrote about the Malawis?
What is the name of the first film Madonna directed?
Who was one of the five inductees of the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame?
What was the name of Madonna's eleventh album?
When was Hard Candy released?
Hard Candy debuted at number one in how many countries?
Madonna worked with Justin Timberlake, Timbaland, Pharrell Williams and Nate Hills for which album?
What is the title of the book by Madonna's brother?
The book debuted at number two on which best seller's list?
When was the divorce finalized between Madonna and Ritchie?
When did the High Court of Malawi gave the right for Madonna to adopt her second son?
When did Madonna appear in MTV for the tribute to Michael Jackson?
When was Mercy adopted?
Madonna known Mercy since going to adopt which child in Malawi?
Who initially protested the adoption?
Who insisted that Mercy should be adopted?
Who stated that he could not support the adoption since he was alive??
When did Madonna perform at the Hope for Haiti Now?
What album did Madonna released in April 2010?
Madonna granted which TV show the rights to her entire catalog of music?
What is the name of the episode of Glee that featured Madonna's songs?
What is the name of the clothing line Madonna released with her daughter?
Material Girl clothing line is released under which brand?
What is the name of the fitness gyms that Madonna opened?
When did Madonna released her second clothing line?
What is the name of the second film that Madonna directed?
Which year did Madonna performed at the Super Bowl?
How many viewers did the half-time show attract?
Madonna signed a three album deal with which record company?
What was the name of Madonna's twelfth album?
When was MDNA released?
Where did the MDNA Tour start?
When did MDNA Tour begin?
How much did the Tour grossed?
How many shows were sold out?
Who named Madonna as the top-earning celebrity of the year?
By 2013, how many did Madonna's Raising Malawi organization built?
When did Madonna visit Malawi's school?
Who criticized Madonna's charity efforts, stating that she exaggerated her contributions?
What was the name of the 17 minute film called?
Which company was selected to release the film?
When was secretprojectrevolution released?
What initiative did Madonna launched with her film?
How many submissions does the initiative have?
What award ceremony did Madonna appeared in?
What song did Madonna sing at the ceremony?
Which singer did she join on MTV Unplugged to sing?
When did Madonna premiered her MDNA skincare line?
Which city did Madonna contribute funds to help poverty?
When did Madonna's album demo leaked online?
What is Madonna's thirteenth album called?
When was Rebel Heart released?
When did Madonna embark on the Rebel Heart Tour?
How much did Rebel Heart Tour grossed?
Whose music had been the subject of a lot of scrutiny?
Who is the author of Contemporary Strategic Analysis?
Who has established herself as a Queen of Popular Music?
Who writes and creates most of her own music?
Who was Madonna's first producer?
Whose music speak about taboo and unconventional subjects?
Madonna was nominated to be inducted twice which year to the Songwriter Hall of Fame?
Which magazine stated that Madonna was the greatest songwriter of all time?
Which genre did Madonna started out in?
When performing with Emmy, how many songs did Madonna produce?
Who popularize dance music as mainstream music?
What is Madonna's second album?
Which 2 album show Madonna's artistic statement?
True Blue has what type of music Incorporated in it?
Which 2 albums explored the New Lack Swing?
Madonna brought which type of music to mainstream with Ray of Light?
What type of music did Madonna experimented with in Music?
Most of the songs in Music are what type of songs?
What type of songs are in Confessions of a Dance floor?
What type of songs does Hard Candy have?
MDNA focuses on which type of music?
Which instruments can Madonna play?
Who taught Madonna how to play the drum and guitar?
What instrument does Madonna play on her demo recordings?
How long did Madonna spent learning to play the violin?
Who was the guitarist that Madonna learnt from to improve on her skills?
According to who was the defining moment of Madonna's childhood with her mother's death?
Which psychiatrist said that when a parent dies when the child is young, it leaves a lasting impact?
Who believes that the rape Madonna experienced is the driving force in life?
Which song made a strong impression on Madonna?
Who sang the song these boots are made for walking?
Whose favorite style is baroque?
Who grew up listening to David Bowie?
Name one of Madonna's major influence?
What is Madonna's religious background?
Like a Prayer reflects Madonna's relationship with who?
In which video did Madonna wear a rosary?
In which video does it show Madonna being scolded by her boss in Italian?
Name one actor that Madonna was inspired by?
Madonna's Material Girl recreated whose look?
The video Express Yourself was inspired by which silent film?
Who stated that Madonna was a bad actress to watch?
Which one of Madonna's movie is a box office bomb?
Whose art influence Madonna?
Which video featured art from Kahlo and Remedios Varo?
Madonna collects whose painting?
Her video Hollywood was a homage to which photographer?
Which religion was Madonna dedicated to?
Which year did she adopt the name Esther?
The influence of Kabbalah is seen in which album?
Where did Madonna attend Catholic services in 2011?
Who are the Madonna Companion Biographers?
Madonna used which TV company to help with her career?
The most remarkable creation in MTV is whom?
What influence did Madonna music video reflects?
She transmit her avant garde style to which audience?
Which look of Madonna became a fashion trend?
What type of Spanish clothings were worn for the video La Ista Bonita?
Who noted that Madonna was reversing the gender role?
In which video was it the most obvious?
Who named Madonna the Greatest Music Video star ever?
When was Madonna awarded the accolade?
Who had new standards of showmanship?
Who earned a reputation of lip synching in the Blond Ambition Tour?
What came as an expense of live singing?
What did Madonna use in her concerts?
What was the microphone coined as?
Who is first to have reenactment of her music videos in concerts?
Whose concerts are extravagant live shows?
Who is the most influential recording artist of all time?
Who wrote the book, Madonna and Me?
Who said that Madonna changed the world social history?
Who said that Madonna is like post-moderm art?
Who holds the record for the most number 1 hits?
How many songs does Madonna have on the Hot Dance Club Songs Chart?
Who has the most number one songs in an active BiIlboard chart?
How many top 10 singles on the Hot 100 does Madonna have?
Who is the most successful solo artist in the history of American singles chart?
Where does London rank in the world in terms of Metropolitan GDP?
Based on international arrivals, where does London rank in terms of most-visited cities?
How many universities are located in London?
Where does London rank in the world's university rankings?
How many times has London hosted the Summer Olympics?
Where does London rank in terms of metropolitan area GDP?
How many times has London hosted the Summer Olympic Games?
What measurement designates London as the world's most visited city?
How many universities does London boast?
When did London most recently host the Summer Olympics?
How many different languages are spoken in London?
What was the population in London in 2014?
Where does London's urban area rank in terms of population within the EU?
How many people are in London's Metropolitan area?
What years was London considered the world's most populous city?
From the 2011 census, London is second in population in the EU to which city?
During what time did London have the world's largest population, city-wise?
Approximately how many languages are spoken in the Greater London area?
As of mid-2014, London's population forms what percentage of the entire United Kingdom population?
What is the population of metropolitan London?
What river flows into the River Thames?
The remains of an ancient bridge found on the shore of the River Thames was dated back to what archaeological period?
The remains of what type of structure from the mesolithic period was found on the River Thames's foreshore?
How many ancient structures' ruins have been found near the River Thames in recent history?
The remains of an unknown ancient structure found on the River Thames foreshore dated back to approximately what year?
Who was the leader of the Iceni tribe?
What was Roman London's population in the 2nd century?
The Romans invaded what is now London and established its first major settlement in what year?
What was the capital of Britannia before Londinium?
Who invaded and destroyed the first major settlement of Roman London in 61 AD?
What area continued to exist after Londinium was abandoned following the end of Roman rule?
What was responsible for the decline of the Anglo-Saxon settlement of Lundenwic?
How many known attacks on London did the Vikings commit?
By the late 7th century, what was a main function of Lundenwic?
Of the three recorded Viking assaults on London, how many were successful?
According to the Anglo-Saxon chronicle, who reestablished London in 886 AD?
Danelaw, established by the Vikings, covered what  geographical area?
What was the name of the Danish warlord who played a major role in establishing Danelaw?
Following the Viking invasion, when did London begin to significantly grow and expand?
What was Danelaw?
Who rebuilt Westminster Abbey?
By which century had London started becoming a prominent capital city?
What architectural style was Westminster Abbey rebuilt in?
What historian was quoted as saying that London had all the necessary characteristics to be a major capital city?
Prior to the 11th century, what was Anglo-Saxon England's capital?
In what area of London was the Tower of London built?
The Palace of Westminster originated from what building?
On what day did Duke William II of Normandy become King of England?
Who built Westminster Hall?
In which famous battle did Duke William II of Normandy see victory?
What was the administration which governed the City of London called?
In the 12th century, where were the various bodies of English government centrally located for the most part?
Where was the royal treasury housed?
Before being centrally located, how was the English government handled in terms of location?
In what era did the Protestant Reformation occur?
What event greatly boosted English shipping and commerce?
What phenomenon did the Reformation bring about?
Typically what were the nationalities of ships that traveled to and from England via the Straight of Gibraltar?
When was England again able to ship to the Netherlands?
What was the defensive wall that encircled London in 1642 called?
How long did it take to build the Lines of Communication?
Who did the Lines of Communication wall fail to prevent from coming into London?
Approximately how many workers did it take to build the Lines of Communication?
What was King George II's royal residence beginning in 1762?
What was the name of the police force established in London in 1750?
On average, when did children born in the City of London die? 
How many crimes in 18th century London could result in the death penalty?
What was the London hub of the British press?
What was the primary cause of the cholera outbreak in 19th century London?
Who bombed London in both World War I and World War II?
When did London host its first Summer Olympics?
How many people died of cholera in London in 1848?
Where did the 1948 Summer Olympics in London take place?
What was the root cause of the Brixton riot in 1981?
In what year was the Greater London Council formed?
In what period was London a symbol of trend-setting and youth?
During "The Troubles", who waged assaults via bombings on London?
Why was the Greater London Council established?
What was London's estimated population in the 1980s?
What event preceded a substantial decrease in the average population in London? 
The main ports for London were relocated to where?
When was construction on the Thames Barrier completed?
What was the primary function of the Thames Barrier?
What were the Millennium Dome, the London Eye, and the Millennium Bridge created to honor?
What government entity was abolished in 1986?
London was honored with what in July, 2005?
What replaced the long-abolished Greater London Council in 2000?
The population of Greater London in January 2015 was its greatest since what year?
What area of the River Thames does the Port of London Authority's jurisdiction cover?
What agency provides fire fighting and rescue service in London?
Who oversees and manages the London Fire Brigade?
The world's largest "free-at-the-point-of-use" ambulance service is known as what?
What agency operates in conjunction with the LAS as needed?
What is the Prime Minister of the UK's official residence?
Who first dubbed the British Parliament the "Mother of Parliaments?"
How many Members of Parliament are from London?
As of May 2015, which party holds the majority of seats in Parliament?
As of May 2015, how many Liberal Democrats sit in Parliament?
In the past, how much wider was the River Thames than it is today?
What was the population density of Greater London in 2001?
In which direction does the River Thames run through the City of London?
What is the population of the London Metropolitan Region?
What is the main geographical landmark in London?
What is England's oldest standing palace from the Tudor period?
Of what material is London's National Gallery made?
When did the Great Fire of London occur?
The area west of London's city is characterized by what type of building?
What, in part, is the reason for London's lack of a singularly characteristic architectural style among its buildings?
Where in London are the Albert Memorial and Royal Albert Hall located?
What famous monument is located in Trafalgar Square?
The Monument, located in the City of London, was erected to commemorate what event?
What was the most common type of brick used to construct London's older buildings?
Where are Marble Arch and Wellington Arch located?
What are the financial districts of London known as?
High-rise buildings may be restricted to prevent obstruction of what views?
What is the European Union's tallest building?
How high does the Shard London Bridge rise?
Most of London's skyscrapers are located where?
How many different species of plant life are known to grow in London?
How many National Nature Reserves exist in the London area?
Green space and open water comprises what percent of London?
How many species of fish live in the River Thames?
The London Natural History Society has document how many species of butterfly?
What type of animal belonging to Queen Elizabeth II was killed by an intruding fox on the Buckingham Palace grounds?
What animal was seen sleeping in London's Parliament Building?
What is London's fox population density?
In 2001, what organization conducted a survey of residents regarding London's fox population?
Approximately how many foxes live in the City of London?
Epping Forest is home for how many species of bats?
What animal was found dead at the Highway in Wapping, near the Tower Bridge?
It appears that otters may be returning to the city of London after how long an absence?
How many species of bats exist in England?
What rare breed of deer is protected at the Deer Sanctuary at Theydon Bois?
When do culls to ensure sustainability of London's deer population occur?
Why are herds of deer starting to enter residential areas in London?
Bushy Park in Richmond is home to what herds of animals?
London is second only to what city in terms of its foreign population?
What percentage of London residents are foreign-born?
Many German-born Londoners were British citizens by birth due to what?
When did London see its highest population numbers?
What was London's estimated population at the time of the 2011 census?
With which two other cities is London named one of the most expensive in the world?
Where does London rank in terms of the world's largest cities?
About how many billionaires call London home?
What is the ratio of black and Asian schoolchildren to white schoolchildren?
What was the approximate population of London children aged 0 to 15 years at the time of the 2011 census?
The 2011 census in London found what percentage of children to be white?
A 2005 survey indicated that how many communities comprised of non-indigenous people existed in London?
According to the 2011 London census, what percentage of children were black?
What percentage of the Greater London population was said to be foreign-born according to the 2011 census?
What agency is responsible for compiling London's population data?
When was the most recent UK census published?
What is the name of the largest Hindu temple in Europe?
Where is London's Sikh population primarily located?
Where is the East London Mosque located?
Which eastern boroughs host large Muslim populations?
How many Hindu temples exist in London?
Which Jewish synagogue boasts the largest membership in Europe?
The Sephardic Jewish community in London is affiliated with which Synagogue?
For how long has the Bevis Marks Synagogue in London been conducting religious services continuously? 
London's Stanmore and Canons Park Synagogue passed London's Ilford Synagogue in terms of membership in what year?
When was the London Jewish Forum established?
What is the best-known London accent known as?
An increasingly popular London accent among younger people fuses Cockney with what?
What style of accent in London is commonly used by media and other professionals?
Outside of London, where is the Cockney accent typically heard?
What is the name of the world-famous insurance market based in London?
What is the largest industry in London?
What is the UK's central bank known as?
Prior to mid-2007, approximately how many people in London had jobs in the financial sector?
How many banks does London operate overseas?
According to 2015 data, how many how many visitors gave London its ranking as the number one visited city in the world?
How many US dollars are estimated to have been spent in London by visitors from other countries?
As of 2003, roughly how many full time workers were employed in the tourism industry?
Which travel and tourism website's user activity has indicated that London is the number one travel destination?
What percentage of visitor money is estimated to be spent in London?
Which elected official is financially responsible for public transportation in London, except for long-distance railways?
London's public transportation is overseen by which agency?
Along with the London Underground, buses and trans, what form of public rail transport was added in 2007 to the Mayor's responsibilities?
How many airports are affiliated with London and incorporate the word London in their names?
The majority of air traffic utilizes how many of the airports in and around London?
In terms of international travel, which airport is the world's busiest?
A fifth terminal was opened in 2008 for which UK airline?
In May 2010, who scrapped British Airways's plans to add a sixth terminal and another runway?
What is the smallest airport in the London area?
London City Airport's clients are comprised chiefly of what?
Which local UK airport hub is located in Essex?
London Southend Airport in Essex offers primarily what type of service?
Where is London City Airport located?
In the 20th century the Night Ferry was a boat train that provided connections between London and which cities?
London is directly connected to continental Europe through what rail service?
In what year did the Channel Tunnel open?
St. Pancras International is linked to Paris and other popular European tourist destinations via what method of transportation?
When did local high speed rail service that linked London and Kent begin?
What professional services network named London the world's capital of higher education?
London has the highest concentration of higher education institutions in Europe with how many universities?
What is the approximate number of international students studying in London?
In terms of teaching and research, what is the world's foremost institute of social science?
Where is University College London, or UCL, ranked among the world's best colleges and universities?
The Financial Times rated what school's MBA program 2nd-best in the world in 2015?
What school in London shares the rank of 2nd best in the world with the famous University of Cambridge in the 2014-2015 World University Rankings?
City University London is related to what specialized business school?
The Royal College of Art and the Royal College of Music are examples of what type of schools?
Who overseas the public primary and secondary school systems in London?
What private boys' school shares in London shares its name with a famous cathedral?
What is the entertainment center of London known as?
What is a prominent feature of Picadilly Circus?
London's Chinatown district is located in what area?
Where is London's West End located geographically?
What prolific composer and producer of musicals has been a major force in the West End theater district?
What street in Islington boasts more bars and restaurants than any other street in Britain?
What is the longest street for shopping,, housing many shops and department stores, in the United Kingdom?
How long is Islington's Upper Street? 
What famous high-end department store is located on Oxford Street?
Which world-renowned luxury department store is located in the borough of Knightsbridge?
The Lord Mayor's Show occurs annually in what month?
What does the Lord Mayor's Show parade commemorate and celebrate?
Who participates in the military pageantry in the Trooping the Colour event every June?
Fireworks are discharged on New Year's Eve from what contemporary London landmark?
Every June, the Trooping of the Colour celebrates what event?
Who witnessed first-hand and wrote about the Great Fire of 1666?
What area has historically been the literary hub of London?
A more current, 20th century center for London's literary set is located where?
Which author's novels painted a dismal portrait of Victorian London?
What female writer is one of the leading literary minds of the 20th century?
What major film production company calls London home?
In what theater are the British Academy film awards presented?
What popular soap opera has the BBC televised since 1985?
What silent movie film star who made movies such as The Little Tramp hailed from London?
In what year was the stage musical My Fair Lady, set in turn-of-the-century London, made into a major motion picture?
When was the British Museum in Bloomsbury founded?
Which London museum is prominently located in Trafalgar Square?
How many artifacts from all over the world does the British Museum have on display?
Besides being popular tourist destinations, London's museums play a vital role in what activity?
The National Gallery was established in 1824 to accommodate and display what items?
What is the National Portrait Gallery known for housing?
London's Tate Britain and Tate Modern galleries were formerly one entity known as what?
What cultural and scientific hub was named in honor of Queen Victoria's husband?
What London museum was named for an historic Queen of England and her Prince husband?
What was the original purpose for the construction of the Tate Gallery?
What musical instrument is situated at Royal Albert Hall?
London-based EMI is a corporation focused on what industry?
In which facility is the London Symphony Orchestra based?
What are the names of London's two primary opera houses?
Royal Academy of Music and Royal College of Music are examples of what?
What famous chain of music-themed restaurants opened its first establishment in London?
In which recording studio did the Beatles do much of their recording? 
What London concert venue shares its first name with a famous football stadium?
Located in London, what is the busiest concert arena in the world?
London was a major factor in the rise of what musical genre?
Musical genres that gained popularity in London and elsewhere, such as dubstep, were based on and derived from what?
Which BBC radio station focuses primarily on black and urban music?
What rock music group led by Gavin Rossdale got its start in London's music scene?
How many royal parks are located in the center of London?
In which park is the London Zoo housed?
What royal park shares a border with its neighbor, the park known as Kensington Gardens?
What area of Regent's Park is an excellent spot to see the London skyline?
What popular tourist destination is located near Regent's Park?
What famous London gardens were named as a World Heritage Site by UNESCO in 2003?
Victoria Park is located in what London district?
What entity oversees both Hampstead Heath of North London and Epping Forest?
What former private home hosts lake-side classical music concerts ever summer?
People frequently engage in physical activities such as walking, biking, and golf, in what forest?
What river is a tributary of the River Thames?
What is the London Outer Orbital Path commonly referred as?
What walking path was created as a tribute to a member of the Royal Family who died prematurely?
What recent improvements has served to enhance the walking experience?
Which walking path follows the route of the body of water for which it is named?
What is London's most popular athletic sport?
How many of the football clubs in the Premier League are based in London?
When did the Chelsea Football Club win the UEFA Champions League title?
How many professional football clubs call London their home?
Besides the Arsenal, Chelsea, and Tottenham football clubs, how many London-based football club have won a national league titie?
What is the name of the national rugby union stadium located in South-West London?
What is the current spectator seating capacity of Twickenham Stadium?
Of the three Aviva Premiership rugby union teams in London, which ones actually play in the Greater London Area?
Where do the London Scottish and London Welch rugby teams play their home games?
What is the foundation of the United States federal government?
In the Unites States what sets out the boundaries of federal law?
What is defined as the official codification of federal statutory law?
What is compromised of many levels of codified and uncodified forms of law?
The constitution set boundaries for case law that originates from where?
What is the foundation of the U.S. federal government?
What sets out the boundries of federal law?
What two forms of law make up the laws of the United States?
What is th eofficial compilation of federal statutory law called?
What different kinds of law make up the laws of the United States?
What is the most important document in the US, setting the boundries for all other laws?
What branch of gevernment is responsible for ratifing treaties?
With branch of government deals with new regulations?
Who's responsibility is case law?
What comes before state and territorial laws in the 50 U.S states?
Federal sovereign only possess authority if it is stated in what?
States may grant their citizens border rights as long as they do not infringe on what?
Most U.S law, the kind of law we live everyday, consists of what kind of law?
Federal law overrides what laws?
The scope of federal power is not what?
What type of system is American Federalism?
American Federalism can also be considered tripartite because of the presence of what?
States can grant their people broader rights than those granted in what document?
Is there anything that trumps state law?
How many state make up the United States?
Can states grant rights to citizens that are not defined by the constitution?
What is day-to-day, operational law considered?
What is living law mostly made up of?
In order for a unconstitutional statue to disappear, it has to be deleted by?  
What has remained on the books after they were ruled unconstitutional? 
What principle  states no lower court will enforce an unconstitutional statue? 
Who can reverse an unconstitutional court ruling?
What must happen to a statute for it to become unconstitutional?
What can delete a statute and make it unconstitutional?
Some federal and state statutes remain on the books for how long after they are ruled unconstitutional?
What decisis states that no lower court will enforce an unconstitutional statute?
Any court that enforces an unconstitutional statute will be overturned by what court?
If a statute is unconstitutional, how is it removed?
What happens when an unconstitutional statute remains on the books?
What would happen if a lower court tried to enforce an unconstitutional statute?
What must happen before the Supreme Court will reverse a decision by a lower court refusing to uphold a constitutional law?
What would happen if a lower court refused to uphold a constitutional law?
The rule of liability for defective products originated from what law?
In what case did the supreme court of California, throw away warranties and strictly impose liability for defective products?
What was most influential American 20th century tort law?
What year was the case Greenman v. Yuba Power products?
What is one of the most influential changes to tort law?
Who was at the forefront of the fight to change the laws on defective products?
When was the Greenman rule in Section 402A of the Restatement (Second) of Torts published?
What case was fundamental in the fight to change warranty laws?
When was the Restatement (Second) of Torts beginning to be adopted outside of the United States?
What law covers wrongs which humans can inflict upon each other?
Why can American tort law not be easily summarized?
While attempting to standardize tort law, multiple versions of tort law have come about, what are there versions called?
What covers crimes of human against human?
What does tort law overlap with?
What is attempting to standardize the tort law system?
What is the Restatement of Torts not successfull as a whole yet?
Why is tort law hard to standardize?
A lot of American common law diverged from where?
When would American courts follow post-revolution commonwealth rulings?
Courts in commonwealth nations are often influenced by what?
Most modern American common law came from what kind of law?
Couts of commonwealth nations are often influenced by who's rulings?
What rulings do American courts rarely follow?
What is one reason American courts may follow a post Revolutionary Commonwealth ruling under what circumstances?
How close is current American law to English law?
What differs about American and English law?
When would American law be more likely to follow English law?
How close do the issues have to be in order for an English law to be used?
Reception statues are generally the same as what law?
Who sites pre-revolution cases when discussion evolution of judge-made law? 
Which US State did not  enact reception statues? 
What do reception statutes state is the law of the state?
What is the only state to not enact reception statutes?
Some reception statutes impose what?
Modern courts often cite which period in history cases when discussing changes in law?
What are reception statutes?
When are reception statutes invaild?
Where did the bulk of the US's starting laws come from?
Which is the only stste without reception statutes?
What kind of case would a contemporary lawyer discuss when talking about an ancient judge-made common law principle?
early on American courts cited what cases?
What century were apellate decisions regularly reported?
When did cotations to English decisions gradually disappear?
How many published reports of American volumes existed in 1810?
How many published reports of American volumes existed in 1910?
When did Americans really begin to establish their own laws independent of the English?
How many published volumes of American reports were released in 1810?
By 1910, how many volumes of American reports were there?
What did the lawmakers think of the increase in reports?
What were the lawmakers beginning to drown in?
What does federal law come from?
What gives Congress limited power to enact statutes?
What do you call the official compilation and codification of federal statutes?
Where are regulations published?
Where are regulations codified into?
Where does federal law begin?
Who has the power and right to enact statutes for interstate dealings?
What is the compilation and codification of all federal statutes?
Who do the statutes give the power of creating regulations?
Where are the regulations from executive branch agencies found?
What areas of the Constitution deal with issuses such as aviation, railroads, and trademarks?
In areas of law such as insurance, there are laws refusing to regulate them as long as states have laws doing what?
What type of property are trademarks and copyrights?
What governs things such as military, money, foreign relations, etc.?
What enabled federal law to begin expanding into other areas such as avaition, telecommunications, railroads, etc.?
When did the Commerce and Spending Clauses of the Constitution allow federal power to begin expanding?
What is a law enacted by Congress that states that it refuses to regulate some industries as long as the states have regulations in place already?
What happens when both the federal and state governments have regulations that overlap?
Who signs a bill into a law?
Where does a bill go after it is signed?
What is a new law given at the OFR of the NARA?
After being given a law number, a new law is prepared for publication as what?
What kind of laws are not given statutory citation by the OFR?
Where does a bill go once the President signs it into effect?
What happens after a bill is delivered to the OFR?
After a bill is assigned a number, what is it made ready for?
Once the slip laws are placed into the United States Statutes at Large, what are they called?
What is the United States Statutes at Large?
What does congress often grant to give rulemaking authority to federal agencies?
Federal agencies are authorized to make what public?
Regulations normally carry the force of what?
Regualtions carry force of law when based on reasonable interpretation of what?
What power is granted to federal agencies by Congress?
Why does Congress give generalized powers to federal agencies?
What gives regulations imposed by federal agencies the right to enforce their regulations?
What does the Principle of Chevron provide for?
What is used to determine whether federal judicial power extends to formulating binding precedent?
What is stare decisis?
Why is stare decisis a limited form of lawmaking?
Who else does stare decisis affect?
Who has noted that binding precedent did not exist when the Constitution was written?
Why were decisions not reported or recoded correctly?
What are the natural theories of law that that the English judges in the eighteenth century used?
Why could one judge reject another judges opinion?
Why would one judge reject another's opinion?
How did the federal agencies differ from their English counter-parts?
What did the missing plenary reception do?
Where do the federal courts fall?
Where is judicial power found in the original Constitution?
What does Article Three give federal agencies?
When did binding precedent become possible in the United States?
What made binding precedent a possibility?
What can invalidate the rule of law?
Why was the rule of precedent allowed?
How is a court hierarchy established?
What states that there is no general federal common law?
When was the doctrine of Erie Railroad Co. v. Tompkins put into effect?
Why can't federal courts just make up law?
When are states allowed to use plenary power?
What is a major implication of the Erie doctrine?
What are states not bound by?
What states that deference is one way only?
What does it mean when Erie states that deference is one way only?
What does each state posess?
What are the 50 states in the Union known as?
Which ranch applies, interprets, and occasionally overturns both state statutes and regulations?
What branch of government enacts state statutes?
Which branch of government promulgates state regulations?
Where are cases usually argued?
What types of cases are argued in the state courts?
How many new cases were filed in 2010?
What types of cases did federal district courts receive in 2010?
How many cases did appellate courts receice in 2010?
What makes up the law of criminal procedure?
What did the exclusionary rule provide for?
What might a suspect use to challenge their detention?
What must a police officer recite to a suspect upon arrest/
What acts cover tort damages from police brutality cases?
What is over all judicial proceedings involving private party lawsuits?
What did New York enact that replaced traditional common law proceeding?
What was code pleading ultimately replaced by?
When did code pleading get replaced by modern notice pleading?
What did the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure abolish?
Which states have not adopted FRCP?
How do New York, Illinois and California maintain civil procedure laws?
What should New York, Illinois and California be using instead of codified statutes?
What is extensive pretrial discovery a part of?
What is a pretrial deposition?
What is an opt-out class action?
What is an opt-in class action?
What is the American Rule?
What is criminal law?
What type of wrongful act will the state prosecute?
Who focuses on things such as evading payment of federal income tax, mail theft, or physical attacks on federal officials, as well as interstate crimes like drug trafficking and wire fraud?
Where are the majority of the U.S.'s crimes prosecuted?
What can result in incarceration?
What two levels of crime are there?
What is a misdemeanor?
What results in lengthy prison sentences as well as subsequent probation, large fines, and orders to pay restitution directly to victims?
What usually happens with misdemeanors?
What is a third level of crime that some states have adopted?
What is contract law?
What standardized contract law?
What kinds of agreements do contract law cover?
What portion of the government was eventually separated from government participation? 
What type of government is now established in Myanmar?
Are previous leaders a hendrence to the current government?
What major conflict is Myanmar known for?
By which name is the country called by most English speaking countries?
How is Burma officially identified in the United States 
What is the country called in sessions of the United Nations?
What does the current president of the United States call the country in official settings?
What extinct species of hominid that lived throughout most of the Pleistocene geological period is believed to have dwelled in Myanmar?
When was the extinct species believed to have lived in Myanmar?
What is the name of the civilization that is believed to be one of the oldest. 
Did any other ancient cultures also leave behind evidence of existence in Myanmar?
What form was the evidence of ancient cultures discovered in ?
By what name is the era in the 3rd millennium around 1500 BC known?
What events of significance to human development occurred during the Bronze Age ?
What event evolving animals are the Myanmar also accredited with being the first to accomplish?
When did the Age of Iron begin?
What events punctuate the beginning of the Iron Age?
What period was the first known city states established in Myanmar?
From what people have were the first records known to be existent derived from? 
Were any of the early civilizations influenced by each other and if so by what how did it occur?
What Myanmar import from other countries that has been of major importance?
What is the name of the kingdom that became dominant along the coastline of Myanmar? 
How long did it take for Myanmar to recover from the collapse of it's first kingdom ?
Did the Mongol invasions of Burma leave any lasting signs?
Who was involved merger of the smaller states into the two largest factions of Myanmar ?
Was there more than one racial class in the organized societies of the states of Myanmar?
During what age did the culture of Myanmar grow?
Who increased the spread of religious reforms in Myanmar?
Who is the monarch that has some of the most impressive built in their honor in the Myanmar
How were the Portuguese expelled from Myanmar?
Did the country have lasting monarchs?
Did the original chieftains maintain power political power?
In what year was one of the original Myanmar kingdoms restored?
What was the event called that caused  Ayutthaya  to reclaim lost territories ?
In what year did  Ayutthaya capture Lan Na  ?
What country was Burma at war with with until 1855 ?
Who managed to eventually control the territory of Arakan 
What language eventually came to power in the Irrawaddy valley ?
What was the literacy rate for the Burmese people during the big period of artistic growth?
Did changes move along at a uniform pace for the Burmese people?
What country was Burma a colony of ?
What are the kings of the Konbaung monarchy famed for in their rule?
have the Burmese people ever shown any reservations about the ruling government bodies?
What were some of problems experienced with the colonialism of Burma by the British?
How long was U Wisara on a strike were he refused subsistence ?
Was U Wisara able to survive  the protest?
Was Burma effected by the world wars?
Did the British protect Burma as its colony during WWII?
Where groups from Burma an advantage to the Allies during WWII?
How many soldiers were lost by the Japanese in Burma during WWII ?
When did the temporary Japanese rule end in Burma?
Who negotiated the agreement that Burma would be free from forgien rule ?
What is the name of the agreement that guarantee Burma's freedom from foreign rule ?
What leaders were present during the negotiations made for freedom of the Burmese people?
What position did Aung San hold in the Burmese government?
When did and how did Aung San pass away ?
What was the cause of the insurrection in the summer of 2007 ?
What was the name of the insurgency lead by Buddhist Monks?
How did the world respond to the reported acts of military violence during the Burmese revolution of 2007?
What natural disaster caused detrimental effects to the Irrawaddy section of Burma in May of 2008 ?  
What is the main crop of the delta of the Irrawaddy section of Burma?
How many people were reported missing or deceased due to the natural disaster of 2007 ?
How much was the financial cost of the damages of the 2007 natural disaster in Burma ?
Did the government of Myanmar welcome the international efforts of assistance?
In 2012 what was the the disturbance with the government running smoothly ? Burma? 
Were any religious groups involved in the scrimmages ? 
Were any terrorist groups involved in the Burmese conflicts ? 
Does al-Qaeda believe that Muslims in Burma are in danger?
What country was Burma involved with in 2015
Were there any refuges that resulted from the Burmese conflict in 2015?
What was the government of China accused of during the Kokang offensive ?
Is China an affect on the government in Burma ?
To what benefit of China has its interest in the Burmese government brought about ?
Where the elections of 2010 conducted fairly in Burma?
What is the name that Burma held before 2010? 
Why was the referendum in 2008 ?
In what direction is the government of Burma ultimately attempting to go?
What type of economy is Burma attempting to reach?
Where was  Aung San Suu Kyi confined during his imprisonment in Burma ?
What happened to the political prisoner being held in Burma ?
Are groups who represent workers allowed to express their opinions in protest in Burma?
Who raised concerns of fraud in the elections held in the Burma 2012 elections ?
Did all of the political prisoners obtain freedom due to the election in Burma of 2012 ? 
Who was expelled from Myanmar before the elections of 2012 and what position did they hold ?
Are international monitors used in the elections of Burma ?
Does the political party of Aung San Suu Ky hold any positions among the ruling faction ?
What countries surround the border that is opposite the southwest border of Burma?
How many miles of uninterrupted coastline does Burma encompass?
What is the name of the bay along the southwest coast of Burma ?
What region lays along the north border of Burma and is famed for the presence of monks ?
What industry is supported by animal labor in Burma ?
What is an important protein source  in the Burmese diet?
What animals where domesticated in Burma for industry use ?
What is note worthy about the bird population of Burma ?
Are large jungle cats part of the animal population of Burma ? 
What was the name of the winning unit in the 2010 elections in Burma ?
Were the elections held in an unbiased manner Burma in 2010 ? 
What were some of the opinions foreign advisers stated about the Burma 2010 elections ?
What was the Burmese official decision concerning the legitimacy of National League for Democracy in 2010 ?
How have international relations developed due to the recent political changes in Burma ? 
What did the United States do in response to the reform changes of the 2010 Burma elections ? 
How did the United States treat Myanmar prior to the changes made in Burmese government ? 
How are international businesses discouraged from operating in Burma?
What was the result for internationals companies attempting to conduct business in Burma ? 
Who called for the sanctions in Burma to be given reprieve ?
What did Aung San Suu Kyi become a part of in Burma ?
How do Asian countries feel about the European attitude towards Burma ?
What is a popular business for international Asian countries in Burma ?
What two countries does Burma have Superior relationships with ?
What is the benefit to the two countries involved in the  India Look East policy ?
Why did India stop supporting the military in Myanmar in 2008 ?
Did the military sanctions imposed by India affect the business workings of it's relations in Burma ?
Who helped to improve the relations between India and Burma?
What city in Burma was visited by the envoy from India 
What country has provided Burma with the most military aid ?
How long has Burma participated in the group ASEAN ?
What year was Myanmar the host for the ASEAN conference?
What event caused tension between Burma and Bangladesh in 2008 ?
What is the name of the military in Burma ?
How large is the military of Burma ? 
Which traditional branches of the military does Burma have?
What ranking does Burma hold for the number of troops currently serving on active military duty ?
What did the United adopt in reference to Burma annually until 2005 ?
What occurred in the United Nations general convening in 2006 ?
What did China and Russia both do in 2008 ?
What other countries were in disagreement with the United Nations decision on Burma ?
What is the general view of Burma ?
Who is Samantha Power?
What did Ms Powers write concerning Burma ?
What are the names of some of the  human right organizations that have been involved in Burmese relations. 
In 2011 what did the group Freedom House say concerning the Burma military?
How many prisoners are still held in Burma on political crimes?
How are children used in the conflicts in Burma?
How are children obtained for use as solders in Burma ? 
How many child solders were released from the Burmese military in 2012 ?
Has the violence in Burma decreased over the years as the country has tried made democratic strides ?
Are the separate religious factions in Burma able to peacefully coexist ?
What news company  discovered visual evidence of the disdain exhibited by civil employees and civilians in Burma ?
Who recorded the visual evidence on the disdainful incident?
What was believed to be one of the Burma reasons for the unrest in 2012 ?
How many are believed to have been uprooted by this unrest ?
Who is the president of the BROUK's UK division?
How many people where missing after the 2012 Burma civil unrest ?
What have the military and law enforcement been denounced for in the matter of  summer of 2012 ?
How have the friar organizations contributed to the struggle in Burma?
What happened in Rakhine in the summer of 2012 that had severe implications on the running of the location?
How did the Burmese government respond to the unrest in 2012 ?
What is the name of the individuals who gave relevant information on the recent events in Burma ?
Have there been any advances in the human rights situation in Myanmar?
What is the current rating of for Burma from the  Freedom in the World report and what caused the current standing ?
What caused Myanmar to receive a rating of 6?
What was the previous rating for Burma?
What did the government bring together ?
Once the decision was made to bring the group together who was it comprised of ?
Has the joining brought about any changes in the region ?
Who extended the offer to the activists ?
Who addressed the United nations on Myanmar's behalf in the fall 2011 ?
Has the government of Myanmar made life any easier for it's inhabitants ?
Does the government allow access to any desired  media channels for residents ?
Are there any groups who are able to effectively operate in Burma ?
What official was the first to visit the grounds of Great Britain from Burma?
Who did the official from Myanmar meet with ?
What was the outcome of the meeting ?
Where did the official make his announcement of the meetings outcome ?
What would the official like to see happen between the two countries ?
In terms of finance, when being ruled by the English, where did Burma stand ?
What was Burma's greatest export during that time of English rule ?
What did Myanmar do that made it know to be one of the originals in a particular finance producing endeavor ?
What wood product was produced primarily in Myanmar during British rule ?
What notable quality made Burma stand out from other South East Asian countries ?
How did world war two affect Burmese business and economy ?
How was the Burma framework affected by WWII ?
What lead to the architectural changes in Myanmar ?
Who was credited with changes that occurred to the interior due to the war's effects ?
When was Myanmar given sovereignty to rule it's own nation ?
What is the major farming production crop in Burma? 
What percentage of  the countries's farm-able land is used for the major farming production crop in Burma? 
What category does the major farming production crop in Burma fall into ? 
How is production in the category tallied ?
How many novel types of this crop did Burma develop as of 1997 ?
What is the difficulty with expanding the gem business in Burma ?
Why is Burma experiencing this problem with the gems industry  ?
Who gave information on the gem industries in Burma ?
What did the group advised based on the information's results ?
Who receives the majority of financial benefits from the gem mining ? 
Name two of the metropolitan areas that are enjoyed most frequently by tourist in Myanmar  ?
What are two of the top spiritual destination that Myanmar offers ?
Does Myanmar offer any destinations  that might be good for outside enthusiasts ?
Are there any edifice points of interest that may be of note to visitors of Burma?
Can visitors travel unrestricted through the country ?
Can one travel by plane from any country in Myanmar ?
Is there anyway to decrease travel time in getting to Myanmar ?
Has the travel industry considered making changes to fight plans for Myanmar ?
What occurred in the winter of 2014 of significance for Myanmar ?
What is the name of the business that first rang a bell to begin in the winter of 2014 in Myanmar ?
W is set to to be the major stock holder of the business that first rang a bell to begin in the winter of 2014 in Myanmar ?
Did other countries actively participate in business that first rang a bell to begin in the winter of 2014 in Myanmar ?
What day did the business that first rang a bell to begin in the winter of 2014 in Myanmar open its doors to customers?
How many are estimated people live in Burma officially?
Who may have been left out of the 2014 census in Burma ?
How many people in Burma are currently using a work visa for Thailand?
How many of the Burmese  people are predicted to work in Thailand without authorization 
What percentage of emigrant workers in Thailand that are from Myanmar ?
What percentage of people in Burma are related by linguistically lines to the Khmer. 
Which community previously held a persuasive authority on the Burmese population?
When did a mass migration of the community that  previously held a persuasive authority on the Burmese population start?
Where did the majority of these people end up after Burma ?
What is the matriarchal brogue of Burma that became the countries' standard vernacular ?
Which two vernaculars hold relation to the official language?
How is the recognized official language of Burma displayed ? 
On what is the visual display of the language a subset of  ? 
From when are the  first impressions of the visually displayed language ?
Does Burma have more than one religion ?
Are public displays allowed for the celebration of religion in Myanmar ?
Are all welcomed to practice faith openly in Burma 
Can anyone in Burma Join the military forces in Burma ?
What are the best routes for career achievement in Burma ?
What part of the populace does not  identify with conformists religious  majority?
Are these percentages an accurate estimate of nonconformists religious  groups ?
How many dwelling are dedicated to the worship of the faith Jehovah's Witnesses ?
How many dialects are the publications distributed by the Jehovah Witness available in ?
What problem presented itself to the Jewish locale in Rangoon ?
Who runs the school system in Myanmar ?
What country is Burma to credit for its academic system ?
Why is this country so influential to the Burma academics ?
Are there any alternatives to the public school system in Burma ?
Are children required to go to school or can they choose to stay at home and work ?
What are the pervasive culture that is sanctioned in Burma ?
Have these cultures developed on there own over time ?
What type of effect did Theravada Buddhism.have on Bamar?
What evidence of previous rule is evident in the buildings in Burma ?
What part of the Burmese population is considered not a part of the mainstream group?
What is the name of the group that reported the information regarding the populace in Burma ?
What is the time-honored dish served for the morning meal in Burma ?
What is most commonly enjoyed to eat along the coast of Myanmar ?
Where is the most chicken enjoyed in Burma ?
What is considered as an alternative to tofu for the valuable ingredient it holds for those not living near water in BUrma?
Which group originated as a national and religious group in the Middle East during the second millennium BCE, in the part of the Levant known as the Land of Israel?
Who consolidated their hold with the emergence of the Kingdom of Israel, and the kingdom of Judah?
What were incoming nomadic groups known as?
When did Jews originate as a national and religious group in the Middle East?
What appears to confirm the existence of a people of Israel?
What percentage of Jews reside in Israel?
What percentage of Jews reside in the U.S.?
How many Jews live in Europe?
How many Jews live in Canada?
What is one reason the world population of Jews difficult to determine?
Name one person that Jewish ancestry traced back to?
Where did Jacob and his family migrate to?
Who led the Exodus?
Who was Jacob's son?
Who was Joseph's father?
What group was divided into Twelve Tribes?
When was the Kingdom of Israel conquered by the Neo-Assyrian Empire?
From where do the Jews derive their ethonynm?
Genetic studies show that Jews bear their strongest resemblance to the peoples of where?
How far back does the Jews' shared common genetic pool date?
Most Jews share a common genetic heritage that originates from what place?
What book is considered a religious interpretation of the traditions and early national history of the Jews?
What religions are now practiced by 54% of the world?
What is the Hebrew Bible?
In modern secular usage Jews include how many groups?
What makes the definition of a Jew vary slightly? 
Which religion shares some characteristics of a nation, an ethnicity, a religion and a culture?
Who believed the status of the offspring of mixed marriages was determined patrilineally in the Bible?
What dictated that when a parent could not contract a legal marriage, offspring would follow the mother?
What is one explanation for the change in Mishnaic times?
What is a tax imposed on Jews in 70 CE?
When did the FIscus Judaicus relax to exclude Christians?
Name one reason historians believe the conversion during the Roman era was limited in number and did not account for much of the Jewish population growth?
What resulted in effective and long-term isolation of Jewish communities?
Name one way Jewish cultural expressions differ in each community?
Name another way Jewish cultural expressions differ in each community?
Name one major group that Jews are often identified as belonging to.
Name another major group that Jews are often identified as belonging to?
What does Ashkenaz mean in Hebrew?
What is the more common term in Israel for many of those broadly called Sephardim?
What does Mizrach mean in Hebrew?
In modern usage, why is Mizrahim sometimes termed Sephardi?
When did the expulsion of Jews from Spain and Portugal occur?
Where are the Teimanim from?
What group of Jews represent the bulk of modern Jewry?
Which group represents at least 70% of Jews worldwide?
Why does Ashkenazim represent the overwhelming majority of Jews in the New World continents?
In what country does the immigration of Jews from Algeria (Sephardim) has led them to outnumber the Ashkenazim?
What is the liturgical language of Judaism?
What is also termed lason ha-kodesh, "the holy tongue?"
What are the two languages of the Babylonian Talmud?
What are the Hebrew scriptures called?
What is a closely related tongue to Hebrew?
What language is spoken by more Jews in history than any other language?
North Africans continue to use what language as their mother tongue?
What are the three most commonly spoken languages among Jews today?
South African Jews adopted which language?
Which language has by and far superseded most Jewish vernaculars?
Ashkenazi Jews share more common paternal lineages with what group?
Jewish traditions place most Jewish paternal origins in which region?
Which lineages are generally more heterogeneous?
What looks at the entire DNA mixture?
What has become increasingly important as the technology deveops?
Mizrahi Jews show evidence of admixture with whom?
What are Sephardic Bnei Anusim?
Who are descendants of the "anusim" forced converts to Catholicism?
What percentage of Iberians are Sephardic Bnei Anusim?
What years did the Jewish population rise from 800,000 to two million?
What is the population of Israel?
Between 1974 and 1979, how many immigrants arrived in Israel?
More than half of the Jews live where?
How many Jews live in Canada?
How many Jews live in Argentina?
How many Jews live in Brazil?
Where is Western Europe's largest Jewish community?
How many Jews live in France?
What is the population of Jews in the United Kingdom?
When did the advent of the Jewish Enlightenment occur?
What was a result of the Jewish Enlightenment?
Name a Jewish community that disappeared entirely?
What is the rate of interreligious marriage in the United States?
What is the rate of interreligious marriage in the United Kingdom?
What is the rate of interreligious marriage in France?
What is the rate of interreligious marriage in Mexico?
What is the rate of interreligious marriage in Australia?
When did the Papal States exist?
In the Papal States, what is the name for the specified neighborhoods where Jews were required to live?
What promoted hatred of Jews because of their descent?
What were Jews and Christians living in Muslim lands known as?
What is the per capita tax imposed on free adult non-Muslim males known as?
What was the disability described by Bernard Lewis as "most degrading?"
Which group had an inferior status under Islamic rule?
What were walled quarters known as?
Who was forced into confinement in mellahs?
When did the confinement of Moroccan Jews in mellahs begin?
What is one method used to prevent intermarriage?
What is the trend for secular Jews to become more religiously observant known as?
Who leads the movement that pursues secular Jews in order to give them stronger Jewish identity?
What is the most frequent use of cotton?
To what date has cotton been dated?
Where in India has cotton been found from prehistoric times?
In what Central American country has cotton use been found from early times?
What machinery has lead to the  easily made and widespread use of cotton?
Where in Southeast Asia has early use of cotton been discovered?
To what period has cotton been dated in Pakistan?
When did the Indus Valley Civilization cover parts of India and Pakistan?
Until what event did the ancient methods of spinning and fabrication of cotton last?
During what time did cotton become widely used in India?
Use of cotton in Iran dates back to what period?
When was the Achaemenid era?
In what source can references to cotton be found in Iran?
What 13th century explorer saw cotton in Persia?
What Frenchman in the 17th century noted cotton farming in Persia?
When did cotton begin to be commercially grown in Egypt?
What French businessman convinced the ruler of Egypt to grow cotton for the French market?
Who was ruler of Egypt in the 1820s?
How high had cotton revenues risen by the time of the American Civil War?
How many bales of cotton were produced by Egypt by 1903?
In the late medieval period in Europe as what was cotton viewed?
What 1350 writer stated that cotton was produced by sheep that grew on trees?
What ancient writer gave later eras the idea that cotton might be a tree?
By the end of what century was cotton grown in the Americas and Asia?
Why was it easy for people to believe that cotton grew on sheep that grew in plants?
How did British rule effect Indian cotton processing?
During what centuries did British rule effect Indian cotton production?
What British business's policies damaged the Indian cotton industry?
What cotton products did British law mandate that India was allowed to sell?
If instead of producing fabrics, where was India forced to purchase cotton products?
What event produced an expansion of the British cotton industry?
When was a new spinning machine patented that boosted cotton production?
What device did James Hargreaves invent?
What was Samuel Crompton's invention of 1775?
Whic British city was nicknamed "Cottonopolis" because of its cotton production?
What invention improved the cotton industry in both America and Britain?
What American invented the cotton gin?
Before the use of the cotton gin, how was cotton separated?
What business development did the British use to establish a hold on the global cotton market?
From what source was raw cotton first bought and later resold?
What was the difference that made American cotton preferred over Indian cotton?
In the 1840s, what country could no longer adequately supply the British cotton mills?
Besides buying from the American plantations, where else in the western hemisphere did Britain buy cotton?
By what time had cotton become prominent in the American economy of the south?
What was cotton called in the 19th century?
What action of the Union damaged the southern cotton exports?
When did the American cotton industry fail?
To what county's cotton did European buyers turn due to the American Civil War?
What characteristic of American cotton attracted buyers after the end of the Civil war?
What did the abandonment of Egyptian cotton mean to the Egyptian economy?
What was the procedure called which involved workers to work for a share of the profits? 
What difficulty in harvesting cotton required a large labor force?
Besides adults what segment of the southern US population was involved in the harvesting of cotton?
What function of southern schools was created for children to pick cotton?
What part of the southern population worked as sharecroppers?
What is the optimum amount of rainfall for cotton growth?
In what soil type does cotton prefer to grow ?
Why is cotton grown as an annual crop?
Where in the US is considered the best place to grow cotton on Earth?
What type of tolerances make cotton an ideal crop for semiarid areas?
To stop reliance on what was GM cotton developed?
What form of cotton is GM?
What bacterium is used to produced GM cotton?
What farming pest management technique does the use of GM grown plants promote?
What part of the life cycle of moths does Bt toxin effect?
In what year did a research study find that the use of Bt toxin plants failed to be effective after 7 years?
On what did a 2009 study conclude that increased insects were dependent?
What did a 2012 study suggest  was halved by the use of GM plants?
What did the 2012 study say was doubled by the use of GM cotton?
How much of the Earth's cotton crops are planted in GM cotton?
What are organic plants understood to be?
Without what are organic plants meant to be grown ? 
What is meant by synthetic chemicals?
What group in the US determines the allowed practices in organic agriculture?
How much organic cotton was produced worldwide in 2007?
What insect is the most destructive pest in cotton growing in the US?
What program has effectively eliminated the boll weevil in the US?
What is the organization that instigated the Boll Weevil Eradication Program?
What form of cotton contains a genetically modified gene?
How is most cotton harvested?
What is the cotton harvesting machine that removes the boll with damaging the plant?
What machine strips off the entire head of the cotton plant?
What weather conditions mandate the planting of stripper types of cotton?
What type of plant is cotton?
What was the first manufactured fiber?
When was rayon first made in France?
What type of industry produced a growing chain of synthetic fibers?
What company produced nylon and acrylic in the 1930s and 1940s?
What was manufactured completely from petrochemicals?
What prompted a help program produced by cotton producers in the 1960s?
What law was passed in 1966 to aid cotton producers?
What type of competitors does the 1966 act help combat?
Where has the Cotton Research and Promotion Act made cotton the best selling fiber?
What did producers of cotton have to re-establish after the market declined?
For what is cotton used to make?
Besides new cotton fibers, what type of fibers can be used to make cotton products?
With what is cotton often blended to make a new style of fabric?
What kinds of fabrics can be made from blended fibers?
For what can cotton yarn be used?
For what is cottonseed used after it is separate from the fibers?
What product is processed cottonseed oil?
What is cottonseed meal used for feed?
For what purpose are cottonseed hulls used in feed?
As what did early scientists describe gossypol ?
What is a fine, tightly twisted type of cotton fabric?
What is lisle considered to be as a fabric?
What does extra twisting of lisle thread produce?
Where was the lisle thread originally made?
How is color perceived to be for lisle in comparison to softer yarns? 
In 2009 what were the largest producers of cotton?
How do the US and Africa rank as exporters of cotton?
What is the combined international trade in cotton?
What company is the top cotton broker in Africa?
Where is Dunavant Enterprises based?
How many subsidized cotton growers are in the US?
What is the rate of subsidies of cotton growers in the US?
What country provides the highest rate of support for cotton growers?
Which former colonies still have tight monopolies on cotton brokering?
Where in Africa is it possible to buy out brokerages in cotton?
What type of labor have some countries come under fire for employing?
What usage that causes worker damage have some countries been reported doing? 
What country has been accused of forced child and adult labor?
Where does Uzbekistan rank as a cotton exporter?
What system was started in 2005 to deal with organic and ethically produced products?
What is the final sequencing goal of sequencing diploid cotton genomes first ?
What type of cotton has two separate genomes within its nucleus? 
When did a group of researchers decide to sequence the genomic structure of tetraploid cotton?
What type of genome must be sequenced first to prevent confusion before the tetraploid form?
In order to understand the tetraploid forms, what must be used as a comparison in cotton gene sequencing?
What companies finished much of the sequencing of the D genome?
When was the sequencing of D genome of G.  raimondii mostly completed?
What did Monsanto and Illumina say they would do with the research?
What is the seeming result of donating genetic cotton sequencing to the public?
What plants are the goal of sequencing wild forms of cotton?
What involves encoding information using fewer bits than the original representation?
What can be either lossy or lossless?
What reduces bits by identifying and eliminating statistical redundancy? 
What is the process called of reducing the size of a data file?
What is the process called of encoding at the source of the data before it's processed?
What usually exploits statistical redundancy?
What represents statistical redundancy?
What may have colors that do not change over several pixels?
What can be paired with an algorithm called arithmetic coding?
What can achieve superior compression?
What uses an internal memory state?
What type of data compression is the converse of lossless date data compression?
What can save storage space?
What helps by eliminating off nonessential bits of information?
What is used for CD ripping?
What methods are used to remove non-audible components of audio signals?
What compression is usually performed with even more specialized techniques?
What is used in internet telephony? 
What is encoded by audio players?
What is Machine learning closely related to?
What type of compressor can be used for prediction?
What has been used as a benchmark for "general intelligence"?
What can be looked at as a special case of data differencing? 
What is made up of producing a difference given a source and a target?
What can classified as data differencing with empty source data?
What has the potential to reduce the transmission bandwidth and storage requirements of audio data?
What is inserted in software as audio codecs?
What compression algorithms provide higher compression at the cost of fidelity?
What compression is used in a lot of applications?
What is used in most video DVDs?
What compression usually achieves far greater compression then lossless? 
What is the coding called that is used with speech?
What is thought of as a basic perceptual coding technique?
What uses a model of the sound's generator? 
What results from methods used to encode and decode data?
What analyzes a statement of data to boost performance?
What creates segments called a "frame"?
What refers to the number of samples that must be analysed before a block of audio is processed?
What has zero samples in a minimum case?
What often has low latencies?
What varies with time?
What has to be compressed in order to perform properly? 
What does "A/D" stand for?
What was published in the IEEE Journal in 1988?
What did the literature compendium document?
Where were most of the authors in the JSAC edition?
Who developed the first commercial broadcast automation audio compression system?
Who was an engineering professor at the University of Buenos Aires?
What was launched in 1987 under the name Audicom?
What all mostly use lossy compression?
What requires a high data rate?
What may present visible or distracting artifacts?
What compression typically operate on square-shaped groups of pixels?
What only sends the differences within those pixels and blocks?
What does high-frequency detail lead to?
What may be represented as a series of still image frames?
What can average a color across similar areas to reduce space?
What is hard to tell with smaller differences involved?
What still remains much shorter than intraframe compression?
What happens when a frame contains areas where nothing has moved?
What is a sequence that can be edited?
What copies data from one frame to another?
What is a type of video format?
What is almost as easy as editing uncompressed video?
What do all commonly used video compression methods use?
What does a DCT do?
What is not used in practical products? 
Which newspaper overtook The Sun as largest Saturday UK newspaper?
What was the sun's circulation per day in March 2014?
What was the largest demographic for readers of The Sun?
What is the percentage of The Sun readers who are women?
What is one controversial event covered by The Sun?
Which newspaper did the The Sun on Sunday take the place of?
In what year was The Sun's look changed?
What was the circulation of The Sun on Sunday in March 2014?
When did the Sunday Mail overtake The Sun in sales numbers?
When is the weekly Mail forecast to pass The Sun in terms of circulation?
What position did Larry Lamb take with the Sun?
What type of view did Lamb have of the Mirror?
What did Lamb and Murdoch believe to be the best indicator of newspaper quality?
What position did Lamb formerly hold at the Mirror?
How many reporters did Lamb hire for the Mirror's initial staff?
What were the Sun's political leanings early on under Murdoch?
Who led the Labour Party in the 1970 General Election?
Who did the Sun support in 1974?
Who would the Sun consider supporting from the Labour Party in 1974?
What type of politician did a Sun editorial state that it would support in October 1974?
What newspaper was founded by Express Newspaper?
By what year had The Daily Star started impacting The Sun's sales?
What helped the Sun overcome the Daily Star's challenge?
Who became editor of the Sun in 1981?
What impact was Mackenzie said to have?
What was the Sun's headline on 4 May 1982?
Which Argentine ship was torpedoed?
Why did The Sun change the wording of the headline?
Which reporter saw copies of The Sun being thrown into the ocean?
What ship were copies of The Sun thrown from?
Which ship was the target of Argentinian aggression?
Which newspapers were highly critical of The Sun's war reporting?
Who was lead writer of The Sun?
Who was the BBC's defense correspondent?
What was the accusation leveled by Ronald Spark against The Daily Mirror, The Guardian, and BBC?
Who did The Sun say was not fit to be Prime Minister in 1983?
Which party was The Sun accused of covering maliciously?
Who did The Sun support in the 1984 U.S. presidential election?
How old would Ronald Reagan turn soon after he began his second term as U.S. president?
What did the headline read that was run with Michael Foot's photo?
How did Murdoch describe critics of his newspaper?
What did Murdoch and Mackenzie say in defense of The Sun?
Who is one critic of The Sun?
What was the focus of Pilger's reporting in one issue of The Daily Mirror?
What distinction does one single edition of The Daily Mirror hold?
Who wrote Max Clifford: Read All About It?
Who was writing a book with McCaffrey?
Who was previously Starr's public relations agent?
How did attention from the story impact Starr's career?
What was the name of Starr's autobiography?
What did Piers Morgan offer opinions about in a late 1980s column?
Which papers did Morgan serve as editor of?
Which BBC show's homosexual kiss did The Sun report on?
Who shared the first homosexual kiss on EastEnders?
Which column did Piers Morgan edit at The Sun?
What did critics believe about The Sun and Lord Kilbracken's ideas on AIDS?
What did Lord Kilbracken think of The Sun's editorial?
Who criticized The Sun for its reporting on AIDS and HIV?
What did David Randall say about the Sun's AIDS story?
In what textbook did David Randall write his opinion?
Where did The sun lose a large portion of its daily sales as a result of the front page?
What were the estimated daily sales in Liverpool 25 years later?
What documentary aired in 2008?
What do many Liverpool residents do with the paper even if given to them free?
What name have Liverpool residents given to The Sun?
Which footballer was verbally attacked in Liverpool? 
What team did Rooney transfer to?
What was Rooney's age at the time of the Hillsborough disaster?
Who was managing editor of The Sun in 2005?
How did Dudman describe The Sun's Hillsborough coverage?
What types of policies did The Sun support?
What is an example of a Thatcherite policy?
What was The Sun's stance toward the EU?
What's another thing the paper showed hostility to?
What was The Sun's initial stance toward the closures?
Who did The Sun declare political endorsement of in 1997?
Who became Prime Minister in 1997?
Which New Labour policies did The Sun oppose?
How did The Sun describe John Major's Conservatives?
Who greatly changed the image of the Labour party?
What allegation did the government level against The Sun in 2003?
Who specifically leveled the allegations against The Sun?
What did a 4 July 2003 front page story claim?
From which issue did claims that The Sun was racist stem?
Who did The Sun print pictures of in a Nazi outfit in 2005?
Who did The Sun endorse in the 2005 general election?
What is one of the weaknesses The Sun thought Blair possessed?
Who was leading the Conservatives at this time?
What did Blair state about the 2005 election?
What was the result of the 2005 election?
What was the subject of the front page on 22 September 2003?
Who was featured in the article on mental health?
What was the original headline on 22 September 2003?
What was the headline changed to after public backlash?
What had happened to Frank Bruno to spur the publishing of a story about him?
Which two nations has The Sun been very antagonistic towards?
What names were used by The Sun to characterize the French and Germans?
What is the paper's stance on the EU?
How was French president Jacques Chirac described by The Sun?
Which German chancellor was criticized by The Sun?
What type of forum was the subject of a January 2009 front page story in The Sun?
Who was said to be targeted in The Sun's front page story?
What magazine refuted the claims made by The Sun in its article about the forum?
According to Private Eye who was the only forum member expressing wishes for a hate campaign?
Complaints to which body led to The Sun removing the story from its website?
What was the claimed target of a terrorist attack according to a late 2010 Sun front page story?
What was the television program that would have been affected by the attack?
What did the Manchester police say about these claimed attacks?
Who negotiated an apology from The Sun for its misreporting of this story?
Who was responsible for the 2011 Norway attacks?
Who followed Tony Blair as Prime Minister?
Who was the Conservative leader that The Sun often supported?
What is the name of the company that operates The Sun?
What was the House of Lords Select Committee on Communications investigating in 2007?
On which issues did Murdoch claim he exerted editorial control?
Who did The Sun advocate for the 2010 election?
What did The Sun fear would result from election of the Labour Party?
What was the outcome of the general election?
Which party came to power after the election?
Who did David Cameron align with in order to become Prime Minister?
Why were former Sun staff members put in police custody in early 2012?
What was the charge against those arrested?
What greater scandal was this investigation a part of?
Which Sun staffers were arrested?
What role had Graham Dudman taken after serving as The Sun managing editor?
Who were the main leaders of the ruling party?
Who criticized Milliband for posing with a copy of The Sun showing the Hillsborough disaster?
How did Milliband explain posing with this newspaper?
Who was the Labour Mayour of Liverpool?
What emotion did many people feel over The Sun's coverage of Hillsborough?
How did the case against Tulisa fare?
What did the judge in the case state?
What type of drugs was Tulisa accused of supplying?
What action did The Sun take against Mahmood?
When was the case against Tulisa tried?
What did The Irish Sun stop doing in 2013?
What was stated to be the last edition of the regular Sun to publish topless models?
Which newspaper claimed that The Sun stopped featuring topless models in 2013?
What happened on 22 January 2015?
What did The Sun's Head of PR say about the reported editorial change at The Sun?
Which Sun columnist made controversial remarks about migrants to Britain in April 2015?
What terms did Katie Hopkins use to describe migrants to Britain?
Which organization sharply rebuked Hopkins' comments?
Who was the High Commissioner of the United Nations High Commission for Human Rights?
What did Hussein compare Hopkins' remarks to?
What is an often used term for British withdrawal from the European Union?
Who did The Sun say was in favor of British withdrawal from the European Union?
Where was Queen Elizabeth II said to have made critical remarks about the European Union?
Who refuted the statement that the Queen was critical of the European Union?
With whom was a complaint lodged alleging breach of guidelines in accuracy after the incident involving Queen Elizabeth II?
When does Fastelavn occur?
The Philippines stopped celebrating Carnival after what year? 
Maslenitsa is celebrated in what type of nation?
What is the Carnival celebration known as in Lutheran countries?
When does Carnival typically begin in the Netherlands?
The term Carnival is very common in areas with a large presence of which religious sect?
What country no longer celebrates Carnival?
The Manila Carnival was dissolved after what year?
What is the Carnival known as in countries which are mostly Lutheran?
What is the name of the festival celebrated in Eastern Orthodox nations during the last week before Great Lent?
What does vastenavond mean?
What month was the livestock typically slaughtered?
A carnival feast is the last time to do what before winter?
Why were the winter stores of lard and meat eaten before fasting?
Why was the carnival feast typically the last opportunity to eat well?
What was one limited to during the winter?
Why would all the remaining stores of lard, butter and meat left at vastenavond be eaten?
What does "vastenavond" mean?
When would new food sources be available for those who survived the winter?
Whose effigy was placed on a ship on wheels?
What type of tribe celebrated daylight returning?
What season did fertility typically return?
What typically accompanied the effigy of Nerthus? 
What typically happened aboard the ship on wheels?
What did a bunch of Germanic tribes celebrate?
How was the ship carrying a predominant deity moved around during the jubilee?
Why was the winter driven out?
What is Nerthus the goddess of?
How would the marriage of a man and woman on the ship serve as a fertility ritual?
What's the name of the Christian festive season that occurs before the season of Lent?
When do the main events of the Christian festival occur?
Who is the Carnival open to?
What do participants of the Carnival experience a heightened sense of?
What is consumed in excessive amounts during Lent?
What desires were expected to be suppressed during the fasting period?
All rich food and drink were consumed before what named event?
The giant celebration that involved the whole community is thought to be the origin of what festivity?
How long is the Lenten period of the Liturgical calendar?
What type of rich foods did people refrain from eating during Lent?
What was one of the festivals sanctioned by the church?
Carnival was also a result of what area's folk culture?
How many days is Jesus traditionally said to have fasted in the desert?
What pagan midwinter festival did the church find easier to subvert than eliminate?
Why were multiple holidays seized by the Catholic population?
In what year did the synod in Leptines rant against the excesses of the festival?
In what month did the excesses occur?
What type of books from around 800 contain more information of people's traditions during this period?
What was it a sin with no small penance to dress up as?
What would some people in Spain go out disguised as?
Many Carnival traditions form an integral part of whose calendar?
What two ancient Roman festivals is Carnival thought to stem from?
The Saturnalia is potentially based on what Greek festival?
On which month and day did Saturnalia start?
What happened to the men and women chosen to represent the Lord of Misrule?
What is the only state in India in which Carnival is celebrated?
What does the Indian word "Intruz" mean?
The largest Carnival celebration takes place in which city?
What is eaten on Fat Tuesday to partake in the celebration?
What legendary king eventually takes over the state?
What do some Belgian cities hold during Lent?
What Carnival takes place on Laetare Sunday?
What group of participants attack bystanders with confetti and dried pig bladders?
What day does the town of Halle engage in its celebration?
What's the name of Belgium's oldest parade? 
How long has Carnival been celebrated?
Under whose rule was Carnival established in the 16th century?
Dionysus was a deity in whose tradition? 
In what century did the Carnival become an organized event?
What city almost exclusively celebrates the Carnival?
How many parades take place during Carnival?
Who rides through the city on a carriage?
Which of the festivals is comprised of participants who are mainly children?
What do people walk along the town's longest avenue in?
Who are the last two parades open for participation by?
What countryside has multiple groups and individuals in disguise?
Kurent is monstrous and demon-like, but also what?
Where is the most significant Slovenian festival held?
Who are magical creatures from another world?
What do the Kurents try to banish?
Who oversees the period of reckless behavior?
What is the ritual procession through the town to call everyone to attendance called?
Fat Thursday is also known as what day?
Who is typically burned on a pyre?
When may conventional social rules be broken?
What do the events of Tarragona start with?
On what day does the main parade take place?
What are the clothing of the Carnival groups full of?
Who has one of the most complete ritual agendas?
About how many people are members of the various parade groups?
What contagiously throbs during the week of events?
How long does Aruba's biggest celebration last?
What type of costumes play a central role in the Queen elections?
What continues in various districts throughout the month of the Carnival?
When is King Mom symbolically burnt?
What is the Carnival known as in Barbados?
Where did the festival in Barbados originate from?
What year did Crop Over begin?
What activity is done using a greased pole?
What is the finale of Crop Over called?
What's the name of the vehicle where the musicians play?
What do devotees follow during a particular religious celebration?
Who are usually included the group comparsa?
What is used in some of the festive fights?
What is the goal of the Carnival painters?
When does  Dirty Mas take place on the Monday before Ash Wednesday?
What do the costumes worn by the revelers pun about?
What is "Clean Mud"?
What are "jab-jabs"?
How are the King and Queen of J'ouvert chosen?
On what day is full costume worn?
What is usually worn on the feet to compliment the costumes?
What does each band base their costume presentation on?
What do the mas bands eventually converge on?
Who gets to be crowned Road March King or Queen?
What does Mardi Gras translate to in French?
Where was Mardi Gras first celebrated?
What originated in the onetime French colonial capitals?
What has been part of the celebrations for many years?
Washington, D.C. and Galveston, Texas are some major American cities which have what?
Which borough of New York City is Carnival celebrated in?
What American holiday is Carnival celebrated on?
What country has one of the largest Caribbean Carnivals?
Over how many people typically attend New York's version of the Carnival?
What neighborhood as the privilege of bearing the brunt of the festivities?
What does the Peruvian Carnival incorporate elements of?
Why are the festivals in Peru held when they are?
When did the festivities acquire their violent tendencies?
What is an element of Peruvian's Carnival not found in any other country's celebrations?
How many years in prison can someone expect for being violent during the fun and games?
How many days does the Carnival in Uruguay last for?
What parade style does Uruguay's festival ape?
What were the stylistic elements of the parade imported with in colonial times?
What are the main attractions of the Uruguayan Carnival?
What is summoned by the Desfile de Llamadas parade?
What are built in many places through the cities?
What do the different Carnival groups perform together?
What do the topics of the shows put on at the tablados typically relate to?
What type of rhythmic figures are performed by the drummers playing the tamboril?
What sort of touch do the vedettes provide to the parades?
What is the difference between a pesticide and a plant protection product?
What is the purpose of a pesticide?
What are pesticides most commonly used for?
What can pesticides protect plants from?
What item commonly used in hospitals, schools and offices is a pesticide?
What are three pests pesticides target?
Are pesticides chemical or biological agents?
What are possible cons of pesticides?
What are pesticides meant to prevent?
What is one way to group pesticides?
Give three examples of target organisms of pesticides.
What are the two types of biopesticides?
Which type of pesticides have seen rapid growth in development?
What is one way you could group pesticides?
What is the main way that peticides perform their function?
In which direction do systemic pesticide generally travel through a plant?
Which parts of a plant do systemic pesticides generally attack?
Pesticides can be used to stop the spread of what dieseases?
What sort of pesticides would you find in ponds and lakes?
Which agency regulates safety of pesticides in the US?
Which agency regulates safety of pesticides in Canada?
What kind of pesticide is DDT?
Why have DDTs been banned in some areas?
Is DDT 100% guaranteed to work?
How may species have been found to be resistant to DDT?
What do monetary savings in crops from the use of pesticide amount to?
What amount is spent annualoy on pesticides?
How are consumers able to benefit from saved crops?
In which area do pesticides creat jobs?
How is the health of the general publis affected by pesticides?
Can pesticides have a serious effect on people?
What is one of the most serious effects of exposure to pesticides?
What is thought to possibly cause neurobehavioral alterations?
How many workers in agriculture die a year from severly poisining pesticides in developing countries?
What careers put people in danger of being exposed to pesticide poisining?
In developing countries, how many workers are exposed to mild pesticide poisining?
Why are 99% of pesticide related deaths in underdeveloped countries?
What pecentage of sprayed pesticides affect the wrong species?
What is affected when pesticides don't reach their target?
What is it called when pesticides are caught in the wind and carried to unintended areas?
Pesticides contribute to what sort of pollution?
What is the effect of pesticide drift?
Why are hydrocarbon pesticides not excreted?
How are levels of pesticides higher going up the food chain?
The movement of pesticides from wawrme to cooler climates is called what?
How could pesticides travel over hundreds of miles?
What feature is wanted to assist with reducing negative impacts of pesticides?
How else can negative impacts of pesticides be reduced?
What is one way by which pesticides lose their efficacy?
What may slow pesticide movement?
What is one thing that can be used in place of pesticides?
What natural product can be used to control pests?
Why are alternative methods of pest control gaining popularity?
What agency has offered acceptance of safer pesticides?
What is one non chemical way of dealing with pests?
What does IPM stand for?
How can the location and amount of insects be changed?
What is one thing that can be used to pull pests?
What is the name of the process by which pests are attracted and repelled using IPM. 
How much was Sweden able to lower thier pesticide usage?
What other country has reduced its pesticide usage?
What natural substance has been found to effectively increase crop yields
What amount of gain in crops can be contributed to application of composted yard waste?
What is one type of pesticide?
How long may it take for persistent pesticides to be broken down?
What quality caused DDT to build up in various organisms?
What is one way to classify pesticides?
What are sulfonyureas commonly used for?
Nicosulfuron, triflusulfuron methyl and chlorsulfuron can be classified as what type of pesticides?
The restriction of what enzyme allows broad-spectrum herbicides to kill plants?
The amount of material used as a crop protection measure decreased from 1kg/ha in what year to its current 1%?
Is the trade of pesticides and pesticide treated goods limited to the United States?
What commitee deals with differences in rules governing the use of pesticides among different countries?
When was the international code which governs the distribution and use of pesticides established?
How recently were voluntary standards of pesticide regulation updated?
What country has attempted to better the controls of pesticide exchanges?
What is one agency who is trying to help make the trade of pesticides safer?
What is one important thing that should be present when countries are trading with pesticides?
Are these agencies a requirement in the countries where they exist?
What is one measure taken to keep society safe from improper pesticide use?
What is a choice that users of pesticides can make that will lower risks?
What is one country that has sucessfully used IPM?
Biological and botanical derivatives have what positive effects?
Who has the ability to make the choice of using less harmful pesticides?
What is a measure of pesticides determined in EPA studies?
Who is protected by EPA regulations?
Pesticides are inspected often to make sure they meet up to date safety regulations from what period of time.
How often are pesticides produced more recently evaluated for safety?
How could someone learn more about how to safely use and handle an unknow pesticide?
What are pesticides that are thought to be extremely dangerous called?
What would qualify someone to use restricted use pesticides?
 The EPA or other groups who govern pesticide use may inspect what?
Agencies who regulate the environment exists in what regional capacities?
When were laws first created to regulate pesticides?
What might someone knowledgable about the history of pesticides call ther period of the 1940s and 1950s?
When did America establish the Environmental Protection Agency?
Countries which are established use what amount of pesticides?
Trends about use of pesticides have been published from which country?
What type of region is somerset
What are some areas of Somerset county
How far back was the county populated 
What Kings rise did the county play part in 
What is the city of Bath famous for 
Who invaded Britain when the Romans Left 
It took how long for the Anglo Saxons to control  the Somerset area 
What was the Saxon Royal Palace used for 
What prison does somerset county contain 
What rebellion took place in Somerset in 1685 
What ended Somersets cottage industry 
What flourished in Somerset after the Industrial revelotuion
What Industry was important in the late 18th and 19th century of North Somerset
What did the west somerset mineral way transport 
How many Somerset soldiers were killed in WW1
How many counties had no casualties in WW1 
The county was base for what in WW2
What is the Tauton stop line 
Why were decoy towns used in WW2
What did the decoy towns mimic 
Who layed out  Beacon Batch 
What decoy city was hit 
How long have the boundaries of somerset remained constant 
What river forms the border of Somerset 
What did king Edward the 3 do 
When did Somerton take over from Ilchester as the county town 
How many cities and towns in Somerset 
The largest populations of the county 
What was the strategic purpose to settle this area 
Most Southernly town of somerset
What area lies in the northeastern part of Somerset levels 
What area was Designated to have outstanding beauty 
What is the name of the coal field 
What's the name of the cave system 
Name 2 of the county gorges 
Name some of the county rivers 
What are the main coastal towns 
what is the name of the natural reserve area 
What is the leading port of somerset 
what was manufacture in Bridgeport in the 19th and 20th century
The good motor system presently allows for 
where are aircraft manufactured 
What do many towns encourage 
What type of factory was built in Somerset 
What other high tech industry is in Somerset 
What is yeovilton home to 
What area is home to royal marines 
What is Somerset an important supplier of 
Where is willow growing still practiced 
What is pollarding 
What did plastic bags result in 
What towns grew around the weaving Industry 
Why did Cj clark shoes leave the area 
What famous shoe brand was made in Somerset 
What type of stone was supplied in the county 
Who promoted the use of stone from the  Bath area
What are some uses for Blue Lias
What has been supplied by the county since the 1920's 
Tourism supports how many people in the County 
Some of the county attractions are 
What does Glastonbury have associations with 
What type of festival is Glastonbury famous for 
What type of cheese is the county famous for 
What is the population growth rate of Somerset county 
What percentage of the population is economically active 
What percentage of the population is native 
The largest ethnic group in somerset county is 
Tauton Bridgewater and Yeovil has what concentration of the population
How many tourist nights are spent in Somerset
What police force covers the ceremonial county 
What fire / rescue squad was formed in 2007 
What area does South western Ambulance  Service cover 
What is the name of the charitable air ambulance service 
Where does the Glastonbury Music festival take place 
who holds a literature festival each summer 
The annual Carnival is held when and where 
What some of the Museums in Bath
What are some other attractions 
Where is the Museum of Somerset 
What is the name of the museum in Glastonbury 
How many listed buildings in Somerset 
How many monuments on Somerset 
What is a key type of Architecture in Somerset 
Name some historic private houses in the county 
Why was the Somerset county Canal built 
What was in use along the canal 
What was never built 
What was laid on the path to Midford 
Who purchased the tramway in 1871
How long were canals used 
What was built int the 19th century 
How many railways served the county 
Were any of the railways  electrified 
What railways lines are still in use today 
What  did paddle streamers serve until the 1960's 
What was the pier on Burnham -on-sea used for 
What is the shortest pier in the UK 
What was constructed in the 1970's 
What are the  state schools in somerset 
What are the 3 tiers of school 
How many state and independent secondary  schools in Somerset 
What schools can trace their origins back 
What was the original name of the Beechen Cliff School
What school in Bruton was given royal  foundation status 
What are some prepatory schools for younger students 
What is one of the Musical schools 
What is a roman catholic school 
Bath school of pharmacy founded in 
When did Bath Spa Gain University status
When did the university of Bath gain royal charter 
What University are in Bath 
When was the Collegiate School of Saybrook Colony founded?
When was the Collegiate School renamed to Yale College?
Why was the school named Yale College?
When did Yale first incorporate humanities and sciences?
When did Yale issue the first Ph.D in the United States?
How many schools is Yale composed of?
How much is Yale's endowment worth?
How many books are in the Yale University Library?
Who runs Yale College?
Where is the main Yale campus?
When was "An Act for Liberty to Erect a Collegiate School" approved?
Who voted on "An Act for Liberty to Erect a Collegiate School"?
What was the name of the group that started Yale's library?
Why was "An Act for Liberty to Erect a Collegiate School" proposed?
Where did "The Founders" go to school?
When did William Graham Sumner teach?
What did William Graham Sumner teach?
Why was The Yale Report established?
What were the group of Yale professors and ministers attempting to achieve?
What changes were the professors and ministers responding to?
What was Nathan Hale famous for?
What profession did Frederic Remington hold?
What was the name of the protagonist of "Stover at Yale"?
What turned into the goal of the student body?
What were the subjects of Frederic Remington's paintings?
In what year was the first debate between Harvard, Yale, and Princeton?
When was the first debate between Harvard and Yale?
How were debates shown to the college students?
What did members of the debate team get for their service?
Why do debates not have a distinct winner?
When was the Yale School of Medicine established?
When was Yale Divinity School established?
When was Yale Law School created?
When was Yale Graduate Schools and Arts and Sciences established?
When was the Sheffield Scientific School created?
When was Noah Porter president of Yale?
What idea did Noah Porter strike down?
What did many historians think of Noah Porter?
What was Porter's reason for striking down the research university?
What caused disagreement about Yale's new position?
How much did  philanthropic foundations donate between 1925 and 1940?
What was the $7 million used for?
What animals sexual behavior did Yerkes study?
Who were the behavioral scientists in charge of the research?
What was the goal of the behavioral research?
Which group of researchers provided a standard research school environment?
Which groups of researchers provided unorthodox structure for a research group?
What was Pickford's group lacking to make it more like other research schools?
What information did Hutchinson's model provide?
What did Hutchinson's group research?
Who was dean of Yale Medical School from 1920 to 1935?
What was the driving force behind Milton Winternitz's research?
What teaching style did Milton Winternitz develop?
What is the Yale System?
What programs did Milton Winternitz create?
Who was the first professor for the American studies program?
Where did Norman Holmes Pearson work before Yale?
What did the American studies program hope to instruct?
Who contributed to the American studies programs at Yale and University of Wyoming?
Why did Coe donate to American studies programs?
What led to Yale's Grievance Board and the Yale Women's Center?
When was a Title IX complaint filed against Yale?
What was the name of the magazine of which multiple editors were involved in the Title IX complaint?
What was the complaint of the editors of Broad Recognition?
What did Yale do about the Title IX complaint?
Why do New Haven city officials dislike Yale?
Which Yale president assisted with New Haven's revitalization efforts?
What has been the effect of Yale and New Haven's relationship on Yale?
What has been the effect of Yale and New Haven's relation on New Haven?
What did the Boston Globe have to say about Yale?
Which US presidents since the Vietnam War have studied at Yale?
What non winning major party nominees studied at Yale?
How many times were Yale alumni on a presidential ticket between 1972 and 2004
In the 1988 election, where did George H. W. Bush say Michael Dukakis's foreign policy was born?
How did George H. W. Bush describe Yale's reputation?
How did George H. W. Bush describe Harvard's reputation?
Why was Howard Dean proud of his graduating class?
Who was appointed acting President of Yale in 1977?
Where did Hanna Holborn Gray go after Yale?
In what year did Judith Rodin become the first female president of an Ivy League school?
In what year did Susan Hockfield become President of MIT?
Who became Vice Chancellor of the University of Cambridge in 2002?
What union are the members of the Yale University Police Department a part of?
What union do Yale security guards belong to?
What is the name of the unrecognized union of graduate employees?
What union are Yale's clerical and technical employees a part of?
What union are Yale's service and maintenance workers a part of?
How many strikes has Yale had since 1968?
What are The New York Times' views on Yale's labor tension?
What professor was retired in a 2003 labor strike?
What adds to the tensions during wage considerations?
Who called Hillhouse Avenue the most beautiful street in America in the 1840's?
Who listed Yale as one of the most beautiful campuses in the United States?
What is Yale largely known for?
When did Travel + Leisure list Yale as one of the most beautiful campuses?
Who financed a large chunk of the architecture from 1917 to 1931
What do the stone statues on Yale's campus depict?
What do the decorative friezes on the buildings show?
How did James Gamble Rogers faux age the buildings?
How did James Gamble Rogers faux age the windows?
What architects have buildings in the Yale Old Campus?
What is the largest residential college?
Which school was used as the engineering and sciences school until 1956?
What are some other terms for the gothic style buildings in the Old Campus at Yale?
When were the first campus police formed at Yale?
Who were the the first campus police composed of?
Why was the campus police established?
What kind of system is Yale's financial aid?
How is most financial aid obtained at Yale?
What was the average need of financial aid at Yale for the Class of 2017?
What percent of students at Yale are thought to have no parental help?
What was the average debt of student loan borrowers from the class of 2013?
What is the name of the country's first university partnered art museum?
How many items are in The Yale University Art Gallery?
Where is the largest center for British art, UK not included?
Whose contributions started The Yale Center for British Art?
Who designed the building for The Yale Center for British Art?
Which of the New Critics were staffed at Yale?
Who is known as the father of deconstruction?
Where did Jacques Derrida teach from the late 1970's to mid 1980's?
Which Yale staffed labor historian advised other younger labor historians?
When was The Journal of Music Theory founded?
When was Yale's residential college system established?
Who established Yale's residential college system?
Who runs Yale's residential colleges?
Are there academic programs in Yale's residential colleges?
Who teaches Yale's residential college's undergraduate classes?
In what architectural styles were Harkness' original colleges?
Which two residential colleges are of modernist style?
What are Yale's colleges encircling?
Who are the Yale colleges named after?
In what year does the university expect to open two more colleges?
What is the name of the world's oldest humor magazine?
What year was The Yale Record first published?
In what year was the Yale Daily News established?
When was the Yale Herald established?
What is the name of the campus radio station?
What do seniors crush to celebrate graduation?
What do they destroy now instead of clay pipes?
What statue is it rumored to be good luck to rub?
What part of the statue of Theodore Dwight Woolsey is it said to be good luck to rub?
What game was created, to later be banned by administration?
What is the name of the United States' first bowl stadium?
What landmarks did the Yale Bowl influence?
What is the name of the world's second largest indoor athletic building?
On what day was the Richard Gilder Boathouse established?
How much did the Richard Gilder Boathouse cost to construct?
How much did Charles B. Johnson pledge to Yale in 2013?
How much did the 1954 class donate for their 50th reunion?
Who led the 1954 class in their large donation?
Who were the main characters in Stover at Yale?
What F. Scott Fitzgerald novel is Yale a part of?
What character in The Great Gatsby wrote editorials for the Yale News?
What football playing character in The Great Gatsby played for Yale?
Who wrote the novel Stover at Yale?
An interest in texts from which two ancient civilizations sparked the Italian Renaissance?
Which conflicts brought Europeans into contact with Arabs prior to the 12th century?
Which city was captured by the Ottoman Turks, resulting in the fleeing of scholars to Western Europe?
Who captured Constantinople?
What kind of texts did Byzantine scholars take with them when they fled Constantinople?
What methods, applied to the study of history, led to the perception of the Middle Ages as a time of recession and crisis?
Which author popularized a pessimistic view of the Late Middle Ages in his 1919 book?
What was the title of Huizinga's 1919 book on the Middle Ages?
Which countries were the focus of Huizinga's research?
What was the nationality of historian Henri Pirenne?
In what year was the Holy Roman Empire dissolved?
In what year did a Golden Bull make the king of Bohemia first among the imperial electors?
The Hanseatic League was what type of institution?
In 1438, control of the Holy Roman Empire passed to what dynasty?
What city was the seat of the papacy for most of the 14th century?
In what year did the papacy return to Rome?
What 14th century conflict resulted in the division of southern Italy into two kingdoms?
What were the names of the two kingdoms into which southern Italy was divided?
In what year were the two southern Italian kingdoms re-united?
When did the French Jacquerie take place?
What English law was enacted in order to forcibly reduce wages?
In what year was the Statute of Laborers enacted?
Which economic system was ultimately ended by the upheavals of the 14th century?
In what year did the English Peasants' Revolt occur?
Which European cities likely had populations greater than 100,000 in 1500?
What event decimated urban populations in the 14th century?
How many other cities had populations larger than 40,000 by 1500?
Which English city had a population greater than 40,000 in 1500?
Which conflict in France resulted in the establishment of permanent armies?
The use of paid mercenaries and domestic retinues replaced which method of raising troops?
Which soldiers were in high demand under the mercenary system?
Which English king is associated with the use of mercenaries in the 14th century?
What was the chivalric order established by Edward III in 1348?
Who founded the Order of St. George?
In what year was the Order of St. George founded?
What was the code of conduct of the military orders called?
In what year was the Order of the Garter established?
Which Oxford professor believed that the Bible should be the sole authority in religious questions?
What were Jon Wycliffe's supporters called?
What was the event that ended religious unity in the Western Church?
Which Catholic practices did Wycliffe speak out against?
Who was one of the English aristocrats who supported the Lollard movement?
In what year was Jan Hus burned at the stake?
Who did Richard II of England marry?
Whose teachings did Jan Hus base his own on?
What were the followers of Jan Hus called?
What conflict resulted from death of Jan Hus?
What privilege was granted to companies on a national level?
Which families financed the wars of kings?
Which economic associations gained power in the towns?
Where was Jacques Couer from?
What caused the decrease in commerce and production in the 14th century?
What is the alternative to the theory that the Renaissance was a time of great opulence?
What type of evidence is too incomplete for a decision to be made between the two theories of the Renaissance?
What is posited as the cause of increased artistic output during the Renaissance?
What did Jean Buridan create to explain the motion of projectiles?
What school of scientific thought was challenged by Jean Buridan and Nicole Oresme?
What scientist is most associated with the heliocentric worldview?
Which scholars made great advances in the theories of motion?
Buridan's theory of impetus led to what modern concept?
Who championed the scientific study of anatomy for the benefit of art?
Which artistic principle was innovated by Brunelleschi?
Along with da Vinci, who were two other artists regarded as masters of the High Renaissance?
What was achieved though the use of the scientific study of anatomy in the field of art?
What did Donatello study that inspired sculptures?
Who wrote the Divine Comedy?
In what languages did Dante and Boccaccio create their works?
Which dialect became the norm for the modern Italian language?
What is one of Boccaccio's works that helped promote the Italian language?
Whose work, Canzoniere, is considered to be the first example of modern lyric poetry?
What is the most famous morality play from the medieval period?
Which dramatic form was created around 1400?
What goes to the grave with Everyman in the morality play?
Which morality play depicted mankind's progress from birth to death?
In the morality play, who summoned Everyman?
Which Late Middle Age English kings kept their own troupes of professional actors?
Who performed the seasonal Christmas plays?
In what year did Henry VIII establish an Office of Revels?
What did Henry VIII build in 1545 for the benefit of the theatrical arts?
In what part of a nobleman's house were plays performed?
What was banned that led to the demise of medieval drama?
In what year did Elizabeth I ban religious plays?
In what year were religious plays banned in the Netherlands?
What types of subjects did dramatists turn to when religious plays were banned?
Where were religious plays banned in 1548?
Which Franciscan monk motivated the peasants to fight against Muslims at the Siege of Belgrade?
In what year was the Siege of Belgrade fought?
Who did the Hungarian nobility elect as King of Hungary?
Which country did Saint Francis of Capistrano come from?
When John Hunyadi died, which province was left in chaos?
Historians from what country in particular do not refer to the Late Middle Ages?
What provided developmental continuity between the ancient and modern ages?
What period do Italian historians believe came immediately after the High Period of the Middle Ages?
What do many scholars regard the Late Middle Ages as the beginning of?
When was Ann Arbor founded?
Which University moved from Detroit to Ann Arbor in 1837?
During  the 1960's & 70's, Ann Arbor gained a reputation for what?
Which type of tree is associated with the city Ann Arbor's name?
Who founded Ann Arbor?
What was the profession of the founders of Ann arbor?
Which tribe named the settlement as kaw-goosh-kaw-nick?
For how much money did the founders purchase the land from the federal government?
What were the names of the founders wives?
When was the Thomas More Law center established?
What was the Thomas More law group?
During the early & mid 70's, which party won the city council seats?
Which magazine listed Ann Arbor as one of the most liveable cities in the USA?
For the past few years, what effects has the city Ann Arbor grappled with?
What plan did the city voters approve in 2003?
What is the city of Ann arbor nicknamed as?
How many parks are there in the city of Ann Arbor?
What is the name of the Arboretum owned by the University of Michigan?
How big is the Matthaei botanical garden?
Which district has the farmers market in the city?
Which districts compose mostly of 2-4 story structures?
Which area in the city contains 19th&20th century as well as modern structures?
Which century does the Kit houses belong to?
Who primarily occupies the complexes surrounding the University?
Which is the tallest building in Ann Arbor?
When was the city listed on the National Register of historic Places?
What is the average household size in the city of Ann Arbor?
What is the average family size in the city of Ann Arbor?
What is the median age for the city of Ann Arbor?
Name some automobile manufacturers in the city of Ann Arbor
What is the employee count of the University of Michigan?
Nam the major components for the City's growth.
Which company manufactured cameras in Ann Arbor from 1936 to 1960's?
Which network company opened up in 2008 providing security, storage & networking?
International Radio introduced which mass produced product from the city of Ann Arbor?
Who is the city's 2nd largest employer?
Which non-profit non-governmental organization is located in Ann Arbor?
How many researchers does the University of Michigan expect to hire?
When did the Borders Books open up in Ann Arbor?
Who opened the Borders Books store in Ann Arbor?
Which pizza chain is headquartered at Ann Arbor?
Which company was the world's largest privately held ink manufacturer till 2005?
Avfuel, a global supplier of what services is headquartered in Ann Arbor?
When was the University Musical Society founded?
How many events does the University Musical Society present in a year?
When was the Ann Arbor civic Ballet established?
Name Michigan's first Civic chartered company.
Which museum is located at Ann Arbors historic downtown fire station?
Ann Arbor ranks 1st among what goods sold?
Which presidential library is located in Ann Arbor?
What medical dispensarys are there in Ann Arbor?
What are the Medical marijuana dispensaries called in the city?
What annual event is held on the 1st saturday of april?
Who is the member of the Big Ten Conference in college sports in the city?
Which is the largest American football stadium in the world?
What is the Michigan Stadium called colloquially?
What form of government does Ann Arbor have?
How many voting members are there in the city- council?
How many terms does the mayor of the city serve?
Who is elected every even numbered year?
How many council members are elected for the city's ward?
Who represents the congress in Ann Arbor?
On a state level the city is part of which district number?
Who represents the city in Michigan senate?
Voters in the city approve which kind of amendment?
What kind of politics have been strong in the municipal government?
Ann Arbor became the 1st city in the US to what type of voting in the Mayoral race?
Name a private business school located in Ann arbor.
Who founded Domino's pizza?
Which school acquired the former Ave Maria building after a Roman catholic school moved from there?
Ann Arbor has one of the leading programs in what subject?
What program is open to the residents of Ann arbor?
In 2008, how many were enrolled in public schools?
Who owns Ann Arbor news?
When did the Ann Arbor news end its print?
Which was the only city in the US to loose its only daily paper?
What magazine covers Ann Arbor's local businesses?
Which automobile magazines are based from Ann Arbor?
Which university magazine reports local, state & regional issues in addition to campus news?
What is the name of the conservative AM radio channel in Ann arbor?
What is the name of the city's FM radio channel?
What is the name of the local free community college radio?
WPXD channel 31 is an affliate of which TV network?
What is the abbreviation of CTN?
What is one time period in which Gothic architecture flourished?
What style of architecture did Gothic architecture evolve from?
What style of architecture came after the Gothic style?
Where did the Gothic architecture style originate?
Gothic architecture is known for being commonly used in cathedrals and churches, what is one example of a lesser known type of structure in which Gothic architecture has been used?
What is an example of where the Gothic style is expressed most strongly?
Where do the emotions which traits of the Gothic style represent, originate from? 
A great number of what type of buildings still remain from this period today?
With what organization are many Gothic cathedral listed with as World Heritage Sites?
Why are larger cathedrals and churches associated with the Gothic style?
What type of description did the term "Gothic architecture" originate as?
Who used the term "barbarous German style" to portray what is known today as the Gothic style?
Who does Vasari believe destroyed ancient buildings after they conquered Rome?
How long had Italy undergone building in a Classical architecture style at the time of Vasari?
In what period was the Classical architecture vocabulary revived? 
What is one region with which the Gothic style is distinctly connected with?
What is another region with which the Gothic style is distinctly connected with?
What type of structures remaining today have the largest amount of examples of the Gothic style?
What is one country with which the Gothic style is distinctly connected with?
What is another country with which the Gothic style is distinctly connected with?
At the end of what century was Europe separated into several city states and kingdoms?
What was the region covering modern Germany, southern Denmark, the Netherlands, Belgium, Luxembourg, Switzerland, Austria, Slovakia, Czech Republic and much of northern Italy known as?
What modern country contains regions in which Plantagenet kings controlled large domains?
Poland was affected by trade connections with what League?
What type of kings brought the Gothic style from France to Southern Italy?
Europe experienced a rapid growth in what at this time?
What is one country that contained considerable and prosperous towns during this time?
What type of building was considered to be very important and a sign of affluence and achievement?
What is one country that stayed mostly feudal and created spectacular architecture for its royalty rather than its burghers?
What is another country that stayed mostly feudal and created spectacular architecture for its royalty rather than its burghers?
What church was widespread across Europe at this time?
Who were bishops appointed by?
Which periods saw a quick growth in Monasticism? 
What types of church were the Benedictines known for?
What is one type of Benedictine order that was common in France?
During what time period did Romanesque architecture become a pan-European style of construction?
What is one country in the geographic area that was affected by the development of the Gothic style of architecture?
Why did country borders not affect differences in style within Gothic architecture?
During which period did regional differences in Romanesque architecture become even more pronounced?
England and what other country showed differences in architectural style rarely observed anywhere else?
What is Romanesque architecture known as in England?
By the beginning of what century was the Romanesque style established all over Europe?
The Romanesque style continued to affect and inspire  the basic architectural forms throughout which period?
What is one important category of building that was recognized during the Romanesque period?
What is another category of building that was established during the Romanesque period?
What is one defining characteristic of the Gothic architectural style?
Which type of architecture first used the pointed arch during the seventh century?
What other type of architecture also made use of the pointed arch?
The Roman Karamagara Bridge is an example of what type of structure?
Parabolic and pointed arches were used in what type of constrcution?
What is considered the first truly Gothic building?
Which cathedral was first to be rebuilt in the new style from 1150 to 1231?
What is one of the features that have come to be considered as an important part of the Gothic style?
What is one of the features that have come to be considered as an important part of the Gothic style?
What is one of the features that have come to be considered as an important part of the Gothic style?
What is one cathedral in which simple cylindrical columns stand out more than the Gothic features?
When was the construction of Wells Cathedral in England begun?
Who completed the transepts and nave on Wells Cathedral in about 1230?
Which Cathedral is considered the first thoroughly Gothic cathedral?
What is another cathedral in which simple cylindrical columns stand out more than the Gothic features?
When was the west front of Saint Denis completed?
What portion of the reconstruction of Saint Denis was begun after the completion of the west front? 
What style of nave was left unaltered during this portion of the reconstruction of Saint Denis?
What style of columns did Abbott Suger use when reconstructing Saint Denis?
What design element allowed the use of large clerestory windows?
What type of buildings most prominently display the design aspects of the Gothic architectural style?
Prior to the 20th century, a Gothic cathedral was considered to be what type of building in the town in which it was constructed?
What is another name for the pointed arch?
What is an example of architectural technology that is seen in Gothic construction?
What is another example of architectural technology that is seen in Gothic construction?
In England, which arm would generally show two distinct sections, choir and presbytery?
Who is a projecting Lady Chapel dedicated to?
What shape does the eastern end often exhibit in France?
What is the ring of chapels found in the eastern end of French chapels known as?
In Italy, the eastern projection beyond the transept often contains what?
The use of the pointed arch for bringing transverse vaults to the same height diagonal ones, is in disagreement with what theory?
At which cathedral is the pointed arch used to match the heights of transverse and diagonal vaults?
In what type of decorative blind arcading are pointed arches common?
When semicircular arches overlap each other, what type of design is accidentally created?
Which type of vault can be used for rectangular and trapezoidal shaped roofs?
What structural benefit is offered by the Gothic vault?
What can architects raise much higher using the Gothic versus the Romanesque variety?
What type of visual character is achieved by using the pointed arch?
What is one feature of both large and small Gothic churches?
What is another feature of both large and small Gothic churches?
How many towers are typical on the front of Gothic churches in France and Spain?
In what country is the tower often found detached from the main building?
How many towers are found at the Salisbury Chapel?
What enhances the vertical look of the exterior of Gothic construction? 
What is one design element of Gothic construction that is often terminated by small pinnacles?
What is another design element of Gothic construction that is often terminated by small pinnacles?
Which cathedral demonstrates a drastic example of termination with small pinnacles?
What other part of Gothic buildings are often found terminated with small pinnacles?
What is often found sweeping unbroken from floor to ceiling on the interior of Gothic buildings?
Where are the verticals found repeated in the interior of Gothic buildings?
What sort of feature is created by the use of vertical elements in gallery and window tracery?
What does the use of vertical elements help to counteract?
Who encouraged cathedral architects to allow as much light as possible into the building?
Who held the belief that all light, including light reflected from walls and surfaces was divine?
What sort of light has always been characteristic of Gothic cathedrals?
What book became popular with monks in France and had an effect on how light was used in cathedrals?
Whose writings led to the clerical belief in the divinity of light?
What is the distinguiushing visual design feature of French cathedrals?
How many portals are typically found on the west front of French cathedrals?
How many towers are typically found on the west front of French cathedrals?
What shape does the east end of French chapels typically have?
What do many major churches in Southern France often lack?
What is the unique design feature of English cathedrals?
What type of transepts do English cathedrals often feature? 
What size of window is typically featured on the west end of English cathedrals?
Where are rose windows used on English cathedrals?
On English cathedrals, where is a tower almost always found?
What is the distinctive design element of Gothic cathedrals of the Iberian Peninsula? 
What size are the arcades of Gothic cathedrals of the Iberian Peninsula?
What type of architecture is a prominent influence on the design and form of Gothic cathedrals from the Iberian Peninsula? 
What type of West front does the Leon Cathedral resemble?
What style are the spires at Burgos Cathedral?
Who was the Royal palace of Olite built for?
Who was the Malbork Castle built for?
What type of Gothic architecture is the Malbork Castle an example of?
What is the name of the royal residence built for the kings of France in Paris?
When was the Palau de la Generalitat in Barcelona constructed?
What is one city with an accumulation of secular Gothic structures? 
What is another city with an accumulation of secular Gothic structures? 
What style are most windows on secular Gothic structures?
Where are pointed arches and vaulted ceilings found on most secular Gothic structures?
What is the name of the surviving monastic building in England? 
What is the name of the Archbishop of Canterbury's residence?
In what year was a Gothic hammerbeam roof installed on the Archbishop of Canterbury's residence?
In what century were distinct Gothic details used on new construction at Oxford and Cambridge?
Who used Gothic details in construction of Tom Tower, Oxford?
Who was the exterior architect of the Houses of Parliament?
Who was the interior architect of the Houses of Parliament?
What style of architecture does the Houses of Parliament exemplify?
Who designed the Albert Memorial in London?
Who designed the chapel at Keble College, Oxford?
What were the three offshoots of Cubism formed in France?
What were the other offshoots formed in countries other than France?
Which offshoot had little in common with Cubism?
Which offshoot of cubism was influenced by Picasso? 
Which artists in the early 19th and 20th century inspired by the newly discovered African, Native American, Micro and Polynesian art?
What about the Native cultures art inspired Matisse, Picasso, and Gauguin?
Who did Picasso meet around 1906 that had also recenelty learned about Primitivism? 
What were Picasso's 1907 paintings usually characterized by? 
Understanding who's work was the tradition meaning of Cubism formed on?
Who suggested that the artists other than Braque and Picasso's relgation to a distant role in Cubism was a mistake?
What other painters were not thought of as being as Cubist as Braque and Picasso?
What did the 1912 exhiibtion of Cubism show?
What two things did Cubism in the early 20th century form an important link between?
In which four countries were the impacts of avant garde art particularly strong?
What was the essential piece Cubist architects explained in their theoretical rules? 
What's  window shapes di Czech Cubist architects use? 
What feelings should Cubist architecture evoke in viewer?
What specifically dates back with Confucius in the 6th century BC?
Chinese political philosophy dates back to what century?
Chinese political philosophy was developed as a response to what?
What advocated a communal, decentralized government centered on frugality and ascetism?
Western political philosophy originates in what philosophy?
What philosophy has dates back to at least Plato?
Ancient Greece was dominated by what?
What demarcates a clear distinction between nation and state, as well as religion and state?
What was divided into governance, administration, defense, law and  order?
What was the governing body of the Hindu states?
Who heavily influenced the early Christian philosophy of Augustine of Hippo?
What was a key change brought about by Christian thought?
Who also preached that one was not a member of his or her city?
What does Civitas terrena mean?
What does Civitas Dei mean?
What was heavily influenced by Christian thinking?
Medieval political philosophy had much in common with what type of thinking?
Who was the most influential political philosopher of medieval Europe? 
What would refer to a set of enduring institutions through which power would be distributed and its use justified? 
What refers to a specific group of people who occupied the institutions of the state?
Society has been considered subject to natural laws akin to what?
In what area did these ideological reforms not take place until much later?
Whose philosophy gave much to Christian thought of the time?
Who was a great admirer of some of the methods of the Iroquois Confederacy?
Who was responsible for the work Two Treatises of Government?
Locke refuted whose political theory?
According to Locke, an absolute ruler is proposed by Hobbes is what?
What was a watershed event in human history?
When was The Russian Revolution?
What brought communism?
What did Ludwig Von Mises and Friedrich Hayek run?
What remained an important focus during the 1950s and 1960s?
There was a marked trend towards what type of approach to political issues?
Who wrote The Racial Contract?
Who wrote The Sexual Contract?
What did John Rawsl publish?
Who Published A Theory of Justice?
When was A Theory of Justice published?
Who wrote Anarchy, State, and Utopia?
What is often considered valuable for generating a new set of philosophical problems? 
What type of control do communitarians tend to support?
What type of economic and social policies do Communitarians tend to support?
When did republicanism and the capability approach arise?
What aims to provide an alternate definition of liberty from Isaiah Berlin's positive and negative forms of liberty?
Mahbub ul Haq and Amartya Sen pioneered what approach?
What is an alloy?
What are alloys defined by?
When are Zintl considered alloys?
What is solid solution metal elements classified as?
What kind of substance is an alloy?
What happens when an alloy is mixed with a molten base?
What is an alloy composed of?
What other metal is impure like alloy?
How is steel produced?
What kind of metal is soft like copper?
What can be added to steel to enhance is corrosion resistance?
What is superior to pure iron?
What is another word for when alloys solidify?
What causes an alloy to form a solid solution?
What is the purpose of intermetallic phases?
What are alloys called when the insoluble elements don't separate until after crystallization occurs?
What is electrum made of?
What alloy is formed naturally? 
Which was on of the first alloys made by humans?
What metal is made by combining tin and copper?
Around what time where alloys starting to get made by humans?
The matrix and the solvent are other names for what?
What is another name for solutes?
What is the name of an alloy that has  four constituents?
A five-part alloy is known as?
What is a characteristic of iron sulfide?
What makes pure metals impure metals?
Using fluxes and chemical additives during the alloying process does what?
What are the three common impurities in aluminum alloys?
What is the name of a common alloy?
What is something on a car that sometimes is made of alloy?
Steel and other very practical metals are also named what?
What can be done to a metal to enhance its properties?
Pure metals have a higher electrical and thermal conductivity than what?
When copper and tin is mixed, what is made?
When was the bronze age?
Copper and zinc combine to make what?
What kind of treatment can be made to alter it's properties?
Softening metals can be achieved by?
Aluminium, copper, magnesium, titanium, and nickel can be strengthened by?
Annealling softens metals by achieving what?
Precipitation hardening alloys produce the opposite effects of?
Precipitation hardening alloys are sometimes also?
What makes alloys more softer than normal?
Bronze and brass are examples of what?
Tin or zinc atoms in place of copper atoms create?
What is the name of one interstitial alloy?
Stainless steel is an example of what two alloys?
What was one of the first alloys used by humans?
What is meteoric iron composed of?
What can forged meteoric iron make?
Where does meteoric iron come from?
How does meteoric iron come to earth?
Where is the only iron deposit on earth?
Around what time did bronze start being formed?
What does copper and zinc form to make?
Where is tin mostly found?
Which metal important to the ancients is the hardest one?
What does mercury make most metals do?
Since when have Amalgams been used?
What did ancient Romans use to gild their armor?
Gold and silver were extracted from their ores by using?
Ancient civilizations often alloyed metals for what reason?
Red gold is made by combining gold with?
 Around what time was the Archimedes' principle discovered?
Who shouted "Eureka!" while checking the purity of a crown?
Buyers were often deceived when precious metals were mixed with?
Pewter is mostly made up of?
Why was tin was rarely used for everyday use?
During the bronze age, which metal was valued higher than gold in Europe and the Mediterranean?
What was done to tin to make it stronger?
What metals were alloyed with tin to make it stronger?
Where did smelting of iron begin?
When did the smelting of iron first begin?
When did iron making technology begin in Japan?
Pig iron is composed of iron and what else?
What makes Pig iron different from regular iron?
Heat treatment of steel has been know since what time?
When did iron start to become melted by people?
Who created the first process for the mass production of tool steel?
When did Benjamin Huntsman begin to melt blister steel in a crucible
What did the blast furnace help do to pig iron in the middle ages?
By reducing carbon in liquid pig iron, what was created?
When did puddling start occurring?
When was the Bessemer process developed?
Steel and manganese combines form to make what?
Who discovered precipitation hardening alloys?
When were precipitation hardening alloys discovered?
What happens to precipitation hardening alloys after they quenched?
One of the first "age hardening" alloys used were called?
What was used in the construction of modern aircraft?
Who was Norfolk Island colonised by?
What purpose did Norfolk Island serve for the majority of the time from 1788 until 1855?
What date did civilians begin to permanently reside in Norfolk Island?
Where did the first permanent civilians of Norfolk Island settle from in 1856?
In what year did the UK hand Norfolk Island over to Australia to administrate?
In what year did the British government include Norfolk Island as a auxiliary settlement?
Who proposed the idea to include Norfolk Island as a British auxiliary settlement in 1786?
In including Norfolk Island as an auxiliary settlement, what Australian state did the British government plan to colonise?
What woman influenced the decision by the British to settle Norfolk Island?
Where was the majority of the hemp and flax used by the Royal Navy imported from?
When did Lieutenant-Governor of New South Wales Francis Grose start suggesting Norfolk Island be closed as a penal settlement?
Why did Francis Grose think that Norfolk Island should be closed as a penal settlement?
When did the first group of people leave Norfolk Island?
By 1808, how many people remained on Norfolk Island?
Why did a small group of people remain on Norfolk Island, after others had already left?
Who were the next settlement of people on Norfolk Island descended from?
Where did the next settlement of people on Norfolk Island settle from?
On May 3, 1856, how many Pitcairners left for Norfolk Island?
What was the name of the ship the Pitcairners traveled on to Norfolk Island?
What trades did the Pitcairners establish while on Norfolk Island?
When was the Commonwealth of Australia created?
During what major event did Norfolk Island become an important airbase and refuelling station?
Who contructed the airbase used on Norfolk Island during World War II?
Norfolk Island fell under whose responsibility during World War II?
When did N Force leave Norfolk Island during the time of World War II?
 What lead to Norfolk Island asking for assistance from Australia in 2010?
What benefit were residents of Norfolk Island told they would receive as a result of Australia's assistance?
What actually ended up happening after Norfolk Island asked Australia for help?
An agreement was finally signed in Canberra on March 12, 2015, to do what for Norfolk Island?
What percentage of Norfolk Island voters were against the changes brought by Australia?
What is the coastline of Norfolk made of?
Where is the site of the original colonial settlement of Kingston, Norfolk Islands, currently located?
How are goods imported to Norfolk Island?
Where are imported goods usually sent on Norfolk Island?
Where can you go to surf on Norfolk Island?
How many plants can only be found on Norfolk Island?
How many of the plants that can only be found on Norfolk Island are rare or threatened?
Where can the tallest tree-fern in the world be found?
What was the majority of Norfolk Island covered with, before European colonization?
How much of the rainforest remains in Norfolk Island today?
What type of bird does Norfolk Island have few of?
What is one reason that has caused many of the birds of Norfolk Island to become extinct?
What is the second thing that caused many of the birds of Norfolk Island to become extinct?
What non-bird animals caused the bird populations of Norfolk Island to suffer?
What non-native birds caused the bird populations of Norfolk Island to suffer?
What island in the Norfolk Island Group is home to breeding seabirds?
What near extinct bird of Norfolk Island has shown signs of population increase?
Where has the providence petrel been seen breeding on Norfolk Island?
What other types of petrels breed on Phillip Island?
What is the sooty tern known as on Norfolk Island?
What used to be abundant in the waters around Norfolk Island?
When did commercial sea hunts on Norfolk Island stop operating?
What are some species of whales that can be seen around Norfolk Island today?
What other species can be seen close to the shores of Norfolk Island?
What type of whales were once common in Norfolk Island, but hardly any remain today?
Christians make up what percentage of the population of Norfolk Island?
Who was the first chaplain of Norfolk Island?
What type of church was formed after Rev G.H. Nobbs' death in 1884?
Who led Norfolk Island's first Seventh-day Adventist church? 
Typical church congregations on Norfolk Island as of 2010 don't exceed what number?
What languages do residents of Norfolk Island speak?
What is the Norfuk language a mixture of?
The Norfuk language of Norfolk Island was first spoken by whom?
What is the official co-language of Norfolk Island?
What part of the residents of Norfolk Island could speak Norfuk as of 2011?
What is the only non-mainland Australian territory that is governed by itself?
What is the name of the Act that formerly governed Norfolk Island?
What is the name of the new Act that governs Norfolk Island, passed in 2015?
Who is the current administrator of Norfolk Island?
During 1979-2015, Legislative Assembly terms lasted no longer than how many years?
The Assembly of Norfolk Island is made of how many seats?
What method of voting does Norfolk Island use for it's Assembly?
Four members of the Assembly made up what Council, responsible for devising policy for Norfolk Island?
Who was the last Chief Minister of Norfolk Island?
What is the official name for the Minister in charge of tourism on Norfolk Island?
How many models did Australia propose to Norfolk Island's legislative assembly?
What would the more severe of the proposed plans threaten to reduce Norfolk Island's assembly to?
When did the Australian government end their review on Norfolk Island?
The Australian government said that changes to Norfolk Island's government would cause what?
When did the Commonwealth of Australia announce that Norfolk Island would no longer be governed by itself?
What did the Commonwealth want to replace the Norfolk Island government with?
From what state did the proposed council come from?
What benefits would Norfolk Island residents receive as a result of the new council?
What would Norfolk Island residents have to start paying as a result of the new council?
When did the Legislative Assembly of Norfolk Island vote regarding the proposed Australian reforms?
How many Norfolk Island residents voted on May 8, 2015?
What percentage of Norfolk Island residents voted in favor of self-governance?
Who is Norfolk Island's Chief Minister?
According to Lisle Snell, Australian Parliament thought that abolishing Norfolk Island's self-governance would be what?
Norfolk Island was originally a what?
Norfolk Island became a territory of what country?
Under what Act was Norfolk Island accepted as a territory of Australia?
Who decided in 1976 that Norfolk Island is a part of the Commonwealth?
What was a necessary qualification for voting in Norfolk Island?
What has been heavily restricted in Norfolk Island, until recently?
When were the immigration protocols relaxed in Norfolk Island?
What aided in the relaxation of immigration protocols to Norfolk Island?
What must Australian and New Zealand citizens do in order to apply for residency in Norfolk Island? 
When will the Australian migration system replace Norfolk Island's immigration policies?
What automatic right do Australian citizens and residents have on Norfolk Island after meeting the criteria in Immigration (Amendment No. 2) Act 2012?
What do citizens from other nations need in order to travel to Norfolk Island?
What do Australian citizens need in order to travel to Norfolk Island?
When someone has an Australian visa and they want to travel to Norfolk Island, where must they depart?
What will happen to travelers with an Australian visa who don't depart from the Australian Migration Zone? 
What Act declares Non-Australian residents "outside of Australia" while they are on Norfolk Island?
What does a Non-Australian citizen who is a resident need to return from Norfolk Island to the mainland?
As far as Australian nationality law goes, Norfolk Island is considered a part of what?
According to Australian nationality law, time spent by a permanent Australian resident on Norfolk Island will do what?
What is the name of the only medical center on Norfolk Island?
What are visitors of Norfolk Island recommended to purchase?
Where are Norfolk Island patients who need serious treatment flown to?
Who handles serious medical emergencies on Norfolk Island?
Who staffs the one ambulance available on Norfolk Island?
What services do Norfolk Island residents believe should be made available from the Norfolk Island's EEZ profit?
What is Norfolk Island's only major natural resource?
What is the name of the area residents of Norfolk Island are permitted to fish recreationally?
What is speculated to be available in Norfolk Island's EEZ zone?
What percentage of Norfolk Island is a permanent pasture?
Norfolk Island inhabitants and visitors don't pay what?
Who is the Chief Minister of Norfolk Island?
What reason did David Buffett give for Norfolk Island surrendering its' tax-free status?
When will income tax be introduced on Norfolk Island?
What type of services were Norfolk Island inhabitants unable to receive prior to this announcement?
How many main telephone lines were being used on Norfolk Island, as of 2004?
How many analog telephone lines were being used on Norfolk Island, as of 2004?
How many local radio stations does Norfolk Island have? 
What is the name of Norfolk Island's only TV station?
What is Norfolk Island's Internet country code top-level domain?
Where are loading jetties found on Norfolk Island?
How is a supply ship unloaded when it reaches Norfolk Island? 
What determines the jetty that's used by supply ships to Norfolk Island?
Where can you find the often-used jetty on Norfolk Island?
Who can usually be found watching supply ships unload at Norfolk Island?
When did Burke begin attending Trinity College Dublin?
What type of people did Trinity College Dublin not allow to earn degrees there?
When did Edmund Burke start a debate club?
What club did Edmund Burke's debate club merge with in 1770?
When did Edmund Burke graduate?
Which bishop didn't realize the satirical nature of Burke's book?
Which lord didn't realize the satirical nature of Burke's book?
When was the 2nd edition of Burke's book published?
Where did Burke make it clear that his book was a satire?
Who thought that Burke's imitation was too perfect to be effective ridicule?
Why did a few scholars think Burke hadn't intended his book as a satire yet later claimed it was a satire?
Whose principles did Burke imitate?
When did Burke sign a contract for a history of England?
How many words long was Burke's history of England contracted to be?
How many pages long was Burke's history of England contracted to be?
When was Burke's history of England published?
Which author's history of England being published before Burke's might have dissuaded Burke from continuing his?
What publication did Burke found?
The Annual Register covered international events of what type?
Burke was the only known writer for the Register until what year?
Burke was the chief editor for the Register until at least what year?
Who wrote a biography of Burke?
What was William Gerard Hamilton's nickname?
Who was William Gerard Hamilton's private secretary?
When did Burke become the Prime Minister's private secretary?
Who invited Burke to join the Freemasons?
What political party was Charles, Marquess of Rockingham in?
Who did Burke want constitutional limits on the power of?
What type of institution did Burke think could offer opposition to abuses of power?
What type of group were the "king's friends"?
What was Burke's most important publication about limiting royal power?
What country did Burke propose restricting trade with?
What city did Burke represent in parliament?
When did Burke make a motion to restrict Irish trade?
What was Bristol's most important industry?
Where had Paymasters been able to get money from directly until 1782?
After 1782, where would money from Paymasters' withdrawal requests go?
Whose administration repealed the Paymaster General Act?
When was the Paymaster General Act passed?
What type of government did Burke think would be inept?
For how many reasons did Burke oppose democracy?
What did Burke think could arouse common people's dangerous passions?
What type of impulses did Burke think could gain power through commoners' passions?
Who did Burke think protected unpopular minorities?
When did Burke charge Hastings for impeachment?
What was the impeachment formally called?
Which house acquitted Hastings?
Which house impeached Hastings?
Like what creature did Burke say Hastings was 'devouring the dead'?
When did Richard Price give a sermon to the Revolution Society?
What was the Revolution Society commemorating?
Who did Price think should see themselves as citizens of the world?
What philosophy did Price support?
Who did Burke say we look up to with awe?
Who did Burke say we look to with affection?
Who did Burke say we look to with reverence?
How did Burke say we look towards nobility?
How did Burke say we look towards magistrates?
Who re-translated the Reflections into French?
Which British ministers disagreed with Burke's Reflections?
What political party was Charles James Fox?
What political party was Earl Fitzwilliam?
What political party was Richard Sheridan?
Who wrote 'The Rights of Man'?
Who wrote 'A Vindication of the Rights of Men'?
Who said the Reflections were "the manifesto of a Counter Revolution"?
Who did Mackintosh compare Burke to?
What types of wisdom did Mackintosh say Burke had?
When did Burke leave the Whig party?
Who did Burke turn down money from?
What did Burke say 'envenoms everything it touches'?
Who thought that Fox and Burke could still be friends?
Who thought that Fox and Burke's friendship was lost?
What did Burke want the Whigs to condemn?
What did Burke publish on Aug 3, 1791?
Burke thought the French Revolution was against whose principles?
Burke attacked Whigs who supported what?
What did Burke think the war with France was against?
Burke hoped which country wouldn't be partitioned?
What kind of empire did Burke think the French revolutionaries wanted?
Who did Burke think the war was against, rather than France as a whole?
Who did Burke write to about the price of corn?
Who introduced a bill in 1795 about minimum wage?
Who was the Secretary of the Board of Agriculture?
Burke's unfinished letter to Arthur Young became part of what publication?
When was 'Thoughts and Details on Scarcity' published?
Whose ascendancy did Burke think was malignant?
What did Burke call corporate tyranny in India?
Which continent did Jacobinism affect?
When did Burke decide Indianism was the worst threat?
What did Burke think was the worst threat in 1795?
Which church did Burke most defend?
What did Burke think was the foundation of society?
What religion was Burke's mother?
What religion was Burke's father?
Burke thought religion was beneficial to what besides souls?
In what year did new discoveries change the course of research on Samoan origins?
In addition to linguistics and genetics, what field of study researches Samoan origins?
One theory posits that Samoans originated from what people during the Lapita expansion period?
What year marks the end of the period of the terminal eastward Lapita expansion?
What country sent their military to protect their interests in Samoa?
For how many years did the civil war in Samoa last?
How many contenders were vying for power in the war?
When did the crucial climax of the civil war occur?
What natural disaster put an end to the war in Apia harbour?
What decade marked the peak of support for opposition to New Zealand's governance?
What was the name of the Mau leader who was of Samoan and Swedish descent?
What philosophy characterized the Mau resistance?
What title was given to the Mau's elected leader, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi?
On what date did the Mau demonstrate on the streets of Apia?
What kind of weapon was used against the Mau demonstrators?
Was Chief Tamasese wounded or killed during the demonstration?
What was the phrase the Mau's chief shouted to try to calm his people?
Besides Chief Tamasese, how many Mau died as a result of the violence that erupted on that day?
What do Samoans call the historical day of the Mau demonstration?
What act gave Samoa independence?
What exact date did Samoan independence go into effect?
What's the name of the agreement that ended with the start of Samoa's independence from New Zealand?
Where was Samoa in the order of small-island countries in their region declaring independence?
On what date do Samoans celebrate their independence from New Zealand?
What do Samoans call their legislative body?
How many Fono members are there?
How many of the members of the Fono are elected to office?
What percentage of female matais are there in Samoa?
What position in government is chosen by Fono majority vote?
In which sector would the government of Samoa like to see deregulation?
The flexibility of what segment could support economic growth in Samoa?
What infrastructure has benefited greatly from capital investment?
What's the name of the team-up between Samoa and Virgin Australia?
Is Samoa helped or hurt by political upheaval in the countries around them?
What was Samoa's major production product before the Germans arrived?
What product significantly dropped in price at the end of World War I?
What did Samoa start growing more of to make up for the lost value of rubber?
Which country's government wanted Samoa to grow bananas for them?
Besides Melanesia, which country sent many workers for the cocoa and rubber plantations in Samoa?
What is copra?
How many metric tons of bananas and copra does Samoa produce each year?
What pest is the greatest threat to Samoan crops?
Are the cocoa beans grown in Samoa high or low quality?
What company produces more coffee than any other in Samoa?
What does "siva" mean in Samoan?
What's the name of the traditional Samoan dance performed by synchronized rows of dancers?
What is the name of the Samoan dance only men can perform?
What are pates?
The "slap dance" probably mimics the movements of Samoans trying to rid themselves of what creatures?
What Samoan author write Flying Fox in Freedom Tree?
In what country was Flying Fox in Freedom Tree made into a feature film?
Which Wendt novel was made into a film directed by Paul Maunder?
Who won a Commonwealth Writers' Prize for fiction for her book "Where We Once Belonged"?
What type of literature does Tusiata Avia write?
What popular Samoan band has a number in its name?
What song covered by a Samoan group was a 1974 number one in New Zealand?
What award did King Kapisi win for his song Reverse Resistance?
Which hip hop artist filmed a music video for his song Suamalie in Samoa?
What year did King Kapisi become the first hip hop artist to win an APRA Silver Scroll?
What did Lemi Ponifasio name his dance company?
What genre of music greatly influenced the culture in Samoa?
What Samoan choreographer founded Black Grace?
What professor at the University in Hawaii at Manoa wrote about the relationships between hip hop, dance, and traditional Samoan culture?
Among what age group in Samoa is hip hop and dance most popular?
Who made the film O Tamaiti?
What was Sima Urale's first feature-length production?
What movie was the first ever all-Samoan production?
Who wrote and directed The Orator?
In what year did Apron Strings star as the opening film of the NZ International Film Festival?
What do Samoans affectionately call their national rugby team?
The Samoan team hasn't missed a Rugby World Cup since what year?
What organization governs the Samoan rugby team?
What team that went on to become World Cup champions was almost bested by Manu Samoa in 2003?
In what year did Manu Samoa make it to the second round of the World Cup?
In what competition did the Samoan rugby team reach the quarter finals in 2013?
Apart from Australia, in what country other than Samoa might Samoan rugby players live?
What Samoan rugby player signed to London Irish rugby club?
How many teams played in the 2011 domestic Samoan rugby league competition?
What rugby club did Maurie Fa'asavalu play for?
What type of devotee was Pope Paul VI?
What name had not been used for a Pope since the year 1605?
In what year was the name "Paul" last used as a pontifical name before Pope Paul VI became Pope?
What did Pope Paul VI re-convene when he became Pope?
What publication promoted Pope Paul VI's views on abortion?
In what Italian province was Giovanni Battista Montini born?
In what Italian village was Giovanni Battista Montini born?
What political organization was Giovanni's father a member of?
How many brothers did Giovanni have?
What was Giovanni's mother descended from?
In what year did Montini enter the Catholic seminary to become a priest?
In what field did Montini obtain a doctorate in?
In what city did Montini finish his doctoral studies?
At what age did Montini enter the Secretariat of state?
Where did Montini continue to study at the request of Giuseppe Pizzardo?
What political problem did Montini feel he needed to address as a diplomat in Poland?
How did Montini see the nationalism of Poland as a problem?
What humanitarian concept did Montini see nationalism as violating?
What type of political stability was compromised as a result of violent nationalism?
Where was Montini happy to return to after his tenure in Poland?
What type of natural ability helped Montini in his career in the Roman Curia?
When was Paccelli elected to the papacy?
With whom did Montini have a relationship with that eventually groomed him for the papacy?
Where did Montini teach history?
Who was Montini's mentor that eventually became a Cardinal?
What department did Montini oversee when he worked with the Secretariat of State?
What organization did Montini, Maglione and Tardini belong to?
What role did Montini fill for Pius XII?
What did Montini take charge of responding to on behalf of Pius XII?
During what time was Montini responsible for the communications of the Vatican?
Who requested Montini become involved in the Church Asylum movement?
What war time group did the Vatican and Papal residence open their doors to?
How many people lived at Castel Gofolfo during the war?
What organization did Montini form with other fellow officials to help refugees?
What did Montini strive to reestablish to help persecuted Jews and allied soldiers?
In what year did Pius XII deliver a radio address announcing Montini's papal appointment?
On what date did Montini become the archbishop of Milan?
In what year did Montini become the archbishop of the Cathedral of Milan?
Where was Pius XII when he announced Montini's appointment as archbishop?
To what Italian city was Montini appointed archbishop?
What group did Montini oppose reforming?
In what year was Montini appointed to the Central Preparatory Commission? 
Where did the Pope ask Cardinal Montini to live?
What did Montini avoid as a member of the Commission for Extraordinary Affairs?
What illness had the Pope contracted?
What type of political viewpoint was Montini known for as a member of the Catholic leadership?
What part of Catholic ministry did Montini seek to reform?
What type of media did Montini use to advertise the church's sermons to the people of Milan?
How many "voices" did Montini's posters claim the people of Milan would hear?
From the 10 of NOvember to the 24 of November how many sermons were actually delivered to the Italian people?
To whom did Montini speak as an archbishop in the year 1957?
According to Montini was does the term apostolate mean?
How many nations did Montini hope to unify as Pro-secretary?
When was Montini's first meeting addressing the unification of Catholic lay followers?
What role was Montini not considered a likely candidate for?
What had Montini yet to become?
Who was elected pope in 1958?
When did Montini finally become a cardinal?
What doicese did Montini become cardinal of?
What country did Montini visit as Cardinal?
In what year did Montini travel to visit Africa as a cardinal?
How many foreign trips did Montini make as Cardinal?
In what year did Montini visit the United States?
Where did Montini like to use as a retreat as a cardinal?
What role was Montini not perceived to fill unlike some of his fellow cardinals?
In what year did Pope John XXIII die?
What role did Pope John XXIII's death precipitate the election of?
What illness caused the death of Pope John XXIII
What organization did the church expect Montini to continue?
What did Paul VI donate to the Basilica of the National Shrine of the Immaculate Conception ?
What group gave Paul VI his Papal tiara?
Where is the Basilica of the National Shrine of the Immaculate Conception located?
Who was the last pope to be crowned?
What ceremony had Paul VI left in place in in the 1975 apostolic constitution?
Who was President of the Christian Unity Secretariat?
What did Paul VI believe in keeping friendly to people of other Christian faiths?
Who insisted that Protestant and Orthodox Christians be invited to all Counsel meetings?
Which cardinal became heavily engaged in the passage of Nostra aetate?
Which Vatican strove to avoid offending other Christian faiths with counsel session language?
What did Paul VI want to keep open with the modern world and people from all walks of life?
How many days after Paul VI election did he announce he would continue the Vatican II?
On what date was Vatican II re convened?
Six days after he was elected, what did Paul VI announce he would continue? 
What did Paul want to reform as a newly elected pope?
What edict did Pope Pius XXIII issue regarding the body of Christ?
How is the body of Christ regarded by Catholic liturgy?
What type of language did Paul VI want to the church to relay dogma in?
From what area were bishops prevented from attending the ecumenical meeting of Paul VI?
What did Paul VI ask other Christian faiths forgiveness for?
What topic did Paul VI see as the most important to the church counsel?
What did the American Counsel of Bishops rally for?
What Saint did Paul VI denote as mother of the Catholic church?
Who did Paul VI feel was most important in the Catholic Hierarchy?
In what year did Paul VI formally appoint Mary as mother of the Catholic church?
What did Paul VI enact between the third and fourth ecumenical sessions?
What does the Catholic church considered "mixed" in a "mixed marriage"?
In what year was Paul Vi's final counsel session?
With whom did Paul VI celebrate surviving persecution in other countries?
For whom did Paul VI work for from 1922 to 1954?
In what year did Paul VI issue a regulation?
With whom did Paul VI issue a regulation in 1968?
What did Paul Vi's reforms reduce in the Curia?
Whose representation was enlarged through reforms in the Curia?
At what age were cardinals restricted by Paul Vi from participating in conclaves?
At what age were bishops required to retire by Paul VI?
At what age were cardinals subsequently required to retire in an edict issued in 1970?
What did Paul VI over hall with age and retirement restrictions?
When was Paul Vi's Ecclesiae Sanctae issued?
What language was traditionally used in Roman Catholic services?
What were revised between 1951 and 1955?
What was re instated to the Easter liturgy by reform?
What type of service did Paul Vi announce reformed in 1969?
How many new prayers were included in the official mass reforms of 1969?
Who established the Pontifical Council for Culture?
What organization did Paul VI create to address non believers by the church?
What was the Secretariat for non-believers eventually renamed?
What Prime Minister did Paul VI attempt to interact with in order to help Catholics in Communist countries?
What is celebrated by the Catholic church on January 1 of every year?
In what year was pre and extra marital sex outlawed by the Catholic church?
Who was accused of being a homosexual in 1976?
Who brought allegations of Montini's homosexuality?
On what date did Montini publicly address charges of homosexuality?
Who was Montini's alleged lover?
What group did Paul VI address in New York in 1965?
Who was the first pope to visit the United States?
To whom did Paul VI give a diamond cross and ring in hopes it would raise funds to help people globally?
What did Paul VI ask the UN to promote during the Vietnam war?
What US president was in office when Paul VI visited America for the first time?
What number doubled during Paul Vi's papacy?
Who did Paul Vi want to maintain a continuing dialogue with?
What document states that the Catholic church is not subject to any particlar government?
Who did the church retain the right to elect without interference from the state in its constitutional document?
What organization officially outlined the church's relationship to state?
What catholic document compares the Catholic church to the body of Christ?
What document declares that the Roman Catholic church lives within the body of Christ?
What was being celebrated in the Catholic calendar when the Eccelsiam suam was given in 1964?
On what date is the Feat of Transfiguration celebrated?
In what city  is the cathedral of St Peter's  located?
What is considered an ideal state for priests in the Catholic church?
What is seen as symbolizing the reality of living in the modern world as Roman Catholic priest?
What document  of 1967 promotes the church's stance of celibacy in the priesthood?
What type of law locked down the Catholic church's stance on celibacy in the priesthood?
In what year was Canon Law issued affirming celibacy in the priesthood?
Which one of Paul Vi's encyclicals best known in Catholic history?
What did Paul VI's Humanae Vitae condemn?
What type of birth control is condemned by the Catholic church?
How many encyclicals did Paul VI publish?
What does Humanae Vitae mean?
According to Paul VI  to whom are a  man and woman in union with besides each other?
What does God contribute to a married couple's child?
Who is considered to be love?
From whom is married love generated?
What type of relations did Paul VI's Humanae VItae discuss?
To whom did Paul VI tell "not to be afraid" when the church released its statement on birth control?
What did Paul VI declare he would be seen as in 25 years?
To which pope can the Evangelium Vitae be attributed to?
Which pope affirmed Paul VI Humanae Vitae?
To what did Western Europe and the United States demonstrate a negative response?
In what city did the pope encourage visits from Catholics from other countries?
In how many ways did Paul VI contribute to an ecumenical dialogue between Catholics?
In Paul VI's view what does the Catholic ecumenical dialogue require from someone?
How much of the person is needed to fully engage in a ecumenical dialogue according to Paul VI?
To what historical figure can the words "Do you love me more" be attributed?
What statement addressed the relationship of Italy to Greece in the Catholic church?
In what year was the Catholic-Orthodox joint declaration read?
In what city was the Catholic-Orthodox joint declaration read?
Who visited the Vatican in May of 1973 in an effort to negotiate Orthodox and Catholic relations?
How many times did Coptic Patriarch Shenouda III meet with Paul VI in 1973?
Who was the first pope to meet with an Anglican Archbishop as an official Head of Church since 1960?
Who was Archbishop of Canterbury during Paul VI papacy?
How many times did Archbishop Ramsey meet with Paul VI?
What center did Archbishop Ramsey open in Rome to improve Anglican and Catholic relations?
In what Italian center was the Anglican center opened in by Archbishop Ramsey?
What did the Cardinal Augustin Bea's Secretariat promote?
What group condemned mixed faith marriages?
To what type of non Catholic denomination was Paul VI considered to be a great ally of?
Which church did Paul VI call "our beloved sister church"?
Who described the Anglican church as "our beloved sister Church"?
In what year was a group created to work with the World Council of Churches to increase dialogue between Catholic Christians and other Christian denominations?
In what year did the World Council of Churches meet in Uppsala, Sweden?
What type of theologians did the World Council of Churches decide to include in their committees?
In what country did the World Council of Churches meet in 1968?
Whose backing did the World Council of Churches require Catholic theologians serving on joint committees to have?
Who was Paul VI in favor of cooperating with in the translation of the bible?
Who asked Paul VI for permission to cooperate with Protestants to translate the bible?
In what year did Paul VI officially declare his support of a cross faith translation of the bible?
What group of Christians did Paul VI support and approve of cooperation with?
Where was Paul VI headed to on July 14, 1978?
What was considered to be the papal summer residence?
Who was the Italian Prime Minister in July of 1978?
For how long did an ailing Paul VI meet with Sandro Pertini in 1978?
What animals did Paul VI consider to be "the most beautiful animals God ever created"?
In what year was Paul VI beautified?
On what day was Paul VI born?
Whose liturgical feast is celebrated on the 26th of September?
On what day was the beautification ceremony performed for Paul VI?
What was attributed to Paul VI and officially approved on May 9, 2014?
According to the Vatican who could the healing of an unborn child be attributed to in the 1990's?
Who approved the miracle of Paul VI?
What group was responsible for recognizing Paul Vi's miracle?
What is the process called that acknowledges sainthood?
What magazine broke the story of Paul VI pending saint hood?
What type of miracle was attributed to Pope Paul VI?
What group declared the healing a miracle by Paul VI?
Who needed to approve the Congregation for the Causes of Saints conclusion that Paul VI performed a miracle?
Who was required to sign a decree declaring Paul VI a saint?
What was Pius XII accused of not condemning?
Whose theology did Paul VI continue to propagate during his papacy?
What type of work did Paul Vi finish that had been started by two previous popes?
On which anniversary of his Humanae Vitae did Paul VI reconfirm the beliefs set forth by the Humanae Vitae? 
Which pope that preceded Paul VI was noted for his warmth and humor?
Who did Paul VI refuse to excommunicate?
What did many other Catholics and Christians consider Paul VI reforms to be?
To what can the dissent among Catholics be attributed to during Paul VI's papacy?
What was the reintroduction of divorced Catholics into the church considered to be by the Council?
How many Synod of Bishops took place during Paul VI's papacy?
What conferences became a requirement after Vatican II?
What political movement was Paul VI criticized for having a relationship with?
The Council, under Paul VI, decided whom could make decisions independently of Rome?
How many of his bishop's decisions did Paul VI end up enacting?
How long did Paul VI live for after experiencing a massive heart attack in 1978?
At what time did Paul VI die?
On what day did Paul VI die?
From where did Paul VI conduct mass on the day of his death?
What residence was the Paul VI staying in on the day of his death?
What type of theatrical uniforms did Paul VI eradicate from the Vatican?
Who was the first pope to visit five continents?
Where did Paul Vi turn the focus of the church toward during his papacy?
What group of clergy did Paul VI include in Vatican decision making that had previously been denied influence in this realm?
What papal statement under Paul VI opened the Vatican doors to global influences?
For which country did George VI stop using the title Emperor but continue to use the title of King?
In what month and year did George VI discontinue using the title Emperor of India?
In 1949 what country solely proclaimed independence from the Commonwealth?
What Child of George VI ascended the throne?
What was the name used after the dissolution of the British Empire?
What year was Britain and allies victorious in the war?
When did India and Pakistan gain independence?
What title did George have in India prior to 1948?
What did Ireland declare itself in 1950?
What month and day was the death of Prince Albert?
Who was Prince Albert's great grandmother?
What was Prince Albert's nickname?
In which church was Prince Albert baptized?
What position was Albert appointed at Cranwell?
Which number squadron was Albert appointed commanding officer in 1918?
What year did Albert become a RAF pilot?
Who was the king of Belgium  in 1918?
What did Albert study in Trinity College?
What was Albert's nickname as he toured coal mines, factories, and railyards?
Who is Albert's older brother?
Which sport was Albert proficient at?
Which society was Albert the president of?
Who was Albert infatuated with?
Who was the youngest daughter of Earl and Countess of Strathmore and Kinghorne?
How many times did Elizabeth reject Albert's proposal?
Who were royals usually expected to marry?
Why did Albert fear speaking in public?
Who helped Albert improve in public speaking?
What did Albert play partnered with a black man?
What did the Duke open in Australia in 1927? 
Why was Albert the heir presumptive to the throne?
What was wrong with Edward marrying Wallis Simpson?
What did Edward do to marry Wallis Simpson?
Who is Edward's mother?
How did Edward react when he became heir to the throne?
What is the Oireachtas?
What did the Oireachtas remove from the Irish constitution?
Which act gave the monarch limited authority in Ireland?
What day did the Oireachtas pass an act that started to establish Ireland as a republic?
What regnal name did Albert adopt?
What title did Albert give Edward?
What did Albert bestow onto his wife on his 41st birthday?
Which two residences did Albert buy from Edward?
What day did George VI become coronated?
Who attended the coronation that was a break from tradition?
How many overseas tours happened after the coronation to France and North America?
In which city are Durbars usually held?
Which prime minister was the King constitutionally bound to support?
Which agreement was signed in 1938?
The balcony in which palace is famous for being where the royal family makes appearances?
Which historian commented that the king's act in associating with Chamberlain as unconstitutional?
Which two countries did the King and Queen tour in 1939?
Who was the prime minister of Canada in 1939?
What title was the king and queen presented with when touring Canada?
What was Roper's position?
What did the Statute of Westminster do?
What kind of tendencies did North America have?
Who was George's predecessor?
Who was the President of the United States in 1939?
Which fair was happening in New York in 1939?
Against who did Britain declare war against in 1939?
Which city did the king and queen stay in even with the bombing threats?
How many people died on the first German raid on London?
What year did the King's brother die in service?
Who was Winston Churchill's predecessor?
What position did Churchill hold?
What day of the week did Churchill and the King meet?
Who did Churchill appoint to Cabinet that the King did not like?
What country did the King and Queen visit in July 1944?
When did the King and Queen visit North Africa and Malta?
What improved when the King and Queen visited different military sites?
What is the association of independent states in Britain called?
What two dominions did British India become?
What country left the Commonwealth in January 1948?
What year was the Republic of Ireland formed?
Who was the Prime Minister of South Africa in 1947?
What were the King's South African bodyguards referred as? 
Who instructed the King to only shake hands with whites in South Africa?
What kind of cancer did the King develop?
What developed in the King's right leg that prevented him from touring Australia?
What treatment helped prevent the loss of the King's right leg?
Who was the King's heir presumptive?
Who was Elizabeth's spouse?
What church did the King's funeral take place on the 15th?
What year did Queen Elizabeth die?
What year did Princess Margaret die?
In which chapel does King George's body lie in today? 
How high was public faith in the monarchy when King George assumed the throne?
What position did George Hardie hold?
Who was George VI's brother?
What is the largest rating of an electric motor?
What is the main example of a DC power source?
What does AC stand for?
What does DC stand for?
In what device are small motors commonly found?
When were developers competing with Jacobi able to match his accomplishments?
What was Jacobi's improved motor used to propel?
Who created the first real electric motor?
Who broke the world record set by Jacobi's first motor?
How long did it take for Jacobi's first world record to be broken?
Who developed the first mnotor capable of being used for machinery?
Which inventor went bankrupt?
What was the main problem with applying early electric motors to industry?
What necessary technical development had yet to occur to make electric motors useful?
How fast did Sturgeon and Davenport's motors run?
How much energy do electric motors use in the modern United States?
In what domain did electric motors reduce reliance on humans and animals?
Besides shafts, belts and compressed air, what did electric motors reduce the need for?
Where did electric motors improve convenience and safety?
What would a rotor do without current reversal?
What switches the input of most DC motors?
From where is current to the motor supplied?
What two motor types are ascendant today?
What does the communicator do?
What type of current is featured in brushed DC motors?
Where do brushes get their power?
What is the main feature of the shaft in a commutated DC motor?
Current flowing to create a temporary magent is called what?
What rotates the motor shaft?
What element of the motor keeps the poles from alligning?
What non-motor device demonstrates why a commutator is needed?
What are large brushes favorable for?
Whate are small brushes favorable for?
What type of brushes are cheapest?
How can the speed of larger brushes be increased?
Besides wear, what is a downside of stiff brush springs?
What can a PM motor not be adjusted for?
What is another name for PM fields?
What design feature does a PM motor lack?
What do field windings provide?
Why do miniature PM motors use high energy magnets?
What are high energy magnets typically made of?
What does the outer housing of a miniature motor resemble?
How do PMs rate against other types of electric motors?
What is the typical maximum range of universal motors?
What type of motor was used in trailway traction applications?
What is the result of using AC power on a DC motor?
What were universal motor pole pieces constructed from?
What kind of motor can employ both AC and DC?
What component of a universal motor is most likely to fail?
When is torque most important in universal motor applications?
Switching the field winding in washing machines causes the drum to agitate how?
How is stepped speed control achieved?
At around what RMP do weed trimmer motors operate?
At around what RMP do miniature grinders operate?
What type of motor can universal motors operate much faster than?
What attributes make universal motors desireable for consumer applications like hair dryers?
What determines the properties of speed and torque?
At high speed, where is the most current?
Is the current frequency higher or lower at high speed?
Changing the shapes of the bars creates what?
Where can variable resistance be created?
Where might a resistor be attached?
What can a resistor control?
How might wasted power be salvaged?
From where may a converter be fed?
What will a motor do if the load is reduced?
What will a motor do if the load is increased?
Where are slip losses dissipated?
How efficient is such a design?
How are torque motors used in computer gaming?
A torque motor at low voltage provides what?
A torque motor at high voltage provides what?
In a tape drive, what is not needed if a torque motor is used?
What element of a combustion engine does a governor monitor?
What is a governor connected to?
What kinds of adjustments would a governor make?
What would a governor do to a too-fast running engine?
How much slip does a synchronous motor have?
How does an induction motor produce torque?
Whithout rotor windings, how must a Hammond clock be started?
How can a synchronous motor be made more like an induction motor?
How is current brought to the rotor in a synchronous motor?
What do hysteresis synchronous motors' rotors do when slip rate decreases?
When in operation, what do hysteresis synchronous motors poles do?
What do hysteresis synchronous motors resemble at startup?
How can a hysteresis synchronous motor's rotor be described?
What do the distributed poles of a hysteresis synchronous motor resemble?
What type of motor has two independent multiphase winding sets?
What advanage do independent multiphase winding sets have?
What is one of the independent multiphase winding sets configured for?
Doubly fed motors have what advantage over single fed?
A coreless DC motor is distinguished by what?
What is absent in a coreless DC motor?
What forms can the rotor take?
What is a likely problem of coreless DC motors?
How does a coreless rotor compare to traditional rotors in terms of weight?
What advantage does a coreless rotor have over traditional variants?
The lack of a metal mass in the core causes what function to be absent?
How is a coreless motor cooled?
What was the original purpose for pancake motors?
What are advantages of pancake motors?
For what type of military applications are pancake motors currently used?
What type of servo-controlled systems use pancake motors?
What may servo motors be used for?
What must be well understood when applying a servo motor for use?
What factors limit performance of servo motors?
Large, slow servos can use what types of motors?
When might coreless motors be used in servo applications?
How do servo motors differ from stepper motors?
How does a stepper system achieve stability?
What makes a printer home switch work?
What kind of counter keeps track of a print head's position?
A stepper system's motor is relied on to not do what?
What is a trait of a sophisticated stepper motor?
What does proportinal control of the field windings in a stepper motor achieve?
What is another name for smooth rotation?
With what other device are stepper motors most versatile?
List two alternatives to rotary stepper motors in printer applications.
In scanners, what do stepper motors move?
In printers and copiers, what do stepper motors move?
Voltage opposing the motor supply voltage is called what?
EMP is proportional to what?
Voltage at the brushes is equal to what?
If load increases, what happens to current drawn?
What needs to be known to calculate torque?
How are the many calculations to determine torque done?
How is torque determined?
What is the formulia to determine torque?
What are factors that determine shaft torque?
Whate decides the size of an electromagnetic core?
What limits excessive torque?
What is the only device with dual ported transformer circuit topology?
What is a brushless wound-rotor?
How does a brushless wound rotor achieve stability?
What is the theoretical maximum of a brushless wound rotor?
What determines continuous torque density?
What three elements determine the size of the air-gap area and back iron depth?
What does continuous torque density refer to?
How does continuous torque density vary between well designed motors?
What type of motor is based on the attraction and repulsion of electric charge?
What are electrostatic motors like two of?
What type of power supply do electrostatic motors usually have?
What two inventors developed the first electrostatic motors?
Micro-electro mechanical systems prefer what type of motor?
In what year was the toponym Schwyz first attested as Old High German Suittes?
At what time did the name Schwyz begin to be used by the entire Confederation?
What was the Swiss German name for Schwyz?
What was the name d'Schwiiz used for?
In what year did the fall of the Agri Decumates territory transform today's Switzerland?
In about 260 AD, what forced the people of Roman towns to find shelter in Roman fortresses?
What was the name of the concept used by the Roman Empire when building another line of defense at the north border?
What increased pressure forced the Romans to abandon their line of defense concept at the end of the 4th century?
Who was allowed to settle on the Swiss plateau by the end of the 4th century?
From the end of the 4th century, what territory was the western extent of modern-day Switzerland part of?
Where did the Alemanni settle in the 5th century?
Where did the Alemanni settle in the 8th century, forming Alemannia?
In the 8th century, what two kingdoms made up Modern-day Switzerland?
What Empire did the entire region of Modern-day Switzerland become part of in the 6th century?
Which Battle was the first to interrupt the seeming invincibility of the Old Swiss Confederacy in 1515?
What inter-cantonal conflicts resulted in the Wars of Kappel?
In what year did European countries first recognize Switzerland's independence from the Holy Roman Empire?
In what two years were the Wars of Kappel?
Under the Peace of Westphalia, who finally recognized Switzerland's neutrality?
Who refused to fight alongside the Helvetic Republic when it was invaded by the Russians and Austrians?
During the Helvetic Republic, which forces invaded Switzerland when war broke out between France and its rivals?
What Act was the result of a meeting of Swiss politicians organized by Napolean?
What was the Act of Mediation responsible for restoring?
How many cantons were introduced as a Confederation by the Act of Mediation?
What example inspired much of a new Swiss constitution providing for a federal layout?
Under the new Swiss constitution, what did the cantons have the right to self-govern?
How many houses was the Swiss national assembly divided into?
What was the name of the upper house, which included 2 representatives from each canton?
What was the name of the lower house, whose representatives were elected throughout the country?
Though invasion plans were drawn up the the Germans, which war did Switzerland escape attack during?
Who was the head of the Swiss central command during World War II?
What did General Henry Guisan order a general mobilisation of during World War II?
What was the original goal of the Swiss military strategy?
What were the Reduit?
Who blockaded Switzerland's trade during World War II?
What was severed in 1942, leaving Switzerland completely surrounded by the Axis?
How many refugees did Switzerland intern during World War II?
When did the financial relationship Switzerland had with Nazi Germany begin to raise controversy?
Where was the International Red Cross based?
In what year did Switzerland become a full member of the United Nations?
What did Swiss voters agree to join on June 5, 2005?
What percentage of Swiss voters voted to join the Schengen treaty?
Though Switzerland is a founding member of the EFTA, what are they not a member of?
What has completely surrounded Switzerland and Liechtenstein since 1995?
Where are Switzerland's glacial conditions located?
What is typical weather in Switzerland during the summer months?
What can the lower lands, suffering from inversion, sometimes lack for weeks?
What is the climate on Switzerland's southern tip?
What rank was Switzerland in safeguarding the environment according to the 2014 Environmental Performance Index?
What do mountainous regions have that make their ecosystems particularly fragile?
What is the ecosystem in the alpine region particularly sensitive to?
What sources of energy does Switzerland heavily rely on?
When was Switzerland's Federal Constitution adopted?
When was a new Constitution adopted in Switzerland?
How many main governing bodies are on the federal level in Switzerland?
What is the legislative body of the Swiss government called?
What is the executive body of the Swiss government called?
How many members are on the National Council?
How long do members of both houses of the Swiss Parliament serve?
What are both houses of the Swiss Parliament collectively known as when both are in joint session?
What can citizens use to challenge any law passed by Parliament?
What can citizens use to introduce amendments to the federal constitution?
What serves as the collective Head of State?
How many members are in the Federal Council?
Who elects the members of the Federal Council?
What is the traditional term for the President of the Confederation?
Who elects the President of the Confederation from its 7 members?
How many legal jurisdictions are Swiss citizens subject to?
What are the legal jurisdictions that Swiss citizens are subject to?
What type of democracy was defined in the 1848 federal constitution?
What two things do citizens have the right to submit to overturn parliamentary decisions?
What are the two hallmarks of the Swiss political system?
How many voters are needed to put a constitutional amendment to a national vote?
How long do citizens have to collect enough votes for a national vote on a constitutional amendment?
What can Parliament supplement the amendment proposed by the citizens with?
What must voters do on the ballot when Parliament adds a supplement?
How much of the national popular vote and the cantonal popular vote is needed to pass a constitutional amendment?
When was Switzerland's policy of neutrality internationally recognized?
What was Switzerland the first state to join the U.N. by?
What have the Swiss people continually rejected membership in since the 1990's?
How long has Switzerland traditionally been neutral?
How does Switzerland treat alliances that might entail military or political action?
How long has Switzerland hosted the United Nations Human Rights Council?
What is the second biggest centre for the U.N.?
Where did the Red Crescent Movement begin?
Where is the League of Nations located?
Besides the U.N. Headquarters, who hosts many U.N. agencies?
What does the ILO stand for?
What is disucussed at the World Economic Forum in Davos?
What does BIS stand for?
What does UNHCR stand for?
Where do Swiss militia keep their Army issued equipment?
Who has compulsory military service in Switzerland?
Who can serve in the Swiss military voluntarily?
What replaced Army 95 in 2003?
In Army XXI, how many are active in periodic army training?
How does the Swiss economy rank worldwide by nominal GDP?
How does the Swiss economy rank worldwide by purchasing power parity?
What ranking does Switzerland hold in terms of GDP per capita, adjusting for purchasing power, according to the World Bank?
Which rating was assigned to Switzerland by the Index of Economic Freedom of 2010?
What percentage of employees belonged to a trade union in 2004?
How many people work in Switzerland?
What was the unemployment rate in Switzerland in 2014?
What was the foreign citizen population percentage in Switzerland in 2014?
What was the peak unemployment rate reached in December, 2009?
How is Switzerland ranked of 189 countries in the Ease of Doing Business Index?
According to Credit Suisse, what percentage of residents own their homes?
How do Switzerland's tax rates compare by Western World standards?
What size was the Swiss Federal budget in 2010?
What are the two main sources of income for the federal government?
Which sectors are the main source of expenditures for the federal government?
Which sectors have experienced a reduction in federal government expenditures?
How much were expenditures estimated to be cut in agriculture and national defense in 2015?
Who has authority of school systems in Switzerland?
What is the minimum age for primary school in all cantons?
What do most cantons provide for free when children are 4 or 5 years old?
When was English introduced as a first foreign language in many cantons?
How long does primary school continue?
What is the world's largest laboratory?
Who co-hosts CERN along with the French department of Ain?
What research is CERN dedicated to?
What notable Swiss invention won the nobel prize?
Who invented the pressurized balloon?
How has Switzerland maintained its relationships with the EU?
In recent years, what have the Swiss brought their economic practices into conformity with?
What have the Swiss tried to enhance by conforming to EU economic practices?
How much did the Swiss economy grow in 2010?
Which conservative party is popularly against joining the EU?
How many bilateral agreements did Bern and Brussels sign to further liberalise trade ties?
What was included in the first series of bilateral agreements pertaining to people?
When was a second series of 9 bilateral agreements signed?
What has since happened to the second series of bilateral agreements?
What were the original bilateral agreements meant to minimize the negative consequences of?
In 2006, what did Switzerland approve 1 billion francs of supportive investment for?
What have the Swiss been under EU and national pressure to reduce in terms of banking?
What have the Swiss been under pressure from the EU to do in terms of tax rates?
In February of 2014, what did Swiss voters narrowly approve to restrict?
What was reintroduced on the influx of foreigners in February of 2014?
Which centres of Switzerland mostly rejected the quota system for foreigners?
What was the rejection rate of the quota system by the French speaking part of Switzerland?
What do some news commentators claim is violated by the restricted immigration proposal?
What was the former 10-year moratorium on the construction of nuclear plants the result of?
What accident caused the delay in plans for the new nuclear power plant in Bern?
What does SFOE stand for?
What does DETEC stand for?
What is the 2000-watt society initiative designed to cut by more than half by 2050?
In 2011, what time frame did the Swiss government give for ending its use of nuclear energy?
What reason did the Swiss government give for ending its use of nuclear energy?
When is Switzerland's first nuclear reactor scheduled to be taken offline?
When is Switzerland's last nuclear reactor scheduled to be taken offline?
Who is the Doris Leuthard?
When did Switzerland sign the Kyoto Protocol?
When did Switzerland ratify the Kyoto Protocol
What was formed by Switzerland, Mexico, and the Republic of Korea?
What percentage of recyclable materials are being recycled in Switzerland?
How did the 2010 Global Green Economy Index rank Switzerland?
In 2010, what percentage of the population was made up of foreigners?
Who were the largest single group of foreigners in 2010?
What percentage of the population aged 15 and over were shown to have an immigrant background as of 2012?
What percentage of the immigrants were born in Switzerland as of 2012?
In the 2000's, what was the concern perceived toward immigrants by institutions?
How many linguistic regions of Switzerland have their own form of local dialect?
What dialect is increasing in German speaking regions?
What has happened to the local dialects in the French speaking regions?
Where do dialects tend to be limited to in the Italian speaking regions?
What are terms that are not used outside of Switzerland known as?
Where are the most frequent characteristics of Helvetisms found?
What do current French dictionaries include several hundred of?
How much of the Swiss population live in urban areas?
From the beginning of the 21st century, how does the population growth in urban areas compare to the countryside?
How many years did it take Switzerland to go from a largely urban country to a rural one?
What is the predominant religion of Switzerland?
What religion has immigration brought by 4.95%? 
What religion has immigration brought by 2%?
According to a 2015 Gallup Poll, what percentage of Swiss people are convinced atheists?
What percentage of the Christian population is Catholic?
What percentage of Swiss people claimed no church affiliation in 2012?
According to the census of 2000, what percentage of Swiss are pentecostal?
According to the census of 2000, what percentage of Swiss are Jehova's Witnesses?
According to the census of 2000, what percentage of Swiss are Buddhists?
What symbolism has played an important role in shaping the history of Switzerland?
What highly energetic culture is in some concentrated mountain areas in the winter?
What is the name of the trumpet like musical instrument made of wood has become the epitome of traditional Swiss music?
What traditional culture predominates in many areas of small farms?
What was hosted for the 10th time by Switzerland in 2009?
What was the name of the 1st European sailing team to win America's cup in 2013?
Which Swiss professional wrestler is currently signed with WWE?
Which Swiss sailing team was the 1st to win America's Cup in 2003?
Which popular Swiss sport is a cross between baseball and golf?
Which old, traditional sport is considered to be the national sport by some Swiss?
What is thrown in the Swiss competition Steinstossen?
Which Swiss population is the only one to have practiced Steinstossen since prehistoric times?
What was the name of the 83.5 kg stone that symbolized the Unspunnenfest, first held in 1805?
What is the most popular alcoholic drink in Switzerland?
When were vineyards first cultivated in Switzerland?
What type of wine comprises a small majority of wine produced in Switzerland?
What are the two most widespread varieties of wines in Switzerland?
What 4 terrain variations are credited for Switzerland's notable variety of grapes grown?
In the latter part of the 19th century what country took control of Mali?
What year did Mali gain independence as the Mali Federation?
Along with a new constitution, Mali became what type of state in 1991?
Mali was once part of how many West African empires?
What was the name of the Empire that the country is now named after?
The Sonhgai Empire's demise was due to what invasion?
What century did Songhai become independent from Mali?
Who was the commander of the Moroccan invasion of 1591? 
What type of trading routes did Europeans make that compounded to the profound effect?
What year was the constitution amended from the previous one of 1992?
The newer constitution divide power among what branches of government?
How many years is one presidential term for?
How many total terms can a president be elected for?
Executive power is given to what person within the government?
Who is given both titles of commander of armed forces and chief of state?
What group is Mali's sole legislative party?
The Alliance of democracy and Progress has how many seats as of 2007?
How many legislative assemblies are  held each year?
Who is considered head of government and assigns the council of ministers?
What is Mali's highest court?
What controls do the supreme court have?
Constitutional Court provides what type of review of legislative acts?
Constitutional Court also serves as what type of arbiter?
Local disputes in rural areas are usually handled by what individuals?
Roughly how many Malians are descendants of slaves?
What is the estimate of current Mali enslavement?
What group of people were known to keep Malian salves into the 20th century?
The darker skinned Bella people are also refereed to as what name?
What region of the country is historical slavery well known?
Ethnic tension are between what two groups of people?
Radical Islam and the Tuaregs are both considered problematic according to whom?
What group of people are trying to establish sharia law?
What type of hereditary relationships still exist today?
Songhai and Tuaregs both complain about what same issue towards each other?
What is the purpose of an NPO?
What does an NPO do with it's surplus income?
What is the constraint's upon an NPO's financial distributions called?
What is the definition of a non-profit organization?
What is an NPO also known as?
What is the purpose of an NPO?
What does a non-profit do with the money it takes in, instead of using it for a profit?
What is it called when a non-profit uses it's money as it should?
How does an NPO have to handle surplus money?
Who makes most of the decisions for an NPO?
How do NPOs handle staffing?
What are token fees used for?
How are charity or service NPOs usually organized?
What type of organization behaves much like a foundation?
 What is a major function of a foundation?
What are the two top types of NPOs?
How is a membership organization run?
How is a board only organization run?
What is a further constraint of an NPO, depending on their legal structure?
What should one be aware of when dealing with a board run NPO?
How are NPOs classified in Canada?
How has Canada's government kept up with the changing forms of NPOs?
How do NPOs change their by-laws, if they had to apply for incorporation by Letters Permit, in Canada?
How does Alberta handle NPOs filing for incorporation?
How is incorporation handled in Ontario?
When was the Canada Corporations Act, Part II repealed?
What did the creation of the Canada Not-for-Profit Corporations Act mean for NPOs?
When did Ontario adopt the Canada Not-for-Profit Corporations Act?
When does Ontario expect the Canada Not-for-Profits Corpaoations Act to go into effect?
When was the Canada Not-for-Profit corporations Act last ammended?
Who grants a charitable status to an NPO in Canada?
What are donors to receive from a NPO?
How does an NPO keep their charitable status?
How does the Canada Revenue Agency decide who can have a charitable status?
What kinds of assets must the NPO spend in order to keep it's charitable status?
What do NPOs in South Africa give to their donors?
What can a tax certificate issued by a South Africian NPO be used for?
Where are South Africian NPOs registered?
Who keeps track of the trusts of South Africian NPOs?
Who would a South Africian NPO register with if they were a voluntary organization?
What is the definition of a charity?
Where are charity organizations registered in England and Wales?
Where would an NPO or charity organization register in Scotland?
What is one of the contraints of an NPO with regards to assets?
Is a trade union governed by the Office of the Scottish Charity Regulator?
How does a US NPO apply for tax exempt status?
What are some things the IRS looks at in a charity applying for tax exempt status?
Does this tax exempt status apply to other taxes?
What happens if an NPO does not abide by the tax laws?
Who has the final say on whether or not an NPO is granted tax exempt status?
What form must an NPO make available to the public?
Are the state requirements to be tax exempt the same as the Federal requirements?
What financial form must be filed with both the state and federal governments each year?
What is one example of an NPO in the United States?
What can states or cities offer to NPOs?
Who is in control of the organization?
Who does the board hire to help with running the organization?
How is the board of directors most often chosen?
How is a board of directors less commonly chosen?
Where, on Form 990, does an organization have to list what type of board they have?
What are ways that a charitable foundation receives money for it's cause?
What type of funding do charitable organizations typically rely on?
What are some problems that affect employee retention and volunteers?
What legislation did the US introduce to try and help the NPOs?
When was the Nonprofit Sector and Community Solutions Act adopted?
What is the biggest concern of non-profits in Australia?
When was the Commonwealth Aboriginal Councils and Associations Act adopted?
When was the Associations Incorporation Act adopted?
What does the Associations Incorporation Act cover?
Who covers incorporated associations or councils?
What kind of marketing budgets do NPOs usually have?
Why is marketing harder for NPOs?
What does an NPO need to have in order to begin thinking about expansion or rebranding?
What is a moer low-key way that NPOs can get access to marketing and word of mouth?
How is resource mismanagement allowed to happen so easily?
How can an NPO help to prevent financial problems?
What can a large influx of money from a for-profit company do to an organization?
What can constitute accounting fraud when nothing is recorded?
What is a major hurdle of the financial aspect of an NPO?
What problems with employment do Non Profits face?
What are positions that employees really want, but there are never enough of?
How important do NPOs consider hiring?
What is a primary interest to prospective NPO employees?
How do employees that are no longer with NPOs feel about the time that they worked there?
What can the public and private sector offer employers that NPOs usually cannot?
What types of employees do NPOs usually attract?
What is something that causes a huge problem with employment in NPOs?
Where are young grads looking for that NPOs?
Can Npos match the wages of public and private sector employers?
What should NPOs focus on offering employees instead of high wages?
What is better than having high pay at an NPO?
How much should an NPO pay employees?
What are other incentives that NPO emplotees can be offered instead of higher wages?
What is one of the wealthiest nonprofit organizations in America?
What NPO was origionally funded by Hughes Aircraft?
How much is the Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation worth?
How much is the Howard Hughes Medical Institute worth?
What is one of the largest NPOs outside of the United States?
What does .org on a URL mean?
Are only NPOs allowed to use .org?
What is included in the list of organizations allowed to use .org?
Is there an agency that decides if someone is using the domain designation incorrectly?
What new domain designation should a museum use?
What university is in Raleigh?
What is the MSA of Raleigh?
What is the Triangle?
What is another university in the triangle?
When was the Triangle created?
What kind of city is Raleigh?
What year was it incorporated?
What happened in the 20th century?
What war was near the city?
What type of community is it?
What energy center is downtown?
What university is in Raleigh?
What is the first historically black university?
What president was born in Raleigh?
What is the name of the amphitheater in Raleigh?
How many miles is the city from Isaac's Tavern?
Why is Isaac Hunter's Tavern popular?
What was Raleigh as a city?
What were the original boundaries?
What city was the plan based on?
Who was the governor during the Civil War?
What did the governor order constructed?
What was Raleigh captured by in the Civil War?
Who led the cavalry in the capture?
Why did the city not grow during the Civil War?
What year did the News and the Observer merge?
What is Raleigh's daily newspaper?
What was North Carolina State called before?
What year was the college founded?
When did Merideth College open?
When was the last time two black congressmen were elected?
What district were the congressmen in 1898 from?
What happened in 1900?
When did blacks lose the right to vote?
When did black regain the right to vote?
When was the Great Depression?
What did the city provide during the Great Depression?
What was dedicated in 1932?
What year was the North Carolina Symphony founded?
What was charted in 1939?
Where is Raleigh located?
What is the area known as?
What type of geography is in Raleigh?
How far is Raleigh from Atlantic Beach?
How far is Raleigh from Richmond?
What historic hotel is downtown?
What is in the Fayetteville business district?
What are some neighborhoods in Raleigh?
Who separated the neighborhoods in the early 2000's?
What are some common names in the area?
Where is Midtown Raleigh?
What frames Midtown Raleigh?
Where is the North Hills Shopping center?
Who was the area developer?
When was the Midtown Raleigh Alliance formed?
Where is West Raleigh?
What is West Raleigh the home of?
What arena is in the area?
How far is Rex Hospital from the fairgrounds?
What are in the area?
What neighborhoods are in North Raleigh?
What are the means of transportation in the area?
What type of area is North Raleigh?
Where is South Raleigh?
What is different about South Raleigh?
What borders South Raleigh to the west?
Where is Holly Springs compared to South Raleigh?
What are some neighborhoods in South Raleigh?
What is to the west of Southeast Raleigh?
What areas are in Southeast Raleigh?
What neighborhoods does Southeast Raleigh have?
What concert venue is in the area?
What university is in this part of Raleigh?
What does the area experience?
How does drought effect the city?
When does Raleigh experience hurricanes?
What was the name of the hurricane in 2003?
How big was the tornado in 2011?
What percent of households had children in 2000?
39.5% of the households comprised of what?
How many people lived alone in 2000?
How many households had someone 65 or older?
How many people are affiliated with religion?
What is the main religion of Raleigh?
What percent of Baptists are there in Raleigh?
What other denominations are there in Raleigh?
How large of a percent does Lutheran's take up?
What is the main industrial area of Raleigh?
What is Raleigh part of?
What does the Research Triangle do?
Is the city concerned with shipping?
What industry is Raleigh a major wholesaler for?
Where are major touring acts hosted in the city?
What is the Red Hat Amphitheater also called?
What event plaza is in Cary?
Where is the North Carolina State Fair?
What is the Lincoln Theater downtown?
Where is the Raleigh Memorial Auditorium?
What other theater is in the Duke Energy Center?
When did the Meymandi Theater open?
Where else can one see a theater performance?
What theaters are at North Carolina State University?
What is the North Carolina Museum of Art near?
What type of art is in the Museum of Art?
When was the Auguste Rodine exhibit?
How many people attended the Monet exhibit?
How did the museum get the artworks they have?
When did the Carolina Hurricanes start in Raleigh?
Where did the Hurricanes play their first two seasons?
What is the home stadium of the Carolina Hurricanes called?
What is the only professional sports team in North Carolina?
When did the Carolina Hurricanes win the Stanley Cup?
Where is North Carolina State University?
What is the mascot for North Carolina State University?
Where does the football team for North Carolina State University play?
How big is Carter Finley Stadium?
Where does North Carolina State University men's wrestling compete?
Who operates the public schools in Raleigh?
What is the school system praised for?
How many magnet schools are there in Raleigh?
What type of degree can you get from a high school in Raleigh?
What is the area's primary airport?
Where is Raleigh-Durham International Airport?
How many destinations does the airport offer internationally?
What are there 10 million of each year at the airport?
What was Terminal 2 formerly called at the airport?
What was Triangle Transit called before?
What does Triangle Transit offer?
Where else does Triangle Transit go to?
Does Triangle Transit have a van service?
Are employers connected with Triangle Transit?
What does RDN stand for?
Who offers dietary advice on the role of nutrition in chronic diseases?
For which health professional is Governmental regulation more universal?
Who typically specializes in obesity and chronic disease?
In which time period did the study of nutrition begin?
What is the European equivalent of "Qi"?
What kind of food classification does ginger belong to?
What nationality was Alcmaeon of Croton?
Other than obesity, what else would trademark an imbalance in nutrition?
What does the Book of Daniel contain?
Which country was being invaded when Daniel and his friends were captured?
What occupation were Daniel and his friends originally meant to have?
How long did the trial diet last?
What is another term for vegetables that was used?
How long was the doctrines of Galen in use for?
Which famous emperor did Galen serve as a physician to?
Who resided at the School of Salerno in Regimen sanitatis Salernitanum?
What did Galen believe that pneuma was?
What did each pair of attributes supposedly consist of?
Who criticized Galen in the 1500s?
Which famous artist did not agree with Galen's theories?
What was a burning candle comparable to?
Which well known gas did Jan Baptist van Helmont discover?
Which scientist was able to create a model for the digestive process?
When was the first nutrition experiment performed?
What was the name of the overlooked physician that served in the British Navy?
The juice of which fruit was determined to have helped sailors from contracting scurvy?
How many sailors died from scurvy between the years 1500 and 1800?
Which nickname was given to the British sailors?
What was the main component of Japanese sailor's diet?
What is the scientific term for beriberi?
What major symptom other than heart problems did beriberi cause?
Who made the observation that the Japanese sailor's diet was the cause for them developing beriberi?
What was introduced to the diet on a molecular level that prevented the sailors from contracting the disease?
What element can be found in thyroid glands?
What group of natives suffered from beriberi?
Who worked with the natives to help solve their dietary issues?
What simple alternative food prevented the development of beriberi in chickens?
How long after the natives were cured did it take for people to figure out the reason that brown rice cured them?
What was measured in the early 20th century?
What did Carl von Voit and Max Rubner apply to nutrition in order to receive their results?
Which amino acid can assist with the well - being of mice but not necessarily their growth?
What did Hopkins believe was required other than calories, protein and minerals to help prevent deficiency diseases?
Which experiment related to diet was conducted that required four years to complete?
What was notable about the discovered vitamin A?
Which property was vitamin B found to have?
Which disease was vitamin C claimed to help prevent?
What was cod liver oil able to help cure in dogs?
What was referred to as "food factor X"?
Who claims that the list of nutrients that humans require is incomplete?
What is the other category of nutrients that people require other than micronutrients?
What is notable about cellulose in humans?
What else, other than antioxidants, helps protect body systems?
In which year were nutrients categorized into their two respective categories?
Which category is represented by carbohydrates and fats among other nutrients?
What other significant aspect do macronutrients provide other than energy?
What unit other than calories is used to measure the energy generated by nutrients?
Which nutrient generally provides around 37 kJ per gram?
Although vitamins are important for many reasons, which role do they not play in the human body?
Other than fats, what else consists of atoms of carbon, hydrogen and oxygen?
If a carbohydrate is not a simple monosaccharide, what else could it be?
What do fatty acid monomers that are bound to glycerol backbones make up?
What characteristic about fatty acids requires them to be an essential component in a diet?
Which element do the amino acids that make up the core component of protein have in common?
What was traditionally believed to be absorbed quickly causing blood - glucose levels to rapidly rise?
What is an example of a simple carbohydrate?
When simple carbohydrates undergo metabolic pathways, what do they result in after partial catabolism?
What is glucose able to stimulate that is required in the human body?
Where are beta cells that attach to insulin located?
Dietary fat can be said to consist of fatty acids bonded to which molecule?
How many glycerol backbones does a triglyceride contain?
What needs to be examined to determine whether a fat can be classified as saturated or unsaturated?
Which element is present that is bonded to all of the carbons in a saturated fat?
What kind of fat can a trans fat be categorized as?
Where do saturated fats in a diet typically originate from?
Which kind of fat is generally considered to be healthiest?
Which type of fat should people attempt to avoid?
What kind of state of matter do unsaturated fats typically have at room temperature?
Although trans fats are harmful to human health, what property do they have that makes them useful in food processing?
What is able to prevent AA from being released from membranes?
The conversion of omega-6 DGLA to AA is able to help regulate which process?
What kind of process is the conversion of DGLA to AA?
What is an example of a hormone other than insulin that is able to control the enzyme delta-5-desaturase?
What is the scientific name for cell division?
What primarily makes up the enzymes in our body that regulate the chemical reactions that occur?
What is the primary component of every protein?
What is the term that refers to the body process that produces new proteins?
When the body no longer needs the amino acids that are present, through which excretion are they lost?
Approximately how many amino acid types does the human body generally have?
What would be required for the human body to potentially have a chance to create a complete protein source?
Other than rice, what would be another example of an incomplete protein source?
What is taken from proteins and converted to glucose by the body?
What is the term for the conversion of amino acids into glucose?
What happens to amino acids that are left over after the body has converted what it can to glucose?
Who was similar recommended intake volumes as adults?
Other then breastfeeding women, who what other category of woman should have increased water intake?
How much more water should pregnant women consumed compared to an average non - pregnant woman?
Why should lactating women increase their water consumption?
How much more water do lactating women need to consume in relation to the average woman?
What kind of element are dietary minerals?
What was the term "mineral" originally meant to describe?
In what form are some metals commonly found in the body?
In what form should minerals be to be absorbed easier?
What is the most famous mineral that is artificially added that prevents goiter?
Which vitamin can be synthesized in the skin?
What is required for vitamin D to be synthesized?
What is an example of a vitamin - like compound that is not considered an essential dietary nutrient?
What has recently been discovered in the thousands, especially from examining fresh vegetables?
What is choline not an example of?
What is another term that can be used to describe "potentially damaging" compounds?
What are oxidizers?
In order for the body to function normally, what must be used to neutralize free radicals?
What subgroup of phytochemicals helps make up the majority of the body's antioxidants?
Which area of the body does vitamin A protect?
What term collectively describes "Firmicutes" and "Bacteroidetes" among others?
What is the importance of having phyla in the body?
Which vitamin are the bacteria present in the gut responsible for producing?
What role specifically in digestion do bacteria in the gut have?
Where could one find a large population of gut flora?
Heart disease and obesity are examples of what kind of disease?
In which country was a study about the presence of cancer and heart disease in different regions done?
How much of an increase in presence of "Western" diseases was there in communities that primarily had animal - based diets as opposed to vegetable diets?
Other than meat, what else is lacking from the people in China's diet compared to diets from the Western world?
What disease was said to possibly be the result of diets that are high in meat and dairy products?
Who released a guideline that recommends that people follow a whole plant food diet?
Which magazine also recommended that people follow a whole plant food diet?
In which year was there a cover article on the National Geographic regarding diet recommendations?
How many populations were studied and surveyed for the cover article?
Other than fruits and vegetables, what other product was highly recommended to be a part of a healthy diet?
Other than nitrogen, what other element varies greatly between a carnivore and herbivore diet?
What percentage of nitrogen content is generally found in fungi?
What process of breaking down cellulose do herbivores rely on for their essential nutrients?
Other than sugar and fiber, what else are carbohydrates consisted of?
Where can fatty acids be found?
Through what part of the body are nutrients transported to feed cells?
In which specific circumstance is the digestive system not the first system involved in nutrient processing?
What is able to break bonds in ingested molecules?
Molecules that are released from ingested foods are done so through which process?
Through which manner are unabsorbed matter and waste products excreted?
What needs to be compared to the waste products from humans to determine what is absorbed in the body?
It is important to examine both the feces and what other excrement when studying absorption?
Other than time consuming, what else are nutritional studies due to their length and variable count?
At which rate is the science behind nutrition continuing to evolve?
How do plants absorb essential elements that are present in the soil?
Having leaves allows plants to absorb nutrients through which medium?
What is the process that plants undergo in order to obtain carbohydrates?
What is the process called in which plants gather nutrients from the soil around their roots?
What part of the leaf in a plant takes in carbon dioxide and releases oxygen?
What can environmental depletion lead to?
Other than malnutrition and a spread of disease, what is an example of a health problem that arose due to environmental depletion?
Other than industrial chemicals, what other industry discharges chemicals that can contaminate the environment?
The release and contamination of the environment affects what important system other than the human race?
If people's nutritional status and health changes, what could this affect in their daily routine?
What is the abbreviation for licensed dietitians in the US?
Who do dietitians have to register with other than the American Dietetic Association in order to be recognized as such in the US?
Which specific term is unregulated but still oft associated with professionals when it comes to food and diets?
Which state has started to regulate the word "nutritionist"?
What are restaurants and food manufacturers required to follow in order to assist consumers looking to follow dietary guidelines?
Nutritional standards and recommendations are produced by a joint effort between the US Department of Agriculture and which other department?
Who releases guidelines that revolve around diet and physical activity recommendations?
What is the name of the concept that has replaced the food pyramid?
The USDA's effort sand actions are overseen by which governmental committee?
On which channel are committee meetings often shown?
In England and which other country is there a curricula that revolves around nutritional education?
What is the official name of the curricula that promotes nutritional education in schools?
What does FCS stand for?
Aside from dieting and general nutritional information, what else does the curricula in England and Wales aim to teach students?
In which type of school are kids required to take a number of health related courses?
What percentage of people were were found to have a high likelihood of low literacy skills in the Mississippi Delta region?
What primary difference was there between the NAAL and Delta study that made comparisons difficult?
Who was the main author of the study that suggested that the Mississippi Delta study identified a problem of health literacy?
For how many years had the My Pyramid graphic been released at the time of the Mississippi Delta study?
Income level was found to have a signification correlation to which outcome in the study?
What did the studies show there was a lack of understanding of by the population?
The studies indicated that there was a lack of information in the area about what kind of choice?
What was found to be limited or at least difficult to get access to in the studied region?
What kind of constraint was found to have a significant effect on the nutritional literacy?
Aside from large people living in poverty, what else is considered a socioeconomic constraint that resulted in a decrease in opportunity for healthy food choices?
What is the term that refers to a viewpoint that believes a reliance on food science is a cause of poor nutrition and ill health?
Who is originally claimed to have given birth to the concept of nutritionism?
Although he was not the creator of the concept, who popularized the idea of nutritionism?
Who has to rely on nutrition experts when it comes to making decisions regarding food and nutritional values?
Which region of the world does Pollan claim could trace their health problems back to nutritionism?
What are organizations targeting with the aim of improving nutritional content or resources?
Outside of policymakers and teachers, who else is a key component to improving nutritional content in schools?
What are health and nutrition shown to have a link to in terms of education?
What percentage of American students report that they currently eat the recommended servings of fruits and vegetables?
Which animal was shown to have a negative effect on learning behavior due to nutritional deficiencies back in 1951?
Reduced insulin function can also go by what other term?
Other than the reduced insulin function, what else contributes greatly to many disease states?
Arterial microinjuries and heart disease can all be linked back to which health issue that is caused by hyperinsulinemia?
The metabolic syndrome is a term that refers to which health issue?
Hyperinsulinemia has a negative effect on the levels of which important molecules in the body?
Insulin resistance has been strongly linked to which health issue?
If someone struggles with insulin resistance, what kind of diabetes can develop as a result?
Almost all individuals who suffer from type 2 diabetes and/or obesity are found to have which trait?
Appropriate exercise and reducing glycemic load are two examples of ways to stimulate which process?
Obesity can cause resistance to which hormone?
In the so called vicious cycle, what aggravates obesity to continue the cycle?
A characteristic of the cycle other than fat storage is a continuously high stimulation of what?
What function do insulin and leptin normally provide in the body?
What effect does insulin/leptin resistance have on the function of insulin/leptin?
Hyponatremia is the term that refers to which action by a human?
In 2007, what kind of contest was Jennifer Strange participating in upon her death?
In which specific kind of events can one often find people drinking too much water?
When a human is suffering from hyponatremia, what is the main cause of damage that may occur?
Damage to the brain occurs because of the increase in which process?
The increase in cases of diabetes, obesity and heart disease can be traced back to an increase in the consumption of what product?
What has been the increase in obesity among adults in the last 30 years in the United States?
What is the current percentage of obese adults in the United States?
Within the past 30 years, how has the number of diabetes cases changed?
What does the term LDL stand for?
When did the Industrial Revolution roughly begin?
Apart from altering the state of food, what is the other main focus in technology increases for the food processing industry?
Which technology is primarily responsible for helping keep food fresh?
Pasteurisation is an an example of a technology that aims to do what to food?
Pasteurisation and autoclavation are examples of what kind of technique?
Centrifugation and pressing are prime examples of what?
An unfortunate side effect of concentrating food components is that it causes what change in the food?
What kind of nutritional value do the processed foods have in comparison to their fresh variants?
What is another term other than 'fortified' that can be used to describe the addition of nutrients to processed food?
Outside of oxidized fats, what is another substance that is deemed harmful that can be found in processed foods?
What did people who became ill with beri-beri have as their main food source?
What vitamin is removed during the polishing of rice?
Which disease became prevalent among infants in the United States as an effect of processed foods?
What treatment did the milk that was fed to infants undergo to control bacterial disease?
What was destroyed during the pasteurisation of the milk?
What is undoubtedly a cause of the increase in obesity related diseases that are becoming prevalent?
Aside from agricultural subsidizing, what else does the food processing industry influence in terms of political decisions?
What is perceived as the general priority of the food processing industry in this sort of economy?
The more expensive fresh foods have what nutritional value in relation to processed food?
Other than being cheaper, what is another main draw of processed foods?
Which two figures refused to back down after the churches worked out their disagreements?
Who wanted the Orthodox subjects to be placed under their protection?
Who arranged the compromise that Nicholas agreed to?
Who demanded the changes that Nicholas later refused?
What month did the Ottomans declare war on Russia?
Near what sea did the allies decide to attack the Russians?
In what year did the allies land on the Crimean peninsula?
The battle of Battle of Balaclava took place in what month?
Who defeated Nicholas's second counter strike at the Battle of Balaclava?
The Crimean peninsula is located in what city?
How long did it take for Sevastopol to fall?
Who wanted peace when they feared of being invaded from the west?
What was the name of the treaty that ended the war?
When was the Treaty of Paris signed?
Who regained control of the Christian churches after the war was over?
What modern technologies were first used during the Crimean War?
Who was recognized for treating the wounded while pioneering modern nursing?
The war was one of the first to be documented in what two ways?
In what year did France move into Alger?
In 1831, who was the strongest vassal of the Ottoman Empire?
Who wanted to take over Constantinople?
What military force did Mahmud II ask for aid?
How many Russians troops were sent to the Bosphorus shores?
In 1838, who was not pleased of their lack of power in Syria?
Who did the Ottomans lose to at the Battle of Nezib?
In what year did the Battle of Nezib take place?
Who helped save the Ottomans by signing a convention in London? 
In what year did Muhammad Ali  finally accept the terms of the London convention?
For 200 years, Russia been expanding across what area?
Why did Russia move towards the warmer ports of the Black Sea?
Who did Russia first have issues with when moving towards the warmer ports in the Black Sea?
Who was treated as second class citizens under the Ottomans?
During the Russian imperial times, what other name was southern Ukraine known by?
What did Russia fail to build south?
What did some feel the Russian army was only good for?
What did Russian colonels due to the men who served under them?
Who was the British ambassador in 1853?
Who declared they no longer wanted to spread Imperial Russian?
Who did the Tsar send on a mission to Ottoman Sublime Porte?
In what year was Prince Menshikov sent to the Ottoman Sublime Porte?
Who wanted to ruled over the 12 million Orthodox Christians in the Empire?
Who was given the special role of guardian over the Orthodox Christians in Moldavia and Wallachia?
Who recognized and gave Russia the special guardian role?
Who felt Europe would not object to the joining of neighboring Ottoman provinces?
What battle took place on November 30, 1853?
What did the Russian send to Sinop?
While anchored in the port, what did the Russians destroy?
What did Battle of Sinop provide for France and the U.K?
When did the Russia disregard the ultimatum to leave the Danubian Principalities?
Who was concerned with Russia  capturing Constantinople?
Who sent men to the Dardanelles?
As men were sent to the Dardanelles, where did Burgoyne go?
Who was Burgoyne visiting in Paris?
Who wrote to Burgoyne on February 8th?
In what year did the Hungarian revolution take place?
Who felt Austria would side with him due to the Hungarian revolution outcome?
Who did Austria feel threatened by?
Who wanted the Russian forces to leave the principalities?
Why did the U.K and France get involved with the war against the Russia?
Who advanced on Dobruja in the spring of 1854?
What river did the Russians cross to get to Dobruja?
How man troops did the Russians have when they attacked Silistra ?
When did the siege of Silistra end?
Why couldn't the French and English take control of the field?
Who stopped the Russians from attacking Vidin?
How man men did the Austrian forces have when stopping the attack on Vidin?
What river did the Russians crossed when they entered the city of Moldavia?
Who didn't show any signs of rising up against the Turks?
After the settlement between Russia and Turkey, who did the Austrians decide to join?
At what harbor did a Russian fleet attacked a Ottoman force?
What was the name of the ship that was attacked outside of the Odessa harbor?
Who attacked the port after the attack outside of Odessa harbor?
After the battle of Sinop, what steamship approached the Port of Sevastopol to show support for Turkey?
Where was the port where most of the Black Sea fleet was located?
What did the Russians turn their warships into?
Why did the Russians strip their warships of their guns?
How many 60-gun frigates did the Russians lose in the Black Sea?
How many 84-gun two-deckers did the Russians lose in the Black Sea?
In what year did the Russians leave Wallachia and Moldavia?
War fever from what two countries caused the war to continue on?
Who voted to have a committee investigate the mismanagement during the war?
In what year did the Crimean campaign open?
360 ships landed in what bay?
How many Marines cause Eupatoria to surrender? 
What is the name of the bay located at the south west coast of the Crimean Peninsula?
The Russians were surprised because they were expecting the fleet to land where?
How many men did the Russians lose after three hours?
Which river did the allies come across the Russian Army?
How many hours did it take to force the Russians away during the attack?
How many allies were lost during the battle?
Which way did the Russians believe they should have traveled? 
When did the army march to the southeast?  
Who was the engineer adviser? 
Who were the joint commanders? 
Who led the charge on the Valley of Balaclava?
Who was Cardigan under fire from when advancing on the Valley of Balaclava?
How many people did Cardigan lose during the Light Brigade?  
Who wrote the famous poem about the Light Brigade? 
What was the name of the poem that memorialized the Light Brigade?
What stopped ground operations during the winter?
What caused the HMS Prince to sink?
What was the HMS Prince carrying when it sunk?
What arrived in January with an engineering crew?
What caused the electrical telegraph to be delayed for some time?
What did the French believe was instrumental in their defense?
Where was the Russians building a new fort?
Mamelon is found on a hill in front of what suburban commune?
After fighting for weeks, what did the Russians continue to have control over?
Who was the garrison commander that died on June 30th 1855?
What figure died on June 28th 1855?
What did the Russians try to attack during the month of August?
Who defended the base at Balaclava?
Who was defeated at the battle of Tchernaya?
What did the British-French commanders send to disrupt Russian communications and supplies?
What sea was the Anglo-French naval squadron sent to?
Where did British-French warships enter on May 12th 1855?
What seaport did the British-French attack with steamers and gunboats?
The seaport of Taganrog is near what port city?
What caused the number of Turkish soldiers to decrease?
How man troops were the Turks forces in the east reduced to? 
Who kept Muravyev informed about the Turks at Kar?
What did Muravyev attend to do to the Turks in order to defeat them?
What city did Muravyev decide not to take control over?
Who vetoed Omar Pasha from landing in Georgia?
In September of 1855, how many Turks could be found at Batum?
When landing at Batum, what were the Turks primary focus?
What river divides Abkhazia from Georgia?
What did Omar Pasha finally reach on December 2nd 1855?
What greatly benefited the Russian resistance?
Who contributed the most to developing naval mining?
Immanuel Noble had expensive knowledge in what field?
Who named the torpedo mines?
What was Immanuel Nobel son's name?
Who was in charge of the HMS Pique?
The Russians escaped under the cover of what in 1855?
Petropavlovsk is located on what peninsula?
Who lost the most due to the Crimean War?
Russia failed to help Austria during what war that took place in 1866?
Who became diplomatically isolated after the war?
France rose to power after what war?
What empire declined after the Crimean War?
The Crimean war marked the end of what dominant European power?
Who made the view of diplomatic drift popular?
What did A.W Kinglake make the British out to be?
Who believed Britain was following a strategy when trying to destroy Russian Navy?
What did the Russians fear losing without compensation?
What province became more popular and saw a increase in population after the war?
Who made the call to sell Alaska?
Who did the Russians offer to sell Alaska to?
Who is Russia's largest regional rival?
The tactical use of railways was first used during what war?
Who gave the first live war report?
Due to his reporting skills, some give Russell credit for doing what?
What reduced the independence of British overseas possessions from their commanders in London?
What was the first European war to be photographed?
What two key elements that distinguish literature as a written form of art?
What are two major divisions of literature?
Besides this major division, what are two other sub-divisions to describe literature?
Prose literature can be sub-divided into what formats?
What words are the Latin roots of the word "literature?"
The changing nature of the meaning of the term "literature" can be described as what?
In Western Europe until the 1700s, literature was a term used to describe what?
During what literary movement did the definition of literature begin to narrow?
During that 18th century period, literature began to be applied how?
A definition of literature that incorporates style and the poetic nature of prose is what?
What is one example of writing that the formalist definition distinguishes literature from?
What element of the formalist definition makes it difficult to apply?
What part of ordinary language makes it difficult to apply the formalist definition?
The formalist definition when applied to industry writing allows it to be called literature when it does what?
What elements of language make for poetic literature?
Poetry is usually differentiated from prose by what factor?
If prose uses sentences, what is the equivalent in poetry?
Poetry was considered to need lines and meter until when?
The structure of poetry may have existed before what?
Literature intended for performance is what?
Drama is sometimes blended with what other elements?
What are two types of drama that incorporate music or dance?
Drama meant to be performed in a theater is what?
What do we call the author of a play?
The earliest form of drama we know of was part of what culture?
Tragedy was a dramatic style that evolved from what?
A tragedy typically involved what subject matter?
What media was the play War Of The Worlds written for?
In what year was War Of The Worlds originally presented?
What are some classical societies whose literature is still studied today?
Besides entertainment or informational value, classic literature also possessed what quality?
What societal evolution helped to develop drama and satire by providing a ready audience?
From what settings did lyric poetry derive?
What is an example of a collection of classic Chinese lyric poetry?
Subjects featured in Ancient Chinese literature include what?
What two inventions helped make Chinese literature especially important and portable?
What historic period was the foundry for classic Chinese literature in the ancient world?
What classic work of war science originated during this period?
Who wrote The Art Of War?
What two epic narratives were written by Homer?
Who wrote Works and Days and Theogony?
Plato and Aristotle wrote what type of literature?
Who were two important Classic Greek lyric poets?
The two great ancient Greek historians were?
Much medieval literature was influenced by the works of what classic culture?
What form of literature enjoyed the most widespread popularity during the Middle Ages?
What element is characteristic of a medieval romance?
What helped cause the widespread appearance of multiple forms of literature in the Renaissance?
What is an early example of the novel form of literature from Europe?
What literary movement in the 1700s recalled the fantastical literature of medieval times?
What elements in 19th century European literature were a reaction to the romanticism movement?
What are two elements prevalent among characters at the center of romanticism works?
How did naturalism effect the greater world?
20th century literature reacted to the objectivity of naturalism in the 19th century to what?
What sub-group of literature emerged in the 20th century?
Alternative reality genre fiction is also known as what?
Who were two 20th century writers who blurred the lines between journalism and literature?
By what means did these two writers create and emergent convergence of literature and journalism?
Critics based in what movement find fault in objective realism?
What two elements have reduced the literary nature of scientific journals?
The segregation of science writing means that articles in those subjects primarily appear where?
The work of what classical scientists is caught between being outdated and of literary importance?
In what coursework is one still likely to encounter the works of these classic scientists?
What is literary historical writing sometimes called?
Reporting that attempts a creative or literary bent is sometimes called what?
What is the main function of journalism or historical documentation?
Who are some classic historians regarded as literary historians?
What Babylonian ruler created formal law tables?
What religious scripture can be fit into a large, loose definition of legal literature?
Roman civil law was written and codified into a unified system by what group?
Under what Emperor did this group sit?
What empire did Justinian preside over?
Literary devices are employed for what reason?
What is one form of narration in literature?
What are two types of narrative structure in literature?
Why would an author utilize experimental narratives in literature?
In what type of writing would a more familiar, standard literary narrative structure be employed?
What was the term used to describe the age in which Ibn Sina created a big body of work?
What is one example of the type of translations done in the Islamic Golden Age?
What school translated Greco-Roman texts during the Islamic Golden Age?
What was one dynasty that provided a great atmosphere for cultural development?
What city was known as a cultural capital of the Islamic world?
What was one subject that Avicenna further developed?
Who is another philosopher during this Islamic Golden Age?
What is the name of one library that Avicenna had access to?
Who was the famous astronomer that Avicenna met before he left Khwarezm?
What text was proof that Avicenna debated philosophy with some of the greatest scholars of the time?
What text could Avicenna not understand?
What helped Avicenna understand the Metaphysics of Aristotle?
How long did Avicenna study philosophy?
How many times did Avicenna read through the Metaphysics of Aristotle?
How much did Avicenna pay for the book that helped him understand the Aristotle text?
At what age did Avicenna turn to away from philosophy?
What subject did Avicenna start studying at 16?
Avicenna became a qualified physician at what age?
Avicenna found medicine to be much easier than what subject?
Who was Ibn Sina's first appontment?
What did Ibn Sina receive as payment for helping the emir?
Why did some accuse Ibn Sina of burning down the royal library?
Who did Ibn Sina assist in his financial labors?
What year did the emir Null II recover from his illness?
At what age did Avicenna lose his father?
What dynasty ended in December 1004?
What modern country did Ibn Sina travel to after the end of the Samanid dynasty?
What is one district that Ibn Sina traveled through in search of more work?
Who did Ibn Sina turn down in order to travel westwards after the Samanid dynasty ended?
Ibn Sina's Book of Healing was partially available in what language?
How many years did it take for Ibn Sina's Book of Healing to be available in Latin?
On what continent was the Book of Healing finally available fifty years after its composition?
What was the title of Ibn Sina's Book of Healing?
Who did Avicenna's metaphysics works have an influence on?
What did Avicenna start an inquiry into?
What two points did he write about?
Who also began an inquiry into the question of being?
What is the Arabic term for existence?
Mahiat is Arabic for what?
What is one modality of being that Avicenna analyzed?
According to Avicenna, what could eventually be actualized by an external cause?
What is the necessary according to Avicenna?
According to Avicenna, what always exists?
If necessary being is true in itself, what is contingent?
The necessary exists due to what?
What is something that the necessary does not have?
What is the Arabic for situation?
What is one thing that the Necessary is detached from?
What religion was Avicenna?
What did Avicenna want to reconcile with Islamic theology?
What did Avicenna hope to do through his work?
Up until what century was Avicenna's work highly influential?
Who did Avicenna view as inspired philosophers?
What did Avicenna consider to be the only way to distinguish real philosophy from illusion?
What did Avicenna fear about stating his theories on philosophy more clearly?
What did Avicenna not consider when explaining his theories on philosophy?
Which interpretation of Avicenna's work was more taught in Islamic schools?
Interpretations of Avicenna's work split into how many different schools?
Who used only parts of Avicenna's works to support their own great spiritual insights?
Who used Avicenna's work to help understand future political events?
What are Islamic schools also known as?
Where did reason interact with sensation according to Avicenna?
What is the universal agent?
In Avicenna's work "Floating Man", what is the core of a human being?
What is the body's perfection?
In Avicenna's "Floating Man", what could the essence of a person not be?
What philosopher did Avicenna discuss in his The Book of Healing text?
What work of Aristotle's does Avicenna focus on?
What method did Avicenna criticize as not leading to absolute certainty?
What does Avicenna ground his psychology on?
According to Avicenna, the body and soul must be what in order to ensure the soul's individuation?
How does Avicenna  explain the connection between body and soul?
How does man first perceive features of an object?
The body and soul's interaction takes place where?
What Muslim astronomer did Avicenna influence?
What subject did Avicenna consider to be a separate discipline from astrology?
What philosopher thought the stars received their light from the sun?
What planet did Aristotle think was a spot on the sun?
Where did Avicenna think Venus was in relation to the sun?
What work by Avicenna is thought to be a fake?
What is another work of Avicenna that is said to not be his creation?
What is definitely seen as being written by Avicenna?
What is the kitab al-Shifa?
What did Ibn Sina classify into stones?
What superpower in 1980 created a stamp in honor of Avicenna?
What was Avicenna's birthplace?
A medical staff training college named in his honor is how many miles away from his birthplace?
In 1980, how many years had it been since Avicenna's birth?
Besides stamps, what did the Soviet Union also create in Avicenna's honor?
When was it announced that Avicenna would have medical directories named after him?
What does the Avicenna Directories contain?
What was Avicenna known for?
What is Avicenna's name needed for?
What use the traditional radical-based character index?
What will have the character's pronunciation in pinyin?
What is at the front of most modern Chinese dictionaries?
What are most words in Old Chinese?
What almost always corresponds to a single syllable?
What is written with two characters?
What has many homophones?
What may have a wide range of meanings?
What have been beneficial in the reconstruction of Middle Chinese?
What represent words of the language using several strategies?
What were most words written in?
What are some words expressed in?
What are the most numerous characters?
What is the radical under which the character is listed in dictionaries?
What suggests the general meaning of a compound character? 
What may have been found at Neolithic sites in China in recent decades? 
What has demonstrated a history of sign use in the Yellow River valley?
What color was the famous valley during the Neolithic through to the Shang period?
What existed as early as the Shang dynasty?
What did the oracle-bone script coexist alongside?
What were preserved in typical bronze inscriptions?
What often allow users to locate entries in several ways?
What lists Chinese characters in radical order?
What is grouped together by radicals?
Who is a Taiwanese politician?
What will often add bopomofo phonetic symbols?
What may render certain names in katakana instead of kanji?
What are written with very precise rules?
What has standardized character forms?
What are also written with different stroke orders due to character simplification?
What are commonly used?
What are often used to teach students Chinese characters?
What resembles an actual person's handwriting?
What is the art of writing Chinese characters?
What is one of the Four Arts of the Chinese Scholars?
What is not required?
What almost always includes character simplification?
What is Caoshu?
When did discussions of character simplification take place?
What varies greatly?
What were mandatory in printed works?
What were adopted for use in mainland China?
When did the second ruler of North Korea pass away?
Who stepped up after 2011?
Who began moderating the use of Hanja?
What is still being used according to experts?
What is used in situations where ambiguity must be avoided?
What is considered a location with a high level of ambiguity?
What was the dominant form of written communication?
What is treated as being conservative and confucian?
What comes directly from China?
What also includes a pair of syllabaries?
Why do the syllabaries differ?
What uses a composite system?
What has been promoted as a justification for spelling reforms?
Character simplification predated the republic's formation in what year?
Who issued the first round of official characters?
What is the capital of Bermuda?
What spin-off company took over operations in Bermuda in 1615?
In what year did Bermuda enter British rule?
What is the name of the company that managed the colony from 1615-1684?
In what year did the islands become a British colony?
What event occured that automatically ranked Bermuda as the oldest remaining British Overseas Territory?
What was Bermuda's first capital?
What two business drive Bermuda's economy?
What type of climate does Bermuda have?
Bermuda stands as a northern point in what susposed area of strange activity and disappearances?
What protects the island from storms?
What are Bermuda's largest economic sectors?
What occurance is the greatest factor affecting Bermuda's economy?
Why is the Bermuda Triangle an area of interest?
What is the climate of Bermuda?
Bermuda is located in what ocean?
Bermuda is on the western fringe of what Sea?
Travel from Puerto Rico to Bermuda would be in which direction?
Travel from Portugal to Bermuda would be in which direction?
Travel from South Carolina to Bermuda would be in which direction?
What natural features compose Bermuda?
In what major ocean is Bermuda located?
Bermuda is located 898 nautical miles from what US city?
Bermuda is closest (in nautical miles) to which US state?
What is the limestone cap of the seamount made from?
During the ice age, what area of land was above water?
Has the seamount always been above sealevel?
What type of volcano forms the archipelago?
Why is the top of the seamount formed by marine organisms?
What was the result of the whole cladera being above sea level during the Ice Ages?
The submarine volcano was formed as part of the same proces as what two things?
In the Bermuda land mass, how many islands are named "Long Island"?
In the Bermuda land mass, how many bays are named "Horseshoe Bay"?
In the Bermuda land mass, how many bays are named "Long Bay"?
Where can St. George's Town be found?
What are three of the bays named?
What name do the bays in Southampton and Morgan's Point share?
St. George's Town, St. George's Island and St. George's Parish are all referred to as what?
What is the name of the Parish located in the City of Hamilton?
The only indigenous mammals of Bermuda are five species of what animal?
What is the national bird of Bermuda?
What animal was believe to be the only land vertebrate of Bermuda?
What animal was found, through DNA testing, to pre-date the arrival of humans to the archipelago?
What are the only native mammals found in Bermuda?
What is the national bird of Bermuda?
Why is the National bird of importance?
What animal has held the title of Bermuda's only native land vertabrate?
Why is there a debate as to dubbing the diamondback terrapin the oldest indigenous land vertebrate?
When did Bermuda have a large amount of people immigrating to it?
Where are the largest group of non-native people in Bermuda from?
According to census result, there was the greatest decline in people claiming what ancestry?
Which cultural group can claim 79% residency?
There is no distinction between what two ethnicities of Bermudians?
Which ethnicity claimed the majority in Bermuda during the 17th century?
Anyone in Bermuda that is not considered 100% of European heritage is referred to as what?
Why is it problematic that the "coloured" population of Bermuda is now referred to as "black" or "African heritage"?
There has been a double in the population of people born in which country?
What term is used to refer to the majority of black people in Bermuda?
Why were so many blacks repeatedly being imported from Africa?
Why can Bermudian blacks trace their ancestry back over centuries in Bermuda?
What is one way that the ancestry of Bermudian black population differs from that of British West Indian black population?
Why is the black population in Bermuda different from that in the British West Indies and the United States?
Where did the Spanish and Portugese enslave most of their black people from?
What is one way we can show that black Bermudians are of different heritage than African Americans?
What is one group that Bermuda's black population can link some of their ancestry to?
Residents of what particular area have awareness of this link to Native American heritage?
During what period were there hundreds of Native Americans shipped to Bermuda?
Why was there a large population of Algonquian people in Bermuda?
What is considered the primary language of Bermuda?
What is a lesser spoken, secondary language in Bermuda?
What are the greatest influences to Bermudian culture?
Which cultures claim to be a dominant source of Bermuda's cultural heritage?
What type of painting are Bermuda artists known for?
What type of art work does Chesley Trott produce?
What significant event does the sculpture The Arrival portray?
Who is one of Bermuda's most famous watercolourists?
Who was one of the original survivor's to sail on to Jamestown.
What is one of the main things John Rolfe is known for?
When did the English begin their intentional settlement of Bermuda?
What is a major reason that Bermuda has problems with overpopulation?
What does Bermuda rely on to counteract overpopulation?
Where did a large number of Bermudians emigrate to before the American Revolution?
Why does a third of the population spend time at sea?
Why did the Somers Isles Company decide to surpress shipbuilding?
Why wasn't agriculture successful?
What did Bermudians do when agriculture failed?
Why was the Somers Isles Company's charter revoked?
What event caused major changes in Bermuda?
Why did defence infrastructure become the major source of Bermuda's economy?
How does the British crown view Bermuda?
What happened to Bermuda's independance due to British importance on them for military reasons?
Who was Bermuda's main trading partner before the war?
What is a factor that hurt Bermuda's merchant shipping?
Why didn't Bermuda produce metal ships?
Why did the need for Bermuda's salt diminish?
Why is Captain Fritz Joubert Duquesne famous?
After Duquesne made his way to St. George, what did he do?
After settling in the US, what did Duquesne do?
When did the first aeroplane reach Bermuda?
Why did the plane have to land twice before reaching Bermuda?
What improved thanks to the Royal Air Force in 1933?
Who began experimenting with flights from Berlin to New York, stopping in the azores?
The Governor of Bermuda gets his authority from whom?
Who appoints the Governor of Bermuda?
Who is currently the governor of Bermuda?
Who is responsible for defence and foreign affairs?
What is Bermuda officially classified as?
When was the Constitution of Bermuda enforced?
Has Bermuda's constitution ever been amended?
What is the head of Bermuda's government referred to as?
What is the legislative branch of Bermuda modeled after?
What does the population get to vote for?
Who has the largest accredited diplomats in Bermuda?
Who is the current US Consul General?
Why is the US so important to Bermuda?
What percentage of Bermuda's residents are US citizens?
When was homosexuality legalized in Bermuda?
What occurred in February of 2016?
What did the Virgin Islands announce in 2007?
Who has "observer status" to CARICOM?
Why did the English originally colonize Bermuda?
What two areas have provided a constant stream of immigration to Bermuda since the 20th century?
Why have these recent immigrants had trouble becoming permanent residents?
When did Bermuda ease up on its immigration laws?
What cultural group has dominated the PLP?
Who are two prominent members of the PLP?
What are Dame Lois Browne-Evans and her husband putting an emphasis on?
Why are some Bermudians against the emphasis of West Indies cultural connections?
Due to the British goverment's defense forces, what are two nicknames for bermuda?
What did Bermuda's merchant shipping fleet do whenever it had the chance?
What was Bermuda established as after the American Revolutionary War?
When were the militias in Bermuda disbanded?
How did the colony form a military garrison in the 19th century?
What did the US ask of Britain in May 1940?
What did the Destroyers for Bases Agreement do?
What was one thing the UK wanted in return for granting access to Bermuda?
Who was the Prime Minister who reached this agreement with the US?
What did the US begin building in 1941?
Who primarily used the bases in Bermuda?
What was the navy patrolling for?
What was the Naval Air Station Bermuda originally?
What was the NAS primarily a base for?
What did the NAS Bermuda offer once designated Annex?
What is located west of the NAS Annex?
What happened at the end of the Cold War?
When did Bermudians serve in the British Armed forces?
Who was key to establishing Bermuda's Regiment?
Who was the youngest Royal Marine Brigadier?
What is the site for Bermuda's Remembrance Day?
What was the new currency in Bermuda as of 1970?
The Bermudian dollar is equal to what other currency and can be used interchangeably?
Who is pictured on Bermudian dollars?
Where can you see a permanent exhibition of Bermuda currency?
Who regulates all financial institutions as well as the issuing of money?
Why is Bermuda considered an offshore financial center?
What does it do in place of an income tax system?
What is Bermuda's legal system derived from?
What three things does the tax system depend on?
What does Bermuda use the consumption tax for?
What does the Exchange specialize in?
What is the BSX a member of?
Where is the BSX located?
Which foreign country offers the BSX Approved Stock Exchange Status?
Who created and popularized many of the sports that we love today?
Why were sports important in these schools?
Who founded organizations like the FA?
What changed in 1885 due to the FA changing rules?
What happened to the Public schoolboys in these sports?
How were sports introduced in Bermuda?
Which sport did not transfer well to Bermuda?
Which sport was quickly adopted?
What Bermuda sport team participated in the 2007 world cup?
Who is Bermuda's most popular Cricket player?
Who defeated Bermuda?
What began in 1872 when the game of cricket was introduced to Bermuda?
Why is there an East End/West End rivalry?
What events did Bermuda compete in at the 2004 Summer Olympics?
What did Katura Horton-Perinchief do?
What is the only medal Bermuda has ever won?
What is the Olympic tradition for Bermuda, regardless of season?
When did the Southern and Northern Nigeria Protectorates merge?
Which empire ruled Nigeria as a colony?
When did Nigeria become independent from Britain?
When did a Nigerian Civil War begin?
When did Nigeria have a fair presidential election?
Which country is called the 'Giant of Africa'?
How many people live in Nigeria?
How does Nigeria rank among the largest-population countries in the world?
How many languages are spoken by Nigerians?
What is Nigeria's official language?
What is Nigeria's 2015 GDP?
What is Nigeria's 2015 purchasing power parity?
When did Nigeria's economy become larger than South Africa's?
What is the largest economy in Africa?
What is Nigeria's debt-to-GDP ratio? 
When did Boko Haram become active in Nigeria?
Who is the President of Nigeria?
How many people had Boko Haram killed by May 2014?
How many schoolgirls did Boko Haram kidnap?
What is Nigeria named after?
Who came up with the name Nigeria in the 19th century?
What was Nigeria's region called by the British before the name Nigeria?
What language does the name of the Niger River come from?
Which river reaches Timbuktu?
Which tribe ran the city of Nri?
When was Nri taken over by the British?
Igbo Ukwu made the oldest bronze art using which process?
Who ruled Nri?
Which clan is Nri in the territory of?
What region has Nigeria traded with for centuries?
Which countries' explorers were the first Europeans to trade with Nigeria?
Calabar is on which historical Bight?
What is the current name of the Bight of Biafra?
Who were the major slave traders through Nigeria from the southwest?
When did Britain outlaw slave trade?
After which war did Britain establish its West Africa Squadron?
Which Lagos king had supported the slave trade?
Where did Britain intervene in a power struggle?
Where did Britain take slaves it seized from traders?
What religion built Western schools in Nigeria?
Britain discouraged building Christian missions in which part of Nigeria?
What religion was the majority in the northern part of Nigeria?
When did Nigeria receive independence?
When did northern Nigeria ban slavery?
In what year were there two military coups in Nigeria?
Which group led the first 1966 coup?
Which Prime Minister was murdered in the Igbo coup?
Which Northern Premier was murdered in the Igbo coup?
Which Western Premier was murdered in the Igbo coup?
What did Eastern Nigeria want to call itself as an independent nation?
When did Eastern Nigeria declare its independence?
Who led Eastern Nigeria during the Nigerian Civil War?
How many months did the Nigerian Civil War last?
How many people died during the Nigerian Civil War?
Which oil group did Nigeria join?
Who failed to use the oil revenues to invest in infrastructure?
Overdependence on oil income led to the fall of what form of government in Nigeria?
Which Nigerian leader transferred power in 1979?
Which Nigerian leader received power in 1979?
How did Nigerians view the Shagari administration?
Who led a military coup against Shagari?
When did another military coup overthrow Buhari?
Which Nigerian leader decided Nigeria would return to democracy in 1990?
What did Babangida set up to help pay Nigeria's national debt?
What was most of Nigeria's federal income being spent on?
What controversial religious group did Nigeria join?
To when did Babangida delay the return to democracy?
When did Nigeria finally hold a fair election?
Who won the 1993 Nigerian election?
Babangida's reaction to the election results caused violent protests for how long?
Who did Babangida appoint as head of an interim government when he finally stepped down?
Who won the 2011 election?
Who was the CPC's 2011 candidate?
How many votes did Goodluck get in 2011?
How many votes did Buhari get?
What was the main opposition political party in 2011?
What is Nigeria's form of government?
What houses does the Nigerian legislature have?
How many times can a Nigerian president be elected?
Who won the 2015 Nigerian presidential election?
Who lost the 2015 Nigerian presidential election?
What are Nigeria's 3 biggest ethnic groups?
When did Nigeria get independence?
What major secession movement has Nigeria had?
What major nationalist movement has Nigeria had?
How many seats does the People's Democratic Party of Nigeria have in the House?
How many seats does the People's Democratic Party of Nigeria have in the Senate?
How many seats does the  All Progressives Congress have in the House?
How many seats does the  All Progressives Congress have in the Senate?
How many minor opposition parties does Nigeria have?
What group did Nigeria support against white governments in Southern Africa?
What group was Nigeria a founding member of?
What is the Organisation for African Unity now known as?
Nigeria is a 'standard-bearer' in what international group?
How many inches of rain does southern Nigeria get each year?
What type of climate is southern Nigeria?
What part of Nigeria is the Obudu Plateau in?
What is Nigeria's northernmost climate?
What does the Cross River State area of Nigeria have the world's largest variety of?
Southern Nigeria is turning from a forest to what type of environment?
What type of monkey is only found in parts of Nigeria and Cameroon?
What ecoregion is in Nigeria near the Cameroon border?
Why is southern Nigeria losing its forests?
What type of vegetation is in central Nigeria?
How many inches of rain does central Nigeria get each year?
How many subregions are there of Nigeria's savannah zone?
How much rain does the Sahel savannah area get per year?
Which desert is encroaching into northeastern Nigeria?
What is the largest Nigerian city?
What type of groups have been failing to keep up with waste management in Nigeria?
What Nigerian community has the worst unsustainable waste management?
What territory is Kubwa Community in?
How many states does Nigeria have?
What non-state area does Nigeria have?
How many smaller areas are the Nigerian states divided into?
What are the Nigerian states' sub-divisions called?
How many geopolitical zones do people consider the Nigerian states to be in?
Where did Nigeria's 2012 GDP rank?
Which sub-Saharan African nation does the most trade with the US?
How much of the US's oil comes from Nigeria?
How much of the US's oil imports come from Nigeria?
How much growth did the IMF expect Nigeria's economy to have in 2009?
How much money did overseas Nigerians send home in 2004?
How much money did overseas Nigerians send home in 2007?
Which country has Nigerians sending the most money home?
Which country has Nigerians sending the second-most money home?
Which Asian country has Nigerians sending the most money home?
What is Nigeria's local vehicle manufacturer?
What is Nigeria's branded electronics manufacturer?
When did Nigeria change its import policies to encourage local manufacturers?
What city is Nigeria's main industrial area?
What city is Nigeria's secondary industrial area?
When did Nigeria launch its first satellite?
What was Nigeria's first satellite called?
Where did Nigeria launch its first satellite?
How many satellites has the Nigerian government commissioned?
What was Nigeria's third satellite called?
When was Nigeria's third satellite built?
When was Nigeria's third satellite launched?
When did Nigeria's third satellite run out of power?
where was Nigeria's third satellite launched?
When was Nigeria's fourth satellite launched?
Where was Nigeria's fourth satellite launched?
What paid for Nigeria's fourth satellite?
What was Nigeria's fourth satellite called?
What satellite did Nigeria's fourth satellite replace?
What was Nigeria's population in 2009?
How much of Nigeria's population in 2009 was rural?
How much of Nigeria's population in 2009 was urban?
What was Nigeria's population density in 2009?
When did President Goodluck Jonathan advocate limiting childbirth?
What is the official language of Nigeria?
How much of Nigeria uses English as a first language?
What is the most popular language in Nigeria?
What are the top 3 languages in Nigeria?
What is Nigerian Pidgin English often called?
What regions is Nigerian English commonly spoken in?
What type of region does a majority of Nigerians live in?
What type of languages are the most popular in Nigeria?
What are the most popular religions in Nigeria?
What religions does Nigeria have besides the top two?
How much of Nigeria's population is Muslim?
How much of Nigeria's population is Christian?
How much of Nigeria's population is Animist and other religions?
What type of Islam is most common in Nigeria?
What school of Sunni Islam is most common in Nigeria?
What Islamic law is being used in some Nigerian states?
What Nigerian state is trying to make Sharia law part of its constitution?
In 2001, what percent of Nigeria's population was Muslim?
In 2001, what percent of Nigeria's population was Christian?
In 2001, what percent of Nigeria's population followed local religions?
According to Pew, in 2010, what percent of Nigeria's population was Muslim?
According to Pew, in 2010, what percent of Nigeria's population was Christian?
How many Nigerian Christians are Protestant?
How many Nigerian Christians are Catholic?
How many Nigerian Christians are Orthodox and other sects?
Which Nigerian tribe is 95% Muslim?
Which Eastern Nigerian tribe is 98% Christian?
When did many newer churches start growing in Nigeria?
What is the largest Anglican church in Nigeria?
What is the largest Baptist church in Nigeria?
When did the Bamako Initiative begin?
Nigeria is adding what kind of costs to its healthcare system?
When did Nigeria start reorganizing its healthcare system?
What was the last African country to still have significant Polio problems?
When had Nigeria not had a reported polio case in 6 months for the first time?
When did Nigeria launch a bone marrow donation program?
Which entity runs Nigeria's bone marrow donation program?
Nigeria was the second African country to perform which medical procedure?
What department runs Nigeria's schools?
When did Nigeria improve its tertiary education?
How much of Nigeria's population can read?
How much of Nigeria's male population can read?
How much of Nigeria's female population can read?
What is Nigeria's most popular organized-crime activity?
What drug does Nigeria ship from Asia to Europe and America?
What drug does Nigeria ship from South America to Europe and South Africa?
How many civilians were killed in Lagos in Aug 2000-May 2001?
How many police were killed in Lagos in Aug 2000-May 2001?
What law is the Nigerian 419 scam nicknamed after?
What organization was created to combat the 419 scams?
When was the Nigerian EFCC created?
What type of scam is the 419 scam?
What type of entity is complicit in the 419 scams?
When did the Nigerian film industry begin?
Which African country has the continent's largest movie industry?
Which cities are Nigeria's movie studios located in?
What is the nickname for Nigeria's movie industry?
Where does Nigeria's movie industry rank worldwide?
Which years did Nigeria win the African Cup of Nations?
When did Nigeria win a Summer Olympics gold medal?
What did Nigeria win a Summer Olympics gold medal for?
What country did Nigeria beat to win a Summer Olympics gold medal?
What is Nigeria's national football team called?
Nwankwo Kanu won what honor twice?
Nwankwo Kanu won in what championship league?
What team did Nwankwo Kanu go on to play on?
Who tried to convert Frisians
Who did the pope appoint Bishop
What did Charles Martel do 
What year did Utrecht gain in power 
What showed the importance of Utrecht
What hapend when Frankish rulers established the system of feudalism
What was part of the territory of bishopric 
What conflict affected Utrecht
Who was in conflict with the prince bishopric 
What region was seized 
What was the Most dominant Cathedral in Utrecht
What began in 1254 
Was the cathedral finished 
How many collegiate churches existed in Utecht besides the cathedral
What did Utrecht's location allow 
Who granted Utrecht city rights 
What was the relationship with the bishop like for citizens of Utrecht
What Industry did the bishop hurt 
Why was the transition to a new union difficult 
What was the purpose of the castle 
How long did the castle last 
What was signed in 1579 
What is this union seen as 
What became the dominant province 
What was the state of Utrecht 
Who did the fortified city fall to in 1672 
In 1674 what hit Utrecht 
What collapsed during the tornado 
What did Utrecht host in 1713 
Since 1723 what has Utrecht become 
What was railway area developed into 
What mall was constructed 
What happened in the early 21 st century 
What does the dense population make difficult 
Least populates areas of Utrecht 
More populated areas include 
what dominates the cityscape
What is being debated in Utrecht
What is the name of the stadium 
What is a landmark in the city 
What does the inner city look like 
What surrounds the mid-evil inner city 
What part of the city remains open 
What is the main railway station 
Does the rail station provide 24 hour service
Are there rail services to Germany 
where to regular local trains provide service 
What does Utrecht provide for cyclist 
What is a barrow bikes use 
utrecht built the worlds largest what ?
What is the name of the large shopping center 
how are the shopping center corridors treated 
What is being recreated 
what is located on the west side of the rail station
What is the largest University in the city 
what is shanghai jiaotong rated 
Cultural life in Utrecht is second to 
What music festival does Utrecht host 
What is the name of the music hall 
Where are music students educated 
What does the city host on Sundays 
What happens on Cultural Sunday 
What does the city subsidise
What football team is Utrecht home to
What Utrecht waterways host to 
What is kampong 
What sports does Kampong support 
How many papers did Von Neumann publish?
What is the name of Von Neumann's last work?
What high profile controversial project was Von Neumann a prinipal of?
Of his published works, what topics were they covering?
With whom did Von Neumann work on the Manhattan Project?
Post World War II, in what role did Von Neumann work?
For what organizations was Von Neumann a consultant after World War II?
What keys steps did Von Neumann work out that contributed to weapons of war?
At what age did schooling begin in Hungary?
Who taught children before they began school in Hungary?
What languages were Von Neumann and his siblings taught?
At what age was Von Neumann familiar with calculus?
Where did Von Neumann begin to lecture in 1928?
By the end of 1927 how many papers had Von Neuman written?
How many papers had Von Neumann written by 1929?
What better offer came for Von Neumann in 1930?
In what year was Von Neumann offered a lifetime professorship? 
In what year did Von Neumann's mother and siblings join him in U.S?
In what year did Von Neumann become a naturalized citizen of US?
Why was Neuman rejected from joining US Army?
What type of "off color" humor did Von Neumann especially enjoy?
What complaints did Von Neumann's neighbor's have?
What famous neighbor did Von Neumann have that may have been distracted by the music Von Neumann played?
What mathematician was Von Nemann's closest friend?
What topics of conversation would Ulam and Von Neumann typically share?
What would Ulam use to cheer up Von Neumann in the hospital?
What is the method to demonstrate that no contradictions were created by the addition of axiom of foundation?
Zermelo and Fraenkel's axiom of foundation established that every set be constructed how?
What excluded a set from belonging to itself in set theory?
What field did Von Neuman establish?
What is the distinction of continuous geometry?
What was the first example of continuous geometry?
In what way did von Neumann make spectacular contributions to measure theory?
What concept was relevant to the solvability of the problem of measure?
According to von Neumann what is the most important part of the problem of measure?
What is von Neumann algebra?
What does the von Neumann bicommutant theorem show?
When was direct integral introduced by von Neumann?
What was introduced in von Neumann algebras?
Von Neumann's abstract treatment allowed him to work on what foundational issue?
What was John Bell's argument?
What did Jeffrey Bub argue in 2010?
Did von Neumann rule hidden variable theories?
With whom did von Neuman work on a paper in 1936 that introduce quantum logic?
What concept was created for quatum logic?
What is the difference of logic in quantum theory?
What year was game theory established?
What discipline is game theory derived from?
what are the possible strategies in minimax theory?
What must a player consider when determining every possible strategy?
What is optimal strategy?
What von Neumann work was published in 1944?
Who was co-author with von Neman on the Theory of Games and Economic Behavior?
What were von Neumann's model an example of?
What ideas were utilized in von Neumann's ecocomic model?
What was the new method of linear programming that von Neumann suggested?
What did von Neuman's method use?
The algorithm defining artificial viscosity is a fundamental contribution to what area?
What did the math of artificial viscosity do?
What was the problem of computers solving fluid dynamics?
What principal contribution did von Neumann make to atomic bomb?
Did von Nemann think that the atomic bomb design was not workable?
What additional ideas did von Neumann contribute to Atomic bomb?
what change was made when shortage of uranium 235 was apparent?
What was the tolerance limit for implosion "edge effect"?
Who constructed Trinity bomb?
In what year was Trinity bomb completed?
What other people worked with von Neumann on target selection?
What role did von Neuman play in the selection of targets?
What was von Neumann's first choice for target city?
On what day was the first atomic blast?
Where did the first atomic blast test take place?
What was the power of the first atomic blast?
In 1950 von Neumann became a consultant for what organization?
What military organization did von NEumann also consult with for military aspect of nuclear weapons?
What committee did von Neumann serve on within the Atomic Energy Commission?
In what year did von Neumann become commissioner of the AEC?
What were compact hydrogen bombs useful for?
What was the concern with longer range ICBM with Hbomb?
Von Neumann testified at whose hearing about loyalty and help?
What was the purpose of top secret ICBM committee?
What argument did von Neumann make about ICBMs?
In what year did SM-65 Atlas pass its first fully functional test? 
Why did von Neumann join government work?
How did von Neumaan describe his political ideology?
What was the project that von Neumann first participated in government?
Who was the inventor of the merge-sort algorithm?
With whom did von Neumann work on the philosophy of artificial intelligence?
What does a merge sort algorithm do?
Where were the computations for hydrogen bomb worked out?
What was the Monte Carlo method?
Due to slow use of random numbers what was developed?
What nullified patent claims of EDVAC designers?
What was the significance of EDVAC?
Where was ENIAC located?
What was the speed difference with new ENIAC?
What were advantages for programming new ENIAC?
After the design of IAS, who built the computer?
When was stochastic computing introduced?
How long before stochastic computing could be implemented?
When did von NEumann develop first self reproducing computer program?
What is another name for the first self reproducing computer program?
How quickly was von Neumann able to complete math in his head?
Were other mathematicians amazed by von Neumann?
Did von Neumann enjoy thinking?
What did Herman Goldstone write about von NEumann?
Could von Neumann recall written text much later?
What countries prevented the Soviets from joining the Munich Conference?
Who was the English politician who appeased Germany with the take over of Czechoslovakia
The soviets suspected that Nazi-Soviet conflicts would result in what?
During conflict, what would prevent transport of materials?
Between german and the soviet union which country needed military machinery? 
Who believed they needed a supply line from the Soviet Union to sustain another war? 
Why did the Soviet government fear the governments of France and Britain?
What country was at war with Japan in China prior to World War II?
Who was afraid of a pact between Germany and the Soviet governments?
Who predicted soviet aggression in the Baltic region?
What month did the Tripartite discussions begin between Britain, USSR and France?
Which country is blamed for the Tripartite discussion to stagnate and fail?
Who downplayed the contrast and recent past history between German and the Soviets?
How long did the anti-Nazi propaganda machine run before the pact-signing?
A war with the USSR was considered certain according to whom?
What was the response of  Kliment Voroshilov in regards to further conversations with Britain and France?
Who should accept the annexation of Poland?
By accepting the deal with the USSR, Hitler admitted that it prevented what?
How did the Russians communicate to the Germans in regards to bombing civilians trying to flee cities?
What day did German invade Poland?
How long did the Germans massacre Polish and Jewish civilians? 
The Soviets took over and setup a fake government in what country?
How long did the Finnish military last during the invasion by the soviets?
Although officially, the number of soviets wounded during the invasion of finland was around 200,000, who said the real numbers may have been closer to a million?
How many Finnish people lost their homes?
Who invaded the countries of Lithuania, Estonia and Latvia? 
What region of Lithuania was to be turned over to the Nazis?
Of the three countries invaded, which lost the least amount of people through deportation or loss of life?
How did these countries become part of the USSR?
How many days after France sued for peace did the Romanians meet the requests of the USSR?
What month did France sue for peace?
How many days did it take for the Romanians give into the Soviets requests?
How long did liquidation occur?
 How many intelligentia were killed during operation AB-Akiton?
Who was part of Hollywood Ten?
Who was the leader of the American communist party?
Who protested the involvement of Britain and France in a war with Germany?
According to Molotov, what was the goal of the west?
Under what guise does the west perform their international policing?
How much more expansive was the newest trade agreement?
What was the trade route between german and the soviet union?
Where were the soybeans coming from?
 What famous ship was the soviet union getting the plans for?
How many new airplanes were the soviets getting in this agreement?
What did the Germans use to avoid British blockades?
Where was the sub base located?
Which oceans did the sub base provide access to?
Who wanted to know the moment an anti-german bloc was to form?
Why did the Germans distrust the soviet agenda?
What caused distrust between the German and Soviet governments?
What countries agreed to a tripartisan agreement?
Which Foreign Minister proposed that the Soviets should join this agreement of axis powers?
Who would the axis powers oppose in the new agreement?
Who was planning an invasion of the Soviet Union?
Who did the Soviet Union agree to remain neutral with when they signed a treaty on the 13th of April?
Why did Stalin sign the pact? 
How many pages of secret documents were microfilmed?
What did Wendell B. Blancke investigate at the end of the war?
Near the end of the war, where the did some of the german command flee to?
Why did Karl von Loesch bury the microfilm?
Edward Carr believes that in a war between Germany and the Soviet Union, who else would have been participating?
Who believes that the Soviet Unions was afraid of Germany?
What was a capacitor originally known as?
How many electrical conductors, or plates, do all capacitors contain at a minimum?
What is the name of the insulator in all capacitors that can store energy by becoming polarized?
In what form does a capacitor store energy?
Where is the energy stored by a capacitor located?
Who first discovered the basic properties of capacitors?
When were the basic properties of capacitors first discovered?
In the original experiment in which the properties of capacitors were discovered, what component acted as the dielectric? 
Besides the scientist's hand, what other component of the experiment in which the basic properties of capacitors were discovered acted as the second conductor?
What was the name of the Dutch physicist who invented the Leyden Jar?
Who was the first person to connect several Leyden jars in parallel?
Where did Benjamin Franklin believe the charge was stored in Leyden jars?
Who coined the term "battery"?
How many nanofarads did the earliest unit of capacitance equate to? 
Why was a gap left at the mouth of Leyden jars?
Besides porcelain, paper and mica, what other non conductive material was used as an insulator? 
For what use were non conductive materials used in the first capacitors?
What was layered between strips of metal in order to create paper capacitors?
When were paper capacitors first manufactured?
What other use did paper capacitors serve in the telecommunications industry?
Who invented the first electrolytic capacitor?
In what sort of electrolyte does the oxide layer on an aluminum anode remain stable?
In what year was the patent filed for an electric liquid capacitor?
What sort of capacitors were created by Bell Labs in the 1950's?
Why did Bell labs create their new type of capacitor?
What are electric double-layer capacitors called today?
When were low voltage electrolytic capacitors with porous carbon electrodes invented?
Who invented low voltage electrolytic capacitors with porous carbon electrodes?
In what part of the capacitor did Becker believe the charge was being stored?
In what component of electrolytic capacitors did Becker believe was similar to the porous carbon electrodes?
What type of area is between the two conductors in a capacitor?
What is the name given to the area between two conductors in a capacitor?
What net electric charge are capacitors assumed to have?
What type of charges do conductors hold on their facing surfaces?
What region within a capacitor develops an electric field?
What is a function of the amount of dielectric, the strength of dielectric and its permittivity?
If the plate area and separation distance are altered while keeping the amount of dielectric the same, what effect is had on the maximum energy of the capacitor? 
In a realistic model of a capacitor, where else besides between the dielectric between the conductors might an electric field be found?
When an electric field exists between the sides of the plates as well as in within the dielectric, what effect is had on the effective capacitance of the capacitor?
When the ratios of plate length and width to separation distance are large, what size is the parasitic capacitance?
What characteristic can leakage current and parasitic effects be assumed to have in the equation for a realistic capacitor?
What sort of components can be added to the equivalent circuit of a capacitor in order to deal with leakage current and parasitic effects?
Upon dealing with leakage current and parasitic effects in a realistic model of a capacitor, what sort of methods can then be applied?
What sort of analysis cannot be used in cases of voltage breakdown in modelling a capacitor?
What causes the assumption of constant capacitance to fail even if the effect is linear in nature?
What order is the breakdown field strength for air dielectric capacitors of?
Of what order is the breakdown field strength for mica dielectric capacitors?
In what way is the dielectric used in order to cause the absolute breakdown voltage of capacitors to be limited?
What is one factor that critically affects the breakdown voltage of the capacitor?
What is the difference in the physical attributes of the dielectric used in high voltage capacitors compared to low voltage capacitors?
What name is given to the AC component of an applied source having either constant or alternating frequency?
What is one cause of dielectric losses in a capacitor?
What is another cause of dielectric losses in a capacitor?
What is the name given to the amount of internal series resistance needed to add to an ideal capacitor model in order to represent the heat generated by dielectric losses?
What is one type of capacitor that has a specified rating value for maximum ripple current?
What value of some capacitors decreases with age?
What causes the decrease of capacitance in ceramic capacitors as they age?
What is one of the most important aging factors in capacitors?
What is another important factor which governs how a capacitor ages?
At what point can the aging effect of a capacitor be reversed if the component is heated beyond?
What is the effect called when capacitors absorb sound waves?
What value of a capacitor is varied when vibration moves the conducting plates? 
What sort of current is induced when the capacitance of a capacitor is altered?
In what type of applications is piezeoelectricity especially problematic?
What is it called when a changing electric field existing between the conductive plates of a capacitor physically moves them?
What is one type of circuit in which voltage and current reversal are affected by damping?
What is another type of circuit in which voltage and current reversal are affected by damping?
Under what condition does voltage reversal occur in RLC circuits?
What is formed between the inductance and the capacitance when the current and the voltage switch direction?
When a system is over-damped, what does it typically not experience?
What percentage of voltage reversal does an AC circuit experience?
What does voltage reversal create in the dielectric of a capacitor?
What percentage of voltage reversal will an under damped DC circuit experience?
What does excess electric field present in the dielectric lead to?
When designing a capacitor, what is an important rating to consider?
After discharging and disconnecting a capacitor, what causes it to develop a voltage?
What does the process of dielectric absorption in a capacitor depend on?
What level of dielectric absorption would a tantalum electrolytic capacitor display? 
What level of dielectric absorption would a Teflon capacitor exhibit?
What amount of energy must a capacitor contain in order to be generally considered dangerous? 
With what value is a resistor in parallel with a capacitor equal to?
What can cause excessive leakage in a capacitor?
What sort of capacitors are used to carry a varying signal from the conductive plate of one tube to the grid circuit of the next stage?
What type of capacitor can cause signal distortion in the downstream tube?
If the grid circuit voltage is increased beyond its regular bias setting, what can happen to the conductive plates in power amplifiers?
What do many capacitors contain that raises the capacitance?
What sort of dielectric is used in low capacitance devices?
What sort of capacitors have traditionally been used in radio tuning circuits?
How did the capacitor traditionally used in radio tuning circuits change over time? 
What did the later designs of capacitors used in radio tuning circuits no longer have?
What benefit is offered by solid state paper capacitors?
What type of capacitor has mostly replaced solid state paper capacitors?
What sort of circuit are plastic capacitors especially useful for?
What is one type of reliable capacitor that is resistant to temperature and voltage changes?
What is another type of reliable capacitor that is resistant to temperature and voltage changes?
What is one type of metal which the conducting plates in electrolytic capacitors are commonly made of?
What type of dielectric layer is used in electrolytic capacitors?
What happens to the conductivity of the electrolyte at low temperatures?
How can electrolytic capacitors be safely used after having been stored unused for a long time?
Why might the method gradually applying the operating voltage not be suitable to protect electrolytic capacitors in modern devices?
What is the main feature of a supercapacitor?
What is one type of material with which a supercapacitor may be constructed?
As of 2010, what is the highest capacitance a supercapacitor has achieved?
What type of capacitor is commonly used in electric motor circuits?
How many times the maximum AC voltage are AC capacitors designed to withstand?
Under what condition might the polarization of the dielectric be unable to follow the voltage?
What type of dipoles which add to the dielectric constant cannot move instantly if a rapidly changing time varying voltage is driving the capacitor?
What is it called when a dielectric constant changes with frequency?
What regulates dielectric dispersion?
What is an example of a dielectric relaxation process?
Since when have inexpensive ceramic disc capacitors existed?
Since when have surface mount packages for capacitors been commonly in use?
What do surface mount packages lack that allows their use on the surface of printed circuit boards?
What is one benefit of using surface mount components?
What is one difficulty when using surface mount components?
What do mechanically controlled variable capacitors enable to be modified?
How do cheap variable capacitors vary the separation distance between layers of a plastic and aluminum?
Of what type of diodes are varactors or varicaps comprised?
What varies as a function of voltage in varactors?
What is an application of varactors?
Why are capacitors connected in parallel with the power circuits of many devices and large systems?
How do the capacitors connected in parallel act with currents from the power supply?
What is one value a stiffening capacitor accounts for when used in for car audio purposes?
What is another value a stiffening capacitor accounts for when used in for car audio purposes?
What do parallel capacitors do to fluctuating current in order to deliver "clean" power for control circuits?
In what scenario are capacitors used for power factor correction?
How are capacitors used for for power factor correction prepared?
In what what unit is the capacitance reported for capacitors used in power factor correction?
What is the reason for using capacitors in power factor correction?
How are power factor correction capacitors sometimes installed?
What happens to the current when an inductive circuit is opened?
What happens to the voltage when an inductive circuit is opened?
What type of capacitor is used to make a path to bypass the contact points?
What is a typical system in which a snubber capacitor is found?
What type of capacitor absorbs radio frequency interference?
What is the main winding on a squirrel cage motor capable of withstanding?
What sort of capacitors are used on the second winding of a squirrel cage motor?
What does the capacitor on the second winding of a squirrel cage motor do?
What does the centrifugal switch do the capacitor when the rotor achieves operating speed?
Where is the start capacitor commonly mounted?
How much energy could a capacitor in a disposable camera contain?
To what voltage could a capacitor from a disposable camera be charged to?
What device can be used to discharge large voltage capacitors?
How are the terminals of high voltage capacitors stored?
What type of charge could a capacitor pick up a transient charge from?
What could cause the failure of a capacitor?
What can happen to capacitors used in high current applications?
What can happen to capacitors used in high energy capacitor banks?
What type of capacitors can generate soft x-rays?
What is one way to help minimize capacitor dangers?
What are natural and social sciences a subcategory of?
What is the history of arts and humanities called?
What kind of phenomena does science study?
Intellectual history and social history are used in what?
What replaced false beliefs?
Who depicts the history of science in a wider matrix?
What time period did the history of science begin to take a progressive narrative?
Thomas Kuhn used conceptual systems and what other term to define the history of science?
The advancement of agriculture made what possible?
Having a surplus of food allowed farmers and hunter-gatherers to spend less time working on what?
Before agriculture advancements, what were farmers having to do?
What advancement aided in spreading knowledge across generations?
Who was able to support the people who were adding to the written knowledge of nature?
Which civilization advanced in astronomy, mathematics, and medicine?
What did Egyptians use to better organize their farmland?
What theory did the Egyptians use to build rectilinear structures?
What research was Egypt known for?
What is the name of the earliest medical document?
Where did the Mesopotamian people originate from?
How far back do the Mesopotamian people go?
What did the Mesopotamian use to record data about the world around them?
What was the earliest recording of Pythagoras' law?
Which tablet had Pythagorean triplets on it?
Which era was marked by investigating the universe?
What type of science are making a calendar and finding cures for diseases a part of?
What is an example of skilled professionals?
What is an example of religious devotee?
What would the first scientists have been considered?
What are early Greek philosophers known as?
What question were Greek philosophers trying to answer?
Who was named "the father of science"?
Which religious deity did Thales undermine with his scientific theories?
Who was the first person to determine that the Earth is round?
Plato and Aristotle are known for systematically discussing what?
What discussion technique are Plato and Aristotle responsible for?
What year was the Platonic Academy founded?
Aristotle introduced what theory?
How many species of animals were classified by Aristotle?
Anatomy, zoology, geography, and studies like them are considered what?
What era utilized Greek theories?
What scientific theory was created by the Greeks?
Who employed logic, geometry, and natural sciences?
Greek thought is predominately applying mathematics and what other method?
Who wrote the book Elements?
What was contained within the book Elements?
Who was able to determine the the area under a parabola?
What method did Archimedes employ to determine the area under a parabola?
Which mathematical figure did Archimedes approximate?
What classification guide did Theophrastus create?
In what year did Pliny the Elder publish the largest encyclopedia?
What did Pliny the Elder observe about diamonds?
Who do engravers use diamond dust for?
What characteristic was Pliny the Elder the first to recognize about amber?
What method did early Chinese mathematicians use to calculate?
One rod in the second box from the right is what number?
When did negative numbers and decimals start being used?
What text includes Horner's method?
What advanced mathematical methods did the Tang dynasty have?
What observations in astronomy did China record?
What kind of predictions were made during the 12th century?
Who made predictions in 1601?
What year did Chinese astronomers start to observe comets?
How many records of sunspots are there?
Who was the Needham Research Institute named after?
What type of bridge originated in China?
What type of map originated in China?
What type of fan originated in China?
What type of globe did Zhang Heng invent?
What was a consequence of the Roman Empire being divided?
Where was support found for Greek philosophy?
What time period was marked by the spreading of Islam?
How long did the Islamic Golden Age last?
What language did Muslim philosophers speak?
What method did Muslim scientists use more than the Greeks?
What book did Ibn al-Haytham write?
What law did the Persians know of?
What was Ibn al-Haytham's nickname?
What theory did Ibn al-Haytham have proof for?
What was Muhammad ibn Musa al-Khwarizmi's profession?
Where does the word "algebra" come from?
Where did Arabic numerals originate?
What did Muslim mathematicians add to Arabic numerals?
What area of science did Al-Razi contribute to?
What language did the important scientific works get translated into for universities and monasteries?
Who favored empirical methods?
Who favored mathematics?
Who wrote the Catholic Church's Condemnation of 1277?
What era was important for scientific advancements?
Who pioneered parsimony?
What theory is based off of projectiles' motion?
What theory did impetus pave the way for?
What did the Oxford Calculators measure?
What year did the Black Death occur?
What caused ancient texts to be rediscovered by Byzantine scholars?
The invention of printing improved which society?
Printed word enabled what?
What type of mathematics aided in developing European science?
The focus on learning in the 12th century is referred to as what?
What began at the same time Scholasticism ended?
Which era came after Scholasticism?
What was the focus of the Northern Renaissance?
Which scientist was known for working on human cadavers?
Which movement took place during the 19th century?
What theory did Darwin introduce?
Which physics subject was affected by The Romantic Movement?
What caused Romanticism to end?
What year did Positivism end?
Which movement is considered to be a dividing line between ancient thought and classical physics?
Who made the heliocentric model popular?
Johannes Kepler created a model of what?
What did Johannes Kepler's model suggest about the planets?
What was Galileo's nickname?
What work was printed by Isaac Newton in 1687?
How many theories were included within the Principia Mathematica?
What concept did the Law of Gravitation deal with?
What are Maxwell's equations about?
Who discovered nuclear fission?
Who edited the first paper about nuclear fission?
What event was going on during the creation of the atomic bomb?
The atomic bomb was a part of which movement?
What is the problem with general relativity and quantum mechanics?
When did modern chemistry come into existence?
Who decided that chemistry and alchemy were different?
What book was written by Robert Boyle in 1661?
What was Antoine Lavoisier's nickname?
Which theory did the law of conservation of mass disagree with?
What happened to geology during the Scientific Revolution?
What did Robert Hooke study?
What theory did Nicholas Steno discover?
What book did Thomas Burnet right in 1681?
What text did Burnet base his work off of?
What changed about the way geology was implemented during the 19th century?
The idea of an ice-age that completely covered a continent was suggested by whom?
What group did Andrew Crombie Ramsay belong to?
What did Ramsay believe about river valleys?
What happened after radioactivity was realized?
Which scientist championed the idea of evolution?
What was the name of the book that Darwin wrote about evolution?
What was the reception of Darwin's ideas about evolution?
Who rediscovered the laws of inheritance?
What was the major break through for the study of genetics?
What larger group does political science belong to?
Where did the ideas of political science begin?
In history, where could you find someone studying politics?
Where did studying politics originate?
What did Plato study?
What method did Plato use to understand political systems?
What did Aristotle add to Plato's work?
What allowed political studies to spread?
What new idea caused politics to cover a larger spectrum?
Where did politics touch in the Middle Ages?
Who wrote The City of God?
What did The City of God change?
Who wrote An Inquiry into the Nature and Causes of the Wealth of Nations?
What did Adam Smith's work cover?
What idea did Adam Smith disagree with?
What idea did Adam Smith propose?
Who is Marxian economics named after?
What did John Maynard Keynes want to separate?
What concept did Milton Friedman propose after World War II?
How did monaterism aim to control the economy?
In the 1970s, what did monaterism turn into?
How did supply-side economics try to increase the amount of money in the market?
What was the beginning of psychology classified as?
What year is most commonly referred to as the beginning of psychology?
Who has the first lab completely dedicated to psychology?
What did Hermann Ebbinghaus study?
What was Ivan Pavlov known for?
What is the group that human psychology belongs to?
What is investigated in cognitive science?
What inventions advanced the study of cognitive science?
What new technology could be created as a result of studying cognitive science?
Who was the major proponent of American sociology?
What did Parsons believe made a functional society?
What was the problem with the views of Parsons?
What idea from Karl Marx was used to combat the problems with structural integration?
What is the main belief of conflict theory?
What science is based on linguistics, mathematics, and engineering?
How has computer science helped science as a whole?
What is the differing characteristic of contemporary computer science?
What text is the foundation of the study of the history of science?
Who wrote a more professional version of History of the Inductive Sciences?
What was the history of science during the 20th century?
How could Sarton's ideas be described?
Who studied the history of science?
What is the large question that the history of science answers?
What did sociology in science explain?
What was the most popular method in the 1960s regarding science studies?
What did Humboldtian science aim to do?
Who was the model for Humboldtian science?
What idea did positivism provide?
Where did the social aspect of science originate?
What idea did social science add to science as a whole?
How did Kuhn view the history of science?
What did Scientific Knowledge and its Social Problems describe the scientific community as?
What was the era called when scientists were rejecting the notion of objectivity of science?
What was positivism called after it was revived?
What did scientism aim to do?
When did the Soviet Union occupy Czechoslovakia?
What language forms a dialect continuum with Czech?
Name three Serbo-Croatian languages that have made a point of establishing their own unique linguistic identities.
Why have many Slavic languages sought to separate themselves from Russian influence?
What deliberate action has been done to some languages in the name of nationalism?
What language family is Czech?
Why did many Slavic languages distance themselves from Russian influences?
When did the Soviet Union occupy Czechoslovakia?
What language does Czech form a dialect continuum with?
How much do the lexicons of Czech and Slovak differ, according to on study?
What was the high percentage of differing lexicons found to derive from?
When is Slovak morphology more regular than Czech?
The most differences between Czech and Slovak can be found in colloquial vocabulary as well as what?
What does Slovak have slightly more of than Czech?
How did Old Czech's use of cases differ from modern usage?
What other language did Old Czech's declension patterns resemble?
How many cases did Old Czech have?
How long was the precursor to Czech classified as Old Czech?
By the thirteenth century, what had the Czech language separated from?
What was Czech civilization called back in the day?
What Holy Roman Emperor expedited the growth of Bohemia in the 14th century?
When was Charles University founded in Prague?
Who contributed heavily to the effort to standardize Czech orthography?
What did Jan Hus advocate for among the Czech commoners?
How many years as Czech continued to evolve and gain in regional importance?
When was the Kralice Bible published?
What did the publication of the Kralice Bible spawn?
In what war were the Czechs defeated at the Battle of White Mountain?
What language became dominant in Bohemia after the Czech's defeat?
What did the Czechs as a people gain during the mid-18th century?
What inspired the Czech's national pride?
What did Czech historians emphasize about their countrymen?
What did Czech philologists advocate?
What is the period during the mid-eighteenth century also remembered as?
What is the official language of the Czech republic?
How long has the Czech Republic been a member of the European Union?
What distinction does Czech have in Slovakia?
Who collected data on language knowledge in Europe for the 2012 European Day of Languages?
Of the five countries with the greatest use of Czech, which country had the lowest percent of use?
Czechs immigrated from Europe to the U.S. primary from 1848 to when?
What kind of language is Czech in U.S. schools?
What states have large communities of Czech Americans?
What is the most commonly spoken non-English language at homes nationwide in the U.S.?
How many Americans spoke Czech as their first language as of 2009?
How many regional dialects does Czech have?
Where are dialects of Czech commonly found?
What is dialect use associated with and thus stigmatized because of?
What kind of scholarly interest has Czech received?
What Czech dialect is gaining ground in journalism and the mass media?
Czech's word order is flexible because it uses what to convey word function in a sentence?
In Czech an intransitive sentence may consist of only what?
What is encoded about a subject in verbs in Czech?
What is a hard to pronounce and remember term meaning primarily auxiliary verbs and pronouns?
Where must enclitics appear in a sentence?
What are inflected for number in Czech?
What are the cardinal numbers one through four in Czech allowed to take?
What case are numbers over five in?
When is the genitive case used?
What is Czech's handling of cardinal numbers typical of?
Are there any circumstances under which a digimon cannot be reborn?
What typically happens when digimon are killed?
What are digimon made of?
How is a digimon reborn?
When was the digimon life cycle first described?
What was introduced during the first Digimon anime?
What happened to a digimon that receives a fatal wound?
What happens to a digimon after it dissolves?
What happens if a Digimons data is completely destroyed?
What companies were responsible for the creation and subsequent release of the original digimon?
What made digimon different from similar digital pets?
What year was the second generation of digimon released?
Who was the main market for the original digimon?
What was involved in the original digimon virtual pet gameplay?
What did the Digimon pets originally start out as?
When was the Digimon released by WiZ?
In what month was the second generation of the Digital Monsters Released?
What year was the third edition released?
What is the world in which the digimon live?
What happens to a digimon after they evolve?
Who accompanies the digimon as they work to save their world?
Are the children who accompany the digimon always the same?
What is the world of the digimon called?
Where are Digimon the inhabitants of?
What group of kids are in charge of the Digimons?
What is the process called when Digimon get stronger?
When did the first digimon series begin airing in japan?
When did Digimon begin airing in America?
What was the premise of Digimon?
How many people are in the original Digimon?
When did the second series of Digimon air?
What age are the original DigiDestined now that they are in High School?
Who is the new evil force that has been enslaving people?
What did Ken do in order to atone for his mistakes?
How long did Digimon stay off the air before returning?
What year did the fifth  series start?
What was the main focus of the 5th season?
What age group did the season target with its darker theme?
What was the original target age for the Digimon series?
When was the sequel announcement for the third arc?
What was the original run of the third arc of Digimon?
Who was the main character in the third arc series?
What is the dimension called between the human world and digital world?
How long after Digimon Fusion was a new series announced?
When was the 15th year anniversary held for Digimon?
Rather than a TV series, What kind of series would the Digimon become?
Where are you able to watch the new series when it is released?
How soon after did another series start after the Digimon Adventure 02?
Whats the name of the group that defeats Cody and Ken?
What happened for the first time to the DigiDestined in the film series?
How many Digimon movies have been released in Japan?
How many movies were directly connected to the anime series?
What year was Digimon: The movie released in the US/Canada?
What magazine were given their own original stories of Digimon?
What series did the UK magazine storyline follow?
What happened to the magazines after their run of Digimon?
What did the Digimon series end up having lots of during the series?
What were the first two North American games released?
Name one of the genres from any of the Digimon video games?
In what year did Bandai post information about a reboot on his website?
What year is the video game Digimon Story: Cyber Sleuth set to be released?
When was the Nintendo 3DS Digimon World Re:Digitize released?
Do Earth's lakes or glaciers hold the most freshwater?
What causes glaciers to release meltwater?
In which area are summer temperatures not high enough to release meltwater from glaciers?
Under what circumstances would humans require water from a glacier?
At what dimensions are glaciers called ice sheets or continental glaciers?
How many extant ice sheets exist?
How much would global sea levels rise if Greenland and Antartica's glaciers were to melt?
What is the term for ice that protrude's from a glacier's surface?
Narrow, fast-moving pathways on an ice sheet are called what?
What are glaciers called that end in the sea?
Most glaciers from Greenland, Antarctica, and Southeast Alaska are of which type?
Are tidewater glaciers more or less affected by climate change than other glaciers?
Do tidewater glaciers calve above or below sea level?
How are icebergs formed?
From where is the temperature of a glacier measured?
Which type of glacier is above or at freezing at it's interface and is able to slide?
What temperature makes a glacier polythermal?
What temperature determines a polar glacier?
What temperature characteristic determines a temperate glacier?
Why are the tops of glaciers rigid?
Which zone is the top of the glaciers?
Why are glacial crevices formed?
What are seracs?
Most crevices are no deeper than what measure?
Which crevasses form on the edge of the glacier?
Why do marginal crevasses form on the edge of a glacier?
What do bergschrunds resemble?
How are bergschrunds different than crevasses?
Where do transverse crevasses form?
How far does a glacier have to move to cause glacial earthquakes?
How high can the seismic magnitude be of a glacial earthquake?
Are Greenland's glacial earthquakes increasing or decreasing as time goes on?
During which months do glacial earthquakes peak in Greenland?
In what year were twice as many glacial earthquakes seen than in any other year in Greenland?
What are ogives?
What does the width of one dark and one light band measure?
How are ogives formed?
Under what conditions are ogives called wave or band ogives?
How many countries contain glaciers?
Which continent contains glaciers?
Which mountain ranges contain glaciers?
Where are glaciers in Africa located?
Which sub-antarctic islands have glaciers?
Which areas in Antartica are considered polar deserts?
Why can't glaciers form in polar deserts?
Does cold or warm air facilitate the transport of water vapor?
What cause glacial stiations?
What can scientists deduct from the direction of the striations?
What are chatter marks?
How are chatter marks formed?
When are glacial moraines visible?
How are glacial moraines formed?
Where are lateral moraines found?
How are medial moraines formed?
What are ground moraines also called?
What shape do mountain valleys have pre-glacation?
What gives mountain vallys their characteristic "V" shape before glacation?
How is a fjord formed?
What shape do glacial valleys have after being widened by glacation?
What has the ability to depress the crust of the Earth into the mantle?
With what speed does post-glacial rebound occur?
How much of a glacier's thickness is usually involved during crust depression into the mantle?
What is considered the minimal energy increment of a hypothetical oscillator?
In what year was the value E associated by Einstein with quantum theories of energy?
Who discovered an association between the value E and quantum energy?
What did the light quantum behave the same as in laboratory experiments?
What type of charge did a particle have that behaved similarly to light quantum energy?
What is energy abbreviated to in science?
What is frequency also known as in science?
What term describes a small amount of element?
What did the light quantum, in some ways, behave as?
What was later termed the photon?
When did Max Planck first recognize the value of the Planck constant?
Which scientist associated the Planck constant with a quantum five years after Planck's recognition?
Instead of an electromagnetic wave, what did the light quantum behave as in some regards?
What is the simple name given to the light quantum today?
What does classical statistics mechanics not define the value of?
What is required to exist in classical statistics mechanics?
After Planck's findings, what was determined could not take on an arbitrary value?
What is the "quantum of action" called?
What does the Planck Constant refer to?
Classical statistical mechanics requires the existence of what?
What was realized after Planck's discovery?
What is the Planck constant formerly known as?
Regarding atoms, what does the Planck constant imply?
Regarding atoms, what are values in between certain energy levels considered by the Planck constant?
Following Planck's discovery, what was realized about values of physical action?
The Planck constant initially was given what name?
How is the proportional nature of the Planck constant explained?
What type of radiation was Planck studying in the late 19th century?
How many years prior to Planck's study had the scientific community first discussed black body radiation?
What scientist first studied black body radiation?
What is required for the electromagnetic field to come to thermal equilibrium?
What does a hot object in equilibrium absorb as much as it emits?
What was Planck studying in the last part of the nineteenth century?
Who posed the problem of black-body radiation?
Cooler objects glow less than objects that are what?
What does a black object do to any of the light that hits it?
What is maximized as a result of a black object absorbing all the light that hits it?
Planck studied what problem posed originally by Kirchhoff?
What is known about the light absorption of a hot object in equilibrium with light?
Electromagnetic fields obey what laws?
Einstein and what other two individuals revisited the black-body problem in 1905?
Who came up with the term, "ultraviolet catastrophe"?
When did Paul Ehrenfest come up with the name "ultraviolet catastrophe"?
When was the first Solvay Conference held?
Who received the Nobel Prize in Physics in 1918?
What did Rayleigh & Jeans and Einstein prove independently in 1905?
What name did Paul Ehrenfest give to the proofs from Einstein and Rayleigh & Jeans?
When was the first Solvay Conference held?
What was the topic of the first Solvay Conference?
In what year did Planck receive the Nobel Prize in Physics for his discovery of energy quanta?
Who first observed the photoelectric effect?
When was the photoelectric effect first observed?
Who published the first thorough investigation of the photoelectric effect?
Who received the Nobel Prize in 1921 for his work on the photoelectric effect?
What did Einstein with the 1921 Nobel Prize for?
What is the photoelectric effect?
Who first observed the photoelectric effect?
Einstein's paper on the photoelectric effect earned him the Nobel Prize in what year?
Einstein's photoelectric effect work was rewards as opposed to his work on what other topic?
Before Einstein, electromagnetic radiation was considered to behave as what?
What terms describe different types of radiation?
What other types of wave besides light has its own intensity?
What is the energy transferred by a wave in a given time called?
Prior to Einstein's work, light behavior was modeled as what?
What is the name for the amount of energy transfered by a wave in a given time?
What portion of the photoelectric effect was in disagreement with the believed description of light behavior?
What does it mean for a light source to be more intense than another?
What is emitted as a result of the photoelectric effect?
What does the kinetic energy of a photoelectron depend on?
What happens if the photoelectron's frequency is too low?
What is the term used when photoelectrons act virtually at the same time?
What type of energy due photoelectrons emitted due to the photoelectric effect have?
What factor of the initial light source does the energy of the photoelectrons depend on?
When the photon energy is less than the work function of the material the light is shone upon, how many photoelectrons are emitted?
If the photoelectric effect is occuring, increasing the intensity of the light source causes what?
Who introduced the first quantized model of the atom?
When was the first quantized model of the atom introduced?
Why was the first quantized model of the atom introduced?
In classical electrodynamics, a charge moving in a circle should do what?
Who modeled the atom in 1913, challenging Rutherford's model?
What was predicted to happen to a nucleus-orbiting electron under Rutherford's model?
What statement did Bohr make about the electron of an atom, citing Planck's work?
 What measurable value obeys a similar rule of angular momentum?
What forces measurement attempts to choose between trade-offs, in quanta?
What form do measurement attempt trade-offs for quanta take the form of?
How is uncertainly measured in this experience?
What type of analysis fits the either-or nature of the uncertainty?
What example is given as another paired relationship of uncertainly related to standard deviation?
What is the unit of magentic properties of the electron?
What is the unit of magentic properties of atomic nuclei?
The Bohr magneton is the magnetic moment of an electron under what restriction?
What three terms define the Bohr magneton value?
How was the Planck constant calculated in the early 20th century?
The value quoted here for the Planck constant is based on a measurement in what year?
Where was this measurement made?
What method was was used to obtain the measurement?
One other measure involved the molar volume of what element?
What is a watt balance?
What value does RK represent?
If the effects are valid, for RK = n/e2, what is the measurement of KJ2RK equal to?
What is the Faraday constant?
How is the Faraday constant determined?
How is the Farday constant value quickly calculated?
What is the primary method for determining the Avogadro constant?
The Avogadro constant is determined to be the ratio between what two factors in the X-ray crystal density method?
What element is used typically to establish Avogadro's constant?
How is unit cell volume calculated?
Calculating molar volume requires knowledge of what two factors?
What is the largest cable company in the world by revenue?
What merged companies are the largest pay TV entity in the world?
Comcast is also the largest media company in the United States in what broadband area?
In what areas of the US does Comcast operate?
Where is Comcast company headquarters?
What are some of the cable TV networks owned by Comcast?
What two national over-the-air broadcast entities are owned by Comcast?
Comcast owns what movie studio?
What company did Comcast propose a merger with?
What date did Comcast drop their proposed merger agreement with Time Warner?
What is the largest criticism leveled by consumers against Comcast
It has been alleged that Comcast's internet service has done what to customers? 
What monopolistic practice draws criticism of Comcast?
What dubious distinction has Comcast earned twice from The Consumerist?
How does Comcast's customer service stack up against its competition?
Who is the current head of Comcast?
Who co-founded Comcast?
In what year was Roberts ranked as the country's highest-paid executive?
What was Roberts' yearly salary in that year?
What is Roberts power on the Comcast board?
Besides customer problems, what other area is Comcast often criticized over?
What online media outlet ran an investigative series on Comcast in 2014?
How many Comcast employees were interviewed for that investigative report?
What online publication ran a feature from a Comcast employee in 2014 that received attention?
What was this 2014 article anonymously penned by a Comcast Employee called?
What is Comcast's stance on organized labor?
A 2004 labor dispute in what city highlighted Comcast's anti-labor stance?
What was one anti-union thing that workers in Beaverton were required to do?
What creative union aired grievances against Comcast in 2011?
In what internal publication was Comcast's union stance formally enumerated?
What magazine listed Comcast as one of its top places to work?
What is Comcast's affiliated entity in Philadelphia?
What newspaper named Comcast it's top place to work?
In what year did this newspaper confer this honor on Comcast?
On what aspect did Black Enterprise Magazine name Comcast a top 15 employer?
What was Comcast's share value in 1999?
What was Comcast's share value in 2009?
Comcast's revenues in 2009 were how much?
What was Comcast's profit margin in 2009?
What caused a 2012 spike in Comcast profits?
What was Comcast's lobbying budget in 2013?
Where did this lobbying budget place the company among all entities in the country?
What is the name of the industry association that represents all cable companies in Washington?
What is the name of Comcast's affiliated political action committee?
How much did this PAC raise for candidates in US elections from 2011 through 2012?
When did Ralph Roberts get into the cable TV business?
Who were Roberts' business partners in this purchase?
What company did this partnership purchase?
What city did American Cable Systems do business in?
How many customers did ACS have when Roberts and his partners purchased it?
How many paying customers did Comcast have in 1994?
Comcast's customer base in 1994 was good enough for what national ranking among its competition?
What sports network was Comcast a founding investor of?
In what year did Comcast take over a majority interest in QVC?
What company did Comcast sell its interest in QVC to in 2004?
What was Comcast's telecommunication business prior to 1999?
What company did Comcast sell their telecommunications company to?
How much was ComCast Cellular sold for in 1999?
What internet commerce company did Comcast invest in?
MediaOne merged with what telecommunications company?
When did Comcast acquire the cable assets of AT&T Broadband?
What did Comcast pay for this subsidiary?
What was the original name of AT&T Broadband and Comcast going to be?
When Comcast purchased AT&T Broadband, how many customers did they service?
Comcast's advertising and commercial production branch was called what?
What media conglomerate did Comcast try to buy in 2004?
How much money did Comcast offer for this company?
What month in 2004 did Comcast drop it's bid for this company?
Comcast dropped their bid to focus on acquiring what sports network?
Besides offering money, what else did Comcast include in their proposal to buy Disney?
Comcast joined with what media company to acquire a movie studio in 2005?
What movie studios did Comcast and their partner buy?
What Pennsylvania cable provider did Comcast buy controlling interest in during 2005?
When did Comcast formally announce its purchase of this cable provider?
How much did Comcast pay for this cable tv provider?
What was the name of the interface front-end introduced by Comcast in 2007?
What company designed this interface?
Smartzone used what company's antivirus protection?
The contacts and address book for Smartzone was called what?
When was Smartzone rolled out to customers?
What media conglomerate did Comcast begin preliminary talks to buy in 2009?
What was NBC's parent company in 2009?
What ownership stake did Ccomcast get in this deal?
What company was forced to sell its interest in NBCUniversal as part of the purchase deal?
What other cable company was reputed to have an interest in NBCUniversal?
On what date was Comcast's purchase of controlling interest in NBCUniversal reported?
What did Comcast pay for their stake in NBC?
How did the FCC vote approval of the Comcast-NBC deal?
On what date was the sale finally completed?
On what date did Comcast buy out the remaining stake of General Electric in NBC?
What publication originally reported a potential deal between Comcast and Time Warner?
What was the value of the deal reported to be at the time?
When did Comcast hope to complete its deal for Time Warner?
Disney and Comcast joined forces to allow Comcast to air what sports networks?
What network was proposed by Comcast and the US Olympic Committee?
What city hosted the 2010 Winter Olympics?
What happened to the U.S. Olympic Network?
What is the name of Comcast's channel available to subscribers in east coast markets?
What is the name of Comcast's subscriber channel in Colorado?
In what year did Comcast Entertainment take over operation of Colorado's Emergency Alert System?
What New York area sports channel did Comcast help found in 2006
What baseball team was Comcast's partner in their New York sports network?
Who was the founder of Philadelphia sports corporation Spectator?
Comcast's purchase of Spectator gave them what sports teams in Philadelphia?
What was the original name of NBCSN?
Comcast bought naming rights for what college's basketball arena?
What was the second name NBCSN was known as?
What organization rated Comcast's customer service the worst in the country in 2004 and 2007?
Comcast's customer service was rated worse than what government organization?
When did the ACSI begin doing customer satisfaction surveys?
When Comcast's customer service rating fell 7%, what happened to its revenues?
What prime factor did the ACSI use to explain this anomaly?
What organization gave Comcast an "F" rating in 2010?
In issuing the grade, the Corporate Library found that a third of Comcast's board was how old?
How much did Comcast pay for flights of its company jet in 2010?
What conflict did Corporate Library note with Comcast's Board?
What name was listed on Comcast customer Ricardo Brown's invoice in January, 2015?
What consumer advocate took over the Brown's case?
What was the amount of disputed money that Comcast eventually returned to the Browns?
Comcast eventually refunded how much service time to the Browns?
Comcast also told the Browns they would do what to correct the situation with the name change?
What bacterium causes tuberculosis infection?
What primary body part is affected by tuberculosis?
Roughly, what percentage of latent tuberculosis infections result in active tuberculosis?
Along with cough, weight loss, and night sweats, what's the fourth classic symptom of the disease?
What name has been used to refer to tuberculosis because of associated weight loss?
Which lobes of the lungs are more often affected by TB?
What symptom will result if TB infection causes a Rasmussen's aneurysm?
What percentage of tuberculosis infections don't ever manifest in symptoms of the disease?
If TB becomes chronic, what lasting effect might it have on the lung's upper lobes?
Approximately what percentage of active TB cases affect the lungs?
The uniqueness of Mycobacterium tuberculosis is due to its high level of what type of molecule?
Is the division rate of the TB bacterium fast or slow relative to other bacteria?
In nature, what "helper" does the MTB bacterium require to grow?
How long is the period between division of MTB cells?
How much time does it take most bacteria to divide?
Which mycobacterium that causes TB can often be found in unpasteurized milk?
Which one of the tuberculosis mycobacteria is associated with the Horn of Africa?
Which of the four TB-causing bacteria do scientists think might be more common than we know?
What bacterium has the name of the country it affects most in its name?
What specific part of the lungs marks the start of tuberculosis infection?
What's the process by which macrophages try to get rid of the TB bacterium?
What do you get when you combine a lysosome and a phagosome?
What does the M. tuberculosis bacterium have that protects it from being affected by toxins?
What vesicle is the temporary holding room for the M. tuberculosis bacterium during phagocytosis?
What two-word phrase is used for the main part of the lungs infected by TB?
If the lungs are infected by TB via bloodstream, what's the type of focus?
In what general area of the lungs is SImon focus usually located?
What is the term that describes a blood-borne infection, like TB when it travels through the blood to the kidneys or brain?
Four areas of the body are usually safe from TB infection, including skeletal muscles, heart, and thyroid; what's the fourth?
What specific type of disease is TB?
What type of cells gather around infected macrophages in a person infected with TB?
What type of cell forms when macrophages clump together trying to kill off the TB infection?
What natural defensive response is hindered by cells in granulomas that can't send antigen to lymphocytes?
What's the technical term for abnormal cell death?
What process replaces tissue damaged by TB?
What material can sometimes be expelled by coughing if the cavities it's stored in connect to bronchi?
What type of bacteria-attacking medicine will treat tuberculosis?
Are the bacteria in caseous necrotic material living or dead?
What result might someone who has received a TB vaccination get from the Mantoux test?
What liquid would you need from a patient to perform IGRAs?
In combination with skin tests, are IGRAs associated with an increase or decrease in sensitivity?
Which test has fewer false positives: IGRAs or the Mantoux skin test?
What does "IGRAs" stand for?
For about how long does full immunity from the TB vaccine last?
What percentage of kids in the whole world get the BCG vaccine?
Is TB common or uncommon in the United States?
In addition to the U.S. and Canada, what European country sees very few tuberculosis infections?
What segment of the population gets the TB vaccine in countries like Canada with a very low incidence of infection?
What group heads up the Global Plan to Stop Tuberculosis?
In what year did the WHO say tuberculosis was a "global health emergency"?
How many lives did the Stop TB Partnership vow to save in the nine years between its start and 2015?
Drug-resistant TB is one of the barriers to success of the Stop TB Partnership's initiative; what's the other other?
What organization created a system to classify various types of TB?
What part of the mycobacterial cell makes tuberculosis more difficult to treat?
Isoniazid is one of the two most popular drugs for TB treatment; what's the other one?
What complication does the use of combinations of antibiotics for active TB prevent?
What's the three-word name for the method where a health care worker watches their patient take their medication?
What organization recommends directly observed therapy to make sure people take their antibiotics correctly?
If a person has TB that's resistant to rifampicin and isoniazid, which type of the disease do they have?
What's the minimum number of second-line medication classes your TB would have to resist to make it count as "extensively drug-resistant"?
In what country was the first case of totally drug-resistant tuberculosis?
What's the only antibiotic that might be effective against totally drug-resistant TB?
Cases of totally drug-resistant TB have been found in what country in addition to Italy and India?
As immunosuppression goes up in tuberculosis cases, what risk rises with it? 
What disease has a similar relationship as TB does between reactivation and immunosuppression?
If you'd been diagnosed with tuberculosis in 1995, how great a chance would you have faced of dying from it?
In what year did the risk of dying from TB reach half what it was in 1995?
New studies have found that half of reactivation cases of tuberculosis might actually be due to what other "re-" word?
Out of every 100,000 people in Swaziland in 2007, how many were infected with tuberculosis?
What country had a record-setting 2 million new cases of TB in 2007?
What people in Australia and Canada have a much higher risk of TB infection than other residents?
What indigenous people in the U.S. are five times more likely to die from TB?
What percentage of TB cases in America are diagnosed in minority groups?
What animal was found with 17,000-year-old damage from tuberculosis?
What does MTBC stand for?
During what time period do some scientist believe the first human could have contracted TB from an ancestor they shared with animals?
In which U.S. state was the oldest definitive evidence of TB found?
Who discovered M. tuberculosis?
What year was Koch awarded a Nobel Prize?
Koch's conviction that human and bovine strains of TB were unrelated meant more people were exposed by drinking what?
What did Koch call the ineffective treatment for TB he came up with in 1890?
What event is celebrated on March 24th to recognize the test for latent TB?
What was tuberculosis called in 19th-century England?
How many deaths out of every six in France during 1918 were attributed to tuberculosis?
In what decade was TB's communicability finally realized?
What did Britain try to get people to stop doing to reduce the spread of TB in public?
What were the "treatment" facilities for poor people with TB in the early 1900s called?
When did the incidence of TB in Europe reach its highest point?
When tuberculosis was at its worst in Europe, what percentage of deaths was TB-related?
What British health organization made tuberculosis its top priority at its start?
What year was the Medical Research Council created?
About how much had the death rate from TB been reduced in Europe by the midpoint of the 20th century?
What groups might help tuberculosis patients share with and support each other?
Education about TB seems to decrease the stigma of the disease and lead to what other positive effect?
What do some people say is even worse than the effects of tuberculosis itself?
What group of people can add to the TB stigma by treating patients as troublesome or unwanted?
As recently as what year were there no studies on how TB mortality is connected to stigma?
What vaccine are researchers trying to improve on?
What phase of clinical trials have some new vaccine options reached?
What does one option propose adding to the existing BCG vaccine? 
What's the name of the subunit vaccine being studied in South Africa?
What genetically modified virus was used to develop MVA85A?
What organization did the Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation donate $280 million to?
Policymakers believe tax incentives, market commitments, and what third incentive will speed up vaccine development?
What group with the initials SATVI is researching TB vaccines?
What nonprofit tuberculosis research foundation has a verb in its name?
What drug in the running to treat multi drug resistant TB has already gotten FDA approval?
What year did the U.S. Food and Drug Administration approve bedaquiline?
Despite FDA approval, how much more likely to die are patients who take bedaquiline in addition to the standard TB regimen?
Opposition to the use of bedaquiline think what providers were influenced by a connection with the drug company?
What type of publication has put out articles questioning bedaquiline's safety?
Outside of employment, what is the other main issue that affirmative action focuses on?
Affirmative action attempts to ask institutions to grant extra consideration to what group of people outside of Native Americans and women?
Studies showed that discrimination in both business sectors and education resulted in advantages for what group of people?
Affirmative action does not only attempt to remove disadvantages, but also to ensure what about the number of people in a field?
What is another example aside from racial quotes of affirmative action for collegiate admissions?
Having quotas regarding admissions or employment has been criticized and said to be what kind of discrimination?
What case determined that some implementation of affirmative action was unconstitutional?
In which time period did discrimination policies originate from?
What do critics of affirmative action believe should be the main factor in hiring?
When did the Reconstruction Era end?
Who proposed that land be divided and split up among families of color?
What was the policy of dividing land among families of color referred to as?
Which part of the constitution was the basis for policies that were developed during the Civil Rights Movement?
Who was the first person to utilize the term "affirmative action"?
In which document did the term "affirmative action" first appear?
Who was the author of the National Labor Relations Act?
Who did employers routinely blacklist of fire?
Who was able to review complaints about possible worker discrimination?
Which group of people did the Wagner Act fail to protect?
What day did Truman mandate the end of discrimination in the federal government?
How many executive orders were issued to help prevent discrimination?
What was the name given to Executive Order 9980?
Which position was formulated as a result of Executive Order 9980?
What name was given to Executive Order 9981?
When did President Kennedy issue Executive Order 11114?
What was the main aim of Executive Order 11114?
What was anyone who received federal funding of any sort required to do under the Executive Order?
Which Executive Order first contained the phrase "affirmative action"?
Who co - authored the executive order?
Who chaired the committee created by Executive Order 10925?
What was the alternative phrase to "affirmative action" that was being considered?
What was the main reason that "affirmative action" was chosen over "positive action"?
Which piece of legislation quickly followed President Kennedy's assassination?
Outside of the private business regulations, what was the other aim of the Civil Rights Act?
Which other Executive Order did the Civil Right's Act work closely with?
What was the purpose of Title VII of the Civil Rights Act?
What was the goal of the Equal Employment Opportunity C omission?
Who followed in Johnson's footsteps in terms of ensuring equal opportunity?
Which piece of legislation was begun in 1969?
Which industry of jobs did the legislation target?
Aside from the construction industry, which other group was one of the main offenders against equal opportunity laws?
Who held the position of Assistant Secretary of Labor?
What kind of classification was subject to strict scrutiny?
What was the only situation in which a racial classification could be considered acceptable?
Who later confirmed that racial classifications were only to be upheld if they were necessary?
What is an example case that can help display where upholding a racial classification is beneficial?
Which case concerning White and Hispanic firefighters was heard by the Supreme Court in 2009?
Where was the issue of White and Hispanic firefighters heard in the case based out of?
How many whites were given the possibility of immediate promotion as a result of taking the controversial test?
What percentage of those people taking the test were African American?
What was the final vote count for the Supreme Court over the issue?
Which President declared that discrimination is contrary to the Constitutional principles of the United States?
Which piece of legislation did President Kennedy use to claim that discrimination was a violation of the Constitution?
What were the affected industries in terms of regulation as a result of Executive Order 10925?
Other than being race and gender based, what did believers in affirmative action also feel that the system discriminated against?
Which organization believed in the class based argument?
What group of people did the AAPF claim affirmative action created?
What does the AAPF believe the foundation for the class based argument is?
What does the AAPF believe the goal of affirmative action should be?
What major event preceded the growth of the divide in education between White and Black Americans?
What was considered to be a major cause of the increase in educational gap?
What did returning black veterans not receive?
How many servicemen and women were educated as a result of the GI Bill?
What opportunities were few for black veterans?
Who conducted a study about the origins of "Latinos"?
How much of the Latino population did Mexican Americans, Puerto Ricans and Cuban Americans make up in 1991?
In relation to other major ethnic groups, what is the education level of Latinos?
What was the percentage increase of the high school completion rate for African Americans between 1975 and 1990?
How many of the total bachelor degrees awarded in 1990 went to Latinos?
Which groups can be categorized as Native Americans?
When did the Native Americans lose their land?
Where were Native Americans forced to live after they lost their land?
How much land did the Native Americans own in 1934?
In relation to whites, what was the poverty rate for Native Americans in 1990?
What form of discrimination did early Asian immigrants experience?
What law type did Asian immigrants struggle with?
Which piece of legislature marked the start of discrimination against Asians?
Which bill was passed in an attempt to limit or prevent Asian immigration?
According to studies, what are Asians perceived to be lacking?
What is one of the issues with affirmative action?
How do people who are in favor of affirmative action view it?
What does affirmative action supposedly aim to do?
What do proponents of affirmative action believe is the best way to combat exclusionary practices?
Which President made their stance on affirmative action clear in 1995?
How long after his inauguration was Bill Clinton's speech?
Which speech did Bill Clinton's speech draw parallels to?
What did President Clinton claim would not be enough to give everyone in American equality?
What was President Clinton's response to the claim that affirmative action was hurting the white middle class.
Where was the National Conference of State Legislatures held in 2014?
What did proponents of affirmative action claim some of the effects of policies that support affirmative action had done?
What has the concept of workplace diversity caused employers to do?
Having a diverse workplace allows for employers to do what?
Which organization claims that private sector employers believe having a diverse workplace is beneficial?
Which idea is the controversy of affirmative action primarily based upon?
Other than African Americans, who do detractors of affirmative action claim benefit most from affirmative action?
At who's expense other than Asian Americans are upper-class African Americans and Hispanic Americans supposedly benefiting?
What do some people believe should be the basis for affirmative action instead of race based legislation?
Who primarily makes up America's poor group?
Where were the Italian American professors employed that asked to be added as an affirmative action category?
Which year did the Italian American Professors make their request?
What category of race do Italian Americans normally fall under?
What was the title of the book written by Thomas Sowell?
Why would Italian Americans want to get themselves designated as members of a preferred group?
What book did Frederick Lynch author?
What did white males feel was happening to them as a result of affirmative action?
What moral position does Shelby Steele hold?
What does Shelby Steele believe that the true concept of affirmative action is?
What is a definition of reverse discrimination?
What do some commentators claim the irony of policies resulting from affirmative action is?
Who is an example of someone that states that affirmative action is another form of discrimination?
What does the opposition of affirmative action believe should be the main key in determining acceptance in employment or education?
An argument against affirmative action is that it encourages what?
What is a typical argument in favor of affirmative action?
In the compensation argument, who should supposedly have to make up for past discrimination against blacks?
Which argument is being made by those who oppose affirmative action in relation to the compensation argument?
In terms of whites, what is an argument that is used to try and refute the benefits of affirmative action as it relates to the compensation argument?
Other than failing to achieve its goal, what else do opponents to affirmative action claim it has?
Other than benefiting more privileged people within minority groups, what is another argument against affirmative action?
When was there a vote regarding affirmative action in Michigan?
How many Michigan voters elected to ban affirmative action for university admissions?
Which court case featured an unprecedented and controversial decision?
Where are racial preferences highlighted the most in the United States?
What is another term for kids who get preferential treatment due to their parents attending the same university?
Which case that went to the Supreme Court resulted in a decision regarding public universities and affirmative action?
What are public universities not allowed to do?
Instead of being allowed to set numerical targets, what did the Court rule that universities are allowed to do?
What does the racial preferences debate indicate about universities and colleges?
What claim did Ronald Dworkin make about the expectations that a college application should not have?
What does Ronald Dworkin believe admission should represent?
When can affirmative action be judged to be acceptable in terms of admissions?
What did the ruling in Hopwood v Texas set a precedent for in terms of admission policies?
What did the law passed by the State of Texas guarantee?
Other than Texas and Florida, which other state replaced racial quotas?
What is one example of what racial quotas were replaced with?
After the state passed the top 10% rule, what happened to minority enrollment?
To which university does Richard H. Sander belong?
In which publication did Sander publish an article questioning racial preferences in law schools?
What did Sander's study show in terms of black law students rankings?
How much does the article estimate the black lawyer population would potentially grow if affirmative action was ended?
Which legislative work prohibited the use of racial preferences for admissions in the state of California?
What area of study did professor Mark Long have a degree in?
In which year did Long publish his study?
How were rebounds of minority enrollment explained in Long's report?
Who would supposedly be the beneficiaries of a class-based style affirmative action?
What percentage of the black population thought affirmative action should be abolished?
With which organization did Li file a civil rights complaint?
Which university was Li alleging racial discrimination against?
Who was the Dean of Admissions at Princeton University at the time of the complaint?
What did Princeton claim the real reasons for the rejection of Li's application was?
Even though Li did not get accepted, what was done instead of a straight rejection?
On which date were lawsuits filed against Harvard and Chapel Hill?
Who filed the lawsuits against the Universities?
Other than Asian students, who else was allegedly being discriminated against?
What is the Students for Fair Admissions an offshoot of?
What are the Universities waiting for before proceeding with the lawsuit?
How many Asian organizations were involved in filing the federal complaints?
Who did the organizations file the complaints with?
Who was the target of the filing?
What grade average do some students have that are being rejected?
Why was the lawsuit eventually dismissed?
What rounds are the qualifiers?
How many teams in the first round? 
What league enters in the third round?
In the modern era, has any non-league team reached the quarter finals??
Has a level 2 club reached the finals ever?
When is the final?
When do clubs above 9 enter? 
Is there seeding?
What happens in the event of a tie?
What are the first 6 rounds? 
Where are the semi finals played?
Is there a name for the specific venue? 
Where did the semi finals take place before then? 
What was the top most used venue?
Where is the FA cup held today?
Why is it held at Webly Stadium? 
Do the people of London agree with this action?
Has the game ever fail to sell out? 
Where is the final played now? 
When did this stadium open? 
Where was the FA cup held while this stadium was built? 
Where is Millennium Stadium located? 
Was it always held in Millennium Stadium? 
Where do the majority of FA cup finals take place? 
How many times was the FA cup playing in the Oval ?
What was the first year the Oval hosted the FA cup? 
How many times has Crystal Palce hosted the FA cup? 
How many replays took place at the Oval? 
How many parts does the trophy come in? 
What is the  parts of the trophy? 
How many trophy designs have there bee? 
How many physical trophies have been presented? 
When was the first design changed? 
Is the cup engraved for the winner? 
When does the engraving take place? 
how long does the engraved have from start to finish? 
Is the trophy decorated? 
Where is he cup presentation made? 
When did people start presenting the trophy after the game? 
when was the first trophy presented? 
Where was the first trophy presented? 
What happens to multiple cup winners? 
Did that ever happen? 
How claims to have stolen the FA cup? 
Did he act alone? 
How long go did this crime take place? 
What did Burge do with the cup? 
What did they do with those coins? 
Do people look forward to Cinderella matches? 
What do people think about giant killers? 
Does giant killing happen often? 
Does the media showcase giant killers? 
What is a giant killer? 
Has the final been played by a two clubs outside of the top divisions? 
Has the final been won by a club outside of the top divisions? 
Who was the first outside club to win? 
What year did that take place? 
How many second tier have made the finals? 
Who used to brodcast the matches on the radio? 
What was the first Fa cup radio broadcast? 
What clubs competed in the match? 
Wa the game broadcast in both cities? 
So when was the firs national broadcast? 
Which three territories make up the Upper Rhine?
Who forced Christianity upon the Alsace people?
What occurred at the treaty of Verdun?
In what year did Lothar past away?
What was considered a common practice in during the Holy Roman Empire?
Under who's rule did Alsace thrive under?
Was was the name given to the Alsace provincinal court?
What was the name of the route that linked Germany,Switzerland , Netherlands, and England
Which other two cities also started to grow economically?
About when did Alsace lose its prosperity?
Why did Alsace decline has a prospering territory?
Which group of people were wrongly blamed for all the disasters that struck the region?
What were the jewish people accused of in Alsace?
When did the Rhine Rift earthquake occur?
In what year was Upper Alsace sold to the Archduke Sigismund?
Why did Frederick III use a tax and a marriage in Upper Alsace?
When did Mulhouse join the Swiss Confederation?
When did the Habsburgs  sell the Sundgau territory to France?
How much did France pay for Sundgau?
In 1685 Edict Fontainebleau by way of the French King ordered what to be done?
What was the population of Alsace in 1790?
Jews were banned from cities in Alsace, where were they forced to settle?
in 1791 Jews were granted what by the French?
Which country was Alsace merged into during  1871-1918
Which group or religion dominates the Aslatian population?
Which other large religion also exist in Alsace due to the once German presence?
What is the name of the Union created by France's second largest Protestant church?
What were landowners also known as that had a right to decide which religion was allowed on their property?
Which groups or religions were greatly accepted in Alsace?
Which group did Louis XIV tried push out of Alsace?
Around when did the Annexation of Alsace occur?
With education reforms in the 19th century what did this lead to in Alsace?
What is now the German dialects of speech now referred as to?
Which two dialects were banned from public life?
What did the banning of the two dialects  include?
Although Aslation is rarely used today, which region still uses their mother language of Aslation?
What other language besides French and German are part of the Aslation-French dialect of today?
What does the French constitution state for the language in Aslace?
How many adult speakers speak Alsatian according the 1999 INSEE survey?
With Alsatian language on the decline, what is the ration of children using the language regularly today?
What is the meaning of the name Aslatia in English?
What was the meaning or term used for Aslace that was used by english people in the 20th century?
Which nationalities still refer it to Alslace "ramshackle marketplace" as of 2007?
What individuals subscribe to a doctrine that baptism should be performed only for professing believers?
Soul competency (liberty), salvation through faith alone, Scripture alone as the rule of faith and practice, and the autonomy of the local congregation what examples of what?
What two ministerial offices do Baptists recognize?
Baptist churches are widely considered to be what?
When was the earliest church labeled "Baptist" traced to?
Where was the earliest church labeled "Baptist" traced to?
Who was the pastor of the earliest church labeled "Baptist"?
Who believed Christ's atonement only extended to the elect?
When did Roger Williams established the first Baptist congregation in the North American colonies?
Who outlined the four main views of Baptist origins?
Baptist origins were viewed as an outgrowth of what?
What does the perpetuity view assume?
Modern Baptist churches trace their history to what movement?
Adherents to this position consider the influence of Anabaptists upon early Baptists to be what?
Modern Baptist churches trace their history to the English Separatist movement in the century after the rise of what?
When did the Church of England separate from the Roman Catholic Church?
Who separated from the Roman Catholic Church during the Protestant Reformation?
During the Protestant Reformation, the Church of England (Anglicans) separated from who?
Puritans are described by Gourley as what?
Others decided they must leave the Church because of their dissatisfaction and became known as what?
Smyth wrote a tract titled what?
What was his first proposition?
What was his second proposition?
Smyth believed a scriptural church should consist only of regenerate believers who have been what?
What is paedobaptism?
When did John Spilsbury promote the strict practice of immersion?
Who promoted strict immersion baptism?
Tom Nettles was a professor at what seminary?
What was Tom Nettles a professor of?
Who was thought to be influenced by continental Anabaptists?
Early seventeenth-century Baptists were thought to be influenced by who?
General Baptists shared similarities with who?
Who are two representative writers?
What were the Dutch Waterlander Mennonites?
Who founded the earliest Baptist church in North America?
When was the first American Baptist church established?
Where did Roger Williams establish a Baptist church?
Where did John Clarke establish a Baptist church?
Clarke was what to Williams?
Missionary work began in what Canadian colony?
When did missionary work begin in Canada?
What was the first Baptist church in Canada?
Where was the first Baptist church located in Canada?
When was the first Canadian Baptist church established?
When did Baptist congregations split over slavery?
Why did American Baptist congregations split?
Slaveholders were prevented from being appointed as what?
Who prevented slaveholders from being appointed missionaries?
Northern congregations formed what organization?
What is the largest fellowship without control?
It has been suggested that a primary Baptist principle is that local Baptist Churches are what?
What term is considered somewhat incongrous is a self-governing church?
Beliefs about one God; the virgin birth; miracles; atonement for sins through the death, burial, and bodily resurrection of Jesus are examples of what?
When was the London Baptist Confession of Faith created?
When was the Philadelphia Baptist Confession created?
When was the New Hampshire Baptist Confession of Faith created?
"Crisis" comes from a Greek word meaning what?
Who wrote that some controversies reach a crisis level may actually be "positive and highly productive?"
What did Shurden claim was never ideal, has often produced positive results?
What are some controversies that have shaped Baptists?
When did Baptists become embroiled in the controversy over slavery in the United States?
When did Methodist and Baptist preachers oppose slavery and urge manumission?
They worked with slaveholders in the South to urge what?
What denomination allowed blacks active roles in the congregation?
What refused to appoint a slaveholder as a missionary?
When did black Baptists began to organize separate churches, associations and mission agencies?
Who separated from white congregations and associations after the war?
Who wanted to be free from white submission?
What states setup black conventions?
What percentage of all African-Americans identify with Baptist denominations?
Where did Baptist missionaries take an active role in the anti-slavery movement?
Who was a prominent British Baptist missionary in Jamaica?
Where did William Knibb work toward the emancipation of slaves?
Knibb also protagonised the creation of what?
What was named after the slave port of Calabar?
When did the Southern Baptist Convention vote to adopt a resolution renouncing its racist roots?
How many Baptists registered for the meeting in Atlanta?
SBC delegates are called what?
What sought to reset the ecclesiastical separation which had characterized the old Baptist churches?
Who was an influential Baptist of the 19th century and the primary leader of this movement?
When did the Southern Baptist International Mission Board forbade its missionaries to receive alien immersions for baptism?
The Southern Baptist Convention adhered to what as its official position?
What groups were formed by moderate Southern Baptists?
When was the Alliance of Baptists formed?
When was the Cooperative Baptist Fellowship formed?
Conservative theology was the official position of what?
What does child labour deprive children of?
Are child artists an exception to the laws with regards to child labour?
Is work done by Amish children an exception?
Where is there legislation that prohibits child labour?
Is all work done by children considered to be child labour?
Was there a period when child labour was essential?
Was there a great need for childhood education in a pre-industrial society?
Who taught the skills needed for the children to work?
Were peopel in pre-industrial societies considered to have long or short lifespans?
On average how many weekly hours did a domestic servant put in?
Mid-18th century London had how many domestic servants?
What was the youngest age of a child working in a factory?
How many hours did builders work in the winter?
Were children able to take on apprenticeships?
How many families were without a bread winner?
How many water-powered cotton mills used child labour in 1788 England and Scotland?
Was it a low amount or high amount of children that also worked in prostitution? 
Where was Charles Dickens employed as a child?
During the Industrial Revolution what was the main driving force behind child labour?
Where was photographer Lewis Hine employed?
What year were over 2 million children employed in the US?
What did children roll in a factory?
What did child do in textile mills in the US?
Early 20th century states began to have a responsiblity to take care of whom?
Children were employed in the home, factories and were else in the 20th century?
According to the Maplecroft Child Labour Index how many countries post risks for child labour?
What country is the second on the list for child labour in accordance to the Maplecroft Child Labour Index?
What was the Phillipines ranked as?
Was Brazil on the list?
Throughout European history was child labour seen as a positive?
Are boys or girls more likely in some cultures to be thrown into child labour?
For working parents what is the value of having their children work by their side?
Do many cultures place value of the education of a young girl?
Biggeri and Mehrotra studied primarily Asia nations including India, Pakistan, Indonesia, Philippines and what other country?
Is child labour a new issue in these Asian countries?
Supply and what else causes child labour to still exist today?
What encourages child labour across the globe?
Where do African children find their first jobs?
What do African children do primarily while working at home?
How many children in Africa are working in the arigucultural sector?
How many children in Africa pick coffee?
How many children work year round in Africa?
Where did children from urban areas primarily work?
Where did children from rural areas work?
When was the United Nations Conventions on the Rights of the Child Act implemented?
What was the most serious aftereffects of child labour?
What country is still an issue today with regards to child labour?
What is an issue in Africa with child labour definitions?
In Africa what is a cultural acceptance with regards to child labour?
In 1888 what country were child convicts sent to the most?
What restricted the 1870s Child labour in Australia?
Was child labour rampagnt in Australia?
When did industrailization take off in Australia?
In 1999 how many children were working illegally in Brazil?
What do drug cartels do with child workers?
What are the risks of child labour in drug cartels?
Has these dangers caused and increase or decrease in child labour with drug cartels?
What type of support did child give to their families by working?
What type of factories saw an increased need for child labour?
Was there an increase or decrease in the field of agriculture?
What became an issue for the working child?
Was illiteracy a factor in changing the minds of parents of child labourers?
What are the reasons that lead to a decline of child labour?
When was the UN General Assembly of the International Covenant on Economic, Social and Cultural Rights enacted?
What did this act due?
When were safe working environments legislation adopted for child labourers?
What did it help do to?
When did the Geneva Declaration of the Right of Children Act pass?
What did the international acts do?
What is the age limit now in India for child workers?
What child working conditions are they protected from?
When were students used as workers?
For Russian student workers how many summer days were devoted to work?
Did they need parental consent?
What year were students killed as part of a road cleanup project?
What former Soviet Union continued child labour programs?
What was the main source of income for Islam Karimov?
Did they have daily quotas for cotton?
What are the 2016 estimates for child labour in regards to cotton picking?
What happened at Verdingkinder auctions?
In 1930s how many indentured children were there?
How many Swiss citizen signatures were collected?
How many countries have signed the Worst Forms Convention 183 (C182)?
What types of child labour does this prohibit?
What other international laws deal with child labour?
What did the United Nations take charge of with regards to child labour?
What is the aim of this?
What are some of the target countries?
What do they want to do with regards to schooling of young children?
What happened in the European Union in 1996?
What age were children allowed to do light labour?
What age were children able to take part in European training programs?
What is the most common occupation for Dutch youth to have?
What does child labour do for adults?
What happens to the wages of adults?
What are the implications for third world countries with regards to child labour?
Does ending child labour have a global value?
What do some scholars agress is the "disease" of child labour?
Do these scholars argue for or against ending child labour?
What do these scholars argue for keeping child labour as a practice?
What caused child labour to decrease in the 20th century?
What caused child labour to decrease in Vietnam?
What do these scholars suggest with regards to child labour reductions?
What do international actions do according to these scholars?
What migrants worked on the Ivory Coast?
After a 10 year low in prices what did some farmers resort to?
Where did the children mainly come from?
Where were begging children often targeted for being sold into slavery?
What industry was accused of profiting from child labour?
Who dismissed the allegations?
What are the figures for cocoa farmers using child labour?
Who claimed these reports as being inaccurate?
Who was the supplier of copper and cobalt to China?
What are child creuseurs?
What percent of materials go to China?
What is the cobalt used for?
What did the BBC say that Glencore used child labour for in 2012?
What did Glencore say in regards to the allegations?
What did Glencore admit to with regards to child labor?
What is another source of mining dangerous to children workers?
What is the third largest exporter of gold in Africa?
Why is gold vital to the people of Mali?
What is the gold production income of poor families in Mali?
How many minors did Agriprocessors employ?
What did Agriprocessors say in regards to the allegations?
When did the CEO go on trial?
Who accused H&M of using products made by child labours?
Who else did they accuse of using child labor products?
What country did the cotton come from that was picked by children?
What are activists trying to get implemented?
What do some feel may happen if child labour products were completely rejected by society as a whole?
What happened to the 50,000 children in the UNICEF study?
Where did children work prior to the Industrial Revolution?
How many children worked?
Where did children go to work after doing farm work for so long?
What did parents do when the wages were finally raised?
What is benefical work for children?
What can children do in countries were trading is involved?
All but what type of children must learn to clean?
What hinders schooling for child labourers?
What can relieve tension for children at work?
What can schools do to help children led to better work lives?
How many main geographical sections make up North Carolina?
What section of North carolina makes up 45% of the state?
What is the section in the middle 35% of North Carolina called?
Tha Appalacian mountains and foothills make up a region of what state?
The extreme eastern section of North Carolina is called what?
Pilot Mountain and South Mountains are located in what region of North Carolina?
What section of Central North Carolina has the most dense population?
What is the average elevation in the west Piedmont region?
What do you call the line that marks the elevation that waterfalls first appear on rivers?
At what point does the coastal plin transition to the Piedmont region?
The weatern part of North Carolina is part of what mountain range?
The Great Smokey Mountains and the Black Moutains are subranges of what mountains?
What mountains are the highest in the eastern United States?
What is the name of the highest point east of the Mississippi river?
How high is Mt. Mitchell?
Hoe often do hurricanes hit North Carolina?
Floyd, Fran, and Hazel are examples of what that hit the state of North Carolina?
What was the strongest storm to make landfall in North Carolina?
What category of hurricane was Hazel?
What year did Hurrican Hazel hit North Carolina?
How many tornadoes does North Carolina have per year?
Houuricanes and tropical stors can produce what across the coastal plain?
What part of the state holds the highest risk for tornadoes?
What protects the western piedmont from tornadoes?
What weather phenomenom can weaken storms but cause major ice events in NW North Carolina?
What was another name for Blackbeard?
What was the name of blackbeards ship?
Where in North Carolina did Blackbeards ship crash?
What year did Blackbeard run his ship aground in North Carolina?
What year were the remains of the Queen Anne's Revenge discovered?
North carolina and Sounth Carolina together were known as what?
What year were the northern and southern carolinas seperated?
What was the profession of most of the settlers in the Province of Carolina?
What people were a menace to the coastal areas of the Province of carolina?
By what year had all of the pirates in the NC Province been captured or killed?
What was the state capital of North Carolina in 1722?
What city became the capital of North Carolina in 1766?
Who was the governor of North carolina in 1767?
What was the name of the offices and residence built for William Tryon?
What central North carolina cuty was chosen for the capital in 1788?
After what year did cotton and tobacco become important crops in North Carolina?
The Tidewater region was in what half of North Carolina?
What region of North Carolina used slave labor and developed a slave society?
Where did free black people migrate to because of the looser social system?
By 1810, what percentage of the free population was black?
What year was the confederacy defeated?
What Era began following the defeat of the confederacy?
The US abolished slavery without giving what to slave owners?
When did white Democrats regain control of the state legislature?
What did the KKK target with violence and terrorism at the polls?
What political party was elected to the legislature and Governors office?
What political group attracted voters displeased with Democrats?
What year did a biracial Populist fusion gain the Governors office?
What year did the Democrats regain control of the governors office from the biracial Populists?
In the 19th century, how many african american congressmen were elected?
What did the NC state legislature pass in 1899?
What type of taxes were required by the new NC constitution?
What did the new constitution require for voter registration?
Being excluded from doing what, made it so that black people could not serve on juries or in public office?
What year was the Federal Civil Rights Act?
What political party Dominated NC after the confederacy?
What was the economy of North Carolina based on after the confederacy?
When did a major industrial base appear in North Carolina?
Where did the major industrial base appear in North Carolina?
What was the emergence of the industrial base of North carolina based on?
What programs created by FDR helped North Carolina during the Great Depression?
Who did the new deal programs benefit?
What crops was the New Deal Program made for?
After what war did the states economy improve?
In the 1990's what NC city became a national banking center?
In the 16th century, where did Spanish explorers meet Mississipian cultureal people?
What is Joara?
Where would present day Joara be?
What was the name of the Spanish man that met the people in Joara?
What year did hernando de Soto arrive in Joara?
Who is the North Carolina state capital named for?
Who granted the charter for Sir Walter Raleigh to travel to present day North Carolina?
What year did Elizabeth I grant the charter to Raleigh to travel to North Carolina?
What was the second american territory the English attempted to colonize?
How many colonies did Raleigh establish on the coast of carolina in 1580?
In 1650, settlers from what colony moved in to Albemarie Sound?
What year did King Charles II grant a charter to North America?
What did King Charles II's charter establish?
Carolina was named after King Charles iI's father, what was his name?
What year was a second charter made to establish the borders of Carolina?
After the Spanish, who were the first Europeans to settle North Carolina?
Where did the English colonists that settle North carolina come from?
The English colonist  left virginia because of what issue with the land there?
Who was one of the first Virginian migrants to reach the carolinas?
What year did Nathaniel Battes settle in North Carolina?
Eastern North Carolina is also known as what?
Western North carolina is also known as what?
Where was The Tidewater located?
Where did immigrants from England and the Scottish Highlands settle?
Who did the Tidewater settlers remain loyal to during the American revolution?
Most English colonists arrived as what?
Indentured servants hired theirselves out as what?
What did the English settlers get in return for their labor?
Indentured servants were similar to what people in the early days?
As indentured servants improved the economy, there became a greater need to import more what?
Who met the British army as they moved north?
Who lost the battle of Cowpens?
Who led the British calvary at Cowpen?
What was the date of the battle of Cowpens?
What is another name for the race to the Dan?
The Battle of Cowan's Ford was fought on the banks of what river?
What year was the battle of Cowans Ford?
What is the present day name of the city that the Battle of Guilford Courthouse was fought at?
After losing the battle of Guilford Courthouse, Cornawallis moved his troops where?
What did Cornwallis move to the coastline after losing the battle of Guilford Courthouse?
North Carolina was the twelth state to ratify what document?
What date did North Carolina ratify the constitution?
What year was the state capitol building of North Carolina completed?
Where was the capitol building completed in 1840?
What part of the state were most slave and plantation owners concentrated in?
Some of the free people of color migrated from what state during the 18th century?
After the revolution Quakers and mennonited encouraged slaveholders to do what?
What happened to the number of free colored people for the first few decades after the war?
What was the name of the railroad that began construction in 1836?
The Wilmington and Raleigh Railroad was going to connect Wilmington to what city?
In 1849, what railroad was created?
What direction did the North carolina railroad extend?
What stretch of the railroad was vital to the confederates in the civil war?
In 1860, what percent of the North Carolina population were slaves?
Where were most of the slaves in North Carolina located?
What type of land did the slaves live on?
How many free people of color lived in NC in 1860?
Where were the free people of color located in north carolina in 1860?
What fraction of the population of North Carolina was enslaved in 1860?
North Carolina did not vote to join the confederacy until they were ordered to invade what state?
When was North Carolinas official secession?
When was Tennessees informal secession?
When did Tennessee officially vote to secede?
Some North Carolinians still refused to support what after secession?
Some of what farmers remained neutral during the civil war?
Where were the yoeman farmers that remained neutral during the civil war located?
How many North Carolinians from the west fought for the union Army?
When did union forces occupy coastal areas of North carolina?
What was the name of the Confederacys most famous army?
How many battles of the army of Northern Virginia did confederate troops from north Carolina fight in?
What was the name of the largest battle fought in North Carolina?
What was the name of the confederate general that fought in Bentonville?
What was the name of the Union General that fought in Bentonville?
Who was the first confederate soldier to be killed in the civil war?
Where was henry Wyatt from?
What battle did Private Henry Wyatt die in?
When did Henry Wyatt die?
When was the battle of Gettysburg?
What is the religious name given to the part of the country that includes the Carolinas?
What religion holds the majority in the Bible Belt?
What was the largest denomination in North Carolina in 2010?
What was the second largest denomination in North carolina in 2010?
What was the third largest denomination in North carolina in 2010?
Immigrants from latin America coming to North Carolina is increasing what?
What has happened to the number of Roman Catholics and Jews in North Carolina?
Religious diversity in North Carolina has generally what?
What is the second largest Protestant denomination in North Carolina?
What county in Piedmont is methodism especially strong in?
What is the Nickname given to North Carolina?
Science, Technology, energy, and math industries have risen what percent since 2001?
What is raleigh-Cary ranked among the 51 largest metro areas in the country?
What was North Carolinas gross state product in 2010?
What was North Carolinas state debt in 2012?
North carolina voters have leaned republican since what year?
What year did North Carolina voters once again vote for a Democrat?
What year did Bill Clinton win North Carolina?
What year did Bill Clinton lose North Carolina?
Where was the 2012 democratic national Convention held?
Who was elected Governor of North Carolina in 2012?
What political party does Pat McCrory belong to?
Who ws elected Lieutenant Governor of North Carolina in 2012?
What political party does Dan Forest belong to?
Who won North Carolinas 7th congressional district seat in 2014?
What agency oversees public schools in North Carolina?
Who holds most legal authority for making education policy?
What year did the boards chairman become the Chief Executive officer of public schools?
How many public school systems does North Carolina have?
What is the largest school system in North Carolina?
Duke University and Shaw University are examples of what type of colleges that are in North Carolina?
What was the first black college in the south?
What is the name of the only Catholic college in the Carolinas?
What is the name of the only Lutheran University in North Carolina?
How many major league sports franchises make North carolina home?
What is the only professional team from North carolina to have won a league championship?
The Carolina Hurricanes belong to what league?
The Charlotte Hornets belong to what league?
The Caroli8na panthers belong to what league?
What Speedway in North Carolina hosts two Sprint cupseries races each year?
Where is Charlotte motor Speedway located?
What North Carolina city hosts the NASCAR Hall of Fame?
What North carolina city is home to several top racing teams?
How many colleges compete at the Division 1 level in North Carolina?
Where is the ACC headquarters?
Where were the ACC football and basketball championships recently held?
What stadium host the ACC championship game and the Belk Bowl each year?
How many times has North Carolina hosted the NCAA final four?
How many people go to see the Appalachian Mountains each year?
What part of the state are the Appalachian Mountains in?
Great Smoky mountain and Blue Ridge Parkway are located in what mountain range?
How many tourists visited the Smoky Mountains and Blue Ridge parkway in 2013?
What North Carolina City is consistently voted one of the top places to live in the United States?
What Hockey team is located in Raleigh?
What league do the Carolina Hurricanes belong to?
What Hall of Fame is located in Raleigh?
What arboretum is located in Raleigh?
What is the center of North Carolina called?
Where is the Krispy kreme headquarters located?
What city is the North Carolina Zoo in?
How many miles of shaded pathways does the Nort Carolina Zoo have?
What North Carolina City hosts the Merlefest?
Fishing, hunting, and birdwatching are what kind of activities that are provided in North Carolina?
In the Fall, people go to North Carolina to see what?
What is another name for caving?
Howmany state parks are in North Carolina?
How many national parks are in North Carolina?
Where is the Uwharrie national Forest located?
Where is Croatan National Forest located?
Where is the Guilford Courthouse National Military Park?
What industry generates 1.2 billion in economic activity each year for North carolina?
How many full time jobs are held by those in the non profit arts and culture industry?
How much money does the nonprofit arts and culture industry raise for government?
What was the first museum in the country to be formed by legislature?
How much money does the North Carolina Museum of art generate?
Where is SouthPark Mall located?
What is the largest mall in the carolinas?
How big is SouthPark Mall?
Where is the hanes Mall located?
Where is the Four Seasons Town Center located?
What is a culinary staple of North Carolina?
What cut of pork do those in western North carolina prefer for BBQ?
What is another name for Western North Carolina Barbecue?
What cut of pork do those in Western North Carolina prefer for BBQ?
How many people visit the lexington Barbecue festival each year?
Krispy kreme is a chain of what kind of stores?
Where is the Krispy kreme headquarters?
When was pepsi-Cola first produced?
Where was pepsi first produced?
What city was Cheerwine created and based in?
What international prize winning winery is located in North Carolina?
What prized cheeses are made in North Carolina?
Much tobacco land has been transformed into what kind of orchards?
North carolina state law allowed a jump in alcohol volume from 6% to what percent?
What city was named Beer City USA?
Winston Salem is the headquarters of what tobacco Company?
The invention of cigarettes made what popular?
What year was RJ Reynolds Tobacco Company founded?
How many packs of camel cigarettes were sold per year in 1914?
What was one of the first growing industries to develope after the civil war?
Where is Camp Lejeune located?
What is Camp Lejeune?
Bases making up the larges concentration of marines and sailors in the world is located in what NC city?
Where is Seymour johnson air force base located?
Where is the military Ocean Terminal Sunny Point stationed?
What noble family wielded power during the Heian period?
Who threatened the authority of Japan's central government?
Masakado led an uprising in what province?
What member of the Fujiwara family rebelled in western Japan?
In what year did Masakado begin his rebellion?
The early courts' military conscription broke down around what year?
Warriors appointed to a province were called what?
Warriors appointed for specific tasks were called what?
Where did final authority over the military lie?
Bushi formed new associations in what century?
How did military families gain prestige?
Who were the three prominent families during the rise of the warrior classes?
The decline of the Fujiwara's governmental power was filled by what?
The members of what clan gradually replaced the Fujiwaras?
What allowed the paternal line of the imperial family to gain influence over royal succession?
The In-no-cho was prominent during what years?
What military commander gained power after the fall of the Minamoto clan?
How old was Emperor Takakura when he died?
What was the name of Takakura's successor?
Kiyomori removed how many court officials to protect his power?
What were the names of the temples that Kiyomori destroyed?
What was the term used to describe military governors?
What was the term used to describe supervisors of estates?
What was the name of the emperor that Yoritomo removed from the throne?
What artform became a mark of status in the courts?
During the Heian period, what did the Japanese think could reflect one's soul?
What was said to show low status or "poor breeding"?
Which Total War game has an expansion set during the Heian period?
What families are playable characters in Total War: Shogun 2?
The Rise of the Samurai expansion for Total War: Shogun 2 depicts which war during the Heian period?
When was the Origin of Species published?
Who wrote The Origin of Species?
What branch of biology was The Origin of Species founded on?
What was the expedition called that Charles Darwin discovered some of his evidence?
How do populations evolve according to Charles Darwin's theory?
Which group of scientists began to support evolutionary ideas?
Which powerful religious institution was a big part of scientific study in the 19th century?
What was the general opinion about transmutation of species in the 19th century?
How did the majority of science see humanity in relation to animals in the 19th century?
Which theology did everyone agree science was a part of in the 19th century?
What section of the population was Darwin's book written for?
Who attempted to secularize science during the debate over Darwin's book?
What was T.H. Huxley promoting?
What was the growing change in opinion about evolution called?
When did Darwin's concept of evolution become widely believed and central to the modern theory of evolution?
To what ancient philosopher did Darwin trace some of his evolutionary ideas?
Whose ideas were summarized by Aristotle in the work Darwin studied?
How did medieval scholars view the Genesis creation story?
Whose work considered adaptation to be evidence of God's design?
What was the name of William Paley's book claiming divine beneficial design? 
What religion were all naturalists working at the two English universities?
How did geologists explain the creation of new species in keeping with their belief in divine creation?
When did Darwin begin attending university?
What university did Darwin attend?
What was Darwin originally studying at university?
Who did Darwin assist in researching marine invertebrates?
With whom did Darwin study about catastrophic geology?
What expedition did Darwin join in 1831?
Who wrote The Principles of Geology?
Where was the first stop of the Beagle Expedition?
What did some of the fossils Darwin found on St. Jago resemble?
What caused Darwin to change his mind about the unbridgeable gap between animals and humans?
Which book did Darwin begin reading in 1838?
What did Thomas Malthus' book theorize would happen to human populations if they were unrestrained?
Which species did Darwin compare with the human struggle to survive?
What concept was de Candolle considering as he studied plants?
Who did Darwin write his ideas to in 1842?
What was the name of Darwin's 35-page writing of his theory?
Which botanist did Darwin begin a correspondence with about his theories?
What information was Darwin's essay based on?
How many pages had Darwin's sketch grown to in 1844?
What was the name of the anonymously published science book?
What kind of progression did Vestiges of the Natural History of Creation propose?
Who wrote Vestiges of the Natural History of Creation?
What was the evidence in Vestiges of the Natural History of Creation used to support?
Which scientist was in favor of Lamarckism in the 1850s?
What creatures did Darwin study that made him believe variation arose constantly?
In what year did Darwin begin to work on his evolution theory full-time?
By which year had Darwin's theory become more complex and supported by a lot of evidence?
Which bird species did Darwin become extremely interested in studying?
What species did Darwin study for dispersal across oceans>
Which book was Darwin working on when he received a package from Wallace?
What was in the packages Darwin received from Wallace?
Who wrote the paper, On the Tendency of Species to form Varieties?
Who wrote the paper, On the Tendency of Species to form Varieties?
By which year did Darwin have the basic premise of his natural selection theory?
Why might Darwin have postponed publishing his theory of evolution for over 20 years?
Which paper did Darwin write that was incorrect?
Who might Darwin have feared upsetting by publishing his work?
What did Darwin's contemporaries think of the long delays on his publishing?
What was Darwin's process on writing his books?
What was Darwin's original estimate for the amount of time his book would take to write?
Which scientist's study theorized that the idea of Darwin's work being delayed dates to the 1940s?
What was the cost for the first published copies of On the Origin of Species?
How many copies of On the Origin of Species were created in the first printing?
Where was the book, On the Origin of Species first offered for sale?
How many editions did On the Origin of Species go through during Darwin's lifetime?
Which institution bought 500 copies of the book, ensuring that a large number of people would have access to it?
What did On the Genesis of Species argue against natural selection?
Who wrote On the Genesis of Species?
When did Charles Darwin first use the word "evolution" in On the Origin of Species?
What did Charles Darwin do to address Mivart's arguments?
What was chapter VII entitled?
Why couldn't Asa Gray use a Boston publisher for an American version of On the Origin of Species?
How much of a royalty was Gray able to negotiate with a New York publisher for On the Origin of Species?
When was the first American edition of On the Origin of Species published?
What did Darwin decide to do with the profits of the American version of On the Origin of Species?
What was the print run that Darwin mentioned for On the Origin of Species?
What was Isaac Newton's belief about God  on the theory of natural law?
Whose epigraph did Darwin add to On the Origin of Species harmonizing God with science and miracles together?
Whose letter does the introduction to On the Origin of Species refer?
In which edition of On the Origin of Species was the epigraph from Joseph Butler added?
How far back does Chapter One of On the Origin of Species go in its coverage of animal and plant species?
What does Darwin use to illustrate the effects of artificial selection?
From what does Darwin assert all pigeons are descended?
Which evolutionary changes were the most important to Darwin?
What does Darwin believe about the differences between species and varieties?
What does Darwin theorize about different species with regard to variety?
What did Darwin and Wallace make central to understanding the natural world?
What did Darwin say that a "well marked variety" could be called?
What did historians say that naturalists generally thought about the differences in variations in a species?
What is the struggle that Darwin describes about population likened to?
Within what frame of reference does Darwin use the phrase "Struggle for Existence?"
What was Charles Lyell's perception of what organisms are exposed to in their struggle for survival?
When is competition strongest in the natural world?
What did Darwin say that artificial selection by animal breeders often causes?
What did Darwin say could happen somewhere if there is a change in conditions?
What can happen if species immigrate to a new location?
What does Darwin say can explain diverse feature such as antlers on deer and bright feathers on certain male birds?
Which of Darwin's written works has more in depth information about sexual selection?
What did Darwin expect to see between species with the addition of artificial selection?
What did Darwin use to illustrate the way that original species change and adapt into new ones?
What is the theory that is based on acquired characteristics within a species?
What did Darwin learn about about the characteristics of domestic animals?
What did Darwin speculate might be how inheritable variations might come about in a species?
What did Darwin admit about acquired characteristics in chapter one of On the Origin of Species?
What did Darwin learn about variations by observing breeders?
When was The Variation of Animals and Plants under Domestication by Charles Darwin published?
What was the hypothesis that attempted to explain heredity?
While Darwin wasn't sure about blending inherited traits, what was his opinion about utilizing inherited variation?
When did a model of heredity begin to be integrated with that of variation?
What was the modern evolutionary synthesis named?
What is one possible objection to the theory of integrated variation?
Why did Darwin wonder why all of nature isn't chaotic and random?
What did Darwin ultimately decide was the reason that nature is not a chaos of variation?
What are some flying animals that Darwin thought might have evolved from bats?
What example did Darwin give of eyes evolving?
How did Darwin justify his theory not breaking down?
How does Darwin theorize that instincts have evolved in slave-making ants?
How does Darwin theorize that instincts have evolved in bees?
What did Darwin notice specifically about slave-making ants?
Why would hybrids have characteristics that keep them from being fertile?
What are Darwin's thoughts on producing hybrids of related species?
What conclusion did Darwin come to after realizing that some diverse species were able to create variations easily, while other species thought to be closely related had difficulty?
Why did Darwin introduce a new chapter in On the Origin of Species in the sixth edition?
What was one of the objections that Darwin addressed in his new chapter in On the Origin of Species?
Which of Darwin's books featured a plant whose elaborate structure aided with fertilization by insects?
Which scientist was addressed the most often in the new chapter of On the Origin of Species?
Whose argument did Darwin borrow that geological record is very imperfect, because fossilization is rare?
Which book written by Charles Lyell contains the argument that fossils are too rare to be used as proof of life suddenly arising?
What did Darwin hope to find as he continued to explore new geologic discoveries?
How long did Darwin estimate the erosion of the Weald to be?
What is the name of the group of well-developed organisms that were discovered within fossil-bearing layers?
Why couldn't differences in flora and fauna be explained by differences in regions alone?
What did Darwin consider that could explain why different regions could have such different species when they are close together?
What was the combination of effects that Darwin considered the most important in determining the differences in species that evolved separately in similar environments?
What theory does Darwin discuss that is related to the importance of homologous structures?
What are some examples that Darwin gives of species whose basic form of limbs is similar, but who have vastly different uses for them?
What does Darwin note about the embryos of many different species in the same class?
What are some examples of rudimentary organs that Darwin discusses in the chapter?
What hopes does Darwin have for his theory in the natural history fields?
Why did Darwin avoid the topic of the origins of humans in most of his book?
What does Darwin allude to hoping in the final chapter of On the Origin of Species about humans?
What were Darwin's two important aims about evolution?
What did heknow his readers were already familiar with from Vestiges?
How did Darwin view Vestiges in the introduction to On the Origin of Species?
What does Darwin do to show that his theory can support many theories that could not be explained by individual creation of species?
Whose scientific philosophy argued that a mechanism could be called a vera causa if three things could be shown as true?
What are the three things John Herschel maintains need to be shown to allow for a mechanism be called a true cause?
What reason did David Quammen believe that On the Origin of Species was weakened in later editions?
Why did James T. Costa think that On the Origin of Species was more likely to draw interest than a larger book that Darwin had been working on?
What did On Origin of Species avoid in order to raise its chance of being taken seriously?
What element of On the Origin of Species ensured that the book would be taken seriously by scientists?
Why did James T. Costa think the larger, abandoned book would not have been as successful?
Why did On the Origin of Species likely raise so much interest and debate?
Why was the book taken seriously even though much of the response was hostile?
What field of ideas latched onto On the Origin of Species when it became a widespread success?
What did Darwin's book do for the field of scientific study of evolution?
What was the term used to not only describe Darwin's theories, but the whole spectrum of evolution-ism after his book met with success?
What was the general response from scientific readers to Lamarck's written work?
What was the likely reason that Darwin's ideas were accepted more readily than Lamarck's?
Which school did opponents to Darwin's method support?
Where did early support for Darwin's findings come from?
Who authored research supporting insect mimicry  using natural selection?
Who supported Darwin's theories on evolution despite it having little impact on his own research?
What did Huxley's 1860 article in the Westminster Review promote?
Why did Huxley coin the name "Darwinism?"
What did the morphologist Ernst Haeckel convince Huxley of about comparative anatomy and paleontology?
Who was the leading naturalist in Britain?
How did Owen respond to On the Origin of Species with his review?
What was the debate between Huxley and Owen concerning humans and apes?
What was the primary debate at the British Association for the Advancement of Science meeting of 1860?
When did Darwin publish his own explanation of the question of the evolution of man and ape?
While evolutionary ideas were accepted by German biologists, what was not?
What led to more misgivings of conservative scientists when Bronn's German translation of On the Origin of Species was published?
Which group of people was excited by the German translation of On the Origin of Species?
Why were political radicals such as Ernst Haekel so interested in On the Origin of Species?
Why did most scientists accept the validity of evolution by the 1870s, but considered natural selection a minor part of it?
What was meant by the term saltationism?
What is the term for the belief that species have a tendency to change and adapt in a certain direction?
What was the minority view on evolution that was believed by August Weismann?
What rediscovered inheritance was thought to invalidate Darwin's views on evolution?
Who believed that action needed to be taken to level out the social and economic playing field before natural selection could occur to improve humanity?
Which political commentary attempted to widen the idea of natural selection to include competition between different races of people and countries?
Why were some political commentaries attempting to attach natural selection to human races?
What uses of his ideology did Darwin object to being used?
What view did Louis Agassiz have of On the Origin of Species?
What view did some clergymen in the Church of England take of the theory of natural selection?
What did Darwin do to show that he admired the cleric Charles Kingsley? 
What did some commentators think about Darwin changing the phrasing in his book?
What were Darwin's views on the part of God in his theory?
What was Baden Powell's opinion of On the Origin of Species?
What did the pamphlet that Asa Gray published defend?
What was a way that theologians compromised with the information in Darwin's book?
What was later realized that caused naturalistic mechanisms such as neo-Lamarckism to be embraced?
What branching common descent theory has become the most unifying one of the life sciences?
What does the theory of evolution explain about living organisms?
In what fields has Darwin's theory of evolution become particularly essential?
What kind of controversy has begun within school systems about Darwin's theory?
What kinds of things have been done by scholars interested in Darwin's work?
What has been created in 1959 and filled with information about changes in every edition of On the Origin of Species?
What was done on the 150th anniversary of the publication of On the Origin of Species?
What party did Gorbachev belong to?
What was the name of the legislative body that was brought into existance in 1989?
When were opposition parties first allowed in the Soviet Union?
In which country did Warsaw Pact regime remain in place?
What were some of the downsides of the more liberal Soviet Union?
When was Gorbachev's speech addressing alcohol abuse?
Other than increasing pricing what was another measure that was introduced to decrease alcohol consumption?
What was censored?
Whose anti-alcohol program did Gorbachev's remind people of?
When did Tsar Nicholas II ban alcohol?
When did Eduard Shevardnadze gain full membership in the Politburo?
Who was responsible for Shevardnadze's membership?
Who was minister of foreign affairs prior to Shevardnadze?
What was Gromyko's western nickname?
Which person did Gorbachev kick out of the Politburo on the first of July?
Who became Chairman of the Council of Ministers in 1985?
Who was Chairman of the Council of Ministers prior to Ryzhkov?
How old was Tikhonov when he stopped being Chairman?
Who was the new chairman of the State Planning Committee in 1985?
What is an analogous office to Chairman of the Council of Ministers?
What is the English translation of the word Jeltoqsan?
Who was fired by Gorbachev causing riots?
What position did Konayev hold in Kazakhstan prior to his removal?
Who took the place of Konayev?
When were the first demonstrations in Kazakhstan to protest the removal and replacement of Konayev?
Who was demonstrating?
How many people were estimated by authorities to have attended the riots?
How did the Kazakh SSR government say the two protesters were killed?
What were the attendance estimates from non governmental groups?
Who wrote about the KGB officer's testimony?
Whose support did Gorbachev seek in order to increase liberties?
What party was Gorbachev in charge of?
What group wanted to stop reforms?
When were the prisoners set free?
Who released the prisoners in the 1950s?
What sort of prisoners were released?
Who demonstrated close to the Kremlin in July of 1978?
Prior to 1987 when was the last large release of prisoners?
When was the Yerevan demonstration?
How many people demonstrated?
What was the demonstrators' nationality?
The protesters were unhappy with the pollution in what body of water?
Where did the protest march start?
How many Azerbaijanis died in the Askeran clash?
When was the Askeran clash?
Who killed the two Azerbaijanis?
What was triggered by the radio broadcast of the deaths?
How many were killed in the ensuing riots?
What group was responsible for the April 25, 1988 protest?
Where did the march happen?
What did the marchers wish to commemorate? 
Which group held secret Milleneum of Christianity celebrations?
In what city did the Ukrainian Cultural Club have its Millennium celebration?
How many people attended the Lviv rally?
Where was the dispersal attempt made?
Who tried to stop the rally?
Who led the Millennium celebration in Zarvanytsia?
Who wanted to break up the celebration?
What percentage of people voted on March 26?
How many constituencies had run-off elections?
How many CPSU endorsement having candidates lost to independents?
What did the Popular Front do to Armenian railways?
What shortages were caused by the blockade?
How much freight into Armenia originated in Azerbaijan? 
When was the sovereignty law passed?
What in Jalilibad was taken over by the Popular Front?
What did the protesters want Georgia to leave?
What did the protesters hope to see become a part of Georgia?
Who attacked the protest?
How many people died in the April 9 attack?
What happened to Georgian politics as a result of the attack?
What were people protesting in Kiev during the last part of February?
Who did the protesters want to resign? 
What was Scherbytsky's nickname?
Who visited the Ukraine while the protests were taking place?
How many people attended the service in Lviv?
What ideology's victims were being honored by the Memorial Society?
How many people from the pre-election meeting in Lviv were detained?
Members of what ideology were more heavily elected to the union Congress of People's Deputies?
How many deputies were elected?
What were the hunger strikers hoping to draw attention to?
When did the Lviv regional Memorial Society have its first conference?
How many people attended the services in western Ukraine?
How many people demonstrated on October 1?
Who attacked the protest?
Where did the attack occur?
What was happening in the stadium at the time?
Prior to the October 20 synod, when was the last one held in Lviv?
When was The Shevchenko Ukrainian Language Society made official?
The three human rights activists reburied November 19th were prisoners where?
Where was Gulag Camp No. 36 located?
Where were the activists reburied?
Who met with Gorbachev on November 22?
What did the Belorussians wish to be cleaned up?
Where did the Chernobyl Disaster occur?
When did the Chernobyl disaster happen?
What symbol did the protesters wear on their arms?
How was the weather during the protest?
Where was the fatal June 19th riots?
Who were the rioters?
What did the rioters try to take over?
How many towns had riots of their own following the initial riots?
What was attacked in Mangishlak?
What party's candidates were murdered in the September 30 elections?
How many members were from opposition parties?
How many total members were there?
Who was elected to be Chairman in May?
How many miles long was the human chain?
Who organized this chain?
What country's independence were the chain members celebrating?
When had the Ukrainian Greek-Catholic Church been broken up by the Soviets?
In 1990 which party had most of the election victories?
How long did it take Parliament to accept Ivashko's resignation?
Who was elected to be the new deputy general secretary of the Communist Part of the Soviet Union in July?
How many Parliament members voted against the Declaration on State Sovereignty of Ukraine?
What was attacked by Soviet troops on January 13?
Where was the TV Tower located?
What were the Soviets hoping to stop?
How many civilians died in the attack?
What was attacked by Russians on July 31?
What was Gorbachev attempting to decentralize? 
What was supposed to be signed on August 20?
Who supported the treaty?
What would have maintained power if the treaty was signed?
Who arrived to protect the White House?
Who did the organizers want to arrest?
Where was Yeltsin during the coup?
What was Yeltsin doing on the tank?
What TV channel carried the broadcast of the coup?
Where was the secret meeting of the leaders?
What was signed at the secret meeting in Balarus?
When was the meeting held?
What was formed to replace the Soviet Union?
What was coming to an end?
When were the Belavezha Accords ratified?
Who ratified the Accords?
Who was recalled?
Who showed signs that he was considering resigning his position?
What went down after Gorbachev departed from the Kremlin?
What replaced the Soviet flag?
When did Gorbachev make his final Kremlin exit?
What was declared as having ceased to exist?
What body also stopped existing following a vote by itself to end itself?
Which country took over the Soviet Union's UN membership?
What made Russia the successor state to the USSR?
Who wrote the letter to the UN secretary general informing them that Russia would be replacing the USSR?
What was the date on the Yeltsin letter?
When did the UN accept the statement?
Who was set up as Patriarch of Kiev and all Ukraine on the 18th of November?
Who gave Mstyslav this title?
Who was the Canadian consul-general to Kiev?
What country made John Stepanchuk its consul-general to Kiev?
How long lasting was the pact between Kravchuk and Yeltsin?
Who was the person that tried Jesus?
How long was Jesus hung for?
What did the sign say on top of Jesus' cross?
What was done to make sure Jesus was dead?
How many statements did Jesus make on the cross?
What is one of the historical certain facts about Jesus?
Do non-Christians agree that the Crucifixion happened?
Is the exact reason known that Jesus got Crucified for?
Who said the Crucifixion of Jesus is firmly established.
Who said the Baptism of Jesus was Univeral Assent?
Are all sources of the crucification literary?
What evidence was found that Crucifixion did happen?
Who was the crucified man discovered in an archaeological find?
When was Ben Hagkol crucified?
What institution holds a heel bone with a spike inserted?
What holds the records of the death of Jesus?
What part of the Bible references the death of Jesus?
How many times did Jesus predict his own death?
What part of Jesus' life is detailed in these gospels?
How detailed is the description of Jesus' death?
Where was Jesus arrested?
What did Jesus do before he was arrested?
How many Apostles were there at the Last Supper?
How was Jesus tortured before he was crucified?
What was placed on Jesus' head?
What was Jesus offered to drink after his arrest?
Where was Jesus Crucified?
How many hours did Jesus endure Crucifixion?
How many accounts are there of Jesus' last words?
Who removed Jesus from the cross?
What detail of Jesus's Crucifiction was only found in Matthew's Gospel?
Which gospel mentioned the time of Crucifiction?
Who did Jesus talk to in the Gospel of Luke?
What gospel talks about breaking Jesus' legs?
What prophecy was fulfilled by the piercing of Jesus' side?
Which Epistle details the raising of Jesus?
Which writing detailed Jesus' appearance before ascension?
How long did Jesus stay with the Apostles per the Acts of the Apostles?
What day is accounted in the Gospel of Luke as the ascension?
Who wrote both accounts of the Crucifixion and ascension?
Who was crucified with Jesus per Mark?
How does Mark say Jesus' life ends?
what natural disaster is mention when Jesus died?
What does Luke say one of the rebels does?
How does Luke make Jesus seem at his Crucifixion?
Where can an early non-Christian reference be found to the Crucifixion?
What is the author of the letter assumed to be?
What does the letter reference?
Other than Jesus, who was one of the wisemen?
Does everyone agree with the content of the letter?
What day is presumed the Crucifixion happened?
Why do some scholars propose a Thursday is possible?
Why do some other scholars argue that it happened on a Wednesday?
How long was Jesus said to be in the tomb?
Was Jesus in the tomb exactly 72 hours?
What time was the crucifiction per Mark?
What time did Jesus die per Mark?
Why do scholars say the times are different depending on the gospel it's written in?
What is another reason the times differ so much?
How close was time guessed in the day of the Gospels?
Who described an interaction between Jesus on the cross and women?
What did Jesus say to women in the crowd?
Where are the words found in the Gospel?
What followed Jesus around?
Matthew described that who was present at the Crucifixion?
The three gospels speak of the presence of which priests?
How many people were crucified with Jesus?
Who kept watch over Jesus?
Name one other group present at the Crucifixion?
How many nails were suggested they used for the crucifixion?
According to some sources, what is theorized to be the maximum nails used?
What adds to the confusion of the number of nails used?
What do all artworks have in common regarding the crucifixion?
Jesuits claim how many nails were used?
What was said to be used as a platform for crucifixion?
Why was a platform used?
Who considered this topic in the 17th century?
Who performed crucifixion experiments in the 20th century to test theories?
Who also used suspension as a form of punishment?
What Psalm gives the words of Jesus on the cross?
What contradiction is found in this Psalm?
What was the psalm said to be in Jesus' time?
How do the other gospels describe Jesus' last words?
How does the sentence appear to historians?
As what was the event mistaken by some pagans?
Why was a solar eclipse impossible?
Which Greek historian wrote about these natural occurrences?
Who reigned Rome during the Crucifixion of Jesus?
What other event supposedly took place that shook people?
Which historian was referenced for the reports?
What event did Thallus describe?
What day do Hebrews celebrate Passover?
When does the passion of Jesus fall?
Where were these events documented?
What is recently considered the type of eclipse that occurred?
How long would a lunar eclipse be visible?
What person possibly made a mistake while copying text?
Which historian says this opinion is indefensible?
What inconsistency would be found in this explanation?
Who wrote The Crucifixion of Jesus?
What did Frederick Zugibe study in detail for this book?
How did Zugibe try to prove his theories?
What kind of experiments did Zugibe run?
What specifics were recorded in his experiments?
What book details the submission of Jesus to being crucified?
Why did Jesus accept Crucifixion.
What theme is central is the Gospel of John in resurrection?
How is Resurrection detailed in the book of Revelations?
What is another name for Jesus given?
Who's Christology focuses on the death and Resurrection?
How is the crucifixion related to the resurrection per Paul?
What term does Paul use for the Gospels?
Paul claims the Resurrection was needed for what reason?
How does Paul view the Resurrection of Jesus?
What did John Calvin claim Jesus could have done?
Why did Jesus submit to crucifixion?
The Eastern Church believes what regarding the death and ressurection?
What did Jesus's death accomplish per the Eastern Church?
What is the blood of the lamb?
What does Jesus' death and Resurrection support?
How important is Jesus' death to modern theology?
Did Jesus sacrifice himself without fighting?
Why did Jesus sacrifice himself?
What church is the sacrifice important to?
Who was present under the cross?
What symbol is popular in Marian Art?
Which pope claims Mary was present at Jesus' Crucifixion?
Who painted the Mond Crucifixion.
Who was responsible for the art names "His Entombment"?
What does downtown Miami possess more of than any other US city?
Along with cruise lines, in what traffic does Miami's port rank first?
What is called the "Cruise Capital of the World"?
How long has Miami been the world's top cruise passenger port?
Along with hospitals, medical centers and biotechnology industries, what is notably present in the Civic Center?
In the early 1900s, what percentage of Miami's population was of African origin?
What was NW Fifth Avenue previously called?
Where did a portion of Miami's black population migrate from in the early 1900s?
Who was a notable chief of the Miami police?
To what controversial organization did a Miami chief of police belong?
For what reason did H. Leslie Quigg kill a black man?
What was the occupation of the African-American man killed by Quigg?
In what year did Fidel Castro take over Cuba?
From what country did people notably emigrate to southern Florida in the 1980s and 90s?
What notable hurricane occurred between the 1980s and 1990s?
What is the largest city in the United States where a majority of the population speaks Spanish?
Miami is the US city with the largest population of what ethnic group?
Where are the Everglades in relation to Miami?
To travel from Biscayne Bay to Miami, in what direction would one move?
What is the northern terminus of Biscayne Bay?
In kilometers, how far is the Gulf Stream from Miami's coast?
In meters, what is the average height above sea level of the Miami area?
What is another name for Miami limestone?
How many meters thick is the bedrock under Miami at its maximum?
What Stage occurred approximately 130,000 years ago?
How many meters did the Sangamonian Stage raise sea levels compared to their present level?
What event caused sea levels to decrease approximately 100,000 years ago?
Along with Miami Springs, where is the highest point of the Biscayne Aquifer?
The Biscayne Aquifer stretches from Palm Beach County to where?
After digging how many meters is one sure to reach running water in Miami?
What is limited by Miami's high water table?
Along with West, Downtown and North, what is the other notable area of Miami?
By cardinal direction, what part of the city is referred to as Downtown?
Along with Port Miami, Watson Island and Brickell, what area is in Downtown Miami?
On what street is the highest concentration of international banks in the US?
Where is South Beach in relation to Downtown?
Along with Coconut Grove and Coral Way, what is notably present in southern Miami?
When was Coral Way constructed?
What does Coral Way connect to Coral Gables?
In what year did the establishment of Coconut Grove occur?
What part of Coconut Grove houses the city hall of Miami?
What notable theater is present in Overtown?
After whom is the performing arts center in Midtown named?
In what part of Miami is Midtown?
What is the name of the architectural style originating in 1950s Miami?
What northern Miami neighborhood is named for a Caribbean country?
Where does Miami rank in population among US cities?
Along with Palm Beach and Miami-Dade, what county is part of the Miami-Dade metropolitan area?
How many people live in the Miami-Dade metropolitan area?
Where does Miami-Dade rank in population among metropolitan areas in the US?
What fraction of the southern Florida population lives in Miami?
What percentage of Miami-Dade's population was non-Hispanic white in 1960?
What percentage of the Miami population in 1970 was black?
What was the largest ethnic group in 1970 Miami?
Along with Downtown and Edgewater, what area of Miami has notably seen increasing population densities?
Starting in what decade did immigration from outside the United States begin to have a significant influence on Miami's population?
How many 400+ foot skyscrapers have been built or are in the process of being built in Miami since 2001?
What US cities have more impressive skylines than Miami's?
What is Miami's world rank in terms of how impressive its skyline is?
Of the fourteen tallest skyscrapers in Florida, how many are in Miami?
What is the tallest skyscraper in Florida?
When did the Florida land boom occur?
What year saw the crash of the Miami housing market?
Where does the area around Miami rank nationally in terms of foreclosures?
Along with its political corruption, why did Forbes call Miami the country's second most miserable city in 2011?
In what year did Forbes call Miami the country's most miserable city?
How many tourists come to Miami each year?
How much money do tourists spend in Miami every year?
What neighborhood is home to the Art Deco District?
Who sponsors Fashion Week Miami?
Along with nightclubs, beaches and shopping, what notable attraction exists in the Art Deco District?
As of 2004, what city was the poorest in the United States?
What was the second poorest US city in 2004?
In 2004, what city ranked third poorest in America?
In what year did Miami's government declare bankruptcy?
In terms of purchasing power, where did Miami rank among world cities in a 2009 UBS study?
What is the largest performing arts center in the US?
What organization calls the Adrienne Arsht Center for the Performing Arts home?
What is the largest venue in the Adrienne Arsht Center for the Performing Arts?
Where is Lincoln Center located?
What venue in Miami is notable for hosting outdoor music?
In what year did the Bee Gees relocate to Miami?
In what decade was disco popular?
What band performed the song "Conga"?
What group performed the song "Hot Number"?
What music label showcased KC and the Sunshine Band?
Who was the Warsaw Ballroom's house DJ?
By what other name is John Benetiz known?
In what area of Miami is there a notable secondhand turntable market?
What sport do the Miami Heat play?
What is the nickname of Miami's NFL team?
What professional hockey team is based in Miami?
At what tournament in Miami is professional tennis played?
Where do NASCAR races in Miami take place?
How many gardens and parks are in Miami?
In what park is the American Airlines Arena located?
Due to the presence of coral reefs, what activities are popular in Biscayne Bay?
In what neighborhood is Bicentennial Park located?
Why can outdoor activities take place all year in Miami?
When did El Nuevo Herald leave Miami?
In what community is the Miami Herald currently located?
Among television markets in Florida, where dies Miami rank?
What is the largest newspaper in Miami?
What is Miami's largest newspaper written in Spanish?
In what neighborhood of Miami is Miami New Times based?
What neighborhood houses the headquarters of Miami Today?
Approximately how many people read The Miami Herald?
For what university is The Beacon the student newspaper?
What is the name of the student newspaper at Barry University?
How many passengers use Miami International Airport annually?
What airline uses Miami International as its biggest international gateway?
What airport is the largest international port of entry for overseas air travelers in the United States?
From Miami International Airport, to approximately how many non-American cities can one fly nonstop?
Along with "Cargo Gateway of the Americas," what is another nickname for PortMiami?
How many passengers used PortMiami in 2007?
How many tons of cargo arrived in PortMiami in 2007?
What North American port sees the largest amount of imported and exported cargo?
How many square kilometers is PortMiami?
What is the name of Miami's heavy-rail system?
How many miles long is Metrorail?
How many stations does Metrorail have?
How many lines does Metromover have?
How much does it cost to use Metromover?
What year was to see the completion of the Miami Intermodal Center?
When was Phase II of the Miami Center Station supposed to enter service?
Approximately how many people were intended to use Miami Intermodal Center?
What airport is Miami Intermodal Center next to?
What part of 2012 was to have seen Phase I of Miami Central Station begin?
Along with the Silver Star, what Amtrak line runs to Miami?
From Miami, to where does the Silver Star run?
In what city is the Miami Amtrak Station?
In what year was the Miami Central Station originally supposed to have been completed?
After the first delay, in what year was the Miami Central Station supposed to open?
Along with Orlando, what city would have been connected to Miami via Florida High Speed Rail?
Who was the governor of Florida in 2011?
In what year did All Aboard Florida begin?
From South Florida, where will All Aboard Florida stretch to?
What company is responsible for All Aboard Florida?
What company was previously headquartered in the Downtown Macy's?
What is another name for Tamiami Trail?
In what neighborhood of Miami is the corner of Miami Avenue and Flagler Street?
What is Miami's street plan called?
If a street is west of Miami Avenue and north of Flagler Street, what will necessarily be in its address?
Along with Virginia Key, what does the Rickenbacker Causeway connect to Brickell?
What causeway connects South Beach with Downtown?
Which Miami causeway has the smallest size?
What causeway is furthest to the south?
How many major causeways are in Miami?
What cannot travel on Downtown Miami streets during "Bike Miami"?
How many people participated in Bike Miami in October of 2009?
Who was a recent mayor of Miami?
Along with Downtown, in what neighborhood of Miami does Bike Miami take place?
In what month in 2008 did Bike Miami start?
What kinds of governed nations may not have a specific, individual high court?
What is an example of a highest court not being specifically called a Supreme Court?
To which body can decisions made by this specific high court be appealed?
What Canadian courts also are not specifically the highest courts in that country?
Countries with more than one supreme court may divide their primacy by what factors?
What is an example of the highest court in a federal system of government?
What are some countries that have a separate supreme court to decide constitutional matters?
A court system with a hierarchy of different administrative courts occurs in what kind of legal system?
What term describes a system where the supreme court's decisions are binding over the lower courts?
What jurisdictions does this system not apply to?
In a civil law jurisdiction, rulings by a supreme court are only binding for which decisions?
Even in civil law jurisdictions, decisions by supreme courts establish what?
What is the legal term for the precedence established by multiple court rulings?
When was Canada's Supreme Court first established?
Canada's Supreme Court didn't actually become that country's highest court until when?
If a provincial case is appealed, how is the Supreme Court's decision applied?
Before 1949, Supreme Court decisions in Canada could be appealed to what body?
When did Britain formally surrender sovreignty over Hong Kong?
When Hong Kong was a colony of Great Britain, which body was the highest court of appeal?
Where is the JCPC located?
When was the Court of Final Appeal established?
The Standing Committee of the National People's Congress is seated in what city?
On what date was India's Supreme Court established?
What article of India's Constitution makes decisions by their Supreme Court binding on lower courts?
India's Supreme Court has ultimate power to determine interpretations of what?
When the Supreme Court ensures that lower courts have properly applied the law it is called what?
In addition to national laws, India's Supreme Court may also interpret what regulations?
What is the highest ranking court in Ireland?
Ireland's highest court has the power to determine whether laws are allowed by what document?
Who is the highest judge in Ireland's Supreme Court?
Besides chief justice, how many other judges sit on Ireland's Supreme Court?
Where is Ireland's Supreme Court seated?
When did New Zealand's Supreme Court come into being?
What is the role of New Zealand's highest court?
What court's decisions may be appealed to New Zealand's supreme court?
New Zealand's second ranking court is known as what?
Local decisions by what judicial body may remain within the jurisdiction of local courts?
What are some of the territories within Pakistan?
What type of cases may Pakistan's Supreme Court hear from FATA?
What Pakistani territory's own courts retain supremacy?
What is the relationship between Pakistan's Constitution and Azad Kashmir?
The Supreme Court of the United Kingdom holds Supremacy in what jurisdictions?
What is the high court in Scotland that has supremacy on criminal matters?
What legislation established the Supremacy of the Supreme Court of the UK?
When did this act go into affect?
What body previously had judicial supremacy in the UK prior to this?
What may cause some confusion in the US regarding state supreme courts?
The Court of Appeals is the high court in which US States or territories?
What is West Virginia's highest court called?
What state's supreme court is the oldest appellate court body in the western hemisphere?
Supreme Courts in New York serve what function?
What document established judicial oversight of legislation in Austria?
What court is charged with the responsibility of deciding the constitutionality of laws in Austria?
What is the German word for this constitutional high court?
What is the Constitutional Court's power over the executive branch of Austrian government?
The Supreme Court of Austria is known by what German name?
What is Germany's constitution called?
What German high court has the responsibility for interpreting this document?
The english translation of this court and its duties is what?
What unique electoral power does this German high court possess?
Under what circumstances may the court enact this responsibility?
Decisions of the Dutch Supreme Court are called what?
The Supreme Court of the Netherlands cannot interpret what?
What areas of interpretative oversight does the supreme court have?
Holland's regular court system does not handle cases related to what area of law?
What type of legal system is the Philippines officially?
The high court in The Philippines is modeled after what judicial body?
What document grants the Philippines Supreme Court the right of judicial review?
How many justices make up the Philippines Supreme Court?
When all judges of a court hear a case at once it is called?
The Spanish Supreme Court hears all cases related to law in what areas?
What types of cases can be appealed to Spain's Constitutional Court?
What is the other power of this latter court?
High courts in Spain do not establish what for lower court rulings?
In practicality, how do lower courts typically view the rulings of higher courts?
When was the Supreme Court of Sri Lanka created?
The Sri Lankan Supreme Court's decisions override what?
Sri Lankan law mixes what two categories of jurisprudence?
What majority is necessary in the Sri Lankan Parliament to dismiss a president and the Court?
South Africa used what type of system to determine it's high courts until 2013?
When was the Supreme Court of Appeal created?
What court in South Africa has authority over the SCA?
When did the Constitutional Court become the highest court in South Africa in all matters?
What nation's model gives the power of the high court to the legistlature?
What is the name of China's high court which sits as a legislative committee?
Current decisions by the NPCSC do not affect what?
Hong Kong's legal system was traditionally based on what?
Macau's legal system comes from what tradition?
What type of documents does a textual critic usually analyze?
What is the proper name for textual scholarship?
Why are there differences in ancient copies of the same text?
What do textual critics call a revised edition of a text?
What is the first goal when attempting to analyze a new text?
Why is finding the first exemplar important in textual criticism?
The exemplar is otherwise known as what?
The final product of reconstruction is known as what?
What is included in or accompanies in "critical edition"?
What is the purpose of the critical apparatus?
What is the goal of the textual critic?
A critical edition of a text is accompanied by what?
What is included in the first part of the critical apparatus?
What is included in the second part of the critical apparatus?
What is included in the final part of the critical apparatus?
Why are there multiple variations of texts before the advent of the printing press?
Are printed editions immune to variation?
How do differences in works arise when using a printing press?
An edited text compiled through many sources is known as what?
Different documents that represent the same original text are called what?
What are the variations in the text of witnesses known as?
How or why do variations enter a witness text?
As well as representing the original text, a critical text must also do what?
Why is it important to document variations in witness texts when compiling a critical text?
What is a variorum?
What is the purpose of a variorum?
Name one author who is less frequently the subject of a variorum.
Name two works that are often the subject of a variorum.
What is often included in an eclectic reading?
Why would someone prefer a second edition to a first edition?
What is external evidence?
Why are older manuscripts preferred?
What characteristic of a compilation of witnesses is the most beneficial to a textual critic?
What characteristic of a single witness is the most beneficial to a textual critic?
Which steps most closely resembles copy-text editing?
What process is best used when only one manuscript is viable?
What process is best used when there are a number of viable manuscripts available?
What is the last step in the stemmatic method?
At what point can a critic using the stemmatic become less concerned with critical analysis?
Why may the dominant reading may be the weaker reading?
Are there times when an editor's judgement should be deferred?
What should one do when two readings are contradictory but balanced?
What do editors call variants that are exactly balanced?
What are editors trying to ultimately accomplish?
If an editor can't achieve an exact reproduction of an authors work, what should be the goal?
What did Bower's say about Greg's method?
What did Tanselle say about textual criticism?
Who argued against works where the author listens to input from others?
Who wanted to determine why an author made changes to a work?
Does Greg believe a later work can be substituted for a earlier one?
What idea did Tanselle champion?
Are appendices easy to use for the average reader?
Can a reader be certain of the validity of information found in a clear-text edition?
How do most editors work around the reference problems of clear-text editing?
Where can a reader find more information on text variants after noticing a footnote?
How common are variations in text that alter the meaning of the Urtext of the Hebrew Bible?
To what degree do variations in the Old Testament alter the meaning?
Who claims that the Old Testament is essentially the same throughout all variations?
How many variations of the Old Testament offer the same meaning?
What is the criteria for copyright?
What minor things can be included and not invalidate a copyright?
Are footnotes included in the copyright of the original work?
What rights do scientific publications in the EU enjoy?
In what year did Thomas Edison invent the phonograph?
How did the phonograph differ from the phonautograph?
What was unique about Einsteins invention?
At what era was the recorded sound market introduced?
What is the name of lateral cut disc records?
What was an issue found with Berliner's records initially? 
Where were lateral cut disc records developed?
What is 'Victor Talking Machine now known as?
Where is the museum dedicated to Berliner located?
What were two drawback of early recordings?
How would one make to early recordings?
What types of violins worked best with early recordings?
What instruments did not record well?
How was the frequency response in early recordings?
What tool was used to improve sound quality in early recordings for special effects?
Where were loud instruments best placed for good sound quality?
How far away has a trumpeter been known to stand?
Were drums heard on early jazz recordings?
What was the item called that recorded the sounds?
What was an early took used to amplify sounds?
What company was vital in progression of quality sound recordings?
How early were electrically recorded discs made available for purchase?
What was new about the way Western Electrics method of capturing sound?
How could the sounds produced by Western Electric be described?
What was a drawback of early home recording systems?
What was the initial cost range of early recording devices?
What year  was the  Victor Orthophonic Victrola released?
What was the typical weekly pay of a worker in 1925?
What options were available that effected the cost of the Victor Orthophonic Victorla?
What material was used by RCA Victor for special purpose records?
What was Metrolite and Sav-o-flex materials primarily used for?
What year was the Victrolac compound released?
What were advantages of vinyl in the 1930's?
What was a downfall of ordinary 78 rpm vinyls in household house?
What was the most popular sized disc by 1910?
How long could a recording be on a 10 inch disc in the 1903?
How small were the earliest discs released?
What was one requirement issue with discs popular in Britain?
Which disc could hold about three minutes of recording on either side?
On which label did Frank Sinatra release his recording of Soliloquy?
What was a typical recording time of a song in 1948?
What was a way musicians got sounds such short recording times?
How many sides of a disc commonly held a recording?
What was unique about Odeon's 1909 release of the Nutcracker Suite?
What was one of the first releases with a photo on the cover?
When were albums said to be pioneered?
What was one of the very first albums released?
When could record album covers first be found?
What were early record album covers made of?
What sizes were record album covers available in?
How were record album covers intended to be stored?
What was the purpose of record album covers?
When were albums as we currently know them widely released?
What is typically found on the front cover of an album?
How may records were commonly found in an album?
When did the vinyl LP records Era begin?
How many songs did most albums contain?
What are reasons for recent releases of 78 rpm speed vinyls?
What is a benefit of newer releases of 78 rpm speed vinyls?
Who released 7" microgrooved records in the 1950s?
What benefits to vinyl have been found in the 1950s?
Who founded Audiophile Records?
In what year did Reprise plan to release a series of 78 rpm singles?
Which disc did Reprise release in 78 rpm format?
What two songs were featured on the 1978 release by Leon Redbone in 78 rpm format?
What record company released recordings of 'Buena' and 'Tuff Enuff' in 1980?
Why did Reprise only release one 78 rpm vinyl?
When was the release by Rhino Records of 78 rpm for jukebox owners?
What was the result of the use of this release of 78 rpm vinyl when used in vintage jukeboxes?
What was needed to successfully play the newer released 79 rpm vinyl?
For whom was the 1990 release of 78 rpm intended?
How did the 1990 release of 78 rpm effect Rhino Records?
What did RCA release to complete against Columbia's LP?
What materials were 45 rpm records made of?
What was the play time of a 45 rpm
What was the size of a RCA Victor 45 rpm?
Who had made an attempt in the 1920s to release a long play time recording?
What caused the constant linear velocity?
What was a unique feature of World Records records?
What currently utilized item was World Records CLV similar to?
What gear ration creates 78.26 rpm?
In what year was 78.26 rpm chosen as standard?
How many rpm did the electrically powered synchronous turanable motor run at?
Why are these records known as '78s'?
When did the 45 rpm gain popularity over the 78 rpm
With which crowd did the 45 rpm gain popularity?
At which time were the 79 rpm no longer mass produced?
On which date did Columbia release it's last 78?
What was the last country to phase out the 78 rpm?
Which company lost the "War of the Speeds"?
What speed ultimantly ended up winning the war of the speeds?
Over which years did the "War of the Speeds" last? 
By 1945 what was the total sale of 45s?
Which two companies were involved in the "War of the Speeds"?
Wy did records outside of the US often have small holes with the ability to punch out the center?
What were the plastic inserts which would adapt 45s to the smaller spindle of an LP player called?
What invention did Thomas Hutchinson introduce?
Whom were the adaptable inserts for 45s to LPs commissioned by?
How many spiders were sold in the 45 rpm heydays?
What term was coined to differentiate better sounding products in the 1920s?
What magazines provided reviews for audio equipment?
What happened in 1958 that changed the home music scene?
During what years did the term HiFi take off with engineers?
What term would be used when one said they produced perfect sound reproduction?
What did Alan Blumlein event?
When did EMI create the first stereo discs?
What was the benefit of 45/45 stereo sound?
What year was stereo sound patented? 
What did quadraphonic recording feature?
What was the newest break through in home sound systems in 1971?
How would the commercial success of quadraphonic records be defined?
What did developments in quadraphonic recordings inspire?
What was a major issue with CD-4 technology?
How widespread was the success of CD-4 format? 
What format was less successful than quadraphonic?
What were potential benefits of the CD-4 format?
Who created the CD-4 format?
For which company did C. Robert Fine work for?
What benefits were found in using the 35mm magnetic film?
Who developed the 3-to-2 mix to create lifelike recordings?
Which microphone hold the most importance in 3 microphone recording?
In which year did Mercury begin 3 channel stereo recording?
What technique were used to reduce inner-groove distortion?
Who developed the Dynagroove format?
Why did some music lovers frown upon diaphragming? 
What did closer groove spacing result in?
What would be found with higher recorded volumes?
How did Disco Eye-Cued system benefit DJs?
How did Disco Eye-Cued sysems differ from LPs?
When was the Disco Eye-Cued System developed?
What were direct to disc recordings expected to product?
When were 'half speed' and 'digitally remastered' recordings being released?
What was required for quality playback of DBX recordings?
When were DBX recordings released?
How compatible were DBX encoded recordings with prior technologies?
What was the intention of DBX encoded recordings?
What did CBS develop in order to reduce outside noise?
What company out of Japan offered laser turntables that read vinyl discs optically?
What was a benedit of laser read discs?
What was a drawback of laser read discs?
What was the primary use of laser read discs?
What was a major issue for laser read discs?
Who is Irene?
Where was IRENE developed?
What is the primary use of IRENE?
Can IRENE read vertically modulated information?
Does IRENE require the  ability to touch the media?
What terms are used for recording with more than one track?
What is a typical max playing time of an LP?
Which format is cheaper, LP or EP?
Which format held recordings ranging from 10 to 15 minutes?
What was a normal play time per side for LPs?
Which colors of 45 were available as late as 1952 before being discontinued?
PeeWee the Piccolo was what?
What significance does Dec 7/ 1948 hold?
How many colors were 45s available in when first released?
When did RCA release the 45?
In which direction does the groove in a normal disc run?
How is sound encoded on a commercial disc?
Does it matter at which speed a disc is spun?
Do all grooves bear data?
What is a 'lead out'?
What is the center where the data joins to complete a circle?
Do turntables play music on lock grooves?
What do most automatic turn tables do when they meet a lock groove?
Where do you find a lead out?
Where were records made with raised label areas?
Are longer recordings, as found in operas, made for use with auto-changing systems?
Do grooves on records touch when stacked?
Do records touch when in auto changers?
What is an effect of using worn molds when casting records?
What is the expected finish of a vinyl record?
On what frequencies is an orange peel effect most noticeable?
What is the effect on a copy if a master as an orange peel effect?
What material is on a direct metal mastering disc?
What is the two step process?
What is the limitation of the two step process?
Which is preferred the two step or three step process?
Which have stronger structures the father or son mold?
What can increase the output of a stamper mold?
What was a known issue of using shellac to make records?
In which novel does 'Whiteman's Lady of the Evening" record get broken?
In Blackboard Jungle what record breaking mention is made?
What causes clicks and pops on vinyl records?
What is the cause of lock grooves on vinyl records?
Where does the saying "Like a broken record" originate?
How easily do vinyl records break?
What is a common damage to vinyl records?
What causes warping in vinyl records?
What is a cause of once per revolution pitch variation?
What method was used to protect a vinyl record?
What were often found with a paper outter cover and no inner cover?
What happens if a vinyl comes with a bit of warp?
What is a limitation of low frequency recordings?
What kinds of unwanted sounds are often heard at high frequencies?
What is done during recordings to help reduce unwanted sounds?
What is a benefit of using equalization devices?
What is done to high frequency  sounds to lessen sound issues?
Whom found that they can make musical instruments sound more natural with an amplifier boost at the turnover point?
What is found when a complementary boost is used at the bass turnover point?
When frequency in the treble increases what happens to the recording amplitude?
What happens when frequency decreases in the bass?
Who made the move to standardize recordings?
When were recording standards officially released?
 Which recording types were effected by the imposed industry standards?
What was one issue of a lack of industry standards?
What is the NAB?
What bass settings were needed to eliminate hum?
What helped cause the most life like sound?
How did the NBC Othacoustic curve relate to the NAB curve?
How far back could these recording practices be traced?
What were the recording standards based off from?
What became the predecessor to the RIAA curve?
Who developed the New Orthophonic curve?
Whom wrote the publication outlining the New Orthophonic curve?
What was the quality of sound recordings made with horns at the end of the acoustic era?
What were issues facing play back and recording mechanics?
Why do photos show take on horns?
What was the cause of delicate and fine sound loss?
How would a record recorded with a horn sound played through modern equipment?
What technique offered realistic sounds during playback?
At at time was radio gaining popularity?
What type of microphones were losing popularity in the 1920s?
What benefit did the use of the Wente style condenser microphone offer?
What was a benefit of early radio recordings?
What is one example of an acoustic phonograph on which one would listen to electric recordings?
What allowed better sounds inside the cabinet of the orthoponic phonograph?
What adjustments were made to the orthophonic  to accommodate electric recordings?
Was it common to hear electric recordings on phonographs?
How similar was the sound of a orthodontic  record to a radio?
What are two examples of high quality microphones?
What was used to dampen resonances in recordings?
When would you have first found the moving coil microphone?
What was a more economical option to magnetic pickups?
In what years would you find electronic recordings played electronically?
What was a benefit of the use of magnetic pickup cartridge?
In what era could you find good quality recordings and playbacks at home?
What was a unique feature of the Capeart radio phonographs?
How similar were live and recorded versions?
What was a benefit of vertical groove cuts?
What could be avoided by using vertical groove cuts?
How was the moving coil microphone unique to the Wente type?
How was sound improved using the moving coil microphone?
How was wax used to improve recordings?
When was the business booming for do it yourself sound fanatics?
What kind of recordings worked best for pop music?
What was used for longer recordings?
What opened doors for long recordings?
What aided in records sales in the 1950s?
What is generally the lowest sound a human can hear?
What is believed to better offer sounds of higher frequencies, compact discs or records?
What is the higher end of typical human hearing?
Does the hearing range of the human vary?
Who would engrave the master disc of a vinyl record?
What was used in first recordings of vinyl records?
What was used in final recordings of vinyl records?
After the 1950s  what was a typical recording process?
Where were sound recordings originally made to?
Should alcohol be used to clean gramophone recordings?
Is gramophone equipment readily available?
What is the recommendation of gramophone recordings to preserve integrity?
What is a drawback of gramophone use?
How are gramophones best stored?
Is it difficult to transfer recording from historic interest to newer technologies?
What would offer the highest quality transfers of historic interest?
What would a hobbiest need to transfer historic recordings to digital formats?
Is an original destroyed when transferred to digital format?
What is one benefit of transferring an older format to a newer format?
Are records generally out of print as of date?
Are albums ever reproduced?
What types of vinyl hold the most popularity?
Does vinyl record maintain any popularity?
What is a reason a DJ would prefer vinyl to CD?
In what techniques would a DJ require a vinyl record?
Are all turn tables capable of DJ manipulation of vinyl records?
What is commonly preferred by DJs vinyl or CD?
Whom set the most recent sales record of vinyl records since 1991?
What medium has seen the biggest fall in sales as of late?
What was unique to vinyl sales in 2014?
Who sold 34,000 vinyl records in 1994?
Prior to 2014 when was the most recent large sale of vinyl records?
How much did Ted Turner pay for Metro-Goldwyn Mayer?
In what year did Ted Turner buy Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer?
Who did Ted Turner sell Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer to?
Who did Ted Turner buy Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer from?
Up to what date of release did Turner retain ownership of the MGM film library?
With what company did Turner Broadcasting Systems merge in 1996?
Along with Lorimar and National General Pictures, what library was included in the Warner Bros. library?
When did MGM give Warner Home Video the rights to MGM/UA's films on home video?
In what year did TCM begin the Young Composers Film Competition?
How often is the Young Composers Film Competition?
What is the grand prize in the Young Composers Film Competition?
In what year was Laugh, Clown, Laugh released?
Who starred in The Temptress?
Who owns the Selznick International Pictures library?
Who is the owner of Columbia Pictures content?
How many films are present in the TCM library?
Who owns the majority of pre-1950 Paramount sound releases?
Who owns Paramount?
Who holds TV distribution rights to Paramount's post-1949 releases?
Who owns Walt Disney Studios?
Who manages the TV distribution of Walt Disney Studios?
On what day of the week are Star of the Month films aired?
Who hosts the Star of the Month films?
During what month and year did TCM Guest Programmer feature TCM employees as guests?
In what year did Spike Lee appear as a TCM Guest Programmer?
When does 31 Days of Oscar occur?
When does the Summer Under the Stars event take place?
As of 2015, who hosted The Essentials along with Robert Osborne?
On what day does The Essentials have its first airing each week?
On what day are repeats of The Essentials shown?
In what month does the Summer Under the Stars event take place?
Who hosted Funday Night at the Movies?
What character was Tom Kenny best known for portraying?
In what year did Funday Night at the Movies first appear?
What series replaced Funday Night at the Movies?
Along with Chris O'Donnell, who was the original host of Essentials Jr.?
Who hosted Essentials Jr. between 2009 and 2011?
Who began to host Essentials Jr. in 2011?
In what year did Essentials Jr. replace Funday Night at the Movies?
In what year did Screened Out appear?
What year saw the debut of Religion on Film?
What series premiered in 2011?
In what year did Arab Images on Film first appear?
What was the topic of Screened Out?
In what month and year did TCM Remembers premiere?
Along with individual tributes, what form did TCM Remembers occur in?
In what month of the year does a longer version of TCM Remembers appear?
In what year did Badly Drawn Boy provide a soundtrack for TCM Remembers?
Who provided the soundtrack for the longer TCM Remembers episode in 2009?
Through what company is the TCM Vault Collection released?
What do the TCM Vault Collection bonus discs feature in addition to documentaries?
After the initial batch of TCM Vault Collection DVDs are printed, how are they made afterwards?
What month and year saw the introduction of the TCM Wineclub?
Who was TCM's partner in the TCM Wineclub?
The winery of what notable director provided wines for TCM Wineclub?
Who starred in True Grit?
How long do TCM Wineclub subscriptions last?
What Canadian cable provider first carried Turner Classic Movies?
In what year did Turner Classic Movies appear on Canadian cable television?
In what year did Rogers Cable begin to include TCM?
What is the name of the TCM spinoff channel operated in the UK?
In what month and year did Rogers Cable add TCM to its analog broadcasts?
How many types of Guna exist in Hindu philosophy?
Which state of guna is that of compassion, positiveness, and goodness? 
Which type of guna is concened with passion and activity?
What is the focus of the guna for negativeness and destruction?
What is the interpretation of classical  of Samkhya?
What means 
Of what does Dvaita Vedanta theorize the existence?
To what entity is the Vedanta Vishnu similar in other religions?
How is the God of Dvaita different from that of Advaita in actions?
As what did the Dvaita school view dualism?
Who did the Dvaita school identify as the Supreme Being?
What are the two most powerful political parties in the United States?
Name a nation that has a one-party political system.
How are political parties elected in democracies? 
What are some countries that have multiple powerful political parties?
Who's liberal political ideas influenced the Whigs?
Name the two people who's concepts of universal rights influenced the Whigs.
Did the Whigs want to limit the monarch's power?
Did the Whigs support or oppose the Catholic king?
Who did the Tories oppose?
Who did the Tories occasionally cooperate with?
When did the Tories regain power?
For how long were the Tories dismissed from office?
Why could the Tories and the Opposition Whigs never form a single party?
Who was the first distinctive Whig party that emerged from the chaos?
Who was the leader of the Rockingham Whigs?
What was the description for the basic framework of the Rockingham Whigs party?
What were the two proto-political parties?
In which year did the period known as the "Era of Good Feelings" begin?
What did the founding fathers not intend American politics to become?
Who were the leaders of the Federalist and Democratic-Republican parties?
Do political parties have a Party leader?
Who maintains the daily work and records of party meetings?
Who is responsible for the membership fees and expenses? 
Who is responsible for recruiting and maintaining party members?
When does a party form an official opposition?
What type of parties allow leaders to form frontbench teams?
When does a party's frontbench become the Cabinet of government ministers?
If a party is represented by members from the lower house of parliament, what other position can the party leader serve?
What is considered a measurement of a state's support to liberal democracy?
How are parties regulated?
Will parties that hold a counter belief to the general beliefs of the state's incumbents be repressed?
Do official political parties exist in a nonpartisan system?
Was the administration of George Washington nonpartisan?
What did Washington warn against during his farewell address?
What do factions within nonpartisan systems evolve into?
In what systems is the political party allowed to legally hold effective power?
What are North Korea and China examples of?
When was Nazi Germany in a one-party system?
What is the one-party system often compared with?
When are opposition parties allowed?
What are some of the reasons for a party's failure?
What are some ways a dominant party can stay in power?
What are some examples of dominant party systems?
For how long did the dominant one-party system last in mexico?
What type of party system is the United States?
What were the first parties in the united States called?
For how long did the Whigs survive?
What are challenged to an unpopular political party?
Which party was anti-slavery?
What has the UK political system functioned as?
What are the two largest political parties in the UK?
What was the other major party before the Labour party?
What is Duveger's Law?
What are called factions by some people?
What are political parties lobbied by?
What are traditional sources of funding for parties?
Around which time was the mass membership party started?
Why did parties that relied on donations or subscriptions run into problems?
When did parties that relied on donations start to run into problems?
In the United Kingdom, what is awarded to people who help fund the parties?
Who was discovered to be selling peerages?
What act did parliament put into place to stop such corruptions?
What did the Honours act do?
How did people attempt to overcome this law?
What are the two categories of public funding?
Which percentage of nations provide no direct or indirect public funding?
What percentage of nations provide direct funding?
What percentage of nations provide indirect funding?
What can also be provided by foreign aid?
What do international donors do to promote democracy? 
What is another common occurrence of international support for a party? 
What does the overseas development institute want to do?
What is the color red associated with?
What political party is the color blue associated with?
Did the political parties choose those colors?
In what year did the occurrence of using different color schemes for the parties stop?
When did political parties organize themselves into international organizations?
What are some examples of this?
Name an example of an administration that outlaws links between local and foreign political organizations. 
Who drew a difference between cadre parties and mass parties?
What are cadre parties?
What are mass parties?
What is an example of a mass party?
What type of parties are the two major parties in the United States?
What form of music was A cappella predominately used for in its early years?
What was considered part of A cappella until the Baroque period?
The madrigal became what type of form that prevented it from being accompanied with A cappella?
In what era was most of the vocal music considered A cappella?
What is the name of the religious a cappella style used with shape notes?
A cappella exists in some liturgical churches as an influence from what era?
In the modern day, what broad religious group is most known to implement a cappella?
What does the rejection of instruments in Christian music likely stem from?
During what time is there no record of Christians using instruments for worship?
At what point did instruments begin to receive condemnation from Christians?
For what reason do modern Christians continue to oppose the use of instruments?
What is the name of the philosopher who praised music without instruments?
What did Philo's views on the absence of instruments clash with?
What is the one instrument still in use today by the synagogue?
The shofar stops being used at the end of what Jewish event?
How is the shofar used?
When did a cappella begin to take hold in the United States?
What was the name of the choir F. Mellus Christiansen used?
Who did the St. Olaf Choir influence?
How many singers are typically in the choirs?
What a cappella group rose to popularity in 1943?
What was boycotted by American musicians in 1943?
Who is credited for first introducing elements of Jazz into a cappella?
What number one song was covered by an a cappella group in 1983?
During and after the 80's, what helped a cappella music rise in popularity?
In place of instruments, what do some modern a cappella groups implement?
Where does a cappella still maintain a heavy presence?
In a cappella, what do the voices not contributing lead vocals or a bass line contribute?
How many works of a cappella in musical theater have been successful in Off-Broadway productions?
What was the name of the a cappella musical that first opened 28 January 1994?
What time period was Avenue X set in?
What was the final number of performances in Avenue X's original run?
Who was responsible for the lyrics of Avenue X?
What is the name of the a cappella musical that debuted Off-Broadway in the same year as Perfect Harmony?
Where does most of In Transit take place? 
What a cappella vocal style is implemented in many of In Transit's songs?
How many Lucille Lortel Awards was In Transit nominated for?
What is the name of the actor who played the subway beat boxer?
What type of a cappella music is specific to American culture?
What did the a cappella organization founded in 1938 change its name to in 2004?
How many people currently have membership to the BHS?
What racial group was primarily involved in babershop a cappella in its earliest days?
What were the initials of the BHS before it changes its name in 2004?
What is the name of the first female barbershop organization?
When did the Sweet Adelines change their name to acknowledge their international reach?
How many women are members of the Sweet Adelines?
Where is the Sweet Adelines HQ?
In what year did the Sweet Adelines become an international group?
What is the name of the Swedish man known for being a large influence to a cappella across the world?
Which music school began the implementation of high musical standards?
What portion of the Swedish population engages in a cappella singing?
Who describes the many reasons for Sweden's heavy involvement in a cappella?
What is the previous name of oldest recorded college a cappella group?
What prominent composer was once a member of The Whiffenpoofs?
What is the name of the a capella group that was a parody of The Whiffenpoofs?
What is the name of the college a capella event that's been held since 1975?
What well-known musician was once part of the college a capella group The Counterparts?
Whas is the name of the ethnic a capella group founded at the University of Pennsylvania in 1996?
Among which group is a capella becoming more prominent?
What is the name of the first South Asian a capella group to accept both men and women?
What a capella competition is hosted at UC Berkeley?
What group hosts the a capella competition "Sa Re Ga Ma Pella"?
What popular a capella competition is not specific to college groups?
Aside from the monetary reward, what was offered to the winner of The Sing-Off?
What is the name of the group that won The Sing-Off?
Who won The Sing-Off final season?
In The Sing-Off, where did the groups not from the United States come from?
What do some a capella groups do other than sing words?
What a capella group is credited for being one of the earliest to adapt instrumental emulation?
What types of music did the Swingle Singers implement instrumental emulation for?
What is the name of the ABC Family show whose theme is entirely a capella?
What did the Swingle Singers primarily use to emulate musical instruments?
What is another term for beatboxing?
What was used to make an a capella recording of The Who Sell Out?
What car manufacturer hired Petra Haden to perform a capella songs in commercials for their car?
On what website can many a capella groups' music be listened to?
During the Middle Ages, who was no longer expected to stay behind walls away from the common man?
How many orders of mendicant friars came out of the Middle Ages?
Who led the Friars Minor order at this time?
Dominic of Guzman led what order of mendicant friars?
What two groups grew quickly during the Middle Ages?
The Dominican Order received influence from what monastic order?
What type of order was the Dominican Order?
What did previous religious orders do for a living?
How did the Dominican Order earn money?
How did Dominic inspire his followers?
What group especially benefited from the Dominican Order's mystical spirituality?
In what country did Dominican Order nuns thrive in?
What type of spirituality did Dominic want his followers to learn?
What subject did Dominic particularly love?
Why did Dominic sell his books?
In what country did Dominic experience a great famine?
At around what age was Dominic ordained as a Priest?
After completing his studies, under whose rule did he become a regular canon?
How did Prior Diego think the members of the Holy Church acted?
Who did Prior Diego admire more than the Holy Church?
How did the Cathars live?
In order to change to a better way of life, what did the legates request of Diego?
Who did Diego and Dominic try to convert?
In what year did Dominic establish a convent?
What women did Dominic convert for his convent?
What group are older than the Dominican Friars?
Why did families send their girls to Diego's monastery? 
How long after his mission did Prior Diego die?
Dominic studied in what city?
Dominic's education helped him to overcome who?
What helps define the work of the Dominican Order?
In what city did Dominic establish a school?
Who did Dominic entrust to start his school?
What European country did the Dominican Friars quickly expand to?
What British university did the Dominican Friars appear in?
What did the Dominican Order fight against?
What is one branch of knowledge that the Dominican Order created works in?
Who appointed the Dominican Order to begin the inquisition?
The term "Dominican mysticism" is also knows as what?
In what European countries did the Dominican Order experience changes to how they thought?
What saint is associated with the new Dominican mysticism?
Dominican mysticism also spread to what European country?
What friar helped to spread Dominican mysticism to Italy?
What historical period gave the Dominican Order a challenge?
What was it about the Renaissance that gave the Dominican Order problems?
The theologians of what German city gave the Dominican Order resistance?
What writer fused humanism with the Dominican Order teachings?
What Dominican friar celebrated the arts of the Renaissance age?
In 1876, how many preachers were expelled from the Dominican Order?
In 1910, how many Dominicans were actively engaged in Order work?
How many Dominican friars were there in 2013?
In what year were there 4,470 priests in the Dominican Order?
How many student brothers were there in the year 2000?
What do present day Dominican Order associates do?
What is an example of a modern Dominican Order follower?
What draws many people into following the Dominican Order?
Present day members continue to do what for the Dominican Order?
The tradition of the Dominican Order includes what?
What is one area the Dominican Order puts emphasis on?
What is one way that the Dominican Order differentiates itself from other religious orders?
In what country did some of the Dominican Order attributes change?
What did Dominic greatly struggle with?
Who remembered Dominic as a cheerful fellow?
What did Dominic enjoy doing?
Who did Dominic pray for?
What did Dominic refuse to do?
What spirit did Dominic give to his followers?
Where did Dominic want his followers to look for truth?
What type of man was Dominic?
Who was the Master general of the Dominican Order during the mid 1200s?
What years was Humbert of Rome the Master General?
What did Humbert do that was very significant during his time as Master general?
What did subject did Humbert love very much?
What language did Humbert want the Dominican Order members to learn?
What did Humbert use to teach even weak members of the Dominican Order?
What did Humbert tell Dominican students to not concentrate on?
According to Humbert, what is all that God regards?
What did Humbert instruct the students not to be?
Albert Magnus studied Dionysus during what historical period?
What was one of Albert the Great's biggest contributions during the medieval period?
Who was Dionysus?
What refers to the conviction that all believers are capable of experiencing God's love?
Albert magnus' writings contributed greatly to what?
What idea did Albertus champion?
Who influenced Magnus at this time?
What is it easier to do regarding God?
How do we deny things of God?
What enhances man's faith in God according to Albertus Magnus?
What is a tool that God uses to speak to the average man?
How can man obtain understanding of God?
If someone contemplates God forever, what type of knowledge will they obtain?
What cannot see God itself?
What virtue guides Christians in their understanding of God?
According to Christianity, who is the "One"?
What is Charity to a Christian?
What should man's nature be centered on?
What did the Europeans of the Dominican Order bring to the group?
What did the English Dominicans hope to do within the Order?
What group of nuns are used all aspects of the Dominican Order for their work? 
The Dartford Nuns are similar to what group?
What do ecstatic mystics hope to achieve?
The search for mysticism in the Dominican Order goes back to what?
What is the Holy Writ?
Who wanted to put mysticism into the Dominican Order?
Whose writings introduced the idea of 'unknowing' to the Order of Preachers?
Who did some early Dominican followers have trouble reconciling?
Where was one female Dominican house located?
How many female Dominican houses were there in Germany?
Who were an order of religious women who later converted to Dominican?
How many Dominican nunneries were there by 1358?
How did female Dominican houses differ from male ones?
What did the sisters do instead of apostolic work?
What did the sisters not have?
Who were the nunneries under the jurisdiction of?
What is one role that the friars served as to the nuns?
After what age could women become members of the Dominican Order?
What type of veil must the sisters wear?
The formula for profession into the Dominican Order is presented in what text?
What were the nuns allowed to minimally do?
What were the nuns tested on?
What did the nuns not do in the Dominican Order?
What was one of the activities the nuns enjoyed?
Who was expelled from a nunnery for not wanting to learn?
Where was Margarette Reglerin from?
What monastery did the nuns belong to who could speak Latin fluently?
The Dartford sisters were heirs of what priory?
Where was the priory of Poissy located?
What book could be found in The Dartford sister's library?
What did the Dartford nunnery have in common with the priory of Poissy?
The Dominican Order in England was controlled by who?
The national side of the Order was influenced by what other side?
Why was the English order of the Dominicans so successful in England?
What did European mysticism concentrate on that English mysticism didn't?
English mysticism was composed of how many elements?
What is one element of English Dominican mysticism?
What was the focus of English Dominican mysticism?
What was so important to English mystics?
The process of faith leads one to what?
What did the English Dominican mystics not require in their work?
What did the English Order of Dominicans believe was the only thing they needed?
The English Dominican Order focused primarily on what?
What did the English Order not care about?
The English Dominican Order wanted to put what at the center of their study of Christ?
What does Christ's love reveal to humanity?
What does love lead to according to English mystics?
What is man always seen as?
What did the English Dominicans like to concentrate on?
What amends humanity to God's life?
The idea of the image of God allows man to do what?
How many students receive financial aid at Eton?
How many students attended Eton free of charge in 2014?
What are the goals of the Independent and State School Partnership?
What are some courses Eton offers in the summer months?
What purpose did Eton Dorney have to the London Olympic games?
How many visitors attended Eton Dorney during the 2012 Olympics?
What did 2012 Olympic spectators vote Eton Dorney to be?
How much does it cost to attend Eton Dorney throughout the year?
Who was Eton's first Headmaster?
How old are the wall paintings in the Chapel and School Yard?
Between what years was College Hall built?
How many bays was the chapel originially intended to have?
How many bays does the chapel have today?
Around what year did construction continue after a period of financial struggle?
Whose name is on the gate-house fronting School Yard?
Where are 18th century "leaving portraits" kept at Eton?
What is the most famous image of Eton College?
Which club at Eaton is for motorcyclists?
What was the purpose for creating an Eton Mission?
What is Eton's rowing club called?
Why did construction of Eton Mission cease in 1971?
Where was the Eton Mission originally to be located?
What were new students once called by others?
What stipulation did the school base entrance on in 1945?
For what reason as the 1945 entrance stipulation removed?
Who decided to remove the 1945 entrance stipulation?
The College boarding house is reserved for whom?
Where do "King's Scholars" get their name?
How many original Scholars were there in the original School?
How many students receive some form of financial aid?
What is the term given to students who lived in town, but not on the campus of Eton?
Oppidan residences were generally cared after by women known as what?
What is a House Master?
About how many students are in a typical Oppidan house?
If a boy elects to live in an Oppidan house instead of the College house, what are they called?
Which students are allowed to use the letters OS after their name?
How many Oppidan houses are at Eaton?
Under what circumstances are Oppidan Scholarships awarded?
How many distinguishments does a student need for an Oppidan Scholarship?
Which Oppidan Houses did not change from their original 1720 names?
Which two houses were built as student population increased 1845?
Which two Oppidan Houses are the oldest?
What term was given to juniors who acted as servants to older students?
What were common duties of younger servant students?
What words were yelled by Librarians that required first year students to come?
Which first year student was given the task yelled for by the Librarian?
What year was "fagging" phased out of most houses?
There is false belief that the current uniforms were first worn for what event?
What are Beaks?
When are Beaks required to wear a form of school dress?
What are classes at Eaton known as today?
How many current students take Chinese courses at Eaton?
Is Chinese a required or non-curriculum course?
How many computers were at Eaton in the 1970s?
Which subject was only studied by boys with sufficient ability?
With whom does the primary responsibility for a student's leaning lie?
Who designed the learning buildings at Eton?
Are living houses and classrooms seperate or conjoined?
What other term is given to the director of studies?
What does the Busk Fund support?
Which Fund is dedicated for travel to non-English speaking countries?
Which Fund supports travel to classical lands?
What action results in something being "Sent Up For Good?"
What does a student receive when work is Sent Up For Good?
When a student has work Sent Up For Good, who signs the card that they receive?
Where is work that has been Sent Up For Good stored?
What is the opposite of a Show Up?
Who must sign a Rip?
Who must sign a White Ticket?
Who must sign an "info"?
What punishment term is "info" short for?
What term is used if a master is more than 15 minutes late to a class?
Where is the "Tardy Book" kept?
How long is the typical punishment for being tardy?
When a boy is summoned to the Head Master, what is the experience called?
What is another term for rustication?
The birch was abolished and replaced with what?
What was the most severe form of physical punishment at Eton referred to as?
Why was a subject ordered to appear to Pop-Tanning in old trousers?
Which Head Master abolished corporal punishment by peers?
Who administered caning privately in his office?
What term is given to the Head of Music?
What is an example of a lesser-known instrument taught at Eton?
Who is the current Precentor?
How many organs does Eton house?
How many people can sit in the audience at Eton's main theatre?
What is the name of Eton's largest theatre?
How many house productions does Eton run each year?
What are "independent" theatre productions at Eton?
Do the plays sport high attendance rates?
Who are cast in Eton's female roles in their productions?
Who is responsible for stage hand duties, lighting, sound, and management?
Which Shakespearean play did the School put on in October 2012?
What are somefemale schools close to Eton?
What is Eton's best-known holiday?
What does the "Fourth of June" celebrate?
When is the Fourth of June celebrated?
Which event is held on the Fourth of June?
Who claimed she had been unfairly fired by Eton and won her case?
What did Sarah Forsyth provide as evidence to her unfair termination and job duties?
For what was Eton criticized in its handling of the Forsyth case?
Who was criticized for not handling the Forsyth case independently?
How many outreach events were held at Eton by Oxford University in 2010?
Which independent school had more hosted outreach events than Eton?
Who described outreach events at Eton as "unfair and indefensible?"
In 2010, how many applicants from Eton were accepted to Oxford?
When was an accidental email sent to potential students of Eton that warranted a personal apology to each family?
How many prospective students received a mistaken email in July 2015?
For how many students was the email mistake originally intended?
What was Eton's beagle club accused of in January 2016?
What evidence was brought forth of a potential hare hunt?
Did Eton's official statement say that they took the matter seriously or frivilously?
Which male private school in Boston, USA has Eton formed a relationship with?
Where do Hennessy Scholars typically reside?
In which year was the Hennessy Scholarship founded?
What is the G20 School's Group?
Which Duke of Gloucester attended Eton?
Where is Prince Richard's son, Alexander Windsor, Earl of?
Which 7th Earl of Harewood attended Eton?
Who was George Lascelles' mother?
Which 2012 Nobel Prize winner attended Eton?
Which Antarctic explorer attended Eton?
Where did adventurer Bear Grylls attend school?
Which current BBC Deputy Political Editor attended Eton?
Which former Editor of the Daily Telegraph attended Eton?
Who is a former Eton alumn and current Editor of The Mail on Sunday?
Who was thought to have founded Cork?
When was Cork believed to have been founded?
When did Viking travelers establish a trading post in Cork?
What kind of settlement was Cork?
What did the Norsemen provide to the monastery?
Who granted Cork's charter?
What kind of protection did Cork have?
What parts of Cork's defense remain today?
What would citizens of Cork pay to neighboring lords in order to prevent them from attacking their city?
Where is the present city of Cork located geographically?
Where is a good place to find dramatic plays all year in Cork?
Which Hollywood actress first began in Cork at the Corcadorca Theatre Company?
What is a major dance venue in Cork?
What are someplaces that you could study drama and therter in Cork?
WHat are some festivals or events of note in Cork?
What are 2 major cultural influences of Cork?
What things show Corks diverse culural background?
When did Cork begin to see people from Russia and Lithuania immigrating to their city?
What types of religions can be found in Cork?
How do the Catholic churches handle the diverse languages of Cork?
What sets the Cork accent apart from other Irish accents?
What is the name of the English dialects that are written and spoken in Cork?
Where did Cork get pieces of its language from?
What is the pronunciation of the Irish "r" called?
WHich Irish newspaper has it's homebase in Cork, Ireland?
What was the Irish Examiner's previous identity?
Who are the Echo Boys?
What newspaper did the Echo Boys sell?
What publications are put out by the UCC?
From which periods are the buildings in Cork from?
What is so special about the Red Abbey in Cork?
How many cathedrals does Cork host?
What is the Catholic cathedral of Cork?
What else is St. Mary's known as?
What style does most of the city's architecture belong to?
WHat is the tallest building in Cork?
What is the longest building in Cork?
What has the old Psychiatric Hospital been turned into?
What is Atkin's Hall?
What is the name of the college in Cork?
Which river runs through the university's campus?
How old is the building holding the covered market?
Where is St Mary's Dominican Church?
Where is the Cork Public Museum?
What types of retail offerings are found in Cork?
What happened after the economy dropped off around 2008?
What major department stores gottheir starts in Cork?
When will work on the Grand Parade begin?
How large is the retail space in the Grand Parade proposed to be?
What is the main industry in Cork?
Who are the two major industry employers in Cork?
What is the most famous pharmaceutical company in Cork?
What major computing company calls Cork it's European Headquarters?
Who are important industrial technology companies in Cork?
When was the Cork South Link dual carriageway built?
What was the purpose of the dual carriageway?
What was the purpose of the Kinsale Road flyover?
What was a beneficial improvement made to Patrick Street? 
How many rail stations has cork had over the years?
What connects Cobh and Midleton to Cork?
Where does the main rail originate?
Where was the original end of the line?
What was Ireland's most rail-centric city?
Which line was reopened in 2009?
What new stations were added to the Glounthaune to Midleton line?
What station is going to be available to the Northern Suburbs?
Where are the Little Island Railway Station routes?
What system are Little Island, Mallow, Midleton, Fota and Cobh stations of?
Where can one study nautical and marine subjects in Cork?
What liberal arts type colleges are in Cork?
Who provides vocational training in Cork?
Who offers post-secondary education in Cork?
What is the biggest conglomeration of start-up companies in Cork?
Where is a good source of marine research in Cork?
What is a good source for business start-ups in Cork?
How many start-ups are associated with the Rubicon Center?
What's the most famous cricket club in Cork?
When was the Cork County Cricket Club established?
Which league does the Cork County Cricket Club belong to?
Which first-class matches were hosted at Mardyke?
Which teams played in the three first class matches?
Which Australian Rules Football team is Cork home to?
How many times have the Leeside Lions won the Australian Rules Football League of Ireland Premiership?
When did the Leeside Lions win the Australian Rules Football League of Ireland Premiership?
Which inline roller sports translate well to winter in Cork?
What Martial Arts can be found within Cork?
What is federalism?
What features are distinctive of federalism? 
What is federlism defined as?
What document exemplified modern federalist government?
What distinguishes Federalism from other types of government?
Federalism combines what two types of government?
What is federalism? 
In Federalism, are the division of powers equal? 
What type of governments are included in federalism? 
How many governments are apart of federalism?
What distinguishes Federalism from other multi-level governments?
What historical event illustrated that dividing sovereignty was not possible?
What organization is a leading example of a federal union?
What form of Federalism is characterized by where sovereignty resides in the whole?
New research has clarified that Federalism has how many distinct forms?
Before new research, what was the definition of federalism? 
After new research, what was the final definition of federalism? 
When was federalism put into place? 
What is the difference between multi-level political forms and federalism? 
What is an example of a federal union? 
What is the Latin word for federalism? 
What was federalism and confederalism common meaning in the 18th century? 
What did James Madison referred to the new United States as? 
Where does the federalist model work best in? 
What are homogeneous states? 
Where can tensions be found in the federalist countries?
What countries did the federalist model fail in? 
What countries dismissed the federalist model? 
In the United States, what was federalism referred to? 
When the U.S Constitution was being drafted, what did the federalist party support? 
What did anti-federalist support? 
On the political spectrum, where does federalism stand? 
Who has a greater history of unitary states? 
What does federalism mean in Europe? 
What branch does the United States want to limit under the federalist model? 
What happened on January 1st 1901?
When did the United Kingdom colonized the Australian continent?
Which model is of federalism is similar to the federalism model in Australia? 
What was established when Australia was colonized? 
What is the government of India based on? 
What is a tiered system? 
What was the constitution originally provided for? 
When the third tiere was added on, what is it in form of? 
What is a distinguishing aspect of Indian federalism?
What does Article 370 say?
What does Article 371 say?
What happens with President's Rule?
When did the federal war end?
How did the federal war end? 
What did the United States of Venezuela incorporate? 
In this type of federation each country had its own what? 
How many components does the Belgian federalism have? 
What passed on July 18, 2007?
What are the Flemish representatives in favor for?
What is Belgian Federalism? 
Which cities are recognized in the Spanish Democratic Constitution? 
How did they manage the tensions in the present of Spanish Transition to democracy?
Where are the main taxes taken?
Who can elect the members of the upper house? 
Can the members of the upper house be elected directly or indirectly? 
Can the members of the lower house be elected directly or indirectly? 
What is federalism seen as? 
What does federalism allow?
What do scholars think of federalism?
What happened to Russia's subdivision of government? 
When was Russia's subdivision liberalized?
Who was in charge when the reforms was going on? 
Who scaled back some reforms from Yeltsin? 
What is federalism in the United States?
How has the American government evolved?
What happened in Federalist No.46?
What happened in Federalist No. 28
What was the federalist party of the United States opposed to?
What did the democratic-republican party believe in?
Who decided the rights in specific cases?
What is the meaning of federalism?
What types of movements are associated with federalism?
What countries advocate for a strong central government?
What happened between 1938 to 1995?
What are most actions in the federal government known as?
What did the court reject in 1995?
What did the court reject in 1994?
What does the commerce clause include?
The US Constitution says what to amendments? 
What happens when certain constitutional amendments cannot occur?
Any amendment in the Canadian constitution that needs to be modified, needs to do what first?
What does every component state of federation possess?
Asymmetric federalism exist when?
What cities in Spain are in the historic movement?
What does federations have for amendments of the constitution? 
What may guarantee the self-governing status of the competent states?
What needs to be done in order to amend the Australia and Switzerland Constitution?
What does the structures of the federal government incorporate?
What is one method to protect the rights of the component states?
What is intrastate federalism?
What is a bicameral legislature?
What does federations often employ?
What is federalist paper no. 39?
What is the foundation for federalist paper no. 39?
China is the largest what?
What are Chinese nationalist suspicious of?
Why is China's government similar to unity structure?
How long has China been with centralized power?
What type of state is the Philippines?
What types of powers does the Philippines have?
What type of modifications been added to the Philippines Constitution? 
What did President Gloria Macapagal Arroyo establish?
What type of state is Spain?
What type of federalism system does Spain have?
What type of government does Spain have?
What does Spain's government accounts for?
How has United Kingdom been governed?
Instead of the UK adopting the federalist model, what did they do?
When did devolution in the UK begin?
What is Ireland Act 1914?
What is Irish Free State?
What has the process of devolution in the UK did?
What happened since 1997?
Does England have its own Parliament?
What does the region of England continue to use?
What is ecclesiology?
What happens in Presbyterian denominations?
In political federalism what does Presbyterian ecclesiology do?
What does each greater level of assembly have?
When was the earliest source of political federalism according to Christians?
What was the structure that the early Christian church described?
What happens in the council of Jerusalem?
In nearly all federalism countries, central powers enjoy what?
Per the UN definition, what is federalism?
What is the German Empire?
What is one variation of Gallicia's name used during the Middle Ages?
Which spelling was the most common spelling during the 13th century?
When did it get its modern spelling?
What is the name of the local government?
Which group regulates the Galician language?
What does the Castro culture's name mean?
When did the Castro culture flourish?
Who mentioned the ancient Galician's "warlike spirit"?
Who was it that described people living on the coast as "Celtic"?
At the end of which year did Central Europe tribes invade the Roman Empire?
Which tribe did the Romans subsequently make a treaty with?
What was the name of the Briton colony formed in Northern Galicia?
Which Visigothic king took over control of Galicia from the Suebi?
In which year did this happen?
War broke out with which other countries?
When did the Galician Junta more often stand up to requests from the monarch?
In what way was the tension between the monarch and Galicia similar to the wars it was fighting?
Which form of government did Galicia start using in 1975
Which modern group now works to attain Galicia status as a nation?
What is the political capital city?
How many rainy days does it typically have?
How many days with frosts?
A colder city like Lugo has how many days with frosts?
Its sunniest city, Pontevedra, gets how may hours of sunlight per year?
Roughly what percentage of the population actually speaks Galician?
What percentage read it?
What percentage write it?
What is Galicia's most widespread religion?
What percentage of Galicians identify with this religion?
What to Galician's call themselves in their language?
Aside from Spain, where have Galicians emigrated to?
Which old english word does the word "green" originate from?
Other than "grass", what other Germanic root word is similar to green?
Which season is green most commonly associated with?
Which chemical in plants is the largest contributor to the color green?
What an is an example of a green mineral?
What, in nature, is most likely to make things green?
For what do some animals use the color green?
What chemical causes emeralds to be green?
From which Middle English and Anglo-Saxon word is green derived?
What is green a symbol of in China?
In the Middle Ages, which color was associated with merchants, bankers, and the gentry?
What does the Mona Lisa wearing green symbolize?
What does the color green represent in the flags of Islamic countries?
Why is green the color of the environmental movement?
In which color system is green created by combining yellow and blue?
In which color model is green one of the additive primary colors?
What is the complement of green on the HSV color wheel?
What is the complement of green on the traditional color wheel?
What do pigments do with the color green?
What are green paints and dyes usually made of?
What is the main chemical that causes emeralds to be green?
What is the source of the green color in malachite pigments?
What is the source of amazonite's color?
What is made by placing a plate of blade of copper, brass, or bronze into vat of fermenting wine for several weeks, then scraping off and drying the green powder?
Who described the process of making verdigris in ancient times?
In what city did the Romans use verdigris in murals?
What would verdigris do to other colors that it came in contact with?
Which famous artist warned other artists not to use verdigris?
Which green food coloring is known to cause hyperactivity, asthma, urticaria, and insomnia?
What is a commonly used food coloring in the United Kingdom that is banned in Australia, Japan, Norway, and the United States?
What is the most common green chemical found in nature?
How do fireworks create green sparks?
Which copper salt can produce green glames?
What is the ratio of boron to potassium nitrate in green pyrotechnic flares?
Why are many plants green?
What does chlorophyll do with long (red) and short (blue) wavelengths of light?
Where did chlorophyll first arise?
How do animals typically use the color green?
Why do most fish, reptiles, amphibians, and birds appear green?
What is a chemical that can cause green hue in birds?
What is a protein that carries copper ions in chelation?
What is the green pigment in bile called?
What is the appearance of green in th eyes attributed to?
Where are green eyes most common?
Among Icelandic and Dutch adults, which sex more commonly has green eyes?
Which color was the symbol to regeneration and rebirth in Ancient Egypt?
What did Egyptian artists grind to use to paint on the walls of tombs or on papyrus?
How did Egyptians dye fabrics yellow?
What is the ancient Egyptian hieroglyph for green?
Who was the ruler of the underworld in ancient Egypt?
Why was green facial makeup worn by ancient Egyptians?
Which ancient greek philosopher considered green to be located midway between black and white?
Which ancient greek philosopher describe pale green as cloron and leek green as prasinon?
Red, yellow, and black are three of the four classis colors of Greek painting. What is the fourth color?
What pigment was made by soaking copper plates in fermenting wine?
How many different words for the varieties of green exist in Latin?
What color did the Romans attribute to Venus, the goddess of gardens, vegetables, and vineyards?
Why were vegetal green dyes less than ideal?
When was a good green vegetal dye finally produced?
What was known as yellow-weed?
When was green associated with the romantic movement in literature and art?
Who was a French philospher that celebrated the virtues of nature?
Which German poet and philospher declared green to be the most restful color?
When did the systematic study of color theory begin?
Who painted The Night Cafe?
What type of colors are red and green?
When were green and red standardized as the colors of international railroad signs?
When was the first traffic light erected?
Where were the first modern electric traffic lights erected in 1912?
Besides its association with danger, why was red chosen for traffic lights?
What was absinthe known as?
Why were popular paints and pigments in the nineteenth century highly toxic?
What color is most associated with toxicity and poison?
Which country had a flag in 1977 that was only green?
What does the green in Jamaica's flag represent?
What does the green cedar of Lebanon tree represent on the Flag of Lebanon?
Which color is considered sacred in Islam?
What color vestments do Roman Catholic and traditional Protestant clergy wear at liturgical celebrations during Ordinary time?
What is green the color of in the Eastern Catholic Church?
What does green represent in Ireland and Scotland?
What did Romans use as decorations for their winter solstice celebration called Saturnalia?
What was worshipped for their ability to maintain their color through the winter season?
What was designed to standardize the connection of computer peripherals?
USB has become what on other devices?
What has USB effectively replaced?
What are the different kinds of USB connectors?
Why were the designs for different USB connectors made?
The Type-A connector is usually what size?
What size is the Type-B connector?
What size is the most durable from the point of designed insertion lifetime?
What was designed for less daily connections?
What has reached 5,000-cycle lifetimes?
What was designed with frequent charging of portable devices in mind?
USB connections come in what?
What is High Speed only supported by?
SuperSpeed is only supported by?
When did the seven companies begin developing USB's?
How many companies developed USB's?
What was the goal for USB's?
Who was included in a team that worked on the standard at Intel?
When was the original USB 1.0 Specification introduced?
How fast was the slowest data transfer rate of the USB 1.0?
What was the fastest data transfer rate of the USB 1.0?
1.1 was the first widely used version of what?
When was the first widely used version of USB released?
What provides a fourth transfer mode?
How fast is the new SuperSpeed bus data signaling rate?
What is full-duplex in SuperSpeed transfer mode?
When were the plans to update USB 3.0 to 10 Gbit/s revealed?
What actually happened whenever USB 3.0 was updated?
When was USB 3.1 released?
What does the USB 3.1 standard increase?
When was the Type-C Specification 1.0 finalized?
What defined a new reversible-plug connector for USB devices?
What does Type-C connect to?
What connector provides four power/ground pairs?
Electronically marked cables have a chip that contains what?
What kind of cables does the fully featured USB Type-C contain?
What is the shortened version of vendor-defined messages?
What are logical sub-devices referred to as?
A single device can provide an audio device function such as?
A single device can provide a video device function such as?
What is a pipe?
A USB connection is based on what?
What is a pipe named at?
Where do pipes correspond?
How many endpoints can a USB device have?
If the direction of the data transfer is from the device to the host, what does the host send?
What does a bi-directional endpoint accept?
What is sent if the direction of the data transfer is from host to endpoint?
What is started when a USB is first connected to a host?
What id the data rate determined during?
When is the device assigned a unique 7-bit address?
What does the enumeration process start by doing?
What do transaction translators do?
When does a USB 2.0 hub operate in high speed mode?
What kind of devices do High speed USB 2.0's contain?
What do USB's implement connections to?
What are the standards called that implement connections to storage devices?
What is the process of making a novel device look like a familiar device?
Since when can most computers boot from USB mass storage devices?
What is USB not intended for?
What is an important advantage of USB?
Buses such as Parallel ATA fulfill what role in PC computers?
Several manufacturers offer what?
What do external portable USB hard drive disks offer?
What is the most recent standard for external drive connectivity?
What do the external drives typically include?
Media Transfer Protocol was designed by who?
Why was Media Transfer Protocol designed?
What was MTP originally designed for?
Why has MTP become the primary storage access protocol of the Android operating system?
What do older computers have to have in order for USB mice and keyboards to be used?
What is the hardware designed to detect in USB mice and keyboards?
USB keyboards and mice may communicate using what?
What connects PS/2 keyboards and mice to a USB port?
What performs bidirectional data translation between two standards?
What is difficult to do with a USB plug?
The USB specification states that the required USB icon must be what?
How is the USB icon located to each receptacle?
Receptacles should be oriented to allow the icon on the plug to what?
What do Type-A receptacles do on host devices?
What do Type-b receptacles do on target devices?
What do the receptacles prevent user from doing?
What networks do USB not support?
Standard connectors were designed to be what?
Why were standard connectors designed to be so robust?
What as a drawback of previous connectors?
How are the electrical contents of a USB connector protected?
How is the entire connecting assembly of a USB connector protected?
Where is the external metallic sheet connected?
What provides a degree of protection from interference with the USB signal?
What are the newer micro-USB receptacles designed for?
What is the minimum rated lifetime for the standard USB receptacle?
After a leaf-spring was moved from jack to the plug, the most stressed part was found where?
Why was the change made for the USB device?
What type of tolerances does the USB standard specify for compliant USB connectors?
Why were loose tolerances allowed for compliant USB connectors?
How is a weakness addressed in some other connector standards?
Due to size restrictions compliant devices must what?
USB cables and device have only what on their ends?
Hosts and devices only have what in terms of connecting to a USB device?
Devices usually have what type of receptacle?
Hosts almost always have what type of receptacle?
What has been used to connect digital cameras. smartphones and other devices to tablet computers?
What was standard for transferring data to and from the earlier type of smartphones?
How large are both mini-A and mini-B plugs?
When were the mini-A connector and and the mini-AB receptacle connector depreceated?
What is the micro connector designed for?
What is the easier-to-replace cable designed for?
What is the micro-plug rated for?
What are all USB On-The-Go devices required to have?
Non-OTG compliant devices are not allowed to use what?
Why are the Non-OTG compliant devices not allowed to use the micro-AB receptacle?
The OTG device with the B-plug inserted is called what?
What does an OTG device default to with no plug inserted?
What is the A-device responsible for?
What is a unit load defined as?
How much is a unit load in USB 3.0?
What is the maximum amount of load a USB 1. and 2.0 device may draw?
What is the maximum amount of load a USB 3.0 device may draw?
What is an example of a device that requires more than 500 mA of current?
What is an issue that may occur if a high-speed external disk drive is powered from just one USB 2.0 port.
What does USB compliance specification prohibit?
What defines a new type of USB port, called the charging port?
When was the USB Battery Charging Specification Revision 1.1 released?
What was the USB Battery Charging Specification Revision 1.1 called?
What does a charging port supply?
What does the USB Battery Charging Specification Revision 1.2 make clear of?
What does revision 1.2 remove?
When was USB Battery Charging Specification Revision 1.2 released?
The USB Power Delivery revision 2.0 specification has been released as part of what?
What does the USB Power Delivery revision 2.0 specification cover?
Power delivery protocols have been updated to facilitate what?
What can sleep-and-charge USB ports be used to do?
What is normally powered off whenever the computer is off?
What remain powered even whenever the computer is powered off?
On what laptops are the USB ports marked with a USB symbol with an added lightening bolt icon?
What does dell call the feature that lets USB drives to remain powered when the computer is off?
On what laptops are the sleep-and-charge marked with a non-standard symbol?
When did many of the largest mobile phone manufacturers sign an EC-sponsored MoU?
What did the MoU make the manufacturers agree to do?
When did the IEC release its version of the common EPS standard as IEC 62684:2011?
Some USB devices require what?
Some devices such as an external hard and optical disk drive can use what?
What is another alternative for power for an external hard and optical disk drive?
What is the purpose of a dual-input USB cable?
What does the USB specification limit?
When is the inrush current affected by the USB specification?
What are USB devices required to enter?
Many USB host interfaces do not what?
What do some non-standard USB devices use?
What Negotiates power draw with the host interface?
What does the USB specification require prior to the Battery Charging Specification?
How is the USB data transmitted?
What does USB use to encode data?
To ensure a minimum density of signal transitions  remains in the bitsream, what does USB use?
After the sync field, all packets are made of how many bit bytes?
How are the bit bytes transmitted?
The first byte is what?
Handshake packets consist of only a single what?
When are handshake packets generally sent?
What is provided by transmitting four bits that represent the packet type twice, in a single PID byte using complemented form?
IN and OUT tokens contain what?
An IN token expects what?
An OUT token is followed immediately by a what?
 a larger three-byte SPLIT token with a seven-bit hub number, 12 bits of control flags, and a five-bit CRC were created to do what?
 Rather than tie up the high-bandwidth USB bus sending data to a slower USB device, what happens?
How many bits of control flags did USB 2.0 add?
There are two basic forms of data packet, what are they?
A data packet must always be preceded by what?
What is a data packet usually followed by?
Low-bandwidth devices are supported with what?
All PID bytes include how many 0 bits?
 Full-bandwidth devices other than hubs can what?
These and other differences reflect the differing design goals of what?
USB was designed for what?
FireWire was designed for what?
FireWire 400 is faster than what?
The IEEE 802.3af Power over Ethernet (PoE) standard specifies a what?
Is USB cheaper or more expensive than PoE?
USB  was designed for peripherals to be what?
USB connects what?
Ethernet standards require what?
eSATA does not supply power to what?
Even though USB 3.0's 4.5 W is sometimes insufficient to power external hard drives, technology is what?
On a notebook eSATAp usually supplies how much power?
USB 2.0 High-Speed Inter-Chip (HSIC) is a what?
What does USB 2.0 High-Speed Inter-Chip eliminate?
When was the USB 2.0 High-Speed Inter-Chip adopted as the standard by the USB Implementers Forum
What surrounds the Sichuan basin to the west?
What mountains surround the Sichuan basin to the North?
What river flows through the Sichuan basin?
Where was the Qin dynasty based?
What surrounds the Sichuan basin to the South?
By what year did the Qin armies finish their conquest of Shu and Ba?
What did Qin administrators introduce to Shu and Ba?
Who engineered the Dujiangyan irrigation system to control the Min River?
The Min River is a major tributary of what river? 
The Dujiangyan irrigation system was used for what purpose?
During which dynasty did Sichuan regain its political and cultural prominence for which it was known during the Han?
Who was known as China's greatest poet and lived in Chengdu?
What was Chengu known to supply the country with?
Which years saw the An Lushan Rebellion?
Which empire ravished the Chengdu region with constant warfare and economic distress?
To which city was the Chinese capitol relocated to during Japanese occupation in the 20th century? 
What are some major cities occupied by the Chinese during the Second Sino-Japanese War?
What are some inland provinces that began to develop modern, westernized education systems? 
What are some reasons for the lack of accurate Japanese bombing during the Second Sino-Japanese War in the Sichuan Basin?
What group was the main antagonist during the Chinese Civil War?
Who led the defense of Chongqing in November 1949?
On what date in 1949 did Chengdu fall to the communists?
Why did Sichuan see some communist activity?
What Chinese Province had the largest population until 1997?
Why did Sichuan lose its status as the most populous Province in 1997?
Why was the Chongqing Municipality formed?
What was the population of Sichuan in 1982?
How many distinct parts make up Sichuan?
What makes up majority of the eastern Sichuan province?
Western Sichuan is delineated by what mountain range?
Which mountain range contains the highest point in the Gongga Shan province?
How many feet above sea level is the highest point of the Saxue Mountains?
Which river flows through the Sichuan Basin?
Which tributary of the Yangtze flows through central Sichuan?
What are the 4 main rivers in Sichuan?
Name some cities downstream of the Yangtze river that are to the east of Sichuan.
What area for the "Province of Abundance" refer to?
What are the major agricultural outputs of Sichuan?
What kind of meat is Sichuan known to produce in abundance?
How much of China's titanium is houses in Sichuan?
What is often done with Sichuan's natural gas reserves?
What is the largest dam ever built in the world?
On which river is the Three Gorges Dam built?
What is the purpose of the Three Gorges Dam?
By how much did foreign trade increase in Sichuan in 2008?
What was the export level of Sichuan in 2008?
What was the import level of Sichuan in 2008?
What cities saw an increase in foreign trade of more than 40% in 2008?
By how much did Sichuan increase minimum wage in December 2007?
What was the new monthly minimum wage in Sichuan by January 2008?
What was the minimum hourly wage in Sichuan on December 28, 2007?
What is the national minimum monthly wage in China?
Which Parks make up the Chengdu Hi-tech Development Zone?
Which industries does West Park give priority to?
What is the focus of the South Park?
What industry does South Park give priority to?
What is the planned area of the Mianyang Hi-Tech Industrial Development Zone?
What is the distance between the Mianyang Hi-Tech Industrial Development Zone and Mianyang Airport?
How much value has Mianyang Hi-Tech Industrial Development Zone  output since inception?
How many high-tech enterprises are present in the Mianyang Hi-Tech Industrial Development Zone ?
How long did it take to complete the Sui-Yu Expressway?
After the newest expressway was completed, what was the new travel time between Chengdu and Chongqing?
What is the speed limit on the Sui-Yu Expressway?
What was the total cost of the Sui-Yu Expressway?
How many lanes make up the Sui-Yu Expressway?
What race is the majority of Sichuan?
What is one of the largest minorities in Chengdu?
Which part of Sichuan has the worst weather and subjected to natural disasters?
How many permanent Tibetan people live in Chengdu?
What are the three most populist provinces in China?
What was the population of Sichuan in 1832?
What is the tenth most populous sub-national entity in the world?
How many sub-national entities have surpassed 100 million people in total?
In what year was the Soviet Union disbanded?
What was Unicode published as?
What was unicode developed in conjunction with?
What is the most recent version of Unicode?
Who maintains the Unicode Standard? 
Unicode contains how many thousands of characters in its repertoire? 
What is the aim of Unicode?
Traditional character encodings don't allow what type of computer processing?
What is multilingual computer processing?
Bilingual computer processing uses what characters?
What is the major limitation of traditional character encodings?
What were the first 256 code points of Unicode made identical to? 
Why were the first 256 code points made identical to ISO-8859-1?
What does the "fullwidth forms" section of code points encompass?
What are the CJK languages referenced?
When was a surrogate character mechanism implemented in Unicode 2.0?
Why was a surrogate character mechanism implemented?
What are some characters not originally intended for Unicode? 
Why are some foreign characters rarely used? 
Why was the Unicode 2.0 codespace increased? 
What are the General Categories of Unicode?
What type of use is the General Category not helpful for?
What is the General Category in Unicode?
How many General Category properties does each code point have?
What exists within the main Unicode categories? 
What is an ogonek? 
How does Unicode encode characters?
How are some abstract characters represented in Unicode?
What does the print on demand, core version not include? 
When was the Unicode Standard first published? 
When was the latest version, Unicode 8.0, released?
What was the last major version of Unicode to be published in book form? 
What year was it announced that only the core specification for Unicode would be printed in physical form?
How many mapping methods does Unicode define?
What are the two mapping methods that Unicode defines?
What do numbers in the names of the encodings indicate? 
What are the most commonly used encodings? 
What does UCS stand for?
What does BOM stand for? 
What specifies the BOM?
what is the code point of the BOM?
What is U+UFFE the result of? 
What is the UTF-8 standard? 
Byte order marks are forbidden in protocols using what standard? 
Why is it possible to distinguish UTF-8 from other protocols?
How is UTF-32 widely used? 
What programming language uses UTF-32 as internal representation of characters? 
what version of python can be used with UTF-32? 
The CJK ideographs comprise simpler elements called what in English?
Why have ideographs been unable to be simplified like Hangul?
What would be the benefit of Unicode decomposing  ideographs?
What does ACE stand for? 
Who created ACE?
When was ACE created? 
Who created OpenType?
Who created Graphite? 
where are instructions embedded to tell fonts how to output sequences? 
Can real stacking be accomplished? 
what is a solution to the placement of combining marks? 
What subset of Unicode is used by Windows? 
What are MES-1, MES-2, AND MES-3A AND MES-3B part of? 
What subset includes every character in MES-1 and WGL-4? 
How long has Microsoft Windows supported WGL-4? 
MES-1 uses what scripts only? 
What is the dominant scheme for internal processing? 
What is Unicode available through Windows on? 
What was the two-byte precursor to UTF-16? 
What is used almost exclusively for building new information processing systems? 
What is recommended for email transmission of Unicode? 
Where are the details of the two mechanisms for email transmission specified? 
How many different mechanisms does MIME define for encoding Unicode in email? 
What is the code for separating lines? 
What is the code for separating paragraphs? 
How is newline normalization accomplished in Mac OS X? 
How does the newliine normallization format work? 
Why has Unicode been criticized for not separately encoding forms of kanji?
What is TRON? 
What perception does the unification of glyphs cause? 
what tables of OpenType allow permit the selection of alternative glyph representations?
Where is information provided to designate which character form to select? 
How does modern font technology address the issue of depicting a Han character in alternate glyph representations? 
How many code points are tamil and Devanagari allocated? 
What is another word for ligatures? 
What is the ISCII standard? 
By how much has Detroit's population fallen this century?
The decline of what industry has hurt Detroit?
What industry has Detroit tried to revitalize in recent years?
What is one of the problems that currently effects property values in Detroit?
Who is the Governor in Michigan?
On which date did Detroit file bankruptcy?
How much debt did Detroit have when they declared bankruptcy?
On which date was Detroit's bankruptcy plan approved?
What type of bankruptcy did Detroit go through?
What trade was instrumental to the growth of this region?
By which group were the original French and French Canadians replaced?
What is the name of the French Canadians in Detroit?
What year was the Battle of Gettysburg?
Who led the Wolverine Brigade?
What Brigade was the 24th Michigan Infantry Regiment a part of?
How many casualties did the 24th Michigan Infantry Regiment have in Gettysburg?
What was a nickname for Detroit in the late 19th century?
On which waterway is Detroit located?
What is the most famous mansion in Detroit?
Which street became known for it's mansions?
Who electrified Detroit?
Who was the labor leader of the Teamsters?
Who was the labor leader of the Autoworkers?
How many hours did the unions push for as a maximum for a work day?
How many hours did the Unions want the work week to be limited to?
What was the name of a vigilante group in Detroit?
How many people of The Black Legion were convicted of crimes?
By which decade had the KKK become very active in Detroit?
What is the name of the movement of rural blacks in the early 20th century called?
How many people were killed in the race riot of 1943?
How many people came to Detroit between 1941 and 1943?
After which event did the 1943 race riot happen?
What care company promoted black workers to work alongside white workers?
In which year was the last electric streetcar line removed?
How many seconds did a streetcar run along Woodward Ave in 1941?
What made car travel much easier?
In which year did Martin Luther King Jr. give a speech in Detroit?
What is the name of the riot in Detroit in 1967?
Who was the Governor of Michigan in 1967?
Who was the President of the United States in 1967?
How many people were killed in the Twelfth Street riots?
Who was Governor of Michigan in 1970?
What is the court case that ruled that schools were subject to local control?
In which year did the Supreme Court hear Milliken v. Bradley?
What case is cited as a reason for White people leaving Detroit?
What school does John Mogk teach at?
At which school did Myron Orfield teach?
Who was the first black mayor of Detroit?
What did Detroit build after the failure of a larger regional transportation system?
How much did the federal government offer for a rapid transit system?
Who did Detroit argue with when trying to plane a regional transit system?
What hurt the Auto industry?
What did Detroit use to build it's tax base?
What was one of the effects of having employers cut jobs and closing plants in Detroit?
What group of buildings opened in 1977?
What was Mayor Young criticized for not reducing?
What area did downtown Detroit continue to lose businesses to?
In which year did Detroit's population peak?
What was the population of Detroit in 1950?
By how much in percent has the population of Detroit declined since 1950?
What was the population of Detroit in 2010?
In which year was Campus Martius open?
What area has Detroit been trying to redevelop?
In which year did Detroit celebrate it's 300th anniversary?
What opened in 2011?
Which two areas were connected by the Port Authority Passenger Terminal?
How much has been invested in Detroit since 2006?
Which hotel is set to be renovated?
How much money has been invested in Detroit in 2013-2014?
How many vacant downtown buildings are there in Detroit?
How many stray dogs do studies suggest are in Detroit?
How much in unpaid taxes did Detroit fail to collect in 2011?
What is the term for when a city falls into disrepair? 
What is the prominent topographical feature in Detroit?
How tall is the tallest point in Detroit?
What is the lowest point in Detroit along side?
What material is the Detroit Moraine composed of?
What architectural style does One Detroit Center boast?
What style does the Guardian building use?
What is a famous theater in Detroit?
What is a famous opera house in Detroit?
What university is near the New Center?
What areas of Detroit contain high rises?
What is the neighborhood just west of Woodward?
What type of neighborhood is Sherwood Forest?
What is the large island park in Detroit?
What is Michigan's first urban park?
How long is the second phase of the riverfront?
What is the total length of the Detroit International Riverfront?
How large is Lafayette Park?
In which part of Detroit is Mexicantown International Welcome Center?
What district is Lafayette Park a part of?
Who planned Lafayette Park?
How many of Detroit's residential lots are are underdeveloped?
How many of Detroit's housing is unoccupied?
How many home in Detroit need minor repairs?
How many of Detroit's home are in good condition?
Where are most of the low density area of Detroit located?
How much in stimulus money was announced in 2008?
Who was the Mayor of Detroit in 2011?
What is the plan called that seeks to clear land for neighborhood construction?
How many acres of land does the Far Eastside Plan seek to clear?
How was the 2008 stimulus plan payed for?
What was the median household income in 2009?
What was the median household income in 2000?
How many residents of Detroit in three live in poverty?
Who said that Detroit is one of the poorest big cities in the country?
What percentage of Detroit's residents where white in 1940?
Where did the population of Detroit shift to in the second half of the 20th century?
How many blacks lived in Detroit in 1930?
What was the movement of blacks to northern cities called?
What industry is responsible for a large growth in Detroit's population?
How much of Michigan's population is Black?
How much of Detroit's population is Black?
What was Detroit ranked as in a 2010 study on segregated cities?
Where have many Black people been moving to in recent years?
What is the 2009 population of Whites in Detroit?
When did Mexicantown start to grow?
What was Detroit's 2010 Hispanic population?
What was Detroit's 2010 Mexican population?
What was it called when many Mexican's were forcibly repatriated?
Where does most of the Bangladeshi population in Detroit live?
What is a word that could describe a lot of the Asian people who work or live in downtown Detroit?
What Tech company is based in Detroit?
What insurance company is located in downtown Detroit?
Which company moved it's world headquarters to Detroit in 2010?
What is the name Of the U.S. Patent office in Detroit?
Which part of Detroit has gotten billions in investment around the turn of the millennium?
What part of Detroit is Green Alleys located in?
What type of vacant buildings have been spared destruction?
What part of Detroit still has high population density??
Which building's reconstruction cost $82 million?
Which Downtown tower was converted to residential use?
What was the former name of the Doubletree?
What was the former name of the Westin?
Which bank announced an investment into Detroit in 2014?
How much of JPMorgan's investment will go to blight removal?
How much of JPMorgan's investment will go to job training?
How much did JPMorgan announce in additional investment into Detroit in 2015?
Which city has a lower than usual drinking age?
How many suburban residents take in Detroit's entertainment options?
Who conducted a study about Detroit's walk-ability?
What "Arsenal" was Detroit a part of ?
What nickname for Detroit recognizes it's musical history?
What is Detroit's area code?
Which hockey team is based in Detroit?
What Kiss song gave Detroit the nickname Rock City?
Which artist resided in Delray?
Which musician attended Cass Tech?
Which musician accompanied Donald Byrd on several albums?
What is the name of the jazz museum in Detroit?
What type of music is John Lee Hooker known for?
Who founded Motown records?
Who did a documentary on Motown?
Who wrote a book about Motown?
What music genre was big in Detroit in the 1980s?
What year did the movie about Kiss come out?
In which decades did bands like MC5 and Rare Earth become big in Detroit?
Which Detroit artist has the highest hip-hop sales?
Which band toured with Kid Rock?
What genre does The White Stripes fit into?
What is J Dilla's occupation?
Techno started in which city?
What genre of music featured robotic themes?
What is the Detroit Electronic Music Festival known as?
When does "Movement" occur?
Where does "Movement" take place?
What building does the Detroit Symphony Orchestra play in?
What family purchased the Detroit opera House?
How many seats does the Fisher Theater have?
Which Detroit theater has 4,404 seats?
In what year was the Detroit Opera House purchased?
What is the name of the art museum in Detroit?
What is the name of the Detroit museum of African American history?
Where was the birthplace of the Model T?
What does MOCAD stand for?
What does CAID stand for?
What is the U.S.'s largest museum complex?
Where is the Detroit Zoo?
What museum is in Bloomfield Hills?
What museum is on Belle Isle?
What Detroit gallery opened in 2010?
Which market has the largest open air flowerbed in the US?
How big is Midtown's population?
Which festival attracts over a quarter million visitors?
How many casino resorts ore in downtown?
On which day does Eastern Market attract the most visitors?
Who sculpted the Spirit of Detroit?
When was the Joe Louis memorial dedicated?
Who commissioned the Joe Luis memorial?
Who sculpted the Joe Louis memorial?
How long is the Joe Louis memorial?
How many metropolitan areas boast teams from all major US sports?
What is the name of Detroit Piston's arena?
Where do the Tigers play?
Where do the Lions play?
Where do the Red Wings play?
Which bowl game is held in Detroit?
Where is the MAC Football Championship game played?
Which conference has held many of it's championships games in Detroit?
What is Detroit's sports related nickname?
What is Eddie Tolan's nickname?
Who won the boxing title in 1937?
Who won the Stanley Cup in 1936?
Who won the World Series in 1935?
How many people are on the city council?
When was Detroit's charter approved?
Who approves Detroit's budgets?
What is Detroit's charter called?
Where is the Circuit Court located?
Where is Wayne County's Probate Court located?
Which District Court is Detroit home to?
What was Detroit's murder rate in 2014?
What was Detroit's murder rate in the mid to late 80s?
What city had a higher murder rate than Detroit in 2014?
How many murders did Detroit have in 2014?
How many murders did Detroit have in 2015?
What fraction of Michigan's homicides occurred in Detroit?
What is Detroit's rate of property crime?
What was the national rate of violent crimes in 2008?
What was Detroit's rate of violent crimes in 2008?
When was Detroit incorporated?
How many mayors has Detroit had?
Who was Detroit's last Republican mayor?
Who was Detroit's first black mayor?
What was Dennis Archer's former occupation?
Who was Michigan's governor in 2013?
What judge declared Detroit bankrupt?
What type of bankruptcy did Detroit file?
When did Detroit file for bankruptcy?
How much did Detroit owe when it was declared bankrupt?
What research university is located in Midtown?
What Catholic university is in Detroit?
In which district is Detroit Mercy's Law School located?
Which Catholic society is Detroit Mercy affiliated with?
How many Catholic high schools are in Detroit?
How many Catholic grade schools are in Detroit?
Two of the three Catholic high schools are operated by which religious group?
On which side of the city of the city are all of the Catholic schools located?
Under which agreement are Detroit's major newspapers published?
When was The Metro Times founded?
In what year did Detroit's two major newspapers reduce home delivery?
What newspaper was founded in 1935?
How is Detroit's TV market ranked?
How often does the Michigan Chronicle publish?
What province of Canada is a large consumer of Detroit programming?
How many major hospitals are in Detroit?
What is the Detroit VA hospital called?
How many affiliated physicians does the DMC have?
How many beds does the DMC have?
Who is the largest private employer in Detroit?
Detroit Medical Center has become a part of what Health System?
How much does Vanguard plan to invest in DMC?
What is a name of a Catholic hospital in Detroit?
How much will Vanguard spend to retire debt for DMC?
How much does Vanguard plan to spend in capital investment?
Around when were humans able to understand to some degree what culture really meant?
Name some cultural universals that exist with humans today.
What does the term "concept material culture" cover?
What does the term "Count Noun" mean?
What cultural traits fall under the term count noun?
What falls within the term "cultural anthropology"?
What is the modern term "culture" based on?
Who took over the metaphor used by Cicero?
Samuel changed something that was in the old meaning of the metaphor, what was it?
What changes do Social conflicts along with developing of technologies have on culture? 
What is this cultural movement called that involves a shift in gender relations mainly involving women?
Which time period was used in the example of shifts in social dynamics?
How did Matthew Arnold view "Culture" with?
Which two philosophers contrasted "culture" with the state of nature?
Which race was considered living "in a state of nature" by the Europeans?
"In a state of nature" was divided into two groups, what where they?
What type of music did critics associate with corrupt high culture?
Which type of music seemed superficial and decadent?
What was another name used for the corrupted high culture of the indigenous people?
Who's definition of culture did anthropologist  accept?
In which century did "culture" as a central concept of American anthropology emerge?
Which three early theorist helped shape sociology of culture?
What were the early concerns for the field of Sociology culture?
What is most of the research into sociological culture ?
In the U.S what does "Cultural Studies" focus largely on in this field?
Who first coined the term "Cultural Studies" in the United States?
What was the name of the company founded by Hoggart in 1964?
The CCCS has since been associated with who?
Who did Stuart Hall work along side with?
What did Stuart and his colleagues create?
In the field that Stuart was working, what did he and his colleagues often concentrate on?
Capitalism can be referred to as what process?
The idea of text in cultural studies can include what forms other than written language?
Which two practices have become the main focus in cultural studies?
What makes up cooperative cultural studies? 
Around when did the United States and United Kingdom began to develop different versions of cultural studies?
When did the British version of cultural studies emerge?
Who had influenced cultural studies in the U.K?
Which University did research of cultural studies take place under CCCS?
Which two wrote Cultural studies [were] grounded in a pragmatic, liberal-pluralist tradition?
From a Marxist view, what did they believe had to be controlled  to essentially control a culture?
How many ways did Raimon Panikkar believed cultural change can be based on?
What is the term used to describe what Modernization could be similar or related to?
What type of society was seen that came from Raimon's 29 ways?
What sea is North of the Sahara Desert?
What is to the south of the Sahara?
What kind of climate does the Sahel have?
What is the long term precipitation average of the Sahara?
What is the world's largest low latitude hot desert?
What ares is the Sahara located in?
What makes it difficult for clouds to form?
What section of the Sahara's cloud cover are the most   accentuated?
What is the air mass lying above the Sahara?
What part of the country does the air masses primarily form over?
What is blocked due to local surface low pressure?
What mountain helps enhance the aridity of the desert?
Where are the Atlas Mountains located?
What is the primary source of rain in the Sahara?
What is the reason the Sahara lacks moisture?
What does the desert have to overcome?
What is the temperature like year around in the desert?
What is the reason the northern fringe receives more   cloudiness and rainfall?
What is the average rainfall of the Sahara?
How much desert land is the Sahara?
What causes the southern fringe to receive cloudiness and   rainfall?
Which directions does the South Saharan run?
What months do the summer rains happen?
What is the average rainfall between the months of July and   August?
How much land does the ecoregion cover?
What is the number of plants in the Central Sahara?
What do plants do in order to avoid water loss?
Where do plants store their water to avoid the conditions?
What helps plants in order to get as much water as   possible?
How many cheetahs remain in the Northwest Africa area?
What months do the cheetah's avoid the sun?
How many many cheetah's are left in the wild?
What activities from these mammals will likely affect   habitat areas?
What underground items have lead to soil degradation?
What kind of pressure can be intense in the Sahara?
When did people start living on the edge of the desert?
How many river animals were thought to be found during   the ice age era?
What area of the Sahara is full of vegetation?
What is believed to have increased temperatures in the   Sahara?
During what era was the central Sudan rich in environment?
What kind of rock art was found in the Sudan?
What are examples of the first known archaeoastronomy   found in Nabta Playa?
What were Egyptians herding in the early BCE period?
By what time period were the Egyptians constructing  large buildings?
What items replaced previously items made of stone?
In which direction were the dead facing when they were   buried?
By What time period was the Sahara dry like it is today?
What was the main reason that the Sahara became so   dry?
What area is known for having the majority of the trade?
Where did the Greeks established their trading colonies?
Which coast did the Carthaginians explore for trade?
Who would raid the desert leaving the people in constant   fear?
What time period did the Garamantes arrive in?
What did the Garamantes do in order to bring water to   their crops?
How many towns are believed to be found by   Archaeologists?
What was the reason for the collapse of the Garamantes   civilization?
What group of people ruled the northern shoes of the   Sahara?
What time period did the Muslim conquest of North Africa   take place?
What is the estimated number of slaves that were   transported each year?
During the 1500 who was a valued part of the Ottoman   Empire?
What did the Ottoman Empire provide to its people?
What was the local language during this time in Egypt?
What time period did the colonialism of the Sahara begin?
What country conquered the Algiers from the Ottomans in   1830?
During what time were good moved through more modern   means?
What is the most common dialect spoken in the Sahara?
What language is mainly spoken in West Africa?
What was the traditional language of Bureaucratic affairs?
Which Scottish theologian is first credited with using the phrase "rule of law"?
Which British jurist later made the phrase "rule of law" popular in the 1800s?
What phrase Ariostle also use which is closely related to "the rule of law"?
Samuel Rutherford used the principle of the rule of law to argue what point?
According to the rule of law, what should hold the determination for rules in a land? 
In what forms of government are leaders not held to the same laws as ordinary citizens?
According to the rule of law, who must obey the laws?
What are governments called that are created with the rule of law in mind?
What happens to the rule of law if a government does not have an effective system for maintenance and restoration?
For what reasons might democratic societies not follow the rule of law?
On what principle did the Ancient Greeks first think was best for governance? 
According to Plato, who was above the law?
What type of kingdom was purported by Plato?
Under what rule did Aristotle believe a nation should be led?
To what did Plato compare a government that follows laws?
In which book of the Bible are limitations on Jewish monarchs outlined?
Who was against the divine rights of kings in England during the 1500s?
What principle did the restrictions on the right of kings, as detailed in Deuteronomy, influence later opposition?
What historical book may have a significant impact on contemporary law making practices?
According to the restrictions placed on Jewish kings in Deuteronomy, ownership over what was regulated?
To what did English Chief Justice Sir Edward Coke compare the law?
According to English Chief Justice Sir Edward Coke, what should Kings follow?
When did English Chief Justice Sir Edward Coke speak in the Case of Prohibitions?
How did the king feel about what was said in the Case of Prohibitions?
What was Edward Coke's official title?
What is another word for a thin definition?
What is another word for a thick definition?
Who commonly, or at least attempt to, abide by the rule of law?
On what do aspects of the rule of law do formalist definitions focus?
What is the third and lesser referred to approach on defining the rule of law?
According to legal theorists, what characteristics must the rule of law have?
According to some, what is the rule of law is formed to protect?
What system of government is considered as a component of the rule of law?
According to some legal theorists, for what are there no requirements for something to be considered a law?
What are the two approaches to defining the concept of the rule of law?
Which interpretation of the rule of law is used on a larger scale?
According to the formalist approach, what else, besides democracy, can laws protect?
According to the formalist approach, how much notoriety must a law have?
How many requirements for content are there for the rule of law under the formalist approach?
Which interpretation of the rule of law is less commonly used?
According to the functional interpretation, what principle is opposite of the rule of man?
What level of discretion do governments with a high degree of the "rule of law" have?
What level of discretion do governments with a low degree of the "rule of law" have?
What happens to those that do not follow to the rule of law?
What fights against the rule of law?
For how many countries have rule of law aggregate measurements been developed?
What is the term that described a government based on the rule of law?
What is the Greek word for law?
What is the Greek word for power?
What is a key qualifier for determining good governance?
According to the Constitution, what is superior to the rules of man?
What does the President and Supreme Court Justices vow to stand by?
What do the President and Supreme Court justices vow to uphold?
According to the Constitution, to what is the rule of law superior?
What branch of the government has prosecutorial discretion?
What branch of government can determine what acts it writes?
Which branch of government has judicial discretion?
Who disagrees with the ideas proposed by John Harrison?
For what body of principles is it debated whether or not it was constructed according to the rule of law?
According to John Harrison, through the Constitution, what is law?
According to Frederick Mark Gedicks, who believed that unjust laws were not really laws?
When was the Philadelphia Convention?
Who spoke at the Philadelphia Convention about the potential chaos from not having judges be able to enforce laws?
What was John Marshall's title?
What did George Mason state that judges could do to a law?
What East Asian philosophy emphasized virtuous leadership? 
What East Asian philosophy emphasized unwavering rule following?
How strong is the rule of law in most Asian countries?
Which Asian countries strictly follow laws?
Which two Asian countries have started to adopt the rule of law?
What has influenced China and Vietnam to conform to the rule of law?
Who is debating the reliance on the rule of law in China?
To whom is the rule of law important to in China's trade deals?
What values might adherence to the rule of law subsequently influence in China?
Where has the rule of law been more of a theory than a way of life? 
In Thailand, what branch of government rejected a proposal for senator selection?
According to what principles are most laws in Thailand decided?
When did Thailand first try to overthrow its government run by a king?
What harms the adherence to the Constitution in Thailand?
What country has the longest version of a constitution?
In what year was India's constitution drafted?
What country has the longest Constitution?
In Thailand, the length of the constitution impacts the judges chances to exercise what?
What is in position to gain control over the rule of law in Thailand?
When did the Declaration of Delhi happen?
How many judges participated in the Declaration of Delhi?
According to the Declaration of Delhi, what provides certain rights and freedoms?
According to the Declaration of Delhi, what type of conditions are needed for human dignity?
When the rule of law become an agenda item for the General Assembly?
What organization debates the rule of law?
What organization meets to discuss and determine the countries that are considered by the rule of law?
What do the Vienna Declaration and Programme of Action require the rule of law to be used in?
In what year was interest renewed in the rule of law within the General Assembly?
What organization works to further the understanding and adherence to the rule of law?
What types of economies does the IDLO focus on helping?
With how many countries does the IDLO work?
What is F.A. Hayek's profession?
According to Hayek, with the rule of law in place what will help people make more wise investments?
According to Hayek, limited governemnt power through the rule of law does not do what to people?
According to Hayek, people are free to do what within the rule of law?
How many people across the Tibetan Plateau speak 'greater Tibetan'?
How many people who have fled modern-day Tibet are considered to be exile speakers of Tibetan?
Why are Dzongkha, Sikkimese, Sherpa, and Ladakhi considered to be separate languages?
When did Tibet and China sign a peace treaty?
Where does a bilingual account of Tibet and China's peace treaty exist?
When did a civil war over succession lead to the collapse of imperial Tibet?
What followed the collapse of imperial Tibet?
What was divided between warlords and tribes with no dominant centralized authority?
Which dynasty ruled Tibet through a top-level administrative department?
What was a dpon-chen?
Who confirmed the dpon-chen?
Who was the political authority of the region?
Who held administrative and military power?
When was the Phagmodrupa Dynasty founded?
Who founded the Gelug school?
Who dominated politics after 1435?
What sect did the Tsangpa Dynasty of Shigatse favor?
When did the Qing dynasty begin to rule in Tibet?
When did Amdo come under Qing control?
When was Kham incorporated into neighboring Chinese provinces?
Who restored the Dalai Lama as a ruler?
What was the governing councel called?
When did the Qing Qianlong Emperor send a large Chinese army into Tibet?
Why did the Qing Qianlong Emperor send a large Chinese army into Tibet?
What was the Qing reorganization of the Tibetan called?
When was Tibet dominated by the Manchus?
When did George Bogle come to Shigatse to investigate prospects of trade.
Who came to Tibet from Europe?
When did the British and Russian empires begin encroaching on Tibet?
When did a British expedition to Tibet invade the country?
With whom were the British hopeing to negotiate?
How many Tibetan troops died at the Massacre of Chumik Shenko?
How many British troops died at the Massacre of Chumik Shenko?
Who imposed the Treaty of Lhasa?
Where did the Dalai Lama's government flee to during the 1959 Tibetan Rebellion?
How many Tibetans died during the Great Leap Forward?
How many monasteries were destroyed during the Cultural Revolution?
When did China and India fight a war over South Tibet and Aksai Chin?
To where did Chinese troops withdraw?
When did Hu Yaobang visit Tibet?
When did monks in the Drepung and Sera monasteries start protesting for independence?
What did the government do when it halted reforms?
When was the most recent Tibetan unrest?
For what have the Beijing and Lhasa goverments been criticized?
On which border of Tibet is Mount Everest located?
How tall, in feet, is Mount Everest?
Where is the source of the Yangtze river?
Which mountain is a holy pilgrimage for both Hindus and Tibetans?
Who do Hindus believe lives in Mount Kailash?
What is the Tibetan name for Mount Kailash?
Which lake is the largest in China?
What is the average annual snowfall in Tibet?
What weather pattern exerts some influence on eastern TIbet?
What are winters like in Tibet?
How are the original ancestors of the Tibetan people represented?
What has the population of Tibet primarily consisted of?
Which country has a disputed area with Tibet?
What are Tibetan Muslims known as?
Where did Islamic influence in Tibet come from?
In what year were all Tibetan Muslims declared Indiana citizens?
What is the Chinese Muslim community called?
Who used to reside in the Potala Palace?
How many stories does the Potala Palace contain?
How many shrines exist in the Potala Palace?
What is Norbulingka?
In what languages is Tibetan music often chanted in?
What do the chants often contain?
What type of chanting is performed without metrical timing?
What type of music comes from the popular Gelugpa school?
What is worshipped during Tibet's various festibals?
What is the Tibetan New Year Festival called?
What do Tibetan's eat on New Year's Eve?
When is the Monlam Prayer Festival?
Who established the Monlam Prayer Festival in 1049?
What is 'a friendly' another term for?
What is 'a scrimmage' another term for?
What is 'a demonstration' another term for?
What is 'a preseason game' another term for?
What is 'a warmup match' another term for?
What type of exhibition game showcases the best players?
What are exhibition games in the Olympics?
What can an exhibition game raise money for?
What can an exhibition game settle?
What were the most common type of matches in the early days of soccer?
When did the Football League begin in England?
By what year had national football leagues been formed in nearly every country?
What did the growth of national leagues cause a serious decline in?
When do football clubs still play friendlies?
What type of football matches are non-competitive?
What do some friendlies change the rules to make unlimited?
What are some examples of friendly short football tournaments?
What do friendly short football tournaments have little of?
What do friendlies help international teams prepare for?
Which type of team lacks time to prepare for tournaments?
What do international leagues' friendlies happen in the middle of?
What concern has caused national associations and clubs to disagree about friendlies?
What do friendlies allow managers to experiment with?
What can happen to players who get red or yellow cards in friendlies?
What kind of record do players' goals in friendlies count for?
When did FIFA decide to limit substitutions in international friendlies?
What absurd number of substitutions had some international teams been making in friendlies before 2004?
Where are "exhibition match" and "friendly match" not synonymous?
What are two examples of leagues holding all-star exhibition matches?
What are 'friendlies' for charity usually called in the UK?
What are 'friendlies' to honor a player usually called in the UK?
What nationality is the Flying Fathers team?
What religion is the Flying Fathers team?
Who founded the Flying Fathers?
What league were most members of the Buffalo Sabres Alumni Hockey Team from?
Where are the Saores based?
Which states do MLB teams do spring training in?
What is the MLB preseason league in Arizona called?
What is the MLB preseason league in Florida called?
How many preseason games does each MLB team play?
What is it called when an MLB team plays two preseason games in one day with different rosters?
What development has made it unnecessary for MLB teams to play exhibition games with teams from other leagues?
What league are the Toronto Bluejays in?
What league are the Montreal Expos in?
What game do the Bluejays play against the Expos?
When did the Mayor's Trophy Game end?
What concerns have reduced Minor League exhibition games?
What inter-city exhibition game did Chicago have?
What inter-city exhibition game did New York have?
In what month is the MLB All-Star Game held?
What did the MLB All-Star winning team gain in the World Series?
How many preseason games do NBA teams play?
Where are the TImberwolves based?
Where are the Suns based?
The Suns' exhibition game in Indian Wells, CA is the only time an NBA game is played in what setting?
What venue do the Suns play at in Indian Wells?
When did the NBA play preseason games against the ABA?
What legendary team did the NBA sometimes formerly play against?
On what continents have NBA teams played preseason games outside the US?
How many preseason games were NBA teams limited to in the 2011-12 season?
What is the main European basketball club?
What is an example of a corporate sponsor of a basketball team?
What is an example of a team of former college players?
When did the FIBA stop allowing pros on foreign national teams?
When did the NCAA decide college teams could only play other college teams?
How often does the NCAA allow college teams to go overseas?
How many preseason exhibition games does an NFL team play?
What is the one exception to the NFL's 4-preseason-game limit?
What month are most NFL preseason games in?
How many players can an NFL team have in the off-season?
How many players can an NFL team have in the regular season?
How many exhibition games did the Arena Football League have per year in the early 2000s?
What type of league commonly plays unstructured exhibition games?
What is a team called that is in the process of joining a league?
Indoor league teams sometimes play against what type of outdoor league team?
What consideration is more important for college teams than exhibition games?
What is a game called in which a team plays against itself?
Championships are decided by formulas for college teams below what level?
Major FBS teams can have lopsided victories against what kinds of lesser opponents?
Why do smaller schools want to play against major FBS teams?
How many wins are required for an FBS team to be eligible for the bowl?
How many games between FBS and FCS teams count towards the FBS's bowl eligibility?
When did the College Football Playoff System begin?
How many exhibition events per year does the NASCAR Sprint Cup have?
Where is the Sprint Unlimited held?
Where is the Sprint All-Star Race held?
What does the winner of the Sprint Unlimited get?
Where is Calder Park Thunderdome?
What was Strasbourg called in 12 BC?
What was the Roman camp destroyed by?
Who was leading the Romans at Argentoratum?
After what year was the Legio VIII Augusta permanently stationed in Argentoratum?
How many times was Argentoratum rebuilt during the first and fifth centuries AD?
Who was the political guide during the Protestant Reformation? 
Who was the spiritual guide during the Protestant Reformation?
Who spent several years as a political refugee in the city?
How many other cities joined Strasbourg at the Imperial Diet of Augsburg in 1530?
How many times was the Rhines bridge used during the Franco-Dutch War?
When did Louis surround the city with considerable force?
When did Louis march into the city unopposed and proclaimed its annexation?
Who bombarded the city of Strasbourg? 
What date was the Museum of Fine Arts destroyed by fire?
What cathedral was damaged along with the medieval church of Temple Neuf?
How many inhabitants were left without shelter after the siege?
How many civilians died during the siege?
In what year was the Fall of France?
What country was Alsace annexed to? 
Who imposed the rigorous policy of Germanisation?
When were the first evacuees allowed to return?
 How high was the dome at the Romanesque revival building?
Who led the first Alsatian resistance movement?  
Who was the highest commander that is under Hitler?
How was Marcel Weinum executed?
What was the city attacked by in 1943?
On what date was the city liberated?
What council was the city given a seat for in 1949? 
When did the European Parliament begin meeting in Strasbourg?
When was Louise Weiss inaugurated?
What is Strasbourg known as?
When was Strasbourg annexed by the Kingdom of France?
What did Montgelas study?
 From what empire did students come from to attend university?
What year was the Canal de la Bruche added? 
What kind of tourism attracts tourists yearly?
What river is Strasbourg by?
What language does the name Oklahoma come from?
What does Oklahoma mean?
When was the name Oklahoma suggested?
Who suggested the name Oklahoma?
When was the name Oklahoma made official?
Where does Oklahoma rank by land area?
How many square miles is Oklahoma?
How many square miles of water is in Oklahoma?
How many states are on the Frontier Strip?
Which state is north of Oklahoma?
How far out of alignment is Oklahoma's western edge from Texas's border?
When was the border between TX and NM first determined?
When was Oklahoma's border determined?
Where is the NM border of both Oklahoma and Texas supposed to line up with?
Which one is more accurately placed, the TX/NM border or the OK/NM border?
What plateau is Oklahoma near?
What watershed is Oklahoma in?
What is Oklahoma's tallest mountain?
How many feet above sea level is Oklahoma's highest point?
How many feet above sea level is Oklahoma's lowest point?
How many major mountain ranges are in Oklahoma?
Which of Oklahoma's mountain ranges are in the US Interior Highlands?
What part of Oklahoma does the Flint Hills reach into?
What is the world's tallest hill?
How high is Cavanal Hill?
What is an example of a mesa range?
What part of Oklahoma is the Antelope Hills in?
What part of Oklahoma has oak savannahs?
What mountains are in Oklahoma's eastern third?
In which direction do the Ozark mountains get higher?
How much of Oklahoma is covered in forests?
What types of prairie grasslands does Oklahoma have?
What part of Oklahoma has low rainfall?
What types of trees grow near rivers in western Oklahoma?
What rare types of maples grow in southwest Oklahoma?
What types of birds does Oklahoma have a lot of?
What types of deer does Oklahoma have a lot of?
What does Oklahoma have the country's largest towns of?
What part of Oklahoma is Cross Timbers in?
What part of Oklahoma does the American alligator live in?
How large is the Tallgrass Prairie Preserve?
What part of Oklahoma is the Tallgrass Prairie Preserve in?
The Tallgrass Prairie Preserve is the largest protected tallgrass prairie in what area?
How many states were originally covered by the Tallgrass Prairie Preserve?
How many national wildlife refuges are in Oklahoma?
What was the "Oil Capital of the World"?
What type of investments were important in early Oklahoma?
Who was the "Father of Route 66"?
Where was the Highway 66 Association based?
When did Route 66 begin?
When did the Dust Bowl begin?
What mistake led to the Dust Bowl?
What states were affected by the Dust Bowl?
How many farmers had to relocate because of the Dust Bowl?
How much did Oklahoma's population decline from 1930 to 1950?
When was the Oklahoma City Bombing?
Who committed the Oklahoma City Bombing?
How many people died in the Oklahoma City Bombing?
How many children died in the Oklahoma City Bombing?
When was McVeigh executed?
What is Oklahoma's fourth most popular language?
How many Oklahomans speak German?
How many Native American languages are used in Oklahoma?
What is Oklahoma's fifth most popular language?
How many Oklahomans speak Vietnamese?
How does Oklahoma rank among US states for producing natural gas?
How does Oklahoma rank among US states for agriculture?
How does Oklahoma rank among US states for producing wheat?
How many Fortune 500 companies are based in Oklahoma?
How many Fortune 1000 companies are based in Oklahoma?
What is Oklahoma's rank among states producing crude oil?
What is Oklahoma's rank among states by active drilling rigs?
How does Oklahoma's crude oil reserves rank among states?
How much of Oklahoma's electricity comes from non-renewable sources?
How much of Oklahoma's electricity comes from coal?
Which largest private oil companies are based in Oklahoma City?
What industry are all of the Oklahoma-based Fortune 500 companies in?
What is the largest company in Oklahoma?
What is the 2nd-largest company in Oklahoma?
Where is ONEOK based?
How many famous Native American ballerinas came from Oklahoma?
What are Oklahoma's Native American ballerinas called?
What ballerina started the Oklahoma City Ballet?
When did the University of Oklahoma's dance program begin?
Which sisters were in the Five Moons?
Where is 'Discoveryland!'?
Who starred in the Broadway production of 'Oklahoma!'?
Where is Ridge Bond from?
Who did Ridge Bond play?
How many performances of Oklahoma! was Ridge Bond in?
What major theater groups are in Oklahoma City?
What is the oldest community theater group west of the Mississippi River?
Where is the American Theatre Company based?
What is the oldest resident professional theater company in Oklahoma?
Where is Heller Theatre?
How many museums are in Oklahoma?
How does Oklahoma's per-capita arts spending rank?
Where is the Philbrook Museum?
What kind of museum is the Philbrook?
Where are Thomas Gilcrease's collections housed?
Where does Oklahoma have a fine Egyptian art collection?
Where is the largest collection of Dale Chinuly's work?
What kind of art did Dale Chinuly make?
Where is the National Cowboy and Western Heritage Museum?
Where is the largest Jewish art collection in the southwest?
When was Oklahoma's centennial year?
When was the exact hundredth anniversary of Oklahoma's statehood?
What organization said Oklahoma's centennial was the top event in the US that year?
What do ethnic festivals depict?
How long is the State Fair of Oklahoma?
Where is the State Fair of Oklahoma?
How many people attend the State Fair of Oklahoma each year?
How long is the Tulsa State Fair?
How many people attend the Tulsa State Fair each year?
When did the Medieval Fair of Norman begin?
Where was Oklahoma's first medieval fair?
Where was the Medieval Fair of Norman held for its first 2 years?
Where was the Medieval Fair of Norman held from 1978 to 2002?
Where has the Medieval Fair of Norman been held since 2003?
How many students were in Oklahoma's public schools in 2008?
How many school districts are in Oklahoma?
How many Native American students are in Oklahoma's public schools?
What does Oklahoma spend per student in public schools as of 2008?
How many public schools does Oklahoma have?
Who said Oklahoma's pre-K program is the best in the US?
When was Oklahoma's pre-K called 'a model for early childhood schooling'?
What was Oklahoma's high school dropout rate in 2007?
What was Oklahoma's high school dropout rate in 2008?
What percent of Oklahomans have graduated high school?
How many public universities does Oklahoma have?
What is the second-oldest university west of the MS River?
Within what university is Oklahoma's only optometry college?
What university has the largest Native American enrollment in the US?
What is Oklahoma's only HBCU?
Which Native American group is involved in a language preservation project?
What percent of Cherokee people are desired to be fluent in Cherokee?
What group runs the Cherokee language preservation project?
How much has the Cherokee Preservation Foundation spent on schools?
Where is there a Cherokee immersion school?
How many NCAA Division I colleges does Oklahoma have?
How many colleges does Oklahoma have in the Big 12?
How many fans attend an average Oklahoma State University football game?
What is the rivalry between OSU and University of Oklahoma called?
Where is Oral Roberts University?
What kind of tournaments does Cedar Ridge Country Club host?
Where is Southern Hills Country Club?
Where is Oak Tree Country Club?
Where is Cedar Ridge Country Club?
How many PGA championships has Southern Hills held?
How many major newspapers does Oklahoma have?
What is the largest Oklahoma newspaper?
How many people read the Sunday issue of The Oklahoman?
What is the 2nd-largest Oklahoma newspaper?
How many people read the Sunday issue of The Tulsa World?
How many miles of highways are in Oklahoma?
Oklahoma has the longest drivable stretch of what famous highway?
What is the busiest highway in Oklahoma?
How many bridges in Oklahoma were found to be deficient in 2010?
How many national highway bridges in Oklahoma were found to be deficient in 2010?
What is the largest commercial airport in Oklahoma?
Where is Oklahoma's largest airport?
How many people boarded in Will Rogers World Airport in 2010?
How many different airlines operate in Oklahoma?
How many public airports does Oklahoma have?
How many ports does Oklahoma have?
Which port in Oklahoma handles international cargo?
Where is the furthest-inland oceangoing port in the US?
How many tons of cargo does the Tulsa Port of Catoosa ship annually?
What connects the two Oklahoma ports?
How many district courts does Oklahoma have?
How many counties does Oklahoma have?
What is the civil court of last resort in Oklahoma?
What is the only other state with two courts of last resort?
What is the criminal court of last resort in Oklahoma?
Who is in the executive branch?
Who commands the Oklahoma National Guard?
Who is responsible for submitting a state budget in Oklahoma?
Who is responsible for enforcing Oklahoma's laws?
How many county commissioners does each Oklahoma county have?
What are the major county offices in Oklahoma?
How many counties are in Oklahoma?
Who can collect taxes in Oklahoma?
Who can hold elections in Oklahoma?
How many tribal governments are in Oklahoma?
Tribes hold land in Oklahoma, but what isn't it called?
What powers do tribal governments have?
Who can overrule the tribal governments?
Who must approve tribal constitutions?
What political party rose to power in Oklahoma in 1948?
When did registered Republicans become a majority in Oklahoma?
What is the one election since 1952 where a Republican presidential candidate didn't win in Oklahoma?
Oklahoma was the only state where which presidential candidate won no counties twice?
Who was the last Democratic presidential candidate to win any counties in Oklahoma?
How many incorporated cities are in Oklahoma?
How many Oklahoma cities have over 100,000 people?
How many of the 50 largest US cities are in Oklahoma?
What is the largest metro area in Oklahoma as of 2010?
How many people live in the Tulsa metro area?
What state House bill would change Oklahoma's motto to 'Oklahoma - In God We Trust'?
What was Oklahoma's state motto, before the state House bill might change it?
Why did the state House think they could change Oklahoma's motto?
For how long have modern humans lived on the Indian subcontinent?
How long ago did earlier hominids live on the Indian subcontinent?
When did the Indus Valley Civilization thrive on the Indian subcontinent?
What was the first major civilization in South Asia?
What was the span of the Mature Harappan period?
What empire conquered most of the subcontinent in the 3rd and 4th centuries BC?
After the 3rd century BC, what style of literature grew in northern area of the subcontinent?
What form of metal was developed and  exported from southern India?
What was the period following 3rd century BC and extending 1500 years called?
What was the foremost dynasty of the the Golden Age period? 
Between what centuries was the Tripartite struggle focused on Kannauj?
How long did the Tripartite struggle last?
When did Islam begin to become a political power in India?
What dynasty conquered southern India and parts of southeast Asia?
What facet of Indian mathematics was introduced into the Arab areas in the early Medieval period?
What group founded the Delhi Sultanate in the 13th century?
When did the Delhi Sultanate decline in its rule of northern India?
What belief system began in the 15th century?
What empire covered most of India in the 16th century?
During what century did the Mughal empire decline?
What company annexed large areas of India in the 18th and 19th centuries?
What effect did Company rule in India produce in 1857?
After the Rebellion who administered the British provinces of India?
The rapid development of what did British rule cause in India?
What party was the leader in the Indian independence movement of the 20th century?
Who remarked Indian history is too devoted to the ranking of dynasties and invasions?
What type of history period is often neglected in Indian histories?
What facet of social and economic conditions are displayed by Indian history?
What type of conquests were gradual in nature?
What part of India was never completely conquered?
By what era was India inhabited by humans of some form?
What type of remains were found in the Narmada Valley?
From how long ago do tools date in India?
Where in the subcontinent is the oldest archaeological site?
What type of resident lived at the site in Soan River Valley?
When did the Mature Indus Civilization thrive? 
What stage of civilization did the Mature Indus represent?
What kind of organization did the Mature Indus have?
Of what were the early cities of the Mature Indus civilization built?
How high were the buildings in the Mature Indus ?
For what culture is the Vedic period named?
Where was the Indo-Aryan culture located?
In what language did  the Vedic culture speak?
What sacred texts are some of the oldest in India?
What was the duration of the Vedic culture?
When did the Aryan culture begin its expansion?
Into what area did the Aryan culture expand?
What were the Aryan social classes called?
What did the Aryans label as impure in the indigenous peoples in order to exclude them from certain social classes?
What groupings formed up into larger monarchical groups?
What were the principle texts of Hinduism?
In what language were the Vedas ?
What were the core epics of the Vedas?
Which Vedic text is the longest single poem on Earth?
On what type of clash is the Mahabharata thought to have been based?
What philosophical movement appeared during 800-200 BCE?
What was the origins of the Shramana movement?
During what time were the first Upanishads written?
What period started after 500 BCE?
Where was the central location of the Muayan Empire?
Where was the Vajji confederation located?
How early did the small republic states exist in India?
Until what century did the republic states endure in India?
In what language did the educated Indian speak?
What was the general population's common language ?
When were the earliest Upanishads composed?
Of what philosophical system do the Upanishads form the basis?
What are the Upanishads called in Hinduism?
What part of the Hinduism belief system did the Upanishads attack?
What worship system is central to Hinduism?
Where is the earliest mention of Magadha people?
In the development of which religions did Magadha participate?
Where was the location origin of the Maurya and Gupta empires?
Due to advances in science and culture, what are the Magadha region empires considered to represent?
What were local villages' assemblies called in the Magadha kingdoms?
What Persian king wanted tribute from the tribes of northern India?
By 520 BC what empire ruled the northwestern Indian subcontinent?
What king ruled Persia in 520 BC?
How long did the Persian empire control the northern India subcontinent?
What did India supply to the Persian war efforts against Greece?
When did Alexander the Great reach India?
Who did Alexander defeat in the area now Pakistan?
At what battle did Alexander beat King Porus?
Where did Alexander's army finally mutiny?
The strength of what empire's army pushed Alexander to retreat?
What are the basic written records of the Mauryans?
What is the archaeological period of the Mauryan Empire?
What metal was developed in south India during the time of the Mauryan Empire?
To where was wootz steel exported?
What organization closely monitored business dealings in the Mauryan Empire? 
During what period did Tamil literature thrive?
How many Tamil dynasties ruled during the Sangam period?
What was the extent of the Sangam period?
In what part of India did the Tamil dynasties rule?
How were Tamil writers different from earlier Sanskrit writers?
What was the time span of the Shunga Empire?
Who founded the Shuga empire after the fall of the Maurya empire?
How long did Pushyamitra Shunga rule?
What script variant was used to write the Sanskrit language?
What tradition did Shunga rulers help begin?
From what area did the Kushan Empire come?
Who was the first ruler of the Kushan empire?
In the middle o what century did the Kushan empire begin?
What was the language base of the Kushans?
What had the Kushans conquered much of by the time of Kanishka
What type of trib were the Hephthalites?
Where did the White Huns roam?
In what country did the White Huns settle?
What lands did the White Huns take in the 5th century? 
In which century did the Gupta Empire fall?
To what type of states did the former Gupta Empire revert?
After uniting the area, what title was Harsha given?
When was Harsha crowned by the states he united?
To what religion had Harsha been converted?
What cults weakened Buddhism in India?
What replaced Buddha in ruling centers?
What kind of temples were built for Hindu Gods?
What was the style of worship of Hindu Gods?
By what dentury did Buddhism disappear form much of India?
What area did the Cholas unite in the 9th century?
What kind of power did the Chola dynasty become in south India?
In what area did the Chola Empire establish political unity?
In what type of architecture did the Cholas excel? 
From their contacts and conquests in surrounding sea areas, what did this establish the Chola empire as? 
What group wanted to conquer India from earliest times?
What empire took over parts of Afghanistan and Pakistan in 720?
Who was the final Hindu monarch of Sindh?
What Arab leader completed the early ambitions of Arabs by conquering parts of northern India?
How did the early Muslims view the possibility of conquering India? 
In what year did Muslim general Muhammad bin Qasim take over most of the Indus area?
Who eventually defeated the Arabs at Rajasthan?
In what area did the Indian Kings contain the Arabs?
When was the Arab invasion repulsed?
Where did the Arabs establish as the capital of the newly conquered territory?
In what areas of India were Islamic kingdoms formed over a period of centuries?
What Muslim endeavors thrived on the coastal areas of south India? 
Which south Indian coast was favored by Muslim traders?
From where did the Arab traders come in order to trade on the west coast of India?
Besides the newly introduced Islamic religion, what other Abrahamic religions were practiced in India?
Until what century did the Kabul Shahi dynasties rule the Kabul Valley?
The decline of what empire allowed the rule of the Kabul Shahi empire?
How many eras are the Shahis divided into?
When did the Shahis switch from Buddhist to Hindu?
What was the kingdom of the Shahis called?
In what id Jayapala see a danger to his dynasty?
What city did Jayapala invade at least twice?
Who defeated Jayapala and required an indemnity payment?
What part of the area did Jayapala lose?
What was Jayapala's response to the indemnity payment?
In what year was Jaipal again soundly defeated by the Muslims?
Where was the location of the Shahi defeat by the Muslims?
What was Jaipal action after his last defeat?
Upon what did Jaipal's subjects think he brought disaster?
Who was the ruler of Ghazni?
From where did raiders come to attack the agrarian Indians?
After a history of raiding groups, what is not remarkable in the history of the subcontinent?
Before the Muslim invasions, what did previous invaders do in the local cultures?
What did the Muslim invaders staunchly keep after invading?
What type of new Indian culture was formed from this mixture of cultures?
What Turko-Mongol attacked and defeated the Sultan of Tughlaq dynasty?
On what date did Timur beat the Delhi Sultan?
In what shape did Timur leave the city of Delhi?
How many prisoners of war were executed in the sack of Delhi?
What were exempted from death by Timur when ordering Delhi sacked?
From the mid 13th century, what dominated politics in northern India?
What empire dominated in the south of India in the 13th century?
What group dominated in western and central India at the start of the 13th century?
Gajapati Kingdom was powerful in the east for how many centuries?
What empire beat the last Bahmani Sultanate?
What empire did Babur found in northern India?
Who defeated Babur's son in 1540?
Of what nationality was Sher Shah Suri?
At what place did Akbar's army defeat Hemu in 1556?
By what route did Babur enter India?
By what date did the Mughal dynasty rule most of India?
What famous monument did Shah Jahan build at Agra?
What reached it height during the reign of Shah Jehan?
What actions caused the decline of the Mughal Empire?
During whose reign did the Mughal Empire reach its greatest expanse?
What groups invaded and damaged the Mughals?
Who attacked and plundered Delhi in 1737?
Who was the final Commander-in-chief of the Mughal army?
What was the site of the final battle for the Mughals?
What was the Indian Rebellion of 1857 also called?
The rise of what dynasty followed the era of the Mughals?
What founding was of importance in the  decline of the Mughals?
Who consolidated the Maratha kingdom?
What did J.N. Sarkar say of Shivaji's nation building?
Who made the Marathas a strong power?
By when had the Maratha kingdom become an empire?
Who ruled the Maratha Empire?
What were Peshwas?
By what year had the Maratha Empire covered most of the subcontinent?
In the end, what empire defeated the Maratha Empire?
To what Kingdom did many small kingdoms pay tribute?
What kingdom was founded in Mysore in 1400 CE?
What groups was Mysore fighting in the later half of the 18th century?
What country promised aid to Mysore to fight the British?
Who took over rule of Mysore in the 18th century?
What did the soldiers rebel against in the Indian Rebellion of 1857?
What happened to the rebels of the Rebellion?
What force took control of the company and the situation?
What did the British government intend to keep in regards to India?
What did the British government remove that had caused the Rebellion?
What did the Colonial government expand by legal means?
What new law was created?
Who insisted that schooling be a priority in India?
When did India build the forth largest rail system in the world?
In what feature of management did the British invest heavily?
What administer divided the province of Bengal in half?
What was the majority of the population of the western half of Bengal?
What was the religion of the western half of Bengal?
What movement did the division of Bengal start?
What was the biggest and oldest political party in India?
What did the Bengali Renaissance resemble?
What did the Movement question?
What early social movement occurred during this time of awakening?
What factors did the Young Bengal movement  say were needed for civil conduct?
What did the movements in Bengal serve to awaken in Indians?
What movement rose in the 19th century?
What did Indian first want as government?
What did Indians finally begin to demand?
What feature of the nationalism movement is unknown?
What can only be listed without absolute firmness in the nationalism movement?
What appointments were  the first step in Indian self-rule?
When was the first Indian appointed as a Councillor?
What more local councils were set up?
Of what nationality were the officers in the Indian Army?
What were the troops in the British Indian Army?
What leader started a mass movement against British rule?
What means did Gandhi espouse to gain self-rule?
What group wanted to use violent means to over throw the British rule?
On what date did India gain its independence?
What action did the movements combine to produce?
What position did Muslims have in the Indian population?
What effect of independence did Muslims distrust?
What did the British form in preparation to leaving India?
How many people died in the rioting over divisions of Bengal and Punjab?
How many people migrated between the newly created countries of India and Pakistan?
Name two infrastructure projects Nasser spearheaded.
What century did Nasser rule in?
What was nasser's position toward imperialism?
How did Nasser's government deal with human rights?
What elementary school did Nasser attend?
Where did Nasser go to boarding school?
What secondary school did Nasser attend?
Where did young Nasser witness demonstrations?
What organization organized the protests Nasser witnessed?
What school did Nasser attend in Cairo?
What was the title of the article Nasser wrote for his school paper?
What was the issue Nasser led a protest against?
How many protestors were killed in the demonstration?
What did King Farouk restore after the demonstrations?
How many days did Nasser attend classes in his senior year?
What treaty did Nasser object to?
What did Nasser not want to have in Egypt?
What was the trajectory of political unrest after the treaty?
From where did Nasser graduate?
What did Nasser do in his spare time?
What institution did Nasser live close to in 1933?
What did Nasser observe from moving around frequently as a youth?
What was Nasser's position in Egypt's society?
What kind of biographies did Nasser read?
What political theory fascinated Nasser?
What politician did Nasser admire?
What poet did Nasser read?
What novel influenced Nasser greatly?
Where did Nasser meet his anti-colonialist teacher?
What was Nasser's goal?
Where did Nasser apply in 1937?
Why was Nasser rejected from the Academy?
Where did Nasser attend law school?
How long did Nasser attend law school?
What's another term for influential intermediary?
Who sponsored Nasser's second application to the Military Academy?
What allies did Nasser meet at the Academy?
What were the students dissatisfied by in Egypt?
What Egyptian institution did Nasser and his friends want to end?
In what year was Nasser posted to Sudan?
Whas was Nasser's position at the military academy in 1943?
Who ordered the King to dismiss the Prime Minister?
What political group was Nasser associated with?
Who was Nasser's contact in the armed forces, giving Nasser dossiers?
Where was the Egyptian army sent in 1948?
In what unit did Nasser serve?
How badly was Nasser wounded?
What army surrounded Nasser's brigade?
What territory was given to Israel?
What Egyptian singer performed at the return of Nasser's brigade?
What book did Nasser start writing?
What group opposed the celebration of Nasser's brigade's return?
Who has pressured the government to cancel the reception?
What was Nasser increasingly convinced he should topple?
What did Nasser do after the war ended?
What group did Nasser try to allign himself with?
What was the reason Nasser rejected the Muslim Brotherhood?
How did Nasser view the terms of the armisitce with Israel?
What region did the Israelis occupy during the talks?
What treaty did the Wafd government abrogate?
Who did Nasser's group try to assassinate?
Who helped Nasser with the assassination attempt?
What was general Amer's political affiliation?
Who was wounded in the assassination attempt?
What type of government did the Free Officer's want to establish?
Who did Nasser choose to lead his coup?
What was teh fate of King Farouk after the coup?
What did Nasser wear during the coup?
What day did the revolution begin?
What group rioted at the textile factories?
How many people died in the textile factory riots?
What group supported the RCC?
How many posts did the Muslim Brotherhood get in Naguib's cabinet?
What was Nasser's position on executing the rioter's leaders?
What was Nasser's first title in the Liberation Rally?
What did Nasser and naguib ban in 1953?
What was Nasser alone in supporting?
What was Nasser negotiating in 1953?
What group went on strike as a result of the turmoil?
What group claimed to be leaving the political scene?
Who was sent to Switzerland?
What nation tried to mediate between Nasser and Naguib?
What event did Nasser exploit to his advantage?
To what group did many of the arrested dissenters belong?
Who avoided a death sentence in favor of 15 years in jail?
Where did Naguib end up after the turmoil?
Who assumed total control of Egypt?
What agreement ran contrary to Nasser's efforts?
What did Nasser feel his military needed to oppose the West?
From what country did Nasser buy arms?
How much money did Nasser spend on weapons?
How did the military relationship between Egypt and Israel change?
What political philosophy did Nasser adopt?
What global period was Positive Neutralism meant to deal with?
How did the Egyptian people react to Nasser after the conference?
How did the Egyptian press react to Nasser's accomplishments?
In what year did Egypt get a new constitution?
What was the political party arrangement of the new constitution?
What was the dominant political party? 
From what group did the National Union originate?
Who did Nasser want more involved in his new political order?
Who could approve or reject candidates for the National Assembly?
Who received new and special protections in the new constitution?
What group dissolved when the new constitution was enacted?
Among the original Free Officers, what did Nasser do to his opponents? 
What did Nasser's allies receive in the new arrangement?
With what two nations did Nasser's foreign policy clash?
What construction project suffered from foreign political retaliation against Nasser?
What communist country did Nasser and Egypt recognize?
France was angered by Nasser's support of the independence of what people?
The UK was chafed by Nasser's opposition to what agreement?
How did the Arab world react to news of the nationalization of the Suez Canal?
What nation's shipping was forbidden from using the Suez Canal?
What US ambassador spoke about the widespread support for Nasser's nationalization of the canal?
Where was Nasser believed to be a spokesman for the poor and oppressed?
What nations were outraged by the nationalization scheme?
What nation did Nasser judge impossible to become militarially involved?
What entity drew up an agreement that drastically reduced the threat of military action against Egypt?
What did the UK, France and Israel intend to do to Nasser?
In what year did battle over the Suez Canal commence?
What did the British and French air forces bomb?
What city did Nasser want to keep the French and British out of?
Who wanted the Egyptian armored units to fight the Israelis?
What did Nasser do to the canal?
How many Egyptian soldiers died during the fighting?
How many Egyptian soldiers did the Israeli army capture?
To whom did Nasser authorize distribution of small arms?
Who recommended Nasser surrender himself to the British?
What was the consequence to Nassir's admiration among the Arab world for Egypt's military failure?
What country was opposed to the invasion of the canal?
What leader did Nasser applaud?
What military force was brought in to calm the situation?
What did Nasser impose as a result of the conflict?
What was the policy meant to contain communism in the middle east?
When was the Eisenhower Doctrine adopted?
What leader did the US prop up to foil Nasser?
What country joined an alliance with Egypt, Syria and Saudi Arabia?
Although not communist, what about Nasser concerned pro-western groups?
What nations' assets did Nasser nationalize in 1957?
How much of the economy was not controlled by Nassir's government?
What entity did Nasser spearhead that was a boon for Egypt's economy?
What nation did Nasser join economic forces with?
What project did Nasser cooperate with the Soviet Union on?
What country wanted to join with Egypt?
What Syrian group did Nasser crack down on?
What was the Egyptian-Syrian alliance called?
What year was the UAR formed?
Who tried to assassinate Nasser?
How was the assassination supposed to have been carried out?
Who assumed power in Saudi Arabia after the failed assassination attempt?
What was King Faisal's position toward Nasser?
How many members were in the National Assembly?
How many members of the National Assembly were from Egypt?
What Soviet leader did Nasser spar with?
What did Khrushchev want Nasser to remove the ban on?
Who were the two National Assembly vice-presidents in Egypt?
What two men overthrew the Iraqi monarchy?
What anti-Nasser Iraqi was assassinated?
Where did US Marines land?
Why did Jordan and Lebanon seek outside aid?
How did Nasser see the prospects for Arab unity?
What Iraqi leader clashed with Nasser?
What did Quasm do to anger Nasser?
What did Nasser suppress as a result?
What old ally did Nasser turn against?
What Syrian social group opposed the UAR?
How was Syria's economy fairing under the arrangement?
How did Nasser respond to economic problems in Syria?
What did Nasser do to Sarraj to try and help the political situation?
What industry did Nassir nationalize in 1960?
What Syrian anti-Nasser group lauched a coup?
In what year did Syria leave the UAR?
Where did Nasser send Egyptian special forces?
What happened to Nasser after the breakup of the UAR?
How was Nasser's health after the breakup of the UAR?
What country experienced a coup in 1962?
What country agreed to help suppress the Yemeni rebellion?
Which side of the civil war did Nasser side with?
In what year did Egypt leave Yemen's civil war?
How did Nasser characterize Egypt's involvement in Yemen's civil war?
What river did the Israelis want to divert?
How did Syria and Jordan see Israel's plans?
What leader did Nasser bond with durin gthe negotiations?
What organization was formed as a result of the talks?
Who was set to lead the PLO?
In what year was the Non-Aligned Movment formed?
Who was named leader of the NAM in 1964?
What global conflict was the NAM made to counter?
What continent did Nasser help to attain political stability?
Who did Nasser give asylum to?
What type of programming was broadcast from Cairo?
What African group did Nasser help to form?
What year was the OAU formed?
What country did Nasser want to be the leader of the Arab world?
What two disparate ideologies was Nasser trying to unite?
What religious group did Nasser endeavor to reform?
What religious group was Nasser seeking to marginalize?
What military entity did Nasser create in 1961?
As opposed to personal loyalty, what basis should military promotions be given, according to Nasser?
Why did Nasser abandon the Presidential Council?
What leader was sidelined by the Presidential Council?
What was the Presidential Council meant to do?
From whom did Nasser want to seize control of Egypt's military?
Who blinked in the confrontation between Nasser and Amer?
How did Amer respond to Nasser's attempts to marginalize him?
How did Nasser deal with the stress of the UAR's collapse and Amer's intransigence?
From what chronic illness was Nasser suffering?
What political ideology did Nasser wholeheartedly back in 1961?
What was the document Nasser backed to push his socialist reforms?
What infrastructure project was part of the National Charter?
What year was the National Charter released?
What type of health care program was put forth in the National Charter?
What percentage of business did the Egyptian government own in 1962?
What was the new name for the National Union?
What was the expression of Nasser's reforms on the street?
What group was targeted with imprisonment?
How did two of Nasser's top aids respond to the new measures?
What was Nasser's political opposition like in the 1965 election?
The leader of what organization was imprisoned by Nasser?
What was Qutb's sentence?
What economic element did Nasser try to encourage with bank loans?
How did Egypt's economy do during the 1960s?
What country warned Nasser that Israel wanted to attack Syria?
What did Amer do without Nasser's approval?
What nations were trying to drag Egypt into a war, according to King Hussein?
What territory was King Hussein afraid Israel would obtain?
Who did Nasser think would prevent Israel from launching an offensive?
What thoroughfare did Amir want Nasser to block?
Who was Nassir's vice president?
How would Nassir deal with an Israeli invasion, if it happened?
What country joined Egypt and Syria against Israel?
What propaganda were Arab media broadcasting at the beginning of the war?
What day did Nasser announce Egypt's defeat?
What did Nasser do about his position as President?
Who rejected Nasser's offer to become the new president?
What did Nasser do after mass demonstrations?
Who did Nasser appoint as the new head of Egypt's armed forces?
How did Amer react to being confronted about planning a coup?
How did Nasser try to deal with the military following the coup attempt?
What loyalists did Nasser target?
Where was the Arab League summit held?
What leader assumed a more prominent position due to Nasser's difficulites?
What agreement ended the Yemeni civil war?
What nation granted military aid to Egypt?
What document called for Israel to abandon land it obtained during the war?
What new positions did Nasser give himself ?
When did students protest for political reforms?
What type of people were ousted from Nasser's cabinet?
What type of spying did Nasser want to concentrate on?
What organization was to undergo a big overhaul?
What trend was Nasser trying to cause?
How did Nasser's promises of increased freedoms turn out?
How did Nasser want to change the relationship between parliament and the executive?
What was the endeavor to reclaim territory from Israel called?
In what year did the War of Attrition begin?
Who led the Fatah movement?
In what battle had the Fatah movement distinguished itself?
To whom did Nasser give authority to deal with Israel?
What did Nasser do to respond to Israeli attacks?
When did the war start up again?
What groups did Nasser broker an agreement with?
Who would get to attack Israel from Lebanon?
What was the American plan to end conflict with Israel?
What did Nasser want to use the agreement to do?
Who pressured Nasser to accept the Rogers Plan?
How did Nasser equate peace with Israel?
What did Nasser move to the canal zone?
How many people attended Nasser's funeral?
At what landmark did the funeral procession begin?
Who was the only Arab leader not to attend Nasser's funeral?
What leader twice fainted during the funeral?
Who was the Soviet leader who attended Nasser's funeral?
What did Nasser completely eliminate from Egypt?
What did Nasser work to put into place in Egypt?
How were working conditions and employment at the end of Nasser's presidency?
What had drained resources from Nasser's social programs?
What reform, initiated by Nasser, caused the Egyptian economy to grow?
What are two infrastructure projects Nasser embarked on?
How was Egyptian culture under Nasser refered to?
What was the most prominent thing Nasser nationalized?
What type of political parties came about when Mubarek was president?
What was the first Nasserist political party?
What party came in third in the 2013 election?
What consolated party was formed from several Nasserist groups?
Who was most critical of Nasser's rule?
What event generated criticism of Nasser from Egypt's elite?
During whose presidency were Egyptians nostalgic for Nasser?
What ideals are associated with Nasser's time as prsident?
Whad did Nasser's enemies call him?
Who did Nasser imprison thousands of?
What did Tawfiq al-Hakim call Nasser?
What Egyptian party dismissed Nasser's popular appeal?
Who blamed the 1952 revolution's failings on Nasser?
To what did critics attribute Nasser's popular appeal?
What did Nasser's political style render unnecessary?
What was needed under Nasser, the absence of which guaranteed instability?
Who called Nasser an irrational and irresponsible leader?
Who was Nasser's closest Western advisor?
Who was Nasser's vice president?
What gambit did Nasser fail at in his bluster with Israel?
What did Nasser do over the years of his rule?
What did Mohieddin attribute Nassir's mistakes in 1967 to?
Who was Algeria's first president, a fervent Nasserist?
What Nasserist usurped the King of Yemen?
Which leader considered Nasser his hero?
What leader took power in Sudan and was inspired by Nasser?
What organization continued Nasser's philosophies?
What 1963 film compared Nasser to Saladin?
What 1996 Nasser-related film set a box office record?
What was Nasser 56 about?
What was the famous biopic about Nasser?
Who did Nasser marry in 1944?
Who introduced Nasser and his wife?
Where did Nasser and his wife live after they were married?
What job of Nasser's offered him a comparably comfortable lifestyle?
What was Nasser's principle vice?
How long was a typical workday for Nasser?
What illness was Nasser diagnosed with in 1960?
What year did Nasser die?
What did Egyptian state media claim was the reason for Nasser's absence after his second heart attack?
When is his feast day celebrated?
What is October 11?
When did Pope Francis added his optional memorial to the worldwide General Roman Calendar of saints' feast days?
Where did Pope Francis commemorate his death on 3 June?
Where did Pope Francis commemorate his death on 4 June?
When was he appointed Apostolic Delegate to Turkey and Greece?
He was appointed titular archbishop of where?
What ws he known by in the Turkish community?
When did he take that position?
Who did he introduce Bulgarian pilgrims to?
When did he hear that his mother was dying?
When did Pope Pius XI die?
When did his mother die?
Who sent him the letter informing him of his mother's death?
When was Pope Pius XII elected?
When was his sister Ancilla diagnosed with stomach cancer?
When did he send his last letter to his dying sister?
When did Ancilla die?
Where did he want to be buried?
When did Pope Pius XII die?
When was his last full day in Venice?
Why did Roncalli leave Venice?
He was elected pope after how many ballots?
What did John XXIII call for?
When was the decision made for this council?
Where was the decision made for this council?
Who did Cardinal Giovanni Battista Montini later become?
John XXIII was an advocate for what?
What did he write about human rights in?
His advocacy from human rights included whom?
John XXIII continued the gradual reform of what?
He published changes that resulted in what?
What did Pope Pius V establish in 1570?
Pope Benedict XVI authorized continued use of the Roman Missal in what year?
When was the Roman Rite created?
Where was the first session of the Second Vatican Council held?
When was the first session of the Second Vatican Council held?
What speech did he give?
Why were the people in Saint Peter's Square chanting and yelling?
John XXIII offered to mediate between who?
When was the Cuban Missile Crisis?
Who expressed best wishes for the pope's health?
John XXIII became the first pope to receive what title?
Who was the latest pope to hold the title of 'Man of the Year?'
John XXIII received what prize on 10 May 1963?
When did John XXIII receive the Balzan Prize?
Who officially awarded the pope the Balzan Prize?
Where did he receive the Balzan Prize?
Who was at the dying pope's bedside?
Who was the Papal Sacristan for John XXIII?
When did the pope bid farewell?
What did John XXIII die of?
What day did he die?
How old was John XXIII upon his death?
Who celebrated his Mass for him in the square below?
What day was he buried?
Who posthumously awarded his the Presidential Medal of Freedom?
When did President Johnson award him?
What is the Presidential Medal Freedom?
When was President Johnson's speech for John XXIII?
What was he also known as?
Who opened his cause for canonization?
When was Pope John XXIII considered "blessed?"
Who declared him "blessed?"
Who was the last pope before John XXIII to receive the title?
When was the 50th anniversary of his death?
Who celebrated his 50th anniversary?
Where were the people gathered at his tomb from?
When did Francis approve John XXIII for canonization?
On what date was John XXIII and Pope John Paul II declared saints?
Time has long been a major point of study in which fields?
Fields such as business, industry, sports, science, and performing arts incorporate some notion of what into their measuring systems?
What is an example of a simple definition of time?
What has been a prime motivation in astronomy and navigation?
Periodic events and periodic motion have served as standards for what?
What is the current international unit of time?
The electronic transition frequency of which element defines the second?
Time has personal value due to awareness of it's limited nature in what?
Artifacts from which era suggest that the moon was used to reckon time around 6,000 years ago?
Which calendars were among the first to appear?
How long were the original lunar calendars?
Where did some of the other early forms of calendars originate?
How many months were in a year in the original Mayan calendars?
Which timekeeping devices are the most accurate?
What method do atomic clocks use to measure seconds?
Which system bases its unit of time on the properties of caesium?
How long has the International System of Measurements based the second on caesium?
How many main viewpoints divide many philosophers?
The realist view states that time is part of the fundamental structure of what?
The realist view is sometimes referred to as what?
The opposing view states that time is an intellectual concept that allows people to what?
What are the earliest texts of Indian/Hindu philosophy?
How long ago are the earliest texts of Indian/Hindu philosophy dated?
How long does each cycle of birth and destruction of the universe last according to Ancient Hindu texts?
Which ancient Greek philosophers wrote essays on the concept of time?
Aristotle defined time as "number of movement in respect of the before and after" in which book?
In what did Immanuel Kant describe time as a priori intuition that allows humankind to understand sense experience?
What did Kant portray space and time to be?
Kant thought of time as a fundamental part of what?
What type of measurements are used to quantify the duration of events?
What type of measurements are used to quantify the distances between objects?
Minkowski spacetime combines the three dimensions of space with what?
In Minkowski spacetime, how can distances in space be measured?
What are two events in Minkowski spacetime separated by?
The invariant interval between events is independent of what?
The invariant interval that separates two events in Minkowski spacetime can either be what?
What Newtonian concept can be used in the formulation of an idea for the synchronization of clocks?
In which century did physicists encounter problems with the understanding of time?
The behavior of which two phenomena caused physicists to encounter problems with their understanding of time in the late 19th century?
Which famous scientist resolved these issues?
Historically, time has been closely related with what?
In which of Einstein's two theories do time and space merge into spacetime?
According to Einsteins two relativity theories, the concept of time depends on what?
A crew in a spaceship travelling nearly the speed of light will not notice the change in what?
How will the above mentioned spaceship appear to a stationary observer?
How does the crew on board the spaceship perceive the stationary observer?
The crew's perception of what is different from a stationary observer?
What the crew perceives as seconds might be seen as how long to a stationary observer?
What remains unchanged in both the cases of the spaceship crew and of the stationary observer?
Who showed, in his thought experiments, that people travelling at different speeds measured time differently?
In what case do these effects become much more noticeable?
How long do most subatomic particles exist for in a lab?
Einstein showed how what could be altered by high speed motion?
In which publication does Hawking say that any events that existed before the Big Bang would not be accessible to us?
Stephen Hawking makes a connection between time and what?
What does Hawking suggest started with the big bang?
Hawking also states that questions about what happened before the Big Bang are what?
Which philosopher has criticized Hawking's formulation?
How long has time travel been a topic in science fiction?
Traveling which direction in time has never been verified and presents many problems?
A time machine is known as any technological devise that is used for what purpose?
What is another solution to the problem of temporal paradoxes?
In several works of fiction, what ceases to exist in the past which causes paradoxes not to arise?
What paradox cannot be enacted because it is a fact that your grandfather was not killed before your parent was conceived?
What type of drugs can impair the judgement of time?
Stimulants lead humans to overestimate what?
What causes humans to underestimate time intervals?
The level of what is the reason stimulants and depressants change human perceptions of time?
Such chemicals do what to the firing of the brain's neurons?
What may the description of events include?
What never precedes cause because of causality?
A sequence of events used to describe a sequential path can be referred to as what?
In what ways can a sequence of events be presented?
What is another way of phrasing "time order"?
Uses of sequences of events include what?
What may a sequence of events be used to describe?
The use of what occurs in fields as diverse as machines, documentaries, or computer simulation?
What is a specific example of a sequence of events?
What is the main mission of the ECB?
What gives the ECB the right to authorise the issuance of euro banknotes?
How can a member state use euro coins?
Where is the mission for the European Central Bank found?
Where can the basic tasks of the European Central Bank be found?
Who was the first president of the ECB?
What was Duisenberg's previous business experience?
Who did the French government think was best candidate for President of the ECB?
Why did the French want a French bank president?
What did the French, German, Dutch and Belgian governments finally compromise on with regards to managing the ECB?
What happens when a lot of repo notes come due?
What happens whe not as many repo notes are coming due?
What happens when members increase their deposits?
What is a good way to boost the economy?
Where are contracts recorded?
How does a bank make sure that they can participate in auctions?
What kind of proof is acceptable for participation in auctions?
What should all assets offered up as collateral be?
What must be a part of a states Gross Domestic Product in order for them to be considered for particpation in auctions?
What governs the ECB?
How does the ECB mimic a corporation?
How much does the ECB have as capital?
Who holds the ECB's capital?
What determined the ECB's initial capital?
What language does the ECB generally use?
When in communication with other nationalities, what language is generally used?
What language is the ECB website run in?
How are the languages of official documents handled?
WHat is the biggest factor in the ECB maintaining price stability?
Who gets to interview and question prospective board members?
Why do EU institutions and national governments have to respect the independence of the ECB?
How is the ECB held accountable for it's actions?
When did the European debt Crisis begin?
What did the eurozone states that were thought to not be able to repay their debt face as a consequence?
Which country was the first to be at risk for soverign default?
Who brought Greece's financial crisis to the forefront?
What had Greece's previous government been hiding?
Which countries didn't want to go around the bail-out clause and have to shoulder the burden of backing the defaulters debts.
What do most see raising the debt celing as doing?
What could keep the crisis states from trying to stand on their own?
What term was coined when Greece left the eurozone?
As one of the financial powers, has Germany ever tried to force the crisis states into leaving the eurozone?
Which eurozone country has the biggest need for financial reform?
What would cause the private banking system to weaken?
Who purchases the debt of countries that cannot repay and are in danger of default?
What happens when the private banking system is weakened?
What is to be used to guarantee the debtors repayment, by the banks assuming their debt?
Is using the tax revenues and credit of the more stable banks to bail out the ones in danger of default an accepted practice?
Who retains ownership of the collateral until the debt is paid?
Since the ECB doesn't buy bonds outright, how are they used?
What is the manner in which bonds are used at refinancing facilities?
Who buys the bonds instead of using them in reverse transactions?
What debt did the ECB focus on abtaining?
What risk is assumed when the ECB purchases bonds from weaker states?
Why were italian bonds purchased by the ECB?
What was something used to minimize the impact of the soverign-debt crisis?
How does sterilisation help to keep the money flow even?
What can a state do with bad assets, rather than cashing them in directly?
How can weaker states improve the surface value of their assets?
What can be shuffeled around during a soverign debt crisis to mitigate the damage?
Where do bad and weak assets get moved in times of soverign debt crisis?
What is shuffling around bad or weak debts from a weaker eurozone member to the ECB known as?
What is monetisation usually viewed as?
If the central banks can come to an agreement with the eurozone member about the continued repayment of the debt, what happens to the bad or weak debt?
What is being caused by links between soverign debt and failing national banks?
Which country has been resistant to attempts to make the soverign debt assets more like the U.S. Treasury?
Who began to increase their coverage of weaker debts?
What would have to happen to make European sovereign debt assets more like what is found in the U.S. Treasury?
Why did propsals about making the European sovereign debt assets more like the US Treasury?
What did the ECB do to help stabilise the financial system during the subprime mortgage crisis?
Why did the ECB intervene during the subprime mortgage crisis?
Who decided, along with the ECB, to use Term auction to help stabilize the financial crisis and improve dollar liquidity?
Besides cooperating with other financial institutions, how does the ECB help to maintain stability?
When did the ECB and Federal Rserve decide to collaborate on Term auction facility?
What is a perk of the central bank?
What kinds of assets does the US Federal Reserve buy?
What kind of asset will the Federal Reserve purchase in mass quantities at a time of crisis?
What is the purpose of buying commercial paper in a time of financial crisis?
Which agencies have became the authority on assessing the risk of financial institutions?
When was Basel II adopted?
What said that agencies had to start using Moody's and S&P to assess financial institutions?
Since when have the Basel II recommendations been in effect?
Where is the European Central bank located?
What decided where the bank was to be located?
When did the bank move to it's new headquarters?
What previously stood where the bank is now?
When did construction of the new bank begin?
Which city is considered one of the oldest settlements in North America?
Around what year did settlement begin to occur in St. John's?
When was Cuper's Cove colony founded?
 What year was Bristol's Hope colony founded?
Who forbade the  english fisherman to setup seasonal camps in Newfoundland?
What was John Cabot's sons first name?
What was the occupation of John Cabot?
Where did the French, Spanish and Portuguese start to travel to fish yearly in 1540?
Where is the Bay of Pasaia located?
In what language did Sebastian Cabot write his map from 1545?
Who referred St. John's as St. "the principal prime and chief lot in all the whole country" ? 
When did censuses start being conducted in St. John's?
When did Irish men begin to operate inshore fishing boats in St. John's?
What grew during the summers in St. John's?
Who controlled most of Newfoundland's east coast by 1620?
Who briefly seized St. John's in 1665?
In what year did the dutch attack St. John for a second time?
How many men defended the attack from the Dutch in 1673?
Who destroyed Fort William in 1696?
How many Dutch warships were fended of by Christopher Martin in 1673?
Who flew the first non-stop transatlantic aircraft flight?
What aircraft did Alcock and Brown use in 1919 for their flight? 
Where in St. John's did Alcock and Brown depart from in June 1919?
Who duplicated Alcock and Brown flight in 2005?
What aircraft did Steve Fossett use for his flight in July 2005?
When did the Northern cod fishery collapse?
What led to an economic boom in St. John's?
For how long did the Northern cod fishery provide a stable economy for St. John's?
How long did unemployment rates and depopulation suffer in St. John's?
Near what body of water is St. John's located by?
How many Square miles is St. John's?
In what providence is Edmonton located?
What is the largest Atlantic Province city?
What is the foggiest Canadian city?
What is the average wind speed in miles per hour for St. John's?
What Canadian city has the mildest winter temperature?
What is the driest season on average in St. John's?
What is another word for freezing rain?
What are wharves in St. John's constructed out of?
In what year was the Great Fire?
What was the most affected area of The Great Fire of 1892?
What US city is St. John's often compared to?
What does the city council have restrictions on in downtown?
What have the restrictions on the height of buildings caused over the years?
What is the city lacking because of the height restrictions?
In what year where there 100,646 inhabitants in St. John's?
How many communities does the CMA include?
What was the population of the CMA in 2010?
What is Newfoundland and Labrador's largest city?
What has been growing in the recent years?
When did the unemployment rate fall to 5.6 per cent?
What was the city's unemployment rate in May 2011?
What is the city's per capita GDP?
Where is the Resource Centre for the Arts?
How many seats does the St. John's Arts and Culture theatre have?
Where in the city is the LSPU Hall?
Where is Rick Mercer from?
Where is Pippy Park located in the city?
About how many acres is Pippy Park?
How many golf courses does Pippy Park have?
What other trail besides walking trails does Pippy Park have?
Where is the Fluvarium located?
What part of the city is Bannerman Park located by?
What year was Bannerman Park opened?
who was the Governor of the Colony of Newfoundland in 1891?
Where does the Tely 10 Mile Road Race end?
Who donated land to create a Victorian-style park in 1891?
What city does Signal Hill overlook?
Where exactly is Cabot Tower located in St. John' ?
What year was Cabot Tower built?
In what year was Queen Victoria's Diamond Jubilee?
 Who recieved the first transatlantic wireless transmission?
What was Canada's  tenth province?
In what year did Newfoundland become a province?
What is the capital of Newfoundland and Labrador?
Where is the House of Assembly?
Who has been the leader of the NDP since 2006?
By how much did crime in St. John's increase in 2009?
What city had the seventh-highest metropolitan crime index in 2010?
How much did crime in the country drop in 2009?
How far is St. John's International Airport from the downtown core?
About how many passengers travelled through St. John's International Airport in 2011?
What is the airport code for St. John's International Airport?
What airport is approximately 10 minutes northwest of the downtown core?
Where is the eastern terminus of the Trans-Canada Highway?
Outer Ring Road is a another name for what?
What does the divided highway provide?
How many routes does the Metrobus have?
How many buses does the region have for public transit?
How many hospitals does the city have?
Who is responsible for public transit in the region?
How many private schools are in St. John's?
How many primary schools are in St. John's?
How many private schools are in the Francophone public school district?
What school offers the lowest tuition in Canada?
What is the tuition per academic year at Memorial University of Newfoundland?
Where does Rogers Cable has its provincial headquarters?
What is the name of CBC's television station in St. John's?
What channel in St. John's airs Out of the Fog?
Where does CBNT-DT broadcast from?
What year was the PlayStation 3 released?
What social gaming service was integrated into the PlayStation 3?
What was the thinner version of the PS3 called?
What year did the Super Slim model hit stores?
How many PlayStation 3 units had been purchased as of early 2016?
What shape was the Sixaxis prototype in?
What event did Sony choose for the PS3 unveiling?
What popular game was demoed in a video at the game shows?
What event did Sony take the PlayStation 3 to four months after E3?
What was one game Sony debuted on a modified PC so gamers could get a look?
Which region experience a setback that pushed back the release of the PlayStation 3?
What part of the system was Sony having trouble getting supplies for?
Which Japanese PS3 model got a 20%-plus price cut before hitting the market?
Where did Sony offer the 60 GB model with an open pricing scheme?
How many playable games did the PlayStation 3 by the time it arrived at the 2006 Tokyo Game Show?
Instead of November, for what month of the following year was the release rescheduled?
What country had to wait until June of 2007 for their PS3?
How big was the hard drive in the single South Korean version?
What did customers in Singapore pay for the 60 GB PS3?
On what date did the PlayStation 3 go on sale in Africa?
What was the model number of the slim version of the PlayStation 3?
What font was discontinued with the release of the slim model?
What would customers notice about the sound of the new, improved cooling system?
What did the boot screen on the game consoles read before Sony changed it to "PS3 PlayStation 3"?
What did Sony change about the PS3 games along with the packaging in 2009?
At what event did Sony tell everyone about the CECH-4000?
What size was the largest hard drive available on the Super Slim PS3?
How many versions of the CECH-4000 were made?
On what date was the 12 GB version of the Super Slim released in the UK?
What color was the PlayStation 3 that was included in the God of War: Ascension bundle in the States?
How many games could you buy to go with your PS3 when it launched in North America?
What game won GameSpot's Game of the Year title for 2006?
What company developed the game Ridge Racer 7?
What's the name of the sequel game to MotorStorm?
How many titles did the PS3 launch with in Europe?
Which Ratchet & Clank title debuted at E3 2007?
What year was Warhawk released for the PlayStation 3?
At what event were two new Final Fantasy games for PS3 first shown to the Japanese market?
What Gran Turismo game was shown in 2007 but not released until after 2007?
Which much anticipated third-party game with the name of a month of the year in it did Sony show at E3 2007?
What's Sony's budget line of PS3 games called in Japan?
If you live in Australia and want affordable PlayStation 3 games, what range would you shop for?
What words would you see in the United States or Canada on a PS3 game that would signify its lower price?
Which Call of Duty title does Sony include in their low-end price range?
In what year was Devil May Cry 4 added to the budget game offerings for PS3?
What company said it would bring 3D technology to the PS3?
Along with Wipeout HD, what game did the press view in 3D in early 2009?
What version of firmware update gave the PlayStation 3 its 3D capability? 
What word describes what happens to a game when is edited to add functions not originally programmed?
What was the PS3 console able to play after the system software was updated to 3.50?
What operating system does Fixstars Solutions offer for the PlayStation 3?
What company sold Yellow Dog Linux before Fixstars Solutions?
What company bought RapidMind in 2009?
How many PlayStation 3 consoles was Dr. Frank Mueller able to cluster together?
Who is buying PS3 clusters instead of supercomputers in order to save some money?
What type of microprocessor is in a PS3?
What does PPE stand for?
What function is the NVIDIA RSX responsible for in a PlayStation 3?
How many Synergistic Processing Elements are in a PS3's CPU?
How much XDR DRAM is on board a PS3?
What did Sony name their vibrating PS3 controller?
At what event at the Tokyo Game Show was the DualShock 3 first announced?
What did many people who handled the DualShock 3 say it was compared to the Sixaxis?
What was the first country to be able to buy the new DualShock 3 in stores?
On what date was the DualShock three released in Australia?
How is "XrossMediaBar" abbreviated?
How many options categories display in the standard PS3 XrossMediaBar?
One of Sony's streaming services is the PlayStation Vue; what's the other one called?
When you start up your PS3, what's the first section of the PS Network you see?
What menu would you use to set up a video chat?
What does the abbreviation "NDRM" represent?
How many different PS3s can one user access?
What identifier allows a player to activate a PlayStation 3?
PlayStation has safeguards in place to prevent illegal use of what type of movies or video?
What application lets PS3 users view and organize photographs?
What version of PS3 contained Photo Gallery?
After version 3.4, Picasa was integrated into Photo Gallery along with what social networking site?
Is Photo Gallery automatically or separately installed?
Photo Gallery includes the ability to sort by age, color, or what other unusual criteria for photo software?
In what month of 2009 did VidZone start free service to some countries?
What do you have to agree to with Netflix before you can use their service on PlayStation 3?
What year did the announcement come about Netflix becoming available on PS3 in the U.S.?
What type of disc was initially used to connect access to Netflix for PS3?
When were users able to discard the disc and access Netflix directly through their PS3s?
What functionality did the PlayStation 3 lose in version 3.21 of its firmware update?
What reason did Sony give for taking out OtherOS?
Was firmware update 3.21 optional or mandatory if users wanted to continue accessing the PS Network?
Which PS3 model never included OtherOS?
What legal action did some disgruntled OtherOS users take against Sony?
What part of the original model PS3s starting causing problems in March of 2010?
What essential network were some users unable to connect to because of the error?
What erroneous date did some users start seeing on their consoles?
What humorous nickname was given to the situation with the console system clock errors?
The name "ApocalyPS3" combines "PS3" with what other word?
By what date did Sony correct the issue with the system clock?
What were the broken models mistakenly classifying 2010 as?
What storage system for dates led to the system clock error?
What clock unrelated to the error in the PS3 had to be updated in some cases in order to fix the bug?
What PS3 game can integrate a PlayStation Portable to use as a rear-view mirror?
What kind of game is Formula One Championship Edition?
If users want to download original PlayStation games, where do they go online?
Games in plain PlayStation format can be played both on the PS3 console and what other device?
What's the name of the feature that would let you play a game on your PSP without having it with you?
In what city did Sony hold their 2006 PlayStation Business Briefing?
Does PlayStation Network use artificial or real currency for purchases?
Along with being free and providing constant connectivity, what other feature does PS Network offer users?
PlayStation Network is only available for PS3 and what other device?
What's the name of Sony's exclusive PlayStation Network subscription service?
How is PlayStation Plus often abbreviated?
Who was the President and CEO of SCEA in the year 2010?
On what date did the PlayStation Plus service officially launch?
Duration options for subscription to PS+ are either three months or what period of time?
Where can you buy downloadable content for the PSP and PS3?
What do you click on in the PS3 interface to get to the PlayStation Store?
What connection would you go through to go to the PS3 store from a PSP?
How many unique downloads had there been from the PlayStation Store by late 2009?
From a PC, what application can you use to visit the PlayStation Store?
What new feature for PS3 was released in September of 2009?
At what event did Sony announce What's New?
What did What's New replace?
What type of information is disseminated through What's New?
What's geographical area does What's New tailor information to for each user?
How many  different sections does What's New have?
What section of What's New would a user visit to find the games they've played lately?
Before What's New existed, what default screen would show when a user put a movie in their PS3?
What section of What's New can't show links to websites?
Other than the Video default screen for movies, what menu would the PS3 default to before What's New?
What does Sony call their social network?
What is the customizable representation of a user in PS Home called?
Home has free, won, and what third type of content?
Users employ the content to decorate club houses, their avatars, or what virtual dwelling space?
What type of games can users find participants for in Home?
What was the date Sony shut down the PS Network because of a security breach?
How many users did Sony say might have been affected by the intrusion?
What did Sony call the special offer they handed out to respond to the breach?
How many free days of PlayStation Plus were included in the offer?
How many free game downloads were included in the "Welcome Back" program?
What was PlayStation 3's toughest competitor in the video game market?
What did Wii offer that PS3 couldn't compete with?
In 2006, did most people prefer the Xbox 360 or PS3 versions of cross-platform games?
Until what year was Sony seeing a loss on each PlayStation 3 console it sold?
Which cost less in stores: PS3 or Wii?
Who was Sony's CEO at the start of 2008?
When did Hirai think the PS3 might start making the company some money?
What market analyst firm said Sony could make the PlayStation 3 profitable by August 2008?
How many PS3 did Hirai set a public goal to sell by the time the product was nine?
What other Sony gaming console was Hirai setting his sales goal to beat?
Along with a drop in the cost of hardware, PS3 has gotten cheaper to make because what chip was phased out?
What's the name of the microprocessor produced by the 65 nm process?
What specific component of Blu-Ray disc have also gotten less expensive to make?
As of Summer 2009, what was the cost to Sony to make a PS3?
The August 2009 cost is a result of what percentage decrease in production cost?
In what year did Gabe Newell call the PS3 "a total disaster"?
Who is Valve's VP of Marketing who says they want to hire programmers for a PS3 team?
What year did Newell show up at Sony's EC3 press conference to take back what he said about PS3?
What game did Valve develop for the PlayStation 3 console?
What's the name of Valve's software update system?
What group does Bobby Kotick think is being discouraged from working on the PS3?
What does "ROIC" stand for?
What company is Kotick the CEO of?
What newspaper reported Kotick's concerns and his threat to stop supporting the PlayStation platform?
What game development company completely disagreed with Kotick's statements in The Times interview?
What score did CNET give the PS3 out of ten?
What PlayStation 3 feature did Home Theater Magazine most like about PS3?
Have reviews praised the PS3's hardware of software more frequently?
What other reviewer agreed with Home Theater Magazine's assessment of the PS3's Blu-ray player?
What website said the PlayStation 3 "lives up to the hype"? 
With a day of its release, on what website did the PS3 Slim become the number-one bestseller?
For how many consecutive days did the PS3 Slim hold the number-one spot on Amazon.com?
What score did the PS3 Slim earn from PC World?
PC World's rave review of the PS3 Slim was a complete turnaround from their thoughts on what older model console?
Along with the PS Slim's value, quietness, and lower power usage, what superficial quality did PC World praise?
What aspect of the PS3 Slim was CNET unhappy was missing for PS2 games?
How many of five possible stars did CNET give the PS3 Slim?
How many of its own five stars did TechRadar award the PS3 Slim?
What area of the console did TechRadar feel was designed poorly compared to the original PS3?
What quality of the PS3 Super Slim was the website Spong excited about?
In addition to quieter fans and drive, what change from the other models did Spong praise?
What piece of the PS3 Super Slim's hardware did Spong say was too "fiddly"?
What did Spong said you have to do to the disc loader before the console will start reading the disc?
What website rated the Super Slim four out of five stars?
What adjective did CNET use to describe the PS3 Super Slim's design?
What component of the Super Slim did CNET call "the easiest yet"?
What hardware component did CNET have the biggest problem with, even comparing it to an old credit card reader?
Was the lowest-priced Super Slim more or less expensive than any of the PS3 Slim models?
When royal assent takes place in the UK, where does the sovereign make an appearance?
Alternatively, when UK Lord Commissioners take the sovereign's place in the ceremony, where does the ceremony take place?
Canadian governor generals can give their assent in person or by which other method?
With what is royal assent sometimes associated with?
Where is a royal assent ceremony held within the United Kingdom?
With what method is royal assent generally granted?
How is royal assent granted within Australia?
Royal assent is a process of approving a nation's legislative acts by whom?
Which three modern monarchies allow their ruler to withhold royal assent?
Since which century have modern political processes forgone royal assent?
What nations allow the withold of the royal assent?
Under what circumstances does a monarch typically use the royal assent?
Is usage of the royal assent frequent or rare in today's societies?
Modern-day sovereigns often acts on the advice of whom?
In the event that the monarch refuses to give royal assent, what can the monarch make use of?
Whose advice does a sovereign follow?
Who often maintains parliamentary support and obtains the passage of bills?
Is it probable, improbable, or impossible that a sovereign would withhold assent?
What is another name for "Curia Regis"?
Who was it that peculiarly called a full parliament without royal authorization in 1265?
As a result, the bishops, abbots, earls, and barons formed which body of parliament?
Which body did the shire and borough representatives form?
From what did parliament evolve?
What positions were contained within the House of Lords?
Which branch of parliament contains shire and borough representatives?
A bill could not become a law without whose assent?
Who is considered the enactor of laws?
Which monarch was responsible for dissolving parliament in 1629?
What is one action this monarch took that is typically left to the discretion of parliament?
After which event was it decided that parliament should meet on a regular basis?
Like Charles II had previously done, the last Stuart monarch withheld assent. Who was this monarch?
Which ruler removed parliament in 1629?
Under whose advice did Anne withold the royal assent?
What did motions attempt to accomplish that prompted Charles I to dissolve parliament in 1629?
When was the last time royal assent was enacted?
Who was the last monarch to use the royal assent in 1708?
During whose rule was power transferred more to parliament?
Who was the first ruler during this dynasty?
In attempting to take back control, George III and George IV opposed which church movement?
Which monarch relied on his ministers more than any of his predecessors?
What did George III and George IV both oppose?
What rule did George III and George IV believe a Catholic emancipation bill would violate?
Which monarch granted assent reluctantly under the advise of his ministers?
In Scotland, who is responsible for submitting a bill for royal assent?
Which three publications are used to signify royal assent?
Under which Scotland Act sections is the royal assent governed?
How many weeks pass before the monarch receives a bill from the Presiding Officer?
Which entities have the capability to refer a bill to the Supreme Court?
For what would a bill be submitted to the Supreme Court of Scotland?
What was the name of the method by which Wales passed legislation in the 2000's?
After a four-week period, who could refer a proposed measure to the Supreme Court?
What were "measures" in Wales?
During which years were measures used in order to pass legislation in Wales?
In Wales, who had the capability of submitting a bill to the Supreme Court?
The sovereign grants assent by which order?
Who advises the sovereign in this decision?
Which recent petition for reforms to the constitution led to assent being refused?
Who advises a bill to be granted or refused?
When was an Order in Counil passed that laid out new rules for consideration of petitions against the royal assent?
In what year did the Lord Chancellor refuse to present a law  concerning constituational reform for assent?
What was the subject of the bill that the Lord Chancellor refused to present for royal assent in 2007?
Under ancient custom, an Act of Tynwald didn't go into effect until decreed at which location?
Promulgation of an Act of Tynwald originally consisted of reading it in English and which other language?
Nowadays, only the short title and what else are read?
How much of the proposed act must be currently read aloud on St John's Day?
On what day does St John's Day occur?
Where is the open-air sitting of Tynwald usually held?
Since 1993, which body has had power to enact measures?
This body makes provisions in respect to matters concerning whom?
Up until 1994, royal assent was given by whom?
Which position now has the power to grant royal assent?
Before what year was royal assent approved by Order in Council?
Who currently holds the power to grant royal assent to measures?
During which years did the Synod have power to enact measures?
Which year was royal assent last withheld in the UK?
The United States Declaration of Independence mentions which British monarch?
What did the American colonies accuse the monarch of?
In what year was royal assent last witheld in the UK?
Who continued to advise governors-general of granting of assent, even after their colonies had responsible government?
To whom did the British government occasionally still advice on the royal assent, although they had their own responsible governments?
The bill from the Australian House of Representatives was mistakenly sent and assented to by whom in 1976?
Why did this occur?
What did the Governor-General do with the first assent?
This same procedure was more recently done to fix a similar error in which year?
What was the reason a bill was accidentally assented in 1976?
After an accidental assention of a bill with same name in 1976, when did a similar mistaken assention occur in Australia?
What protocol was not followed in 1976 when a bill was mistakenly assented?
How was the case of two bills mistakenly assented corrected both in 1796 and 2001?
What term refers to the legislature of the Isle of man?
In what year was lordship of the Isle of Man purchased?
What does the term the Revestment refer to?
Previous to the Order in Council method, how was royal assent passed previously within the Isle of Man?
How is royal assent currently granted in the Isle of Man?
In Commonwealth realms, who is the representative of the sovereign?
Who grants royal assent in Canada?
Who grants the royal assent in Commonwealth nations other than the UK?
What two documents declared all Commonwealth realms as sovereign kingdoms?
Who exercised the power to withold royal assent in Alberta in 1937?
What the did Accurate News and Information Bill hope to accomplish?
Which Houses in the UK must approve a bill before it is assented?
Which Parliamentary Acts allow a bill to be presented for assent even after the House of Lords has refused it?
Who can be authorized to grant assent by letters patent?
Why did Henry VIII wish to execute his fifth wife?
What was Henry VIII trying to avoid by creating a new procedure for granting assent?
How many times in the 16th century was assent granted by Commissioners?
Who was the last monarch to grant assent personally?
How many lords are usually present during assent by Commissioner?
What do the Lords Commissioners wear to a ceremony of assent?
Which commissioner reads the formal closing statement to the assention ceremony?
Which position reads the commisssion aloud during tthe ceremony?
During which decade was assention by commission discontinued?
When does assention by commission occur today?
In whatear did several members refuse to attend the assention ceremony after a heated debate?
What was passed in reference to the discord in 1960 and 1965 during assention cremonies?
What is unique about the method used for assention allowed by the Royal Assent Act 1967?
How is assent granted under the Royal Assent Act 1967?
Which document formats the letters patent?
In which year were minor amendments made to the Crown Office Order?
When assent is granted in person, when is it formally considered final?
An assent is considered granted when applying the Royal Assent Act 1967 when both presiding officers have done what?
When is assent effective if the presiding officers inform their houses at different times?
Whose responsibility is it to assure that assent has been granted?
What is omitted when an act is published?
Who writes the formal Norman French formula on passed acts?
In what year did the New Zealand governor-general last personally grant the royal assent in parliament?
Which country has not used the formal assention ceremony since the early 20th century?
Who are the leaders of each house given the responsibility of informing their group of the governor-generals actions?
From where is the sovereign typically forbidden?
Whose job is it to release parliament after the ceremony?
Who reads the formal statement after the list of bills has been finished?
Which position nods their head to signify assention?
How much time does a Jordinian leader have to sign or veto legislation?
What majority is required to override a veto from the soverign?
What happens if the soverign doesn't sign the bill within the six-month time frame?
What text is written and sent to the Senate if the House approves of a law?
What text is written and sent back to the government if a bill is rejected?
Where are laws published after receiving assent?
Where is the original law text stored?
What happens in the rare case the government doesn't approve of a law that has passed both houses?
Which article in the Spanish constitution gives the monarch the right to ask for a referendum?
Which article specifies the number of days available to the monarch to provide a signature on an assended bill?
In the 1978 Spanish constitution, which title describes how bills are passed?
What chapter in the Spanish constitution describes how bills are to be passed?
If the Spanish monarch is deemed incapable of granting assent, who is the power transferred to?
Could a Spanish ruler follow the same action of events as King Baudouin did in Belgium?
What is an arithmetical structure comprising of a set of elements including an operation that joins any two elements to form a third element?
What is the name used to describe the four conditions of closure, associativity, identity and invertibility?
What permits elements with different mathematical starting points to be taken care of in a flexible manner while holding their key basic aspects?
When is it preferable to consider two group elements to be the same?
What should not be considered when asking if a reflection has been performed?
What number sets are used to show how subgroups can be seen as translations of the larger group?
What groups can be combined to describe every group?
What group can be the quotient of the free group over the generators of the group?
What is a finite composition of two symmetries or their inverses?
What aids in predicting changes of physical traits?
What stage of a physical transformation can group theory be used to make prediction?
What temperature causes the change of ferroelectric materials?
What term describes the vibrational lattice mode that turns to 0 frequency at the change?
What groups combine matrices with matrix multiplication?
What includes all invertible n-by-n matrices with real entries?
What term describes subgroups of the general linear group?
What matrix group portrays all possible rotations in n dimensions?
Rotation matrix groups are utilized in computer graphics with what concept?
What does a finite group include?
What is the number of elements in a group named?
What type of class has a finite group that can be expressed as a subgroup of a symmetric group?
What can be described as the group of symmetries of an equilateral triangle?
How long ago did people start living in the area?
What agricultural job did people settling in the area perform?
What vegetation helped populations expand?
What was an imported food that provided most of the carbohydrates?
What important protein helped with expansion of the inhabitants?
When did the slave trade hit the CAR region?
What is one area where captive slaves were sent?
Which people were major slave traders in the 19th century?
Who did the Bobangi sell slave to?
What river saw the establishment of a new Kingdom?
When was Equatorial Africa established?
Where was Equatorial African ran from?
What plant was mandated to be grown by the French?
What important infrastructure was built in the 1920s.
What religion was spread through CAR?
What agreement called for the stop of Hostilities?
What did the Birao Peace Agreement call for?
What major group did not sign the peace agreement immediately?
When did the CPJP finally sign the peace agreement?
When was the Birao Peace Agreement signed?
What national part is located in the South West?
What large animals reside in the national park?
Which Primate can be found in the national park?
What National Park can be found in the North?
What has threatened the wildlife in this park?
Due to fighting, what threatened people in the NorthWest?
Who assisted in saving the people from starvation?
Who headed the UN effort to rebuild CAR?
When did CAR request assistance directly to prevent war?
Who assisted CAR in avoiding war?
What is the per capita income in CAR?
How is the per capita income compared to the world?
What gemstone comes from the CAR?
Which item that poachers kill elephants for can be obtained in CAR?
What hinders export?
What type of agriculture is popular in the CAR?
The economy grows at what rate in the last few years?
How many tonnes of Cassave is produced per year?
What product is produced that is exported?
Which insect hinders livestock development?
How are the human rights in the CAR?
What concerns are there regarding to human rights?
What punishment is a human rights violation per the US state Dept?
How is the prison quality in the CAR?
What right in a court is denied and considered a human right violation?
What two factors cause asthma?
What are two enviromental factors?
What medications can also trigger asthma?
What patterns are used to diagnose asthma?
How is asthma classified?
Is there a cure for asthma?
How can symptoms be prevented?
What is taken by mouth to treat rapidly worsening symptoms?
What happens in very severe cases of asthma?
What are the characteristics of asthma?
When are symptoms of asthma normally worse?
What is produced in the lungs by coughing?
Is asthma worst during the day or at night time?
Does everyone have horrible episodes of asthma?
What are some of the enviromental factors that have been linked to asthma?
What two things are associated with a greater risk of asthma-like symptoms?
What can cause symptoms and asthma serverity to change?
Exposure to what compounds can also trigger asthma?
What hypothesis tries to explain the increased amount of asthma world wide?
How does the hygiene hypothesis explain the increase in asthma?
What has caused the reduced exposure in childhood?
What could prevent asthma?
What else is a risk factor for asthma?
If one identical twin has asthma, what are the odds of the other twin having asthma?
How many genes were associated with asthma by the end of 2005?
How many genes were associated with asthma in 2006?
What else are these genes closely related to?
What is asthma the result of?
What two airways are most effected by asthma?
In what ways do airways change?
What other cell types are involced with the changing of airways?
What other components of the immune systems are included?
Is there a universal definition of astham?
What main components play a role in asthma?
What is the inflamation a result of?
What does hyper-responsiveness of the airways cause?
What are two ways to reverse an asthma attack?
Is there a test to determine asthma in an individual?
What is diagnosis based on typically?
When should you suspect asthma?
What is used to confirm the diagnosis of asthma?
What age is too young to use spirometry to determine asthma?
What is recommended to help in the diagnosis of asthma?
Why is spirometry so commonly used to diagnose asthma?
What helps support the evidence of asthma?
What substance can skew the results of an asthma test?
What test can tell the difference between asthma and COPD?
How is asthma clinically classified?
How else is asthma classified?
When asthma is caused by allergens that is called what? 
What  is asthma usually classified based on?
What is a important goal of asthma research?
What kind of condition is asthma?
What are examples of chronic obstructive pulmonary disease?
Is the airway obstuction reversable in asthma?
What part of the airway does emphysema affect?
What part of the airway does asthma affect?
Exercise-induced bronchoconstriction is common in what profession?
What professions has the highest rate of Exercise-induced bronchoconstriction?
What conditions are more likely to cause Exercise-induced bronchoconstriction?
What does not appear to help athletic performance that do not have asthma?
What is a condition that can cause symptoms of astham in children?
What are some other causes of airway obstruction?
What other conditions can cause wheezing?
In adults, what conditions can cause the symptoms of asthma?
What is a complication of chronic asthma?
If you are 65 years old and have an obstructive airway disesase, you are more likely to have what other conditions?
How is COPD differentiated?
Why is this not determined in a patient with COPD?
What are the principles of management for asthma and COPD?
What is weak that is not helping prevent the development of asthma?
What preventative measures always work to prevent asthma?
What has been determined about dietry restrictions during pregnancy and when breast feeding?
Why are smoking bans in place?
Who recoomends immunizations?
What is a key component of control and preventing asthma attacks?
What are some of the more common triggers?
What can reduce the effectiveness of medications?
What did law that limit smoking accomplish? 
What type of exercise can provide small improvements?
What type of person would use bronchial thermoplasty as an option?
What does bronchial thermoplasty consist of?
What effect does bronchial thermoplasty have?
What treatment helps improve those with allergic rhinitis and asthma?
What is the prognosis for asthma? 
What has caused the mortality rate to decrease?
Worldwide, how many people suffer from asthma?
How many cases that are diagnosed in childhood make it past 10 years with asthma?
When was the first paper written about asthma?
What was first used as a cure for asthma?
In 1880 what was used intraveniously for asthma?
When did inhaled corticosteroids and short acting beta agonist start being used? 
Did LaserDisks offer higher or lower quality sound and picture than VHS?
Why didn't LaserDisk gain popularity in North America?
With whom was LaserDisk a popular choice for it's picture and sound quality?
In what city was LaserDisk used as a popular rental medium in the 1990s?
Where was LaserDisc first available?
How many years after VHS was LaserDisk released?
Under what name was LaserDisc originally marketed?
How did the first viewers refer to the media?
Who purchased the majority stake and re-marketed the product in 1980?
Was Laserdisk officially or unofficially reffered to as "Laser Videodisc"?
Did MCA produce the disc or the players after being bought out?
Who were the scientists that worked on the early research for Laserdiscs?
What company did the early Laserdisc researchers later found?
What product replaced LaserDisc in North America by the early 2000s?
Who chose LaserFisc for their Domesday Project in the mid-1980s?
What was the BBC Domesday Project?
Which country still exported players to North America until 2001?
How large was a standard LaserDisc?
What numbers are used in Binary information coding?
Were the ealiest LaserDiscs in 1978 analog or digitally formatted?
What was the length capacity of the CAA55 format?
Why was Back to the Future released with analog sound?
What was the maximum length of the CAA60 format?
How many works were released to the public with the CAA70 format?
What competition caused LaserDisc sales to decline?
Did all AV receivers carry the demodulator circuits necessary for LaserDiscs, or only high-end models?
What did the Onkyo outboard demodulator covert the RF AC-2 signal to?
Was sound quality from disc to disc and between players consistent or varied?
Was analog or digital formatting more popular with enthusiasts?
What result did adding CX Noise Reduction have on analog discs?
Which company added digital sound option when re-releasing movies?
Which channel would not work in conjunction with AC-3 audio?
What audio playback options were available if an AC-3 output was not present?
What happens to the right channel in a player that doesn't recognize AC-3?
Are integrated AC-3 demodulators common in LaserDisc players or a rare find?
How many 5.1 surround sound options exist in LaserDiscs?
What type of decoder logic is common in 1990s A/V receivers?
Which has a longer playing time: PAL LaserDiscs or NTSC discs?
How many audio tracks do PAL LaserDiscs have?
Which two audio options are available on PAL LaserDiscs?
What was the name of the first solid-state laser consumer LaserDisc player?
Besides a solid-state laser, what else was unique about the LD-700?
When did Pioneer release the LD-700?
Which company continued to use gas-lasers in industrial models of LD players although they were no longer used in consumer models?
Which three names did MCA use for LaserDisc technology during its development?
To what did MCA change the name to in 1969?
When did MCA remove the hyphen from the name Disco-Vision?
Which company owned the rights to the world's largest collection of films during the 1970s?
Consumer sales of MCA films began in 1978 with what movie?
What did VLP stand for in English-speaking countries?
What was the first consumer VLP player?
Which group officially chose the name "Laservision"?
The Laservision Association was comprised of which companies?
Which company joined a 50/50 partnership with MCA in 1977?
In what year was the first Universal-Pioneer player released?
What was the name of the first Universal-Pioneer player?
Which singer did an ad for the LD-700 player in 1984?
What other companies did MCA manufacture discs for?
What quirk is present in MCA's release of Howard the Duck?
What is unique about the LaserDisc release of E.T.?
Which film is only available with its original score in LD format , even today?
How many horizontal TVL lines did LaserDisc have in comparison to VHS's 240?
Which medium was chapter based like DVD format, Laserdisc or VHS?
Which medium allowed for multiple audio tracks, Laserdisc or VHS?
Were Laserdiscs initially cheaper or more costly to produce than their VHS counterparts?
How many parts does a VHS tape have that must be manufactured?
How much did LaserDiscs cost to produce by the end of the 1980s?
How much did VHS cost to produce by the 1990s?
Were Laserdiscs or VHS more durable in the long run?
Why is physical contact with a VHS tape less desirable than an optical reading?
Where do VHS tapes store their information?
How is data stored on DVDs?
What device seperated the black and white and color signals in LaserDiscs?
In what areas are comb filters most likely to lose detail?
Are comb filters exact, or is some data smudged?
Do LaserDiscs or DVD use analog video?
Are DVDs partially or entirely digital?
What is contrast banding?
What step of the DVD production process causes contrast banding?
How does LaserDisc operation vary from DVD?
What are "User Protected Options" on DVDs?
Where are User Protected Options commonly found on DVDs?
Which format, LaserDisc or DVD, gives the user the most control over playback?
What does the repair+skip feature on newer DVD players do?
Which format, DVD or Laserdisc, can become unreadable with damage?
Will the same size scratch cause more problems for a DVD or LaserDisc?
Which format is considered to look most realistic, LaserDisc or DVD?
Which format, LaserDisc or DVD, is said to appear sharper and clearer to most viewers?
What features do LaserDiscs lack in, causing DVDs to appear sharper and clearer?
What was the vertical blanking interval used for in LaserDiscs, preventing Macrovision signal to be implemented?
Why wasn't there a need to redesign the LaserDisc format to prevent piracy?
What protection could not be applied to LaserDiscs, making them prone to piracy?
LaserDisc was the first format to provide what type of releases to consumers?
What was the first "Special Edition" film to be released to home video?
What bonus features were available on the first home video "Special Edition"?
What feature, unique to LaserDisc, made bonus content possible?
What was required of a LaserDisc to continue playback after 60 minutes?
Which LaserDisc player solves the disc switching dilemma?
What must be reduced in order to allow LaserDisc playback time to increase?
Which format allows for more playback tie per side, CLV or CAV?
What video problems on a LaserDisc can be caused by dust or scratches?
Which format used in DVDs has built-in error correction?
What type of encoding, analog or digital, causes LaserDiscs to be succeptable to damages?
When does "crosstalk" occur?
What problem can be caused by a player becoming out of alignment?
How does "crosstalk" appear to the viewer?
In which format does crosstalk generally not occur?
Why does the CAV format prevent crosstalk?
What happens during "laser lock"?
Is LaserDisc quality consistent or inconsistent between player brands? 
What is LaserDisc playback quality dependent on?
How cheaply could an older LaserDisc player be purchased in the 1990s?
What range of prices were high-end LaserDisc players in the 1990s?
What substandard product was used in LD manufacturing that caused "laser rot"?
What was the internal name for "laser rot" within LD processing plants?
What problems could occur with laser rot?
Why didn't LaserDiscs become popular in North America?
By 1990, how many American homes were estimated to use LD?
Why were LaserDiscs more popular in Japan?
Which format was more popular in high humidity areas such as Singapore?
How much did a LD cost in Hong Kong in the 1990s?
Broadcast in Hong Kong used which standard formatting?
In contrast to broadcast, which format did consumers use in Hong Kong?
By what year had DVD taken over the LaserDisc market?
Which collector group highly values LaserDisc for their rareness?
Until the end of what year were movies released in VHS, LD, and DVD in Japan?
What country was the only to receive a LD release of Disney's Song of the South?
In what decade did Philips produce a "professional" LD model for computer?
In what year were LD jukeboxes created?
Who created LD Jukeboxes in 1985?
Which musical artists were featured on LD Jukeboxes in 1985?
How many EditDroid systems were ever built?
Were EditDroid discs single or multi-sided?
Which production company engineered the EditDroid machines in the 1980s?
In what year did the Doomsday project occur?
Which equipment was used for the Doomsday Project?
What does LV-ROM stand for?
The Doomsday Project discs used which formatting?
Which of Apple's programming languages allowed users to ceatively manipulate LaserDiscs?
What did LaserStacks software enable Mac users to do?
Where were "stacks" created with the LaserStack software used?
Which commercial company was LaserStack's most successful distributor?
A combination computer/LD player was comissioned by what government entity?
How much did Matrox's computer/LD combo weigh?
How could Matrox's computer unconventionally be controlled?
What quality made LDs a consideration for videogames in the 1980s and 1990s?
What was the first game to use LaserDiscs?
In what year was Sega's AStron Belt released?
With what operating ratio would MUSE Discs operate?
What benefits did the MUSE narrow wavelength red laser have?
In addition to scratches and rot, what other common LaserDisc issue was to be eliminated by MUSE discs?
How many years did it take Blu-ray and HD-DVD players to duplicate MUSE technology?
What was the price for early HDTVs?
Did MUSE have a large or small target market, even in Japan?
What were some movies that were released on MUSE LaserDiscs?
What were "Squeeze LDs"?
With what aspect ratio did Squeeze LDs operate?
Why did Squeeze LDs have a very limited market?
Could the 16:9 aspect ratio be easily resized by a normal LD player, or was the image significantly distorted?
What percent vertical resolution increase did Squeeze LDs feature over regular widescreen LDs?
Which movie was released twice on Squeeze LD?
What improvement was added to Terminator 2's second Squeeze LD release?
What Warner Brothers films were available in 16:9 aspect ratio Squeeze LDs?
What films were available for Japanese market Squeeze LDs?
What does the acronym RLV stand for?
Which company originally developed and marketed the RLV?
In what year did ODC develop the Recordable LaserVision Disc?
What is the difference in appearance between an RLV disc and a regular LD?
Why do RLV discs have a blue or purple reflective color?
For what purpose were RLVs popular?
What color were regular LaserDiscs, in contrast to RLVs blueish purple hues?
In contrast to large LD disks, what is the size of a standard CD?
What were CD size "single"-style discs called that were compatible with LaserDisc players?
How much video content could be stored on a CD-V disk?
What were CD-V's video capacities usually used for?
Which artist released a music video and three audio tracks on CD-V in 1989?
What were VSDs lacking that CD-Vs included?
In what areas of the world were VSDs popular?
Were VSDs or CD-Vs all digital and also playable on DVD players?
What kind of symmetry do annelids have?
What do annelids use to move?
Which subtype of annelids includes most marine worms?
Which subtype of annelids includes earthworms?
Since 1997, what are leeches seen as a subgroup of?
How do annelids normally reproduce?
What can asexual reproduction techniques help annelids do?
What larvae live like plankton?
What annelids are hermaphrodites?
What annelids make a cocoon in a ring around themselves?
How do earthworms help the soil they live in?
How much of near-shore marine annelids are burrowing?
How do burrowing marine annelids help ocean ecosystems?
What annelids' jaws are being studied by engineers?
Why are some leeches endangered?
How are the layers arranged in annelids' cuticles?
What are annelids' cuticles made out of?
What do non-cuticle annelids use to protect their skin?
What layer is under the epidermis?
What does 'coelom' mean?
What are cirri?
What kind of parapodia do burrowing annelids often have?
What type of annelids have limb-like parapodia?
What are parapodia?
What are ganglia?
What is an annelid's brain in a ring around?
What is a pharynx?
Where are clitellates' brains?
Where are polychaetes' brains?
What species group are annelids' muscle control similar to?
What are giant axons?
How do annelids withdraw from danger?
What kind of things can annelids' sensors detect?
What does 'nuchal' mean?
What type of annelids have nuchal organs?
What are the nuchal organs thought to do?
What term means 'little eyes'?
What are coelomata?
What are annelids' body cavities separated from other segments by?
What are annelids' body cavities separated from each other by?
What is the mesothelium made of?
What type of annelids are very different from others?
What type of tissue takes up most of the body of a leech?
How many coelomata do leeches have?
What lines the coelomata of leeches?
What do leeches use to move?
What does 'everted' mean?
What part of a polychaete can be everted?
What types of annelids have evolved jaws?
What do annelids use jaws for?
What do some annelids have 'crowns' of?
How many sexes of annelids were there originally?
What releases sperm from annelids?
What do annelid eggs become?
What do annelids' larvae live like?
What does the trochophore become when annelids mature?
What do some non-single-sex polychaetes do?
What are most polychaetes lacking for reproduction?
How do some annelids get a one-time chance at a better spawning spot?
What annelid group includes leeches and earthworms?
What type of sex are most earthworms?
Where are leeches' eggs fertilized?
Where do leeches move their eggs to?
What type of annelids hatch as miniature adults?
Who published a book about worms in 1881?
What was the first scientific study of how earthworms help soil?
Where do earthworms prefer to live on the surface?
How does burrowers' loosening help the soil?
What is the largest bird that eats earthworms?
Where were native earthworms killed by glaciers?
Where did most of the current earthworms in glacial areas come from?
What type of forests can be hurt by invasive worms?
What type of annelid tunnels through coral?
What annelid's rear end do Samoans like to eat?
What type of bait do experienced anglers prefer?
What do some polychaetes eat that has been causing problems?
What type of worm have there been proposals to farm?
When did leeches begin being used for blood-letting?
Where did leeches begin being used for blood-letting?
When did Rome begin using leeches?
When did India begin using leeches?
Which organizations list Hirudo medicinalis as endangered?
When did Cloudina exist?
What do some people think Cloudina should be called instead of an annelid?
How old were the fossils of Canadia and Burgessochaeta found in Canada?
What era was underway 505 million years ago?
Where was Myoscolex found?
When did the Tertiary period begin?
What era did oligochaetes evolve in?
What type of annelid fossils have been found from the mid Ordovician period?
When were the earliest annelid fossils found?
What two groups are annelids traditionally divided among?
What subtype of clitellates contains earthworms?
What subtype of clitellates contains leeches?
How many polychaete families are there?
When did Greg Rouse begin trying to categorize polychaetes?
Who compared annelid genes in 2007?
How many annelid genes did Torsten Struck first compare?
How many annelid genes did Torsten Struck compare for a cross-check?
What subtypes of polychaetes were useless classifications, according to the 2007 study?
What did Rouse decide leeches were a subgroup of?
How many previously-separate phyla did the 2007 study reclassify?
What did the 2007 study decide was the parent group for annelids?
What offshoots of polychaetes are unsegmented?
What offshoots of polychaetes are only segmented in the rear?
What nervous system structure is less univeral among annelids than was thought before 2007?
Which Lophotrochozoa phyla have similar egg development?
How do the cells of Lophotrochozoa eggs arrange themselves?
What is the Lophotrochozoa spiral egg-cell pattern sometimes called?
What does it mean to say that God is omnipotent?
What is the feeling of God being everywhere?
What is the extent of God's knowledge?
What is infinite knowledge classified as?
What is the benevolence of God called?
Does God have a gender?
What type of human is God portrayed as in some religions?
What is a God in monotheism?
In what belief is God the creator and sustainer of the universe?
What does deism believe God's role in the universe is?
Which belief is that God is the universe?
Which belief system definitively believes in no Higher Power or Supreme Being?
Which belief system belives in some form of higher powwer, or something, but not organized religion?
What is God in theism?
What is monotheism?
What is pantheism?
What is atheism?
What is God in deism?
What differentiates God from gods?
What belief has many gods?
What does it mean to read the word LORD in all capitals in the Bible?
What is the tetragrammaton gor God?
No matter which religion, what is usually used as the name for the Supreme Being?
What form of the word God refers to polytheistic gods?
What is the name of God in Judaism?
What does the all caps word LORD used in some bibles represent?
What do Muslims believe that Trinitism too closely resembles?
Which belief is expected to never try and visualize God?
What is the most basic belief of the Muslim religion?
What religious text helps reinforce to Muslims that Christianity is more like polytheism?
What is the meaning behind the Muslim concept of tawhid?
What religion believes that all theist worship the same god?
What is the trinity in Christianity?
What do monotheists believe?
What do Muslims think of Christianity?
What is the basis behind Catholic theology?
What ways can God interact with the universe?
Why is it sometimes hard to think of God as benevolent?
What is the suffix theism used for?
What are examples of different types of theism?
What three points do most theists agree on?
What religion believes that God is infinitely simple and not subject to time?
What does theism mean in general?
What is a deistic view of God?
How does a deistic God feel about us?
What is Pandeism?
What does a deistic God not do?
What type of religion believes that God is transcendent?
What is deism?
In deism is God represented in human form?
In deism, does God answer prayers?
What do some non-theists view God as?
Although a proclaimed atheist, who was it that said "the word 'God' is to me a sound conveying no clear or distinct affirmation"?
What is NOMA?
In NOMA, what should be used to answer questions about the physical world?
What should be used to answer ultimate questions on morality and meaning?
Name the nineteenth century English atheist?
What does Stephen Jay Gould call philosophy that deals in the supernatural?
What category does NOMA fall under?
What did Sagan argue was the only was to prove the existence of God?
What is Richard Dawkins belief about the existence of God?
What kind of difference does Dawkins believe would come from the existence of God?
Who argued that the existence of God is an empirical question?
Who stated that God was difficult both to prove or disprove?
What does Stephen Hawking and Leonard Mlodinow pose as a better question that "Is there a God"?
Who wrote The Grand Design?
What is Michael Nikoletseas profession?
How do Hawking and Mlodinow believe the question of God can be answered?
What is the name of Stephen Hawking's book?
Who was Hawking's co-author?
Who says the that whether there is or isn't a God are just like questions in natural science?
Why does Stewart Guthrie believe that people project their human features onto non human things?
What is one of the most common traits of religion according to Boyer?
What did Frued believe about the belief in God?
How does Pascal Boyer believe that gods and other supernatural beings behave?
Who argues that there are lots of supernatural things in the world?
How do supernatural entities act?
Which religion does Boyer equate with a modern soap opera?
Who believed that gods are just projections of a person's father?
How did St. Anselm define the existence of God?
Who said that God is "a substance consisting of infinite attributes"?
What did Baruch Spinoza use as proof for the existence of God?
What did Spinoza believe the world was made of?
Who defined god as "that than which nothing greater can be conceived"?
Name a famous pantheist?
What was Spinoza's concept of God?
Spinoza believed that the universe was made up of one substance which is?
How does Dawkins interpret evidence for or against the existence of God?
What do atheists believe of God?
How long has the thought of the existence of God been carried on?
How does Dawkins interpret his findings on the existence, or not, of God.
Who believes God isn't real?
What do religions share across their belief structures?
What are some religious traditions that are found within differing religions?
Who does Christianity share roots with?
How many Attributes of Mercy are in Judaism?
What three religions share similar parts?
What three religions share similar beginnings?
What attributes do religions all roughly share?
How is sex by God handled in a monotheistic religion?
How do polytheistic religions view sex by God or gods?
What is God's role in the creation of the world?
In what ways can the gender of God be viewed?
What do polytheistic religions assign to their gods?
What role does got serve in a sexual intercourse?
In which type of religion does God have no sexual partner?
What is a muslims life purpose?
What type of God is the Muslim God?
What aspect does Alister McGrath argue is important in Christianity?
What does prayer usually include in Islam?
What type of God is the Muslim God?
Who believe they are the one and only chosen few?
Who believe that they are the only people that know the truth?
What is one called that believes he has the one religion, but that the others aren't necessarily wrong?
What is it called when someone belives that their own religion is an advancement of older religions?
What is a religion that believes that all religions are correct?
Who posited the existence of God?
What philosophical debates arose in the middle ages?
How does Alvin Plantinga describe faith?
Who stated "the heart has reasons of which reason does not know"?
Which philosopher takes the evidentialist position?
Name three philosophers of the last 100 years arguing for the existence of God?
What did Obama say the US is at war with, in 2009?
What was the "Global War on Terror" officially renamed to in March 2009?
What term did Obama want the government to stop using?
Who said in 2012 that the fight would change from military to law enforcement?
What was the  "Overseas Contingency Operations" renamed to in 2010?
When did al-Qaeda attack the US embassy in Kenya?
How many people were killed when al-Qaeda attacked US embassies in 1998?
How many Americans were killed when al-Qaeda attacked US embassies in 1998?
What operation did Bill Clinton start to retaliate for the 1998 embassy attacks?
How much of Sudan's medicines were produced by a pharmaceutical plant Clinton's operation bombed?
What law was signed on Sep 14, 2001?
Who did the AUMF authorize the US military attacking?
What law did Congress refer to as a basic for the AUMF?
When was the War Powers Resolution passed?
When did the US invade Afghanistan?
Who helped the US invade Afghanistan?
What was the goal of the US invading Afghanistan?
When did the US begin airstrikes on Afghanistan?
Where did bin Laden escape to in Dec 2001?
Where did the Taliban regroup in 2002?
In what parts of Afghanistan did the Taliban attack Coalition forces in 2002?
What operation began in Feb 2010?
Where did Operation Moshtarak take place?
When did Afghanistan sign a security agreement with the US?
How many people were killed by US Special Forces on Sep 14, 2009?
Where was the Sep 14, 2009 action?
What country's ships did some witnesses say were involved in the Baarawe attack?
What Somali group is affiliated with al-Qaeda?
What nationality was Saleh Ali Saleh Nabhan?
When did a Mali conflict begin?
What group were the Mali radicals affiliated with?
When did France provide troops in Mali?
What did France call its Mali operation?
What was Operation Serval's goal?
When was the first ground attack in the post-9/11 Iraq war?
Which nationalities worked together in the Battle of Umm Qasr?
When did the US capture Baghdad?
When did Bush say 'major combat operations' were complete in Iraq?
What regime were Hussein loyalists part of?
Which civil war did the Iraq branch of Al Qaeda begin fighting in?
With support from Syrians, what did the Iraq branch of Al Qaeda rename themselves to?
What part of Iraq did ISIS invade?
Who denounced ISIS?
What relationship do Al Qaeda and ISIS now have?
When did Obama launch airstrikes on ISIS?
What law did Obama cite on Sep 9, 2014?
When did Obama make a speech about ISIS on TV?
Which countries worked together to bomb ISIS on Sep 21-22, 2014?
Where were the Sep 21-22 airstrikes?
Which Pakistan president supported the US attacking the Taliban?
How many Pakistan airbases did Musharraf let the US use?
What was the name of the US's Afghanistan operation?
Who was the US Secretary of State in 2001?
Who said he had 'war-gamed' the US?
When did Musharraf give an anti-Islamism speech?
What did Musharraf say he'd combat?
What did Musharraf ban?
What did Musharraf say his ban wasn't influenced by?
When did Musharraf arrest Maulana Masood Azhar?
What group did Maulana Masood Azhar lead?
What group did Hafiz Muhammad Saeed lead?
What nationality is Zayn al-Abidn Muhammed Hasayn Abu Zubaydah?
Which third-highest-ranking al-Qaeda officer was captured?
What controversial technology did the US use in Pakistan?
Which US agency runs its drones in Pakistan?
Why did the US use the CIA instead of the Air Force to run drones?
Abuse of what term allowed a lack of a formal war declaration?
Who wrote 'Letter to American People' in 2002?
Who was the US Secretary of Defense in 2002?
Which group did Rumsfeld think was active in Kashmir?
What teams hunted for Bin Laden in Kashmir in 2002?
Who led the Harkat-ul-Mujahideen?
Who did a US drone kill in Sep 2009?
What group did Ilyas Kashmiri lead?
After 2009, who began fighting in Waziristan?
What group did Al-Badar Mujahideen break away from?
What did Al-Badar Mujahideen call for in 2012?
Who declared the Partnership Action Plan against Terrorism?
When was the Partnership Action Plan against Terrorism announced?
Where did NATO begin naval operations after 2002?
What was NATO's operation in the Mediterranean called?
What were the countries who supported the US's post-9/11 invasions called?
Which country disavowed the Taliban?
How many soldiers did Pakistan contribute to fight the Taliban?
Where in Pakistan is Waziristan?
Where did Pakistan try to remove the Taliban and Al-Qaeda?
What was the primary fighting force in southern Afghanistan?
Which nations besides the UK contributed significantly to the southern Afghanistan fight?
How many troops did Canada send initially?
How many troops did Australia send initially?
How many troops did the Netherlands send initially?
What new agency did Bush create after 9/11?
When was the DHS created?
What other massive agency's creation was the DHS compared to?
What did the DHS focus on?
When was the Patriot Act passed?
What did the Patriot Act make it easier for law enforcement to search?
What did the Patriot Act make it easier to do to immigrants?
How was the definition of terrorism expanded by the Patriot Act?
Which newspaper revealed the Terrorist Finance Tracking Program?
When did the ACLU first challenge the Patriot Act?
What rights did the ACLU say the Patriot Act violated?
What did Section 215 of the Patriot Act allow the FBI to search?
Who passed symbolic resolutions against the Patriot Act?
What terrorism-related resolution did the UN Security Council adopt in 2005?
Which countries haven't submitted the required reports to the UN Security Council?
What plan did the DoD release in 2005?
What did Resolution 1624 try to protect?
What phrase has been called a misnomer?
What has the 'war on terror' been used as an excuse for?
Which other misnamed 'war' has 'war on terror' been compared to?
What is the likely fate of the 'war on terror'?
What flaw in the 'war on terror' name did Francis Fukuyama point out?
What does the 'war on terror' name obscure?
Who said the US's presence in Iraq increases resentment and terrorists?
What fed US hysteria about terrorism?
What has the 'war on terror' done to the US's international image?
Who runs the Welsh Assembly?
What is the largest opposition party in the Scottish Parliament?
How many MEPs does it have in the British Parliament?
What year was Jeremy Corbyn elected?
Who overturned the Taft Vale judgement?
Who was elected Chairman of the Parliamentary Labour Party?
How many votes did Keir Hardie win by?
Who was Keir Hardie's opponent?
How many MP were elected in the 1910 election?
Who passed the Osborne judgment?
When was the Trade Disputes Act passed?
WHen was the COmmunist party refused affiliation?
HOw many seats id Labour win in 1922?
Who was voted the first leader of the Labour Party?
In what year did Ramsay MacDonald become the Labour PM?
How many MP did they get in the election in 1924?
When did MacDonald submit the resignation of his ministers?
What caused MacDonald to form a separate party?
Who won the 1931 election?
In what year was the Scottish and Welsh devolution rejected?
How many votes did the vote of confidence lose by in 1979?
When was the Labout party defeated?
What year was Michael Foot elected as leader?
What did four members of the Labour Party leave to creat?
Why was the electoral college introduced?
How many seats did Labour win in 2010?
How many seats did the Conservatives win?
WHen did Brown announce his intention to stand down?
How many more seats did LAbour get in 1987?
What was the merger of SDP and the Liberals called?
What year did Kinnock call for a general election?
What was Kinnocks party theme?
What was the original Tory lead percentage?
What did the percentage fall to?
WHen was Black Wednesday?
What was Black Wednesday?
When was the recession declared over?
When did Smith die?
What did Smith die of?
What was the other name for the Labout Party?
When was this branding first used?
When did Labour publish a new draft manifesto?
What was this manifesto called?
Who did Tony Blair side with?
Why did Blair side with Bush?
Who has an active Iraq War inquiry?
Was the idea of the Iraq War popular or unpopular in Western countries?
When did Blair announce he was quitting?
When were the next elections?
Who did Labour lose power in the election to?
Who was Blair replaced by?
What was the party membership at the end of 2009?
When did Estonia start hoping for freedom?
Who was in control during the national awakening?
Who was in control of Estonia for most of the country's history?
What year was the Republic of Estonia established?
What war ended as Estonia was born?
What features describe Estonia as a developed nation?
What standard of living does Estonia rank well in?
What country performs well in evaluation of economic freedom, civil liberties, and education?
What year did Estonia rank third in press freedom?
What financial institution is associated with Estonia?
What year did the Oeselian pirates carry out a famous raid?
Who did the Oeselian pirates atack?
What important figure was killed in the raid?
What two ships were used by the Oeselian pirates?
What type of ship was the liburna?
When was Terra Mariana established?
Who ruled the southern parts of Estonia?
What year did the Livonian Brothers join the Teutonic Order?
What year did the King of Denmark sell Estonia to the Teutonic Order?
Who did Estonia rebel against in 1343?
What form of servitude was eliminated?
When did the Estonian nationalist movement begin?
The development of Estonian national identity was accompanied with what era?
What capital of France was lost to the Nazi Germans?
When did the Soviet army initiate their blockade on Estonia?
What was the name of the Finnish aeroplane attacked by the Soviets?
Where was the destination of Kaleva?
What did the majority of Estonians view the Germans as?
Who was in control of Estonia before the Germans?
What did Estonia hope to restore after the removal of the USSR?
What did Germany take from Estonia for their war strategy?
Who did some Estonians join as an alternative to the Germans?
Who was the Finnish Army allied with?
Who composed the The Finnish Infantry Regiment 200?
What year did most Estonians join the Germans after a new Soviet threat was emerging?
How many Estonians chose to retreat or flee when in anticipation of another Soviet invasion?
Which countries did most Estonians desire to flee to?
What was the name of the refugee ship that Estonians boarded?
What date did the Soviet Council of Ministers issue a declaration to remove native Estonians?
What political strategy only allowed major parts of of Estonia to be accessed by the Soviets?
What sea islands were declared border zones?
What document did people need to travel to the border zones?
What was established in the city of Paldiski?
What year did the Singing Revolution occur?
What was the demonstration of the Singing Revolution trying to fight for?
How many people created a chain of solidarity that went Estonia and other countries?
What was the name of the human chain?
What is the length of the border that Estonia shares with Lativa?
What is the length of the border that Estonia shares with Russia?
What document established the border between Russia and Estonia?
What position do the citizens of Estonia elect for a four year term?
What year did the Estonians create a constitutional document for their modern political system?
How many representatives are in the Estonian parliament?
What can the Estonian parliament do in regards to treaties?
Who chooses high state officials of Estonia?
Who does the government have to explain their actions to?
What can the Riigikogu monitor for abuse of influence?
What is the most amount of ministers that a Prime Minister can assign?
What is another name for the governing body of ministers?
What strategy does the cabinet execute?
What major responsibility does the cabinet hold?
What digital technology as Estonia been advacning?
What year did the first internet vote occur in local Estonia elections?
What year did the first internet vote occur in Estonia parliamentary elections?
In 2007, how many Estonians used internet voting?
What date did Estonia join the League of Nations?
What date did Estonia join the United Nations?
What date did Estonia join NATO?
What date did Estonia join the European Union?
What type of foreign policy has Estonia sought after getting their independence?
What were the most important foreign policy priorities?
What trend has accompanied Estonia's cooperation with Western powers?
What has been a major factor in the restoration of Estonia after winning their independence?
When did Toomas Hendrik Ilves deliver his speech?
Who expressed a speech called "Estonia as a Nordic Country"?
What year did the foreign ministry hold an exhibit exploring the Nordic ties of Estonia?
When did Estonia join the European Union's Nordic Battle Group?
What government institution did Estonia continue to show desire in joining?
What percentage of Estonia's foreign trade was held by Russia in 1992?
What percentage of Estonia exports are sent to Nordic countries?
Which countries aid Estonia in trilateral defense strategies?
What joint military educational academy does Estonia share with Baltic Countries?
Where is the Baltic Defence College located?
When were the Baltic states asked to join NORDEFCO?
Who have been jointly working on protection against cyberwarfare?
What year was a declaration of e-military introduced?
What event in 2007 led to a need for e-military action?
When was the Computer Emergency Response Team of Estonia established?
What institution views the economy of Estonia as high income?
What was the GDP of Estonia in 2015?
What countries share similar levels of GDP with Estonia?
Where is Estonia ranked in the 2015 Index of Economic Freedom?
How much of consumed electricity does Estonia produce by itself?
What percentage of electricity was produced with local oil shale in 2011?
What alternative energy sources account for 9% of energy production?
What percentage of electricity was produced from renewable energy in 2009?
When did the global economic recession start?
What trend led to the decrease of Estonia's GDP?
Who approved the supplementary negative budget drafted by the Estonian government?
What year did Estonia start their economic rise based on strong exports?
What was the worst economic year for Estonia after winning independence?
What year did Estonia reclaim their independence?
What event played a major part in the decline of the economy during 1999?
When did Estonia unite with the WTO?
What lacking resource does Estonia depend on other countries for?
What type of energy production as many companies been investing in recent years?
What energy source has been increasing in Estonia?
What is total amount of energy production from wind power?
In what region does Estonia hold one of the highest per capita income levels?
Being close to what commercial area gives Estonia a competitive advantage?
What is a major trait of the Estonian employed workers?
What is the largest city in Estonia?
When did a huge deficit and rising inflation place pressure on Estonia's currency?
What area of commerce did Estonia need to expand?
How much electricity is imported by Estonia annually?
How much electricity is exported by Estonia annually?
How much money did Estonia receive from European Union Structural Funds between 2007 and 2013?
What year was the start of investments from the European Union Structural Funds?
What year was the end of investments from the European Union Structural Funds?
What period did the amount of ethnic Estonians drop by 61%?
What trend caused the drop of ethnic Estonians?
Who ordered large scales of deportations and executions?
What year did minorities in Estonia make up more than a third of the country?
What number of Estonia's counties are over 80% ethnic Estonian?
How many counties are in Estonia?
Which county in Estonia is the most uniform?
What percentage accounts for the total number people living in Hiiumaa that are ethnic Estonians?
What number describes the percentage of Russian Estonians?
What year was the Estonian Cultural Autonomy law established?
In 1925, what rule did Estonia create that was unique in Europe?
How many minorities were granted cultural autonomies?
What groups of minorities could elect a cultural council before the Soviet occupation?
What guarantees freedom of religion for Estonian citizens?
Estonia's constitution declares the division of what parts of society?
What individual privacy rights are citizens granted?
What percentage of Estonians claim no religion?
What is the major group that believes in Eastern Orthodox Christianity?
Which religious group is the second largest with 150,000 members?
What religious group do Catholics in Estonia follow?
What are the three levels of higher learning in Estonia?
What medical fields have their bachelor's and master's levels combined into one unit?
What do Estonian public universities have more of than higher education institutions?
What is the largest private university in Estonia?
What is the main science institution in Estonia?
What is the strongest research body that executes fundamental and applied research?
What decade were the first computer centers created in Estonia?
What cities were the locations of the first computer centers?
What virtues does modern Estonian society promote?
What size and power of government is popular in Estonia?
What is a highly prized fixture of Estonian society?
What ideal does Estonia hold towards the environment?
What institute provides education in art, design, and media?
What institute promotes awareness of native culture?
What parts of native culture does the Viljandi Culture Academy highlight?
How many Estonian museums existed in 2010?
What event preceded the domination of Estonia by different European powers?
Which three nations occupied Estonia up until 1918?
What era contains the oldest records of written Estonia works?
What document dated in 1241 contains place and family names?
Which medieval town is on the UNESCO World Heritage List?
When were the preserved hill forts in Estonia built?
What institutional structures still exist from medieval times?
What physical activity plays a major part in Estonian society?
What year did Estonia declare independence from Russia?
What event did Estonia compete in as a nation for the first time ever?
What year was Estonia annexed by Russia?
What city hosted the 1980 Summer Olympics Sailing regatta?
What is one of the main causes of the turbulent history?
What was the main cause of the spread of Shtokavian?
In which geographical region did Shtokavian become wide spread?
What was one of the major differences between the Bosniaks, Croats and Serbs?
What is "Illyrian?"
What were some of the names given to language during period of foreign control?
What specific historical event caused a group of religious and verbal differences in South Slavic dialect?
Why was Shtokavian the most widespread culture in the western Balkans? 
In which time period was Serbo-Croatian standardized?
What was the name of the document that standardized Serbo-Croatian?
What were both Serbian and Croatian standards based off of?
What was Serbo-Croatian the official language for in the 20th century?
Which additional language was added as an official language after the breakup of Yugoslavia?
What were both Serbian and Croation standards based on?
Which language officially served the Kingdom of Yugoslavia?
What ethnic names does Serbo-Croatian associate with?
What is a dialect continuum?
What caused the dialect continuum to become fractured?
Contrary to the 16th and 18th centuries, what caused migrations in the 20th century?
Which language groups lived in Dalmation city-states prior to the 19th century?
Today's Croatian language has its roots in what other language?
Prior to the 19th century, why was it irrelevant whether a person spoke Croatian or Serbian?
What was the first book published in Serbo-Croatian?
For what was "Evangel from Reims" named?
In what year was the first book printed in Serbo-Croatian?
What are the contiguous states sometimes called?
What is Alaska's capital city?
How many miles are between Alaska and Washington state?
Which set of islands extend into the Eastern Hemisphere?
Which forest is the largest national forest in the US?
Which city was Alaska's former capital?
What is the area closest to the continental US called?
Where did most settlement occur after the Louisiana Purchase?
How much tidal shoreline does Alaska have in miles?
On which island is Mount Shishaldin located?
What do geoligists believe is unique about Wrangellia?
What is most impressive about Mount Shishaldin in comparison to Mount Fuji?
How high does Mount Shishaldin rise above sea level?
What percentage of Alaska is maintained by the US federal government?
What types of areas are managed by the federal government as public lands?
How many acres is the Bureau of Land Management in charge of?
How much of the state is controlled by the Bureau of Land Management?
What is the world's largest wildlife refuge?
How many acres of its land does the state of Alaska own?
How much land is the state of Alaska provided by the Alaska Statehood Act?
Why aren't homestead and subdivision areas more popular?
Which group claims it is Alaska's largest private land owner?
What privelege do private Alaskan corporations have that its public citizens do not?
Was a law enacted in 1991 allowing corporations to sell land holdings or was it repealed?
What two bodies of water influene the climate in Western Alaska?
Is precipitation varied or uniform in Western Alaska?
Which area of Western Alaska is techincally a desert?
How much precipitation does the desert area of Western Alaska receive?
Which President allowed Tsimshian settlers to inhabit Annette Island?
What epidemic resulted in numerous deaths between the 1830s and 1860s?
In what year did the Tsimshian people arrive in Alaska?
Which Alaskan indigenous group is now well-known for their art?
Which indigenous group is controversially known for hunting caribou on protected land?
The Inuplat population inhabit what areas?
Which Alaskan indigenous group was the fist to be exploited by Russians?
What event brought thousands of people to Alaska in the 1890s to early 1910s?
What year was Alaska officially incorporated as a territory?
In what year was Alaska's capital officially changed to Juneau?
Which industries did European settlers in Alaska begin?
From what countries were European settlers in Alaska?
On what day was Alaska officially named a state?
In what year did Alaskan Statehood gain momentum following a territorial referendum?
What cause did James Wickersham focus on in his early Congressional tenure?
From which areas did Alaskan supporters face political challenges?
On what day was Alaskan Statehood finally approved by Congress?
What major event happened in Alaska on March 27, 1964 killing 133 people?
Did the earthquake or resulting tsunamis and landslides do the most damage to Alaskan communities?
How did the Good Friday earthquake compare to other documented earthquakes in the world?
Which factors concerning the Good Friday earthquake do some believe caused a higher survival rate?
How did the Good Friday earthquake compare to the 1989 San Francisco earthquake?
According to the Association of Religion Data in 2010, what percentage of Alaskans are members of a relgious congregation?
Which religion is most prevalent in Alaska?
How does Alaska compare with other states in church membership?
Which other nearby states are also considered to be less religious than others?
Which church was established in Kodiak in 1795?
What was one way in which Russian immigrants integrated into Alaskan society?
Alaska has the largest population of what religious lifestyle of any state?
What religious tradition may be a problem for Alaskan Jews?
What was the per capita personal income in Alaska in 2007?
How does Alaska's per capita personal income rank against other states?
How much of Alaskan state revenue comes from petroleum extraction?
Beyond petroleum, what is Alaska's largest export?
In which Alaskan areas are military bases prevalent as an important part of the local economy?
What program allows Alaska to keep low taxes?
What are some of Alaska's industrial products?
How, specifically, have tourists helped the local economy in Alaska?
What other states rank higher than Alaska in crude oil production?
How does Alaska rate in comparison with other states in crude oil production?
Which area in Alaska is the nation's second highest-yielding oil field?
How many barrels of oil does Prudhoe Bay produce per day?
Prudhoe Bay is second place in production to what other oil field in the US?
How much oil can the Trans-Alaska Pipeline transport per day?
How much recoverable gas is still undiscovered in Alaska, according to the US Geological Survey?
Alaska's coastline also has potential in which two environmentally friendly energy types?
Alaska's large rivers have potential for what environmentally friendly type of energy production?
What is the Alaska Permanent Fund?
In what year was the Alaska Permanent Fund established?
Why was the Alaska Permament Fund established?
Who originally proposed the Alaska Permanent Fund?
Why did Governor Keith Miller propose the Alaska Permanent Fund before the Prudhoe Bay sale?
Was Alaska's Constitution written to encourage or discourage state funds being used for a particular purpose?
Why is the Permanent Fund an exception to the premise of the Alaskan Constitution?
Where is the principal of the Permanent Fund invested?
How much was the initial principal of the Permanent Fund?
How high has the principal of the Permanent Fund grown?
How long must an Alaskan have lived in the state in order to receive a Permanent Fund Dividend?
What percentage of the Permanent Fund is divided betwen Alaska's eligible residents?
When did disembursements from the Permanent Fund begin?
How much was the initial disembursement from the Permanent Fund?
Which crops are produced in the Delta-area?
Small farms west of Fairbanks cater to whom?
Which area did Hammond develeop during his second term?
Why is there a debate about moving the capital of Alaska to another town?
Which part of Alaska has no road system connecting it to other areas?
Compared to the rest of the US, does Alaska has many or few road connections?
What year was the Alaska Railroad built?
To what does "The Railbelt" refer?
Which development in 1915 played a key role in developing Alaska?
The ARR was one of the last railroads in the US to use what?
When are cabooses still used occasionally?
When was the Parks Highway constructed?
What is the name of Alaska's ferry system?
Which other Ferry group works alongside the Alaska Marine Highway to coordinate travel?
Which areas does the Alaska Marine Highway serve?
Which service allows government to subsidise regular air travel in Alaska?
Which airline offers in-state travel with jet-service?
What are some Alaskan regional hubs?
What are the names of a few regional Alaskan airlines?
What model is the most popular aicraft in Alaska?
How much of the subsidized bulk mail delivery program goes to carriers who offer passenger service?
Which plane is considered quintessentially Alaskan?
Where is the busiest seaplane base in the world?
Which state had the most pilots per capita than any other US state?
Lake Hood is located next to what International Airport?
Which Alaskan way of transport is more for sport than for transportation?
Which dog-sled race in Alaska is the most famous?
What does the Iditarod Trail Sled Dog Race commemorate in Alaskan history?
Why were sled-dogs used to deliver medicine to Nome in 1925?
Which dogsled race most accurately follows the route of the 1925 serum run?
Which two companies provide internet and data transport to Alaska?
In what year was a project to connect Asia and rural Alaska announced?
How much money did the federal government contribute via stimulus to the connectvitiy between Asia and Alaska?
Which company owns and operates the Alaska United Fiber Optic System?
How does Alaska finance its state government operations?
How many states in the US do not have sales tax?
How many US states do not collect an individual income tax?
Which state has the lowest tax burden of the entire US?
Which political party does Alaska generally support?
How many elections have Democrats won in Alaska?
Which candidate was the only Democrat to win Alaska in a landslide election in 1964?
Which Democratic candidate was the first to win 40% of the vote in Alaska since 1964?
The areas surrounding which university has been historically a Democratic stronghold?
Which areas of Alaska have the highest Republican concentrations?
As of 2004, how many Alaskan residents refuse to select a political party?
Into how many recording districts is Alaska divided?
What is the function of an Alaskan recording district?
Which documents do recording districts universally use between areas?
In 2010, what percent of Alaska's population did not live in a city or CDP?
What four areas have not been established as CDPs by the Census Bureau?
Which seven CDPs were incorporated as part of the 1980 Census?
In what year did Alaskan State Troopers become an official organization?
What is different about a "Public Safety Officer" that distiguishes the position from a policeman?
What do wildlife enforcers regulate?
What type of vehicles do Troopers operate?
What is Alaska's most prominent orchestra?
Which company is Alaska's only professional opera?
What are a few of Alaska's noteworthy music festivals?
Which Alaskan native starred in a film also set in Alaska?
Where did actors on the set of The Magnificent live during their stay in Alaska?
In what area of Alaska was Camp Hollywood located?
Which chef was hired to prepare meals for the actors in The Magnificent?
Which classical views about the method of science did Popper reject?
Who proposed empirical falsification as the central principle of the scientific method?
What is necessary for a scientific theory to be falsified?
Which account of knowledge did Popper contest?
What is the term for Popper's non-justificational theory of criticism?
Where did Popper move in 1937?
Where was Popper's academic appointment in New Zealand?
Which lifelong friend did Popper make in Dunedin?
What philosophical fields did Popper teach at the London School of Economics?
Which Austrian school's failure to give Popper a directorship prompted him to return to the United Kingdom at the end of his life?
In which year did Popper win the Karl Renner Prize?
Which city made Popper part of its Ring of Honour in 1983?
What award given by a Japanese foundation did Popper win in 1992?
Popper won the Dr. Leopold Lucas Prize in which year?
What political philosophy that attracted Popper as a teenager had a profound influence on his thinking going forward?
For a time during which year did Popper consider himself a communist?
At which stage of life was Popper most strongly influenced by Marxist thinking?
How did Popper feel about Marxism after only a short time associating with other Marxists?
According to Popper, a theory is scientific only is it is susceptible to what?
What key components of science are ineffective when brought to bear on non-scientific theories?
How did Popper characterize the wide applicability and immunity to criticism of psychoanalytic theory?
What term did Popper use for his philosophy?
Which account of scientific method did Popper's repudiate?
What was Popper's position on classical empiricism?
According to Popper, what is the only way one can test scientific theories because they are necessarily abstract?
Popper pointed out an important logical asymmetry between what two concepts?
What does Popper say demarcates scientific theory from non-science?
What political theory did Popper say did not meet his falsifiability criterion?
What branch of psychology was Popper critical of for not producing falsifiable theory?
Popper's thoughts on falsification present a solution to the philosophical problem concerning what type of scientific reasoning?
What parts of a theory are unnecessary before the simple theory is falsified?
Who presented a solution to the philosophical problem of induction centered around falsifiability?
Popper's rational approach opposes what technique sometimes used to remove contradictions in knowledge?
Which of Popper's students argued that rational criticism should be most widely applied?
What type of knowledge is not the only sphere of rational criticism, according to Popper's student W.W. Bartley III?
According to Popper, what is not grounds for doubt?
What principle of traditional philosophy did Popper take an anti-justificationist stance against?
What does Popper believe is essential to do to theories instead of justification?
What don't we need to look for about theories in Popper's view?
What is the term for the view that there are discoverable general laws constraining history's development?
What political forms did Popper believe historicism supported?
What unpredictable feature of the world did Popper say refuted historicism?
Which of Popper's works criticized the idea that history has an inexorable developmental path?
Whose theory of truth did Popper read with intense interest in 1935?
What theory of interest to Popper did Alfred Tarski publish in 1933?
Tarski's theory overcame certain objections to what conception of truth?
What kind of realism did Popper believe Tarski's theory supported?
What term do philosophers give to the kind of theory Tarski proposed about truth?
With what does Popper say Tarski's theory replaces the predicate "is true?"
What concept did Tarski introduce to discuss the conditions for the truth of statements?
What two things does Popper argue Tarski's theory involves in an evaluation of truth?
What term does Popper use that roughly means verisimilitude?
Poppers notion of verisimilitude leaves no place for which kind of probabilities in the evaluation of scientific hypotheses?
What class of considerations did Popper believe were not important in scientific measurement?
What is the logical content of hypotheses inversely proportional to in Popper's reasoning?
What did Popper argue was objective and independent of its subject?
How many different worlds or realities did Popper differentiate in Objective Knowledge?
What constituted World One in Popper's theory?
Who produced the contents of World Three?
Which world's evolution corresponds to the growth of human knowledge?
Along with some creationists, Popper believed that evolution must have what quality to its progress?
Popper disagreed with creationists that whose hand must be directing evolution?
What kind of an entity did Popper believe the universe to be?
Which view of evolution emphasizing large changes in organisms' phenotypes does Popper oppose to his own?
Which aspect of organisms changes most radically in the process of evolution Popper envisions?
How does Popper describe the "monsters" that evolve in his view of evolutionary processes?
What kind of Darwinism does Popper subscribe to in contrast to the naturalistic kind?
What branch of philosophy did Popper advance the most?
Which department did Popper found at the London School of Economics?
Which two major philosophers of science learned a great deal from Popper at the London School Economics?
What did Paul Feyerabend ultimate do to Popper's philosophy of science?
Where did Popper establish a university department for the philosophy of science in 1946?
Which other Austrian scholar and friend of Popper also worked near him at the London School of Economics?
What was Hayek's academic field?
In which year did Popper write Hayek a letter expressing his intellectual debt to him?
Who did Popper say was the only thinker who might have had a greater influence on him than Hayek?
Which of Hayek's publications was dedicated to Popper?
What other contemporaneous school of thought is often confused with Popper's own contributions?
Popper has stressed that his description of scientific methodology should not be mistaken to apply to whom?
At what level does Popper indicate his view of scientific methodology applies?
What kind of progress does science make given the methodology Popper describes?
Popper believed he had already discussed similar ideas to Kuhn's about scientific communities in what work?
What aspect of Kuhn's thinking did Popper criticize?
What did Popper say must be the beginning phase of science?
According to Popper, what second layer does scientific inquiry have that pre-scientific inquiry does not?
What kind of criteria frequently used in science complicates the definitiveness of some hypotheses' falsification?
What other flaws complicate the problem of identifying faulty scientific hypotheses?
According to Popper, what resolves conflicting hypotheses and observations in the long run?
Which book by Houck points out logical flaws in Popper's falsificationism?
Who argued that Popper's falsificationism was just as logically untenable as Logical Positivism's verificationism?
Who wrote the book Science Versus Crime which challenged the logic of falsificationism?
Which German psychologist and tutor of Popper may have originated some of Popper's ideas?
Who claimed Otto Selz deserved credit for ideas published by Popper?
What contributed to Otto Selz's cessation of work in 1933?
What is the name of the 2004 paper that links Popper's work to that of his tutor Otto Selz?
Popper is criticized for dismissing which major philosophers in his work?
Which two prominent scientists advanced theories that John N. Gray claims would never have survived the scientific method Popper describes?
Which work by John Gray challenges Popper's falsificationism?
According to Gray, what should have falsified Einstein and Darwin's theories when first proposed?
What kind of thesis does Gray advance about scientific progress?
Gray's approach aligns with which approach that Popper himself considered untenable?
A possible rebuttal to Gray's argument appears in Popper's reply to which philosopher?
What did general relativity do that made it tentatively acceptable when it was proposed?
In contrast to Gray, which theory did Popper argue was at least equally consistent with Newton's on the available evidence?
Which type of theory is most falsifiable?
What school of philosophy does Popper's thinking on induction oppose?
For Popper, knowing that a theory is true is what?
What quality of a useful theory must be easily detectable?
What is there currently confusion over? 
Who is said to have ran the first shop? 
Where does the mandolin built by Antonio Vinaccia reside?
Where does the mandolin built by Giuseppe Vinaccia reside?
What happens to mandolin notes when plucked? 
Do mandolin notes decay faster or slower than larger string instruments?
What is tremolo?
What parts of the mandolin faciliate the tremolo technique?
What is a plectrum?
What kind of style does the Neapolitan mandolin have?
How many strings does the Neapolitan mandolin have?
What are the Neapolitan mandolin made of?
What sits on top or is flush with the sound table of the Mandolin?
How long is the scale commonly used on European roundbacks? 
Where did the Lombardic family of bowlback mandolins come from?
What do the Lombardic mandolins resemble more than modern mandolins?
What differences do the Lombardic mandolins have from the Neapolitan mandolin?
How many strings do the Lombardic mandolins have?
Who was the developer of the Milanese mandolin?
Who described the Lombardi mandolin as wider and shorter than the Neoapolitan mandolin?
How many strings do the regular mandolin's have?
What was the Lombardi Mandolin tuned to?
How many frets did the Lombardi have?
How many octaves did the Lombardi cover?
Who popularised the Cremonese Mandolin?
What was Bartolomeo Bortolazzi's popular mandolin method?
How many strings did the Cremonese Mandolin have?
Did Bortolazzi like playing the new wire strung mandolins? 
What did Bortolazzi say about the sound? 
When was a new sytle of carved top and back construction mandolins created?
What was the new sytle of mandolins inspired from?
What sytle did the new style of mandolins supplant?
Who founded the Gibson Mandolin-Guitar Manufacturing Co, Limited? 
What shape sounds holes do these styles of mandolins have? 
Where are the soundholes located?
What mandolin is associate with Bluegrass music?
What style is associate with other types of music?
Why is the F-5 mandolin more expensive?
What style of Gisbon Mandolin was largely replicated?
When was the Gibson F-5 largely replicated?
Who supervised the Gibson F-5's replication? 
Who are the other makers from the Loar period? 
Who were notable modern American mandolin manufacturers? 
What instrument does the mandolin share the same tuning of?  
Where was the mandolin primarily used? 
When was the mandolin considered a fad?
Who contributed to the idea that the mandolin was a fad? 
When did the mandolin craze end?
Who played a key role Australian mandolin movement? 
When did the Australian mandolin movement begin?
When was Phil Skinner awarded an MBE? 
What was Phil Skinner's birth name? 
At what age did Phil Skinner begin playing music? 
Who is the director of the Sydney Mandolins?
How many commisions of Sydney Mandolins have their been?
On what media was most of these work released?
What radio stations can they be heard on? 
Who has had many Concertos written for him? 
What Island is the mandolin a main instrument in Cretan Music? 
When did the mandolin appears on Crete?
What was one of the variants of the mandolin that was used?
Who reported that the mandolin and the mpoulgari were used to accompany the lyria? 
The mandolin was reported to be popular among what sex? 
Many adaptations of the instruments were done to cater to what type of music? 
What is the mandolin usually tuned to for Indian music?
There is no concept of what in Indian music? 
What is another popular madonlin tuning? 
These mandolin are used in a popular dance music called? 
What types of instruments do irish player prefer?
Why is it said that the Italian style can't hold their own session? 
Which type mandolin had a tendency not to stay in the player's lap?
Which mandolin was preferred for formal performances and recordings? 
What was the Irish style mandolin reminiscent of?
Who are some of the famous Irish Mandolinists?
Who are popular fiddle player and tenor banjo player?
What was John Sheahan and Barney Mckenna's band called?
Who made the instruments used by the Dubliners?
What Irish guitarist played the mandolin on stage?
Who composed the Concerto in C Major Op 3 6?
Who placed it in his 1787 work? 
What two artists created four variations of the Concerto in C Major Op 3 6?
Who composed the La conquista della Spagne di Scipione Afriacano il giovance?
When was Alexander Balus composed? 
What country still maintains strong classic music tradition with mandolin?
How many people compose the Japanese mandolin orchestras?
What other instruments do the Japanese madnolin orchestras play?
Japan hold and extensive collection of what? 
What does bandolim mean?
When was the bandolim porpular among the Portugese bourgeoisie?
Where can you see mandolins a part of in Portgal? 
Where is the Portuguese mandolin scene located? 
How many active mandolin orchestras does the Madiera Island have? 
Who is a famous British player?
What did Simon mayer produce? 
Who played the mandolin on the album Tubular Bells? 
What was UK's biggest selling album? 
What song by Rod Stewart used the mandolin? 
What group in the US was popular?
When did the Estudiantina Figaro come to the US?
Where did the Estudiantina Figaro play? 
What group was inspired by the Estudiantina Figaro? 
What did the Origianl Spanish Students expect the American  public not to know? 
When did madolin awareness in the US become fluent?
When was the first madolin made in the US?
Who made the first US mandolin?
Where was Joseph Bohmann from? 
What type of madolin was Partee using ?
What popular musical casted a teacher-dealer? 
What did these teacher-dealers often conduct? 
How many people were usually in these teacher-dealer orchestras? 
Who played the mandolin in Vaudeville? 
Who was the famous African American musican and director? 
The setting the mandolin was used in until the 1930's was? 
Where did the mandolins find a new home? 
What mandolin was designed to boost interest in the mandolin?
What mandolin became the face of bluegrass music?
What instrument did artist Bill Monroe use? 
What groups have become popular amonbgpublic schools?
What are two of the popular public school groups? 
Who found the Classical Mandolin Society of America?
Who are modern mandolinists and composers?
What family recorded an old-time music in 1924-1926?
Who was the earliest known southern music artist?
What type of mandolin was becoming popular by 1930's? 
Who was considered the father of Bluegrass music?
What was Bill Monroe's group called? 
What chording sound was Monroe popular for?
What keys was Monroe popular for? 
Who was Monroe's most influential follower?
Who developed a electric five-string mandolin?
What type of music did the electric five-string mandolin help popularize?
What is Jethro Burns commonly known for?
What type of music did Jethro Burns play? 
Who popularized the mandolin in Western Swing Music?
Who was well known for important works of traditional blugrass?
Who are othe rwell know players? 
Who got his start with his father's mandolin? 
Who is the most popular blue music mandolinist?
What other instrument did the Tennessee string bands use? 
Who played in the Whistler and His Jug Band? 
When did the mandolin first appear in rock music?
Who played the drums and the mandolin in the group called The Band?
What Rod Stewart song in 1971 featured the mandolin?
What artist from the Greatful Dead played the mandolin?
Tommy Shaw sang and played the mandolin in which Styx song?
What type of mandolin do rock musicians today use? 
Which Irish-American punk band uses Mandolins?
What REM song uses simple mandolin licks?
What American rock band has extensive use of mandolins? 
What film's theme song uses a mandolin?
What type of music has mandolins played? 
Where do traditional mandolin orchestras remain popular? 
What do the structure of a contempory traditional orchestra consist of?
What are smalled ensambles composed of? 
What are the mandocellos usually tuned like? 
What is the term for the gait of an insect characterized by walking in alternating triangles?
What larval adaptation is common to underwater insects?
What species of insect has the capability to walk on the surface of water?
What do crickets do in order to attract or repel a mate?
What variation of beetle in the Coleoptera order communicate by way of light?
Insects move by walking, flying, and what else?
Which insects walk, fly, and swim?
Insects walk the ground in alternating what?
Insects walking in an alternating triangle is called a what?
What can insects do with each other in a variety of ways?
By what method do humans often try to control the spread of insects?
What portion of the biosphere would be devastated absent the complex pollination role of insects?
What insect provides a tangible economic benefit via the production of silk?
What insect is known to consume carrion?
Humans consider most insects as what?
Humans can control insects using what?
Insects have the potential to damage what?
Insects can damage crops by feeing on sap, fruits, or what?
Silkworms are used by humans for producing what?
From what period do researchers believe that the oldest known full-body impression of a flying insect originates?
What is believed to be the oldest known insect fossil?
In what year did Tufts researchers reportedly uncover what is believed to be the oldest known impression of a flying insect?
What is the term for a mandible with two articulations?
With what type of insect is a dicondylic mandible associated?
What higher-level is constantly up for debate and research?
The higher-level phylogeny is of the what?
What kind of impression has been uncovered by a University?
A University discovered a primitive flying what?
How old is the primitive plying insect found by the University?
In addition to Carboniferous, what other insect order is inclusive of extant groups, stem groups and Paleozoic groups?
To what measurement, in cm, did the wingspans of giant dragonfly-like forms reach?
Higher levels of what substance possibly contributed to the phenomenon of gigantism? 
How many million years ago is the Permian period believed to have begun? 
The most significant mass extinction of insect groups is commonly ascribed to what period?
Late Caboniferous and Early Permain are what kind of orders?
The insect orders include both of what?
The insect orders include a number of what kind of groups?
What kind of giant insect form had wingspans?
How wide were the wingspans of the dragonfly-like forms?
What type of defense did plants adaptively evolve in response to insects?
What is the term for a plant-eating insect?
What do many insects adaptively utilize in self-defense from predators?
How is toxicity sometimes visibly displayed by insects as a warning?
What is an example of a mutually beneficial process indicating the coevolution of plants and insects?
Insects are considered terrestrial what?
What were insects the major selection agents of?
What did plants eventually form against insects?
Insects formed mechanisms to shield against what?
Insects show how toxic they are with what kind of colors?
What is the term for the class of insects with wings?
What is the term for the class of insects without wings? 
What group of insects are inclusive within the Monocondylia primarily due to the shape of their mandible?
What is the collective group to which Thysanura and Pterygota belong?
Insects are historically divided into how many groups?
Insects with wings are known as what?
Does an Apterygots have wings or wingless?
What is a Thysanura?
Thysanura and Pterygota are what?
Morphology-based and appearance-based are known as what?
What class is the Hexapoda ranked?
How many groups are defined in the superclass?
Springtails are also known as what?
Collembola, protura, and dipkura are in a group called what?
Paleoptera and Neoptera are what kind of insect orders? 
An insects hard body parts are called what?
Insect's wings fold flat over their what?
Neoptera can be divided into what kind of "based" group?
Paraneopter and Endopterygota are closely what?
The throax has how many sections?
Another term for tagma is?
The anterior section is closest to the what?
The prothrorax is what segment of the insect?
The pleura is made of how many lateral regions?
Insects are also known as what kind of vertebra?
Insects have developed what kind of active capability?
Active flight ability has played what kind of role for insects?
How many times are insects muscles able to contract?
Insects muscles are attached to their what?
What is on each side of a thoracic segment?
How many ganglia are on each side of a thoracic segment?
Ganglia are connected into a what?
How many pairs of ganglia are in a segment?
What other location on an insect are ganglia located?
How many insects have nociceptors?
Cells that detect and transmit pain are called what?
When were nociceptors discovered?
Nociceptors were discovered by studying the common what?
Which probe did the larvae react to?
What produces saliva in an insects mouth?
What leads from the salivary glands to the reservoirs?
What is an opening through the head called?
Where is the salivarium located?
Where does an insect's digestion happen?
What is another name for mesenteron?
Food goes in to the midgut after leaving where?
The majority of an insects digestion happens where?
What kind of projections are in the midgut wall?
What are microscopic projections called?
Female insects reproductive system contain a pair of what?
What kind of glands are in a female insect's reproductive system?
What connects the parts inside a female insect's reproductive system?
Where are egg tubes are found inside of an insect?
What are egg tubes called?
What is the male reproductive system called? 
Where is tracheae located?
Most make insects contain a pair of what?
What are inside male testes?
Follicles inside a male insect's reproductive system connect to what?
Polymophism is a developmental and reproductive what?
Haplodiploidy is what type of system?
The number of chromosome sets determines the offspring's what?
The sex-determination system is found in which insects?
Polymophism species have different forms or what else?
How many insects use parthenogenesis?
GIving birth without fertilized eggs is called what?
What usually partakes in a form of parthenogenesis?
Aphis have asexual and sexual what?
Aphis are usually female and what else during the summer?
Incomplete metamorphosis insects are called?
What kind of metamorphosis do hemimetabolous insects undergo?
Do hemimetabolous insects change quickly or gradually?
Hemimetabolous insects gradually change by a series of what?
Insect's molt when they outgrow what?
What is a complete metamorphosis called?
How many stages happen in complete metamorphosis?
What is another word for egg?
What is an imago?
Name an example of an insect that undergoes complete metamorphosis?
Insects have what kind of sense of numbers?
Which insect displays a rudimentary sense of numbers?
What kind of species does a solitary wasp prey upon?
What does the mother wasp provide for her eggs when they hatch?
Is the male solitary wasp bigger or smaller than the female solitary wasp?
What is another name for Colleobola?
Mycetophilldae is another name for what?
Phengodidae is party of what insect family?
Elateridae and Staphylinidae are what kind of luminescent?
What kind of fly mimics the flashing of female Photinus to attract males?
Most insects are able to perceive darkness and what else?
What insect is not abel to perceive light and dark?
Most insects have what kind of vision?
Insects notice what type of movement?
Many insects are able to see visible light, ultraviolet, and what other kind of light?
What were the earliest organisms to produce sound?
Insects can sense what?
Insect sounds come from what kind of action?
The mechanical action of what allows insects t make sound?
Moths create what kind of click sounds?
What sound volume is produced by Coleoptera?
Low insect sounds are made by the insect's what?
Low insect sounds can be heard through what?
Insect moving sounds are used to warn and do what with other insects?
Corixids are able to communicate with what type of sounds?
What are used by insects to communicate with members of the same species?
Vibrations are used to communicate with members of the same species, and what other species?
Which insects has a song to attract males from the same species?
What is a lycaenid caterpillar? 
Living in association with ants is called what?
Animal taste and smell rely on what kind of communication?
What is the physiological response of a sense organ called?
Chemical stimuli are signals that regulate the activity of what?
What is a message-carrying chemical called?
Kairomones are a type of what?
Insects with fine scale spatial orientation live in colonies and where else?
Some insects have a fine scale spatial orientation and/or what else?
Spacial orientation/homing allows an insect to return to one specific hole among how many?
An insect recalling a specific location for up to a year is called what?
An insect that can recall a specific location for up to a year does what?
Eusocial insects provide food for their offspring full-time or part-time?
What do eusocial insects guard?
What do eusocial insects build?
Most eusocial insects lead what kind of life once becoming an adult?
An adult eusocial insect does not contact it's what?
Insects are the only invertebrates that have evolved into what?
What part of the insect has been up for debate?
Wings from the paranotal lobes are based on what theory?
Wings from modified gills is from what origin?
The epicoxal theory suggests insect wings are modified what?
How many legs do adult insects contain?
Most adult insects have adopted what kind of gait?
The tripedal gait allows what kind of walking?
Insects can adopt how many gaits?
Insects can change their gait to deal with the loss of what?
What kind of locomotion is seen in stick insects?
What is another name for walking stick insects?
Some insects can walk on top of what?
What insect can walk on the surface of water?
Water striders are part of what insect family?
Water beetles have legs of what type of structure?
Dragonflys use what kind of propulsion?
Dragonflys shoot water from where?
Water striders have what kind of special groove up their leg?
Rove beetle Stenus emit what type of gland secretions?
What is an important defense strategy for insects to survive?
What does coloration and shape help an insect do in the surrounding environment?
Protective coloring is common in what insect family?
What is Chrysomelidae?
A beetle can resemble what kind of dung?
Pollen transferred in the reproduction of plants is called?
What is required to transport pollen?
Most pollination is completed by what?
What do insects receive in return for pollination?
Flowers that allow only one type of pollinator is called what?
Insects play prominent roles in what?
What is a common insect used for research purposes?
What percent of the fly genome is similar to the human genome
Drosophila has helped develop principles in what kind of linkage?
Genetic systems are conserved among what?
What ancient world insect is considered symbolic?
Cicadas symbolize immortality in what culture?
The praying mantis symbolizes patience and what else?
Witchety grubs serve as personal clan totems in what country?
What kind of ants are symbolic among the Australian Aborigines?
What do all living humans belong to?
What species are all humans?
Race has no taxonomic significance among whom?
What set of traits do some scientists use race to make distinctions among?
How do scientists around the world continue to conceptualize race?
What type of group can't be biologically defined?
What type of categorization in every day usage is there wide agreement it is only a social construct?
What do some people contend racial categories are obviously correlated with?
Some genetic markers have varying frequencies among what populations?
What is the majority opinion on whether racial categories can be considered to have impact on human genetic variation? 
How do people create a social reality in which social categorization is achieved?
What can be said to be a social construct?
What contexts do racial social constructs develop within?
Constructs may be the result rather than the inciter of what?
What effect does race have in the lives of people?
Socioeconomic factors and enduring views on race has led to what for certain racial groups?
What is discrimination often paired with?
What do members of one group typically perceive the moral standing of outgroups as?
What do groups with less power often find themselves?
What has led to many tragic instances of events like slavery and genocide?
What does law enforcement in some countries use to profile suspects?
Why is using racial categorization for profiling often criticized? 
What promotes stereotypes?
Who can race serve as a significant factor when studying social inequality?
What may in part reflect subjective attributes, self-identities and social institutions? 
What have human groups always considered themselves as compared to other nearby groups?
During which process did our current idea of race come about?
Where did Europeans come into contact with other groups?
What have differences among groups not typically been perceived as being?
What ideaology is found in the natural sciences?
What year was Blumenbach's treatise published?
How many divisions did Blumenbach's treatise specify?
What type of transition was noted from one group to the next?
What can one not mark between the variety of mankind?
What race was later renamed to Negroid?
What did the merging of superstitious beliefs and scientific ones regarding group differences produce?
What were races considered to be, according to the ideology of race?
How might some groups have resulted, according to the ideology?
What group was identified as being inferior to Europeans?
Who particularly noted the unnatural sexual appetites of Africans?
What theory is the belief that differences races had evolved independently on each continent?
What country did Edward Long and Charles White advocated the belief of polygenism in?
What was the profession of Christoph Meiners and Georg Forster?
In what century was polygenism most widespread?
The Ethnological Society was sympathetic towards what cause?
What species do all living humans today belong to?
When is it theorized that Homo habilis evolved in East Africa?
How many millions of years ago had Homo erectus spread throughout Europa and Asia?
Members of what species populated parts of Africa in a relatively short time?
What group might have Archaic Homo sapiens evolve out of?
Who taught and accepted the belief that biologically distinct races were isomorphic?
What practice was combined with the field of eugenics regarding the distinctness of social groups?
What effect did the Nazi eugenics program have on racial essentialism? 
What conclusions were race anthropologists pressured to revise?
What did a lot of modern anthropologists in the West come to view racial designation as?
What type of geneticists have debates about what can provide a basis for a new conception of race?
What class of researchers surprisingly have no generally accepted concept of population?
What do most definitions of population rely on?
What do Waples and Gaggiotti identify two broad types of?
What are both ecological and evolutionary definition modifiers of?
What are traditionally geographically isolated?
What is "subspecies" used to indicate an objective degree of?
What is an objection to the idea of subspecies because it doesn't specify this?
What would a population have to somewhat be to be considered a subspecies?
What did Templeton argue is necessary to impose a threshold on for a population to be a subspecies?
What must organisms have a measurable level of to be seen as a subspecies?
Who proposed subspecies be defined by the seventy-five percent rule?
What year did Dean Amadon make his proposal?
The 75% rule states how much of a population must lie outside the range of other populations for a defining set of characters?
Many scholars argue what should be replaced with a ninety or ninety-five percent rule?
When did Sewall Wright make his suggestion about human populations?
How should populations long inhabiting separate parts of the world be considered?
What is required to allocate individuals in subspecies populations correctly?
What did Wright feel it wouldn't take an anthropologist to easily distinguish between of in groups?
What term is it customary to use instead of subspecies?
What did Lieberman and Jackon find profound problems using cladistics to support concepts of?
What would the diverse group of East Indians, North Africans and Europeans be grouped as prior to DNA analysis?
Cladistics can limit and skew what?
What is variation found in that can be labeled as races?
Lieberman and Jackson suggest authors of some studies use the term race in what ways?
What did C. Loring Brace observe about about variations?
Why are variations distributed along clines?
What is a problem common to phenotype-based descriptions of races?
What is Frank Livingstone's profession?
What is the conclusion from the evidence that clines cross racial boundaries?
What is the consequence of the number and geographic location ascribed to a race highly dependent on?
What partially accounts for the appearance of light skin in humans?
What mutation did scientists discover?
What do East Asians have to thank for their relatively light skin?
Traits and gene frequencies do not always correspond to what type of location?
What thing that strongly differentiates the French from some other populations be clinal across Europe?
When did Coop and others find out something about a selected allele?
How many major geographic patterns do the global distributions fall into?
What are sweeps?
Something that is found at high frequency in Europe could be what elsewhere?
What can one use to look at differences between groups instead of physical differences?
Who was William C. Boyd?
Boyd felt race was based on a specific differentiation of the frequency of what in a population?
How numerous would the number of races be if one gene can distinguish races?
What may people who have lived in the same area for generations have in common?
What did Sewall Wright develop one way of measuring?
What was Wright's method known as?
What is the often stated FST for humans?
Richard Lewontin, upon looking at the FST ratios, concluded race wasn't an appropriate or useful way to describe what?
Human group variation is similar to variation observed in what other species?
What two researchers gave a long critique regarding the application of FST to human populations in 2003?
What do Long and Kittles think of the implication that human populations contain on average 85% of all genetic diversity?
Non-African groups of human population may only drive from what type of sample of the African population?
What type of bottleneck did the migration out of Africa represent?
How much human genetic diversity exists in a single African population?
What type of classification system for humans did A.W.F. Edwards argue for?
What might genetic clusters be shown to correspond to one day?
How is the relationship between genes and complex traits understood?
Risch feels any category someone comes up with will be what?
Risch thinks imperfect categories still have what?
Cluster structure of genetic data is dependent on what initial thing?
If one samples a continental group, what do the clusters become?
What is not a natural taxonomy of the human species?
What are objective social constructions?
What are diversity partition and clustering analysis are examples of?
What word do many social scientists instead of race?
What had been used to justify discrimination, apartheid, slavery and genocide in WWII?
When did the civil rights movement take place?
What movement gained momentum worldwide in the 60's?
What type of reality do some believe race is a social construct corresponding to?
Researchers from which university challenged the theory of race being only a social construct?
Where was the challenge to the theory of racing being a social construct published?
Neil Risch found a 99.9% agree between genetic structure and people's description of their what?
What is a problematic category in addition to race?
What may self-identification not correlate with precisely?
What country was race "Biologized" in?
What wasn't racial identity governed by in Brazil?
What were Brazillian children never automatically identified with the type of?
What may full siblings belong to?
What determines genotype?
How many racial categories would be needed with all the possible combinations of outward features?
What way would categories grade into each other, rather than being isolated from each other?
What did race refer to instead of heredity?
What is appearance a poor indication of?
Where is there a lot of complexity in racial classifications?
What categories have an aspect of fluidity?
What are people with high quantities of Amerindian ancestry grouped as?
What's a rough translation of "pardos"?
What do people with less than 60-65% of European descent usually cluster with?
What percentage of Afro-Brazillian DNA is reported to be Subsaharan African?
What would more people report themselves as if a more consistent report were considered?
What do people with a high quality of African descent classify themselves as?
Brazil's population is believed to have between what percentages of autosomal European ancestry?
How much of the population of Brazil reported themselves as pardo in 2010?
Brazil's population is thought to have greater than what percentage of European Y-DNA?
What is roughly the amount of African slaves imported to Brazil?
What conditions did the African slaves in Brazil live in?
Most African descent in Brazil came from what sort of congress?
Between what years did Brazil welcome 5.5 million immigrants?
Between 1500 and 1760, how many Europeans settled in Brazil?
What relies on the idea humans can be divided into biologically distinct races?
What community rejects the idea there are biologically distinct races?
Why does the ECRI reject theories based on the existence of different races?
What does the ECRI strive to make sure no one becomes?
The law penalizes situations where someone is treated less favourably on the ground of what?
When did the term "Hispanic" begin being used?
What is the word "Latino" often used as a synonym for?
How are the terms Hispanic and Latino not specific?
What is common misconception in the US about what some national origins are?
Anglo can refer to non-Hispanic European Americans who speak English but are not necessarily what?
What does the current literature regarding human variation lack?
What do some studies use the word race in the sense of?
What term do some use to mean population, clade, or haplogroup?
What do some eschew altogether? 
What is a less problematic unit of analysis?
Where is Eduardo Bonilla-Silver a Sociology professor?
What does Bonilla-Silva contend racism is about more than anything else?
Who does Bonilla-Silva think is the dominant racial group?
What idea does color-blind racism thrive on?
What exists between the alleged color-blindness of most whites and the persistence of a system of inequality?
What concept's use has declined significantly in the U.S. during the 20th century?
The majority of what group in the U.S. has rejected the concept of biological races?
What textbooks introducing anthropology have rejected race as a valid concept since 1932?
How many books out of 33, from 1975 to 1984, rejected race?
What percentage of articles in 1996 employed a bio-race paradigm?
What group of anthropologists overwhelmingly support the idea of human races?
What does George W. Gill think about the veracity of the idea that race is only skin deep?
What are probably the primary forces of nature which shaped human races?
What does Gill think the complete denial of opposing evidence stems from?
What does Gill attribute the lack of presenting the perspective as a possibility to?
What type of anthropology is "race" sometimes still used within?
What term would Brace prefer forensic anthropologists use?
What can forensic anthropologists determine about the ancestors of someone from their skeletal remains?
What does Brace feel the term "black" in meaningful in?
Why is it bad that a category is merely socially constructed?
Who promotes the use of racially categorized data in the United States?
What has race sometimes been used in clinical settings to diagnose and treat?
What have doctors noted about some medical conditions in certain racial groups?
What fueled the recent interest in race-based medicine?
What do proponents of the use of racial categories in biomedicine think it makes possible?
What does finding a difference in disease prevalence between two socially defined groups not necessarily imply?
What do some research suggest medical practices should maintain their focus on?
What is a risk of overemphasizing genetic contributions to health issues?
What is makes more of a difference than race in health outcomes for "race specific" diseases?
What have some studies found patients reluctant to accept in medical practice?
What does the FBI feel providing general descriptions helps to facilitate?
What does the FBI employ the term race to summarize?
What does law enforcement feel appearance characteristics of individuals help them do to those individuals?
What is more important for law enforcement in categorizing instead of DNA?
Where has the practice of racial profiling been ruled to be unconstitutional?
What is a violation of civil rights in the United States?
What do many consider an example of institutional racism in law enforcement?
How has the misuse of racial categories historically impacted one or more groups?
What has impacted the debate on the legitimate use of known phenotypical characteristics?
What impacts African American and Latino communities in disproportionate numbers?
Who is the author of "The New Jim Crow: Mass Incarceration in the Age of Colorblindness"?
What type of bars and walls beyond physical ones does Alexander think people are behind?
Who does Alexander think a second class citizenship is imposed upon disproportionately?
What type of caste system is mass incarceration compared to?
What morphological features do forensic anthropologists draw on?
What measurement can aid in the identification of a human body?
Who noted in a 1992 article that anthropologists had generally abandoned the concept of race as valid?
What group still uses race as a valid means to represent human biological diversity?
What are forensic anthropologists very good at identifying?
What does mapping clusters disentangle ancestry from?
Hammer and others recently aimed to test what claim about how closely related present-day Jews are to what group?
What shifted depending on the locus investigated?
What was suggested the reason for the degree of genetic shift among Jews was the result of?
What chromosome was focused on to circumvent some of the complications associated with selection?
Thomas and others sought to distinguish between what chromosome of Jewish priests and that of non-Jews?
What does the new "race science" call attention to the importance of?
What do people desire to use science to confirm?
What is fundamentally different from older notions of race?
How were older notions of race used?
What is a problem with racial assignments? 
How many people have a varied ancestry?
When were periods of numerous interracial relationships in the U.S.?
Who do many people who identify as white have for ancestors?
What percentage of African ancestry were 30% of college students identifying as white estimated to have?
What was Paris known as in Latin?
In what century was Christianity introduced?
Who brought Christianity to Paris?
What is the name of Saint Denis burial place?
Where was Saint Denis beheaded?
In what years did the English soldiers occupy Paris during the Hundred Years War?
Who tried to liberate the city in 1429?
What was the date of the St. Bartholomew's Day massacre?
In what year was Henri IV assassinated?
Who was responsible for rebuilding Paris in the 1600's
How many members are in the Metropolitan Council?
Who was the first president of the metropolitan council?
What town was Patrick Ollier a mayor of?
What party does Patrick Ollier associate with?
What is the budget for Metropole?
Where is the headquarters for UNESCO?
Where is the head quarters for the International Federation for Human Rights?
Where is the head quarters for the European Space Agency?
What is Paris' peak population?
When was Paris' population peak?
What year was the first population increase since 1954?
What was the population in 2009?
What was the most populated city in the EU in 2012?
How many people lived per square kilometer in the city limits?
What three departments surrounding Paris had densities greater than 10k/k?
How many immigrants were in Paris in 2012 from Europe?
How many immigrants to Paris in 2012 were from the Maghreb?
How many immigrants in Paris in 2012 were from sub-Saharan Africa and Egypt?
How many Asians immigrated to Paris in 2012?
What percentage of jobs were market services in 2012?
What industry had the lowest percentage of jobs in Paris of 2012?
What percentage of people worked in agriculture?
What percentage of people worked in finance and insurance?
What does Paris region manufacturing specialize in?
How much of a drop was there in manufacturing jobs between 1990 and 2010?
How many people does the Paris regions aerospace companies employ?
The closing of what plant in 20147 caused a major loss to the automobile industry?
How many manufacturing workers does Paris have?
What does the southern Essonne department specialize in?
What does south-eastern Val-de-Marne specialize in?
How many construction workers worked in Paris in 2011?
How many construction workers were employed in the metropolitan area?
What percentage of french publishing houses were in Paris in the 1970s?
Approximately how many bookstores are located in the 5th arrondissement?
How many bookstalls are located along the Seine?
What is the maximum amount a publishers book can be discounted?
When did most of the jazz clubs close down?
Why did the jazz clubs close down?
Where were most jazz clubs located?
What is the most predominant religion in France?
How many parishes and curates were there in 2011?
How many catholic schools are in Paris?
How many students attend catholic schools?
How many evangelical churches are there in Paris?
How many parishes of the LDS church are in Paris?
When was the American Church in Paris founded?
What is the principal Anglican church in Paris?
Who built the Marais-quarter Agodudas Hakehilos Synagogue?
When was the Marais-quarter Agoudas Hakehilos Synagogue built?
When did a large number of Sephardic Jews settle in Paris?
What percentage of France's Jewish population survived the holocaust?
What is the former Cameroon pavilion?
Where is the biggest Buddha statue in Europe?
When did the Hindu temple on Rue Pajol open?
How tall is the biggest Buddha statue in Europe?
Who was Apollo's twin sister?
To whom was the Delos sanctuary dedicated?
Who discerned three components in the prehistory of Apollo worship?
Who was Apollo's son?
About the 4th Century BCE, what became merely a formula of adulation?
About the 4th Century BCE, what was the object of paean?
What does the word Pella mean?
What represents Apollo as a Northern intruder?
What played an important part in the cult of the god?
What was the name for "the double-axe men?"
What is another name for the double-axe?
Who was the Minoan "Mistres of the animals?"
Who was Apollo's sister?
Who did scholars beieve carried on the rituals in a consistent procedure?
Who is a mythical seeress of Anatoian origin?
What Greek tradition seems to be confirmed by recent studies?
Who was Apollo's mother?
What origin was Leto?
Where was Leto worshipped?
What is the origin of Sibyl?
Who is the Cretan seer that purified Athen after the pollution brought by the Alcmeonidae?
Who told the story of the Cretan seer Epimenides?
What group was probably heir to the shemanic religions of Asia?
which two cult sites had widespread infuence?
Who tried to revive the Delphic oracle?
In what did Apollo confirm that all deities are aspects of servants of an all-encopassing highest deity?
What buildings were originally rectangle wood structures?
Why did mathematical relations become necessary?
Why were the first buildings narrow?
Who believed that behind the appearance of things, there was a permanent principle of mathematics?
What was the name of the chthonic dragon?
which spring emitted vapors that caused the oracle at Delphi to give her prophecies?
Who was Apollo's mother?
Where did Apollo kill Python?
Who was a parent of Python?
Who is Apollo's son?
Why did Zeus strike down Asclepius with a lightning bolt?
How long was Apollo sentenced for killing Cyclopes?
Who was Leucothea's mother?
Who is Leucothea's sister?
Who did Leucothea fall in love with?
Who ordered Leucothea to be buried alive?
Who was the daughter of Phlegyas?
Who owas King of the Lapiths?
How was Apollo informed of the affair between Coronis and Ischys?
Who was the son of Elatus?
Who argued about whether the matricide was justified?
Who says the bond of blood between mother and son is more meaningfu than the bond of marriage?
Who holds that the bond of marriage is sacred?
Who was accused of matricide?
Who challenged Apollo to a trial of skill?
Who was a faithful follower of Pan?
Who was the mountain-god?
Who was chosen as umpire of the trial of skill?
What instrument did Apolo play?
What instrument did Marsyas know how to play?
Who could not sing at the same time he played the flute?
What is said to have turned into the river Marsyas?
Where was Apollo's first temple at Rome established?
When was the Second Punic war?
What is another name for the Ludi Apollinares?
Whose masterpieces are a mixture of naturallism with stylization?
In whose depictions can the evolution of Greek sculpture be observed?
Who seems to be released from any art and religious conformities?
Who is said to be the builder of the labyrinth?
During what period was art's main theme the representation of motion in a specific movement?
These free-standing statues were sometimes rendered from immestone, bronze, ivory and terracotta but were usually made from what material?
Who wrote that beauty consists in the proportion not of the elements?
In what type of art does the god hold the cithara in his left arm?
What type of art is modeled after a supposed Greek bronze original made in the second quarter of the 5th Century BCE.
The statues of who were thought to incarnate his living presence?
Representations of illusive imaginative reality had deep roots in what period?
What people saw the mountains, forests, sea and rivers as inhabited by concrete beings?
Who seemed to have been dominated by geometrical pattern and order?
What rely on presenting scenes directly to the eye for their own visibe sake?
While each scene has its own character and completeness, it must fit into what?
Who is often depicted with a kithara or bow in his hand?
What is the name of a marble sculpture that was rediscovered in the late 15th century?
Who made the Apollo Belvedere?
When did Leochares make The Apollo Belvedere?
How many States renounced their preferred political party?
Which state switched sides and embraced the Democratic party after previously choosing the Republican party?
How many votes did Kerry receive, in the Electoral College?
How large of a gap was there between Bush's and Kerry's votes? 
Which candidate, in the 2004 election, had the majority of the popular vote?
What even occured during Bush's presidency that made him become a wartime president?
How long into Bush's presidency did tragedy occur on American soil?
Did Bush become disfavorable during the time of the 9/11 attacks?
How long did it take for the US military to respond by infiltrating Afghanistan?
By which month, were the Taliban no longer controlling Kabul?
By what date did Bush obtain the number of votes required to become the 2004 Republican nominee?
When did Bush accept the Republican nomination?
Whom did Bush want to stand beside him as Vice President?
Which two topics did Bush remain steadfast on, during his campaign?
In New York State, which party was the Bush/Cheney duo candidates of?
Who became the Democratic nominee, half way through 2003?
Dean's admiration for internet campaigning accredited his strength as what?
What did Dean's backers become known as?
What government position has Howard Dean previously held?
Which of Bush's policies did Dean criticize most notably?
Which Democratic nominee declared his intention to enter into the presidential race, in the fall of 2003?
What did Wesley Clark's initial campaign ads depend upon?
What were Wesley Clarks's core issues?
What shortcoming was noticeable, from the start, for Wesley Clark?
Was Wesley Clark influential in gathering the Democratic backing?
Who had the least amount of backers, between Kerry and Dean?
Which state was expected to show the least amount of support for Kerry going into the caucuses, before Iowa?
What act showed that Kerry's fight for the White House was in trouble?
Who took over for Jim Jordon, when he was fired?
What regulation did Kerry not follow to try to save his campaign?
Who, at the start of the primaries, had the most single campaign contributors?
Who had the highest amount of single campaign contributors, at the final quarter of the primaries?
Who earned the fewest individual contributions as of the April 15th filing date?
What agency provided statistical information regarding the Presidential Candidates' individual contributors?
How many candidates remained by the end of the Iowa caucuses, in January 2004?
Which two candidates had surprising results despite Howard Dean being the strong front-runner?
Which candidate slipped into third place, following the Iowa caucuses?
Preceding the Iowa caucuses, which candidates used naysaying tactics in their campaigning?
Which candidate dropped out of the race, leaving the field to nine candidates?
Which candidate, after dropping out, went on to endorse Kerry?
Which troubled candidate did Carol Moseley Braun end up endorsing, after she dropped out?
The continual playing of Dean's post-rally speech by the media stirred what type of controversy?
What tag did the media attach to Dean's post-rally speech?
Did those in attendance at Dean's speech know about the "Dean Scream"?
Which candidate went on to win the South Carolina primary?
Which candidate won the Oklahoma primary?
Which candidate dropped out of the race, following losing the Oklahoma primary?
Which candidate received heighted support after winning caucuses and primaries in many states?
After Clark and Dean dropped out, which candidate was considered to be the only real contender against Kerry?
Which candidate was the fore-runner after definitively winning in the primaries and Minnesota caucuses?
Which candidate won his state primary, despite having already dropped out of his race?
Which candidate finished in second place in the Georgia primary?
Besides Georgia, what other state primary did Edwards win?
Which candidate dropped out of the race, next after Edwards?
What was the primary focus of Bush's campaign?
How did Bush try to convey that he was the stronger, tougher candidate?
What phrase did Kerry use to try to express that he was more concerned for America?
What does Kerry feel Bush aliented the American people with?
The stategy that Bush used against Kerry was compared to what other similar strategy in the past?
Who was accused on not fulfilling their military service, during the fall of 2004?
What shifted attention away from the coverage regarding Bush's controvery regarding his required service?
Which news agency came under review resulting in the firing of their producer?
Which time period came into the spotlight, during the fall of 2004?
What did the documents that were aired during the 60 Minutes segment come to be known as?
Where did the first debate, between Kerry and Bush take place?
Who was considered to have been the winner of the debate?
Who was the moderator of the first debate between Kerry and Bush?
What was thought to be the main focal point of the debate?
How did the opinion regarding Kerry change, after being delared the winner of the debate?
Where was the second debate for presidency held?
Was the second debate held in a rigid, formalistic manner?
Was there a specific topic as the main focus for the second debate?
Who was the moderator of the second debate, held at the Washington University?
How many debates were there in total, between Kerry and Bush?
Where was the final debate, between Kerry and Bush held?
What was the next biggest competitor for television viewers, next to the debate?
Who did Kerry publicize as a lesbian while discussing gay rights, some time after the debate?
What did Cheney refer to him as, after hearing Kerry's comments about his daughter?
Who received a certified ballot from the Electoral College, despite his name being spelled incorrectly on the ballot?
Had there ever been a time where an elector voted for the same candidate to be both president and vice president?
Which candidate won the unanimous vote for vice presidency?
What is different in comparison between the 1800 electoral system and the system in place in 2004?
In the 1800 election, why did Thomas Jefferson get the second vote?
Was there any debate about the voting process in Ohio?
What was the decision regarding the motion to re-count the votes, after each House finalized their debates?
Who was the lone supporter of the motion, from the Senate?
How many people from the House of Representatives did not vote?
What did Kerry say affected the ability to know if the results of the Ohio vote was unbiased?
Which Democratic official supported Kerry's theory about the Ohio votes?
What was said about the devices used to collect the votes, in Ohio?
Who was targeted for defrauding the electoral process, in Ohio?
Who was called in to watch over the presidential election in 2004?
Was this the only occasion the OSCE was invited to preside over a presidential election?
What were the findings of the OSCE team?
What type of values did the OSCE determine were adhered to during the election process?
How were viewers able to determine who endorsed political campaign ads, they saw in advertisements??
What was disallowed in advertising during the two months prior to the general election?
Official advertisements generally contained what phrase?
Independent advertisements generally contained what phrase?
What action suggested by a state, would have affecting the outcome of the electoral votes?
What unique change to the electoral voting process did Colorado suggest should happen?
Which two states designated their assigned votes based on their districts?
Did everyone agree that Amendment 36 was a good idea?
Did Amendment 36 get passed?
What was the original name of IBM?
What does IBM stand for?
In what year was CTR created?
What was the unofficial name given to IBM by analysts?
Who created the IBM name?
In what year did the company that was to become IBM form?
What was the name of the company that eventually became IBM?
In what year did IBM get its name?
What nickname was given to IBM?
What is one parent company of the Computing-Tabulating-Recording Company?
Under what name do research laboratories operated by IBM work under?
How many research labs does IBM have world wide?
In 2013 how many years had IBM generated the most patents by a business?
How many Nobel Prizes have been won by IBM employees?
This IBM invention is known by the acronym UPC, what is the full name?
What was IBM's operating margin in 2004?
What were the net profit margins of IBM in 2004?
IBM's net profit margins were 16.5% in what year?
IBM's operating margin in 2013 was what?
IBM focusing on markets like business continuity, business intelligence, security, and cloud computing is an example of IBM doing what?
In what year did IBM acquire Kenexa?
IBM made an acquisition in 2009, name it.
IBM span off its printer manufacturer in 1991, what was its name?
IBM sold two product lines to Lenovo, name them.
What was the name of the company that IBM Micro Electronics was offloaded to?
On what date did the companies that became the Computing-Tabulating-Recording Company get consolidated?
Name the individual that consolidated the companies that were to become the Computing-Tabulating-Recording Company.
In what year did the companies owned by Computing-Tabulating-Recording Company finally integrate?
Where was the CTR Business office?
In 1933 the four companies owned by CTR had how many employees?
In what year did Thomas J. Watson, Sr. join CTR?
Thomas J. Watson Sr. was fired from what company?
What was the favorite slogan of Thomas J. Watson Sr.?
The revenues did what under the first 4 years of Watson being president?
The name International Business Machines was first used in what year?
What what was the name of the subsidiary working in Germany during World War 2?
Records for how many people were maintained by IBM in 1937?
What service did IBM provide for the Nuremberg Trials?
What year did IBM open its first office in Bahrain?
What was the eventual name of the company that IBM operated in Saudi Arabia?
Thomas Watson Sr. stepped down in what year?
In 1956 the company demonstrated the first example of what?
What computer did Arthur L. Samuel program to play checkers in 1957?
In 1957 the FORTRAN language was created, what is FORTRAN short for?
In 1961 who became the president of IBM?
IBM sold its personal computer business to what company?
In what year did IBM sell its personal computer business?
What was the design for low cost data encryption named?
SPSS Inc. was acquired in what year?
This program was awarded the National Medal of Technology and Innovation.
IBM has how many members on its Board of Directors?
What board member resigned in November 2010?
What year did William R. Brody join the IBM Board of Directors?
Kenneth Chenault is affiliated with what company?
Who is the most recent member to join the IBM Board of Directors?
What building did Van der Rohe create for IBM?
The 330 North Wabash building served as what post World War 2?
The 330 North Wabash Building was recognized with what award?
IBM has towers in which cities?
IBM has worked with architects and designers such as Ludwig Mies van der Rohe, I.M. Pei, and Van der Rohe, name one  more.
Who was the CEO in 1914?
The Quarter Century Club began in this year.
What is the name of IBM's internal magazine?
In 1925 the first meeting of this group occurred.
What is the Hundred Percent Club composed of?
In what year did IBM begin to provide group life insurance?
IBM created a school house in 1933, what was its name?
IBM employees created a magazine in 1935, what was its name?
What program did IBM launch in 1942?
What year did IBM hire its first black salesman?
Who published IBM's first equal opportunity policy letter?
In what year was IBM's first equal opportunity policy letter published?
In 1961 IBM's nondiscrimination policy was expanded to include what?
Starting in 1963 IBM started a program by naming 8 of these.
How many inventors were honored at IBM's first Invention Award Dinner?
What date did Thomas Watson, Jr. send out a letter about IBM hiring the best people regardless of race, gender, or origin?
IBM publicized its hiring policy to help negotiations in two states where in the U.S.?
What kind of workplaces did IBM commit to not building?
IBM expanded their nondiscrimination policy in 1984 to include what?
In what year did IBM add sexual orientation to their nondiscrimination policy?
IBM began supporting this in 1998.
300 Linux kernel developers work here.
IBM created the software framework known as?
What is a notable legal case involving open source and IBM?
What does RDBMS refer to?
IBM runs what website for software developers?
In 2007 what happened to developerWorks?
DeveloperWorks has content about open industry standard technologies like Java and SOA, what is one other industry standard technology it has resources for?
IBM products such as WebSphere and Rational are covered on DeveloperWorks, what other three IBM products are covered?
The Jolt Hall of Fame inducted DeveloperWorks in what year?
What kind of processor was in the Xbox 360?
How quickly did IBM take to create the Xbox 360 processor?
Playstation 3 featured which microprocessor?
Who helped IBM develop the Playstation 3 microprocessor?
What year did the Nintendo Wii U, partly developed by IBM, debut?
What is the name of the program that IBM uses to search for new start-up companies to solve world problems?
How many SmartCamp events does IBM hold worldwide?
Who has IBM partnered with to allow retail shoppers to easily donate money?
Charities of which nation benefit from the IBM partnership with Pennies?
What company is known for the electronic charity box?
What is economic liberalism sometimes also referred to?
Does the Liberal Party of Australia consider itself socialist or anti-socialist?
Who was the Liberal Party of Australia's longest-serving leader?
Who founded Australia's liberal party?
Whom are referred to as "The forgoten people?"
In what year were the Australian Democrats founded?
Which former liberal founded the Australian Democrats in 1977?
Which group was predecessor to the Liberals?
From where did the ideology of the Liberals stem?
What did the Commonwealth Liberal Party merge to form?
In what year was the Nationalist Party of Australia formed?
What economic event influenced the 1931 Election?
How many consecutive elections did the Lyons Government win?
What event caused Robert Menzies to become Prime Minister?
What years did Robert Menzies serve as Prime Minister?
Where was the formation of the Liberal party officially announced?
Where did the name "Liberal" come from?
What was the name of the Liberal Party's youth division?
How many members were in the Young Liberals by Sept 1945?
What was a key political topic in the 1950s and 1960s?
What actions showed Menzies' anti-Communist beliefs?
Over what did the Labor party divide?
Which treaty was Australia's first military alliance outside of the British Commonwealth?
Which areas were involved in the ANZUS Treaty?
What does the acronym SEATO stand for?
Which group is a counterpart to NATO?
Where was the signing of the ANZUS Treaty held in 1951?
What did the Immigration Act's entry permit system include?
Which ruling allowed indigenous Australians the right to vote?
Who was the first women to serve on the Australian Cabinet?
Which government put an emphasis in supporting the arts?
Which government established equal pay for men and women?
What year did the Gorton Government stop replacing troups in Vietnam?
Which continent did Gorton wish to pursue closer ties with?
Who commented that Gorton was not fit to be Prime Minister?
Was Gorton impeached, voted out, or did he resign?
Which countries did Gorton maintain close relationships with?
Who became the first indigenous Austrailian in Parliament?
How long did Bonner serve as a Liberal Senator?
How was Bonner appointed his position?
Which document allowed Indigenous peoples the right to some traditional lands?
What environmental consequence affected the Australian economy by 1983?
Which party did Don Chipp seperate to form in 1977?
Who did Frazer eventually lose to in 1983?
How was Howard different from Paul Keating?
In what ways was Howard similar to Paul Keating?
Which government supported the US's war Afghanistan and Iraq?
Under what agreement did the Australian government support the US?
Which parties merged in Queensland in 2008 to form the new Liberal National Party of Queensland?
In March 2012, which party won by an historic landslide?
Who led the new Liberal National Party of Queensland through the election in March 2012?
How close was the race betwen Turnbull and Abbott in 2009?
Who was elected to the Parliamentary Liberal Party after the 2007 Federal Election?
To whom did Nelson lose the party to in 2008?
Who is the Australian Liberal Party's leader?
Who was Turnbull elected to replace?
Who is the Australian Party's deputy leader?
What was the former name of the Turnbull Government?
Who was the first indigenous Australian elected to the House?
In what year was the first indigenous Australian elected to the House of Representatives?
In what year was the first Aboriginal Senator elected?
How many state divisions exist in the Liberal Party's organisation?
Which politician purposely created strong state divisions to a weaker national party?
Who makes party policy?
How long was Tom Playford in political power?
How many consecutive losses has the Liberal party faced since the 2002 election?
During what years did the dismantling of the Playmander begin?
When was the Genpei war?
Who was given the right to appoint shugo?
What was Minamoto's position?
Who opened the Kamakura Bakufu Shogunate?
When did the Kamakura Bakufu Shogunate open?
Who was the first warrior to become imperial advisor?
Who established the first samurai-led administration?
Who succeeded the Taira clan?
What role did the Emperor have in the samurai-controlled government?
How did the Taira clan expand power?
What was built around Hakata Bay?
When did Japan begin building the Hakata Bay barrier?
When did Japan finish building the Hakata Bay barrier?
How long was the Hakata Bay barrier?
What happened to diplomatic envoys the Mongols sent to Japan?
Who used arquebuses a lot?
What did Oda Nobunaga value?
Who disarmed Japan's Buddhist monks?
When did Oda Nobunaga die?
Who caused Oda Nobunaga's death?
Which force invaded Japan in 1853?
Who lead the US Navy's invasion of Japan?
What was Perry's goal in Japan?
What technology helped the downfall of samurai?
What does a samurai has his heart in the wrong place dislike?
What debt should samurai not forget?
What virtues should samurai not be dismissive of?
Where was Malacca?
Where was Goa?
Who impressed Xavier by taking notes in church?
In what language did Anjiro speak to Xavier?
How did Anjiro think the Japanese would accept Christianity?
Who wrote 'Ideals of the Samurai'?
Who were the models for future generations of samurai?
Where did Japanese warriors come to literary maturity?
How did the samurai treat concubines?
How did the samurai view kidnapping concubines?
Who thought being a concubine was better than being a wife?
Why did merchants prefer that their daughters not marry samurai?
What happened if a commoner concubine had a son?
How common was divorce for samurai?
What could samurai do instead of divorce if their wife couldn't produce a son?
Why did samurai avoid divorcing for reasons of dislike?
What financial concern prevented divorce?
What did samurai wives spend most of their time on?
What did okugatasama mean?
What did samurai wives' duties include when their husbands were away?
What was a naginata?
What was tantojutsu?
What characteristics did samurais want their wives to have?
Who did samurai wives have to teach?
Who did samurai wives have to take care of?
Who was a woman supposed to be subservient to?
What defined the samurais' code?
Who was Ashikaga Yoshimasa?
Who was Ashikaga Yoshimasa's wife?
Why did Ashikaga let his wife take over?
Who was Nene?
Who was Yodo-dono the concubine of?
In what period did Japanese women begin being more educated?
What were added to marriage criteria in the Tokugawa period?
What types of advanced books did some Japanese women read?
When had most samurai wives learned to read?
Who is Eiji Yoshikawa?
Why are Eiji Yoshikawa's books popular?
What are Japanese comic books called?
What are Japanese animation called?
What is the purpose of testing software?
Why is it so difficult to locate bugs in software?
What can come from one bug being fixed?
What is the primamry reason for testing software?
What can testing software not fully completely establish?
What does the scope of testing the software also look at?
Which two teams would you normally separate when writing and testing software?
What is the first step that leads to a software failure?
What is the result of the programmer making a mistake?
When can software defects in dead code cause problems?
Although software developers are unable to test everything, what do they run to keep the testing to a minimum? 
What does the use of combinatorial testing consist of?
What two types of testing are involved with combinatorial testing as mentioned here?
Name three approaches software testers take when testing their software?
What is the term that is used to described executing programmed code with a given set of test?
When can dynamic testing occur?
What are commonly used techniques during dynamic testing?
What is another term used for White-box testing?
What is involved with White-box testing?
Which two procedures are used to design test cases in White-box testing?
What is the main difference between black-box testing and white-box testing?
What are the software testers aware of?
What are the first three methods mentioned that make up black-box testing??
What term is used to test functionality of the software accordingly with the application requirements?
What are the test cases built around?
When building test cases which of the two methods used is more common over the other?
What is one huge advantage to using the black-box method?
What can black-box testing sometimes be referred to with the in-ability to see the code?
What is a good reason to have testers and developers separate?
What does grey-box testing involve?
What does a grey-box tester not need to run their test?
What does not qualify as grey-box testing?
What does a grey-box tester implement when they have limited information?
What dopes a typical grey-box tester sets up?
What does the tester execute while performing certain actions?
What are the four recognized levels of testing software?
What are these test (level testing) typically grouped by?
What is defined in the SWEBOK guide as to testing the main levels?
What are the other levels classified by?
What is the main reasoning behind Unit testing that involves synchronization of the application on a broad spectrum? 
Who performs the Unit testing phase?
What does Unit testing look to eliminate?
By elimination construction errors, what is the expected end result?
What is it called to check data passed between units?
What is it called when data is being passed?
What is an option  of component interface testing  used while sending message packets?
What is a variation of black-box testing?
What is the term used to test software during a pre-release?
What does Operational Acceptance focus on?
What is Operational Acceptance limited to while testing?
What is the most common reason for software failure?
What do developers commonly do when creating software that can lead to failures?
What is the most common cause for software failure?
What often lacks in software developed when its released that can eventually lead to errors?
What does backwards compatibility always seem to be the cause of errors and bugs after a release?
Finding defects once a change in code had already happened is called?
What happens to software after a major change in code that leads to regression??
What is a common method used during regression testing?
What determines how deep a tester will go during regression?
If changes need to occur during the softwares early release with regression testing how much of an impact does this have on the team as related to other testing? 
What typically comes after the Alpha stage in the development and testing of software?
To whom is the beta testing released to?
What is it called when a public test continues indefinitely?
What method is used to cause a system to fail?
What does Destructive testing verify?
What is one example of failure testing?
What method is used to test software under a specific load?
What two methods can be used when using Load Testing?
What is called to test software functions when certain components increase in side?
What is Stable testing also called?
What method is used to test components under unexpected workloads?
What method is used that involves synchronization of a application?
When is development testing used?
What does Development testing look to eliminate?
Which two current movements adhere to the "test-driven software development"?
Under the development of agile software and extreme programing what is written first?
What is the goal of Unit testing?
What three components make up Bottom Up Testing?
Bottom Up Testing helps facilitate the testing of what?
What does Bottom Up Testing also help with once the process has been repeated over and over again at all levels?
If the number of states is unknown, what group does this fall into?
There are three classes, what has been concluded and proven for all classes?
If the number of states are unknown and the finite state of the machine is failing for a single trace, which group does this fall into?
With several certifications out there that can be aquired, what is the one trait they all share?
What has the inability for the applicant to show how well they test led to?
What four traits can a certification not measure?
What makes up part of the SQA?
What is the primary concern for the software specialist and auditors?
What type of software would have a better defect tolerance?
What ingredient makes glass colorful?
What in combination with glass fibers is used to make fiberglass?
What quality of silicate glass allows it to be used for windows?
What type of glass products can be used for sending information?
In what product are glass fibers used to hold dead air?
What element is used in glass to keep it from becoming too hot?
How does barium affect glass?
What property of thorium oxide has caused it to no longer be used in eyeglasses?
What is another name for lead glass?
What is the benefit of thorium oxide in addition to its refractive index?
What happens during refining?
What method is used for making windows?
What is used on the surface of window glass to make it smooth?
What is added to the glass of jars to improve water resistance?
Who were the inventors of the float glass process?
What can be used to make glass less refractive?
What is the refraction index of typical glass?
What is a toxic additive that increases refraction?
What are high-index glasses erroneously called?
Why are high-index glasses valued?
Which kinds of glass existed the furthest in the past?
What kind of glass are containers made from?
What is sand mostly made of?
What can a very strong and transparent glass be made from?
What types of glass is the word commonly used to mean?
What kind of glass exists in nature?
Obsidian is what type of glass?
What was obsidian used to make in prehistoric times?
When are the oldest beads thought to have been made?
What glass-like material is made with a method related to glazing?
What can give glass a faint green tinge?
What can prevent a green color in glass?
What other than additives can give glass a yellow color?
What chemical compounds can make glass nearly black?
Charged ions can be used to produce what in glass?
What word does "glass" come from?
Where did glasswork begin relatively late?
In what year did glassmaking begin in Asia?
What city was a center of glass production for the Romans?
In what current country is Trier located?
What type of glass is used in cars?
When did eyeglasses originate?
The walls of skyscrapers are often made of what material?
What type of power systems use glass?
What type of scientists rely on glass for distant observations?
What components of glass for networks?
What type of components change the network's shape?
What type of component can both make and change networks?
What type of chemical attachment connects ions to the network?
What component gives glass the ability to conduct electricity?
How can glass be prevented from corroding?
What types of ions does typical glass have?
Reaction with what causes dealkalization?
What can alkaline ions in glass harm, in addition to electrical resistance?
What material is useful in glassmaking because of its slow evaporation?
What containers are used for melting?
Why are different materials used in a lab than are used in factory production?
What is the reason for crushing the glass and melting it again?
Why is glass annealed?
Who coined the term "splat cooling"?
What are thick alloys made in layers called?
What does Liquidmetal Technologies use for their alloys?
What type of metal makes better alloys than traditional steel?
At what university was Klement a student?
Who showed that q-glass could be produced from a melt?
What shows that there is an inner surface between glass and melt?
What is q-glass?
What kind of microscope shows that q-glass grows as separate particles?
What word means that ceramics don't absorb liquids?
What hardens glass-ceramics?
What materials do glass ceramics have a lot in common with?
What were the areas at the center of an old sheet of glass called?
In early 20th century glass production, the glass was thickest at what part of the sheet?
Currently window glass is made as what?
How was the bull's-eye used?
What was the benefit of installing glass with the thick side at the bottom, in addition to avoiding water accumulation?
Who used to make window panes?
What is the name for the glassmaking method that involved spinning it into sheets?
The thickness at the bottom of glass panes was once taken as evidence that glass had features of what state of matter?
When does glass stop moving like a liquid?
How is "glass" defined in physics?
What is the tendency to make a glass when cooled called?
What must happen quickly for glass to form?
What predicts glass-forming ability?
What does glass not have, leading some to think it is a liquid?
What theory isn't completely valid for glass?
Transition in glass is comparable to what?
Atomically, glass is similar to what?
What acts like a liquid but is under the freezing temperature?
Despite its atomic structure, cooled glass acts like what?
In cooled glass, what types of movement stop?
What drives the wider acceptance of renewable energy technologies?
Denmark has a committment to 100 percent renewable energy by what year?
How many countries now have renewable energy policies?
How much was the total investment in renewable energy in 2012?
Why did the total investment in renewable energy go down in 2012?
What  six were the top countries for investment in recent years?
Who has shown support for ambitious renewable energy goals?
What group polled the 27 EU member states in 2010?
The goal was to increase the share of renewable energy in the EU by 20 percent in what year?
By the end of 2011, total renewable power capacity worldwide exceeded what number?
Renewables contributed what percentage to our energy consumption?
Renewables contributed what percentage to our electricity generation?
Who led the world in renewable energy production in 2013?
Since what year has production of solar cells in China expanded 100-fold?
What is the main driver of reduced costs?
What is getting cheaper as a result of technilogical change?
As of what year have there been substantial reductions in the cost of solar and wind technologies?
What group stated that "cost reductions in critical technologies, such as wind and solar, are set to continue?"
What is the most economic solution for new grid-connected capacity in areas with good resources?
What happens as the scope of economically viable applications increases?
What are now often the most economic solution for new generating capacity?
What is one problem with biomass?
What can be economically competetive but may still require deployment support?
What is a fully maturing technology which offer a ready disposal mechanismm?
Hydropower is produced in how many countries?
Which country is the largest hydroelectricity producer?
What is the average cost of electricity from a hydro plant larger than 10 megawatts?
How many hydroelectricity plants are larger than 10 GW?
What was the geothermal capacity in 1975?
What was the geothermal capacity in 2008?
In the Phillipines, geothermal represented what percentage of the total power mix at the end of 2008?
Where have the majority of photovoltaic power stations been built?
Where is Charanka Solar Park?
Where is the Agua Caliente Solar Project located?
Where is Desert Sunlight Solar Farm currently under construction?
Where is Desert Sunlight Solar Farm?
Who is building The Califoria Valley Solar Ranch?
How is the wind industry in the USA able to produce more power at lower cost?
How tall are new wind turbines that are being built in Indiana, Michigan and Ohio?
Wind turbines in the USA can now compete with what type of fuel?
Prices have fallen as low as what price?
Where is the Ivanpah Solar Power Facility located?
What is the world's largest solar-thermal power plant project currently under construction?
Where is the PS20 solar power tower located?
Nearly all gasoline sold in the U.S. is mixed with what percentage of ethanol?
What act calls for 7.5 billion US gallons of biofuels to be used annually by 2012?
Name one company that sells flexible-fuel cars?
What can be made from plant matter composed primarily of inedible celllose fibers thta form the stems and branches of most plants?
What are potential sources of cellulosic biomass?
What is a promising cellulose source that can be sustainably produced in many regions?
As of 2008, geothermal power development was underway in more than how many countries?
What is one new technology attributed to the growth of geothermal power?
What is operational in the USA, Australia, Germany, France and The United Kingdom?
The PV industry has seen drops in module prices since what year?
What is a sign that further price reductions are likely in coming years?
What cost is often regarded as marking the achievment of grid parity for PV?
Why do utility operators often reject renewable resources?
Why do consumers often ignore renewable power systems?
Who argued that some of the problems facing renewable energy are more about culture and institutions than engineering and science?
Lester Brown states that the market does not incorporate what?
Who believes that the market does not value nature's service adequately?
What can help over come the problems with the market?
What involves lowering income taxes while raising levies?
Several Western European companies are shifting taxes in a process known as what?
What is the purpose of tax shifting?
Besides tax shifting, what is another need?
What was the result of publicly funded links among computers in government labs and reserach institutes?
What helped create the modern wind power industry?
As of 2012, what accounts for about half of new nameplate electrical capacity?
What involves the deployment of three generations of renewable energy technologies dating back more than 100 years?
Name one second-generation technology that is market ready.
What group advocates leveling the playing field?
How does the International Solar Energy Society propse to level the playing field?
What is the key to stabilizing the earth's climate?
What country is reducing its coal subsidy?
What country has been increasing its support for the fossil fuel and nuclear industries?
Some countries have phased out all subsidies for what substance?
Setting national renewable energy targets can be an important part of what?
The European Union has prescribed an indicative renewable energy target of what percent?
Name one outher country with defined national or regional target?
What is the driving force behind voluntary green electricity within the EU?
What states that EU Member States must ensure that the origin of electricity produced from renewables can be guaranteed?
In the US, what is the main tool to track and stimulate voluntary actions?
What made a strong economic case for investing in low carbon technologies?
In what year did a number of events push renewable energy up the political agenda?
What is driving increasing rates of investment in the renewable energy industry?
What helped the industry weather the 2009 economic crisis better than other sectors?
What suggests that the commercialization of clean energy will hellp countries deal with economic malaise?
Which company became invovled in a political controversy?
What company filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy?
What plays a major role in the energy mix of many countries?
What is becoming increasingly economic in both developing and devloped countries?
As of 2012, prices for what commodity continued to drop?
Who is United Nations' Secretary-General?
Ban Ki-moon states that renewable energy has the ability to lift the poorest nations to new levels of prosperity?
Who is chair of UN Energy?
Who is chairman of Bank of America?
In 2012, solar electricity consumption increased by what percentage?
Use of wind power in 2012 increased by what percentage?
How much was the worldwide investment in solar power in 2012?
Analysts expect the market to triple by what year?
In what year did investment in renewables exceed fossils?
What motivated the incentive to use 100 percent renewable energy?
How many nations already have renewable energy contributing to more than 20 percent of energy supply?
Who developed a series of stabilization wedges?
Who is a professor of civil and environmental engineering at Stanford University?
What is a barrier to implementing the renewable energy plan?
Who stated that energy costs with a wind, solar, water system should be similar to today's energy costs?
Jacobson says producing all new energy with wind power, solar power and hydropower is feasible by what year?
In what year was Palermo founded?
What name was Palermo originally founded as?
What group of people founded Palermo?
What did the Greeks name Palermo?
During which years was Palermo ruled by the Arabs?
What types of churches attract tourists to Palermo?
Which town is Sicily's primary industrial and commercial center?
What are Palermo's four main industrial sectors?
What geographic form is Palermo surrounded by?
What geographic form is Palermo surrounded by?
Which author desribed Monte Pelegrino as "The most beautiful promontory in the world?"
Which is the tallest mountain in Sicily?
Where is Monte Pellegrino in relation to other peaks?
How can former rivers be recognised presently?
What is the only remaining waterway in Palermo?
Which two former rivers in Palermo are currently building sites?
What did Phoenicans name their settlement in 734BC?
Besides Ziz, what other two major settlements belonged to the Phoenicians
Why cant artifacts from the Phoenicians be easily excavated?
What is the current name of the road the Phoenicians used for trading?
How had the Vandals earned their strong reputation?
Whom took control of the Vandal's territory after 488?
How was Theodoric different than the Germanic Goths?
What name was the Eastern Roman Empire also known by?
Who is considered a hero by natives for ending Muslim control of Palermo?
What was the family name who returned Palermo to Christianity after reconquest in 1072?
Where was the Kings Court held in the Kingdom of Sicily?
How did the Kingdom of Sicily compare monetarily with the other European staes?
After what treaty did Savoia gain control of Italy?
For what event did Charles III choose Sicily as the location?
Where did the Royal Court reside?
Where did the capital city move in 1817?
Whose son died on the way to Palermo and is buried there?
To what does the term "Sack of Palermo" refer?
Why did Palermo substancially grow in size?
What did Palermo expansion lack?
Where does the first of Palermo's circuits suround?
What was the name of the primary east-west road within the walls of Palaeopolis?
On what road was the eastern edge of the walled city?
What was the purpose of Castello a Mare?
What was used to block passage through the La Cala port?
During which historical period was the wall circuit expanded?
What is a heliometer?
What name is given to the bronze line on the floor of a heliometer?
Which direction does la Meridiana run?
What image is projected on the floor of the heliometer?
How many people were living in the Palermo area in 2010?
What percentage of Palermo residents were female in 2010?
What is the average age of a Palermo resident?
Why has Palermo's population declined from 2001 to 2010?
On what does Palermo's economy rely?
Palermo is the home of what mafia?
Has the level of crime in Palermo risen or declined?
What negative qualities does Palermo carry?
Who is the popular patron saint of Palermo?
When is Palermo's most important religious event of the year held?
Who is said to have ended the Black Death in 1624?
What is The Festino?
What is the symbol for Zinc?
What is the atomic number for Zinc?
What is zinc chemically close to?
What is the oxidation state for zinc?
How many stable isotopes does zinc have?
What is the symbol for zinc?
What is zinc's atomic number?
What other element on the periodic table is zinc similar to?
What is the most common zinc ore?
What is used to extract zinc during the production process?
What two metals are mixed to create Brass?
When was brass first used?
Where was zinc first produced on a large scale?
When was zinc introduced to Europe?
Where is the oldest evidence of pure zinc?
Brass is an alloy of what two elements?
The earliest uses of brass has been attributed to what ancient location?
We have evidence of zinc production dating back to the 6th century thanks to what mine?
What early process was used to make zinc?
What were the names given to zinc by early alchemists?
Who named the element zinc?
What was zinc named after?
Who is credited with discovering zinc?
What two people discovered the electrochemical properties of zinc?
Where can you find zinc chloride?
Who is credited as giving zinc its name?
What does the name zinc or zinke mean?
Who discovered pure metallic zinc?
What is the most common use for zinc?
What is a common use for zinc chloride?
How many people are affected by zinc deficiency?
What can consumption of excess zinc cause?
Where can you find enzymes with a zinc atom in the reactive center?
What can a lack of zinc cause in children?
What is extremely important to prenatal and postnatal development?
What can cause symptoms in children ranging from diarrhea to retarded growth?
In what substance can you find a zinc atom within its reactive center?
What causes symptoms such as lethargy and copper deficiency?
How many radioisotopes of zinc have been discovered?
What is the longest half life of the isotopes?
What does the superscript m represent?
How many excited states does 61Zn have? 
How many excited states does 73Zn have?
What is the most long lived radio isotope?
What is the half life of 72Zn?
How many nuclear isomers does zinc have?
What does the superscript "m" indicate?
What does a metastable isotope do to return to ground state from an excited state?
Because zinc has a filled d-shell, its compounds are usually what?
The ionic radii of what two elements are almost identical?
What is the determining factor where zinc and magnesium are very similar chemically?
Whit what donors does zinc form stable complexes?
What is not known for binary compounds of zinc?
ZnO can be dissolved in what kind of solutions?
What applications do chalcogenides have?
Zinc oxide is believed to be mentioned in what ancient text?
Active zinc mines in India date back to what period?
What process occurred around the 12th century?
When was the Rasaratna Samuccaya written?
What are the two uses of zinc ore mentioned in the Rasaratna Samuccaya?
Who first patented the process that creates an oxide usable in the retort process?
Before John Champion, what was the only element used to produce zinc?
Who built the first horizontal retort smelter?
What did Galvani name the effect he created of causing the frogs legs to twitch?
What is used to produce the metal zinc?
What is froth flotation used for?
What is the first step in zinc metal production?
What percentage of the ore concentrate is zinc?
What two compounds is zinc more reactive than?
What forms as zinc corrodes?
How is zinc applied?
What is used on many common items, such as chain link fences?
What makes zinc an efficient sacrificial anode?
Connecting anodes made from zinc to buried pipe creates what?
What does attaching a zinc disc to a ships iron rudder do?
Why does zinc protect metals exposed to sea water from corroding?
Aside from die casting, what are alloys of zinc mixed with copper, aluminium and magnesium used for?
Alloys of zinc mixed with copper, aluminium and magnesium are marketed as what?
What is possible to produce thanks to the low melting point and low viscosity of zinc aluminium alloy?
What brand name of alloy is supposed to be as strong as steel while still being malleable as plastic?
What can be done when small amounts of lead are added to alloys?
What is made with an alloy of 4% aluminium mixed with 96% zinc?
Why are alloys used to make stamping dies rather than metal?
Why isn't unalloyed zinc used in construction applications?
In what form is 1/4 of zinc used in the US?
What kind of zinc compound is used in manufacturing rubber?
What protects the polymers in rubber from ultraviolet radiation?
Why is zinc oxide useful in photocopying products?
What kind of process is the zinc zinc-oxide cycle?
What is added to wood in order to preserve it?
What is the feature of zinc sufide that makes it useful in television screens?
What kind of lasers are crystals of zinc suflde used in?
What is the most abundant zinc isotope?
What does 65Zn produce?
Why is zinc oxide used in nuclear reactors?
What is used to study how alloys containing zinc wear out?
What consumable product is zinc included in?
What property of zinc is believed to protect against skin aging?
What is the benefit of zinc after injury?
What kind of cancer cells may zinc prove to kill?
What type of agent is zync useful as against prostate cancer?
What could overuse of zinc possibly cause?
What role does zinc play in fingers, twists and clusters?
What are proteins that druing replication and transcription of DNA, recognize base DNA?
How many amino acids do the Zn2+ ions bind to?
What does the transcription factor wrap around?
What is the most common supplement in the US?
Why is zinc carbonate poorly absorbed in the body?
What is the recommended daily dose of zinc supplement in healthy adults?
What is the Tolderable Upper intake of zinc?
Zinc oxide is used to fortify what product?
In what product did  various compounds of zinc show little difference in absorption?
What compound is better absorbed than zinc gluconate?
What is the best absorbed dietary zinc compound?
Symptoms ranging from diarrhea to eye lesions are from what?
What is a symptom of both zinc deficiency and excess?
What is required for animals with zinc deficiency to gain the same weight as animals with sufficient zinc?
What is one way that vegetarians and vegans obtain zinc?
What is found in whole grains that can interfere with zinc absorption?
Where is zinc chelator phytate found?
What kind of diet may require more than 15mg of zinc daily?
What are two billion people in the world deficient in?
800,000 children worldwide die each year due to what?
What is recommended by the WHO for malnutrition and diarrhea?
In what type of soil is zinc deficiency most common?
Growing plants in zinc deficient soil makes them more susceptible to what?
Excess zinc has what effect on plants?
How is zinc primarily added to soil?
What can zinc cause damage to in the nose?
Why was zinc being used in the 1930's?
What did the FDA order removed from stores in 2009?
What product is suggest as a potent heat shock response inducer?
What coin, as of 1982, is now primarily made of zinc?
What is a concern with the new zinc pennies?
Ingesting zinc can cause lack of muscle movement and coordination called what?
Why have people reported zinc intoxication?
What are dogs known to ingest?
What does the zinc coins ingested by dogs cause?
In what animal is zinc toxic to the point of poisonous?
What has been a cause of mass parrot poisonings attributed to zinc?
What century were most four influential books published?
Who wrote Vitruvius Britannicus?
In what century did Palladian architecture become well established?
When was "The Designs of Inigo Jones" book published?
Who was the "architect earl"?
When was Chiswick House designed?
What was the original building that Chiswick House design was reinterpretation?
What is 1734 design is considered one of the finest example of Palladian architecture in England, built in Norfolk?
What additional influences were incorporated into neoclassical architecture by mid 18th century?
What englishman excavated pompeii?
In what city did a generation of French art students study that propelled neoclassical architecture and incorporation broader styles?
When was the second wave of neoclassical architecture?
What term is used to express the first wave of neoclassicism in France?
What is the second wave of neoclassicism in France called?
Up until Napoleaoic regimes, what style remained popular in Italy?
Who began the new phase of neoclassical design?
Where were the inspirations for the new phase of neoclassicism centered?
What book outlines the new trends of neoclassicism in this phase?
During the later 18th century the trend of neoclassic design attempted to simplify what styles?
This new style was an attempt to give what different feel to design?
How would the Empire style of France be characterized by comparison?
What was the origination of the Imperial Roman Style?
What was the corresponding style to Empire in Britain?
In the US, the style during this time of Neoclassical Empire was known as what?
What other architecture style did neoclassical share similarities and vocabulary?
What qualities were more emphasized in neoclassical versus Baroque?
In addition to being flatter, how were individual features handled with neoclasic?
How broad was the reach of high neoclassicism?
What direction did British architecture go in mid 18th century?
What were Robert Wood's influential Greek monuments from mid 18th century?
Who began the revolution of Greek influenced architecture in Britain?
What brothers were instrumental in this Greek movement of neoclassicism?
What author's 20th century writing caused interest in pure neoclassical design?
In what period did Percy Thomas design public building in neoclassical?
Sir Edwin Lutyens' city planning in what city marked a shift in design?
What new design was trending after neoclassical?
When was Malta introduced to neoclassical architecture?
What was the ruler at the time of neoclassical introduction?
When was RNH Bighi built?
In what year did the St Paul's Pro-Cathedral get built? 
In what are of architecture is neoclassical currently classed?
What is the term for sincere traditional-style architecture that sticks to regional architecture?
What is another name for New Classical Architecture?
What is the award for major contributions to traditional of classical architecture in 21st century?
When was the lull in neoclassical architecture?
What is the movement that caused resurgence of neoclassicism?
Many post modern designs feature classic elements in what way?
What recent architect began to take elements of classicism seriously?
Who has stirred controversy for development and design of Chelsea Barracks?
What family was funding the development of former Chelsea Barracks?
What new library illustrates the traditional style of neoclassicism?
What is the name of the library that illustrates the unconventional style of neoclassical?
Is neoclassical design current in Britain?
In what year did the network end American programming?
What foreign programming is shown on the CBC after 1998?
Which recent (2007-2008) shows helped the network regain popularity?
Which company owns the rights to National Hockey League broadcasts?
Where are affiliates of HNIC aired?
Where are HNIC broadcasts aired?
What did the 11pm broadcast of The National omit?
Which title is CBC's flagship newscast?
When did CBC discontinue its late-night broadcast of The National?
During hockey season, when does the late night news update occur?
What times are generally reserved for local newscasts?
When do most other stations view their local newscasts?
When does CBC News Now air?
What year did HNIC begin being broadcasted on CBC?
What did CBC air during the NHL lockout?
On what nights does CBC generally reserve broadcasting for hockey?
What did CBC call it's movie showings during the NHL Lockout?
Which American newscast was taken off the air only two weeks after CBC began showing it?
Why did CBC move The National in some areas?
For what purpose did CBC make significant changes to their broadcasting?
What year did the CBC begin contributing funds to the show Doctor Who?
When did CBC end its Doctor Who contributions?
Which Doctor Who spinoff did CBC contribute to?
Which Australian series has CBC taken interest in?
What stations did CBC broadcast in HD in 2005?
Where is CBC available for free?
What is required to view over-the-air broadcasts?
What station does not identify itself by its call letters?
Who owns and operates most of the CBC television stations?
What are the first two letters of nearly all CBC stations?
What is the last letter of nearly all CBC stations?
Which stations break convention and begin with "CF" instead of "CB"?
What are private affiliates?
Minimally, how many hours are devoted weekly to network programming in CBC's private affiliates?
Which broadcast do affiliates generally carry?
Which CBC affiliate joined E! in February 2006?
Which affiliate left CBC due to an agreement with CHBC?
What two affiliates joined E! in late August, 2008 after which transmitters were not replaced?
CJFC, CHAT, and CKPG are owned by whom?
What was Canada's date for the switch between analog and digital transmission?
What did CBC announce on August 31, 2011?
In March 2011, CBC and CKPR agreed to continue working together for how many additional years?
Who purchased CFTK and CJDC in March 2012?
When did CBC shut down its analogue transmitter?
Which CBC location has a lapsed area of coverage after 2010?
Which US city can receive broadcasts from CBC's London transmitter?
Why is CBC's coverage preferable to other networks in the US?
Did CBC air more or less live Olympic events than NBC?
Why was NBC criticized over its Olympic coverage?
When was CBC's anologue upgrade extension set to expire?
At the deadline, which area lost broadcast entirely?
Did Barrie, Ontario lose signal for CBC, Radio-Canada, or both?
How many people were intended to be served by digital transmitters, according to CBC's application?
How many people were previously served by analogue transmitters before the upgrade?
In what area of Victora was CBC and Radio-Canada available?
How many transmitters does currently CBC operate after 2012?
When did the CBC announce service would be discontinued to analogue transmitters?
How much did CBC say they would save by ceasing analogue operation?
How many transmitters did CBC intend to upgrade before August 2011?
For what reason did CBC attribute to delayed upgrades?
How many transmitters did CBC plan to upgrade total?
On which day did CBC release an updated announcement stating they were striving to update all 27 transmitters?
On what date did CBC say it was striving to update its analogue transmitters by?
Why did the CTRC send out a bulletin to broadcasters?
On what day did the CRTC agree to allow CBCs broadcasting transmitters to remain active for another year?
Where could CBC's channels need to be relocated in order to continue operating?
Which of CBC's channels were required to be relocated or reduced in power?
On what date did the CTRC approve the shut down of CBC's analogue transmitters?
On what date were CBC's remaining analogue transmitters shut down?
How many analogue transmitters were shut down on July 31, 2012?
What country do the Appalachian mountains extend into?
How large is the zone in Canada?
Where does it start in Canada?
Where does it end in the US? 
What island is included in the range?
What does the term Appalachian refer to?
What states comprise of the southern Appalachian mountains?
What area is usually grouped with the Appalachians? 
What mountains does that region include?
What is the plateau known as in West Virginia?
What does the Great Appalachian Valley do?
What is common among all the mountains in the range?
How tall are the mountains in Newfoundland?
How tall are the mountains in Nova Scotia?
How tall are the mountains in Maine?
How tall are the mountains in New Hampshire?
How many summits in PA are over 2,500 ft? 
How tall are the summits of Mount Davis and Blue Knob?
How tall are Eagle Rock and Dans Mountain?
How tall is the Pinnacle?
How many peaks are over 4,000 feet in WV?
Where do the Blue Ridge Mountains begin?
What are the typical elevations of the Blue Ridge Mountains?
How tall is Quirauk Mountain?
How tall are the Blue Ridge Mountains in Virginia?
What is the tallest Appalachian mountain in Virginia?
Where did the mountains lay before the French and Indian War?
What happened after the French and Indian War?
What was the general opinion of the law?
What did the law likely lead to?
What did the backcountry settlers want to secure?
Where did a lot of Germans settle? 
What dialect was created because of this?
Where did these Germans eventually occupy?
What is one typical bird found in the range?
How many species of tree squirrel are commonly found in the range?
What is the most commonly seen species?
What does the squirrel share its habitat with?
What is found more in the northern portions?
Which species is commonly found more in spruce-fir forests?
What trees are typically found in the dryer portions?
What species of tree was pretty much eliminated?
What does the tree live on?
What trees replaced chestnut trees?
What kind of oaks are in the central and southern portions?
What other tree is common there?
What trees are located in drier portions?
What is a property of objects which can be transferred to other objects or converted into different forms?
In SI units, energy is measured in what measurement?
Mechanically, one joule is defined as what?
Common energy forms include what?
In Newtonian physics, there is a universal law that says energy can be neither created nor what?
What law states, in part, that energy can change from one form to another?
How can the total energy of a system be calculated?
The limit to the amount of heat energy that can do work in a cyclic process is known as what?
What can be fully converted into work in a reversible isothermal expansion of an ideal gas?
What states that the system doing work always loses some energy as waste heat?
Give one example of energy transformation.
What transforms nuclear potential energy to other forms of energy?
What is another example of energy transformation?
What is determined by an object's movement through space?
What usually consists partly of kinetic and partly of potential energy?
What is a function of the position of an object within a field?
What is dependent upon electrical potential energy?
Where is chemical energy stored and released?
Some types of energy are a varying mix of potential and what other kind of energy?
What is a term for living force?
What is defined as the product of mass of an object and its velocity squared?
Who proposed the idea of the Latin: vis viva?
In what century did Leibniz propose the idea of Latin: vis viva?
Who shared Leibniz's view that thermal energy consisted of random motion of the constituent parts of matter?
Who was possibly the first to use the term "energy" instead of vis viva?
When did Thomas Young use the term "energy" instead of vis viva?
Who coined the term "potential energy?"
Who discovered the link between mechanical work and the generation of heat?
When was the law of conservation of energy first postulated?
What is another energy-related concept?
Who is the Lagrangian named after?
What is defined as the kinetic energy minus the potential energy?
Is the Lagrange formalism or the Hamiltonian more convenient for non-conservative systems?
When was Noether's theorem created?
What states that any differentiable symmetry of the action of a physical system has a corresponding conservation law?
What has become a fundamental tool of modern theoretical physics and the calculus of variations?
What is also captured by plants as chemical potential energy in photosynthesis?
What do plants release during photosynthesis?
What may be triggered suddenly by a spark?
What are two low-energy compounds?
What states that energy tends to become more evenly spread out across the universe?
What are remarkably inefficient in their use of the energy they receive?
Complex organisms can occupy this, that are not available to their simpler brethern?
This drives many weather phenomena, save those generated by volcanic events.
When may sunlight be stored as gravitational potential energy?
What is an example of a solar-mediated weather event?
What occurs when large unstable areas of warm ocean, heated over months, give up some of their thermal energy suddenly to power a few days of violent air movement?
What releases stored elastic potential energy in rocks?
What does radioactive decay of atoms in the core of the Earth release?
What drives plate tectonics and may lift mountains via orogenesis?
What is mechanical potential energy?
What is driven by various kinds of energy transformations?
What releases another store of potential energy which was created at the time of the Big Bang?
What theory states that space expanded and the universe cooled too rapidly for hydrogen to completely fuse into heavier elements?
Hydrogen represents a store of potential energy that can be released by what?
What states that there are strict limits to how efficiently heat can be converted into a work in a cyclic process?
What is the direction of transformations in energy?
What is often determined by entropy considerations?
Why are certain larger transformations not permitted?
Name an example of a heavy isotope?
Name another example of a heavy isotope.
What is a process ultimately using the gravitational potential energy in the creation of these heavy elements before they were incorporated into the solar system and the Earth?
In the case of a chemical explosion, what is transformed to kinetic energy and thermal energy in a short time?
Matter may be converted to what?
Energy may be converted to what?
Why is a loss of energy difficult to measure by weight?
Where are examples of energy transformation into matter found?
Thermodynamics divides energy information into what two kinds?
What divides energy transformation into two kinds reversible processes and irreversible processes?
A reversible process is one in which this does not happen.
As the universe evolves in time, more and more of its energy becomes trapped in what?
What is it referred to when more and more of energy becomes trapped in irreversible states?
In this heat death of energy, what does not change?
According to what, energy can neither be created nor destroyed by itself?
The total inflow of energy into a system must equal what?
What can neither be created nor destroyed by itself; it can only be transformed?
What shows that the conservation of energy is a mathematical consequence of translational symmetry of time?
What is the quantity which is canonical conjugate to time?
This mathematical entanglement of energy and time results in what?
What states it is impossible to define the exact amount of energy during any definite time interval?
What are simply lowest quantum mechanical energy state of photons?
What is responsible for electrostatic interaction between electric charges?
What results in Coulomb law?
What can be considered for the special case of systems which are closed to transfers of matter?
The portion of energy which does not do work during the transfer is called what?
Give one example of how energy can be transferred between systems?
What asserts that energy is always conserved and that heat flow is a form of energy transfer.
The first law of thermodynamics asserts that what is always conserved and that heat flow is a form of energy transfer?
What is a commonly used corollary of the first law?
What is the principle that is vitally important to understanding the behaviour of a quantity closely related to energy?
What is entropy?
What is the mathematical result when an isolated system is given more degrees of freedom?
Who defeated the native Prussians during the 13 century?
What other groups during this period for form minorities?
The Balts were gradually converted into which religion?
Which ethnic group become dominant following the 13 century just a few hundred years later?
Around when did the Old Prussian language become extinct?
Why were the prince electors able to proclaim themselves King of Prussia?
In what year were the prince electors elect them selves as King?
What time period did East Prussia and West Prussia join to become Prussia?
Who converted to Lutheranism and secularized the Prussian branch of the Teutonic Order?
In what year did The Teutonic Order lose Eastern Prussia?
What did Albert establish himself as?
In what year did Maximilian III die?
What happened as a result of Maximilian's death?
Who revoked the King of Poland's sovereignty over Prussia in 1660?
Was the population of the Prussian province in 1900?
Which religious group made up the majority of the population in Prussia?
Due to Germanization which three groups saw a decrease in Prussia?
Which country invaded east Prussia in World War I?
Why did the Russian army face such little resistance when moving through Prussia?
In what year did the battle of Tannenberg take place?
How many people lived in Easy Prussia in 1939?
Of the population in East Prussia, what percentage of those were German?
How many East Prussian Jews were around in 1939?
In what year did the Polish government officially take over the administration in East Prussia?
How was the pre-war population in East Prussia referred to as?
How much did the Ukrainians make up in population as a percentage in East Prussia?
What happened to the Curonians who lived in the area in East Prussia?
What did the Russians consider Curonians?
Where did most of the Curonians flee to in 1958?
What were common task of the corporation formed by the urban and rural districts?
What was the name of the corporation that looked over common task?
What has since happened from 1919 that involve the provincial diets?
Under the reign of who did the Ottoman empire control much of Southeastern Europe?
During what centuries was the Ottoman empire in control of much of Southeast Europe?
How many provinces did the Ottoman empire control at the start of the 17th century?
Along with provinces what type of states did the Ottoman empire have control over?
What regions of Africa were under control of the Ottoman empire?
What was the capital of the Ottoman empire?
What Ottoman empire controlled lands contributed to the centre of transactions between East and West ?
When did the Ottoman empire decline?
What nation did the Ottoman empire align with in the 20th century?
What led to the decline of the Ottoman empire?
Which city did Osman's son capture?
In what year did Osman's son capture an Anatolian city?
What was the name of the son of Osman that captured an Anatolian city?
What city was captured from the Venetians in 1387?
In what year did the Ottoman's have a victory at Kosovo?
What was an objective of Turkey after its expansion into the Balkans?
What empire were the controlled lands surrounding Constantinople formerly controlled by?
What leader invaded Anatolia from the east?
Timur was the founder of what?
What battle between Timur and the Ottoman empire took place in 1402?
Who was the son of Murad II?
What city was conquered on 29 May 1453?
What did the Orthodox Church get to keep in exchange for accepting the authority of the Ottoman empire?
The Orthodox population of Constantinople preferred Ottoman rule instead of what?
What was the main obstacle to the expansion of the Ottoman empire into the peninsula of Italy??
France and the Ottoman Empire united against what?
Where did the French lay conquest in 1553?
The conquest of Nice was an effort by Suleiman and what French king?
What were the names of the Ottoman admirals who commanded the conquest of Nice?
What ruler recognized the Ottomans in 1547?
Who argues that there was steep decline and stagnation after the death of Suleiman?
In what year did Suleiman die?
By what year was it argued that the Ottoman empire was merely "a shadow" of what it was in 1566?
Beginning and ending with what years does Lee argue that the rules of the Empire were incompetent?
What factor caused inflation in the Ottoman empire?
Poor rule by what class of people strained the empire?
Europeans gained on the Ottoman empire in what type of technology? 
What types of conservative beliefs slowed the expansion of the empire?
What battle took place in 1683?
The empire ceased its expansion into what area after a battle in 1683?
Avoiding the strength of Ottoman trade was accomplished with the discovery of what?
What did the Portuguese discover in 1488?
Where did the Ottoman and Portuguese have Naval wars in the 16th century?
Who did the Ottomans ally with in the Indian Ocean?
New coins were a proclamation of independence by the Somali Muslim Ajuran Empire from whom?
Which Spaniard led a battle in 1571?
What battle did the Spanish win in 1571?
What siege occurred in 1565?
In what year did Venice sign a peace treaty with the Ottomans?
After signing a peace treaty with Venice, in what region did the Ottoman empire expand?
How many primary schools existed for Christians in the Ottoman empire in 1861?
How many Christian pupils were in ottoman schools in 1861?
Greeks in Istanbul owned how many wholesale companies in 1911?
There were how many wholesale companies in Istanbul in 1911?
Jews and Christians were offered protection in the form of what assistance by Europe?
What historian wrote that banks were the single greatest threat to mid-east independence? 
In what year did the Ottoman Empire declare bankruptcy?
What was the administration that the empire used to control its debt called?
Who served on the debt controlling administration of the Ottoman Empire?
European capital in the Ottoman empire resulted in what?
When did the Russian Caucasus Army advance into eastern Anatolia?
What ethnic group was deported by the Ottoman Government from eastern Anatolia?
How many ethnic Armenians are believed to have died in the Armenian Genocide?
Armenian women and children were deported on death marches through what desert?
Two other ethnic minorities were massacred during Ottoman ethnic cleansing, what were they?
What was the highest ranked person in the Ottoman Empire until the 19th century?
On type of system were the civil administrations of the empire based on? 
Who had control over the clergy in the Ottoman empire?
What was the main responsibility of the Ottoman state as it relates to lands?
What type of practice guided the Ottoman state in its responsibilities?
The sultan of the ottoman empire had what honorific?
What was the council that handled state politics named?
What type of people were initially in the Divan?
At a later point other groups were admitted into the Divan, what groups?
A Grand Vizar began to be appointed in what year?
Who was the one that presided over the empire's Islamic Courts?
At what juncture did the Qadi focus less on precedent?
What was one thing the Ottoman legal system lacked?
What did Qadis focus on in some areas?
What is another word for Qadi?
Reforms in the Ottoman court system were based on what model?
How many tiers did the Ottoman court system adopt?
What was the new Ottoman court system known as?
What code regulated marriage?
The goal of developing Bursa and Istanbul was an intentional act to create what?
Who was Mehmed's successor?
Who did Mehmed and Bayezid encourage to come to Istanbul?
What group were Jews being persecuted by in Europe?
Persecution of Jews in Spain occurred after what event concluded?
The economic goal of the state was to serve as what for the ruler?
In what regions concepts was the Ottoman economic system based on?
What was a way to reach the economic goals of the Ottoman economic system?
What was the final goal of the state economic system?
What did the state economic system hope to avoid?
Two of the most developed economic organizations under the Ottoman Empire were what?
What were the scribes of the chancery known as?
Part of the scribal bureaucracy were trained what?
What did the scribal bureaucracy become?
The Ottoman Empire had the most developed economic organizations among Islamic Governments until which century?
What serviced as the foundation for the structure of the economy of the Ottoman empire?
The Ottoman Empire caused navigators from which two nations to find another route to the Orient?
Who once used the spice route that the Ottoman Empire controlled?
When were direct trade links established with India?
When did Christopher Columbus sail to the Bahamas?
What is believed to have caused the opening of new sea routes during the Ottoman Empire?
The formation of sea routes bypassing the Middle East may have led to the decline of what?
What is another name for the Treaty of Balta Liman?
What did the Treaty of Balta Liman do for Ottoman markets?
In what direction did land routes lose their importance?
The development of what caused people to expand areas of cultivation in the Ottoman Empire?
What dominated all economic and political interests?
What were the types of economies that were being developed in western Europe?
The expansion of international trade through the Empire was the result of what?
What was the official language of the Ottoman Empire?
What were the main influences of the official language of the Empire?
What language was spoken by most people in Anatolia?
Which languages influenced by the empire was spoken in Iraq?
What language was used for religious uses in the Empire?
The Empire had a Christian majority until what time?
What group ruled the empire until the 15th century?
What group began to decline within the Empire in the late 19th century?
Muslims accounted for what amount of the population of the Empire in the 1820s?
In 1914 what portion of the Empire weren't Muslims?
What system deemed non-Muslims subjects of the empire but unbound by Muslim law?
What code had been active for 900 years in the Byzantine empire?
What were non-Muslims also known as in the Islamic Ottoman State?
Being a non-muslim in the Empire resulted in what as it related to taxes?
What millet was subject to Justinian's Code?
The Ottoman dynasty was preceded by what sultanate?
What is one way that the Empire was described as it related to culture?
When the Ottoman empire conquered a region what also became a part of the empire?
The Seljuk Empire was influenced by the cultures of others resulting in it being referred to as what?
What was the biggest influence from the west on Ottoman literature?
During what time period was Ottoman literate most influenced by the west?
During the Tanzimat what western influence could be seen?
The poetic tradition had its biggest influence on what Ottoman literary movements?
Romanticism, and Realism were two movements from the west that influenced the Ottoman literary scene, what was the third?
Ottoman artists mixed Chinese art with the art of what else?
The ottoman empire built structures in Romania that included Mosques, and Bridges, what else was built?
Why did the art of the Ottoman empire develop the way it did?
Beside Edirne, Istanbul, and Egypt what other locations can one find the influence of the Ottoman classical period?
Were would one find the sheets where Ottoman's created illuminated decorations?
What is another name for an Ottoman miniature?
Ottoman calligraphy can also be referred to as what?
Who commissioned illustrated manuscripts in the Ottoman empire?
What palace was the place of creation for illustrated manuscripts?
Which art was important in religious symbolism and as a decoration in the Ottoman empire?
What was the custom for those wearing shoes indoors in the Ottoman empire?
Where did carpet weaving in the Empire originate?
Where did carpet weaving initially spread to inside of the Empire?
Kilims were used by Turks to provide insulation where?
The elites of the Ottoman empire found what type of music important?
Many of the Sultans of the Ottoman empire were accomplished at being what?
The sultan known by what name has compositions which are still performed today?
What rhythmic units does Ottoman classical music use?
What are the melodic units used by Ottoman classical music?
In what century did the Ottoman's start to desire foreign manuscripts?
Which sultan ordered a Greek scholar to do translations of work by Ptolemy?
Who did an Ottoman sultan order to translate work by Ptolemy?
How many years did Ali Qushji spend in Istanbul?
Where was Ali Qushji from?
Which philosophy branch is concerned with issues surrounding ontology?
The philosophy of space and time was inspired by what kind of philosophy?
The  philosophy of space and time focuses on whether or not time and space exist independently of what?
The  philosophy of space and time focuses what kind of flow within time? 
Which 11th century Muslim physicist discussed space perception and its epistemological implications? 
Which 11th century book discussed space perception and its epistemological implications?
Whose definition of topos did Alhazen reject?
Alhazen's  experimental proof of the intromission model of vision led to the change of understanding of what?
Alhazen stated that without tangible notions of distance and size for correlation, sight can tell us what about spatial perception?
What did Leibniz argue against?
Which principles did Leibniz's arguments trade heavily upon?
Leibnitz held that there is a reason that is sufficient to explain what and why it is the way it is and not otherwise for every what?
What states that if there is no way of telling two entities apart, then they are one and the same thing?
Leibniz's example involves how many universes?
Where are Leibniz's universes situated?
How far are Leibniz's universes situated apart?
What is the only way Leibniz's example would be possible?
What stood out in Clark's response to Leibniz?
According to Clark's argument, water in a bucket, hung from a rope and spun, will begin with kind of surface?
As the buck spins, what happens to the water?
If the buck stops, the water will do what?
What is the surface of the water apparently not caused by?
Leibniz describes space as existing only as a relation between what?
According to Leibniz, what has no existence apart from the existence of objections?
What provides the absolute frame of reference within which objects can have motion?
In Newton's system, how does the frame of reference exist between objects within it?
For how long did the evidence of a concave water surface hold authority in reference to space?
How did Mach describe thought experiments like the bucket argument?
What is difficult to confirm about the bucket in the absence of anything else in the universe?
What did Mach argue about the water experiment in an otherwise empty universe?
What did Mach argue would happen if another object were introduce in the bucket's universe?
What does the increase in the number of objects in the universe do to the curvature of the water?
The Mach argument is called what?
Mach argued that the momentum of an object exists as a result of the sum of the effects of what?
lbert Einstein proposed that the laws of physics should be based on what principle?
The principle of relativity holds that the rules of physics must be the same for who?
In all reference frames, how is the the speed of light?
Einstein's theory was motivated by who?
Before Einstein, speed was though to be relative to what?
In classical physics, an inertial reference frame is one in which an object without force does what?
What follows a geodesic of space-time?
An object in free fall does not experience what?
What holds an object standing on earth against the geodesic?
How does Einstein advocate Mach's principle?
How Einstein's theory compared to Leibniz's?
What is considered contrary to idealist beliefs in regards to space?
Coordinative definition has how many major features?
The first feature of Coordinative definition involves what?
What is the first feature motivated by?
The second feature of Coordinative definition involves what?
Sameness of length must be set how?
The symmetry group of the general theory of relativity includes what?
What else besides  invariance, or symmetry and group part ways in relativistic physics?
Which theory does the relativity depart from?
What are not pair with transformations in the theory of relativity?
 The covariance group of the general theory of relativity is the covariance group of how many theories?
How many contradictory facts does the problem of the direction of time arise from?
What kind of physical laws are time-reversal invariant?
If if a cinematographic film were taken by means of physical  laws and then played backwards, it would still portray what?
How is our experience of time at the macro level?
What do we not have memories of?
How are things in statistical mechanics? 
What are superior to classical thermodynamics?
In order to explain glass breaking, Fundamental laws of physics can be paired with what? 
Is statistical mechanics asymmetric or symmetric in regards to time-reversal?
What kind of law is the second law of thermodynamics, as it arises in statistical mechanics?
What does the third type of solution to the problem of the direction of time argue?
What is are kind of nuclear force is not time-reversibile?
Time asymmetric phenomena in quantum mechanics are to few to account what kind of time-asymmetry?
Who argues that the fundamental laws of physics are laws of temporal evolution?
Maudlin argues that the passage of time is what kind of asymmetry?
What grounds the distinction between sequences?
Whose suggestion is difficult to assess in regards to the direction of time?
Who started the discussion within analytic philosophy on the problem of the flow of time?
How many "temporal series" did McTaggart propose?
What was McTaggart's first series called?
The A-Series orders events according to their being in the past, present or future and in comparison to what else?
What is McTaggart's second series called?
How similar are the positions on the persistence of objects?
Who holds  that for an object to persist through time is for it to exist completely at different times?
Who holds for a thing to exist through time is for it to exist as a continuous reality?
Which view is seen as conventional?
Who is an example of a perdurantist?
How can asymmetry of causation be observed?
How many features of asymmetry in the cup example can be viewed?
Asymmetry is attributable to a relation of what kind of direction?
What else, besides direction, is asymmetry attributable to?
What era is commonly known as the final phase of the Stone Age?
What era preceded the Neolithic?
What event is associated with the start of farming?
What era saw an increase in metal tool use?
What objects were not used by early farm societies in the Near East ?
What did the use of pottery help early Japanese societies develop?
What trend led to parts of the world developing their own local Neolithic cultures?
When did the domestication of sheep first appear in Egypt?
How did Egyptians gather food before raising livestock?
What region do some scholars see as the source for Egypt's start in agriculture?
When was the earliest known Asian farm site found in South Korea?
What time period was the Korean farm site dated?
What items were found on the Korean farm site?
What technology will researchers use to measure a more accurate time period for the farm site?
What caused a major increase in social inequality?
What started competition between families for wealth?
Who was in possession of large herds that would produce more livestock?
What settlement featured equal sized homes with little evidence of capital?
Where was evidence of fortified settlements found?
What did some villages fortify their settlements with?
What tools were seen as evidence of violence among settlements?
What site in Talheim suggests violent warfare in the Neolithic era?
What production trait existed in tribal groups that were controlled by charismatic leaders?
What theory describes the implied egalitarianism of Neolithic societies?
What type of disagreement existed in tribal groups that were controlled by charismatic leaders?
What lifestyle element changed significantly from the paleolithic to the neolithic era?
What era consisted of people living temporary homes?
What type of homes were built in the Neolithic era?
What societal trend was the cause of permanent homes?
Where were entrances located in early homes?
What trend led to a major shift in the livelihoods of early cultures?
What behavior did humans rely on to survive before agriculture?
What era saw an increase in permanently settled farming towns?
What were the causes of famine in early farm towns?
What type of societies were not affected by famine?
What type of societies were usually still successful after dealing with famine?
What food related trend was significant in the new agrarian societies?
What forms of availability dictated Pre-agrarian diets?
What was included in the Post-agrarian diet?
What forced the need to supplement food supply with hunting and gathering?
What type of occupation were Neolithic people considered to be proficient at?
What purposes were the production of farm tools used for?
What types of tools did early farmers use for crops?
What types of tools did early farmers use for food production?
What tool allowed early farmers to convert forest into arable land?
Hayek became a member of which group in 1984?
For what reason was Hayek inducted into the order?
What award was Hayek the first to receive?
Who awarded Hayek the Medal of Freedom?
Which of Hayek's articles received recognition in 2011?
Who was among the first readers of Ludwig  Wittgenstein's book?
How often times did Hayek and Wittgenstein meet?
Whose philosophy heavily influenced Hayek?
What did Wittgenstein and Hayek do during the first world war?
What was the name of the book Wittgenstein published in 1921?
What did Hayek conclude regarding his brothers?
With whom did Hayek more frequently converse?
Prior to his schooling, what was the state of Hayek's reading skills?
Who told Hayek he should begin reading Hugo de Vries works?
Which philosopher did Hayek learn about in a school lecture?
Where did Hayek acquire his doctorates?
Where did Hayek learn about the brain?
What was the name of Hayek's first work?
With whom did Hayek establish the Geistkreis?
Where did first show his work?
What work did Hayek begin in 1923?
Where did Carl Menger and Friedrich von Wieser influence Hayek?
For whom did Hayek work upon being hired by Ludwig von Mises?
What was Hayek gathering during his time as a research assistant?
What was the name of the professor Hayek worked for as a research assistant?
What ideology was Hayek originally in support of?
What caused Hayek to turn away from Wiser's ideology?
During his attendance to von Mises' seminars, who did Hayek become friends with?
What viewpoint did the book Socialism shift Hayek toward?
Who is the father of the ideology Hayek came to support?
What position did Hayek gain at the Austrian Institute?
Who requested that Hayek be employed by LSE?
What sort of recognition had Hayek received when he came to London?
What subject did Hayek's works influence and inspire?
In what year did Hayek come to London?
What did Hayek write regarding fascism and socialism?
Whose works served as inspiration for the title of Road to Serfdom?
When was the Road to Serfdom published?
Where was Road to Serfdom more popular than it was in Britain?
Who is responsible for Road to Serfdom being shortened for Reader's Digest in 1945?
Upon leaving London, for what college did he choose to work?
Who supplied Hayek's salary?
What was the cause for the feud between Robert Hutchins and faculty?
Why did the economics department turn down Hayek's employment?
What did Hayek serve on after his initial rejection?
What topic were Hayek's next two books going to cover?
Which of Hayek's books was not as well received as The Road to Serfdom?
As of the release of his 1960 book, how long had it been since The Road to Serfdom was released?
What was the title of the his 1960 book's second chapter?
How did Hayek feel about the success of the book he released in 1960?
What country did Hayek move to in 1962?
What is the name of the book Hayek started upon his arrival in West Germany?
Where did Hayek spend an entire year after his retirement?
When was the final volume of Law, Legislation and Liberty released?
During his time in Los Angeles, what was the topic of the seminars Hayek taught not related to his new book?
What political party was Margaret Thatcher the head of in 1975?
Who did Thatcher meet with shortly after she was elected as the head of her party?
What path was suggested as the right one for Margaret Thatcher's party by a speaker?
Which of Hayek's works did Thatcher produce at the Conservative Research Department?
What was the name of the agreement Hayek criticized in 1977?
What did some Liberal politicians claim the pact was meant to do?
The agreement Hayek criticized was between the British Labour government and which political party?
What did Hayek believe was lost in the continued empowerment of a socialist government?
Which party was criticized for being less concerned about liberty and democracy?
With which political group was David Steel affiliated?
Who disagreed with David Steel's statements in 1978
Which type of government was more favorable than others according to Hayek?
Hayek believed that which type of democracy was the worst of its alternatives?
What group was Hayek inducted into by the Queen of England?
Who suggest Hayek for the honor of joining the Order?
In 1984, what was Margaret Thatcher's position within the British government?
How did Hayek wish to be referred to after his 1984 award?
What was the reason given for Hayek's 1991 award from the President?
Which President presented the award to Hayek?
Where was Hayek when he died?
Where was Hayek buried in relation to his home town of Vienna?
Where was The Use of Knowledge in Society published?
What is the name of Mises' 1912 book?
Hayek focused most of his economic works on the business cycle, money and what else?
What work did Hayek produce as a result of studying Mises' book?
What is the English name for the book Hayek published in 1929?
According to Hayek, what was the cause of the banks' wrongful allocation of funds?
Lionel Robbins came to head which school in 1929?
In regards to economics, Lionel Robbins believe English-speaking academics had what?
Which man's works were mostly the cause of the ''narrow approach''?
Who was responsible for bringing on Hayek at the LSE?
What did Nicholas Kaldor say Hayek brought to macroeconomics?
Hayek's critical analysis of Keyne's work was published under what title?
Apart from easy money, what did Hayek believe unemployment was caused by?
Who did Keynes turn to for assistance in arguing his point to Hayek?
According to Nicholas Kaldor, what had Hayek's book created?
What was the result of Hayek's Prices and Production?
Who was particularly critical of Hayek's work following Prices and Production?
What is the name of the first book Hayek released to revise his stances from Prices and Production?
Lionel Robbins' The Great Depression was a result of his support for what?
Who did Keynes' arguments against the Austrian theory of the business cycle eventually influence?
What topic did Hayek never write a book about as he said he would?
What topic did Hayek shy away from following Pure Theory of Capital?
What did Gunnar Myrdal call Hayek?
Which of Hayeks books did Milton Friedman praise most?
Which whom did Hayek share a Nobel prize?
What did Hayek claim those who must distribute resources would lack most?
Whose work most notably influenced Hayek's argument regarding resource distribution?
What is the one way Hayek argued that resource distribution could succeed?
Other than Max Weber, who was a notable influence to Hayek's statements regarding resource distribution?
What did some socialists bring up as a rebuttal to Hayek's resource distribution argument?
What did socialists believe equilibrium theory invalidated?
According to those who argued against Hayek, what sets planned and free markets apart is what?
What type of economic system did the socialists want to avoid?
Which of Hayek's books argued against the socialist price mechanism?
Which type of economy did Hayek believe the price mechanism to be less effective with?
The arguments presented in The Use of Knowledge in Society created an starting point for who?
The arguments presented in Hayek's 1945 book were a large reason for being granted what award?
What was the name of the ideology Hayek criticized?
How did Hayek believe collectivism could be maintained?
According to Hayek, what is necessary for the implementation of a socialist economy?
Hayek believed the requirements for a socialist economy would lead to what?
What did Hayek believe was the core responsibility of the state?
Hayek believed the state could aid the economy by doing what?
Who did Hayek say economic security should be guaranteed to?
According to Hayek, clothing, food and shelter should be provided to what extent?
What sort of system did Hayek propose the government create?
In what economic field of study does Hayek's views differ from those in macroeconomics?
What is the term used to describe economists following Keynes school of thought?
Whose works inspire the term "Walrasian" in economics?
When did Hayek begin presenting his ideas on the limits of human knowledge?
What did Hayek want society to function around?
What is the responsibility of government in Hayek's market order?
What would be the cause of the success for the Hayek's ideal free-market?
What would Hayek's free-market not require in order to function properly?
What concept did Hayek dislike?
How did Hayek feel regarding income distribution?
What reason does Hayek provide for differences in income distribution not being a matter of just or unjust?
According to Hayek, a society in which income is redistributed is what?
According to Wapshott, who was promoting the implementation of universal health care?
Who did Hayek say should provide a safety net for society?
In which of Hayek's works did he make his statements regarding social insurance?
Who made the claim that Hayek was particularly determined regarding his beliefs on social insurance and a safety net?
What did Hayek claim to be better than investing in government spending programs?
What other notable figure signed the letter in which Hayek made his statement regarding private investment?
Who was responsible for England's return to the use of gold as standard currency?
With whom did Hayek disagree with publicly?
Whose 1980 book mentions "informal" economics?
What is the name of the book Friedman released in 1980?
How is Friedman's book described in regards to the price system?
Which of Hayek's works did Friedman once teach?
Which fellow Vienna native was Hayek friends with?
Who is the only exception from whom Hayek claims to have learned more than he did from Popper?
Hayek dedicated many of his papers to Popper based on a dedication Popper made to him in which of his work?
Which of Popper's works was the first to grasp Hayek's attention?
Popper was present for which notable Mont Pelerin Society event?
Which of Hayek's books had an impact on those against postmodernism?
To whom did Hayek owe his intellectual success?
Carl Menger's work in social explanation was not too different from those in which Scottish period??
In what year was Margaret Thatcher elected Prime Minister?
Whom did the Prime Minister of England choose as secretary of state?
During the 80s and 90s, three major English speaking nations experienced a political shift to to what?
What position did the British Prime Minister's secretary of state previously hold?
One of Hayek's supporters served which US president?
What ideology did Hayek not agree with in an essay appended to The Constitution of Liberty?
What word is used in the United States to identify Hayek's ideology?
Which ideology did Hayek believe conservatism discouraged?
What does conservatism have in common with classical liberalism?
What was Hayek's statement regarding conservatism?
What did Hayek suggest as an alternative to being called a libertarian?
In opposition to conservatives, what group has Hayek's work influenced?
Who wrote an essay as a result of Hayek's "Why I Am Not a Conservative"?
From whom did Hayek acquire the term he proposed as an alternative to libertarian?
In his later years, what term did Hayek use to describe himself?
What term do those who disagree with Hayek use to describe his ideals?
Who was it that claimed Hayek's The Constitution of Liberty to be an thorough example of neoliberal philosophy?
Whose ideals does Brittan believe to win out over Hayek's?
What is diarrhea?
What is one of the effects of diarrhea?
What are the warning signs of dehydration?
What are other signs of dehydration?
What is the most common cause of diarrhea?
What can cause an infection in the intestines?
What are the three types of diarrhea?
What is it known as if blood is present?
What are some ways to prevent diarrhea?
What else can a mom do to prevent diarrhea for her baby?
What is the treatment of choice for diarrhea?
What conditions would a doctor prescribe antibiotics?
What is secretory diarrhea?
What are the causes of secretory diarrhea?
Is there any structural damage associated with secretory diarrhea?
What occures with osmotic diarrhea?
What causes osmotic diarrhea?
How do osmotic lazatives work?
What can cause osmotic diarrhea in healthy people?
When does inflammatory diarrhea occur?
What happens with inflammatory diarrhea?
What can cause inflammatory diarrhea?
What other causes are there for inflammatory diarrhea?
Diarrheal disease has what effects on a person?
What can early childhood malnutrition cause?
What is the cause of childhood malnutrition?
Children who have experienced sever diarrhea are more likely to have what effect?
What is IBS?
What symptoms do you have with IBS?
How can symptoms be managed with IBS?
What is a good indicator of the rate of infectious diarrhea?
Why does living in poverty raise your risk of diarrhea?
What causes this to be exacerbated?
Why is proper nutrition important?
What effects does lower levels of zinc have in children?
What can having a vitamin A deficiency cause?
What is the rate of  vitamin A deficiency in children worldwide?
What did Nesse and Williams learn?
If diarrhea is stopped, would could happen?
What happened with people with Shigella were treated with anti-diarrheal medication?
What is the downfall of using immunization against the pathogens that cause disease?
What is responsible for 6% of dearrheal disease?
What percent is the rotavirus responsible for in diarrheal disease deaths?
What was the effect of the Rotavirus vaccine?
What year was the Rotovirus vaccine used?
What can be done to combate dietary deficiences?
What has been used and shown successful in a decrease in incidence of diarrheal disease?
WHat strategy was found out to be more cost effective?
What can be used to prevent dehydration?
What are some good standard home solutions?
What is a commercial solution that can also be used?
What is the WHO's recipe for ORS?
What are not recommended for younger kids because it can casue more dehydration?
Why are sodas and high sugar fruit juices not recommended?
What can be used to give fluids when they can not drink?
What does WHO recommend?
What does continuing to eat do for your illness?
What happens when a childs food is restricted?
Are antibiotics used in diarrhea instances?
What are the concerns with anitbiotics?
What are bacteria doing that makes them not work as well?
Where was the first madrasa located?
Who was the teacher at the first madrasa?
Who was named as a teacher at the second madrasa, housed in a mosque?
What handwriting art form was taught in the early madaris?
What type of physical fitness activities were taught in the early madaris?
Who traditionally paid for scholars to study natural sciences?
What group of people had the highest literacy rates during the Middle Ages?
What schools had the biggest impact on the rising literacy rates in the Caliphate?
How long did it take for madaris to spread to smaller cities and towns?
When did some madaris become considered like traditional colleges?
What class of people founded both European universities and Islamic madaris
What was considered to be the underlying purpose of madaris?
Who argued that European universities and Islamic madaris have very little in common?
What other religion was considered to share parallels in teaching styles with the Muslim faith?
What was Makdisi accused of doing when evaluating the parallels between European and Islamic schools?
What is the European version of fiqh?
What do scholars believe is the reason for similarities between Islamic and European schools?
What kind of social service was provided through the madaris?
What had a hold over social life in the Ottoman Empire as well as other cultures?
Where did students learn about religious and social norms?
What practice was desired through connecting religion and schools?
What group makes up a larger percentage of people in India?
What problems are arising due to the political conflicts over schools?
What is the largest school for Barelvis people in India?
What disciplines does India want to introduce to madaris?
In what year did the Indian government begin to stop recognizing madaris as schools?
How many Muslim students are there in Kerala?
How many Muslim teachers are there in Kerala?
Who determines the content taught in Arabic public schools?
What types of programs provide traditional Islamic teaching?
What is the format of school for girls and boys?
How many madrasahs are in Sinagapore?
What program is being installed in madrasahs in Singapore?
What year is it planned for IB programs to be in place at Madrasah Al-Arabiah Al-Islamiah?
What will the uniform be at Madrasah Al-Arabiah Al-Islamiah?
How many regions in Singapore have widely accepted madaris?
What law protects the teaching of Arabic and Islamic traditions in Mindanao?
What religion do most people practice in Mindanao?
When did madaris become more accepted in Mindanao?
What curriculum is used in non public madaris in Mindanao?
When was the first madrasa started in North America?
What country has many students that attend Al-Rashid Islamic Institute?
Where is Al-Rashid Islamic Institute?
What organization did Shaykh Muhammad Alsahareef start?
What is the common western perception of the teaching received at madaris?
What type of content is delivered at madaris?
What type of teaching is provided at Indian madaris?
What are the origins of western schools?
How many science disciplines were taught at madaris in the Ottoman Empire?
Who founded Philadelphia?
What role did Philadelphia play in the American Revolution?
What purpose did Philadelphia serve while D.C. was under construction?
When did it reach 2 million occupants>
What was the historical economic base of Philadelphia?
When did the city near bankruptcy?
Where did wealthy residents move?
Who replaced the wealthy?
What is the GDP of the city?
Where does it rank in comparison to other US cities in GDP?
How many Fortune 500 companies call Philadelpia home?
How many domestic tourists visit annually?
What branch of the US military was born in Philadelphia?
What native American tribe lived in the area before settlement?
What other tribe occasionally fought against the Lenape?
What disease killed the most Lenape?
Where did the Lenape go after being pushed out of the Philidelphia area?
Where do the Lenape reside today?
Who were the first settlers to the Delaware Valley?
What was the name of the first settlement in the area?
Who claimed the entire Delaware River?
When did the English conquer the New Netherland colony?
Who founded the Pennsylvania colony?
Who did Penn buy the land from?
What religion did William Penn practice?
When was Philadelphia established as a city?
What type of street layout did Penn use for Philadelphia?
What important revolutionary document was signed in Philadelphia?
When did Philadelphia host the Constitutional Convention?
How many Revolutionary War battles were fought around Philadelphia?
When did the US government leave Philadelphia for D.C.?
What religion did the black community found?
Which city surpassed the population of Philadelphia?
What type of economy did Philadelphia have?
What was Philadelphia's biggest industry during the 19th century?
When was the first World's Fair?
Which were the two biggest immigrant groups in Philadelphia?
What is the size in square miles today?
Who carried out the first strike in North America?
When did the strike take place?
What did the strikers achieve?
Why did so many Irish immigrants come to Philadelphia?
When did the black population explode?
Which political party controlled Philadelphia in the early 20th century?
What phrase could describe Philadelphia of the early 20th century?
When did the first major political reform occur?
When was the peak of Philadelphia's population?
Why did the population decline after this time?
What is the main driver of the economy now?
How much of the population left after 1950?
What is another large industry?
Who planned the central city?
Which rivers run through the city?
How many public parks did Penn plan?
How many live in the central area today?
Name 6 important Philadelphia architects?
Who is Philadelphia's greatest architect of the later 19th century?
When did building begin on the Philadelphia CIty Hall?
What commission was created in 1955?
What does this commission control?
How tall is the City Hall?
What is the tallest building?
Which building under construction will surpass Comcast Center?
What is the dominant type of house in Philadelphia?
What are row houses called outside of Philadelphia?
How old is most of the housing in Philadelphia?
Name a type of row house in the city?
Which neighborhood has the oldest housing in America?
What is the 2014 population?
When was the low point in Philadelphia's population?
How much is the population predicted to grow by 2035?
What is the percent of blacks?
What is the percent of whites?
What is the hispanic make-up of the population?
What is the largest European ancestry?
At the last census how many households had children under 18 in them?
What percent were non-family households?
What is the size of the average household?
Percentage of unwed births?
What was the median household income in 2013?
What is the name of a wealthy neighborhood?
What is the lowest median income in Philadelphia?
What is the city's largest age group?
How many people at the last census were under 18?
How many baby's were there in 2013?
How many deaths were there in 2013?
Name the six largest European ethnic groups in the city?
Which city has the largest Irish and Italian populations?
What area of the city has a large Italian neighborhood?
Which three areas are high in Irish and Polish?
Which part of the city has a large Jewish area?
Name three sub-cultures in the Center City?
What is the name of the gay district?
Name a University located in the city?
What percent of 5 year olds or older speak English?
What percent of 5 year olds or older speak Spanish?
What is the total over 5's that speak another language than English?
Unemployment rate in 2014?
What was the average unemployment rate in the U.S. in 2014?
How many jobs were gained in 2014?
What industries accounted for most of the city's job gains?
What industries suffered declines?
Which is the biggest historical sites?
How many UNESCO sites does the U.S. have?
Where was the Declaration of Independence signed?
What famous bell is in Philadelphia?
What famous writer has a house in Philadelphia?
Name the accent spoken in the area?
Which dialect is it similar to?
What other city is similar to Philadelphia's accent?
Who studies the accent at the University of Pennsylvania?
Name two districts with good night life?
What is the home of the orchestra?
What is the countries oldest opera house?
Who uses the opera house?
What is the oldest theater in the U.S.?
Which American city has the most public art?
What was the Assoc. for Public Art called in the past?
How many pieces of art were funded by the Percent for Art ordinance?
Name a type of music from the 70's that influenced the nation?
What concert did Philly host on July13th, 1985?
What is the name of the stadium that held Live Aid?
Name a hip/hop artist from the city?
What water sport is popular in the city?
What is the symbol of rowing in the city?
What is the name of the big rowing races?
Where are these races held?
What type of government does Philadelphia have?
How many terms can a mayor serve?
Who is the current mayor?
What party does the mayor represent?
What is the legislative branch called?
What is the main trial court called?
What type of cases are heard here?
How are judges appointed?
Who was the last Republican DA?
What party dominated until the mid-20th century
What happened in Philadelphia in 1856?
When did the Democrats take the city?
Who won the most votes in the city in '08?
How many congressional districts are there in the city?
How many congressional districts were there at the peak population?
Who represents the 8th district?
When was the last major Republican representation of a large part of the city?
Who was the last Republican to be fairly competitive in the mayoral race?
Did the crime rate go up or down after the War years?
How many murders occurred in 1990?
What was the average murder rate during the 90's?
How many murders occurred in 2013?
When did shootings peak in the city?
How many shootings were there in that year?
Has violent crime rate fallen or risen in the last 10 years?
What rank in danger does Philadelphia have in the U.S.?
Has public school enrollment dropped or increased in the last 5 years?
How many public schools have been closed in 2013?
How much does the city spend per year per child?
Have grad rates fallen or increased in the last years?
What was the grad rate in 2005?
What was it in 2014?
Is that the above or below the national average?
What is the largest private institution in the city?
What are the 3 research universities in the city?
How many med schools are there?
How many major papers are published?
What is the 3rd oldest paper in the nation?
Who owns the major papers in the city?
Where was the first radio license granted?
When did the first radio stations appear?
Name the 3 public radio stations?
Who owned W3XE?
When did it become NBC's first affiliate?
What show started out in the city?
When did SEPTA service get cut?
Why did SEPTA rail service get cut?
Has service ever been restored?
Name a proposed project to repalce it?
Name the main airport?
Where does PHL rank in the list of busiest airports?
What airline uses this airport as its primary international hub?
What is the main north-south freeway called?
What is part of I-76 called?
When was the Vine Street Expressway finished?
Name a bridge in the city?
What is another name for the Roosevelt Expressway?
When was Woodhaven road built?
What neighborhoods does Cottman Avenue serve?
What is another name for The Fort Washington Expressway?
What is US-30 also known as?
What bus line uses the city as a hub?
Where is Greyhound terminal located?
How many other bus companies operate from Philadelphia?
What is the name of the six bus companies?
Name 2 rail companies that use the city as a hub?
Where did the Pennsylvania Railroad have their first station?
Where did the Reading operate out of?
What is Reading Terminal called now?
What was the first water supply system called?
Who provides the city water now?
Where dos PWD get it's water from?
How many pumping stations are there in the sewer system?
How many miles of sewers are in the city?
What is the largest city owned gas utility?
How many homes does PGW serve?
When was PGW founded?
When did the city take PGW over?
What area code is used in Philadelphia in 1947?
When was the 610 area code added?
When was the 267 added?
When did Kerry run for president?
Who was Kerry's running mate?
How much did Kerry lose by?
Who was Bush's running mate?
Where was John Edwards a senator?
What is Kerry's middle name?
At what facility was Kerry born?
What was Kerry's father's religion?
What was Kerry's mother's religion?
What is Kerry's older sibling's name?
What was Kerry's role in the Yale Political Union as a junior?
What secret society did Kerry join?
What country did Kerry visit as a student?
Who was Kerry's most influential professor?
What was Kerry's role in the Yale Political Union as a sophomore?
When did Kerry join the Naval Reserve?
When did Kerry become a navy officer?
How long was Officer Candidate School?
Where is the Navy training center?
When did Kerry publish his memories of Vietnam?
What kind of ship was the USS Gridley?
What was the formal name of 'swift boats'?
How long were swift boats?
What had Kerry expected the 'swift boats' to do?
Where was Kerry's boat on Dec 2-3, 1968?
How many crew were with Kerry?
Who were in Kerry's crew?
What did Kerry's crew destroy?
Where was Kerry injured?
When did Kerry earn a Silver Star?
Where did Kerry earn a Silver Star?
How many swift boats did Kerry command?
Who awarded the Silver Star to Kerry?
What story described the events of Feb 28, 1969?
Where did Kerry receive his Silver Star?
Who was Kerry's commander?
What complaint did Elliot have about Kerry's actions?
When was a press release put out about Kerry earning the Silver Star?
What was released on March 17, 1969?
What boat was Rassmann on?
Who fell overboard from Kerry's boat?
What was Rassmann's job?
What medal did Kerry earn for rescuing Rassmann?
What does the Combat V mean?
Which wound allowed Kerry to leave combat duty?
Where was Kerry reassigned in April 1969?
When did Kerry become a lieutenant?
Who was Kerry a personal aide for?
When did Kerry leave the Naval Reserve?
Who kept George W. Bush out of Vietnam?
What military branch was George W. Bush in?
How did Republicans attack Kerry?
What did SBVT change its name to?
What term was inspired by the attacks on Kerry?
How many members did VVAW have when Kerry joined it?
What VVAW investigation was Kerry involved in?
Who was Melvin Laird?
What did Laird refuse to court-martial Kerry for?
What did Kerry do on Apr 22, 1971?
What was the topic of the hearing Kerry testified on?
What did Kerry throw over a fence?
Why did Kerry participate in the protest?
How many vets participated in the protest?
When was Kerry arrested for protesting?
Who was being honored on May 30, 1971?
How many people were arrested with Kerry?
At what time was Kerry arrested?
Why were the protesters arrested?
Who had Kerry considered running against in 1970?
In which district had Kerry considered running in 1970?
Who ran against Philbin instead of Kerry?
Why did Morse retire?
What political party was Morse in?
What was Paul Sheehy's job?
What was DiFruscia's position?
Who did Kerry share a campaign headquarters with?
Why was Kerry's brother messing with phone lines?
What is Kerry's younger brother's name?
What party did Durkin run as?
How far ahead of Cronin did Kerry poll?
What slant did The Sun have?
Who did Kerry say tried to stop his campaign?
How did Kerry want to create jobs?
How many votes did Cronin get against Kerry?
What percent of votes did Cronin get against Kerry?
How many votes did Kerry get against Cronin?
What percent of votes did Kerry get against Cronin?
What did Kerry think cost him the race against Cronin?
Where did Kerry move after the 1972 election?
What did Kerry's brother call the decade after 1972?
What did Kerry fundraise for?
When did Kerry enter law school?
Where was Kerry a talk radio host?
When did Kerry become an ADA?
What condition did Droney have?
What is ALS's nickname?
What senator did Kerry investigate in 1978?
Why was Brooke being investigated?
When did Kerry consider running for president if Droney didn't?
When did Kerry leave the DA's office?
Who left the DA's office with Kerry?
What bakery did Kerry co-found?
Who did Kerry start a bakery with?
What was Paul Tsongas's job in 1984?
When did Kerry run for Senate?
When did Kerry run for Lt Governor?
What was James Shannon's job?
What was Tip O'Neill's job?
When did Kerry visit Nicaragua?
Who did Kerry visit Nicaragua with?
Where was Tom Harkin from?
Who did Kerry visit in Nicaragua?
What was criticized about Ortega's administration?
Who did Kerry's staff expose in an Oct 14 report?
Who had Oliver North been supporting?
What crime had Kerry said North committed?
Who were the Contras?
What government agencies worked with North?
Who was the State Department giving money to?
How much money did the State Department give the traffickers?
Where had the money given to drug traffickers come from?
What was the response to Kerry's accusation of funding traffickers?
Where is the BCCI based?
What bank helped Noriega?
When was BCCI shut down?
Who collaborated in the report about BCCI?
What was the BCCI report called?
Who ran against Kerry in 1996?
When Weld was re-elected governor, how much of the vote did he get?
When was Weld re-elected governor?
What did Kerry and Weld agree to limit their campaign spending to?
Who broke the agreed-upon spending cap?
What was Kerry supposed to say when he 'botched a joke'?
Who was Kerry saying was stuck in Iraq?
What mistake did Kerry make in the joke?
Who did the Washington Post say Kerry was an envoy for?
When did the Washington Post say Kerry was important envoy?
How, in May 2011, did the WaPo describe Bin Laden's killing?
What did Kerry get from the Pakistanis?
Who was Pakistan's army chief in 2013?
Who said Kerry was the 'top Senate liberal'?
When was Kerry called the 'top Senate liberal'?
What was Kerry's actual career voting rank for 'liberalness'?
What trade agreement did Kerry support?
What trade agreement did Kerry oppose?
When did Kerry say he intended to support the Iraq War?
When did Bush declare the Iraq war?
Who did Kerry say we should disarm?
When did Kerry speak at Georgetown University?
What committee did Kerry chair in 1991-1993?
What did the POW/MIA committee conclude about Vietnam POWs?
When did Kerry sponsor a resolution to reopen trade with Vietnam?
Who sponsored the resolution to reopen trade with Vietnam, along with Kerry?
When did Bill Clinton normalize relations with Vietnam?
Where was John Edwards a senator?
Where was Howard Dean a governor?
What was Wesley Clark's former job?
Who won the 2004 Iowa Democratic Caucus?
When did Kerry choose John Edwards to be his VP?
Who did Kerry criticize during the 2004 campaign?
Why did Kerry criticize Bush during the 2004 campaign?
What had Kerry voted against after supporting the initial Iraq authorization?
What did Bush's campaign call Kerry for changing his mind about Iraq?
What was Kerry's PAC?
What was the mission of Keeping America's Promise?
How many down-ballot candidates did Kerry help support?
How many states' down-ballot candidates did Kerry help support?
Which election did Kerry's PAC focus on?
Who complained about how Kerry ran the State Dept?
What was the complaint about how Kerry ran the State Dept?
How had some State employees described Kerry?
Who published the Ivory Tower Survey?
What was Kerry's ranking in the Ivory Tower Survey for effectiveness as SoS?
Who was Syria's president in 2014?
What did Kerry say Syria could do to avoid a military strike?
Which country convinced Syria to actually give up its chemical weapons?
What was Sergey Lavrov's position?
When did the UN Security Council order Syria's chemical weapons be destroyed?
Where did Kerry speak in Nov 2013?
What did Kerry say had ended, in the Nov 2013 speech?
When did Kerry speak to the OAS?
When did Kerry and his wife separate?
When did Kerry and his wife divorce?
When did Kerry and his wife get an annullment?
What book did Kerry's ex-wife write?
Who did Kerry's ex-wife remarry?
What was Teresa Heinz Kerry's net worth in 2004 according to Forbes?
What range of estimates have been given for Teresa Heinz Kerry's net worth?
What was Kerry's mother's name?
When did Kerry's mother pass away?
Where would Kerry have ranked among richest US presidents, adjusted for inflation?
What religion is Kerry?
What religious items did Kerry bring with him while campaigning?
What is St. Christopher the patron saint of?
What did Kerry do in the church while living in Switzerland?
Which part of the Bible did Kerry find the most moving?
Who interviewed Kerry in Oct 2004 about his religion?
What did Kerry tell Christianity Today that he is open-minded to?
What did Kerry say about major religious texts?
Who said Kerry is an 'avid cyclist'?
What type of bicycle does Kerry prefer?
What are 'centuries' in bicycling?
What bicycles did Kerry use while campaigning?
What other sports does Kerry participate in?
What type of yacht did Kerry buy?
How expensive was Kerry's yacht?
Where was Kerry's yacht built?
How much sales tax did Kerry owe on the yacht?
Which state received Kerry's yacht's sales tax?
When was the first usage of the word Rajasthan?
In what publication did the name Rajasthan first appear?
What is another name for the Rajasthan region?
In what year did George Thomas write the memoir known as Military Memories?
Who wrote the book entitled India: A History?
Members of what tribe were exterminated in Ajmer?
What tribe formerly ruled Kota?
What was the name of the group that formerly ruled Bundi?
What is another way to refer to the PhulMali?
The Jats assisted in building what state?
What empire stopped Arab invasions?
Arab attempted to invade the Gurjar Pratihar Empire beginning in what century?
Arab conquest was limited to what region?
What was the most notable accomplishment of the Gurjara Pratihara Empire?
Which historian claims that even the Arabs acknowledged the importance of the Gurjara Pratihara Empire in stopping invasions?
How many princely states of Rajputana contain?
What is the name of the British district within Rajputana?
Bharatpur is an example of what kind of state?
Under a Muslim Nawab there was a princely state, what was its name?
What families rose to power in the 6th century?
What group in the Rajasthan region started to have internal disputes?
In what century did the Mughal Empire come into decline?
The Maratharas gained what over Rajputana?
Where were the Marathas from?
In what year did the British Empire replace the Maratha Empire?
Which mountain range goes through Rajasthan?
What is the length in miles of the Aravalli Range?
What peak is at the southwestern part of the Aravalli Range?
What portion of Rajasthan is east and south of the Aravalli Range?
Which river separates the main Aravelli ranges?
What is a characteristic of the region to the east of the Aravalli range?
What is the name of the ecoregion to the east and southeast of the Aravalli Range?
What are two examples of trees in the broadleaf forests east of the Aravalli's?
What is the name of the region which is home to Dungarpur?
What is the most heavily forested region in Rajasthan?
How many meters high is Guru Shikhar?
What percentage of Rajasthan is to the northwest of the Aravalli range?
What is the average elevation of the south-eastern region of Rajasthan?
A tableland is contained within what to southeastern districts?
What river runs along the badlands in the northeast of Rajasthan
Which region contains Desert National Park?
How many square miles is Desert National Park?
What types of large fossils are found in Desert National Park?
What are the most common types of eagles one might see in the Jaisalmer region?
What is another name for a laggar falcon?
What Rajasthani national park is known for its tigers?
How many tigers were relocated to Sariska?
Ranthamb National Park is known by photographers as what?
Why did tigers became extinct in Sariska?
The Rajasthan economy is largely composed of what type of industries?
What are Rajasthans two main cash crops?
What type of oil does Rajasthan produce some of the largest amounts of in India?
Rajasthan consumes the most of what product?
How many crop seasons are there in Rajasthan?
What type of fibre is Rajasthan ranked 2nd in production of?
What is the largest city for polyster blouse pieces in Rajasthan?
From what town did the marble in the Taj Mahal come?
What type of deposits are found at Sambhar?
What kind of mines are found in Khetri and Jhunjhunu ?
What type of dance comes from Jodhpur Marwar?
Kalbeliya dance is from which region?
What type of music plays a big part in the culture of Rajasthan?
Heroic deeds are often a theme of what type of Rajasthani song?
What kind of song is referred to as a bhajan?
Bagaru and Sanganer represent what type of art?
Zari is a type of what art that is a major Rajasthani export?
Females in Rajasthan wear what type of traditional clothing?
What are the names for a traditional female short-top piece of clothing?
What colors are dresses in Rajasthan typically made using?
What type of possession has been documented in Rajasthan?
What underworld god possess Rajasthanis?
What are possessed individuals known as? 
Ghorala is another word for what?
What results from possession by even benign spirits?
What was the literacy rate of Rajasthan in 1991?
How many females had the ability to read in Rajasthan in 1991?
What was the rise in female literacy between 1991 and 2001 in Rajasthan?
What is the national average for literacy in India?
What was the literacy rate of Rajasthan in 2001?
What are the to main educational hubs of Rajasthan?
In what educational hub would one find AIIMS?
What is is Kota known as within India?
How many universities does Rajasthan have?
How many engineering colleges are in Rajasthan?
Who built the famous decorated havelis in Rajasthan?
Jaipur is also known as what city?
What are the notable houses in Jaipur made from?
What type of temples stretch from the north to the south of Rajasthan?
Which Pali District temple is dedicated to Lord Adinath?
Why were the Chamorros brought to Guam?
How were Guamanian Chamorro viewed by the Japanese?
Who were loyal to Japan?
What established Guam as an unincorporated territory?
What conflict did the Organic Act come after?
What did the Guam Act allow the population now that they were a U.S territory?
What two indiginous pre-hispanic culture has survived to this point?
What is the name of the intricate system in Guam?
What do the Chamorro believe in according to Historian Lawrence Cinningham
What posses some challenges for the Chamorros who find it hard to keep their culture?
What else has led to the Chamorro find it hard to keep their culture that involves it's children?
How many people make up the Guam legislation?
Who is the current non-voting delegate for Guam?
How many electoral votes does Guam currently have?
What major movement occurred in Guam in the 80's and 90's?
Why would Guam becoming a commonwealth be so important?
What is the name of this U.S state that could possibly form a union with Guam?
What has the U.S military proposed?
How many Marines would the United States move to Guam?
Because of the EPA, how many Marines would the United States be able to send to Guam to live?
What is the name of the pact held between the United States, Micronesia, Marshal Islands, and Palau?
What is the benefit of the  Compacts of Free Association?
What has Guam claimed about Compacts of Free Association?
What determines the speed in which mail reaches Guam from the United States?
Which type of service usually takes less than a week to get postage to the island?
What do most Guam residents use when receiving mail?
What is considered to be the lifeline of Guam?
What is the name of the shipping company in Hawaii that connects Guam?
Why is the port so important?
What is the name of the international airport in Guam?
What major airline resides at the airport?
What is Guam responsible for when goods both come in and leave?
Which animal was accidentally introduced into Guam?
What was accidentally introduced into Guam?
With the introduction of a non native snake in the area of Guam what impact did it have the island?
What has the U.S Department of Agriculture done to help watch for the snakes?
What are the names of the two native birds in Guam before the brown snake intrusion?
How many bird species have been driven to extinction in Guam?
What other bird was very common before WWII according to the elders?
What plagues the Guam dry season?
What are the cause of the majority of the fires in the area?
What causes water quality problems in Guam?
What has Guam recently being trying to protect?
What has led to the decrease of fish near Guam?
What is the name of the flying mammal in Guam that some are concerned for?
What are the names of the two colleges in Guam?
Who are these two schools accredited by?
What is the name of the small Christian college in Guam?
How many students as of 2000 were attending public schools in Guam?
What has plagued Guam public schools?
What is the name of the governing body of the school in all of Guam?
Who runs Guam's main health care facility?
What is the name of the main health care facility in Guam?
Which privately owned medical facility opened in 2016?
What is commonly contrasted with empiricism?
Where does rationalism say knowledge comes from?
What is an example knowledge being derived from intuition?
What did Locke think some knowledge could come from?
Where were the main European rationalists?
What theory was Aristotle's explanation based on?
How did Plato's Phaedo and Apology think of the mind?
Who thought the senses were more important, Aristotle or Plato?
Who thought the senses were less important, Aristotle or Plato?
What does "nihil in intellectu nisi prius fuerit in sensu" mean?
What is the Stoic view?
What was Aetius's career?
Where was Sextus from?
Who wrote 'Against the Professors'?
Whose ideas did Sextus build on?
Whose idea was 'tabula rasa'?
What religion was Al Farabi?
What does al-'aql al-hayulani mean?
What does al-'aql al-fa'il mean?
What is crucial for understanding?
What was 'Abubacer' normally called?
What was 'Ebn Topnail' normally called?
What was Ibn Tufail's religion?
What was Ibn Tufail's ethnicity?
When did Ibn Tufail live?
What types of human knowledge did Hume say there are?
What type of human knowledge is math?
What type of human knowledge is observing the world?
What type of human knowledge is "the sun rises in the East"?
Where did Hume say people's ideas come from?
What did Mill say knowledge comes from?
What sensations did Mill differentiate?
When Mill left a question of sensations unanswered, how did Berkeley answer it?
What did Mill say might not actually exist?
What did Mill misrepresent about math?
What phase of empiricism ended in the 1940s?
How can't a finite set of statements be described?
What is necessary to explain a doctor's normality in sensory terms?
What are other terms for logical empiricism?
When was logical empricism formulated?
What did logical empiricism try to combine with mathematical logic?
What was Otto Neurath an important member of?
What was AJ Ayer an important member of?
When did pragmatism arise?
Who developed pragmatism?
Where did Peirce and James meet?
When did Peirce and James meet?
What did Peirce later call his ideas instead of pragmatism?
How long before Peirce did Hume write?
How did Peirce view inductive vs deductive reasoning?
How did Hume view inductive vs deductive reasoning?
What did fallibilism say?
What does the scientific method's rationality depend on?
What was the ethnicity of Friedrich Wilhelm Joseph Schelling?
In what century did Hegel write?
Along with British idealism and existentialism, what philosophy was influenced by the German idealistic tradition?
Along with positivism and pragmatism, what philosophy rejected idealism's metaphysical views but what nevertheless influenced by it?
What is the term used for philosophies that consider the spiritual to be of paramount importance?
What branch of idealism believes that reality is fundamentally nonphysical?
What branch of idealism sees abstracts as more real than perceived objects?
Along with phenomenalists, what idealists believe the senses are more important than reason?
What branch of idealism believes that we can only know the real world via ideas?
In what philosophy was Christian idealism often rooted?
What philosophy influential in the medieval church was opposed to Christian idealism?
In what century did Christian thought begin to be influenced by the scholasticism of Aristotle?
Along with the Unity Church, what contemporary religious movement may be regarded as idealist?
What notable idealist was responsible for a "world ground" theory?
Along with phenomenalism, what is another term for subjective idealism?
Of what see was Berkeley bishop?
What was Berkeley's ethnicity?
What does esse est percipi mean?
What did Berkeley consider things like matter to be?
Who was known as the "Cambridge Platonist"?
Who was notably influenced by John Norris?
When was An Essay Towards the Theory of the Ideal or Intelligible World written?
What sort of reality did Collier believe was knowable?
Who coined the term "thing-in-itself"?
Who invented the idea of a "table-of-commonsense"?
Who came up with the idea of "things-as-interacted-by-us"?
Who spoke of the "warning signs" of idealism?
What sort of philosopher was Richard Rorty?
What sort of thinkers were Foster and Luce?
What book was written by A.A. Luce?
What year saw the publication of Sense without Matter?
Who wrote A World for Us: The Case for Phenomenalistic Idealism?
Whose work is Sense without Matter regarded as updating?
What school of thought did Berkeley belong to?
What sort of idealist was Descartes?
In what section was Descartes criticized?
In what edition was there a Refutation of Idealism?
When was the second edition published?
Who wrote Parerga and Paralipomena?
What type of knowledge did Schopenhauer believe the ideal to be?
According to Schopenhauer, to what can the ideal be attributed?
What did Schopenhauer believe we were restricted to?
What did Schopenhauer believe were the only things we could know?
Who censured Kant for his agnostic tautology?
Along with Schopenhauer, whose idealism did Nietzsche attack?
Nietzsche's attack on Schopenhauer used an argument similar to Kant's attack on who?
According to Hegel, what sort of idealist was Fichte?
Who did Hegel see as a subjective idealist?
What sort of idealist did Hegel define himself as?
How did Hegel believe historical reality to be knowable to a philosopher?
Who was a notable critic of Hegel?
For whom did Kierkegaard argue reality cannot be a system?
According to Kierkegaard, why can't reality be a system for human beings?
Even though Kierkegaard does not believe in the possibility of an existential system of reality, what sort of system can exist?
What sort of reality did Hegel perceive God's mind to be?
Along with Hegel, who also argued for human incompleteness?
According to Hegel, what form does thought necessarily take?
Why does Hegel believe we cannot know God?
If something transcends time, what does it, according to Hegel, also transcend?
Who is a notable exponent of pluralistic idealism?
What is the term for the type of idealism preached by Leibniz?
What did Leibniz believe the universe is fundamentally composed of?
Who was a notable disciple of Leibniz?
What does Ward see as the purpose of interaction between monads?
Who was an exponent of so-called "Boston Personalism"?
What was the term given to the personal idealism of Howison?
Who is a notable realistic personal theist?
What issue do both Aquinas and Brightman discuss?
What sort of freedom did Howison believe was incompatible with materialism?
With what university is J.M.E. McTaggart affiliated?
In what year was The Nature of Existence published?
According to McTaggart, what are the only things that have real existence?
What does McTaggart believe space and time to be?
How does McTaggart believe minds relate to one another?
What was the name of the philosophy preached by Thomas Davidson?
What type of idealism was Thomas Davidson's philosophy?
According to Davidson, how many gods are there?
By whose philosophy was Davidson influenced?
What did Davidson believe the God of Aristotle is synonymous with?
How do receive information from the physical world?
What type of consciousness is similar but not identical to consciousness itself?
What is the nature of the fundamental character of reality?
According to the author, who would have particular trouble in accepting that reality is fundamentally mental?
What is the main thing that we experience?
What makes up Education?
What methods make up Education?
Where does education usually take place under?
What occurred after the Fall of Rome with literature?
What happened with education  during the Early Middle Ages?
What did these early schools during the Middle Ages evolve into?
What was the name of the famous school during the high middle ages?
Where does formal education take place?
What are some of the sets or ideals most school systems follow?
Who guides the students in a formal environment?
Whats the typical age range for pre-school?
What are pre-schools also known as?
In what country is Kindergarten a term used for primary education?
What is another term used for Primary education?
What does primary school consist of?
What is the name of the orgination who is striving to get all the countries on the same path with primary education?
When did secondary education emerge in the United States?
Why was secondary school introduced in the U.S?
Who benefited from secondary schools?
What was another name used for Higher Education?
What is High Education?
What does Tertiary education include?
What does University education include?
What are usually Universities made up of?
What type of University would Yale fall under?
What was a rule for disabled people in the past for education?
Who denied children with disabilities to be unable to attend a public school?
Who were some of these early physicians?
What would Special Education usually only apply to in the early years of schooling in the U.S?
What is another term used for Special Education Services?
When were public schools become more and more developed?
What are some examples of alternative schools?
What makes up Indigenous education?
In which two systems can Indigenous education be used?
What is one of the main purposes for Indigenous education?
Who defines informal learning?
Where does informal learning occur?
What does informal leaning usually consist of amongst people who take this route of learning?
Where does informal learning usually take place?
What is not necessary for informal learning?
What falls under the informal learning umbrella?
When was the 'education through recreation" applied to childhood?
When was the concept of 'education through recreation' changed and expanded?
What changed when the concept was broadened?
What does Auto didacticism generally mean?
When can you become an Autodidact?
Which famous U.S president was a Autodidact?
Which famous inventor was a Autodidact?
In what year did e-learning jump 14 times over traditional leaning?
Which form of education looks to be the dominant form i the coming years?
What has been a constant issue with education for as long as education has been around itself?
Which type of schooling can be most expensive?
What is not as common in open education?
Which University offers conventional degrees? 
What do most open education sources offer?
What does Universal Primary Education belong to?
What is one issue that hurts Universal Primary Education?
Which organization has discovered corruption in the educator sector?
What does LCPS stand for?
What was the reason for the polarisation for affordable schooling?
Where are these types of school spreading across?
What are some of the claims being pointed towards education inequality?
Who do students often blame for their education short comings?
What happens when someone tries to improve education?
What is the discrepancy between Developed and less developed countries?
What resources do developed countries have better access to?
What is common in developed countries?
What is one good trait about students from developed countries?
What use of technology can greatly supplement how teachers teach in the classroom?
What do students also need occasionally before putting blame on teachers?
What is the meaning of Education psychology?
What is also used interchangeably  with Education psychology?
Who are likely to be identified as educational psychologist?
What is educational psychology concerned with?
How can Educational psychology in part be understood?
How is the method of educational psychology have some relation to medicine and biology?
Where does education psychology draw from?
In universities where are the departments of educational psychology normally held?
What is important for a student in education?
What does education increase in a student?
What is intelligence at 53 more closely related to?
Who focused on identifying stimuli that can influence learning?
Who also along with Dunn recommended other teaching studies?
Who created the Type Delineator?
What do some theories believe?
What should be included in effective teaching?
What can Philosophy education be when we talk about the process?
What defines Philosophy education?
What fields make up field education and a field applied philosophy?
What is another term used for instructors?
What are the main subjects that are covered by the instructor?
In the United States what is considered the single most important factor in a child's education?
What is the theory behind Empirical analyses?
What has been argued about high rates in education?
What is greatly needed with technology transfer when it relates to education?
Literature on how earnings and how it relates to schooling was greatly influenced by who?
This view of how schooling and earnings has sparked a lot of studies, but what else has it brought up?
What was one of the main concerns of this literature on how schooling and earnings?
What government formed in 1772 is considered the forerunner of Tennessee?
What state held territory that would later become part of Tennessee?
What date did Tennessee become one of the United States of America?
Which was the final state to join the Confederacy before Civil War fighting started?
Which of the Confederate states rejoined the Union first when the Civil War concluded?
Which part dominated Tennessee's politics in the late 1880s?
Which Tennessee city was received significant federal investment in the 1940s?
What part of the Manhattan Project did Tennessee host?
What made Tennessee politics more competitive again in the middle of the 20th century?
What locale in Memphis is know as the place where blues was born?
What Tennessee recording company first promoted Elvis Presley?
Which Tennessee city is home to the Country Music Hall of Fame?
Which museum celebrating popular music is located in Jackson, Tennessee?
In which year is W.C. Handy first known to have been playing in Tennessee clubs?
What is Tennessee's primary non-meat agricultural product?
What trail forms part of the border Tennessee shares with North Carolina?
Which national park in Tennessee sees more visitors that any other in the United States?
Which Tennessee city hosts the state's most famous aquarium?
What tourist attraction is located in Pigeon Forge, Tennessee?
Who first recorded a territorial name in the region that resembles its current name Tennessee?
Which Native Americans had a town called Tanasi in present day Monroe County, Tennessee?
Tanasi is know to have been located and mapped by British traders by which year?
What nationality was Juan Pardo?
Which governor is given credit for the name Tennessee as it is now spelled?
Which work by Henry Timberlake made the current spelling of Tennessee widely popular?
Which state created a county called Tennessee in 1788?
Which two Tennessee counties cover the area that comprised North Carolina's Tennessee County?
In which year did a constitutional convention meet to form a new state out of the unincorporated territory that would become Tennessee?
What is the elevation of Tennessee's highest point?
What mountain in Tennessee is the Appalachian Trail's highest point?
What river is situated on Tennessee point of lowest elevation?
Which city marks the geographical center of Tennessee?
Approximately how many miles long is Tennessee's Ridge and Valley region?
What is the western part of the Tennessee Valley called?
Which city is Tennessee's fourth largest?
Together, Bristol, Johnson City, and Kingsport are known by what name?
What river forms in the Tennessee Valley?
Which Tennessee airport has the code TYS?
What is the name of the airport serving Chattanooga, TN?
What interstate highways cross the Grand Division in Tennessee?
An airport with which code serves the Tri-Cities area in Tennessee?
What is the lowland area of Tennessee between the Tennessee River and Mississippi River called?
What geographical region lies west of the Tennessee bottom land?
What maximum elevation is the land in the Mississippi Alluvial Plain?
What city is central to the economy of West Tennessee?
What is the most common climate across Tennessee?
Most of Tennessee has which type of climate?
Which mountains contain those parts of Tennessee with a temperate climate?
Which body of ocean water affects Tennessee's climate the most?
What is Tennessee's average annual precipitation in inches?
Which range of months is Tennessee's wettest?
Which hurricane brought damaging rains to Tennessee in 1995?
On average, how many days each year are there thunderstorms in Tennessee?
Which parts of Tennessee are most threatened by tornadoes?
How many tornadoes strike in Tennessee in an average year?
What year in the 1990s did an unusual blizzard visit Tennessee?
Which cities other than Knoxville have been the capital of Tennessee?
How many counties are part of Nashville's metropolitan area?
What distance in miles is Clarksville, TN from Nashville?
Which city is Tennessee's sixth largest by population?
Which two of the six most populous Tennessee cities are nearest the Great Smoky Mountains?
Which European nationality first explored the Tennessee region?
Which year did Hernando de Soto explore Tennessee?
Which Native American peoples were living in Tennessee when Juan Pardo explored the area?
Which Native American people left Tennessee for the Virginia area because of encroaching Europeans?
By which year had most of the Native Americans been forced out of the Tennessee region?
What did American settlers call the Cherokee who attacked Fort Watuaga in 1776?
Who lead the Cherokee attack on Fort Watuaga in 1776?
What was the name of the Chickamauga leader's cousin who helped settlers escape his raids?
Who left Fort Watuaga, crossed the Appalachians, and attacked the British army in South Carolina in 1780?
Who lost the Battle of Kings Mountain in South Carolina?
Which state was the first formed out of federally controlled territory?
In addition to the original thirteen, which two states were admitted to the union before Tennessee?
Which mountain marked the starting point of the Tennessee border described by the state constitution?
When Tennessee's border was first defined, territory west of which river was considered for future annexation?
Which county in East Tennessee was more supportive of the Confederacy than its neighbors?
Which Confederate general failed to capture the Union fort at Knoxville?
Which Union general broke the Confederate siege of Chattanooga in November 1863?
Which Confederate general launched an attack on Chattanooga from Perryville, KY?
Which battle did Confederate General Longstreet win in East Tennessee?
Which forces controlled most of Tennessee when slaves were emancipated?
Up to how many former slaves began fighting with for the Union after the Emancipation Proclamation?
Which edict freed slaves across most of the Confederacy, but technically not Tennessee?
Who was elected Vice President of the United States in 1864?
Which Confederate state's representation was readmitted to Congress first?
On which date were Tennessee's elected representatives restored to their offices in Washington D.C.?
Their ratification of which Amendment spared Tennessee a military governor during Reconstruction?
In which year did Andrew Johnson become President?
Who were targeted by restrictive laws passed in Southern states at the end of the 19th century?
In which year did the Tennessee General Assembly pass electoral reform laws that disenfranchised most African Americans in the state?
Who besides African Americans were victims of Tennessee's late-19th century electoral reform?
What is the name for laws dating from the late-19th century which promoted segregation?
Approximately how many African Americans lived in Tennessee in 1900?
Which Tennessee Senator was the only Republican first-time Senator elected in 2006?
Who was elected governor of Tennessee in 2002?
Who was the first Republican Speaker of the Tennessee state senate since Democrats took control in the Reconstruction era?
Which political party did the majority of conservative Tennessee voters support in the early 20th century?
What was Tennessee's estimated population in 2015?
What percentage population increase did Tennessee experience between 2010 and 2015?
How much of Tennessee's population increase between 2010 and 2015 was due to migration?
In 2008, what percentage of Tennessee residents were born outside the South?
What net population increase during Tennessee's last two US Census reports was due to immigration from outside the country?
Which Protestant denomination has its headquarters in Nashville, TN?
Which Tennessee city contains the headquarters of the Church of God and The Church of God of Prophecy?
The principle Bible college of the Free Will Baptists is located in which Tennessee city?
Which two major Protestant denominations are based in Memphis?
Roughly how many farms are located in Tennesee?
Which livestock is the major focus of Tennessee agriculture?
When did cotton first become a large-scale agricultural product in Tennessee?
Which river landform partly in Tennessee provided the most fertile land for cotton production?
Where in Tennessee is the headquarters of International Paper?
Where is Nissan Motor Company's headquarters in the United States?
Which company has a $2 billion production plant in Bradley County?
Hemlock Semiconductor produces electronic components in which Tennessee city?
Which major global shipping company is based in Memphis?
What types of income are exempt from Tennessee state income tax?
At what rate is Tennessee state sales and use tax usually applied?
Above which amount is inheritance tax applied in Tennessee?
What is the sales tax on foodstuffs in Tennessee?
Which edible items are taxed at the higher non-food sales and use tax rate in Tennessee?
In which year did Tennessee tourism first exceed 100 million visitors?
How many billions of dollars were spend by tourists in Tennessee in 2014?
How much tax revenue did tourism generate for Tennessee in 2014?
In 2014, which three Tennessee counties took in the most money from tourism?
What was the percentage increase in Tennessee's tourism-based jobs in 2014?
Which other state sent Tennessee the most tourists in 2013?
What percentage of out-of-state tourists stayed in Tennessee for four or more nights?
What average daily amount did a tourist spend in Tennessee in 2013?
What percentage of Tennessee tourists daily spending in 2013 went toward accommodation?
In which state do the greatest percentage of Tennessee tourists reside?
Which city is the endpoint of I-26?
I-24 connects which two Tennessee cities?
Which interstate highway running north-south passes through Memphis?
Which interstate ends at a junction close to Dandridge, Tennessee?
What Tennessee cities are connected by I-269?
Which are the two main parties in Tennessee politics?
Which part of Tennessee voted more Republican in the years following the Civil War?
What type of farmers inhabited eastern Tennessee in the late 19th century?
Which crops grown in West Tennessee had required a great deal of slave labor?
Which party did most former slaves join when they were given the right to vote after the Civil War?
In which decade did the Tennessee legislature institute a poll tax?
Which party declined in Tennessee politics following voting reform legislation during Reconstruction?
What percentage of the Tennessee population was African-American in 1900?
In 1913, the Tennessee state legislature made which organizational structure the default form of city government in the state?
Which Republican presidential candidate did Tennessee support in 1920?
What religion was the Democratic presidential candidate that Tennessee voted against in 1928?
How many times has Tennessee supported Democratic presidential candidates in the general elections since the 1950s?
Which Republican won the Presidency while carrying Tennessee in 1928?
In 1960, what group made up 16.45% of Tennessee's population?
What Congressional Act fully re-enfranchised African-American in Tennessee?
Which Republican Senator's 1970 victory showed the Republican Party's renewed competitiveness in Tennessee?
Which constituency has become the Republican Party's staunchest supporters in Tennessee?
Which Republican was elected Tennessee Governor in 1970?
Which two Tennessee cities are most supportive of the Democratic Party?
Which Tennessee city has the largest African-American population?
Which two eastern Tennessee congressional districts have the longest track record of favoring Republican candidates?
Since which year has Tennessee's 1st congressional district voted overwhelmingly Republican?
Which two Tennessee metropolitan areas have been most supportive of the Republican Party?
Which Democratic candidate lost his own state in the 2000 general election?
By what percentage of the popular vote did George W. Bush carry Tennessee in 2004?
Democratic presidential candidates from which region's states have fared best in recent Tennessee history?
Which 2000 presidential candidate was a former US Senator from Tennessee?
Which 1962 US Supreme Court ruling forced states to realign their voting districts to reflect census findings? 
What phrase expresses the Supreme Court's 1962 decision that population overrules geographic consideration in election districting?
A bias in Tennessee politics favoring which type of geographical district gave rise to the Baker v. Carr Supreme Court case?
Which type of geographical district became more powerful in Tennessee politics following the 1962 Supreme Court decision?
Which Tennessee law enforcement agency looks for road safety violations?
Which Tennessee agency enforces state wildlife regulations outside of parks?
What is the acronym for Tennessee's statewide criminal investigation agency?
Who provides law enforcement within Tennessee's state parks?
Which law enforcement entity serves warrants in Tennessee?
Each Tennessee county must elect which law enforcement official?
Who is in charge of policing Tennessee counties' unincorporated areas?
Who polices incorporated areas of Tennessee's counties?
What proportion of Tennessee counties recognize their Sheriff as their head law enforcement official?
What method did Tennessee use for capital punishment before 1913?
In which year was electrocution introduced as Tennessee's method of execution?
How many inmates has Tennessee executed since 2000?
How many death row inmates were awaiting executing in Tennessee in April 2015?
How many prisoners did Tennessee execute between 1916 and 1960?
What is the nickname of the University of Tennessee, Knoxville athletic teams?
In which year did the University of Tennessee begin competing in the Southeastern Conference of the NCAA?
How many college football bowl championships have the Tennessee Volunteers won?
How many national titles has the Tennessee Volunteers women's basketball team claimed?
What is the farthest the Tennessee Volunteers have progressed in the NCAA men's basketball tournament?
What is post-punk?
When did post-punk arrive on the scene?
What did post-punk artists use in their music?
What began to spring up around the post-punk music?
How did post-punk take on rock and roll?
When was the original punk movement?
What is a name for a type of rock music that is extremely varied in sound?
What elements of punk rock did post-punk depart from?
What subject matter does post-punk commonly mesh its musical sensibilities with?
What developed along with the music developments of post-punk?
Who coined the term post-punk?
What dis the new term, post-punk, cover?
What inspired early post-punk artists?
Why did post-punk fall out of love with punk?
What did the new post-punk artists believe?
Who were the first to use the term "post-punk"?
When was "post-punk" first used to start describing artists?
What were many post-punk artists originally inspired by?
How many chords did standard punk songs typically use?
What did post-punk artists feel there was an imperative to constantly do?
What were the things that post-punk really got into?
What are non-rock styles that post-punk used as inspiration?
What aesthetic did Matthew Bannister associate with post-punk?
What music did post-punk end to reject?
As a movement, post-punk has been characterized by its conceptual assault on what conventions?
What does post-punk reject any of which are perceived as being traditionalist, hegemonic, or rockist?
What is one of the foundational aspects post-punk is deeply favorable towards?
How did post-punk artists once again approach the studio?
What references did post-punk artists specifically reject of the 1960s rock artists?
How did Nicholas Lezard describe post-punk?
Which artists were influential in post-punk?
Which writers helped to influence the post-punk movement?
What was an intellectual focus of post-punk?
How did the post-punk movement feel about big business?
What was Nicholas Lezard's description of post-punk?
Where did post-punk ram its appropriation of ideas into?
What tradition could be found in works by Captain Beefheart and David Bowie?
What intellectual movement informed and influenced a variety of post-punk artists?
Why did many post-punk artists produce and release their own music?
Who described post-punk as "a more adventurous and arty form of punk"?
Who described post-punk as  "less a genre of music than a space of possibility"?
Who said "so multifarious that only the broadest use of the term is possible" with regards to post-punk?
Who does music critic Stephen Thomas Erlewine work for?
What as the blanket term "post-punk" been the target of?
What organization is Stephen Thomas Erlewine associated with?
What have some people suggested post-punk doesn't have, instead being more about approaches and sensibilities?
Why type of scholar is music journalist Simon Reynolds?
Why is only the broadest use of genre possible when trying to categorize what actually defines post-punk?
What is post-punk?
What else was music incorrectly catagorized into before post-punk?
Why is the term post-punk sometimes disputed?
What is the acctepted era of post-punk?
What previous movement is post-punk often identified as coming after?
What were many groups now labeled as post-punk initially categorized as?
Why has the prefix 'post' caused a bit of dispute as it relates to various post-punk groups?
Who has defined a period of when the post-punk era was?
Between what years did Reynolds identify the post-punk era as existing?
WHich independent music company was founded by Geoff Travis?
Who founded Factory?
When did releasing music indepentently really hit popularity?
Who released Spiral Scratch on their own label?
When did the indoe music scene begin to grow?
What did many entrepreneurs interested in their local punk-influenced music scenes found?
Who founded the record label Rough Trade?
Where was Tony Wilson's Factory based?
When did some groups start looking for methods to release their music themselves?
Whose label did the Buzzcocks release their Spiral Scratch EP on?
When did writers for Sounds first mention "post punk"?
What did Wire do with sounds, lyrics and aesthetics which different a lot from their peers?
What career path did Jon Savage take in life?
When did the Sex Pistols break up?
Who was Siouxsie backed by?
What are examples of British bands termed post-punk?
Who connsidered post-punk "harsh urban scrapings [,] controlled white noise" and "massively accented drumming"?
Which band's lead singer was Johnny Rotten?
What was Johnny Rotten's real name?
When did the Sex Pistols break up?
When the punk movement started shrinking, what began to fill the void left by their demise?
What territory did the post-punk bands pursue in their works?
What nationality's music magazines had an influential part of post-punk culture?
What professional is Ian Penman known from?
What kind of background did many of the initial post-punk artists have?
Who were well known authors covering the post-punk era?
What were popular post-punk culture media sources?
What were the bands coming in on the heels of post-punk beginning to sound like?
What was a common background of post-punk musicians?
What was a common theme to post-punk music?
Who was responsible for disbanding the Sex Pistols?
What group declared itself to be anti-music of any kind?
Where did Joy Division hail from?
What type of literature contributed to Joy Division's unique style?
What end of the political spectrum was the political philosophy of Gang of Four?
What band did Johnny Rotten form after the Sex Pistols?
What kind of group was Public Image Ltd?
Which bands combined way left politics with art school studies?
What are some British post-punk bands from Manchester?
Which post-punk bands began to branch off into things like dub and dance music?
What type of producer was Martin Hannett?
What type of production techniques did Dennis Bovell develop?
What took a central roll for the emerging post-punk music?
What eventually resulted in the pioneering of industrial music?
Whose independent label became a hub for the industrial scene?
Who were producers that led the way with emerging the post-punk culture?
What was the name of Throbbing Gristle's record label?
Which bands were on the forefront of industrial music?
Where did industrial music get it's name?
What was one of the most important ways that post-punk artists created their new sound?
What type of worldview did New York's no wave movement tend to have?
The Contortions, Teenage Jesus and the Jerks were all musicians part of what movement?
Who produced the compilation "No New York"?
What no wave-affiliated label was founded in 1978?
In addition to non-rock styles, what did some of the no-wave groups experiment with sonically?
What was no wave?
What type of a view did no wave have?
What types of musicians were the Contortions, Teenage Jesus and the Jerks, Mars, DNA, Theoretical Girls and Rhys Chatham?
When was ZE Records founded?
What was considered the true portrait of the no wave movement?
What did the magazines catering to post-punk interest do to alienate their readers?
Many of the big players in the post-punk scene began leaning away from what as time progressed?
What writer advocated "overground brightness"?
Which magazine tied to the post-punk movement lost half of its circulation?
What did the club-oriented scene emphasize instead of the experimental seriousness of earlier post-punk groups?
What did authors and artists begin advocating for instead of the underground scene?
What began to alienate the readers from publications such as NME?
Who did Paul Morley collaborate with on the Art of Noise?
What did the Art of Noise hope to accomplish?
Which new cultural movement began to emphasize glam, escapism and fashion?
What style of music was Gary Numan associated with?
What did the synthpop style of music benefit from the gaining popularity of?
Synthpop heavily borrowed elements from what type of music?
What type of ideas did post-punk artists attempt to sneak into mainstream pop?
What did some post-punk artists reject their previous avant-garde practices to pursue?
What new music style focused on electronic and synthesized sounds?
What really helped to launch synthpop?
What else began to emerge as post-punk groups moved to a more commercial focus?
How did pos-punk give rise to pop?
When did Manhattan's no wave scene start becoming more dance-oriented?
What formula did a lot of the artists emerging from the scene adhere to?
What type of party could be found at venues like Club 57?
Who did the venues because cultural hubs for?
What movement was the group the Lounge Lizards indebted to?
What did Downtown Manhattan's no wave scene transition into?
What type of sound did no wave have before it began to transition to a more dance oriented sound?
When was ZE's Mutant Disco released?
What clubs were frequented by artists in the emerging dance scene?
What type of music did many of the post-punk bands start indulging in?
How did bands associated with the original post-punk movement cause it to end?
What venue drove a lot of the awareness of the music from the now pop post-punk bands?
Where was a lot of the post-punk pop bands played in addition to MTV?
What band combined religious imagery with political commentary into their music?
What was the death knell of the post-punk movement?
What else would the post-punk bands record under?
Who was the most successful band to arrise from post-punk?
What was one of the most popular concepts of the pop movement?
What was a driving force behind the revival of the second British Invasion of New Music to America?
How did most critical writing treat the post-punk era, until recently?
What do contemporary scholars feel the post-punk period contributed in hindsight?
What did Simon Reynolds describe the era of post-punk as a match for in terms of great music created?
Who wrote that the music of the post-punk era was avant-garde?
What were the post-punk era artists more interested in doing to their audiences than in entertaining them with pop songs?
What era was usually dismissed as merely an awkward phase of music?
What do comtemporary scholars think that post-punk actually did for music?
Which critic said that the post-punk period was open to any possibilities as far as music went?
Who said that the post-punk movement rivaled the Sixties in the shear amount of great music produced?
What did Nicholas Leonard say united post-punk?
What musical styles did post-punk help merge?
What beginnings rose from the dead ashes of post-punk?
New wave, industrial music, synthpop and house all share roots in what genre?
What style of music did post-punk band the Cure play in?
What genre of music did Joy Division help in the development of?
Which type of eclectic music had a huge variety, large innovations and an "anything goes" mentality?
Which darker post-punk bands gave rise to gothic rock?
Where did systhpop, industrial and neo-psychedelia music derive from?
What type of music was gothic rock?
What styles of music did post-punk pave the way for?
Which North American version of football calls for 12 player per side on the field?
How many yards wider is a Canadian football field than an American football field?
Which version of North American football has smaller end zones?
How many downs does a team have to advance ten yards in Canadian football?
How far away from the line of scrimmage must Canadian football defenders be?
On which date was the first Canadian football game for which a written record has survived?
Which team won the first recorded Canadian football game?
What is the oldest football club in Canada?
Which founder of Milton, MA also helped develop the rules of Canadian football?
What was the first final score recorded of a Canadian football game?
On which date was the first governing body for Canadian football formed?
Which governing organization for Canadian football was formed on June 12, 1880?
In which year was the Western Interprovincial Football Union founded?
Which Canadian football union expanded its scope in 1891? 
Which organization founded in 1956 evolved into the modern Canadian Football League?
Which Canadian football rules did the ORFU adopt in 1903?
Which three Canadian football unions resisted the Burnside Rules?
In which year did forward passes become acceptable in Canadian football?
Which style of North American football changed the rules of their game the most from their earliest versions?
Who donated a championship trophy for Canadian football teams in 1909?
When did professional teams begin to dominate the Canadian football championship?
Which trophy was awarded to a Canadian football champion beginning in 1909?
Which was the last amateur team to compete for the Canadian football championship?
What government position was held by the man who donated the Grey Cup to Canadian football?
Which one country besides Canada has hosted a professional Canadian football game?
In which year did the CFL first attempt an expansion into the United States?
Which American CFL team won the Grey Cup?
The return of an NFL team to which city contributed to the demise of the CFL's American expansion?
How many years did the CFL South Division last?
Which organization oversees amateur Canadian football?
How many football teams compete in Canadian Interuniversity Sport?
Which trophy goes to the Canadian Interuniversity Sport football champion?
What is the name of the championship game for junior Canadian football teams?
Which provinces field teams in the Quebec Junior Football League?
Which team calls heads or tails in the coin flip before a CFL game?
Who on a football team articulates the team's decision following the coin flip?
What can the team that wins the coin toss choose besides whether they wish to kick off or receive the ball?
Who makes a choice after the team that wins the coin toss has made their decision?
What is the term for play stopped because the ball carrier, although not fully tackled, can no longer advance the ball?
Where does the next play start unless a team has just scored?
Which parts of the ball carrier's body do not cause play to stop when they touch the ground?
Which direction of pass causes play to stop when it is not caught?
What minimum distance from the sideline does the official place the ball before play starts?
What is the term for the line across the field where the ball is positioned before a play?
How many players must the team with possession place near the line of scrimmage?
How close to the line of scrimmage can defensive players approach before a play is run?
How many players does each side field in an American football game?
What is the term for the team who begins a play with control of the ball?
What is the initial backward movement of the ball in a play called?
Which two players most commonly receive the first backward pass in a football play?
What is another term for a completed play?
How many plays can the offence run without gaining ten yards?
What does a team do when they have not advance the ball enough to score or likely gain a new set of downs?
How many downs does a team get after they've gained ten on their first down?
What is the term for the player that is currently handing the football when play is underway?
Within what distance from the line of scrimmage can offensive players who do not have the ball be legally contacted by defensive players?
What are two illegal ways to block an opposing player's progress near the line of scrimmage?
Which player may not be tackled immediately after they have thrown a pass?
What is the usual penalty when the rules of play are violated?
How many yards does a team lose when they commit a minor penalty?
How many yards does a team lose for face-masking?
What other than yardage is sometimes awarded the offence on a defensive penalty?
Where is the ball placed when a defensive penalty is committed in their own end zone?
In which North American style of football is the line of scrimmage never inside the one-yard line?
A play that results in what outcome will never also be a scoring play?
How many penalty yards are awarded when the ball is nearer the goal line than the usual penalty yardage?
Who can decline a penalty?
A team receiving a punt cannot decline a penalty on which down?
The outcome of which play determines the placement of the ball when a penalty is declined?
What can a team do when they prefer the original outcome of a play to the situation they would have with a penalty assessed on the other team for that play?
At which point in a game is the time the offence takes to put the ball in play measured?
How many seconds elapse before a time count penalty is assessed?
What is the penalty for a time count on the first two downs?
Who can turn the ball over to the other side if an offensive team incurs too many time count violations?
How many yards does the offense lose for a time count on third down?
What happens to a quarter whose time expires while the ball is still live in play?
Which plays do not cause time to run off the clock during the final minutes of a half?
What causes a quarter to be extended one additional play even if time has run out?
How long is a quarter in minutes?
What determines which team gets possession first when extending a game to break a tie?
At which yard line on their opponent's side does a team take possession of the ball according to the CFL's tie-breaking rules?
In which year did the CFL begin requiring teams to attempt 2-point conversions after scoring in a tie-breaking situation?
Which round of tie-breaking is the last possible round in a regular season CFL game?
Which CFL games require tie-breaking rounds continue until a winner results?
What countries led the two coalitions during the Seven Years' War?
What major power of the time was not involved in The Seven Years' War?
When was the Seven Year' War fought?
What country emerged as the world's predominate power?
What was the Seven Years' War considered as the prelude to?
Who made the first strike of the Seven Years' War?
What area was the site of the first action in the Seven Years' War
What country allied with Prussia?
What was the initial country to ally with France?
The smaller German states joined which side?
With whom did the Dutch Republic align?
Which side of the coalitions did Naples, Sicily and Savoy join?
How did the war impact the Russian population?
What items had already been taxed by Russian Empress Elizabeth?
What did Britain gain in North America from the war?
What did Great Britain gain in the West Indies from the war?
What did Great Britain gain in Africa from the war?
What happened to the scope of France's colonies as a result of the war?
How did the war impact France financially?
What is the grandest label that historians have used to describe the  Seven Years' War?
What does the term "Second Hundred Years' War" describe?
What is the precedent for the "Second Hundred Year's War?
What was a later conflict that some considered the first World War?
What was Sweden's motivation to join the war?
What country did Spain invade?
When did Spain invade?
What region did Austria hope to recapture?
What was the result of the invasion by Spain?
Why did Denmark-Norway remain neutral rather than assisting its longtime ally, Britain?
Who would Sicily and Savoy normally align with?
What did Russian Empress Elizabeth use the proceeds of the tax on salt and alcohol for?
Why did Naples remain neutral?
What did Great Britain gain with respect to the French trading outposts on the subcontinent of India?
What was the result for the Native American tribes?
What did the Native American tribes accomplish in the later Pontiac's War?
What were two factors that redeemed the outcome for the Prussians?
Who was the leader of Prussia?
What two geographies did Frederick want for Prussia?
What country would refuse support if Frederick wen to war for Saxony and west Prussia?
What was his concern about trying take Hanover from the British?
What kept Augustus III from consolidating Saxony and Poland?
Who was Poland's ancient ally?
What country was pleased that Britain used its Hanover vote to elect Joseph as Te Holy Roman Emperor?
What country and person were displeased that Britain used it Hanover vote to elect Joseph as the Holy Roman Emporer?
What was a major objective of Britain in joining the Austro-Russian alliance?
What was Kaunitz's objective with the French?
What was Kaunitz of Austria willing to trade for French help in capturing Silesia?
What did Russia use Britain's money for?
What countries teamed together at the Convention of Westminster?
When was the Convention of Westminster signed?
Why was Beshuzev happy to put the troops on the Livonian-Lithunian border?
What was the response of Empress Elizabeth of Russia to the English-Prussian agreement?
Why was France mad at the British-Prussian agreement?
France was now in a desperate position, what did they do?
Who were the parties to the treaty of Versailles?
How many troops did Austria and France pledge to defend each other?
Where did the French build Fort Duquesne?
What city is now located where Fort Duquesne was built?
Were the British successful in stopping the building of Fort Duquesne?
Who led the British militia to drive the French out of Fort Duquesne?
Where did the French for General George Washington's surrender?
How much effort did France put into wars to defend its colonies?
Identify a major factor in this feckless strategy by France of not defending its colonies with enthusiasm?
Why did the French rulers need a large domestic army?
In treaty negotiations, what trades did France hope to make.
What was the grand strategy of prime minister William Pitt?
What was Pitt's primary military advantage?
What locations did Pitt want from France?
How did Pitt plan to augment the British regular troops?
How did Pitt's strategy affect Britain's future plans?
What was the reason that the British Prime Minister thought that ware in Europe could be prevented?
What country initiated conflict?
What was the result for Admiral Byng?
When was war declared between Britain and France?
How did Frederick protect Silesia when he went to invade Saxony?
How did Frederick protect East Prussia when he went to invade Saxony?
Describe the command of Prince Ferdinand of Brunswick.
Describe the command of the Duke ofBrunswich-Bevern.
Describe the command of Field Marshall James Keith 
How much resistance did Frederick encounter in Saxon?
What reinforcements were the Saxons expecting?
What happened to the Saxon army?
What was the result of the fury of Europe?
What characteristic of Saxony caused Europe to be mad?
Where did the Austrians retreat in May of 1757?
What were casualties like in the 1757 battle in Prague?
Who led the Prussian assault on Prague in 1757
Why did Frederick reduce his manpower at Prague?
How did Austrian Marshall Daun reverse the situation at Prague?
What were reasons that the late 1757 time frame looked bad for Prussia?
What was the initial result of the French invasion?
What was the result of the Austrian invasion?
Name the four opponents of Prussia.
What German areas were beginning to oppose Prussia?
What Hanoverian leader lost the Battle of Hastenbeck?
What country won the battle at Hanover?
How would one describe the future participation of Hanover?
How did Frederick respond to the defeat at Hanover?
Why did Ferdinand feel comfortable withdrawing troops from the eastern front?
What was the result of Prussian resistance to Sweden?
What area of Sweden was occupied by Prussia?
What favorable developments occurred for Prussia in Hanover?
What political development shaped the policy of the British?
How did the Prussians slow the advance of the Russians?
What was the size of one of the Prussian victories against the Russians?
Identify a major Prussian loss to the Russians
identify a major Prussian loss to the Austrians.
In 1763 what was the status of Frederick?
In 1763 what was the status of Austria?
What had happened to Frederick's financial help from Britain?
What had happened to Frederick's extra troops from Russia?
Who decided to send British troops into Germany?
Who led the invasion troops?
Was the landing successful?
Where did the troops land?
What stopped the planned siege at St. Malo?
How did the army get to the new anchorage location?
How did the fleet respond to the bad weather?
How did the British army escape
What happened to the British army?
What island did Great Britain lose in 1756?
What success did the British have in Cuba?
What possession did the French lose to the Brits in 1758
Identify the French colonies lost  to the British in 1759 and 1762.
What other colony was taken by the British from Spain?
Who assisted the French in taking forts Oswego and William Henry?
How did the French guard respond to the attack on the prisoners?
How did France's native allies treat the British prisoners?
How did the French defend the Fortress of Louisbourg?
Which country enjoyed the most success in battles in North America in 1759
What two forts fell on the same day in 1758?
When did General Wolfe take Quebec?
Did the French take Quebec back?
What military advantage brought the success for the British in defending Quebec?
Where did the French attack in 1762?
What advantage would taking St. John's have provided for the French?
Did the French hold St. John's?
Did the French take St. John's?
Where was the final battle between the French and British in North America?
Name two major events of the Seven Years' War In North America.
Name two more major events of the Seven Years' War in North America.
How did the events of the Seven Years' War affects the production of art?
What are some novels about the Seven Years' War period?
What other items point to the interest in the events of the Seven Years' War?
What did France retain in India?
How were the French settlements changed to eliminate their military usefulness?
What French ally in the area abandoned the French?
What happened to French power in the area?
Who defected to the British?
Where was the Treaty of Hubertusburg signed?
Who were the parties in the Treaty of Hubertusburg?
What country made gains in the Treaty of Hubertusburg?
What did Austrian want in the Treaty of Hubertusburg
Did the Austrians retain Glatz?
What happened to Austrian prestige due to the war?
What area was preserved from Prussian invasion?
Did Austria get Silesia back?
Who did Frederick II promise to vote for in the imperial elections?
What was the impact of the war on the wealth of Austria?
What was the change in the status of Prussia because of the war?
What was Hanover's attitude toward Austria?
Which British king supported Hanover following the war?
What was the name of Feynman's 1959 talk on nanotech?
What was the name of Feynman's lectures he made as an undergraduate?
What was the name of one of his semi-autobiographical books?
Feynman wrote many books and gave many ___
What book did James Gleck write about Feynman?
What personality trait did Feynman acquire from his mother?
What person influenced Feynman to think deeply?
What electronic instrument did Feynman repair as a child?
As a grade school child he created an electronic device while his parents were away, what was it?
What talent did Feynman have, even early in his childhood?
What happened to Feyman's younger brother?
What is Feynman's sister's name?
What science displicine did Feyman encourage his sister to study?
Who was the one that pushed Joan to explore the universe?
What career did Joan hold?
Feynman used this to protect his eyes during the test detonation
What atomic bomb test did Feynman see?
What did Feynman see after the atomic test?
What did Feynman think that the truck windshield would shield him against?
What was the Water Boiler that Feyman worked on?
Where was Feyman sent after his work at Los Alamos?
What did Feynman help produce at the Oak Ridge Facility?
Which weapon did Feynman found to not be feasible?
Where did Feynman work on the "Wateer Boiler"?
In which book did Feynman talk about the Manhattan project?
What was his reasoning in helping make the atomic bomb?
After feeling guilty for helping make an atomic bomb, Feynman went through what mental disorder?
What did Feynman think of his part in making the bomb after Germany had been defeated?
What did Feynman produce that help in understanding calculations between particles in space and time?
What is the name of the antimatter counterpart of electrons?
Where did Feynman paint his diagrams?
What did Feynman digrams allow him and others to do?
What model did Murray Gell-Mann develop?
What model did Feynman produce to complement the quark model?
Quarks were thought of as what in the 1960s?
Which scientist experimented with blasting alpha particles at the nuclei of gold?
After the fifth quark was discovered, Feynman said what had to also exist?
Which society was Feynman elected to?
After 3 years at Caltech what lectures did Feynman produce?
Why did publisher change the cover picture on Feynman's book?
In his book, Feynman was shown playing what instrument?
What was the name of the book Feynman wrote over light and matter?
What did Feynman help develop in the 1980s?
Who did Feynman work with on computers at Caltech?
Who else worked with Feynman on developing computers?
What specifically did his son work on?
What did Feyman do while his son worked on software?
In which way did he write about his experience on the Rogers Commission?
Feyman's experience on the Rogers Commission was talked about is which of his books?
While the higher-ups said a failure was unlikely, at 1 in 100,000 odds, the scientists felt the odd were what?
His writings about the Rogers Commission showed that trouble was brewing between scientists and executives at which prolific institute?
Who did NASA recruit by using flawed safety numbers?
Which religious sect did Feynman refuse to be part of?
Which book did Feynman decline to be listed in?
What did Feynman believe that the Jewish people were not?
What religious affiliation did Feynman have?
Feynman did not like to be listed in anything that labeled people by what standard?
Where did Feynman work at in Brazil?
Which place in Russia could Feynman not visit, but wished to do so?
When was Feynman allowed to go to Tuva?
What is the name of the film that discusses Feynman's attempt to get to Tuva?
Who went to Tuva in Feynman's stead?
Which book does Feynman detail was to pick up girls?
Where was his second office at Caltech?
Who was the only person to testify that the topless bar should remain open?
Where did Feynman write down his equations at the topless bar?
Who tried to shut the topless bar down?
Which paper published a story about Feynman in 1992?
Who helped tell the 1992 New York Times story about Feynman?
Gleick told a story about a specific algorithim that Gell-Mann described to a student, what was this algorithim called?
Feynman's algorithim included writing the problem, thinking, and then what?
What book did Gaddafi publish that detailed his Third Internal Theory?
What was Gaddafi's first position in government?
As Chairman of the RCC, list the first two things that Gaddafi accomplished.
How did Gaddafi change the legal system?
Describe the Popular Revolution.
How did Gaddafi change the legal system?
How did Gaddafi use all the money that resulted from nationalizing the oil industry?
Describe the Popular Revolution.
When Gaddafi established his power in the government, what were his first actions?
What political ideology did Gaddafi want to push his country to?
What was the profession of Gaddafi's father?
What was Gaddafi's ethnicity?
In what city was the Royal Military Academy located?
From what monarch did Gaddafi's movement take over Libya?
What was the name of the governing body headed by Gaddafi after the revolution?
What does "Jamahiriya" mean?
What was Gaddafi's role in jamahiriya?
List two reasons why Libya become an "international pariah."
Name two significant events in 1986 that demonstrated the world's view of Libya.
How did Gaddafi lose power?
What was Libya's socialist government called?
Why did Libya become an "international pariah"?
How did the world respond to Libya in 1986?
How did Gaddafi lose power?
What does the term Jamahiriya mean in English?
In what year did Gaddafi found the Jamahiriya?
Along with Egypt, what nation did Libya have border issues with in this era?
What terrorist bombing was Gaddafi's Libya supposedly involved in?
In what year did the United states bomb Libya?
Describe Gaddafi's humble upbringing.
How did Gaddafi's father earn a living?
What culture did Gaddafi experience as a child?
When was Gaddafi born?
Describe Gaddafi's early childhood.
How did Gaddafi's father earn a living?
How come no one knows for sure when Gaddafi was born?
When did Gaddafi's parents die?
Other than Mohammad Abdul Salam bin Hamed bin Mohammad, what was Gaddafi's father called?
When did Gaddafi's mother die?
How many sisters did Gaddafi have?
Near what town was Gaddafi's birthplace of Qasr Abu Hadi?
What was the name of Gaddafi's tribe?
When did Libya become an independent nation?
When Libya first became an independent country, what form of government did it adopt?
What countries occupied Libya after World War II?
Who was the first leader of Libya?
What World War I event directly impacted Gaddafi's family?
How did World War I directly impact Gaddafi's family?
What happened to Libya right after World War II?
When was it announced that Libya would be independent?
What country occupied Libya during World War II?
What nation controlled Libya as a colony when Gaddafi was a child?
Who battled the Italians during the North African campaign?
Who was Gaddafi's father's father?
During what year did the Italians invade Libya?
Along with the British, who occupied Libya at the end of the Second World War?
Describe Gaddafi's first experience with education.
In addition to gaining an education, describe how Gaddafi managed to attend school 20 miles from his family.
How did Gaddafi deal with peer pressure regarding his cultural background?
Describe Gaddafi's parents' educational backgrounds.
Why was Gaddafi made fun of in elementary school?
How did Gaddafi manage to attend elementary school so far from home?
Were Gaddafi's parents educated?
Was Gaddafi's education free?
In what religion was Gaddafi educated?
What town did Gaddafi's family move to after they left Sirte?
What geographical portion of Libya is Fezzan located in?
Who was Gaddafi's closest friend in secondary school?
In what town did Gaddafi first attend primary school?
What subject did Gaddafi briefly study before joining the military?
Why didn't Gaddafi learn to speak English?
Where did Gaddafi begin his military training?
How did Gaddafi view the influence of the military?
What crime did the British trainers believe Gaddafi was involved in?
What subject did Gaddafi study at the University of LIbya?
Why did Gaddafi drop out of college?
What rationale did Gaddafi use for joining the military?
What country trained Libya's military?
What crime was Gaddafi suspected of being involved in during his time in the military?
Where did Gaddafi attend college for a time?
During his time in college, what did Gaddafi study?
After Gaddafi left the University of Libya, what institution did he attend?
While the Libyan monarchy existed, who trained the Libyan army?
What did Gaddafi regard his British instructors as?
When Gaddafi traveled to London, did he attempt to blend into the English culture?
How did Gaddafi feel about the British officers?
How did the Bovington signal course director view Gaddafi?
How did the Bovington sign course director think of Gaddafi?
When Gaddafi went to England, how did he respond to their culture?
How did Gaddafi feel about the British Army officers?
What were Gaddafi's favorite hobbies in the military?
Along with reading, how did Gaddafi enjoy spending his free time?
In what part of London did Gaddafi wear traditional Arab garb?
What language did Gaddafi have difficulty learning?
Where did Gaddafi's signal course take place?
What mistreatment did Gaddafi say that British soldiers subjected him to?
What was happening to Idris' government in the 1960s?
What industry greatly impacted the downfall of Idris's government?
What sort of problems did the oil industry experience in Libya?
What did the Libyan workers do to show their support of Egypt?
What country won the Six-Day War?
In what cities did protests against westerners flare up in 1967?
On what country's behalf were the 1967 protests taking place?
In what year did the CIA begin to expect a military coup in Libya?
What revolutionary organization was led by Abdul Aziz Shalhi?
When did Gaddafi decide to stage his coup?
What was Gaddafi's coup called?
What did Gaddafi seize during the coup?
What did Hameidi do during the coup?
What countries did Idris visit in the summer of 1969?
What was the code name for Gaddafi's coup against the monarchy?
What leader's forces occupied the barracks in Tripoli?
Who arrested Sayyid Hasan ar-Rida al-Mahdi as-Sanussi?
What revolutionary leader took control of the anti-aircraft equipment in Tripoli?
How did Gaddafi announced his leadership?:
List the two names of Gaddafi's coup.
What did Gaddafi tell the people that the revolution represented?
What did Gaddafi insist that the coup be referred to as?
What was the name of the government Gaddafi set up after overthrowing the monarchy?
What was the Libyan coup called at first?
What was the Libyan coup later called, when it was renamed for the day it took place?
What was the name of the revolutionary group led by Gaddafi?
How did Gaddafi characterize the monarchy in his radio address?
How did Gaddafi staff the RCC members?
Whose face was most closely associated with Libya's new government?
Did everyone endorse Gaddafi?
On what date were the members of the RCC announced?
What was the general age group of the members of the RCC?
How many members of the RCC had graduated from university?
What was the sex of all the members of the RCC?
Along with the working class, what was the class background of RCC members?
What did the RCC do with remnants of the monarchy?
How did Gaddafi view the elite?
What happened to the monarchists and and journalists?
What clan was King Idris part of?
How many people were executed by the People's Courts?
What sentence was given to the absent King Idris?
Along with the Senussi, who was purged from the military?
Along with journalists, who was tried in the People's Courts?
What was the RCC's view of political parties?
What did Gaddafi do in 1971?
What was the impact of incorporating the sharia into the legal system?
In what year did the Revolutionary Intellectuals Seminar occur?
In what month and year did Gaddafi first resign?
What did the RCC outlaw in 1970?
What publications were shut down 1972?
In what year did Gaddafi's second resignation occur?
What was Libya's main export?
How did Gaddafi's decisions in the oil industry impact other OPEC states?
What was the main export of Libya?
How much money did Libya accrue in a year as a result of the Tripoli Agreement?
What organization of oil producers was Libya a part of?
Who was responsible for raising the price of Libyan oil in 1969?
In 1979, how much did the average per capita income change for Libyans?
How did Libya's gross domestic product increase from 1969 to 1979?
What decision allowed Gaddafi to move Libya closer to socialism?
How did the RCC begin their march toward nationalization?
What company's property did Libya nationalize in December of 1971?
In what month and year was a blanket nationalization of foreign oil production proclaimed?
What was Libya's GDP in 1969?
In what year did Libya have a GDP of $24.5 billion?
What was Libya's per-capita income in 1951?
What sort of identity was promoted by the RCC?
What identities did the RCC try to dissuade?
Where was the military court located that tried the tribal leaders in 1971?
What were tribal leaders accused of in 1971?
Of what party did Gaddafi become president in this period?
On what philosophy was the RCC's social reforms based?
What language was used in official communications by the government of Libya?
During what period were oil-funded programs for social welfare created?
What religion was suppressed in Libya?
What beverage did the Libyan government ban?
What philosophy influenced the RCC?
Along with Egypt, Iraq and Sudan, what country's Arab nationalist government recognized the Libyan revolutionary government?
What Arab nationalist thinker was influential with the RCC?
What countries founded the Arab Revolutionary Front with Libya?
In what year was the Arab Revolutionary Front founded?
Who did Anwar Sadat succeed?
What was the alternative to creating an Arab political federation?
Along with Libya, what nations joined the political federation?
In what year was the merger charter signed?
When did the federation have to be implemented by?
How many Italians lived in Libya prior to October of 1970?
In addition to Italians, what people were kicked out of Libya in 1970?
Who did the RCC buy military equipment from?
Who were the adversaries of the Soviets during the Cold War?
Who did Libya offer foreign aid to in 1971?
During what decade did Libya finance militant groups?
During what conflict did Gaddafi notably switch sides?
On what continent did the Red Army Faction operate?
What was the Third World fighting against in the 1970s?
What was the ANC combating?
On what date did Gaddafi declare the beginning of a "Popular Revolution"?
What type of revolution began as a result of the third point?
What happened to Libya's laws as a result of the first point of Gaddafi's speech?
How many points did the Popular Revolution plan have?
Along with Libya and France, where did Gaddafi speak on the Popular Revolution?
What were the Libyan people instructed to create in conjunction with the Popular Revolution?
Along with the bureaucracy, who were the General People's Committees directed at?
What political system did Gaddafi claim was less democratic than the General People's Committees?
What kind of structure did the People's Committee system use?
What negative consequence did the People's Committees lead to?
Along with Ba'athists and Islamists, who was arrested as a result of the actions of the People's Committees?
Along with the General People's Congress, what national body represented the People's Committees?
Who was the founder of Three Worlds Theory?
In what month and year did Gaddafi begin Third International Theory?
What sort of state did Gaddafi believe should be founded?
Along with the United States, what country did Gaddafi believe to be imperialist?
What economic philosophy was associated with the West?
Gaddafi's written work on Third International Theory consisted of how many volumes?
When was the last volume of Gaddafi's work on Third International Theory published?
What was the title given to Gaddafi's Third International Theory writings?
What volume of The Green Book discussed democracy?
What political philosophy was discussed in the second volume of The Green Book?
In what year was the Office for the Security of the Revolution founded?
In what year did student protests occur in Benghazi?
How many senior officers were expelled fro the army in 1975?
How many students were executed in January of 1977?
Who criticized the political execution of students and military officers that occurred in January 1977?
Whose rise to the presidency of Egypt led to the decline in relations between Egypt and Libya?
What nation's military destroyed Libyan Arab Airlines Flight 114?
What city was the destination of RMS Queen Elizabeth 2?
Why did Libyan Arab Airlines Flight 114 accidentally fly into Israel's airspace?
Jews from what nation chartered the RMS Queen Elizabeth 2?
What country formed a political union with Libya in 1974?
What was the name of the abortive political union between Tunisia and Libya in 1974?
Who was the president of Tunisia in 1974?
With what country did Libya conclude the Hassi Messaoud defense agreement?
Against what government was the Hassi Messaoud defense agreement directed against?
What policy did Gaddafi propose that the GPC was against?
What type of education did Gaddafi prefer to primary schools?
What was a policy that Gaddafi instituted without support from the GPC?
What book did the Jamahiriya look to for legal advice?
What tenet of sharia did Gaddafi believe was incompatible with socialism?
What relationship led the Soviets to invite Gaddafi to Moscow?
What did conservative Muslim clerics accuse Gaddafi of?
Who won a border war with Libya?
In what year did Gaddafi resign from his position in the GPC?
Prior to his resignation, what office did Gaddafi occupy in the GPC?
After Gaddafi stepped down from the GPC, what title did he take?
What authority did Gaddafi have over the Libyan armed forces?
In September of 1978, what bureaucracy did Gaddafi speak out against?
What "dictatorship" did Gaddafi attack in September of 1978?
After People's Committees expropriated companies, what did they turn them into?
How many companies were taken over by People's Committees?
On what date did the GPC separate the revolution from the government?
Who was the leader of the Revolutionary Committees?
What was the English name of the magazine published by the Revolutionary Committees?
How often was al-Zahf al-Akhdar published?
What bodies represented the revolution after the separation of government and revolution?
Where did land redistribution begin in 1979?
When did the Jefara plain land redistribution end?
What was the maximum amount of money a person could have in their bank account without having it expropriated in 1980?
What took the place of private businesses in 1981?
As a result of the 1981 laws putting the government in control of commerce, what began to thrive?
What tribe did Gaddafi belong to?
What Libyan government official allegedly plotted to kill Gaddafi in 1978?
In 1981, what Libyan opposition group was founded?
Who founded the NFSL?
What group notably murdered Libyan diplomats?
About how many Libyans died in Operation El Dorado Canyon?
What terrorist attack did the United States claim Libya supported?
How many Americans died in the Berlin disco bombing of 1986?
What was the name of Gaddafi's daughter who may not have existed?
What country did the CIA believe Reagan should attack instead of Libya?
In what year did the "Revolution within a Revolution" begin?
In what year was the Ministry for Mass Mobilization and Revolutionary Leadership created?
How many articles were contained in the Great Green Charter on Human Rights in the Era of the Masses?
Who won the Al-Gaddafi International Prize for Human Rights in 1989?
What was Mandela's nationality?
What bodies were intended to be replaced by the popular militia created in 1988?
Where did Libya manufacture mustard gas?
What chemical weapon did Libya start making in 1987?
Where did an abortive coup occur in 1993?
Where did a Muslim insurgency take place in 1995?
What organization did Libya join in 1999?
Where did the OAU summit in July 1999 occur?
What organization was founded in July of 2002?
What is COMESA?
Who was the president of South Africa circa 2002?
In what month and year did Gaddafi make a speech promoting economic privatization?
How much direct foreign investment existed in Libya circa 2004?
By what factor did direct foreign investment in Libya increase between 2003 and 2004?
According to the plan of 2010, what fraction of Libya's economy was intended to be privatized?
As of October 2009, who was the head of the PSLC?
In what year did the so-called Arab Spring occur?
Who was the president of Tunisia in 2011?
About what percentage of the Libyan population was unemployed in 2011?
On what date in 2011 did protests begin in Libya?
Along with corruption, what were Libyans upset with in 2011?
Who did Gaddafi accuse the Libyan rebels of being linked to?
How many protesters were killed in Benghazi?
What rebel organization was founded in Benghazi?
Cities in what geographic part of Libya were controlled by rebels?
Along with Benghazi and Misrata, what cities did the rebels control in February?
What position was held by Gaddafi's brother-in-law?
About how many governments recognized the legitimacy of the NTC at a meeting on July 15, 2011?
Where did the July 15, 2011 meeting take place?
Which child of Gaddafi did the ICC issue an arrest warrant for on June 27?
Who is Gaddafi's brother-in-law?
What is another term for the Amazigh?
What language did the Berbers living in the Nafusa Mountains not speak?
On what date did the NTC government enter the Arab League?
What organization provided air support to the Libyan rebels?
What were the last two cities to be controlled by Gaddafi's government?
Who claimed to have murdered Gaddafi?
What son of Gaddafi, present in the convoy, was found dead shortly after being captured?
Where did an ambulance take Gaddafi after he was murdered?
Who was the chief forensic pathologist of Libya?
How many bodies of Gaddafi supporters were found at the Mahari Hotel?
Who was the prime minister of the NTC?
For how many days was Gaddafi's corpse displayed in public?
Who was killed by Gaddafi supporters for his role in Gaddafi's capture?
Near what town was Oran Shaaban killed?
On what date did the NTC announce Gaddafi's burial?
What philosophy was named for Gamal Abdel Nasser?
What did Gaddafi call his political philosophy created in the 1970s?
What philosophy was combined with socialism and nationalism to form Third International Theory?
The Green Book consisted of how many volumes?
What is the occupation of Sami Hajjar?
What variety of Islam was Gaddafi raised in?
In what country is Kampala Mosque located?
In what ethnic culture was Gaddafi raised?
In what year did Gaddafi notably visit Italy?
Whose efforts did Gaddafi see himself as continuing?
Who stated that Gaddafi was fond of children?
What was Gaddafi's religious affiliation?
What is Mirella Biano's occupation?
Who remarked on Gaddafi's family orientation?
Who referred to Gaddafi as a populist?
Who stated that Gaddafi was a gifted speaker?
Who noted that Gaddafi made long speeches?
What sort of virus did Gaddafi describe HIV as?
Who did Gaddafi claim created H1N1?
According to Gaddafi, what insects made up God's armies?
What illnesses did Gaddafi claim would afflict invading colonialists?
What was the name of Gaddafi's female bodyguard?
In what decade was Gaddafi first accompanied by his female bodyguard?
What is Halyna Kolotnytska's nationality?
What is the profession of Halyna Kolotnytska?
What sort of relationship did Gaddafi have with Halyna Kolotnytska?
What diseases were minimized by Gaddafi's health care policies?
What was the cost of primary and secondary education under Gaddafi?
Why did living standards decline in 1980s Libya?
Due to his opposition to West governments, who notably respected Gaddafi?
What is the occupation of Lillian Craig Harris?
What did Reagan call Gaddafi?
According to Human Rights Watch, how many prisoners were killed on June 29, 1996?
Under Gaddafi, how did Freedom House rate Libya?
What did Gaddafi call Libya dissidents based outside the country?
At what prison did extrajudicial executions occur according to HRW?
Who was elected president of the GNC?
Who was initially named prime minister by the GNC?
Why did Mustafa A.G. Abushagur not become prime minister?
Who did the GNC eventually make prime minister?
What official name did the GNC give to Libya?
What is the date of the earliest known human activity on Cyprus?
What is Cyprus home to of?
Who was Cyprus settled by in 2nd millennium BC?
What empires have occupied Cyprus?
When did Ottoman rule occur in Cyprus?
The Republic of Cyprus does not have de jure sovereignty over what two British territories? 
How many parts is the Republic of Cyprus partitioned into?
How much area of the island does the Republic control?
The Turkish Republic of Northern Cyprus is only recognized by what country?
What does the international community consider the northern part of Cyprus?
During what Age did Cyprus experience two waves of Greek settlement?
Who did the first wave of Greek settlement consist of?
What year did Turkish Republic of Northern Cyprus begin visiting Cyprus?
Cyprus is the birthplace of what two Greek mythological figures?
Cyprus is home to which Greek mythological figures?
In what year did James II die?
Who assumed control of the island after the death of James II?
In what year did Venice formally annex the kingdom of Cyprus?
Which empire frequently raided Cyprus during Venetian rule?
In what year did the Ottomans destroy Limassol?
In what year did Cyprus face a full-scale Ottoman assault?
Ottoman forces massacred which types of people?
Turkish peasants and craftsman were brought to the island from where?
What system did the Ottomans abolish in favor of the millet system?
Who was invested as the leader of the Greek Cypriot population?
Who was the Church of Cyprus hoping to end encroachments of?
How many years did Cyprus face of economic decline?
What year did the Greek war of independence break out?
How many Greek Cypriots were arrested and executed by the Ottoman governor of Cyprus?
Who was modern Greece's first president?
What did Ioannis Kapodistrias call for?
The island of Cyprus serves as a key military base to what western country?
What years was the Famagusta harbour completed?
Cyprus was a naval outpost which overlooked what canal?
Which side did the Ottoman Empire join in World War 1?
The Megali Idea was actively pursued by whom?
Historically, the idea of enosis was part of which other idea?
What guerrilla organization was founded by religious officials and military officers?
In what year decade did the pursuit of enosis become a part of national Greek policy?
In what year did the Church of Cyprus organize a referendum?
In 1946, the Greeks made up what percent of Cyprus' population?
In what year was the EOKA organization founded?
What is the name of the policy that the British adopted?
National militants had the support of what two countries?
What was the goal of the Akritas plan?
Which president called for constitutional changes?
Who rejected the constitutional changes proposed by President Archbishop Makarios?
In December of what year did intercommunal violence erupt?
The violence beginning in 1963 resulted in the deaths of many Turks?
How many Turkish Cypriots were displaced due to the violence?
Turkish Cypriots were prevented from doing what?
Who tried to invade Cyprus in 1964?
Which US President prevented Turkey from invading Cyprus?
What policy could not be abandoned in 1964?
How many troops did Greece send to Cyprus?
What did the Turkish troops capture first on the island?
What was the date of the second Turkish invasion?
What locations were seized in the second invasion?
How much of the island was controlled by Turks after international pressure led to a ceasefire?
How many Greek Cypriots had been displaced from their homes?
How many Turkish Cypriots moved into areas that were under Turkish control?
In what year did the US impose an arms embargo on Turkey?
Why did the US impose an arms embargo on Turkey?
In what year did the last major effort to settle the Cyprus dispute take place?
In 2006 people fled to Cyprus from what country?
In what year did Cyprus join the European Union?
How many Turkish Cypriots voted for the Annan Plan in 2004?
How many Greek Cypriots voted against the Annan Plan in 2004?
What two mountains ranges are located on the island of Cyprus?
What plain is located in between the Troodos Mountains and the Kyrenia Range?
Which river drains the Mesaoria plain?
What is the highest point on the island of Cyprus?
How tall is Mount Olympus?
What types of branches did the 1960 Constitution provide?
What type of person was the vice-president?
Where did Legislative power rest?
Which part of Cyprus was occupied by the Turkish army?
In what years was Cyprus divided?
In 1983, Turkish Cypriots declared what?
What organization recognizes the sovereignty of the Republic of Cyprus?
Why does the United Nations question the Human rights status of Cyprus?
What is the rating for Cyprus in the "Freedom in the World 2011" report?
What is one of the reasons for the human rights issues on Cyprus?
What is the per capita GDP of Cyprus given by the IMF?
What are three of the largest contributors to the Cyprus economy?
When was the Euro declared as the national currency of Cyprus?
Why has Cyprus been sought out by offshore businesses?
What are the three modes of transport available on Cyprus?
How many miles of roads are paved on Cyprus?
How many miles of roads are unpaved on Cyprus?
Which side of the road do vehicles on Cyprus drive on?
What was the number of Greek Cypriots on Cyprus in 1973?
What did the Cypriot government find was the Greek population on Cyprus?
What did the Cypriot government find was the Turkish population on Cyprus?
In what years did the Greeks conduct extra censuses?
Who was excluded from the censuses conducted by the Greeks?
How many people were living in Northern Cyprus according to the 2006 census?
How many citizens born in Cyprus also have parents who were born in Cyprus?
How many of the citizens in Northern Cyprus was born in Cyprus?
What religion do most Greek Cypriots identify with?
What religion do most Turkish Cypriots identify with?
What country is the second most religious in the European Union?
Who is the current head of the Greek Orthodox church in Cyprus?
How many official languages does Cyprus have?
What are the two official languages of Cyprus?
What are the minority languages are spoken in Cyprus?
Are there any Western languages spoken in Cyprus?
Are there any Eastern languages spoken in Cyprus?
What do Cypriot universities ignore when looking at admission?
What is required for university attendance?
What plays a large factor in determining admission at a university?
What percentage do grades obtained account for in a students final grade?
Which foods do Greek Cypriots and Turkish Cypriots have in common?
Which art forms are integral parts of everyday life?
What is something that Greek Cypriots and Turkish Cypriots do not have in common?
What religion do Greek Cypriots usually practice?
What religion do Greek Cypriots usually practice?
What type of art is being promoted by art institutions in Cyprus?
What types of places can Cypriots visit to experience art?
What year was Cyprus supposed to host the international art festival Manifesta?
Traditional Cyprus music has what other types of genres in common?
What are the names of the Greco-Turkish dances?
What are the names of the Middle-Eastern inspired dances?
What is chattista?
Where is chattista performed?
Where was William Shakespeare's Othello set?
Where did British writer Lawrence Durrell reside from 1952-1956?
Which 2014 novel uses Cyprus as its main location?
What book did Lawrence Durrell write while living on Cyprus?
What is the name of a local television company in Cyprus?
What is BRT?
Which television broadcasters produce art and cultural programming?
What is the amount in Euros of money set aside for the Cinema Advisory Committee?
Who finances European film co-productions?
What was the first feature film to receive funding  from Eurimages?
Which film was awarded the Best Screenwriting and Best Photography at the London Greek Film Festival?
What are some famous seafood and fish dishes?
What fruits are commonly used in foods?
What is lountza?
What is souvlaki?
What is sheftalia?
Can you name some common vegetables used in Cyprus?
Can you name some common fruits used in Cyprus?
Can you name some common pulses used in Cyprus?
Which Cypriot tennis player ranked 8th in the world?
How high did Kyriakos Ioannou jump in Osaka in 2007?
What organization does Costas Philippou participate in?
Where does Tio Ellinas race?
What issue did Spielberg address in his movie Schindler's List?
What issue did Spielberg address in his movie Amistad?
What issue did Spielberg address in his movie Munich?
How long has Steven Spielberg had his career so far?
In what film did Spielberg address humanistic issues?
In what film did Spielberg cover the slave trade?
In what films did Spielberg address war?
In what film did Spielberg address terrorism?
What type of films did Spielberg find early success with?
Where was Steven Spielberg born?
What religion was Steven Spielberg's family?
Where were Steven Spielberg's granparents from?
Where did Steven Spielberg's family move to in 1953?
What job did Steven Spielberg's father have?
Where was Spielberg born?
What religion was Spielberg's family?
What was Spielberg's father's career?
What was Spielberg's mother's career?
Where did Spielberg's paternal grandparents immigrate from?
When did Steven Spielberg have trouble dealing with being an Orthodox Jew?
How did Steven Spielberg feel about being an Orhtodox Jew?
What kind of prejudice did Spielberg have to deal with in High school?
How many bloody noses did Spielberg get in High School?
At what age was Spielberg embarrassed by his family being Jewish?
What was Spielberg bullied because of?
How many bloody noses did Spielberg get in high school?
What was Spielberg's first indepenent film?
How long was Spielberg's film "Escape to Nowhere"?
How much money did Spielberg spend to film Close Encounters?
Who did Spielberg get money from to film Close Encounters?
What genre was Spielberg's first film "The Last Gunfight"
When did Spielberg join the Boy Scouts?
What film did Spielberg make to earn a merit badge?
Why did Spielberg make a movie instead of taking still photos for the photography merit badge?
At what age did Spielberg make 'Escape to Nowhere'?
What film led to Close Encounters?
What job was SPielberg offered when he was a student?
Who offered Spielberg a contract at Universal Studios?
What short film did Spielberg make for theatrical release?
What did Steven Spielberg do to begin directing TV prouctions for Universal?
How did Sidney Sheinberg feel about the film "Amblin'"
What studio gave Spielberg an unpaid internship?
What department did Spielberg have an unpaid internship with?
How long was 'Amblin'?
What was Sidney Sheinberg's position with Universal?
How long of a contract did Sheinberg give Spielberg?
Who starred in the TV show segment "Eyes"
What genre was Steven Spielberg's episode of "The Name of the Game"?
What was Steven Spielberg's first feature-length assignment?
What year was Spielberg hired to direct one of the segments for "Night Gallery"?
What was the relatioship between Joan Crawford and Steven Spielberg?
What was the first TV episode Spielberg directed part of?
What was Spielberg's first full TV episode to direct?
Who starred in Spielberg's TV debut?
What law show did Spielberg work on?
What genre was 'LA 2017'?
How many TV films did Universal sign Spielbergo to direct?
What British critic helped boost Steven Spielberg's career?
Who starred in the TV show "Savage"?
How did Steven Spielberg's film "The Sugarland Express" do in the box office?
What were the married couple in Steven Spielberg's film "The Sugarland Express" trying to regain?
How many TV movies was Spielberg signed to direct?
What kind of truck was 'Duel' about?
Which British critic praised 'Duel'?
Which TV film Spielberg directed played off 'The Exorcist'?
Who starred in 'Savage'/
What film did Richard D. Zanuck and David Brown offer Steven Spielberg to direct?
Why was Jaws nearly shut down?
How many Academy Awards did the film "Jaws" win?
What was the film "Jaws" nominated for?
How much money did the film "Jaws" gross worldwide?
Who made Spielberg the 'Jaws' director?
How many Academy Awards did 'Jaws' win?
Who wrote the 'Jaws' book?
How much did 'Jaws' earn in theaters?
How many times did Spielberg work with Richard Dreyfus?
What films did Spielberg turn down in the 70s?
How many Oscars did Close Encounters win?
How many Oscars did Close Encounters get nominated for, besides Best Director?
What was the genre of '1941'?
How much did '1941' earn?
When did Spielberg re-release Close Encounters?
What new footage did Columbia require for a Close Encounters revisit?
What was the Close Encounters revisit called?
Which studio funded Close Encounters?
When did a Close Encounters DVD come out?
Who was responsible for Star Wars?
Who played Indiana Jones?
Who played Han Solo?
What was the first Indiana Jones movie?
When did the first Indiana Jones movie come out?
What rating did 'Temple of Doom' receive?
What movie caused 'PG-13' to be created?
When did 'Temple of Doom' debut?
Why did Gremlins need 'PG-13'?
What was Spielberg's future wife's career?
Who wrote 'The Color Purple'?
What was 'The Color Purple' about?
Who starred in 'The Color Purple'?
What did Ebert think of 'The Color Purple'?
How many Oscar nominations did 'The Color Purple' get?
Until the 1980s, when had an American film last been shot in Shanghai?
Who wrote 'Empire of the Sun'?
Who starred in 'Empire of the Sun'?
Who thought 'Empire of the Sun' was the best film of the year?
What was Spielberg's role on 'Batteries Not Included'?
When did the 3rd Indiana Jones film come out?
What was the 3rd Indiana Jones film called?
Who played Indiana Jones's father?
Who directed 'Batman'?
What was 'Always' about?
Whose life was 'Schindler's List' based on?
How many Jews did Schindler save?
What did Spielberg first win Best Director for?
What did Spielberg do with 'Schindler's List' profits?
Where did the American Film Institute rank 'Schindler's List' in 1997?
What movie did Spielberg collaborate with Cruise for?
When is Minority Report set?
What was the Rotten Tomatoes rating for Minority Report?
How much did Minority Report earn?
When was Minority Report released?
Which studios produced Spielberg's 'War of the Worlds'?
Who wrote the 'War of the Worlds' book?
When was the first 'War of the Worlds' movie released?
Who did the visual effects for 'War of the Worlds'?
How much did 'War of the Worlds' earn?
What was 'Munich' about?
What book was 'Munich' based on?
Who wrote 'Vengeance'?
How many Oscar nominations did 'Munich' get?
Who composed music for 'Munich'?
When did Spielberg announce what would become 'Interstellar'?
Who took over directing 'Interstellar'?
What was the concept for 'Interstellar'?
Who wrote the 'Interstellar' script?
What university provided scientific consultation for 'Interstellar'?
Who starred in 'Lincoln' as Abraham Lincoln?
What book was 'Lincoln' based on?
What part of Lincoln's life did the film cover?
Where was 'Lincoln' filmed?
Who played Mary Todd Lincoln in 'Lincoln'?
When was 'Bridge of Spies' released?
How many Oscar nominations did 'Bridge of Spies' get?
When was 'Bridge of Spies' set?
Where was 'Bridge of Spies' filmed?
Who played Donovan in 'Bridge of Spies'?
Which Warner Bros. cartoons did Spielberg produce?
What films did Spielberg produce for Don Bluth?
What video game did Spielberg come up with the concept for?
When was 'The Dig' released?
What charity did Spielberg's 'Lego Moviemaker' kit fund?
When was 'Men In Black' released?
Who wrote the book 'Memoirs of a Geisha' is based on?
Who did Spielberg collaborate with in 2006?
What film did Spielberg first collaborate with Zemeckis on?
Which studio produced 'Super 8'?
When did 'Into the West' air?
How many Emmys did 'Into the West' win?
Who wrote the music for 'Into the West'?
When was 'The Pacific' released?
How much did 'The Pacific' cost?
Which channel aired 'Falling Skies'?
In what year does 'Terra Nova' begin?
How far back in time do people in 'Terra Nova' travel?
Which channel aired 'Terra Nova'?
What show did Spielberg work with Rodat on?
Who wrote the script for 'Someone's in the Kitchen'?
When was 'Skullmonkeys' released?
When was Boombots released?
When was The Neverhood released?
What video game did Spielberg say in 2013 he's working on a TV show based on?
Who wrote 'The BFG'?
Who wrote E.T.'s script?
What film festival will first air 'The BFG'?
In what month is Cannes held?
When will 'The BFG' be in most theaters?
Who wrote 'The Kidnapping of Edgardo Mortara'?
When does 'The Kidnapping of Edgardo Mortara' take place?
Where does 'The Kidnapping of Edgardo Mortara' take place?
Who plays Pope Pius IX in 'The Kidnapping of Edgardo Mortara'?
When is 'Ready Player One' planned to be released?
What theme is common to Spielberg's films?
When in his life did Spielberg 'feel like an alien'?
When did Spielberg give an interview saying he had 'felt like an alien'?
Why does Spielberg think aliens would visit?
Which of Spielberg's parents liked sci-fi?
What was Indy's father's career?
What artifact did Indy's father focus on?
What is Spielberg's most common theme?
Whose son disappeared in 'Minority Report'?
Whose parents divorced in 'Catch Me If You Can'?
Which Spielberg films has Dreyfuss been in?
Who was Ford going to play in E.T., until the scene was removed?
Which Spielberg TV shows has Frank Welker been a voice actor for?
Which Spielberg films has Tom Hanks been in?
Which Spielberg films has Tom Cruise been in?
What are the only Spielberg films since Sugarland Express to not have music by John Williams?
What happens at the end of 'Indiana Jones and the Last Crusade'?
Who are the 'Movie Brats', besides Spielberg?
Who are the only screenwriters Spielberg has worked with on more than one film?
Who did Spielberg begin dating in 1976?
What was Amy Irving's career?
Who introduced Irving to Spielberg?
How did Irving describe Spielberg's house?
Why did Irving not want to be in Spielberg's films while dating?
When did Spielberg and Irving initially break up?
When did Spielberg and Irving get back together?
When did Spielberg and Irving marry?
When did Spielberg and Irving divorce?
How expensive was Spielberg and Irving's divorce?
In which Olympics was Spielberg a flagbearer?
Where was Spielberg an Olympic flagbearer?
How did Time Magazine recognize Spielberg?
What honorary degree did Spielberg receive from Boston University?
How did Life Magazine recognize Spielberg?
When was Spielberg named the 'most influential celebrity in America'?
How much of the US believes Spielberg is influential?
Who is Gerry Philpott?
How did Spielberg influence the public's behavior?
When was Citizen Kane released?
When was 'The War of the Worlds' radio broadcast?
When did Spielberg buy a sled from Citizen Kane?
When did Spielberg buy Orson Welles' personal script copy from 'The War of the Worlds'?
What does Spielberg do with Academy Awards he buys?
What was the first video game Spielberg played?
When did Spielberg first play a video game?
What movie was Spielberg working on when he first played Pong?
What game consoles does Spielberg own?
How does Spielberg feel about cutscenes in games?
What Boy Scout merit badge did Spielberg help develop?
Which Spielberg movie showed its main character was a Boy Scout?
What was Indy's rank in Boy Scouts when shown in a movie?
Which major Spielberg movie character was a Boy Scout?
When was Spielberg's merit badge launched?
For which industry were elevators first used?
In the mid 1800s what were elevators fueled by?
What were elevators originally built for?
Who built the "ascending room", in 1823?
The "ascending room" gave customers a view of what city's downtown?
Who invented the hydraulic crane in 1846?
Were was the hydraulic crane initially used?
In what manner did hydraulic cranes employ Pascal's law? 
The water pump supplied water pressure to a plunger located where?
besides water pressure, what else was used to increase the lifting power?
What Neapolitan architect created the "Flying Chair" elevator?
At what location was the "Flying Chair" installed in 1845?
What type of wood was used on the inside ?
What controlled the traction?
What did the safety system consist of?
Who created the safety elevator in 1852?
What feature did the safety elevator display? 
What did the govenor device engage to lock the elevator?
At what location was it first presented?
Where was the first safety elevator installed?
Which was built first, the first elevator shaft or the first elevator?
What year did constructrion begin for the Cooper Union Foundation?
What design did Peter Cooper feel was the most efficient?
The Otis Elevator Company is today a subsidiary of what major corporation?
What title does United Technologies Corporation hold?
Who built the first electric elevator?
The first electric elevator, built in 1880, was in what Country?
Who is credited with increasing the safety and speed of electric elevators?
Who ultilized von Siemens ideas to build a succesful business?
To whom did Frank Sprague sell his company to in 1895?
What is another name for an elevator shaft?
Elevator drive mechanisms have, in the past been, powered by what?
What is the weight of the elevator cage balanced by? 
How do elevators built in pairs work?
How do most elevator doors work?
What is a single panel door referred to as?
What design allows wider entryways within limited space?
The single door is sometimes located where?
What do elevator doors protect riders from?
Throughout history, what type of engines were used for elevator machines?
Why were AC motors used?
What problem arises for fast and large capacity elevators?
Generally, what powered the relay contoller?
What is a known advantage of the MG set?
In a gearless traction engine, what is the drive sheave attached to?
What speed is a gearless traction elevator capable of attaining?
What motivates an external drum brake held open electrically?
One exception that is not high speed high rise and large capacity is what?
What reduces the amount of force needed to propel the cab?
Where will the counterweight be found?
What guides the traction machine?
The counterweight runs equal to the cab weight plus what percentage of the elevator capacity?
Maintaining that the ropes all have equal tension may reduce what?
"Compensation" is the name of the system used for what type of elevators?
"Compensation" consists of what?
What is the chain guided by in a compensation system that uses chains?
What exactly does this system compensate for?
What does this type of elevator use to propel the cage?
For sudden surges in pressure above the cab, what is used as a "brake"?
How does it enable the cab to go down by it's own weight?
What is the shaft made of?
How much weight is permitted on a low capacity elevator?
Until the mid 1900s most elevators lacked what?
How were most elevators built before 1939 powered? 
 Many earlier built  freight elevators were controlled by what?
A rheostat is the size and shape of what?
Where was the rheostat mounted?
Where is the elevator motor found?
Moving the helve forward causes the cab to do what?
The more pressure applied to the handle caused what?
Why was the handle considered a "dead man switch"?
Eventually safety locks were used to guarantee what?
What function does a "destination operating panel" feature?
What is another benefit of a "destination operating panel"?
What is one benefit of a "destination operating panel"
What is the downside to a :destination operating panel"?
What is one example of a limitation on the system? 
What is generally unable to support variations in the number of people for a particular destination?
For what reason do people repeatedly push the up/down buttons on a panel?
Why is this a bad practice?
What is one way to implement destination control?
How does this help the system?
Newer systems know where and how many people are at a location for what reasons?
What is another name for up-peak mode?
Generally, up-peak mode takes place during what times of the day?
What are the reasons for up-peak mode early in the day?
For what reasons are elevators routed one-by-one?
Why is a "this car leaving next" sign used?
How is the special sercice mode enabled?
What is the impact on an elevator set to independant service mode?
At what times is Independant service best utilized?
During independant service mode how is a single cab in a hall kept from being used?
Who is authorized to provide inspection and/or maintenance of the elevator?
What is the purpose of the Inspection service? 
What action initiates it's activation?
WWhat's the first thing to happen when the switch is activated?
Once activatated, what is the only way to deactivate it?
What initiates Phase one mode?
What happens when an elevator goes into Phase one mode?
Where does the elevator go from there?
How is the elevator enabled for service after the incident?
What happens if the mode is activated on the fire-recall floor?
How is the Phase-two mode enabled?
What actions must a firefighter take to activate Phase-two mode?
What does Phase-two do?
What is the purpose of the Phase-two mode?
Where is the Phase-two key switch to be found?
Upon arriving at the desinated floor, what does the elevator do?
What steps do medical personnel take at that point?
Where then does the elevator go?
Once it arrives what does the elevator do
What does the hold feature do?
What sequence of events happens when the power shuts off in a traction elevator and the elevators all stop?
What do any passengers experience at this point?
After all cars go to the lobby, what is the next step?
How are the selected cars then readied for passengers? 
What is a safety feature to prevent entrapment?
How do hydraulic elevators work in emergencies?
Once the passengers have exited, what happens?
For what reason are hydraulic elevators not powered by the standard emergency system?
What are current-limiting motor starters referred to as?
Underground electrolytic malfunctions in hydraulic elevators can result in the destruction of what? 
What Elevator Safety Code change required a second dished bulkhead? 
Before the code change was enacted what was the only permitted hydraulic cylinder type?
Once the cylinder is breached, what calamity does the loss of fluid cause?
What testing does the code require?
What part of the mine shaft requires routine testing?
What is  the first step in destructive testing?
Afterwards, what type of machine is the segment secured in?
What type of testing is done to the an area of the cable?
What types of information are collected in the process?
Passenger elevators, used in city transport share similarities to what other ascending and descending vehicles counterbalancing each other?    
What type of public elevator in Yalta, Ukraine, transport passengers from a hill above the Black Sea to a tunnel down on the beach?
The elevator located at the Casco Viejo station in the Bilbao Metro is also used for what?
How is that set up?
What is another name for a freight elevator?
What type of notice is required to be visible in most freight elevators?
Some freight elevators allow transport of both freight and passengers by using what?
How do freight elevators differ from passenger elevators?
What type of elevator is better suited for carrying freight?
How are stage lifts powered?
How many hydraulic elevators are there at Radio City Music Hall?
What is an orchestra lift used for?
What is on the background of the image which can be used as a scale to represent the size of the mechanism?
What type of elevators are generally less costly than full commercial elevators?
What type of doors do commercial elevators use?
What safety mechanisms are still required, despite lower design costs?
What type of elevator has a hinged wooden shaft-access door?
What types of elevators occassionaly do not use a traditional elevator shaft, machine room or hoistway?
In what year were Machine-room-less elevators first allowed?
This decision reflected a revision of what?
What benefits does this serve?
What are small freight elevators used for things such as food, called?
What rooms are dumbwaiters frequently used in?
What is a safety feature found in passenger elevators they generally do not have?
What is the height restriction on dumbwaiters?
What features do they have that mimic passenger elevators?
What do the partians do on the conveyor?
An inclined plane with a conveyor belt describes what type of elevator?
What industries are these types of elevators generally used in?
What are spiral screws used for?
What type of elevators are used for loading loose materials into bulk carriers?
The invention of elevators brought with it questions of social etiquette and formalities, generally referred to as what?
The last tsar of Russia, Nicholas ll encountered his first elevator at the Hotel Adloin in what city?
This caused a stir in deciding who should enter first and who should do what?
Andreas Bernard wrote about the social aspects of the new elevators in what book?
Modern elevator position or floor indicaters often use what type of bulbs?
What type of lanterns are used outside elevators as well as inside most cabs?
What do floor indicaters often consist of?
What generally indicates the arrival of the elevator at a new floor?
What is the main function of direction lanterns?
What might change your mind about whether or not to enter an elevator?
What type of etching might you see on a direction indicator?
Some elevators may use the color convention for only what purpose?
New technologies aim to provide a better elevator experience to passengers who suffer from what?
What Israeli company uses motion sensors to display information on a screen embedded in the wall of the cabs?
LiftEye uses virtual window technology for what?
How does it produce the panoramic effects?
Where is the video projected?
In what neighboring countries are passenger elevators required to adhere to Standard A17.1?
What is the equivilent to the US Standard A17.1 called in Canada?
 What is Standard A17.1?
What are passenger elevators tested with?
What country had the second most elevators installed?
In 2008, what country had the largest number of elevators?
How many elevators had China installed since 1949?
What country boasts the worlds largest market for elevators?
How many elevators are in Brazil?
What type of elevators are used in the Taipei 101 office tower?
During what hours is the lower deck turned off?
During the low volume hours, what can the upper deck function as?
On what floor must restaurant customers clear their reservations?
What levels make up the "sky lobby"?
How fast do the observation deck elevators travel?
This speed holds what record?
What does cabin pressure control do? 
How fast does the elevator drop down?
At what floor do the doors open on the way down?
What is the name of the elevator attraction at the Disney World parks across the world?
What is the main feature of this attraction?
Do ride goers stand or sit?
What unique feature does this ride provide guests?
What type of motor is used?
How are passenger cabs separated from the lift?
What type of vehicles are the passenger cabs?
What action do the cabs take before the elevator begins to move?
What is special about the doorways of the top floors?
What does this allow riders to do at the top?
What are the 67th, 69th, and 70th floors of the GE Building at Rockerfeller Center nicknamed?
What do these floors serve as?
What type of elevator is featured?
How long is the short trip?
The special effects include blue light, music playing and what else?
 The Haunted Mansion at Disneyland in California and the one in Paris, France sharewhat attribute?
What is the name of area that is really an elevator?
What is included in the elevator's design?
What is the illusion given by these effects?
How was Neptune found? 
When was Neptune first observed? 
Who discovered Neptune? 
What is Neptune's largest moon? 
What flew by Neptune in 1989? 
Which planet is compositionally similar to Neptune? 
What is Neptune's atmosphere primarily composed of? 
What is the interior of Neptune composed of? 
What makes Neptune blue? 
What "ices" makes up Neptune? 
What two countries argued over credit for the discovery of Neptune? 
Who ultimately deserved credit for the discovery of Neptune? 
Who questioned Adams's claim to co-discovery of Neptune? 
Who predicted Neptune's place and convinced astronomer's to search for it? 
Who did not deserve credit to co-discovery of Neptune? 
What was Neptune before Pluto was discovered? 
What discovery made astronomer's debate Pluto's status as a planet? 
What year did the International Astronomical Union define the word planet? 
Now that Pluto isn't a planet, what is Neptune known for in our solar system? 
What period was Pluto closer to the sun than Neptune? 
What is Neptune's atmosphere made of? 
Where are absorption bands of methane on Neptune? 
What gives Neptune it's blue hue? 
What planet also gets it's color from atmospheric constituent? 
What color is Uranus, compared to Neptune? 
What is Neptune's temperature in the thermosphere? 
What would interact with Neptune's magnetic field to make it warm?
Where would gravity waves in Neptune's interior dissipate? 
What does Neptune's thermosphere containers traces of? 
What system, like Saturn, does Neptune have? 
What might Neptune's rings consist of?
What might the ice particles of Neptune's rings be coated with?
Where is Adams ring from the center of Neptune?
Where is the La Verrier ring from the center of Neptune?
What white cloud group on Neptune is farther south than the dark great spot?
When was The Scooter on Neptune observed?
What type of storm is The Scooter on Neptune? 
What detected the storms on Neptune? 
What is the second most intense storm on Neptune? 
Where are Neptune's dark spots thought to occur? 
What do Neptune's dark spots appear as in the cloud decks? 
Since Neptune's dark spots persist for several months, what are they thought to be?
What on Neptune are associated with dark spots that are brighter?
When Neptune's dark spots migrate too close to the equator, what do they do?
When did Neptune complete it's first barycentric orbit since it's discovery?
What is the Earth's orbit?
Why didn't Neptune appear to be in it's exact discover position? 
Using the heliocentric coordinate system, when did Neptune reach the discovery longitude? 
What is the region behind Neptune called? 
What does the Kuiper belt consist of?
Where is the Kuiper belt relative to Neptune?
What dominates the Kuiper belt? 
What did Neptune's gravity do to Kuiper belt? 
What is the fraction of the most heavily populated resonance in the Kuiper belt? 
What is the best known, and largest, object in the Kuiper belt?
How many known objects is in the most populated resonance of the Kuiper belt?
What is the resonance of Pluto in the Kuiper belt?
Which resonances are less populated in the Kuiper belt?
What could have blasted Neptune and Uranus's atmosphere with radiation, aiding in creation? 
What is too low to account for the formation of Neptune?
If Neptune was formed from instabilities within the original protoplanetary disc, what was it not formed by?
If Neptune formed closer to the sun, what is the matter density?
If Neptune formed closer to the sun, what caused it to migrate to it's current orbit?
What is the most widely accepted explanation of Neptune's formation called?
What is Neptune's angular diameter range?
The advent of what telescope made it easier to study Neptune?
When was the first useful observation of Neptune from the ground?
What seasons are Neptune currently entering?
What was discovered around Neptune in 2004 and 2005?
What is the only spacecraft to visit Neptune?
When did a spacecraft get closest to Neptune?
What near Neptune did a spacecraft visit dangerously close?
What program aired on PBS about Neptune?
When is the next hypothetical mission to Neptune?
What about Neptune did NASA propose in 2003 in their "Vision Missions Studies"?
When will Argo be launched?
What will Argo visit?
When can we expect Argo to visit Triton?
What is of the factors the capital cost of electrification system depends on?
How do some locomotives function in order to be more flexible in operation?
What are two types of revenue obtained through railway transportation?
What is the main disadvantage of railway electrification?
What is used to haul passengers cars?
How is electricity being generated for electric locomotives?
What entity provides distribution lines, switches and transformers?
What is the principal alternative to electric railways?
What locomotives are usually more reliable?
What do some electric traction systems provide?
What type of fuel do diesel locomotives use?
What is one of the sources electricity is being generated from?
What is a safety hazard to track workers?
What issue can complicate electric railway service?
What is a safer alternative to third rails?
What is speed limit for railways?
Why is DC motor being used more than AC type?
What are two types of railway transportation still use DC motor?
Why do motors have little space for insulation?
Why 1kV voltage is almost always used by rail systems?
What is most common volatage range used by railway system?
Which system uses higher voltages?
Is "low" voltage used by trains safe for people?
What type of electric power garantees lesser loss?
Which type of supply for electric motors creates electromagnetic radiation?
Which type of power does require three-phase transmission?
What can electromagnetic radiation interfere with?
Where was an experimental 6kV DC railway built?
What is most common voltage for DC supply?
How many narrow-gauge lines in Slovakia?
What railway line is DC being used in Portugal?
Where in India line has been converted to AC?
What voltage is being used in railway system of South Africa and Chile?
Besides using 3kV DC what other power type is used in the former Soviet Union countries?
What was New Jersey Transit called before?
What does the railway system of US use DC or AC?
What type is mostly used third rail or overhead wires?
Is trird rail system being used exclusively with AC or DC ?
What depth does the alternating current penetrate in a steel rail?
What is more prefferable for subway lines?
What is physically more compact tird rail or overhead wires?
Why DC system can effect the speed of trains?
Can DC systems use low-level platform?
Besides speed and size what else the low voltage of DC system can effect?
What is the speed limit for third rail system trains?
What can become unreliable if the speed exceeds the limit of 100 mph for DC system trains?
What is the other name for the street trams?
Where is third rail situated in the street trams system?
What area in US discontinued using overhead wires for streetcars in 1962?
What external and weather factors can effect conduit slot?
What are the main reasons the conduit lines were converted to overhead  wire system?
What danger can return currents cause?
How are stray earth currents kept to a manageable levels? 
What insures minimal current leak during power rails instalation?
How did return current effect water and gas in iron pipes?
What is the crucial advantage of four-rail system?
Why some sections of Bakerloo and District lines were rewired to three-rail system?
What is the voltage shared two types of trains UK railroad system?
How did it become possible to share the voltage for different types of train?
How can different range of voltages be supplied for AC locomotives?
What was a disadvantage of DC system?
What taps can provide lighting supply?
What will AC/DC motor be replaced with?
What is the main advantage of an induction motor?
How can DC motor turn universal?
What problems did AC distribution cause?
How do railways try to solve the problem of inductive reactance of AC system?
How can low frequencies be obtained?
When was the first trail of RhB system tested?
What frequency was typically used on US Amtrak?
What voltage does SEPTA system use?
What specification is similar for both Amtrak and Septa systems?
When was a 11kV system of NY, New Haven and Hartford was converted to 12.5 kV?
When was overhead wires system being used for the first time in UK?
What line used the overhead wire system first Victoria to Crystal Palace or Peckham Rye to West Noorwood?
What was the cause of lines not being extended?
What voltage was used in the two lines opened in 1925 of Southern Railway?
What countries  used three-phase AC system in the the beginning of 20th century?
What country was a bigger user compare to the three of them?
Where did Italy start using the AC system?
How long did the AC system last in northern Italy?
How long did three-phase system operate in Cascade Tunnel?
What was the main requirement for electric feeder stations?
What invention prevented lines from getting mixed?
What was the part of wire in Phase Break sections an arc being drawn from one wire to another?
How were the drivers warned to start coasting the train?
What should the driver do in order to open and close the circuit breaker?
What nowdays electrification systems can use?
What is the main action AC and DC systems have to deal with?
What type of losses happen during conversion and transmission in wires and electronics?
What kind of losses take place in transformers and inductors during conversion/transmission process?
What two systems were compare in the Soviet Union in 1970?
Which system had higher losses in overhead wires?
Which system was used in Soviet Union after all calculations?
What came with lesser lesser cost mobile conversion hardware or stationary hardware?
What can be seen in the newly electrified lines?
What can electrification of modern trains effect? 
How can better service quality be achieved?
What is a major factor whn it comes to electrification?
What was the reason some electrifications were removed after a while?
What can be a drawback of electrification of long distance freight trains?
Where can the issue of through traffic benefits occur?
What does the increasing demand for container traffic make companies use more often?
What is the other issue that comes to sight when using electrification system?
Why the commuter lines built to different standards can cause be complicated?
What is the solution many lines came up with in order to avoid replacing present rolling stock?
Why are disel trains  still used on electrified routes?
Which of two can be more efficiently electricified?
How can electric power plant become more power efficient?
How can electric train be more energy efficient?
Which type of train continues to use energy while coasting or being stopped?
What causes electric trains to waste energy?
Can renewable source of electricity be used in mobile power plants?
What is the recent incentive in  order to overcome oil scarcity?
What type of natural resources is more scarce?
What research can be used in the future if translated?
What type of trains became more energy-efficient in the former Soviet Union?
What year could be marked as year when electric railways more efficient than diesel ones?
How much fuel did electric train used less than diesel in the middle of 1970 in USSR?
What could be a factor of lower energy consumption for electric trains?
How much more expensive was diesel compare to electricity per unit?
How many people speak Spanish as a first or second language in the United States?
What type of language id Spanish?
What other language is often spoken in the United states?
How many Spanish speaking students are there in the United States?
How old is the Spanish language in the United States?
Where in the United States did the Spanish explore?
Were there states ruled by the Spanish?
Did the Spanish conquer land in the United States?
Was Texas a part of Mexico?
When did the Americans come to Texas?
Was there a war between the Mexicans and the Texans?
When did Texas become a state?
Was Texas a primarily a Spanish speaking state?
Why isn't the southwest Spanish speaking?
Is Canada bilingual?
Was California a bilingual state?
Why didn't California officially become  bilingual?
Did America try to make Puerto Rico an English speaking territory?
How did America try to make Puerto Rico's language English?
Was English in Puerto Rico successful?
How did Puerto Rico stay a Spanish speaking territory?
How many Puerto Ricans are there?
Does Florida have a high Hispanic population?
Do they speak Spanish fluently?
Where are the biggest population of Puerto Ricans on the mainland?
Why did Cubans come to the United States?
What year did most Cubans start coming to America?
Do Cubans speak Spanish in America?
Where do most Cuban Americans live?
What other Spanish Speaking people come to America?
Why did the Nicaraguans come to America?
When did the Nicaraguans arrive?
Was there a specific reason many Nicaraguans fled to the U.S.?
Why did Central Americans flee to the U.S.?
When did Salvadorans flee 
Are the Salvadorans a large population in the U.S.?
Is the  Salvadoran population still growing?
When did the Venezuelans emigrate to the united states?
Does Venezuela have immigrates from other countries?
Why did Venezuelans come to America?
 Do Venezuelans still come to America for the same reasons as they did before?
Is there such a thing as bilingual state?
What language is spoken in the U.S.A?
Is there an official language of the United States?
Has some states like Arizona embraced their Mexican history?
What is the states history?
Has New Mexico had a majority of Spanish speaking natives.
Why is New Mexico always an after thought in American -Spanish speaking society?
Is New Mexico's language different than from other Spanish dialect 
How does New Mexico's Spanish dialect differ?
Does New Mexico's language also include other dialect?
Does New Mexico also use language from the  American language when spoken in Spanish?
What is Texas official language?
Are there exceptions to Texas official language?
How does Texas handle people who don't speak English, but live in Mexico?
What language, other than English, is spoken in the U.S.?
Are students taught Spanish in american schools?
How popular are Spanish language classes in the U.S,?
What other languages are popular among American students?
What political speaches are delivered in English and Spanish?
Was this always the case in American political addresses?
Does Washington (government) operate in both languages (bilingual-Spanish?)
If someone is not bilingual and only speaks Spanish, how do they learn about current events?
Are there studies on Hispanic-American language?
What is Calvin Veltman' study about?
Is Calvin Veltman' relevant to today's Hispanic Americans?
What was Calvin Veltman' findings?
How large is Charleston, South Carolina?
Which city blocks Charleston for expanding up the peninsula? 
How much of Charleston is covered by water?
How of Charleston's total area is dry land?
What town occupies the land directly east of the Cooper River?
How many people lived in the Charleston=North Charleston Urban Area in 2010?
What is the third largest city in South Carolina?
How many people lived in Moncks Corner in 2000?
Charleston and Berkeley is combined with what other county to form a metropolitan statistical area?
In which county is Moncks Corner located?
What era brought counties to South Carolina?
Counties replaced what system in South Carolina?
What is the main use of the parish system nowadays?
The city of Charleston is defined by the limits of the Parish of St. Michael and what other parish?
What other parish besides St. John's Parish is  mostly an incorporated rural parish? 
Where did Charleston's original settlers come from?
Bermuda is located near which North Carolina town?
Who was the first governor of Charleston?
Who predicted Charleston would become a 'great port towne'?
The settlement was relocated east to what river?
Which country along with France contested England's claim to the Charleston region?
Which group raided the settlement as a means to protect themselves from settlers?
The majority of the fort walls were removed in what decade?
Whose 1704 plan was used to fortified the city?
Beside European nations and Native Americans, who else attacked the Charleston settlement?
What author paid for the simple bench at Sullivan's Island?
What percentage of those sold as slaves in North America landed at Sullivan's Island?
What stage of the slave trade provided slaves to Charles Town?
What peoples were brought to Charles Town to be slaves?
Which African coast did many slaves that were sold in Charles Town come from?
African slaves had great knowledge of the cultivation of what product?
By what year was indigo was a leading export for the Lowcountry?
Which nation subsidized indigo crops from the Lowcountry?
By what year was rice a successful commodity crop for the Lowcountry?
What products were exported along with indigo from the Lowcountry?
What other Native American nation supplied Charles Town with deer hides other than the Cherokee nation?
What is the  estimation of deer slaughtered in Charles Town from 1739 to 1761?
Records indicate how many pounds of deer skins were exported from Charles Town during the height of its deerskin trade?
What trade was the basis of Charles Town's original economy?
What was the average amount of deer skins  that Charles Town exported to Europe between 1699 to 1715? 
What is the oldest college in South Carolina?
Charleston supported the College of Charles Towne until what year?
What year was the Charles Towne Library Society established?
When was the College of Charles Towe founded?
What is located where the first theatre building in Charles Town once stood?
Which general tried to seize Charles Town during the American Revolution?
Who was the commander of the American forces defending South Carolina?
When did General Clinton attack South Carolina?
What was the British hoping to inspire by their attack on Charles Town?
Fort Sullivan was renamed  what after the battle?
What was the greatest American defeat of the American Revolution?
How many soldiers did General Clinton return with?
In what year did General Clinton return to Charles Towne?
Who was the leader of the American forces defending Charles Towne?
How many soldiers did General Lincoln lead?
What city became the state capital of South Carolina?
Charleston was the state capital of South Carolina until what year?
In what year was the cotton gin invented?
What became South Carolina's major export commodity after 1793?
Who made up most of the primary labor force of cotton plantations? 
How many free people of color lived in Charleston in 1860?
What percentage of Charleston's population were free people of color?
What percentage of Charleston's black population were free people of color?
In what year was the Brown Fellowship Society created?
In what year did the Brown Fellowship Society end?
What was planned by Denmark Vesey?
When was Vesey's plan for a slave revolt revealed?
How was Vesey executed in 1822?
How many slaves were executed with Vesey? 
What revolution made whites fearful of retribution of slaves?
Black left which religious denomination is great numbers after slavery?
How many African Americans lived in Charleston in 1860?
What  barred product ,along with dogs and guns ,  did the Freemen want after slavery ended?
How many African American lived in Charleston in 1880?
AME Zion Churches were first established in what part of America?
What association founded the Avery Normal Institute?
What type of school was the Avery Normal Institute?
Who attended the Avery Normal Institute?
What general supported the conversion of a US Arsenal into Porter Military Academy?
Soldiers and boys helped by Porter Military Academy were affected by what?
What percentage of Charleston's population was black in 1875?
What percentage of Charleston County's was black in 1875?
In 1876, Charleston's Black Republicans fought against whom?
The second riot of 1876 happened when?
How many major riots between blacks and whites occurred in Charleston in 1876?
What were white Democratic paramilitary groups in Charleston known as?
What granted Freeman were American citizenship?
The Cainhoy Incident occurred on what day?
The violent 1876 incident that took place on King's street happened on what day?
Who won the 1876 election as a result of voter intimidation?
What nearly destroyed Charleston in 1886?
What date was the Charleston earthquake of 1886?
How many buildings were damaged by the 1886 earthquake in Charleston?
What was the cost of the damage of the 1886 earthquake to the city of Charleston?
What was the total value of all of Charleston's city buildings before the earthquake?
Which party dominated South Carolina's state legislature?
What year was a new constitution passed that discriminated against blacks were passed?
The William Enston Home was built in what year?
Blacks were the majority in South Carolina until what year?
A large post office and courthouse was built in what year?
On what day were nine people killed in the Emanuel African Methodist Episcopal Church?
What was the name of 21 year old that killed nine church members in Charleston, South Carolina?
Clementa Pinckney served what public office for the state of South Carolina?
A memorial service for the nine victims was held on which college's campus?
On what day was the Confederate flag removed from South Carolina State House?
What season is Spoleto Festival USA held?
Spoleto Festival USA is a counterpart to what Italian festival?
What year was Spoleto Festival USA founded?
What  the profession of Gian Carlo Menotti?
What major award did Gian Carlo Menotti win?
What is Charleston's oldest community theater group?
Where is the  annual Charleston Fashion week held?
The Footlight Players  started creating theatrical productions in what year?
Charleston is known for what type of food?
Charleston cuisine is influenced by what two cultures?
"Charleston's Provincialisms" was published in what year?
To which two early cultures are the unique characteristics of Charleston's accent attributed to?
To which college did Sylvester Primer belong?
Who was the author of the work entitled, "The Huguenot Element in Charleston's Provincialisms"?
What type of journal were Primer's work on Charleston's accent published?
How many days does the Spoleto Festival USA run each year?
What kind of festival is Spoleto Festival USA?
The Holiday Festival of Lights are held where?
About how many performances are there in the Spoleto Festival USA?
Who founded the Spoleto Festival USA?
Who wrote the "Charleston"?
What decade was the Charleston dance popular nationally?
Who created the song "Charleston Rag"?
Which Charleston community had a large influence on jazz music?
Geechee dances are associated with the music of what type of worker?
What year was the Jenkins Orphanage created?
What type of donations did the Jerkins Orphanage accept?
What Charleston Reverend established the Jenkins Orphanage?
Whose graduates tutored many boys from the Jenkins Orphanage?
What city was Louis Armstrong from?
What other president did the Jenkins Orphanage play for other than Taft?
What play did the Jenkins Orphanage band play for on Broadway ?
What was the name of the "folk opera" based on 'Porgy'?
Where did Gershwin and Heyward write their folk opera?
When did Gershwin and Heyward write their folk opera?
How many companies are there in the City of Charleston Fire Department?
How many full time firefighters do Charleston have?
Who was the Fire Chief until June 2008?
Who became the Fire Chief in November 2008?
How many tower companies does the fire department have?
What is the largest police department of South Carolina?
How many reserve police officers do the Charleston Police Department have?
How many civilians serve on the Charleston Police Department?
Who is the current Chief of the Charleston Police Department?
What year did Reuben Greenberg retire as Chief of Charleston Police Department?
What is the state's first school of medicine?
Where is East Cooper Regional Medical Center?
Where is the Trident Regional Medical Center is located?
Bon Secours-St Francis Xavier Hospital is located at what portion of the city?
What medical district is experiencing growth in biotechnology and medical research field?
What airport provides service to the City to Charleston?
The Charleston International Airport is located in what city?
How far is the airport from downtown Charleston?
Charleston Executive Airport is located where?
What military base is located near the airport?
What area in Charleston is considered the 'industrial area'?
What highways is King Street in downtown Charleston?
U.S. Highway 78 merges with what street?
Interstate 526 begins and ends at what Highway?
Interstate 26 begins on what part of Charleston?
What year did the Arthur Ravenel Jr. Bridge open?
What is linked to downtown Charleston by the bridge?
What year was the Grace Memorial Bridge built?
What year was the Silas N. Pearman Bridge built?
The Arthur Ravenel Jr. Bridge crosses what river?
Some of the oldest private schools in Charleston date back how long?
The Roman Catholic Diocese of Charleston oversees what kind of schools?
How old are some of Charleston's private school?
Which school is Charleston's diocesan high school?
Which organization oversees several K-8 Parochial Schools?
Bishop England High school , Porter-Gaud School and a what other school is among Charleston's most prominent private schools?
What is the nation's 13th-oldest university?
Where is the Art Institute of Charleston located?
What year did the Art institute of Charleston open?
What Charleston College offers a degree in Building Arts?
What Technical college have a campus at downtown Charleston?
What is the name of Charleston's sister city?
In what country is Spoleto located?
Who selected Charleston to host an American version of a festival?
What is the name of festival held in Spoleto?
What is the profession of Gian Carlo Menotti?
What year was the Polaris Missile Facility Atlantic station closed?
How many nuclear warheads were stored at the Polaris Missile Facility Atlantic station?
How many SSBN "Boomer" squadrons were homeported at the Weapons Station?
Submarine Squadron 4 is homeported at what type of military base?
What year did South Carolina pass a law allowing them to repeal Federal Law?
After South Carolina passed an ordinance of nullification, who was sent to Charleston's forts?
After South Carolina passed an ordinance of nullification, who was sent to Charleston Harbor?
The federal action of sending soldiers to Charleston in 1832 is known as what?
A compromise law from the state politicans achieved what?
What industry depended on the port of Charleston?
Where was  fresh food sold daily in Charleston in 1840?
What year did the legal importation of slaves end?
The region where cotton plantations were developed was known as what?
In what era did one million slaves get trade throughout the South?
What percentage of those elected from 1868 to 1876 were Freemen?
Freeman became the leaders of what party in Charleston?
What else did freed slaves face in postwar Charleston besides discrimination?
For what did the Federal forces remain in Charleston?
Which side was defeated in the war before Reconstruction?
From where does the color red in blood come from?
What does hemoglobin contain?
What causes the color of hematite and red ochre?
Why does a sky turn red when the evening comes?
What pigment is responsible for the color of leaves in fall?
In which book of the Bible did God reference gifts of Blue Purple and Scarlet?
What does coccumque bis tinctum translate to in english?
In ancient greek, what is coccus referred to as?
What does Kokkos mean in english?
In what century did the latin vulgate bible use the term coccumque bis tinctum?
When did Egyptians start to make red pigment?
What pigment was used for male skin tone in ancient wall art?
What root did Egyptians use to source their red pigment alizarin?
What dye did the Egyptians make using the madder plant?
What type of palette was found in Tutankhamun's tomb?
Which color was said to be the Emperor's color in ancient Rome?
At what time were togas with red were worn by Romans?
What is a flammeum?
What color was correlated with the Army in ancient Rome?
After what event would a general of the Roman army be painted red?
Which European emperor painted their palace red?
In what year did cardinals in the Roman Catholic church start wearing red?
When was Saint Denis Basilica rebuilt?
Who rebuilt the basilica of Saint Denis?
Christ and which other Christian figure were often painted red in medieval painting?
What status did the wearing of red in medieval times represent?
On what occasion would townspeople wear red?
What root was used for red clothing owned by commoners?
Outside of sun exposure in what circumstance did pigment made from rubia tinctorum fade?
What was carmine made from?
How many elements did the Chinese philosophers think the world was made of?
What element was red associated with in Chinese philosophy?
Outside of Fire and Earth, what three other elements did Chinese philosophers say the world was composed from?
At the time of the Han dynasty where would one fine the color Red?
In the time of the Ming Dynasty one would find what color used during sacrificial offerings?
What plant was used to make the most used red dye in Venice?
Which group in Europe used Kermes dye?
The wealthiest in Europe used what red dye?
What dye was known as the Blood of Saint John?
The Blood of Saint John was made from an insect, which one?
During which revolution was red a symbol of liberty?
What kind of cap did the Jacobins wear?
Women with red caps crowded around guillotines during the Reign of Terror to do what?
During what years did the Reign of Terror take place?
Who was Saint Denis?
What was Turkey red called in France?
In what years did Turkey red begin to be used to dye cotton in England?
What other pigment was Turkey red compared to?
What did turkey red get its color from?
In what century did quilts in America commonly use Turkey red?
In which century did color theory begin to be systematically studied?
Who painted the Night Cafe?
In what year was The Night Cafe painted?
What was the name of vincent van Gogh's brother?
What occurred when red and green were put next to one another?
During which century did Matisse work?
Placing red and green next to each other causes their color to be what?
What color did Matisse claim would impact ones blood pressure?
What color did Matisse say could penetate ones soul?
What part in the paintings of Matisse did color play?
To whom did Rothko donate Passion of Christ murals?
In what year did Rothko donate Passion of Christ murals?
What organic reds did Rothko use in the Passion of Christ murals?
In what year had the Passion of Christ murals by Rothko end up ruined?
What was the result of the change in color in the Rothko Passion of the Christ murals?
What was red ochre composed of?
How were pigments like red lake created?
What was red lake composed of?
What was the source of color in Red lac?
The Laccifer lacca was crucial to making what pigment?
Which colors are part of the RGB model?
What color light is created when one mixes red, green, and blue?
The RGB color model has three colors in it that are described as what kind of colors?
Which era did Cennino Cennini actively paint in?
What colors are used to create purple on a computer screen?
Over what numerical scale is color measured on a computer screen?
What is the total number of possible sRGB colors?
What is the number used to indicate pure red in sRGB?
Crimson is identified by what sRGB number?
What type of scattering is responsible for the shift in the color of sunlight?
What occurs to colors of short wavelengths in Rayleigh scattering?
What is the effect on blue and green light experiencing Rayleigh scattering during sunrise?
In comparison to blue and green, what would describe the wavelength of orange or red light?
At which period of the year are phosphates high?
What causes sugar created by chlorophyll to breakdown?
Where does phosphate within a leaf move in the fall?
What is created in fall when phosphates retreat to the stems of plants?
What occurs in bright light to leaves during fall?
What pigment accounts for the majority of color in red hair?
There is another part of the face which gets its red color from the pigment pheomelanin, what is it?
Aside from pheomelanin what color pigment contributes to red hair?
In what year can the earliest used of redhead be traced to?
What type of temper are people with red hair considered to have?
In alpha male mandrills what party of the body is most red according to their rank?
Wearing red is connected to what result in humans, in terms of sport?
In what sport have judges been shown to favor athletes wearing red?
What is the effect of exposing a human to red when it comes to cognitive skills?
The amount of red in mandrill males is directly related to levels of what?
What trait do people most commonly link red with?
Why did the Popes of the middle ages wear red?
What was depicted on the banners of Christians in the First crusade?
What is the cross on the banners used during the First Crusade known as?
Who was Saint George believed to be?
When was Saint Valentine martyred?
Who was Saint Valentine?
In which century did Saint Valentine's day become connected with lovers?
In what kind of countries is the celebration of Valentine's day forbidden?
Which nation forbade the sale of Valentine's Day products in 2002 and 2011?
What color gowns are generally worn by recent Doctors of Philosophy at Oxford?
What good traits is the color red associated with in China?
In what century did Saint Nicholas become the influence for red being worn by Santa Claus?
Who was Saint Nicholas?
In what nation is Myra?
What did a red flag signal in the Middle Ages?
What was the importance of a red flag flown by a warship in the Middle Ages?
Which British law forbade cars from following a bearer of a red flag as a warning to horse drawn vehicles?
Under what circimstance is a red flag flown in auto racing?
What is a football player shown before being ejected from a match?
In what city did the standardization of red as a color of stop lights occur?
In what year did nations standardize on red as a color for stop lights?
At what event did the color red become the standard color of stop lights?
Red is the color of stoplights due to its universal affiliation with what?
At what time is red at its brightest?
In what way is red used in contemporary fashion?
What is the main impact of people wearing red as it relates to the perception of distance?
Why do monarchs sometimes wear red?
Some professions require employees to wear red because it allows them to be what?
How many heads did the scarlet beast which a woman sat on have?
The horned scarlet beast that a woman sat on had how many horns?
What kind of cup did the woman on the scarlet horned beast have?
What was on the forehead of the woman on the scarlet horned beast?
Outside of the blood of the saints, on what did the woman on the scarlet horned beast become drunken?
What central African warriors are said to cover themselves in red for celebrations?
What does the Ndembu culture believe red symbolizes?
What color do the Ndembu believe is better than red?
What alternative colors does the Red Cross use in certain parts of Africa?
What team did the Cincinnati Red Stockings become?
When did the Cincinnati Red Stockings come to be?
What political movment was red identified with in the 1950s?
What name did the Cincinnati Red Stockings become known as for a time in the 1950s?
Where did the Cincinnati Red Stockings move after leaving Cincinnati?
In Christian nations what does the color red often become associated with?
What cross is on the British flag?
As it relates to England, who is Saint George?
Which US armed force uses red as the main color of its flag?
In terms of a beach, why might one see a red flag?
When did the Slavic solidarity movement choose red blue and white as their colors?
In what year did the nation of George get a new national flag?
What is in the middle of the Georgian flag?
How many small crosses are on the Georgian flag?
What were the Pan-Slavic colors originally?
During what time period did the German Empire use the colors red white and black?
What did red white and black become associated with in Germany?
Whose design was the Nazi flag?
In what era did red white and black become part of the Nazi flag?
Red was chosen as part of the Nazi flag to do what?
After the demise of what was the red flag linked to the French Revolution?
On what date was the Garde Nationale empowered to hoist a red flag to signal their intervention in a riot?
On what date did the Garde Nationale kill as many as fifty people on Champs de Mars?
Who wrote the words "Against us they have raised the bloody flag of tyranny?"
In what year did the most ardent revolutionaries in France adopt a red flag to symbolize the blood of their fallen comrades?
When was the Communist Manifesto first created?
Who wrote the Communist Manifesto?
The French Revolution resulted in the fall of which monarch?
When did the 19th century workers of Paris construct barricades and hoist red flags to protest their new government?
Who was tasked with stopping the late 19th century worker uprisings in France?
Who was defeated in the Franco-Prussian war?
After Paris was seized as a result of the Franco-Prussian war, what did revolutionaries and workers create?
For how long did the Paris Commune exist?
Next to whom was a a Paris Commune banner placed?
In what year did people of the French Communist party go to Moscow to give the Soviet government a Paris Commune banner?
How many days did the recount after the 2000 US election last for?
In the USA red states are known to do what, in terms of politics?
In what year did the concept of red and blue states become relatively fixed?
In the United States states that vote for Democratic presidential candidates are known as what?
In what year was the Community Party of China created?
The Community Party of China gained power in China, what year did it happen?
Who was the Party leader of the Communist Party of China when it took power?
In terms of the Communist Party of China, what is "The East is Red?"
How many members does the contemporary Communist Part of China have?
What did the biggest star on the flag of China in 1949 represent?
What does the red color in the Nepalese flag represent?
In the mid 20th century the flag of Laos was primarily what color?
Which group gained power in China in 1949?
In what year during the 20th century did the Chinese flag become red?
What was the beginning date of the aerial raids on Great Britain?
How many days did the aerial raids on Great Britain last?
How many times was London attacked?
Who was the UK Prime Minster at the time of the aerial raids?
What city did Winston Churchill bomb in retaliation for the killing of civilians? 
How many nights did the Luftwaffe bomb London?
What north sea port was the secondary target for bombers that could not find their primary target?
How many homes in London were destroyed in London?
How many people were killed in Liverpool?
Which city centre was destroyed?
What was the name of the Luftwaffe plan to invade Britain?
How many people died in the bombing of Hamburg?
What was the date of the bombing of Hamburg?
Who was the leader of the Luftwaffe? 
In the 1920's and 30's to theorist thought wars could be won by air forces what were their names?
Bombing of civilian's was believed to cause what?
What does USAAC stand for?
What kind of populace was believed to be most vulnerable?
What kind of bombing raids were most favored?
Who believe air power alone would not be decisive?
What was the name of the Luftwaffe's bombing raids?
What year did the terror bombing policy become official?
Who said the Luftwaffe General Staff should be taught grand strategy?
What is the mentality of potential opponents also known as?
What did the Air Academies not focus on?
What army does the general staff belong to?
What year was the beginning of enemy bombing first promoted by Hitler?
Why did Hitler feel the Luftwaffe was unsuccessful in bombing raids?
Why did Hitler feel bombing wasn't working?
In 1939 Hitler said bombing of Britain would begin when?
Who had skepticism towards strategic bombing? 
Which tactics were the Luftwaffe excepted to use against Britain? 
Why did the Luftwaffe bomb the RAF Fighter Command?
What was the name of the Channel the Luftwaffe bomb to try to gain air superiority?
Which Navy was assumed not to be able to operate under German air superiority?
Why did the Luftwaffe fail to locate their targets?
What did German crew members face if they were shot down over Britain?
Britain's  fabrication  of fighter planes out paced Germany by what margin?
How big was the crew of a bomber?
How many aircraft did Britain produce in 1940?
The Luftwaffe air fleets were taking what kind of losses?
What did the punishing losses to the air fleet cause the Luftwaffe to do?
What kind of strategy did the Luftwaffe use to give their bombers better protection?
What city did Hitler give a speech where he said he would erase British cities?
In what year did Hitler give the speech at Sportspalast? 
Coupled with British quick reactions what cause operational capacity hard to achieve?
What was an important fuel in the Second World War?
Who was given permission to restore power and move supplies to keep the war moving?
What kind of bombs were effective in the beginning but became less so with time?
What did Britain do that helped make the new strategy less effective? 
What was the biggest fear aerial attacks would cause besides death and wounded?
Psychiatrists believe in 1938  that mental trauma could reach how many millions?
Where did 150,000 migrate during the Munich crisis?
Who told Parliament that after long periods of attacks people would leave the cities for the country? 
What civil-defense efforts were left to local authorities to handle?
What year did the shelter program finish?
Why were the shelters soon abandoned in 1940? 
Why were Londoners forced to sleep in shelters?
What kind of sentiment did the government fear would developed in large group shelters? 
Who did the government see as a leading advocate for building deep shelters?
What was the name of the Pact of August 1939?
Why did the government refuse to allow the London Underground stations to be used as shelters?
Underground officials were ordered to lock the stations during raids but opened how long after the orders?
In 1940 how many people were sleeping in the Underground stations?
Muffling the sound of batter made what easier in the Underground Stations?
Why were many killed in Underground Stations?
What was the largest number to use Underground shelters in September  27, 1940?
In 1940 what percentage used the Tube for a sleeping shelter?
Where did 60% of populations stay?
What year did the government start giving out Morrison shelters?
Where could the Morrison shelters be used?
What witness wrote that these people are staunch to the bone and won't quit?
With the intense bomb what did not happen as great as prewar predictions expected?
People called the raids very blitzy like they were talking about what?
What is ARP?
The Auxiliary Fire Service had how many members in July of 1939?
Who was given the name Blitz Scouts?
The Royal Army Pay Corps and what other group were in charge of salvage and clean-up?
What group did Samuel Hoare set up in 1938?
Who was Home Secretary in 1938?
How many members did the WVS have at the end of 1941?
How many gas mask were issued before the war?
Who was the Air Officer Commanding Fighter Command after 1940?
What credit did Dowding receive?
What strategy could the German's have used instead of day raids?
Why were civic and political leaders worried about Dowdings?
Who was reluctant to act quickly when urgent changes need to be made?
Who thought Dowding was stubborn and didn't like to cooperate?
What did the Air Ministry plan to do with his failures?
The Air Ministry was critical of Dowding after which battle?
Who was summoned to the Air Ministry conference on October 17, 1940?
Lord Beaverbrook and Churchill's support of Dowding was what?
Neglect of the RAF until 1938 caused what to happen?
The Air Ministry and which other group decided to not make night defense a top priority?
What did the RAF put most of their resources into?
RAF bombers had trouble flying at night, so the British believe the Germans would do what?
What did the Air Force believe they could avoid if they carried out effective day missions?
Britain believe German bombers would be unable to reach and identify what?
What did the British offence become know as?
Why was the tactic of bombing German aircraft bases, factories and fuel reserves impractical?
Until 1940 what type of aircraft did the RAF lacked?
What was wrong with the anti aircraft units?
What did the Lorenz beam allow aircraft to do?
The Germans developed the Lorenz into what system?
The Knickebein was the same as the Lorenz but used how many beams?
The Germans flew along one beam until they picked up the second beam the sound telling them when to start doing what?
The beam was traced to what town?
The Bean Approach Training Development Unit were fitted with what kind of transmitter to search for the Knickebein? 
In 1940 a German prisoner overheard boasting that the British would never find what system?
Which RAF technical advisor was the conversation passed onto?
The first jamming operation was carried out using what machines?
The German beacons used what frequency band?
What two letter identifier did the signal have?
What system used a separate locations for a receiver and a directional aerial?
When a German bomber flew to close to its own beam what happened to the signal?
Anti-aircraft defenses became better after what?
What did they use to lure German bombers away from their targets?
What kind of airfields were prepared to stand up to skilled observers? 
What was the name given to these dummy airfields?
Fake fires were used as what kind of technique?
What was injected into the fires from time to time to produce a flash?
Two tanks one of oil, one of water fed what kind of fire?
What did these flashes simulate?
What was the purpose of these fires?
The bombing of the Thames Estuary cause how many civilian casualties?
How many were killed in the bombing of the Thames Estuary?
How many aircraft did the Luftwaffe lose?
How many German pilots were killed?
How many Air Fleet 3 attacked that night?
What was the name of the airfield where heavy raids took place?
How many Bf 109s were lost?
FighterCommand lost how many fighters?
How many pilots did Fighter Command lose?
What caused the delay in the effort?
On September 15 the Luftwaffe made daylight raids on what target in London?
What two targets were the Luftwaffe trying to destroy?
What was the reason to try and draw the RAF into a battle?
What was this air battle called?
The Luftwaffe lost what percentage of its bombers sent that day?
On October 14 how many German bombers attacked?
How many people were killed?
Who fired anti-defense rounds?
How many rounds of anti-defense were fired?
How many German bombers were shot down?
How much of the short tons of bombs were dropped during the day?
What two cities had 500 short tons of bombs dropped on them during the end of October?
What was targeted with 12 short tons of bombs?
Which was targeted more heavily, bomber or fighter command airfields?
Liverpool had how many short tons dropped on it?
British night air defenses were effective to what height?
By July of 1940 how many guns were deployed in Britain?
What was the practical ceiling of the effective heavy guns?
What type of light gun dealt with aircraft up to 6000 ft.?
What is believed to have caused many civilian casualties from anti-aircraft guns?
Who reorganised London's defences?
The British were how far below the establishment of heavy anti-aircraft artillery?
Who relied on night fighters?
Who's four squadrons shot down more enemy aircraft than any other type?
How were AA defenses improved?
The bombers used what out of desperation?
What was considered unreliable?
Gunlaying radar and RAF controls combined to create what system?
What used most of Fighter Command's resources?
Who replaced Dowding on November 25?
What supported the GL carpet?
How many pilots remained in February 1941?
How many number of contacts and combats were there in May?
What did a bomber crew need to do for a good chance at evasion?
What was critical in the night battles over Britain?
What concept eventually became successful?
On what day did airborne radar help intercept and destroy enemy aircraft for the first time?
Who was the RAF night fighter ace that used airborne radar to destroy a Ju 88 bomber?
How many bombers hit Birmingham?
For how many months did the night raids continue for?
How many tons of bombs had to be dropped to be considered a major attack?
December saw how many attacks?
On what day was London itself attacked?
What group was the first to use incendiaries?
How many fire bombs were dropped per minute?
How many civilians were killed in the bombing?
The Luftwaffe dropped how many short tons of bombs?
Why were port cities targeted by the Luftwaffe?
How many times was Swansea bombed heavily?
What was primarily damaged in the attacks?
What cities had large sections of them destroyed?
What was left mostly unharmed?
What was the primary goal of the German air doctrine?
In November and December of 1940 what changed to make attacks on civilians a moot point?
What had nearly been considered indiscriminate bombing?
Lighting targets hidden by haze had to be done without what?
What was the group that used incendiaries and high explosives to mark targets?
The Feuerleitung (Blaze Control) tactic led to what creation for marking targets?
What was the nickname of bombs used in streets and residential areas?
What was the weight of the "Max" bomb?
What was the first consideration for the OKL to support Directive 23?
What was the second consideration?
What did the OKL insist on maintaining?
When would other targets be considered available?
What was inflicting heavy losses and increasing the air war designed to do?
What was preventing escalation of air operations?
What happened to airfields?
How many bomber groups were relocated to Germany?
What was focused in March?
What did these attacks accomplish?
Why was the OKL forced to improvise?
How many Ju 87 Stuka dive-bombers and Jabos were used?
How many German bombs hit their target?
How many sorties a night were crews asked to fly?
What contributed to the exhaustion of crews flying extra sorties?
What happened to Peter Stahl when he fell asleep flying?
What did Peter's crew take to complete their mission?
What did the British fear most?
What was an important destination for supply convoys from North America?
The Liverpool Blitz sank how much shipping?
How many ships were destroyed on May 8, 1941?
How much of the overseas trade did the Port of London take on?
How many houses were spared damage in Glasgow?
How many people per week were losing housing?
Why was Plymouth targeted the most?
What did the Germans use along with incendiaries and bombs?
How many AAA shells were fired?
What were two large ports on the English east coast in the North?
Sunderland saw how many incendiaries used against it on 25 April?
How many bombers were used in a five-hour attack?
What was the result of the German attacks?
When was the last major attack London saw?
How many tonnes of bombs did the Luftwaffe use on London?
How many casualties were inflicted?
What was the damage done to London's streets?
What showed RAF night fighter effectiveness was increasing?
How was the British night fighter operations faring?
How did the Bristol Blenheim F.1 perform against German aircraft?
What did interception rely upon?
How did the Bristol Blenheim F.1 compare to German aircraft speed?
What was the max speed of a Beaufighter?
What is the operational ceiling of the Beaufighter?
how many machine guns did the Beaufighter include?
What day was the first victory the RAF had with airborne radar?
What was the most losses the Luftwaffe suffered on any mission?
How many bombers hit Plymouth on Hitler's birthday?
How many bombs hit Plymouth on Hitler's birthday?
On May 3/4 how many German bombers were lost?
How many German bombers were shot down by the RAF in May?
How could have more been achieved in the air offensive?
What did the disputes in the OKL tend to be about?
What was the Luftwaffe incapable of doing?
How many casualties did the Blitz ultimately cause?
What helped increase the Bomber Command's offensives?
What did the RAF conclude?
What caused the most production disruption?
What did the Luftwaffe fail?
Without what could morale collapse occur according to Arthur Harris?
What was the primary strategy for Bomber Command offensives?
Arthur Harris announced that Bomber Command would enable economic warfare to achieve what?
What was the communist party agitated over?
What did Londoners use for bomb-shelters?
What did Morrison warn he couldn't do?
Who did the Communists blame for the damage in the Conventry raids?
The success of the Communists helped what political group?
Where did anti-semitic attitude spread primarily?
What was one the rumors that Jews were doing in regard to shelters?
What was feared would happen when different races were mixed in shelters?
What was another reason for populations moving?
How much of London's population left?
What locations saw an increase in populations?
How much of the population returned in four months?
How many evacuees were there?
What are the audiobooks with wartime recordings?
What are some of the things included in these recordings?
What is one of the notable recordings included?
What did the Endangered Species Act authorize the Secretary of the Interior to do?
The Endangered Species Act permitted how much annual expenditure by the US Fish and Wildlife Service for habitat purchase?
The Endangered Species Act gave the Secretary of the Interior administrative power of what organization?
How did the Endangered Species Act impact wildlife commerce?
How did the Endangered Species Act impact other agencies not specifically mentioned in the Act?
What is the nickname given to the first listing of endangered species?
How was the first listing limited in what species were listed?
What was concluded to be the biggest threat to the listed species?
How did being listed initially impact species?
When was the Endangered Species Conservation Act passed?
How did the Endangered Species Conservation Act benefit endangered species?
What did the Endangered Species Conservation Act add to the wildlife definition of the Lacey Act?
What two reptiles were particularly of interest for the inclusion of "reptiles" in the Endangered Species Conservation Act?
What important precedent did this set for invertebrates?
How many different ways can a species be added to the endangered list?
What federal program is used to list a species?
How long is the screening period of an individual's or organization's petition to add a species to the list
In the case of vertebrates, what is the most lenient interpretation of "species"?
What word was added to the Endangered Species Act in 1982?
Because of the change to the Endangered Species Act in 1982, what is the only consideration for being listed as endangered?
Which president issued an Executive Order that required financial consideration of all government actions?
What did Congress do to the Executive Order that would have included financial considerations as a factor for a species to be listed?
How is public notice given regarding a listing?
How long after a published notice of the listing may a public hearing regarding the listing be requested?
Do listing notices cross international soil?
What section of the Endangered Species Act establishes critical habitat regulations?
Critical habitat regulation links what two topics?
What does critical habitat regulation require?
What is an example of a critical habitat consideration that would apply to plant wildlife?
How are non-federal government activities that might impact critical habitat often subject to the Endangered Species Act?
What are some non-regulation actions that critical habitats encourage?
What does the Endangered Species Act detail about government action regarding critical habitats?
What is the time limit for designating a species critical habitat after the species has been added to the endangered list?
Which presidential adminstration limited the protective status of critical habitat in 1986?
After the limitations placed on critical habitat were lifted by the courts, where were critical habitats established primarily?
Where have the majority of critical habitats in the Midwest and Eastern states been located geographically?
What four topics are required in an Endangered Species Recovery Plan?
What is the time limit for completing an Endangered Species Recovery Plan?
What Recovery Plan duration the does Fish and Wildlife Service plan for in their policies?
What is the average time of completion of an Endangered Species Recovery Plan?
Which president had the most completed Recovery Plans during their administration?
What is the primary consideration for determining if projects may be carried out in areas with endangered species?
If a species may be harmed, who holds final say on whether the project may proceed?
How many members are on the ad hoc panel that allows project exemptions for cases where a species may harmed?
How many votes must be in favor of the exemption in order to award the exemption?
What is one specific requirement regarding the make-up of the exmeption panel?
Who reviews exemption considerations before the Endangered Species committee?
During informal consultation, what is the goal?
What prompts the need for formal consultation?
What considerations are weighed during the consultations?
How many times has the exemption process been used, as of 2009?
What were the results of those exemption petitions?
Why is this exemption provision often considered a nonfactor?
How can jeopardy opinions be dissuaded?
Who owns the majority of critical habitat?
What program gives incentives to private landowners to protect species on their land?
Before the amendment in 1982, under what situations could a listed species be displaced?
An approved HCP results in what being issued for the species?
How long do ITPs last?
How is the public made aware of ITP applications?
How long does the public have to comment on ITP applications?
What location held the first HCP?
What percentage of the critical habitat was protected for the area that received the first HCP?
What type of animal was being protected in the area that received the first HCP?
What 1981 court decision added to the power of HCPs and ITPs for conservation?
Who wrote the article "Searching for Consensus and Predictability: Habitat Conservation Planning under the Endangered Species Act of 1973."
What did Thornton compare the scientific and legal advances to, from the viewpoint of the development community?
What is the name of the rule that protects the landowner if their conservation efforts fall short?
Why is this particular rule so controversial?
If the landowner fails to adequately protect the species, what penalties do they face with the "No Surprises" rule?
Who covers the cost of additional efforts if the ITP holder's efforts fall short?
How do Candidate Conservation Agreements differ from Safe Harbor agreements?
How does a CCA impact unlisted species?
What animal species was delisted in August 2008?
How long had the squirrel been listed as endangered?
Which president signed an Act directing the delisting of the Northern Rocky Mountain population of gray wolf?
As of September 2012, how many species had been delisted due to recovery?
Of the ten species removed due to extinction, how many are believe to have already been extinct when listed?
How many species have been downgraded from endangered to threatened status?
How many species were delisted due to discoveries of new populations?
How did a land owner impact the protected red-cockaded woodpecker species?
What is the success rate of the list and the Endangered Species Act initiatives?
What is the name given to the act of pre-emptive habitat destruction by landowners fearing a protected species?
How many species are currently listed?
What is one particular industry that exploits Endangered Species Act loopholes?
What is one particular loophole that aids roadside zoos and private collectors?
What allows exploitation of interstate commerce regulations?
How can fake breeding loans be used to sell wildlife?
Why are there not more arrests from undercover investigations of interstate wildlife commerce?
The Center for Public Integrity found that 151 of what primate were moved from the New England Primate Research Center into exotic pet trade?
What happened in 1976 that impacted this primate's classification as Endanger?
What school is affiliated with the New England Primate Research Center?
Section 6 of the Endangered Species Act provided funding for what purpose?
What is one notable drawback with state wildlife agencies creating their own lists?
What states are listing species that are endangered in their own state, but that are not endangered in all other states?
Is the public given incentive to report Endangered Species Act violations?
Given that a violator caused wildlife harm, who may provide financial assistance for the care of the harmed wildlife?
Costs over what balance lead to the Secretary of the Treasury depositing money into the cooperative endangered species conservation fund?
The word Vacuum stems from what Latin adjective?
What does the term used by Physicists, partial vacuum, refer to?
What is a vacuum?
What type of pressure is less than atmospheric pressure in a vacuum?
What Latin term is used to describe an object in a vacuum?
What did Aristotle believe about a void?
What was historically disputed about vacuums?
What did something that was literally nothing at all,According to Plato, mean?
Aristotle thought what would fill any rarity that might give rise to a void?
In what century did believes start to move away from Aristotle's idea regarding a void?
What thought process was used in the beginning belief of the existence of vacuums?
Roger Bacon,Walter Burley and Blasius of Parma were from what century?
What belief regarding a cosmic void was accepted by most in the 17th century?
What does Rapid decompression do to the lungs?
What causes barotrauma?
What amount of pressure drop can kill you if it occurs suddenly?
What does acceleration of oxygen consumption do?
rapid decompression is more dangerous than what?
An infinite sea of particles with negative energy  was a model propesed by whom?
What year was the Dirac sea modeled?
When werer virtual particles confirmed?
What year was the uncertainty principle formed?
What theorized that time and energy can be measured?
what is a perfect example of a filled vacuum showing a curvature?
Who's equations  helped to imply vanishing of the Ricci tensor?
what produces curvature in a vacuum?
What has no electric charge?
Who required no restrictions regarding God's power?
When did Buridan state that teams of ten horses could not open a bellow with a sealed port?
the 1277 Paris Condemnations led to what conclusion?
What was a common belief about vacuums and nature?
what was the belief that nature abhorred a vaccuum called?
What was the vacuum created by the mercury displacement pump?
What year was the Toepler Pump invented?
What was first invented by Otto von Guericke ?
Who conducted the Magdeburg experiment?
What was made visible at a partial vacuum of 10 Pa?
What was originally believed the heavens were filled with?
Why were experiments done on luminiferous aether in the 19 Century?
Who stated that the character of a gas and free molecule were in ether?
Where are the highest amounts of naturally occurring partial vacuums?
What was ether originally thought to be made of?
density of oxygen like that of sea-level atmosphere is needed to do what?
What is the lowest altitude where acclimatization or a suit is not needed to prevent sickness in humans?
What can boil away in extreme vaccum exposure?
How should the grain direct of metallic flanges run to flange faces?
What are 2 metals that can be absorbed in an ultra high vacuum system?
What becomes a concern in an ultra high vacuum system regarding aluminum or palladium?
The state with the lowest possible energy in quantum mechanics defines what ?
A vacuum state with no matter particles or photons is called what?
why is a QED vacuum impossible to achieve ?
What is a QCD?
When are electric and magnetic fields with zero average values, but their variances are not at zero?
What is a verified effect of vacuum fluctuation?
what is  vacuum fluctuation?
Finite energy in a QED is called what?
What modifies can Coulomb's Law in a vacuum?
What was the object to use first in widespread manner process of vacuum?
What is produced by a vacuum and used in electron beam welding and vacuum frying?
Hight to ultra-high vacuums removes what obstruction?
How does freeze drying, distillation and metallurgy benefit from a deep vacuum?
What are two things made possible by the electrical properties of vacuum?
what is evaporation and sublimation in a vacuum?
Why can outgassing products ruin a space mission?
When does outgassing become important in all solid or liquid materials?
Repeatedly closing off a compartment of a vacuum allows what?
How is a vacuum created inside of a manual water pump?
Why is fluid in a manual pump pushed into the pumps cavity when a small sealed cavity is expanded?
What are pumps based off principle of sealed compartment pulling,pushing and expanding called?
What pump can capture gases in a solid or absorbed state?
Entrapment pumps often work without seals, moving parts and what else?
What pump has a higher quality vacuum than a positive displacement pump?
When multiple pumps are connected in series to produce higher vacuum it is called what?
The choice of seals, or chamber geometry ,for example impact a pump. Together these are options are called what?
What are two other relevant characteristics of a pumping system along with final pressure?
When did the Qing dynasty fall?
What innovation was acquired from the Qin?
What philosphy in education was sanctioned by the Chinese court?
What was an attributing factor that caused kingdoms to lose their Independence during the Han dynasty?
What class did a majority of appointed ministers come from during the Han dynasty?
Who made up a majority of the people on the frontier?
Who forced peasant farmers to move to new settlements?
In what year did Han forces stop a joint Xiongnu-Qiang invasion?
Where were landowners encouraged to migrate willingly to?
How many commanderies in the new frontier were created by the Han court in the year 111 BC?
What type of Roman item was traded on the Silk Road network?
Which diplomat helped gather information on the country of Anxi?
When did Zhang Qian end his travels?
Which network was used to exchange goods with Rome?
What empire had established an embassy in Anxi?
Which group did Han forces fight in the Tarm Basin?
When was the first national census taken in China?
What was the population of China in 2 AD?
What year was the Protectorate of Western Regions created in?
Which kingdom did the Han conquer in 109 BC?
Who made up the bulk of the administrators of the new government monopolies?
When was the liquor monopoly abolished?
Which faction did the Reformists oppose?
Which political faction favored budgetary reform?
In what year did Huo Guang die?
Who tried to outlaw slavery?
What caused the water level in the Yellow River to increase?
Who created a dam in the southern branch of The Yellow River?
What emptied out to the south of the Shandong Peninsula?
What caused the end of Wang Mang's regime?
In what year did the Partisan Prohibitions end?
In what year did Zhang Lu's rebellion end?
How many provinces did Zhang Jue's rebellion take place in?
What type of healer was Zhang Jue?
What religion did Zhang Jue practice?
How was Luoyang destroyed?
Who demoted Emperor Shao?
What position would the young Liu Xie eventually be promoted to?
Who had taken control of Luoyang?
When did Dong Zhuo die?
During what period was it obvious that corruption was widespread in the government?
What rank provided its holder territorial rule?
What class did individuals who served as officials in the government belong to?
What was considered to be more important to some than serving the local government?
What rank is below that of full marquess?
Who were considered to be below the social rank that scholars held?
What color of clothing were merchants that had registered with the state forced to wear?
Who was commonly considered by some to be social parasites?
Who would retainers in the employ of nobles occasionally have to fight?
How could a merchant prevent having to register as one?
How many family members would commonly live in a single household during the Han era?
Whose opinion on the spouse of an arranged marriage was considered to be more important?
Who were rich enough to afford multiple lovers?
What type of family was your typical Han era family considered to be?
What type of marriage was thought of as a normal occurrence in this era?
How did daughters get their portion of the family fortune?
What type of title could be passed down?
What type of document could be produced to distribute some of an inheritance?
Was is guaranteed that a first born son would receive all of the family's fortune?
Which family member commonly sent an adult married offspring away with their portion of the families fortune?
What type of torture was acquired from Qin law?
What eventually replaced torturous mutilation as a type of punishment?
What could a criminal in this era expect not to happen if he was convicted of a crime?
What type of extreme punishment was likely to be laid upon those who committed the harshest of crimes?
What did women commonly have less of?
What type of crop was rice considered to be during this period?
What were dogs in this era most likely to be considered?
What type of partridge was commonly consumed?
Where were turtles acquired from?
What was the color of the bayberries?
What was the purpose of breathing exercises to a Daoist?
What could the prophet Laozi offer in return for the confession of sins?
What type of religion did the society of the Way of the Five Pecks of Rice practice?
What could be earned if an individual had reached the lands of the Queen Mother of the West?
What literal work were followers of Laozi expected to chant?
Which individual had a duty to maintain the imperial stables?
Which Minister had the responsibility to interpret laws in this period?
Which Minister could an honored guest of the court be expected to see?
Who provided  the emperor with sustenance and medical aid?
Which individual held the responsibility to oversee the interactions of the empire's nobles with the court?
Which group made up the bulk of the Han tax base?
Who made reductions in the taxes that landowner-cultivators were forced to pay?
During what period did a large number of peasants incur debt?
What type of housing did the Han government provide to landless indebted peasants?
What did the Han government do to help out smaller landowners?
In which year did Emperor Wu monopolize several industries?
Who allowed industrialists to become officials in the newly state sanctioned industries?
During what period did the governmental monopolies become privatized once again?
What did Emperor Wu do to negate the influence of private entrepreneurs?
During what era could a wealthy iron industrialist be able to rival the treasury in funds?
What industry was monopolized by the government in 98 BC?
In what year did the liquor industry once again become privatized?
What was mostly missing during the Eastern Han?
What did Emperor Wu sell that offended the merchants?
What office did Emperor Ming create?
What was an invention that allowed farmers to place their crops into rows?
How many animals were neccessary to pull an iron plow?
How many acres of land could succesfully be sowed with a seed box in a day?
How many persons were necessary to operate an iron plow?
What methodology allowed the production of new agricultural tools?
How many stone pillar-gates survive from the Han era?
What architectural feature contained an imitation of a balustrade?
What building material were tomb chambers constructed with?
What were the walls that encompassed the city of Luoyang comprised of?
What type of system used ceramic water pipes?
During which period was the odometer cart first created?
What item was used to make very small measurements during this era?
What has allowed us to discover long lost inventions of the Han era?
What was used to separate parts of grain?
What use did the odometer cart provide?
What was used to power chain pumps to raise water to irrigation ditches?
What commandery was the creator of the waterwheel-powered reciprocator from?
Who was the author of the essay entitled Balance Discourse?
During what century is it likely that the watermill made an appearance in China?
During what era did the waterwheel first appear in recordings?
What type of treatise is the Book on Numbers and Computation considered to be?
How many mathematical treatises have still managed to survive to this day?
What achievement of the Han era can be used to help solve linear equations?
During what era was the Nine Chapters on the Mathematical Art from?
What can be used to help find the roots of equations?
In what treatise did negative numbers first appear?
How were negative numbers first described during the Han period?
In what century were negative numbers more commonly accepted in Europe?
What Indian manuscript also contains the useage of negative numbers?
What were positive numbers portayed as in the treatise of the Nine Chapters on the Mathematical Art?
In what era was a geocentric view of the universe adopted?
Who was able to describe the process of evaporation?
What object was assumed to block sunlight during a lunar eclipse?
What did astronomers believe the shape of the Sun to be during this era?
What did astronomers during this area believe to be the center of the universe?
What textile were some of the early Han maps made from?
In what type of building were silken maps found?
Which individual created the very first raised relief map?
What food stable was the first raised relief map created from?
What type of boat design was first invented during the Han era?
In what areas were Han ships able to be sailed in part due to the stern rudder?
What ship design contained a flat-bottomed hull?
What type of transport was the steering oar most likely to be used during?
Which two seas have been most central to Greek history?
During which prehistoric age was the Greek language invented?
Which city in modern Turkey was once a major center of Greek culture?
Which area of North Africa has hosted Greek communities in the past? 
What eleventh century empire had roughly the same extent as ancient Greece's?
Where are Greek States believed to have been settled ?
Which two bodies of water are believed to be central to the establishment of the Greek society ?
When was the emergence of the Greek spoken dialect believed to have started ?
What other culture did the Greek states share boarders with ?
What progression coincided with the the early Greek states that makes it difficult to give credit for the language and differences ? 
What is commonly seen in the Greek language that is not a constant ?
What other language has this same trait ?
What other things do the two languages seem to have in common ?
What group of people came with others who left the geographical and historical region in southeastern Europe, now a mutual  region between Greece and Albania ?
When did these groups make the migration ?
What civilization is the group credited with putting an end to ?
Is it believed that they truly are responsible in full for the collapse ? 
What areas were being explored by others in  by sea faring vessels and when are they believed to have arrived  ?
How did the Greeks look upon their forebears ?
How did they believe their forebears lived ?
What literary events were believed to be a fact of truth ?
Who was the author of these tales ?
What were the names of some of the figures for the established religion that are based on ancestral ties ? 
What event is believed to be the ethnic basis of the Greeks society?
When did this event occur ?
What national sporting event was held during this time period still goes on in celebration today ?
What was the foundation for spirituality and church ? 
What famous spiritual guide and God was a devotional temple made to in the 8th century ?
The time span that is counted as the classical for the Greeks is from eras ?
What is so well known about this period ?
Are there some discrepancies among scholars for the distinction of the period ?
What shiny other name is this time also called ?
What Macedonian ruler helped to advance Greek beliefs and ways of life ?
How was this achievement of advancing culture undertaken ?
What types of cities did the expansion of the great ruler inspire ?
Name a city that the Greeks nested in ?
With the secession away from the smaller communities in the Grecian world, what living situation became of great importance ?
The kingdoms of Diadochi was comprised of what ?
How did the cites remind themselves of their beginnings ?
What did the Greeks wants to be imparted to their descendants ?
When did the religions of the past begin to dissipate ?
What encouraged the change of faith ?
What religions form of worship came from the Eastern sects ?
What group was significant in the expansion of the Christian faith ?
What language are the Apostle's namely believed to have spoken ?
What caused the resurface of the Grecian monotony in politics ?
When did the nation reestablish itself ?
What was the specialty of great Pietho and what is famous for ?
What was bolstered by the the final downward spiral of the Empire of Trebizond ?
Which factoring war was on gong in 1828 and shares the of a previous scuttle ? ?
When did the emperor Constantine  lose rule over in 1453 ?
What did the populace do in response to the loss ?
What type of position did Greeks come to hold in the Ottoman Empire ?
Who made up the majority of soldiers in the Ottoman Empire ?
What type of work were must young boys antiquated with in the Ottoman Empire ?
What did the Greeks offer to the Ottoman Empire that was a superb benefit ? 
Who held much of the wealth in the Greek society ?
What three cities were imperative for the scholarly and economic exchanges ?
When was the Greece that we know today officially formed ?
Is this identifying factor for official citizens of Greece still in effect today ?
How did the original  Constitution identify its society members ?
When was the original Grecian constitution formed ?
What factor was used to expel or include citizens in the  Lausanne Treaty ?
What do Westerners believe it means to belong to the Greek heritage ? 
What do the Grecian Romioi  descendants of the Constantine rule  believe to be true in regards to the status as beneficiaries ?
What other cultures do the Romioi  clam to be their birthright ?
What is an alternative word used by Greeks to mean those who worship and alternative religion to the mainstreams ?
From what era is the Rigas Feraios believed to be a part of ?
When was the Greek state of modern times birthed into exsistence ? 
What did Greeks do that caused  the formation of the new state ?
What foundation was laid that is the demographics of Modern Greek Enlightenment Era ?
What is the easiest connection between the Greeks of old and those of today ?
How log did the age of darkness last for the Greeks ?
Who else has a history as long standing as those of the Greeks ?
When did most of the Eastward sector of the Roman expanse choose to have a rebirth of Greek traditions and appreciations ?
What aspects of the Greek culture have remained steadfast throughout the years ?
In the Rupublic of Hellenic who is the ethnic majority and what percentage of the populace do they represent ?
What's the estimated populace of Greeks on the isle of Cyprus ?
Are Greeks in danger of contributing vastly to the problem of population control ?
Is the Greek populace on a whole increasing or decreasing in numbers ?
Where there any significances that contributed to the increase or decrease in population numbers ?
Which colonial enterprise for land was the Greek Isles a part of 
Who was living on with the Greeks in Cyprus s 1974 ?
Whee these new inhabitants welcomed ?
During the early seventies where did most Cyprus Greeks decide to go ?
What other countries boast of a Greek populace ?
What acts have caused the population of Greeks to be numbered so few in the country who name is reminiscent of a big American holiday?
How long was there a Greek influence represented in "little" Asia ? 
Are there any Greek who still live in the area around the dark sea in any majority of numbers?
How many people that are of Greek ascendancy live elsewhere than Greece ?
Who provided the contradictory  population numbers for Greeks abroad ?
How many Greeks do they believe would be an accurate number for census numbers ?
At what university is this issue of accurate consensus for Greeks living elsewhere being debated an 
Who has presented the contradictory number to the census groups ?
What helped to advance the Greek way of life beyond its boarders ?
What other close by countries have been greatly influenced by the Greek way of life ?
How were the rulers of social class picked to be representatives in the now traditionally Arabic speaking part of the world and in Northern Africa ?
What period marked the expansion of Greek thinking and expression ?
After freedom was won by the Greeks who was of import to forming the rules  ?
What did they do that contributed to the Greek's success of establishment?
Who already had contact over a network of countries ready to offer assistance to the Greeks ?
What countries did they settle in ?
How were these relationships with the other countries most likely established ?
What is considered the start of the Grecian cultural world ?
Which devotion of time was heavily influenced by the religious followers of the  Son of God ?
In what centennial was the massacre of the Greeks of Ottoman descent ?
Was there anything good that could be found from the divergence into exchange ?
Who was given the merit for the reemergence of the Greek way of life ?
What other dialects share a thread with the Greek language. 
What radical political changes occurred during the 19th century ?
What did these changes highlight ?
What became the official dialect of Greeks and what was it missing ?
What choices in 1976 made a change to the decisions concerning the official dialect ? 
What is different about the use of Greek language today as opposed to the language of the past ?
What are some of the local jargon used in Greek speaking?
What language still survives as the representation of the one of the three religious orders of historic Greece ?
What ancient language is still in use today in some of the minuscule societies in the Grecian world ?
What is the religion of the Greek majority ?
What denominational variance do they adhere to for the most part ?
What language was the second half of the Bible originally written in ?
This language is the official dialect of worship for the traditional sect for church worshipers of Greece ?
What other varieties of Christianity can be found among the Grecian people ?
What input did the Greeks have on artistry of the world ?
What period in Europe was full of an appreciation for earlier cultures ?
What important heritage of art  from Greece was celebrated during this time ?
What enacted the transactions of customs and ways of life for the people of the Asian continent and the Grecian people ?
Who was one of the old masters from the Greeks ?
Who sang in a voice that is in the high octave range from the Modern Greek Era ?
Who was one the most well known modern decorative modelers of the Greeks ?
Name one of the poetic authors who was also nominated for the Nobel Peace Award from the Greeks ?
What are considered to be the motherland of the Greeks ?
What statement of note was given by a great philosopher from Greece written by another great philosopher ?
What is the name of the ancient map of the Greek world  named  ?
When did changes of this ancient map become notable ?
Are there many product available from farm cultivation on the Greek lands ?
What else is this particular captain known for doing ? 
Who was the well known sea vessel captain of the Greeks who sailed to Asia  ?
What did Greeks do that caused a later deal to be made with the Italians ?
Who proposed that change was needed in the way business with the Greeks was to be conducted  ? 
What was brought about by the Ottomans that caused and uplift in the classes of Greek society ?
Is the seafaring business still of any relevancy to the Greek economy ?
What did the development of these changes lead to for the Greeks under Ottoman rulers ?
What was the last husband of Jacquelyn Kennedy known for ? 
What dominant hair color is to believed to be prevalent among Greeks 
Which colors lay outside of the nor for those of Greek descent ?
What eye color shows the least presence among those of Greek heritage ?
What eye color is believed to be the norm among Greeks ?
What location did many of the Greek people decide to live in other than Greece after the 19th century ?
During what period of domination were many Greeks unable to interact with it's central location ?
The anthology of the Greek world is intimately joined with what areas of the world ?
After the 19th century about how much of the Greek population resided in little Asia ?
Which angel is believed to have communicated the Quran to Muhammad?
On which date did Muhammad begin receiving the Quran?
In which year CE did Muhammad die?
What is the Arabic variant of Gabriel?
How many times is the word "Quran" used in the Quran?
Who first recorded Muhammad revelations?
Who first standardized the earliest versions of the Quran?
By what name is the first standardized version of the Quran known?
In which language is the Quran spoken during prayer?
The Quran is used in the interpretation of which form of law?
What accounts are form the basis of much of the accounts in the Quran?
Which religious text calls itself a book of guidance?
In which mountain cave did Mohammad experience his first revelation?
Where did Mohammad move to found a separate Muslim community?
Prisoners from which battle are thought to have helped Muslims learn to write?
Vegetation from which tree served as an early recording medium for the Quran?
When Muhammad dies, what had not yet been compiled as a book?
What is the most common interpretation of the word "ummi" that the Quran applies to Muhammad?
Because Mohammed was "ummi," what would he not have known about that lent credence to his prophethood?
What term does the Quran use to describe Mohammad's lack of exposure to scripture?
What skills would have made others more suspicious that Mohammad was not getting his revelations in the way he said?
Which caliph decided to preserve the Quran as a single book after some of Muhammad's companions were killed in battle?
Which scribe led the production of the first written Quran?
In which year did Abu Bakr die?
Who took possession of the first Quran manuscript after Abu Bakr?
Which caliph ordered the Quran manuscript copied and standardized?
What script were the Birmingham Quran fragments written in?
Which modern script descends from the script on the Birmingham Quran fragments?
What feature of the Birmingham Quran fragments' text make some doubt that it is older than other known versions of the Quran?
How many years old were the Quran fragments discovered in Birmingham in 2015?
Which section of the Quran inspires some Muslims to ritually wash themselves before touching their copy?
What is done with the ashes of burned copies of the Quran?
In what state are copies of the Quran sometime wrapped in cloth and buried?
Which are the safest places to inter an older copy of the Quran?
Quranic verses concerning which phenomena are thought by Muslims to authenticate its contents?
What types of events are related in the Quran in support of its moral teachings?
Historical narratives from whose time period are unique to the Quran among holy books?
What fraction of the Quran deals with eschatology?
What general topic is eschatology about?
Which natural disaster features in Sura 22?
What topic do suras 44, 56, 75, and 101 have in common?
In what form does the Quran say God sends his messages to people?
Who intermediates between God and prophets?
Which part of the Quran describes God's use of intermediaries between himself and his prophets?
Which humans are the messengers of God?
How does the Quran describe the similarity of messages God has delivered throughout human history?
What mental state is the foundation of morality as described by the Quran?
What finance-related acts are forbidden by the Quran?
What is the name of the formal prayer proscribed by the Quran?
Which month is designated for fasting in the Quran?
The Quran uses a term that also means purification for what social act?
Which astrophysicist has written about the ways the Quran encourages scientific thinking?
Verse 2:111 of the Quran supports which aspect of scientific thought and practice?
Whose scholarship on the concept of proof in the Quran does Guessoum cite?
Which philosopher believed the Quran had a rational and empirical basis like science?
Nature and its phenomena are mentioned in approximately how many of the Quran's verses?
Al-Battani is an example of a Muslim scientist who drew inspiration from which text?
Who recommended science as a way to achieve the goals of the Quran?
Who argued that the Quran inspired the first practitioners of the scientific method we use today?
Al-Biruni is a example of a scientists of which religion?
Which physicist quoted the Quran in his address after receiving the Nobel Prize?
Which verse from the Quran did Abdus Salam quote at his Nobel banquet?
Which two Muslim scientists did Salam celebrate as inventors of empirical methods?
Salam suggests physics and science be kept separate from which topics which are more suited to religion?
What description of the writing in the Quran highlights its poetic aspect?
Which suras in the Quran are particularly rhythmic?
What often changes along with the rhyming of Quranic verses?
Which parts of the Quran are the least poetic?
What metatextual character does Stefan Wild focus on in his discussion of the Quran?
What quality does the Quran claim in the different ways in which it refers to itself?
Which term that the Quran uses for itself means "news"?
The Quran is more self-referential in which of its suras?
What is another term for Sufi Quranic interpretation?
What Arabic word describes the aspects of Quranic verses that Sufism tries to push beyond?
What is an Arabic term for allusions?
Sands says Sufi interpretations tend to use which literary device rather than direct explanation?
Beloved is a term for God used by which style of Quranic interpretation?
Which Quranic verse describes Moses' encounter with God at the mountain?
In Sufi thought, what experiences bring one closer to truth?
Who wrote that Moses had lost the Moses in himself along the way to his encounter with God?
Who was an important esoteric interpreter of the Quran in the 11th century?
What is the English name of Sulami's major work?
In which language did Maybudi write?
Which Sufi commentator wrote the Spirit of Elucidation?
In which year did the poet Rumi die?
What is the Arabic term for the surface-level aspects of a text?
What Arabic term applies to interpretations aimed at the deeper, esoteric meanings of a text?
Who is the only one who ever knows the full meaning of Quranic verses in the esoteric view?
Which two groups are examples of Muslims who advocate a very literal reading of the Quran?
In which language was the Quran first translated?
Which work did scribes from Khorasan translate in the 10th century?
Whose student wrote a Persian tafsir of the Quran in the 11th century?
Who wrote a Persian translation of the Quran in the 12th century?
To which dynasty did the king who commissioned the first translation of Quranic texts belong?
In which year was the Quran first translated into a Western language?
Which organization offers versions of the Quran in 50 languages?
Whose French translation of the Quran was the model for the first English version?
Who completed the first Latin version of the Quran?
In which language was Alexander Ross' version of the Quran published in 1649?
What discipline concerns the way the Quran is correctly recited?
Tajwid deals with what aspect of the phonemes in the Quran?
Tajwid describes rules for what noiseless aspect of articulating Quranic verses?
Rhythm is an example of which features of Quranic recitation covered by tajwid?
Which Biblical character is the most often mentioned person in the Quran?
Who has claimed that Christians and Jews had heard and discussed the Quran before it took on its standardized Arabic form?
Which older language is thought to strongly resemble that of the Quran?
Which relative of Jesus appears more often in the Quran than the New Testament?
What do devout Muslims believe is the reason for the overlap of events and characters in the Bible and Quran?
What are the two type of ta'wil?
Which type of esoteric interpretation involves a transfer by proof of a verse's meaning?
The implicit meaning of a Quranic verse that is known fully only by God is which type of ta'wil?
What physical symptom accompanied Muhammad's revelations?
What measure of distance described the nearness of the Angel's approach to Mohammad?
In which work did Welch express his belief that Mohammad's physical reaction to the revelation was historically accurate? 
Which people would Mohammad's critics have compared him to at the time?
Who do Shia Muslims believe can approach Quranic truths besides God and Muhammad?
According to Shia Muslims, who is the only one who can fully know the a Quranic interpretation?
How must God have treated those who are qualified to know Quranic sectets?
What is a nation which can exert its influence on a global scale called?
What two dominant traits do great powers usually possess?
China, France, Russia, the United Kingdom, and the United States serve as what body's five permanent members?
What two lesser traits do great powers usually possess?
Canada, France, Germany, Italy, Japan, the United Kingdom, and the United States are part of what international forum?
What do great powers usually have?
What are the permanent members of UN Security Council?
What are the countries in the G7?
What 3 factors have international relations theorists considered factors for great power status?
The term "great power" was first used on which continent?
Which treaty made the distinction of small powers and great powers a formal affair?
What year was this treaty signed?
During which two wars has the balance of power shifted the most dramatically?
What is another more modern term used in place of "great power"?
What was the formalization of the division of small powers and great powers?
During the post Napoleonic era where were the first Great Powers concentrated?
What is another term for Great Power?
During what 2 wars was the balance of power shift most dramatic?
What one criteria was used in early times to judge a great power's status?
Besides military, what two other capacities were used to describe great powers in later times?
Who is the founder of the neorealist theory of international relations?
How many criteria are used to judge a great power in the neorealist theory?
Who wrote, "The test of a great power is the test of strength for war."?
What 5 criteria did neorealist use to determine great powers?
Whos was the founder of the neorealist theory of international relations?
What 3 areas can summarize the great power determination?
What three things do all states have in their geographic scope?
Which societal values had become world-wide by 1914?
What is the scope of a regional power restricted to?
What should a great power possess?
What were the great powers of 1914 called?
Who stated that "Great power may be defined as a political force exerting an effect co-extensive with the widest range of the society in which it operates. The Great powers of 1914 were 'world-powers"?
What do all states have?
What type of powers should have actual influence throughout the scope of the prevailing international system?
What type of power is restricted to its region?
What discussion should great powers be included on?
Historically, when would great powers meet?
What types of decisions would great powers reach?
When did Lord Castlereagh first use the term Great Powers?
What position did Lord Castlereagh hold?
What did Castlereagh determine as the last resort of great power's influence?
What 2 powers named in the 5 orignal great powers of the congress of vienna have maintained that status?
What country emerged as the pre-eminent power, due to its navy and the extent of its territories?
What country lost Franco-Prussian war?
Balance of power of great powers was a major influence on what continents politics?
Who stated that "All politics reduces itself to this formula: try to be one of three, as long as the world is governed by the unstable equilibrium of five great powers.?"
Was the power of the 5 countries constant?
What countries found their economic growth in early 20th century?
Which of the 5 powers were beginning to stagnate in early 20th century?
What agreement replaced the Congress of Vienna?
What conflict was this agreement in opposition of?
What is a superpower?
Who first used the term superpower?
Who were the three original superpowers?
Who lost their superpower status in 1950s?
What are middle powers?
During the cold war, what European powers rebuilt their ecomonies?
By what year was China beginning to lose its hold as sole legitimate government?
When did China lose its permanent seat at UN security council?
What countries are recognized as Nuclear Weapons States?
How many countries are permanent seats on the UN Security Council?
What other countries are referred to as middle powers?
What treaty addresses nuclear weapons?
What countries are great powers mostly based on economic reasons?
Due to lack of strategic and hard power, countries are excluded from what?
What is the name for the grouping of countries of China, France, Russia and the United Kingdom; Germany and Japan?
Zbigniew Brzezinski and Malik Mohan consider what country to be a great power too?
Is there agreement on the status of all powers?
Many academics debate the status of this country as a power?
Milena Sterio includes what former axis powers among great powers?
What emerging power is considered a great power?
What G7 members are among great powers?
Which country is debated as intermittent and/or least of great powers?
What organization is often seen as a great power in addition to member counties?
What other tools are used as alternative to military force?
How many great powers are members of Europian Union?
What summits does EU have membership?
How many wars occured between 1500s and 1953?
For bout how many years was an average of one great power fighting another each year?
What country had the most conflicts from 1500s through mid 20th century?
What span was the Pax Britannica?
Compared to other countries, how large is the US?
Which country is the worlds fourth largest?
Who may also be the third largest country?
Who does the US share land borders with?
Who does the US share water borders with in the northwest?
How many contiguous states are there?
Which ocean does Alaska border to the south?
What is the capital city of the US?
Which US state donated Washington, D.C.?
What are the US territories overseas located in the Pacific?
Which US state also donated territory to Washington, D.C., but had it returned?
How many Great Lakes form a border with Canada?
Which of the Great Lakes is entirely located in US territory?
Which major river is located west of the Appalachian mountains?
What type of land makes up the Ohio and Tennessee valleys?
Which section of the US contains subtropical forests and mangrove wetlands?
What area is located in between the Mississippi River and the Rocky Mountains?
In which area are a large number of the country's agricultural products grown?
How high does elevation rise in the Great Plains?
What is the only major mountain ranged located between the Appalachian Mountains and the Rocky Mountains?
Which northern country do the Rocky Mountains begin at?
Which northern country do the Rocky Mountains terminate at?
In the US, which region is the highest by elevation?
In which state are the highest peaks of the Rocky Mountains found?
What is the name of the plateau that lies west of the Rocky Mountains?
What is the name of the large southern portion of the Intermontane Plateaus?
What type of flats compose the Great Basin?
What region is centered around the Four Corners?
What is the name of the range where the Intermontane plateaus end?
Which mountain range contains Mount Whitney?
What type of mountains compose the Cascades?
What is the largest point in the Sierra Nevadas?
How tall is Mount Whitney?
What are two national parks located in the mountainous regions?
What is the name of the famous valley located in California?
What is the name of the famous valley located in Oregon?
What are the low mountain ranges that are located along the pacific coast called?
What are the tallest trees in the world?
Why does the Appalachian Highland have the terrain it does?
During what geological period did the Appalachian mountains reach their highest formation point?
What is the name of the mountaneous region along the Atlantic cost. 
What originally covered the east coast of the Appalachians?
What are the two branches of the Cordilleran system?
Which two major rivers are located in the Cordilleran system?
Which region of the Appalachians is the most arid?
What is one of the two major highlands that stretch from the gulf of mexico to the Arctic ocean?
How far north do the Interior Highlands reach?
Which two nations are the central plains divided in?
Where does the Mississippi discharge?
What is the climate like in the Southern United States?
Hawaii has what type of climate?
Which state is known for its Mediterranean climate?
What contributed to the rise of the US as a world power?
What is the climate like in most areas of the US?
Which region of the US receives the most amount of rainfall?
What is the average amount of rainfall that the Quinault rainforest in Washington receives?
Which regions in the East receives the most amount of snowfall?
Which state receives an average of 460 inches of rainfall per year?
What is the name of the desert that is located in the driest region in the US?
Where are tornadoes most common on Earth?
During which seasons are tornados most common?
Which regions experience the worst flooding in the US?
Which region experiences the worst droughts in the US?
What type of disasters affects the western US every year?
What is the area in the pacific known for heavy volcanic activity?
Which Hawaiin volcano has been erupting since 1983?
The Pacific Ring of Fire contains what percentage of the earthquakes on Earth?
When was the last time that the Hawaiin islands experienced a life threatening volcanic eruption?
What year did Mt St. Helens erupt causing devastating damage?
When did Audio CDs become available for purchase?
What does CD stand for?
What does SVCD stand for?
What were CD's originally created to store?
What does SVCD stand for?
In what year were compact discs realesed for purchase?
What was the original intended format for CDs?
In what year were digital and physical music sales the same?
How many CDs had been distrubuted worldwide by 2007?
In 2004 how many CDs had been sold around the world?
What percent decrease did audio CD sales experience?
What has caused a decrease in CD sales?
In 2004 how many CDs had been sold around the world?
How many CDs had been distrubuted around the world by 2007?
What has caused a decrease in CD sales?
Who created Compact Disc prototypes in the 1970s?
How lond did the creation of Red Book CD-DA standard take?
To what does the compact disc owe its prosperity?
How many CD players were sold in the United States in their first year?
What did the CD evolve from?
What made it possible for CDs to be played on any companies CD player?
What year did CD players become available for purchase?
To what does the compact disc owe its prosperity?
In what year did Philips institute a laboratory to create a digital audio disc?
What was the proposed diameter for the original compact disc?
What year did Philips propse the idea of a digital audio format?
Who was the director of the Philips audio division in 1974?
In what year did Sony and Philips band together to design a new digital audio disc?
What year was the Red Book CD-DA standard released?
When did the IEC isntigate the Red Book CD-DA as an international standard?
Who headed the 1979 Sony and Philips digital audio disc task force?
Who first sold a million copies on CD?
Which artist was the first to have their full catalogue converted to CD?
What year was the Dire Straits album Brothers in Arms released?
How many studio albums did David Bowie release in February 1985?
How many CDs were mass produced in 1988?
How many studio albums did David Bowie release in February 1985?
What does ROM stand for?
What year did Sony and Philips release CD-Recordable?
What was the original intended format for CDs?
What year was the 73rd AES Convention?
What was the CDs predecessor?
What was the CDs predecessor?
When did CD sales experience their original decline?
What portion of music sales did CDs and DVDs account for in the United States as of 2012?
Which country attributes over 80 percent of its music sales to physical formats?
How are MP3s compressed?
When did CD sales experience their original decline?
What has caused a decrease in CD sales?
How are CDs mass produced?
What type of material is used to make CDs?
What size is the diameter of the center hole in a CD?
How long does it take to stamp out one CD?
What is the term for the center hole in a CD?
What materials can be used to make the reflective layer on a CD?
What type of light is used to cure CDs?
What is a glass master?
How are glass masters created?
What is the term for a negative image of the glass master?
How is the positive image on a CD protected? 
How is lacquer distrubted on a CD?
What is the priciest component of a CD?
Why did the cost of audio music increase when the production costs decreased?
What did CDs retail for in 1995?
Who received the most profit from the sale of CDs?
How much did a jewel case cost in 1995?
How long are CDs expected to last?
What can cause sudden disc degradation?
Are CDs meant for permanent or temporary use?
What does SCMS stand for?
What does DRM stand for?
What does AHRA stand for?
What type of CD is intended to be used in a Consumer audio CD Recorder?
Which is less expensive, the ReWritable Audio CD or a CD-RW?
How fast could the first ReWritable CD be written?
Which CD has writing speeds betwen 4x and 12x?
How fast can Ultra Speed+ CDs write?
How fast can Ultra Speed CDs write?
Where is the semiconductor laser found in a CD player?
What wavelenght is used to pull data from a CD?
What is used to discern the change of intensity in light on a CD?
In what pattern is data stored on a CD?
What createds the change in light reflected off of a CD?
Where can one expect to find damage on a disc?
How are scratches on a CD fixed?
What eats at the plastic and aluminum found in CDs?
Where does the fungus Geotrichum candidum originate from?
Where is the start of data on a CD?
What size CD is most frequently used?
What is the size of a Mini CD?
What is the size of a Maxi Single?
Who was the Sony Executive in 1980?
Where does the Red Book get it's name from?
What is the formal name for a CD? 
Do CDs have a two or four channel format?
What format has never been implemented on CDs?
How is graphics information read from a CD+ Graphics?
What is the primary use of Compact Disc + Graphics?
Which channels does the CD+G use to hold graphics data?
How much video can a CD-R contain?
Which has better resolution, a VCD or SVCD?
How are lengthy videos fit onto SVCDs?
What is the maximum amount of video a SVCD can properly hold?
How many images could Photo CDs initially contain?
When were Photo CDs initially released?
Who created Photo CDs?
What type of paper can Photo CD images be produced on?
In what book are Photo CD standards defined?
When did record companies first attempt to protect their CDs from copying?
Who said that protected CDs are not allowed to carry the CDDA logo?
Where does the Red Book mention copy protection?
What is the use of a transistor?
What is a transistor made of?
Why does a transistor increase a signal?
What is the minimum amount of external connection terminals to call an item a transistor?
Where are most transistors found?
When was the first transistor created?
Who invented the first transistor?
When was the first transistor implemented for practical use?
When did the implementers receive a Nobel Prize for making the transistor?
What list is the transistor on?
When was the thermionic triode invented?
What was the purpose of the thermionic triode?
Who filed a patent for the field-effect transistor?
Where did Lilienfeld file his patent?
What year did Lilienfeld file his patent?
Why is a transistor so useful?
What is gain?
What is an additional use of the transistor?
What determines the amount of current in an electrically controlled switch?
How many types of transistors are there?
What controls the large current between the collector and emitter?
What are the components of a field-effect transistor?
In a field-effect transistor, what controls the current between the source and drain?
What are the components of a bipolar transistor?
Why does the collector voltage drop in grounded-emitter transistor circuits?
What would happen if the voltage difference from collector and emitter were zero?
What is the term for a zero difference between collector and emitter?
Why is the term saturation named as such?
What position is the switch in when saturated?
What is a major problem with using bipolar transistors as switches?
What does the transistor provide?
What determines the current ratio in transistors?
If the type of transistor is the same what determines the current ratio?
How are parameters chosen in a switching circuit?
What is a switching circuit trying to simulate when on?
What is a switching circuit trying to simulate when off?
How quickly does the change from open circuit to short circuit happen?
How are FET's separated?
At what point is a channel off in enhancement-mode?
At what point is a channel on in depletion-mode?
What channel corresponds with high current?
What channel corresponds with low current?
What was the most frequently used transistor in the 1960s and 70s?
Why were BJTs so popular?
What are some applications of discrete MOSFETs?
What were the most popular digital circuits of the time?
What is the Pro Electron standard?
How many letters does the part numbering scheme begin with?
What is the first letter in the part numbering scheme?
What is the second letter in the part numbering scheme?
What follows the 2 letters in the part numbering scheme?
What was once an indicator of the devices creator?
What makes a manufacturer's prefix less reliable?
What is the marking for a 2N2222A in a plastic case?
What is a plastic version of a BC108?
What is a discrete transistor?
What are the two most common types of transistor?
What is the newest surface-mount transistor?
What is another name for the surface-mount transistor?
What is a ball grid array composed of?
What did many people in the Pre-Modern era express their faith through?
What were Religious officials perceived as in the Pre-Modern era?
Through whom did the general masses have access to the divine?
What belief did ancient cultures consider sacred?
How were the moral standards of ancient cultures enforced?
Who were spiritual intermediates? 
Peoples sense of worth was expressed through what in the Pre-modern era?
Through who did the masses have access to the divine?
What did social order mandate be strictly enforced?
What belief was considered sacred by ancient civilizations?
What term was created in the 1930's to separate the middle ages form the 1800's?
The 1800"s are referred to as?
What do the terms "Early Modern" and  'Modern Ages" originate from?
What does the term "Early Modern" mean?
When was the term "Early Modern" implemented into the English language?
What time period is referred to as The Late Enlightenment?
Where do the terms "Middle Ages" and "Modern Ages" originate from?
In what era were there many socio-technological trends?
The 21st century is refereed to as what?
What device was used most during the The Information age?
What was a major concern for Western civilization during the 21 century?
In what time were there many socio-technological trends?
What is the 21st century also known as?
What device was used most during 21st century?
What was considered a threat to Western civilization?
Who controlled the Asian Sphere during the period between 1600-1868?
What is the period between 1600-1868 referred to as?
What is the Edo period also known as?
What is time is considered the "Modern Period" in Korea?
Name one of the tribes Native Americans established in the Americas.
What two groups controlled the Asian Sphere?
What time is referred to as the Edo period?
What is the 'Early Modern period" known as in Japan?
Name one of the tribes Native Americans formed in the Americas?
Name one of the reasons urbanization grew in China.
What did Nanjing and Beijing contribute to?
What are Nanjing and Beijing?
Under what rule was China not isolated?
During The Early MIng Dynasty Chinese merchants explored all of what?
What caused urbanization to increase in China?
Where did Chinese merchants explore? 
What was society based on during the Tukugawa period?
Strict class hierarchy was established by who?
What group were considered to be at the top of the Strict Class Hierarchy?
How were taxes charged during the Tukugawa period?
What effect did  having taxes charged at a fixed amount have on it's revenue?
What is the Tokugawa period also known as?
What was society in  the Tokugawa period based in?
What group was considered at the top of the Strict Class Society?
What effect did the way the taxes were charged have on it's revenue.
How were taxes charged in the Tokugawa period?
Who ruled most of India in the early 18th century?
How did the "Classic Period" end?
Who was behind the death off Emperor Aurangzeb?
Where was the The Maratha Empire centralized?
Who ruled most of India in the 18 century?
What event ended the "classic period"?
What caused the death of Emperor Auranzeb? 
Where was the Maratha Empire centralized?
What caused the Maratha Empire to split in 1761?
What did the development of new imperialism cause?
When did the commercial colonization of India begin?
What happened n the battle of Plassey?
When was the British East Company given the right to collect revenue?
What is the term used to describe the "Right to collect revenue"?
In what year did the Maratha states lose to the British East Company?
What was the name of the war lost by the Maratha states in 1818?
How long did the British east Indian Company rule last after the war?
What caused the British east Indian Company rule to end?
What did Britain establish in 1824?
What dispatched of The Dutch East India Company and the British East India Company?
What country did not have to succumb to forign rule?
Who also profited from Southeast Asia resources?
In what year did the fall of Constantinople happen? 
When is the modern period dated in England?
Who was defeated by Henry Vll at the battle of Bosworth?
What bridged the middle ages to the modern era?
What is regarded as the start of modern philosophy? 
What does the Age of Rationalism succeed? 
What is 17th century philosophy also referred to as?
What did the beginning of the 18th century mark the beginning of in Europe? 
From where does the phrase humanist originate? 
What is the basic training of a humanist?
Where did Enlightenment gain momentum?
What was the age of Enlightenment centered on?
What did renaissance humanism reference?
renaissance humanism was antagonistic to what?
What did renaissance humanism place an emphasis on?
What did the Scientific Revolution cause?
What s the Scientific Revolution?
What did the Scientific Revolution force people to do?
What happened to the king after the trial?
Who else was involved in the warfare?
name an event that can be contributed to the revolution.
What characterized the Napoleonic Era?
Where was Napoleon Bonaparte born?
Where was Napoleon Bonaparte die? 
Why were Europe's Empires and Kingdoms dispatched?
From where did the French empire rule a large portion of Europe?
What event did the American revolution cause?
How did the Thirteen Colonies become The United States Of America?
Why did the United States form independent states?
Who did the Second Continental Congress join together against?
What is the armed conflict form 1775 to 1783 is known as?
Where did the American Revolution start?
What was issued on July 4, 1776?
What did the Declaration Of Independence proclaim?
What position was Ben Franklin appointed in 1776?
What was Ben Franklin disabled by? 
What is the decolonization of the Americas? 
When did the decolonization of the Americas begin?
What were the Spanish wars directly linked to?
When did the wars against Spanish rule occur?
When did the first industrial revolution merge into the second? 
The 19th century was also known as? 
What was the second industrial revolution was labeled?
What caused technological and economical progress?
What is industrialization? 
industrialization is a subdivision of what general process?
During industrialization a human group is turned into what?
In what fields did achievements occur during the revolution?
What did the advancements during the revolution improve for people?
What did Lewis Paul invent?
In what period did James Lewis invent the 'Roller Spinning"?
Who improved the steam engine?
Thomas Edison is credited with?
How many volts did Thomas Edison's electrical supply provide?
What Did Thomas Edison switch to in 1882?
How many customers were supplied by Thomas Edison's electrical supply network?
Where was Thomas Edison's electrical supply network located?
When did the European revolutions occur?
How many people were estimated to be killed in the revolutions? 
What are European revolutions known as in other countries?
In what country did the revolutions begin?
What did the reformers look to to solve social problems?
What is Newton Natural philosophy?
What did Newton's Nataural philosophy replace?
What did defeating Napoleon leave Britain without?
Why did Britain adopt the role of Global Policemen?
Britain adopting the role as global policeman is known as
What was Britain's foreign policy called?
Britain's dominant position in the world trade allowed them to do what?
What was British imperial strength replace by?
What was the British Empire linked by in 1982?
When were the steamship and the telegraph invented?
How many people were added to the British Empire by 1922?
When did the British establish colonies in Australia?
The Bourbon Restoration followed what event?
What is the Bourbon Restoration? 
What is the July Monarchy? 
What is the second empires?
Through what period did the second empire last?
What was the Meija era marked by?
How did Japan rise to be a world power during the Meja era?
When did the Meija restoration begin?
What does "Meija era"
What did Irokawa Daikichi act out against?
Laws mandated that every able bodies Japanese citizen do what?
Who initially rejected the Japanese laws mandating military service?
Who did the Japanese form their military  forces after?
What did the peasant class name the mandatory military service law?
Where was the military academy located?
What happened in the Glided Age/
In what time period did the Glided Age occur?
Where did the wealth of the Glided Age come form?
What did Financiers refer to rich industrialist as?
What type of practices did John D. Rockefeller exhibit in the oil industry?
When was the enlightenment of spiritual philosophy challenged?
What were Humanist ethical philosophy's developed from?
Why did Kari Marx criticize Humanist Philosophy's? 
What did Friedrinch Netzsche consider Humanism to be?
Why does Friedrinch Netzsche believe human rights exist?
What is Albert Einstein known for? 
What did Einstein add to the Brownman Motion?
What did Einstein discover a resolution to?
What theory  did Einstein have reservations about?
What is the federation of Australia?
What was the federal Government responsible for? 
When did the colonies collectively become a part of the Commonwealth  of Australia?
What were the last days of the Qing dynasty marked by? 
What did the Qing dynasty attempt to do n the face of civil unrest? 
What happened to The reformers in the Qing dynasty? 
What caused the revolution against the Qing dynasty?
When was the Republic of China established?
What did China agree to avoid the undermining of the Republic?
Who had control of the Beiyang army?
Who was Inaugurated in Nanjing as the first provisional president? 
Who was sworn in as the second provisional president of the republic of China?
What happened to China after the 20th century revolutions?
Who ultimately gained control of the Beijing government?
Why was there not a new era of governance in Beijing? 
What were the military dominated governments known as?
When did the warlord era end?
When dd the Russo-Japanese war take place?
What did the battle of Port Arthur establish?
What were the Russians hoping to find in the pacific ocean?
Why did the Manchurian Campaign fight the Russians. 
How were the Japanese victories over the Russians views around the world?
What is the Edwardian era?
What event split the United Kingdom into two groups?
In what year did the Liberals win huge in the general election?
What led to a reduction in the power of the peers?
What is The Triple Entente?
When was the Anglo -Russia Entente signed?
What was the origin of the war?
Who was murdered in Austria?
The Triple Entente served as a counter to what agreement? 
In what century did the Nationalistic revolutions occur?
How many years after world war I did world war II start?
What withdrew the political boundaries of West Asia?
Who did The League of Nations grant  France mandates over?
What did the partitioning of the Otto Empire bring about? 
What event happened in October of 1917?
What happened when Nicholas II was removed from power?
What happened during the red faction revolution?
What is the Russian Revolution?
When was the armistice signed between Russia and Central powers?
What did Central powers concede in exchange for peace?
Who did the Bolsheviks make peace with?
What were Vladimir Lenin's decisions caused by? 
Who did the German sponsorship of Lenin's Petrograd upset?
Where did Soviets under the rule of the  Bolshevik first assume power during the Russian Civil War?
In the wake of the October resolution, what happened to the Russian Imperial Army?
What was Bolshevik's main military force?
How did the Red red Army overcome their foes?
How were former Tsarist Officers utilized? 
Who was the principal fighting between?
In what time period did the most brutal battles occur?
What general was defeated in 1920?
When did the major military operation end?
Where did the last Resistance from the White movement occur?
What did the May Fourth movement help do?
Sun Yat-Sen became the leader of what military group.
What did Sun Yat-Sen hope to get from western democracies?
Who did Sun Yet-Sen turn in 1930 for help?
How did the Soviets try to befriend  the Chinese Revolutionist?
What is the "Roaring Twenties" ?
What is the "Roaring Twenties" also known as?
Where did the "Roaring Twenties" begin?
Where did the "Roaring Twenties"  spread to after the war?
what did the "Jazz Age" usher in? 
What changed worldwide property drasrically?
In what year did The wall Street crash occur?
When did the great Depression end?
What is the Great Depression?
The great depression is the worst economic downturn of what century?
Where did the depression cause negative effects?
How much did international trade fall?
What happened to construction during the Depression?
How far did crop prices fall?
Who was first to invade Manchuria?
What is the Abyssinian crisis?
What is Abyssinia?
When did the Abyssinian crisis occur?
Who did The League try to force economic sanctions on?
Where did Japan attack the United States?
What countries were referred to as "The Trusteeship Of The Powerful"?
When did the attack on Pearl Harbor occur?
What did The United Nations name "The Trusteeship Of The Powerful"
Who were the victors of World War II? 
What Was estimated amount of deaths during the war?
What percent of the deaths during the war were civilians?
What countries suffered the most casualties in the war?
What percentage of it's population did Poland lose in the war?
How many deaths did the Soviet Union suffer in the war?
What is the Holocaust?
During what word event did the Holocaust happen? 
Who is responsible for the Holocaust? 
How did the Nazis conjure up anti-Semitic feelings in civilians?
When did the suffering of the Jews begin?
What was Europe split into after World War II?
Who battled in the cold war?
What does the term NATO represent?
What did the defeat of Japan mean for Asia?
What did China name themselves after the war?
By what percentage did the world's per-capita gross domestic product grow by during the 20th century?
What has Modern medicine increased the average life expectancy by?
What happened to the income gap between the rich and the poor?
What did the media industry make possible in the middle of the century?
What did the brutal dictatorships caused by the media lead to?
What did increased communications lead contribute to?
What time period did technological advances lead to?
what did the Soviet Union annex some of it's territory as?
What did the territory the Soviet Union maintained as satellite states, later became known as?
The United States and many Western countries began what policy to fight communism?
What did the soviets opposed rebuilding?
What actions of the Soviet Union did The United States oppose?
During what time was the cold war close to happening?
What did  the Reagan administration increase on the Soviet Union?
What was  the Soviet Union suffering from in the 1980's?
What did Mikhail Gorbachev introduce?
In what year did the Soviet Union collapse?
What is the space age?
Who launched  Sputnik 1?
How long does did it take for the Sputnik 1 to orbit the earth?
What did Sputnik 1 usher in?
How many people watched the Apollo 11 landing?
What types of control are considered when labeling a country with the perjorative "51st state" label?
Sometimes, when a country refers to themselves as the 51st state, what has happened to their culture?
What reasoning would cause a country to be referred to as the "51st state" in a positive way?
What is a positive connotation of the label "51st state"?
What is a reason for one negative connotation of the term?
If a country refers to themselves as the "51st state" after cultural changes, what can we assume has changed?
What does Article IV, Section three of the US Constitution outline?
Article IV, Section Three of th United States Constitution gives Congress the power to do what?
What does the states' requirement to give "full faith and credit" help recognize?
What are all states guaranteed by the federal government?
What does Article 4, Section 4 guarantee?
What part of the US Constitution outlines the relationship among the states?
What does the concept of "full faith and credit" protect?
Article IV, Section Three allows Congress to do what?
What is guaranteed to the states by the federal government?
What country has been regarded as a potential new addition to the United States?
What percentage of voters expressed dissatisfaction with their current political relationship?
What percentage of voters supported statehood?
When did Puerto Rico resolve to request that the United States act on these results?
What would be an ideal reaction from the United States, according to Puerto Rico?
What territory has been suggested as a new addition to the United States?
What percentages of voters expressed unhappiness with the current political relationship between the U.S. and Puerto Rico?
When did the legislature of Puerto Rico request that they be considered for statehood?
How long has Puerto Rico had representation in Congress?
Who represents Puerto Rico in Congress?
Which Congress gave the commissioner the power to vote?
What is the commissioner not allowed to vote on?
How was the Puerto Rican constitution brought about?
When was the Puerto Rican constitution written?
When was the constitution accepted by the electorate, U.S. Congress, and U.S. President?
What clause gives Puerto Rican citizens the same rights as US citizens?
What percentage of voters rejected the status of territory?
What percentage of voters preferred statehood?
What percentage of voters abstained from voting on a preferred alternative status?
What argument do those opposing statehood use?
When was H.R. 2000 introduced?
What did Senator Heinrich's bill require?
What would happen in the event of a yes vote in this referendum?
What would H.R. 2000 do?
Who considered the implications of the definition of the seat of government in the Constitution?
Where are these ideas located in the Federalist Papers?
What limits does the constitution have for the size of Washington, D.C.?
What caused the size of Washington, D.C. to change?
What Revolutionary War motto have Washington, D.C. statehood supporters modified and used?
What does the phrase protest?
In what way has the phrase been spread wide?
When did  Obama have the protest plates put on his Presidential limousine?
What party carried the position of D.C. Statehood?
What party did the D.C. Statehood Party merge when?
When did the movement get closest to success?
What would be the new name of the D.C. State?
When did the drive for statehood falter?
What is another likely country for statehood?
What is another likely country for statehood?
What entity reported on Guam and the Northern Mariana Islands becoming one again?
What country had small grassroots movement for US Statehood?
What party used to be known as the Federalista Party?
What was the most recent year of the Phillipines pushing for statehood?
What is another connotation for the 51st state label?
When was the Canada-US Free Trade Agreement enacted?
When was the Charlottetown Accord signed?
When did the Clarity Act go into effect?
When did Quebec land in British hands?
When did Ontario land in British hands?
During which the US invade Canada?
What did several US politicians suggest doing in the 19th century?
When were the last days of the Dominion of Newfoundland?
What did the Economic Union Party support?
What was the result of the 1948 referendum?
When did Panama have the US-ruled Canal Zone Territory?
When did El Salvador adopt the US Dollar as its currency?
When did the British Honduras become Belize?
Why is Israel referred to as the 51st state?
What book did Martine Rothblatt publish?
When was Two Stars for Peace published?
Who wrote the book The American State of Canaan?
Who is the mayor of Tirana?
Who said that Albania is the most pro-American country in Europe?
When did James Baker visit Albania as Secretary of State?
What is the name of the largest US military base outside of US territory?
When did the US control Greenland?
How much did the US offer to pay for Greenland?
What university is professor Gudmundur Alfredssson from?
What are the four categories of terra nullius?
What three treaties exist for unclaimed lands?
Where is Bir Tawil located?
What device is able to change electric powerinto radio waves and also do the reverse?
What device is often used in conjuntion with the antenna?
What process associated with antennas produces a high frequency alternating current?
What else can radio waves be called?
When does an antenna catch electromagnetic waves?
What is frequently used to connect elements to the receiver?
During transmission does the electric field wave move closer to the antenna?
What particles are pushed through the antenna by a transmitter?
During what process would electrons be vacillating in the antenna?
What is an acceptable synonym for antenna?
What can sometimes be meant by the term aerial specifically?
What is one way of referring to more than one antenna?
What is the most widely accepted term for an electrical device that converts electric power into radio waves?
Who is most associated with the emergence of the word antenna?
When did experimentation with electromagnetic waves begin?
What is a way to increase the strength of a radio transmission?
How far was Marconi able to get his signal to go using this technique?
What is essential for the mating of the elements that create radio waves?
How fast are signals produced by antenna transmitted?
What is one system that uses electromagnetic waves?
What mobile locator and direction finder technology takes advantage of radio waves?
What often inconspicuous part of a laptop computer allows for internet usage?
What is the main element of an omnidirectional antenna?
What type of antenna would most likely be a half a wavelength long?
In which direction would you expect to find a dipole?
What is meant by the area where signals cannot be accepted well along the conductor?
Are basic antennas expensive?
What is the foundation most often used when creating new antenna models?
What category do vertical antennas fall under?
What is used to close the circuit of a dipole antenna?
What are different designs aimed at increasing?
What is different from a monopole antenna with most other antenna types?
Gain when referring to an antenna refers to what about radiated power?
Where is the power that is distributed originating from?
How many antenna would make up a phased array?
What determines if the antenna creates a broadside array or an end fire array?
What are the two standard antenna types?
How are antennas oriented when arranged with specific spacing?
What type of antenna formation is made up of multiple dipole elements of varying lengths?
What is the benefit of this formation type?
What is a variation of this antenna type?
What is the main application of these set ups?
For radio broadcast that one would hear in their car what type of towers are used?
If one wished to take an antenna to different locations, which type would be best?
Why is this specific antenna type used?
What is a problem one might encounter when using a portable antenna?
What is mainly responsible for the connection of the antenna to its end destinations?
What is the group of elements used to join the elements of an antenna?
What are the type of antennas used with satellite television called?
What can be used in place of  a standard transmission line?
Monopole antennas consist of what element?
What are small monopoles used as?
What the most common form? 
What has vertical polarization?
What is the most widley used antenna class?
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                 What radiates two lobes perpendicular to the antennas axis?                                                                                                                                       
Besides low gain antennas, what is also used as driven elements in complicated higher gain types of antennas?
How much gain does a half-wave dipole have?
What must be true of the antenna and transmission medium for the repiprocity rule to apply ?
What is one material that does not have this quality?
How can the lack of this quality be used in an everyday way?
What is called when the direction of the elctrical current does not make a difference to the current?
How could one deide what type of antenna is nedded for a project?
What would most likely be the main concern in making this decision?
How would you distribute power to allow for a greater gain?
What is often the most imprtant crediting factor of antennas?
Which antenna type would be best for a project requiring a specific frequency?
How could an antenna be made to coordinate with the needed frequency?
What factor would result in a desired feedback independence?
If you were unable to choose the antenna you wanted how could you still achieve this result?
What is the essential difference in radio waves transmitted by an antenna?
How can this be adjusted more easily than changing antenna types?
When might the size of an antenna cause an issue?
What size antenna would not be good when the antenna needs to be directional?
There is a relationship between the size of the antenna and the size of the wavelength with what antenna type?
What particle's migration does the resonance principle rely on?
What is the basis for the way most antennas are developed?
What type of surface is formed by the tip of a conductor?
How would you place the conductor in relation to the signal you wished to obtain?
How do quarter wave elements act in relation to a series relevant electrical element?
What frequency develops a current peak?
How would you describe a current that has maximum efficiency?
What could be the best possible output versus input ratio?
 If your were unable to match the source frequency with the design frequency of the antenna what could you use?
What is the most common application of resonant antennas?
What antenna setup type is generally used for TV viewing?
For use with more than one channel changes are made to increase what property?
What accounts for the geometry involved in the use of an antenna?
 How is the compactness of the signal measured?
What type of project would call for more than one element used together?
What can take advantage of these elements to add more gain?
Does this device improve the operation of the antenna?
What is the name for passive elements nearer to the source of the signal?
Adding more elements to a Yagi-Uda would have what effect?
What can be paired with transmission lines to create phases that would support output?
What is the most common element used to create a single in phase signal?
What must be precise in order to create this signal at output?
What is a more complicated occurrence of the single in-phase producing antenna?
What magnifies the small radiation resistance of a loop?
What is resonated by a capacitor along with the receiver tuning that maintains resonance over the AM broadcast band?
What is used in most AM broadcaster receivers?
When using a small loop antenna at a low frequency, what may occur?
What is left after antenna tuning?
Where does cancellation of any reactance seen?
What can be used to cancel a inductibe reactance or residual capacitative?
What is an antenna designed to have?
What type of antenna has impedance at a specific frequency?
What term can be used to refer to the usable spectrum of an antennas frequency?
What causes the frequencies outside of the bandwidth to be unusable?
What is lessened by the Yagi-Uda design?
What characteristic of the conductor changes the amount of reactance?
What characteristic would be better if it were steady?
What would be used to create a half wave or quarter wave dipole?
What type of tubes are generally used for sturdier always of antennas?
What effect do cages have on the spectrum of usable frequencies?
What type of tubes are generally used for sturdier always of antennas?
How could one achieve the task of creating an antenna that can be Used over various bands?
What is an essential for dealing with directing the flow of power?
What is an acknowledgement of the range of possible direction for and antenna?
What is another way to refer to an antennas gain?
What is the meaning of intensity?
What type of an antenna would offer the same level of power to each possible destination?
Antennas with higher gain have what positive feature?
What is a measure of how much efficient is improved by adding a device designed to make something stronger?
Dish network Tv takes example of what type of antenna?
What type of antenna would be best if placement was tricky?
A plot of the radiation behaviors of an antenna would show what?
What type of pictoral aid is often used to show this?
 A sphere shows what type of antennas radiation?
Dipoles are considered to be what antenna type?
What would an omnidirectional antenna look like if plotted?
What is the term that refers to areas where an antennas radiation is zero? 
What do radio waves do that account for maxima or nulls in an antenna pattern?
If you desired to project radio waves to the south, what part of the antenna would you build larger in that direction?
What is the main distinction of side lobes?
What is one piece that makes up an antenna system?
What is created by a portion of a radio waves energy reversing?
A term that refers to the highs and lows of power in electro magnetic waves is?
Impedance matching makes an important difference in what antenna function?
A measure of the power that is useable and the power absorbed by the terminals?
What happens to the power that is not absorbed by the antenna?
What can cause that reaction?
What can cause that reaction?
What would need to be placed into the transmitter to create ten W oh warmth? 
What would need to be investigated to determine how much power was radiated?
What factor may play a hand in lessened power from a transmitter?
What can increase the feedpoint impedance of a component?
The addition of Rr and Rloss equals what?
What equation an determine an antennas effectiveness?
What is the single factor that can be precisely measured?
What is the median level for measuring atmospheric noise?
In what type of programs would low efficiency antennas not make a difference in effectiveness?
At lesser frequencies what can account for incorrect assumptions about efficiency?
What is SNR?
What else is also known as power gain?
What is used to signal toward a reciever?
Which gain does not iclude the effect of an antenna?
Wats divided by the antennas efficiency?
How many polarizations will a antenna have when mounted vertically?
What is another name for electric-field?
When is a magnetic fields right angles to a electrical field?
Whats understood in reference of direction of an E-plane?
What mostly affects polarization?
What reflector can change the waves polarization?
What will you be matching with the  receiving antenna's polarization?
What stays the same regarding polarization state at the recieving location?
What is the name used for signals recieved following reflection by the ionosphere?
Whats predictable about an antenna's geometry?
The polarization of what antenna is essential specification?
Most rooftop antenna's are polarized in which direction?
What is a more complicated type of polarization from an antenna's geometry?
What are electrical fields projected on to?
What is the imagenary plane perpindicular to?
What is the name to describe polarization of radio waves varies over times?
How many directions does the E-plane of the radio waves oscillates back and forth?
What is the best for an recieving antenna for optimum reception?
What loses signal strength?
What is used to match vertical and horizontal linear polarizations?
A transmission can cause reduction in what?
What requires matching of the empedance to an antenna system?
Why would a transmitter have additional adjustments?
What is SWR?
What is the desired design value for transmmiting circuitry?
What can be shorter than 1/4 wavelength long?
What is the opposite of inductive reactance?
What is at the base of the antenna?
Where is the resistance seen on the loading foil?
What is not adjustable when it comes to a transformer?
How many ohms are in are in a standard coax?
A general matching network needs a minimum of how many adjustments to correct all components of impedance?
What is included between the transmission line and the antenna element?
A balun should be integrated into what?
What antenna's are nonresonant?
How long are the wire antenna's that the voltage and current waves travel in the same direction?
What are undirectional traveling wave directions terminated by?
What antenna does not have linear polarization?
What is the resistor equal to?
What is the radiation patter influenced by?
The ground is important for what antenna?
Whats another name for the ground?
What does the artificial ground plane do for the antenna current?
What is the net quality of the ground dependent of?
What is the reason for the receiver seeing both the ral antenna and image of the antenna?
What frequencies is associated with shorter wavelengths?
When will reflections not be coherent?
The properties of a usable radio frequency can be called its?
What is a measure of the comparison between reactance and resistance?
What is the largest Q that could be achieved with a slimmer band antenna?
What type of element would be used to encounter less reactance?
How big would an antenna be used to with with one m wavelengths?
How could the rection of output be adressed by?
 What unit is used to measure current?
What effect occurs when the signal is reflected back into the antenna?
What sort of changes in material would a current reflect?
 What must match between the transmission line and elements?
What technique is used to prevent unintentional decrease in signal?
How is this process usually used for transmission lines and antennas?
What is used to allow one to control the function of wave fronts moving through an antenna?
What changes the structuak traits of a wave on either side?
What is the main purpose of a refractor?
A refractor can be compared to what type of viewing?
What is another name for classical television transmissions?
Buildings can create ghost images because of what?
When is ghosting reduced?
What cause less problems in digital terrestrial television?
Where are the indiviual array elements known?
What induces a feedpoint to antennas nearby?
What are the mathmatic useful towards?
What cause mutual interactions between the elements electric and magnetic fields?
a antenna element not connected to anything is circuited how?
When is the element not allowed voltage?
What element absorbs and reradiate RF-energy?
What antenna can the solid rod be viewed as a dipole antenna?
Where can this solid rod be viewed?
What type of antenna can be formed by a circular segment of wire?
What is a loop antenna compared with to determine its beahvior?
If you needed to place an antenna somewhere with a large amount of interference, which type would be best?
Why would this type be good for receiving but not transmtting?
What else would be an effective application of this antenna type?
Are essential properties of an antenna changed based on what fungtion they are performing
What proposition explains the equivalency of the recieving pattern of an antenna?
Can the antenna serve more than one fungtion at a time?
What is one electrical trait of an antenna?
What are the most diverse group of land plants?
How many species of flowering plants are there about?
What does an angiosperm produce its seeds within?
What do angiosperms have in common with gymnosperms?
What is the Greek word for "case" or "casing"?
How long have higher plants lived on land?
How did early plants reproduce sexually?
Upright meisporangia allowed what to be dispersed to new habitats?
What are the nearest algal relatives existing today?
What is the common name for Selaginella?
How many distinct rounds of genome duplication events are suspected in the evolution of seed plants?
When did the first whole genome duplication event occur?
What type of event perhaps created the line which led to modern flowering plants?
How are duplication events studied?
Who coined the term "abominable mystery"?
When is the earliest known macrofossil identified as an angiosperm dated?
What is the earliest known angiosperm?
What pushes the age of angiosperm 5 million years further back?
How long ago has circumstantial evidence has been found for the existence of angiosperms?
What group of now extinct seed plants had many of the traits of what are now flowering plants?
When does a great diversity of angiosperms appear in the fossil record?
What is the appearance of a large amount of angiosperms in the fossil record known as?
When did the division of the eight main groups of angiosperms occur?
What were the angiosperms up to by the late Cretaceous?
Beech and maple had already appeared by what period?
What is one proposed explanation for the instant appearance of flowering plants?
What is island genetics thought to be a default source of?
What did radical adaptations seem to have required?
How did an isolated setting like an island help flowering plants evolve?
What are bees descended from?
What are animals also a part of?
What did the enlargement of flower parts evolve to form?
What does a plant get out of forming fruit?
What are many mutualistic relationships, thus failing to survive competition? 
What turned out to be unusually effective for plants to reproduce?
What uses a combination of genes to form new shoots?
What were plant parts like in their primitive days?
How did flowers become bixsexual?
What did some plant parts do as they evolved?
What is a term for a plant with a specific sex per flower?
How long has flower evolution occurred? 
What heritage do many modern domesticated flower species have?
Humans have effected some flowers so much they can no longer do what in nature?
Why did weeds grow with human crops?
What feature helped flowers not get plucked?
What three groups were the first to diverge from angiosperm?
What term refers to the first three groups to diverge from angiosperm?
How clear is the relationship between the broadest of the three non-basal angiosperm groups?
What group do some analyses seem to indicate diverged first?
In taxonomies, what type of group are flowering plants treated?
What does anthophyta mean?
What do the Wettstein and Engler systems use at the assigned rank of subdivision?
How does the APG system of 1998, with its 2003 and 2009 revisions, treat flowering plants?
What formal subclass classification were flowering plants given in 2009?
What consensus is the AGP trying to reach?
What internal component has undergone considerable revision?
What system did Arthur Cronquist put forth in 1968, but not publish in full form until 1981?
Who published an influential reclassification of the angiosperms in 1998?
What type of groups do monocots form, based on a recent APG studies?
Eudicots or tricolpates are part of a monophyletic group formed by what species?
What third major clade can many dicot species be found in?
How many species dicot species are magnoliids?
Basal angiosperms are what type of grouping of primitive species?
What is the estimated range for the number of flowering plants?
How many species of moss is there?
What does the large number of flowering plant species indicate is true of them in general?
What are the minimum number of families in the APG system?
How many families are in AGP III?
What shape are the bundles in the young stem of dicotyledons arranged in?
What does the cambium separate?
What is a layer of meristem or formative tissue known as?
What results from the development of xylem on the inside and phloem on the outside?
What's another name for the concentric rings in trees?
What is the defining feature of angiosperms?
What characteristic flowers show variation in?
What do flowers provide the best external feature for doing?
What is it the function of the flower to ensure fertilization of?
What is the name of a branch system?
What is a willow's flower comprised of?
What have some structures evolved to protect?
What appearance are calyx of sepals typically?
Individual members of enveloping structures are known by what terms?
The features of flowers which attract pollinators also attract what other creature?
What sexual feature do a majority of flowers demonstrate?
Why did flowering plants develop numerous morphological and physiological mechanisms?
Why are a heteromorphic flower's carpels and stamens different lengths?
What type of mechanism might homomorphic flowers use to tell the difference between foreign and self pollen grains?
How are some male and female parts separated for some species?
What process does double fertilization refer to?
What does a pollen grain adhere to, to start the process of double fertilization?
What type of cell travels down the pollen tube while it's growing?
Where does the pollen tube release its sperm cells?
What serves as the embryo's food supply?
The appearance of the seed coat bears a definite relation to that of what?
What does the seed coat protect?
What does the fruit of the flower secure?
How developed is the seed coat when it's used for dissemination?
In what year was Hyderabad established?
Who is the person that established Hyderabad?
What dynasty controlled Hyderabad until the early 18th century?
Which Mughal viceroy created a dynasty in early 18th century Hyderabad?
Which dynasty did Asif Jah I create?
What items had been historically traded in Hyderabad?
What is a nickname for Hyderabad?
What are three historic bazaars in Hyderabad?
What is the economic output of Hyderabad?
What is the rank of Hyderabad among cities contributing to India's GDP?
There may be Iron Age findings near Hyderabad, what age are they thought to be from?
What time period did the Chalukya dynasty rule the Hyderabad region?
When did the Calukya empire split into four?
What was the capital of Golkonda in the mid 12th century?
What was the Hyderabad region known as under the Chalukya dynasty?
Who defeated the Kakatiya dynasty in 1310?
Which entity subsumed the Kakatiya dynasty?
What did the Malik Kafur do to the Kakatiya dynasty in 1321?
When was the Behmani Sultanate established?
In what year did Muhammad bin Tughluq succeed the Delhi sultanate?
What position did Sultan Quli hold?
When was Hyderabad founded?
In what year did the establishment of the Qutb dynasty occur?
In the late 17th century the capital of Deccan Suba was moved, to where?
Whom did Sultan Quli rebel against?
What position did Farrukhsiyar hold?
What official title did the Viceroy of Deccan hold?
Who was the Viceroy of the Deccan under Farrukhsiyar?
In what year was Mubariz Khan defeated by Asif Jah I?
What did Asif Jah I rename Deccan Suba to?
Whom did the Nizam ally with in the late 18th century?
What was the title of Baji Rao I?
What was the title of Hyder Ali?
Which military occupied Hyderabad city in a protection role?
In what year did Hyderabad become the capital of Nizams?
On what date did the Indian Army take control of Hyderabad?
Which uprising occurred from 1946 to 1951?
What was the code name for the Indian Army invasion of Hyderabad?
Which Nizam defeated by the Indian Army?
On what date did the constitution of India become active?
On what date was Hyderabad state divided into three?
Which three states was Hyderabad state divided into?
Hyderabad city became the capital of what state in the mid 20th century?
When was Telangana state announced?
What date was the official formation of Telangana state?
How far south of Delhi, in miles, is Hyderabad?
In what region of the Deccan Plateau is Hyderabad?
How large in square kilometers is Greater Hyderabad?
What are the highest hills in Hyderabad?
When was Hussain Sagar lake built?
What is the name of the largest zoo in Hyderabad?
Hyderabad's largest zoo is known as India's first to have what two kinds of animals in a safari park setting?
How many national parks does Hyderabad have?
Two of the national parks in Hyderabad are Mrugavani National Park, Mahavir Harina Vanasthali National Park, what is the third?
Which environmental preserve in Hyderabad is known to be a home for migratory birds?
What is the entity that controls the infrastructure of Hyderabad?
How many municipal wards are within Hyderabad?
In what year did the GHMC form?
How much area, in square miles, does the GHMC oversee?
Which board oversees military areas within Hyderabad?
Which Hyderabad agency is responsible for the largest area?
What is the HMDA mainly responsible for?
What does the acronym HMDA stand for?
What does the acronym HMWSSB represent?
Hyderabad city can be referred to as something else as administrative agencies are concerned, what?
What dam began to provide water to Hyderabad in 2005?
Along with dealing with sewerage and the water supply, what is one other thing the HMWSSB regulates?
How long is the pipeline from the Nagarjuna Sagar Dam which the HMWSSB operates?
Which company is responsible for electricity in Hyderabad?
Which entity is responsible for the fire stations in Hyderabad?
What are the people who live in Hyderabad called?
There are two main languages spoken by the people of Hyderabad, what are they?
What is the main language of most Muslims from Hyderabad?
Which is the largest ethnic community in Hyderabad?
Hyderabadi is a type of what langauge?
In what region of Hyderabad is Mecca Masjid?
South central Hyderabad is generally the home to what attractions?
On what side of the river is Begum Bazaar?
Where in Hyderabad is the Secunderabad Railway Station?
In what region of Hyderabad city is Jubilee Hills located?
Where in Hyderabad would one find defence centres?
What area in Hyderabad contains the Hyderabad Airport?
Cyberabad contains a national park, what is it?
After a flood in what year did Hyderabad expand?
Which river flooded in 1908, preceding the expansion of Hyderabad?
The Mir Osman Ali Khan had a title, what was it?
What did India declare Hyderabad om 2012?
What type of heritage architecture is mainly displayed in Hyderabad?
In the 18th century there was one global trading hub for large diamonds, what was it?
When did railway expansion in Hyderabad occur?
What did the Hyderabad Stock Exchange come to be known as?
During what era was The Defence Research and Development Organisation founded?
At the end of 2014 what entity would handle the the transaction services for BSE-Mumbai?
In what year was Indian Drugs and Pharmaceuticals Limited established?
In 2010 what percentage of India's bulk pharmaceuticals were produced in Hyderabad?
What percentage of Andhra Pradesh's IT infrastructure exports originated from Cyberabad in 2013?
How many ITES and IT companies are located in HITEC city?
What rank within India was HITEC City given by the World Bank Group in 2009?
In what year did the Hyderabad Literary Festival start?
What is the name of the largest public library in Hyderabad?
What is one of the activities Telugu Academy is credited with encouraging?
In what year was the biggest public library in Hyderabad created?
What is the Deccan region known for culturally?
What is a tawaif?
What kind of music is dholak ke geet?
What entity is responsible for the Taramati Music Festival?
During the rule of what two groups did dance and music from North India become popular?
What type of art might one encounter at Lalithakala Thoranam?
What is Numaish?
What is a popular name for the Telugu film industry?
Where was the Telugu film industry ranked in 2012 in India in comparison to Bollywood?
What did Guinness World Records say of Ramoji Film City was in 20015?
Golconda is a type of what kind of painting?
In what century did Golconda painting develop?
What type of colors would one generally find in Golconda painting?
In what century did Hyderabad style painting develop?
What types of scenes does Hyderabad style painting generally contain?
In which century did metalwork become popular in Hyderabad?
Under which act is the Geographical Indication tag granted?
What is Zardozi an example of?
What is Kalamkari?
In what style is Kalamkari made?
What type of foods are generally thought of as a part of Hyderabadi cuisine?
What is a large influence on Hyderabadi food?
What is kaddu ki kheer?
What types of cuisine are noted within Hyderabadi haleem?
When was The Deccan Times founded?
What is The Deccan Chronicle?
What type of paper is The Siasat Daily?
What year was the first radio station in Hyderabad formed?
On what date did the first public radio station in Hyderabad begin broadcasting?
When did Doordarshan begin broadcasting in Hyderabad?
What satellite network began broadcasting to Hyderabad in July 1992?
In what year did the general public first get access to the internet in Hyderabad?
The first private company to offer Hyderabad internet service began offering it in what year?
What is Doordarshan?
What entity controls the schools in Hyderabad?
What percentage of students are in private schools in Hyderabad?
Which languages are used for teaching in the schools of Hyderabad?
What type of educational plan does the Central Board of Secondary Education use in Hyderabad?
Students in Hyderabad may be required to acquire one of two different certificates, one is  the Secondary School Certificate, what is the other?
How many universities are in Hyderabad?
Of the universities in Hyderabad how many are state run?
Maulana Azad National Urdu University is a type of university that represents what type of university?
In 1982 the first long distance university was opened in India, what is it's name?
What year was Osmania University formed?
Ghulam Ahmed and Shivlal Yadav are what kind of sportsmen?
What sport does Sania Mirza play?
Who is a notable bodybuilder from Hyderabad?
Gagan Narang does what sporting activity?
Pullela Gopichand and Saina Nehwal are known in Hyderabad for being what?
What type of transport that is not government owned is commonly used in Hyderabad?
How many people are carried each day by the bus service network in Hyderabad?
What is the light rail system in Hyderabad known as?
How many passengers use the Hyderabad light rail system each day?
What is Setwin otherwise known as?
How many national highways form a junction in Hyderabad?
How many states are linked to from highways in Hyderabad?
How many miles long is NH-7?
How many state highways pass through or begin in Hyderabad?
What road connects Hyderabad to Bhopalpatnam?
What ethic group grew in the 20th century?
What other ethic minority did white american's treat poorly?
What type of Village was located on the Long Wharf?
How many ethnic minorities were looked at differently in Santa Monica?
What role did the fishing village play in Santa Monica?
Who built a plant in Clover field?
What company was the structure at Clover Field for?
What did Clover Field built airplanes attempt the first of?
The Douglas Company had facilities in Santa Monica through what decade?
How Many Planes returned from the circumnavigation in 1924?
What year was the Sanat Monica Pier buildt?
What historic landmark is located on the Pier?
La Monica Ballroom used to be what type of ballroom in the United States?
Where were the Academy Awards held in the 1960's?
What place is still considered a prominent acoustic performance area?
The Third Street Promenade is located in what part of Santa Monica?
How large is the Third Street Promenade?
What is Third Street access shut off from?
What two major department stores are located at the Third Street Promenade?
What year did the mall reopen?
What event does the Chamber of commerce host in the fall?
What can visitors do at the Taste of Santa Monica?
Where is the Taste of Santa Monica held each year?
Who provides the guests with these samples at the event?
What hotel offers a trip to the famer's market to influence dinner?
In what two years were the first Sustainable City Plan's introduced?
What percent of the city's public work's vehicles use alternate fuels?
Water conservation policies have been adopted by what two sectors?
What percent of the bus systems use alternate fuels?
What company provides the city with natural gas?
What is the name of the urban runoff facility?
How many gallons of water does (SMURFF) treat every week?
How much money do residents get back for participating in water conservation per square foot?
Santa Monica plans on water independence by what year?
If (SMURFF) did not collect water where would it go?
What year does the city plan on having a bicycle infrastructure?
The city has two bike Action Plans of how many years?
The city's bus system is being over hauled to work with what other program?
What percentages does the city Bike transportation mode's target?
What type of business certification do they plan on expanding?
What was the total average family size?
What percent of households were made of one person?
What percent of households had someone over 65 living in it?
Roughly how many same-sex couples were there?
What percent of household have children under 18?
What plan launched a Bicycle sharing system?
When was Santa Monica's Bicycle sharing system launched?
What is the name of the bike trail that goes through Santa Monica?
When was the most recent Bicycle Friendly Community Award given to Santa Monica? 
What other year did Santa Monica receive the Bicycle Friendly Community award?
What is the name of the Santa Monica Freeway?
What road does state route 2 begin on?
How many more states aside from California does the interstate 10 run through?
What city and state does the interstate 10 end at?
Where does the Santa Monica Freeway begin around?
Beginning in what decade did the Santa Monica  Expo Air Line host freight and passenger services?
What year did the Santa Monica freight and passenger service stop running?
Diesel powered freight deliveries continued through what date?
What was the result from the discontinuation of using the line for deliveries?
Who bought the Expo line from Southern Pacific?
In 2006 what percent of the population was impacted by crime?
What percent of crime was strictly property in 2006?
In 2006 what was crime mostly comprised of?
How are the Santa Monica per-capita crime rates calculated?
The Santa Monica Police Department suggests that the per-capita crime rate sways in what way?
In what year was there a double homicide?
Where was this homicide perpetrated?
What gang is mentioned in connection with this crime?
What two people were killed inside the store?
Where is the getaway driver of the Culver city gang murder?
What is one of the oldest exterior shots in Santa Monica?
What does this iconic exterior shot display?
What 1982 movie includes Sylvester Stallone running on the Santa Monica Beach?
What 1996 movie was set completely in Santa Monica?
What movie was shot at Samohi?
When was Washington University founded?
How many Nobel laureates have been affiliated with Washington University?
Where is Washington University ranked among Academic Ranking of World Universities?
For whom is Washington University named?  
How many different countries comprise the makeup of faculty and students of Washington University?
Who was the first chancellor of Washington University?
When did Washington University secure its charter?
What makes Washington University unique among other American universities?
Who was the first president of Washington University?
What local businessman help provide support for the Washington University?
What was one of the names that was initially considered for Washington University in St. Louis?
What name was selected by the Board of Trustees in 1854 for Washington University?
Why did the Board of Trustees choose to name Washing University after George Washington?
When was the name Washington University amended? 
When was the suffix "in St. Louis" added to Washington University?
Where was Washington University located? 
When did classes first begin at Washington University?
What building was first used for classes at Washington University?
What three departments were Washington University divided?
What type of school did Washington University first function?
When was did Washington University open its law school?
Who was Robert Somers Brookings?
When did Washington University establish its medical school? 
When did St. Louis Medical college affiliate itself with Washington University?
Where was Washington University located during the first half of the 1800's. 
When did Washington University begin to expand west?
What architecture firm was hired by the Board of Directors at Washington University? 
Who was on the committee that found a new site for Washington University?
What nickname was given to the new campus site?
When did Washington University begin desegregation?
What were the first schools to become integrated at Washington University? 
What student group campaigned for full integration at Washington University in 1949?
What organization sought to strip Washington University of its tax-exempt status in the 1940's?
When did the Board of Trustees pass a resolution to desegregate the Washington University undergraduate division? 
What years were presidential debates held at Washington University?
What building at Washington University was used to host the presidential debates?
Why was the presidential debate canceled in 1996 at Washington University?  
When was the only vice presidential debate held at Washington University?
Who were the candidates in the vice presidential debate at Washington University?
What was Chancellor Wrighton's initial sentiment to hosting another presidential debate at Washington University after 2004?
What did  Chancellor Wrighton state as one of the reasons for hosting another debate at Washington University?
What year did Chancellor Wrighton submit another bid for a presidential debate at Washington University after 2004? 
How many freshman class applications did Washington University receive in 2013?
What percentage of incoming freshman at Washington University were in the top %10 of their class in 2013? 
Where did Washington University rank among private universities for National Merit Scholar freshman in 2006?
When was Washington University ranked #1 for quality of life?
What percent of applicants were admitted to Olin Business School in 2007? 
What is the current national rank of the School of Medicine at Washington University?
What is the current national rank of Brown School of Social Work?
What program at Washington University ranks first in the 2016 in the U.S. News & World Reports rankings?
Where did the School of Law rank in  2015 by the U.S. News & World Reports?
What year did the Graduate School of Architecture and Urban Design rank ninth by Designintellence?
Where is the West Campus of Washington University located?
When did the university acquire the property for the West Campus?
What was previously located at the West Campus of Washington University?
What is located in the basement level of the West Campus? 
What department located at the West Campus provides IT services?
Where is Tyson Research Center located?
When did Washington University acquire the property for Tyson Research Center?
What is the function of Tyson Research Center?
When was the Living Learning Center accredited as a "living building"?
Who previously owned the property where Tyson Research Center is located?
How many divisions make up Arts & Sciences at Washington University?
Who is the Dean of Faculty of Arts & Sciences at Washington University?
When did James Mcleod pass away?
What positions did James Mcleod hold at Washington University?
When was Olin Business School founded?
What was the original name of Olin Business School? 
When was Olin Business School named?
After whom is Olin Business School named?
Where was an Executive MBA program established by Washington University in 2002?
With what schools does the Washington University School of Law offer joint-degree programs? 
How many semesters of courses are offered by Washington University School of Law?
What LLM degree programs are offered by the Washington University School of Law?
How many hours of coursework are required to obtain a JD at the Washington University School of Law?
During what seasons are courses offered at the Washington University School of Law?
Where do students in the Washington University School of Law place among test takers on average?
Where is the Washington University School of Law ranked in the 2015 US News & World Report America's Best Graduate Schools?
When does full-time coursework J.D. begin at the  Washington University School of Law begin?
Where does the Washington University School of Law rank among "25 Most Wired Law Schools"?
What building provides the location of the Washington University School of Law?
When was the Washington University School of Medicine founded?
Where does the Washington University School of Medicine rank in student selectivity?
Who is the director of the Genome Center at Washington University?
How much of a contribution did the Genome Center at Washington University make in sequencing the Human Genome Project?
What hospitals partner with the Washington University School of Medicine?
When was the George Warren Brown School of Social Work founded?
By what other names is the George Warren Brown School of Social Work known?
What degree programs are offered by the George Warren Brown School of Social Work?
What roles was George Warren Brown known?
What facilities house the  George Warren Brown School of Social Work?
Who is the Brown School's current Dean? 
How many research centers are housed by the Brown School? 
What topics of emphasis are contained in the Brown School Library collection?
What areas does the Brown School Library have represented scholars?
To how many academic journals does the Brown School Library subscribe?
When was the Mildred Lane Kemper Art Museum established?
From what centuries does  the Mildred Lane Kemper Art Museum have collections?
When did the Mildred Lane Kemper Art Museum changed locations? 
Who designed the new location of  the Mildred Lane Kemper Art Museum?
What facility was Fumihiko Maki's first commission?
How many schools does Washington University have?
What percent of undergraduate students are involved in faculty research?
How does the Center for Measuring University performance rank Washington University?
Where is the Office of Undergraduate Research located?
How much money in financial support did Washington University receive in 2007?
How many inventions does Washington University have funded by the National Institute of health?  
What percentage of NH grants in Missouri went to Washington University? 
What percentage of the sequencing did the Washington University Medical School contribute to the Human Genome Project?
What  are some organisms for which  the Genome Sequencing Center at  Washington University Medical provided genome decoding?
How many student organizations does Washington University have on campus?
How are most student organizations at Washington University funded?
What is the amount of the Washington University Student Union annual budget?
What percentage of students are involved in Greek life at Washington University?
How many fraternities are located at Washington University?
How many a cappella groups does Washington University have?
What is the name of the oldest a cappella group at Washington University?
What is the oldest female a cappella group at Washington University?
When was the oldest co-ed  a cappella group at Washington University founded?
When did the group After Dark perform MSNBC?
What percent of undergraduate students live on campus at Washington University?
Where are most residence halls located at Washington University?
How did the South 40 get its name?
Where are all freshman residence buildings at Washington University located?
What is the gender make-up of the residence halls at Washington University?
Where is the Village located at Washington University?
What students are allowed in the North Side residences at Washington University?
How many students are composed in Blocs?
What residences comprise the North Side of Washington University?
How are students grouped in BLOCS at  the Village residences?
How many media outlets does Washington University support?
What is the official student radio station at Washington University?
What is the name of Washington University's political publication?
What is Washington University's closed circuit television network? 
What are the names of the art journals published by Washington University?
What is the CIA's main focus?
What does FBI stand for?
What is the only agency that is authorized to carry out action on behalf of the president?
What is the title of the person who manages the relationship between the CIA and the Unified Combatant Commands?
What three ways does the Executive office support the U.S. military?
Who is in charge of the day to day operation of the CIA?
How many regional analytic groups does the Directorate of Analysis have?
Who produces all source intelligence investigations?
How many groups of the Directorate of Analysis focus on policy, collection and staff support?
How many groups does the Directorate of Analysis have for transnational issues?
The Directorate of Analysis has an office dedicated to what country?
What office is in charge of collecting foreign intelligence?
What is the main reason the Directorate of Operations was created?
What intelligence service did the Department of Defense recently create?
What does DIA stand for?
What is DOD short for?
In what year did the CIA establish its first training facility?
What was the name of the first training facility that was established by the CIA?
What event decreased the CIA's training budget?
How many annual courses does the CIA University have?
Who was the Director of Central Intelligence in 2002?
What year was the Central Intelligence Agency Act created?
How much money was spent on non-military intelligence in 2013?
Who is the only federal employee that can spend un-vouched for money?
What was the 2013 annual budget for the CIA's HUMINT?
What two major things does the CIA's "Covert action programs" include?
What was the first year the CIA's budget was disclosed?
Who disclosed the CIA's budget for 2005?
What group accidentally published the non CIA budget in 1994?
What plan appropriated $13.7 billion over five years?
What percent of the $13.7 billion did the CIA receive?
Which four countries can share communications with the U.S. IC?
What does NOFORN stand for?
What is the special marking that shows messages can be shared with these other five countries?
What president authorized the creation of the intelligence service?
Who's secret intelligence service was the US's modeled after?
What does OSS stand for?
Who signed the order to get rid of the OSS?
In what year was the OSS dissolved?
Which act got rid of the NIA and the CIG?
What program handled "essential aliens" that did not fall under normal immigration policies?
Lawrence Houston helped to draft what act in 1949?
Who was appointed to be the new Director of the CIA in 1950?
What president announced the new CIA director?
Where was most of the CIA's intelligence coming from before 1950?
Who wanted the CIA to have a central group that organized information for him?
What did the Department of defense want from the CIA?
What was the State Department hoping for the CIA to do?
What was one of the main targets of intelligence gathering?
Who created the Office of Special Operations?
What does ORE stand for?
What was the Office of Special Operations initial budget?
Who was the OSO trying to track and gain intelligence on?
In what year was directive 10/2 issued?
Who was the head of the OPC?
Most CIA stations had how many chiefs?
Directive 10/2 called for actions against who?
How many troops did the Chinese enter into the Korean War?
Who compromised hundreds of airdrops?
Who was a Russian translator and Soviet Spy?
What type of stimuli causes pain?
What type of feeling is pain?
Why has defining pain been a challenge?
What organization's definition is widely used?
In medical diagnosis, what is pain considered?
What is the most common reason people go to the doctor in first world countries?
How can pain effect a person's quality of life and general functioning?
Excitement and distraction are what type of factors which affect pain's intensity?
What has pain sometimes been used as an argument to allow terminally ill patients the right to do?
What year did the IASP respond to the need to create a more useful system for describing pain?
How many classes of pain does the IASP system note?
Who has criticized the IASP's system?
What do some people feel the IASP's system is inadequate for?
How many classes of research does Woolf encourage?
What is usually temporary?
How long does pain tend to last?
What is pain which resolves quickly called?
What has the distinction between acute and chronic pain been arbitrarily measured by?
What might chronic pain sometimes be referred to as?
Stimulating nociceptors will induce which type of pain?
How is nociceptive pain classified?
The thermal category of pain deals with which two temperature ranges?
Crushing, tearing and shearing are examples of which type of pain?
What is the term for nociceptors which respond to more than one type of stimuli?
What type of of pain is visceral a division of?
What type of structures are sensitive to being stretched but not very sensitive to burning?
Which type of pain is dull, aching and hard to pin-point?
What can visceral pain be accompanied by?
What type of pain are first degree burns classified as causing?
What percentage of people who've had upper limbs amputated feel phantom pain?
What is the percentage of of phantom pain felt by lower limb amputees?
What may accompany urination for amputees? 
What may happen with intact body parts if there is continuous pain for a long period?
After six months, what percentage of people who had limbs amputated still felt pain in those limbs?
What happens when an anesthetic injection is directed into the nerves a limb stump?
How long can an anesthetic, at max, relieve pain for, despite wearing off in only hours?
What is injected in small amounts into the soft tissue between vertebrae to produce local pain?
Vibrating the stump of an amputee's limb can produce what in some patients?
What is paraplegia?
What is the initial phantom body pain sensation experienced by people with spinal cord damage?
What can cause paraplegia?
What is an inefficient treatment for chronic pain which rarely provides any sort of true relief?
The sensation of a knife twisting in the flesh is an example of what type of pain?
What triad are the inventory scales of hysteria, depression and hypochondriasis classified as?
When people have long-term pain, what do they frequently display?
Clinical evidence indicates that neuroticism is caused by what?
If long-term pain can be relieved by therapy, what does a person's neurotic triad score do?
What shows improvement in many patients once their pain has been resolved?
What is the term for pain which is acute and note alleviated by normal pain management?
How do cancer patients usually control their background pain?
Who is breakthrough pain common among?
What class of medication is fentanyl an example of?
What activity in relation to breakthrough pain requires heavy use of opiods?
Which type of injection has caused patients to report they have pain but aren't bothered by it?
How much do some patients going through psychosurgery suffer from the sensation of pain?
IASP's definition of pain includes what aspect as an essential part?
What is it possible to induce which is, contrary to expectations, devoid of unpleasantness?
What perspective towards pain are some people with perfectly normal nerves born with?
An abnormality of the nervous system can render a small number of people insensitive to what?
What is it known as when someone is born without being able to feel pain because of their nervous system?
What happens to children with congenital insensitivity to pain?
What is the life expectancy for people who can't feel pain?
What gene is responsible for coding for a sodium channel necessary for conducting pain nerve stimuli?
What year was peripheral pattern theory developed? 
Whose suggestion prompted the development of peripheral pattern theory?
What does the gate control theory specify the diameter of which is responsible for the amount of pain sensation?
What did DC Sinclair and G Weddell propose a property of all skin fiber endings is?
Why were peripheral pattern theory and gate control theory left behind?
How many dimensions did Melzack and Casey describe pain in terms of?
The affective-motivational dimension of pain is characterized by what urge?
What did Melzack and Casey theorize could influence the perception of the magnitude of pain?
War game excitement appears to block what aspect of pain?
What did Melack's and Casey's paper end with a call towards?
What type of signal can be generated by intense enough stimulation of any sensory receptor?
What types of stimuli can't some sensory fibers differentiate between?
What type of stimuli do nociceptors response to?
How many different types of ion channels have so far been identified?
What does stimuli generate to send signals along a nerve fiber?
What are some spinal cord fibers exclusive to?
Pain signals travel first to what region of the brain?
What are dynamic range neurons?
Where does pain-related activity in the thalamus spread to? 
Pain which is distinctly located also activates what cortices? 
Who wrote "The Greatest Show on Earth: The Evidence for Evolution"?
What does Dawkins explain must compete with each other in living begins?
What would be the most fit creature?
What type of designer is natural selection?
What might the relative intensities of pain resemble?
Along with with ethnicity and genetics, what is the other factor associated with differences in pain perception?
What might some people of Mediterranean origin report as painful that people of this origin wouldn't?
What nationality can tolerate the least amount of electric shock?
What do some individuals in all cultures have significantly higher than normal?
Patients who have painless heart attacks have higher what?
What is the most reliable measure of pain?
What do health-care professionals tend to underestimate? 
What did Margo McCaffery introduce in 1968?
What scale might a patient be asked to locate their pain on?
What are patients asked to use the McGill Pain Questionnaire to indicate?
What is MPI an abbreviation for?
How many classes of chronic pain patients are there?
What do interpersonally distressed people feel their significant others aren't supportive of?
What do dysfunctional people perceive the severity of their pain to be?
What should MPI characterization of a person be combined with for deriving the most useful case descriptions?
What become critical when a person is non-verbal? 
What can be monitored as pain indicators?
What type of social behavior might patients experiencing pain exhibit?
How can patients with dementia indicate discomfort exists?
Facial grimacing and guarding indicate what?
Why may older adults quit doing activities the love?
What does the experience of pain have throughout cultures?
What might an aging adult not respond to the same way as a younger person would?
An older adult may also not report pain because they're scared they may be put on what?
Aging adult's ability to recognize pain may be blunted by what?
What kind of barriers can prevent a person from telling someone they're in pain?
How can religious beliefs contribute to a person remaining in pain?
Some people may not report pain because they think it's a sign what is near?
What do many people fear pain treatment will lead to?
What is an issue of reporting pain specific to Asians?
What does the IASP advocate that the relief of pain should be recognized as?
What should chronic pain be considered in its own right?
What two countries is treating pain a specialty in?
What is pain medicine often under disciplines like physiatry, neurology, etc?
As of 2011, how many people worldwide are still denied access to inexpensive medications for severe pain?
What, when taken orally, can reduce total crying time of newsborns undergoing a painful procedure?
What doesn't sugar change the effect of pain on?
Sugar also doesn't measurably change what type of electrical activity in the brains of newborns a second after the heel lance procedure?
A sweet oral liquid does moderately reduce the incidence and duration of what?
Clinical hypnosis may be effective in doing what with pain associated with surgical procedures in adults and children?
How many studies in 2007 found evidence for the efficacy of hypnosis in the reduction of chronic pain?
What did the studies regarding the effectiveness of hypnosis lack?
What is considerable more research needed to determine for different chronic pain conditions?
What is the most common reason people seek out alternative medicine?
What did an analysis of the 13 studies of pain treatment conclude about the effect of real treament versus sham treatments?
What medicine is there tentative evidence for the efficacy of?
Some contradictory reviews of 13 high quality studies found actual what?
Other than in osteomalacia, what is there no evidence of a relationship between pain and?
What type of topic is physical pain important in relation to many issues?
Corporal punishment is a form of what type of pain?
How does pain inform attitudes deemed unacceptable?
What kind of practices do some cultures highly regard?
What is corporal punishment used as retribution for?
What about pain in an animal isn't able to be known with certainty?
An animals physical and behavioral reactions may be inferred to indicate the presence of what?
Who do specialists believe can feel pain?
No mechanism is known by which what organisms would be able to have a feeling such as pain?
What do fungi and fruit flies seem to lack?
How is data accessed?
How much data can a DBMS store?
A DBMS consists of what?
What do most database applications contain?
What is used to recover data if disks suffer a failure?
How can large quantities of data be accessed?
What is required for a modern DBMS to function?
How long can it take to create a DBMS?
Name three DBMSs that have been used since the 1970s.
How is the cost to create a DBMS distributed?
Name an example of a general-purpose DBMS.
How are many databases accessed?
How do administrators work with the DBMS?
What is a way for programmers to use the DBMS?
Who created the relational model of DBMS?
Instead of using links, how was information found in a relational model?
In what decade did computer hardware become able to handle a relational system?
What type of system in still prominent to this day?
What database language is the most prominent?
Why was COBOL created?
When were DBMSs first used commercially?
When was the standard protocol completed?
What group discovered COBOL?
What was the standard protocol called?
What was the DBMS created by IBM called?
What was the purpose of the IBM DBMS?
What is the classification of IMS?
What was the name of Bachman's Turing Award presentation in 1973?
Who proposed using a table to store data?
How is data accessed in a table?
What model solved the problem of databases where information was missing?
What system assists a user in seeing a table?
How was the relational model able to improve over time?
What is the relationship called in a hierarchical model?
What is the relationship called in a navigational model?
What is a third type of model that can be combined with heirarchical and navigation models?
How is information stored in a navigational system?
How is a database system frequently used?
How is information stored in a relational system?
What happens to blank data fields in a navigational system?
What is a key used for?
What technique is used to collect into one place?
How is information accessed in a relational model?
How is data in an optional table accessed?
How does a program collect information using a navigational system?
What is used to solve the problem of looping?
What computer language came about as a result of the looping problem?
What type of math was used to create a system to find data sets?
Who used tuple calculus to show the functionality of databases?
Who used Codd's paper at Berkeley to improve a geographical database?
What was the name of the project to create a geographical database?
When was INGRES first tested?
What computer language was used in INGRES to access data?
Is QUEL still used to access data in INGRES?
What is a CAFS accelerator?
Did the CAFS accelerator work as planned?
How are today's database systems run?
Name a company that is still working on the CAFS accellerator?
Who created dBASE?
Why was dBASE unique?
Why was dBASE successful?
What is a benefit of using dBASE?
In the 1990s, what type of programming changed the handling of databases?
What term is used for the difficulty in database table and programmed object translation?
How is the problem of object-relational impedance mismatch corrected?
What is the library programmers use to solve object-relational impedance mismatch?
What kind of database is XML?
Where are XML databases frequently used?
What type of processing is used in enterprise database software?
How is XML used in enterprise database management?
What is used to offer a balance in guarantees?
What explains the difficulty in a system containing availability, consistency, and partition tolerance guarantees?
How many guarantees will most databases tolerate?
What should a conceptual data model do?
What makes a successful data model?
Asking questions about an organization's needs will help to create what?
What must one understand in order to create a successful data model?
A conceptual data model in separate from the choice of what?
In what form is the output of a logical database design?
Which data model is displayed as a specific model that uses DBMS?
What decisions must be made in the last stage of database design?
What is an important goal in in this final stage?
What factor is reflected in performance requirements?
How many conceptual or physical views of data are there?
How many different external views of data are there?
What is the benefit of external views of data?
What does the conceptual view offer?
How does the conceptual view handle how data is managed?
What type of view does the conceptual view offer?
What is responsible for putting information into permanent storage?
What do database administrators closely monitor?
What is database storage?
While working, does DBMS store information in one place?
What are huge quantities of information stored as?
What does database access limit?
What are examples of database objects?
Who sets database access?
What does data security avoid?
What is a subset of a database called that can be accessed by using a password?
What is possible when a DBMS interrogate and update a database?
What is a unit of work called in a database?
Are transactions limited?
How can database transactions ensure accuracy after a crash?
Why would someone attempt to unite two different databases?
In order to merge, what must the database maintain?
What are the important parts of the database related application that should be moved?
How can a DBMS database migration be made easier?
Can a DBMS be transfered to a different DBMS?
Name a reason to take a database backward in time?
Is each database backup kept in the same file?
Who can restore a database that has been corrupted?
What parameter is requiret to restore a database?
How can static analysis be useful with query languages?
What do query languages support in abstract interpretation frameworks?
What is a security measure that uses a relational database system?
Can query languages be adjusted?
What was Tuscon known as 12,000 years ago?
What group lived in the area that were known for their red-on-brown pottery?
Near what river was a village site dating from 2100 BC found? 
Who were probably the first group of people in Tuscan?
How long ago did Tuscan have their first visitors?
How long ago were Paleo-Indians known to be in the Tucson area?
How old was the village site found near the Santa Cruz River?
When was the Early Agricultural period?
What happened in the Early Ceramic period?
When did the Hohokam live in the Tucson area?
What was the date when Arizona was bought?
What year did the Overland Mail Corporation end operations?
Arizona is south of which river?
What was the name of the deal in which Arizona was bought?
In what year did Tuscon become a stage station?
When was the Gadsden Purchase?
Where did the US buy land from in the Gadsden Purchase?
When did the US formally take control of the Tucson area?
When did the mail stagecoaches stop running?
Why did the mail stagecoaches stop running?
What date did William Whitney Brazelton Die? 
What is the name of the sheriff who shot William Whitney Brazelton?
What was Wyatt Earp's job title?
Who was held responsible for the murder of Morgan Earp?
What Deputy was responsible for the death of Frank Stiwell?
What crime increased in the Tucson area in 1877?
Who was the most famous stagecoach robber in the Tucson area?
When was Brazelton killed?
Who killed Brazelton?
What was Shibell's job?
What county is Tuscon located in?
What was the population of Tuscon in 2006?
what were veterans in need of after World War I?
What did the U.S. Veterans Administration build around 1910?
What was the population of Tuscon in 1940?
What was Tucson's population in 1900?
What was Tucson's population in 1910?
What was Tucson's population in 1920?
What was Tucson's population in 1940?
What was Tucson's population in 2006?
Which Mountain has the Highest point surrounding Tuscon?
Which desert is Tuscon in?
How many mountain ranges is Tuscon surrounded by?
How above sea level is Wasson Peak in feet?
What direction are the Tortolita Mountains from Tuscon?
How high is Tucson's airport?
What desert is Tucson in?
What mountain range is east of Tucson?
What mountain range is north of Tucson?
What mountain range is west of Tucson?
How many miles is Tuscon from Phoenix?
How many miles is Tuscon from the US - Mexico border?
What is the second largest city in Arizona?
Where does Tuscon rank in terms of the largest city in the U.S. in 2009? 
What area exceeded 1 million people in 2015?
What is Tucson's city population in 2010?
What is Tucson's metro area population in 2010?
How does Tucson rank among US cities?
How does Tucson rank among US metro areas?
What is Tucson's metro area population in 2015?
Which interstate is the only one that uses kilometer posts instead of mileposts?
Are the speed limits on I-19 marked in miles or kilometers?
What border does I-19 come close to? 
Which interstate would you take to go to Jackson Florida from Tuscon Arizona?
Which direction does I-10 run through Tucson?
What is the next major town to the west on I-10?
What is the next major town to the east on I-10?
Which direction does I-19 run from Tucson?
What is unusual about I-19?
What was the Union Pacific once known as?
What year was Locomotive #1673 made in?
What was the name of the retail and community center that took longer than a decade to build?
When did a revitalization of downtown Tucson begin?
What is Rio Nuevo?
What is the southern edge of Tucson's downtown?
What is the western edge of Tucson's downtown?
What is the northern edge of Tucson's downtown?
Which architect designed the Broadway Village shopping Center?
Which part of Tuscon is Broadway Village shopping center located in?
What mall is located in midtown?
Who designed the Broadway Village shopping center?
Where is Broadway Village shopping center?
Where is the Lost Barrio?
Where is the El Con Mall?
Where is the 4th Avenue Shopping District?
What is Tuscon's largest Park?
What was once named the "ugliest street in America" by Life magazine?
What mayor was quoted in calling Speedway Boulevard "the ugliest street in America?
Which newspaper did David Leighton work for?
What city is the Harlem River Speedway in?
What is Tucson's biggest park?
What sports field is in Reid Park?
What zoo is in Reid Park?
What was the "ugliest street in America" in the 1970s?
What was Speedway Blvd called in the 1990s?
Where does E.University Blvd. lead to?
What neighborhood has historic homes?
What mode of transport is encouraged in Central Tuscon?
Of the 3.5 miles from N. Mountain Avenue to Rillito River Park, how many are bike-only?
Which Tucson street is devoted to bicycles?
How long does N Mountain Ave have a bike lane?
Which park has a multi-use path?
Which bike path does Highland lead to?
Which shopping area is on East University?
What is the percentage of Native Americans in South Tuscon?
What kind of restaurants are widely known in South Tuscon?
What are painted do to city policy? 
What percentage of the South Tuscon Population is Mexican-American? 
What year was South Tuscon reincorperated? 
When was South Tucson first incorporated?
When was South Tucson reincorporated?
How large is South Tucson?
How much of South Tucson is Mexican-American?
How much of South Tucson is Native American?
What interstate is the West side west of? 
What is the name of the movie set in Old West Tuscon?
What is the name of the national park in Old West Tuscon?
What is the museum in Old West Tuscon? 
The Marriott Starr Pass Resort & Spa is located where?
What part of Tucson is considered the West Side?
What museum is in Western Tucson?
What resort is in Western Tucson?
What neighborhood is the Marriott Starr Pass Resort & Spa in?
What theme park is in Old West Tucson?
What else is Sentinel Peak also known as?
What is the giant letter downtown in honor of?
What year did the tradition of freshmen whitewashing the "A" begin?
during the Iraq war, what color did anti-war activists paint the "A"?
Who intervened when the "A" was painted various colors?
Why is there a giant letter A on a Tucson mountain?
Where is there a giant letter A on a Tucson mountain?
What color did college freshmen paint the A?
What color did Iraq War protesters paint the A?
How did City Council decide to paint the A?
What is the Foothills west of?
Where are some of the major resorts of Tuscon?
What is La Encantada?
What is the Foothills east of?
What community is north of Tucson's city limits?
Where are the most expensive homes in the Tucson metro area?
What is the southern edge of the Catalina Foothills area?
What outdoor mall is in Catalina Foothills?
Which big resorts are in Catalina Foothills?
How many residents live in the master-planned communities?
Which town is Rancho Vistoso located?
What mountains is Oro Valley next to?
Which town would you find Dove Mountain and Continental Ranch?
Where is Oro Valley?
Where is the Continental Ranch planned community?
Where is the Dove Mountain planned community?
Where is the Rancho Vistoso planned community?
Which direction from Tucson is Picture Rocks?
What is considered Tuscon's first suburb?
When was the Casas Adobes Plaza established?
What representative was almost assassinated at the La Toscana Village?
What nature preserve is in Casas Adobes?
What mall is located in Casas Adobes?
When was the Casas Adobes Plaza built?
What was Tucson's first suburb?
Where is Tohono Chul Park?
Who was nearly assassinated in Casas Adobes?
What was John Roll's job title?
What park was developed between the 1950's and 1970's?
What park is in East Tuscon?
Which estates were named after a ranch of a famous author?
What year was Tuscon's largest office building built?
What shopping center is located along Broadway?
What part of Tucson is Saguaro National Park East in?
When was East Tucson developed?
What is the boundary of East Tucson?
What is the biggest office building in Tucson?
Where is Park Place?
Where is a great place to bird watch in Southeast Tuscon?
Where do a lot of the families from Davis-Monthan Air Force Base live at?
Rita Ranch also has a planned development called what?
What is the name of the lake in Southeast Tuscon?
What is the name of the High School in the area of Southeast Tuscon?
What Air Force base is in Tucson?
What is the alternate name of Chuck Ford Park?
What community college is in southeast Tucson?
Where do many Air Force families live?
What is the goal of Civano?
How many miles is Catalina Highway?
What town is near the top of Mt. Lemmon?
What area has a ski lift?
What two winter sports would you do at the mountain range?
How long is Catalina Highway?
What activities are popular in the mountains of Tucson?
Where is Summerhaven?
What is in Ski Valley?
What is in Summerhaven?
What year did the "Stupid Motorist Law" come in effect?
A monsoon can last into what month?
How much can a motorist be charged for needing to be rescued after ignoring safety precautions? 
What could you say is the average start for a monsoon?
What is usually higher during a monsoon compared throughout the rest of the year?
When was the "Stupid Motorist Law" passed?
What is the legal name of the "Stupid Motorist Law"?
How much can the "Stupid Motorist Law" charge people for being rescued?
When does Tucson's monsoon usually start?
How long does Tucson's monsoon last?
What is the second-largest employer in Tucson?
Where is the US Army Intelligence Center?
What railroad route passes through Tucson?
Where does the Sunset Route connect to the west coast?
What was Raytheon previously called?
What drug company has a major presence in Tucson?
How many optics-related companies are in Tucson?
What do the 'Optics Valley' companies do?
What accounting software company has a major presence in Tucson?
When did the Tucson Festival of Books begin?
When is the Tucson Festival of Books held?
How many people came to the Tucson Festival of Books in 2010?
What award did the Tucson Festival of Books give to R. L. Stine?
When is the Tucson Folk Festival held?
Where is the Tucson Folk Festival held?
How many performers are in the Tucson Folk Festival?
How much does the Tucson Folk Festival cost to get in?
Who runs the Tucson Folk Festival?
What season is February in Tucson?
What is the Fiesta de los Vaqueros?
What month is the Fiesta de los Vaqueros held in?
Who started the Fiesta de los Vaqueros?
How much time do Tucson schools give students off to attend the Fiesta de los Vaqueros?
What time of day is The Procession?
What is burned at The Procession?
What group runs The Procession?
What kind of group runs The Procession?
What kind of parade is The Procession?
What famous writers have lived in Tucson?
What is the Chax Press?
What does the University of Arizona Poetry Center offer?
What university were some of Tucson's famous writers associated with?
Who is thought to have led to calling Tucson 'The Old Pueblo'?
When did Tucson get a railroad?
What did Leatherwood call Tucson in a telegram?
How did newspapers abbreviate Leatherwood's phrase?
Who were among the recipients of Leatherwood's telegram?
How many times has the University of Arizona men's basketball team won NCAA tournaments?
How many times has the University of Arizona women's softball team gone to NCAA National Championships?
How many times has the University of Arizona women's softball team won NCAA National Championships?
Who coaches the University of Arizona's swim team?
Who coaches the University of Arizona men's basketball team?
Where did the Tucson Sidewinders move to?
What team played at Kino Veterans Memorial Stadium in 2011-2013?
Why were the Tucson Padres temporarily in Tucson?
Where did the Padres move when the Escondido stadium fell through?
What is the new name of the Tucson Sidewinders?
Where does Tucson hold NASCAR races?
What kind of races does Rillito Downs hold?
What former Tucson horse racetrack no longer exists?
What is on the former site of the Moltacqua track now?
How many asphalt short tracks are in Arizona?
Who said Tucson is bicycle-friendly, in 2007?
When does El Tour de Tucson happen?
Who runs El Tour de Tucson?
How many people participate in El Tour de Tucson?
How many US cities have at least a gold rating for bicycle-friendliness?
Which political party does Tucson usually support?
Which political party does Phoenix usually support?
How many Federal Congressional districts was Tucson split into in 2013?
Who represents Tucson's city center in Congress?
Who represent's Tucson's wealthy areas in Congress?
When is Tucson's city council primary?
How long are Tucson's city council terms?
When is Tucson's city council general election?
Which wards elect city council members in the same year as the mayor?
Which wards elect city council members in the alternate year from the mayor?
What is Tucson's NBC station?
What is Tucson's ABC station?
What is Tucson's Fox station?
What is Tucson's CBS station?
What is Tucson's PBS station?
Who runs Tucson's main power plant?
What highway is Tucson's main power plant near?
What does Tucson's main power plant use for fuel?
When did Tucson's main power plant begin operation?
How many days of sunshine does Tucson get each year?
How is most of Tucson's water used?
How much of Tucson's water is used on agriculture?
How much of Tucson's water is used on residential/city use?
How many days of full sun does Tucson get each year?
What agency manages Tucson's water?
How is Tucson replenishing its groundwater?
What does Tucson use reclaimed water for?
How long has Tucson's water conservation efforts been underway?
What is the CAP?
How long is the CAP?
What water source feeds the CAP?
What aquifer is Tucson starting new wells in?
How many wells has Tucson stopped using since 2001?
How long is the Sun Link?
What is Tucson's bus system called?
What transit systems does Sun Link connect to?
When did Tucson get a 'Best Transit System' award?
What kind of vehicles operate on the Sun Link?
Why is cycling popular in Tucson?
What is The Loop?
How many miles of trails are in The Loop?
What organization advises the Tucson government on bike concerns?
What kind of places to ride bikes does Tucson have?
What kind of government does Armenia have?
What religion did Armenia support?
Who brought Armenia to success in the 1st century BC?
What two empires did Armenia belong to in the beginning of the 5th century?
When was Urartu created?
Which two empires ruled Armenia between the 16 and 19th Century?
Who took over Eastern Armenia in the 19th century?
When did the Armenian Genocide occure?
When did Armenia become part of the Transcaucasian Socialist Federative Soviet Republic?
When did Armenia gain its independence?
Under who did Areminia become fully sovereign?
What Empire did the Orontid Dynasty belong to?
When did Armenia reach it's peak?
Which ruler is responsible for Armenias prosperity?
Who vanquished Bagratid Armenia?
When did the Seljuk Turks beat the Byzantines?
When was Cilicia founded?
What was the outcome of the Battle of Manzikert for the Seljuk Turks?
Where did Roupen find refuge?
Which family overthrew the Seljuk Turks?
What principality did the Zakarid family form?
What area did the Orbelians and Zakarids command together?
What area did the Hasan-jalalians command?
When did the Seljuk Empire experience it's decline?
Which empires seperated Armenia?
Who controlled Western Armenia between the 16 and 19th Century?
Who controlled Eastern Armenia between the 16 and 19th Century?
How long did the Turco-Iranian rivalry last?
What is another name for the Armenian Revolutionary Federation?
What was the Dashnaks objective?
Which Dashnak groups helped protect Armenian citizens?
When did the Dashnaktsutyun originate?
What instigated conflict between the Ottoman and Russian Empire?
When did the Tehcir Law come to fruition?
Which army had a group of Armenian volunteers fighting for them?
Where did the Armenian Genocide occur?
What do the Armenians see the events of 1915-1917 as?
How many phases were there to the Armenian Genocide?
What did the first phase of the Armenian Genocide involve?
What did the second phase of the Armenian Genocide involve?
Where did the Armenian Genocide death marches push the deportees to?
Who was in charge of the Russian Caucasus Army of Imperial forces?
Who was the leader of the Armenian militia?
When was the Bolshevik Revolution? 
Who formed the Transcaucasian Democratic Federative Republic?
When did the Dashnaktsutyun declare independence?
Who provided the Armenians with supplies?
Who succeeded Vladimir Lenin?
Which three parts make up the TSFSR?
When did the TSFSR break up into three parts?
Who succeeded Stalin?
When was the Armenian Genocide Memorial constructed?
When did Vazgen acquire his position?
When did Stalin pass away?
Where is the memorial for the Armenian Genocide?
In what year did Armenia suffer from a catastrophic earthquake?
How man Armenians resided in Azerbaijan in 1970?
When was Nagorno-Karabakh removed from Armenia?
Who partitioned Nagorno-Karabakh from Armenia?
What does NAA stand for?
When was the NAA formed?
Who started the fight between the MVD and the NAA in 1918?
How many people died as a result of the MVD and NAA clash in 1918?
Continued fighting transpired between the Armenians and Soviets in which city?
Where did the Armenians living in Baku escape to during the January 1990 massacre?
When did Armenia reject the referendum proposing the retention of the Soviet Union?
When did Turkey decide to become part of the blockade against Armenia?
How does Armenia get most of it's commodities?
Who did Armenia fight in teh Nagorno-Karabakh War?
What prevented Armenia from getting it's commodities?
What percent of Armenias commodities were transported via rail traffic?
When did the Karabakh War end?
What does OSCE stand for?
Armenia has closed borders with which two countries?
How many people died as a result of the fighting betwen Armenia and Azerbaijan?
Who gained the most from the Karabakh War?
What is the lowest score on the Democracy Score scale?
What Democracy Score does Armenia have?
What does the Freedom House classify Armenia as?
What makes Armenia's presidential elections faulty?
With who does Armenia have bad relations?
Is the border between Armenia and Azerbaijan open or closed?
When was the Nagorno-Karabakh War?
When did Turkey close off its border with Armenia?
Which country claims the Armenian Genocide didn't occur?
When did Armenia gain independence from the USSR?
Who wants the border between Turkey and Armenia opened?
When did Armenia and Turkey initiate an attempt to reopen their border?
Who made it difficult to ratify the protocols to reopen the Armenian/Turkey border?
Who ratifies protocols in Armenia?
How did Turkey thwart the ratification of these protocols?
Russia has a military base in which city in Armenia?
How many Armenians reside in the United States?
Why does Russia have a miltary base In Gyumri?
Who gave Russia permission to have a military base in Gyumri?
How many of Armenias inhabitants approve of becoming part of the EU?
What is KFOR?
What are some states join Armenia in the Council of Europe?
When can the EU expect Armenia to attempt to join it?
When was the Armenian military created?
When was the Ministry of Defence founded?
What are the four branches of the Armenian Armed Forces?
Who is in charge of the the Armenian military?
Who is in charge of the Ministry of Defence?
What does CSTO stand for?
What does EAPC stand for?
Who else joins Armenia in the CSTO?
When did Armenia remove its peacekeepers from Iraq?
How many hamaynkner does Armenia have?
How many districts does Yerevan have?
Does Armenia have more rural or uban hamaynker?
What is the Armenian term for settlment?
Was agriculture more important before or after Armenia left the Soviet Union?
Why did agriculture become so significant for Armenia's economy?
How much of total employment did agriculture account for at the end of the 1990s?
How much of the GDP has agriculture accounted for most recently?
How many people died because of the Spitak earthquake?
When was the Spitak earthquake?
How much did the Armenian GDP decrease from 1989-1993
What is the national currency of Armenia?
What did Armenia declare a cease-fire to in 1994?
Since when has Armenia experienced a positive growth in their economy?
What helped Armenia decrease inflation and create study growth in the economy?
What is one of the newer sectors Armenia has in addition to agriculture?
What does IMF stand for?
What dos EBRD stand for?
What does IFI stand for?
How much in loans has Armenia received since 1993?
When did Armenia become a part of the World Trade Organization?
What is the unemployment rate in Armenia?
To what does Armenia attribute it's high unemployment rate?
When did Armenia establish a foreign investment law?
When did Armenia establish a law on privatisation?
Who is in charge of releasing the World Directory of Medical Schools?
When was the foreign student department for Armenian diaspora created?
Armenian students attend YMSU with foreign students from where?
What are some examples of Armenian folk music instruments?
Who created the Armenian alphabet?
Who composed the Sabre Dance?
What is known as one of the most prolific type of religious music in Armenia?
What is kef?
What did kef help do?
Where did the Armenians emigrate from?
Who is the most well know kef artist?
What type of music had the biggest impact on the kef of the Vosbikian Band?
When did Armenian pop music become popular?
Who were some Armenian pop artists?
What type of musician is Sahan Arzruni?
What type of band was System of a Down?
What type of songs do armenian youth prefer?
What topics do armenian revolutionary songs usually encompass?
Which lake is most popular for water sports in Armenia?
What international sports has Armenia done well at?
What does IIHF stand for?
Which Games does Armenia hold?
What Olympic Sport did Hrant Shahinyan compete in?
What medals did Hrant Shahinyan win at the 1952 Summer Olympics?
Where were the 1952 Summer Olympics held?
What year did Armenia begin competiting in the Olympics seperate from the USSR?
Who provided the funds to rebuild the Armenian sports schools?
What year did Yerevan create a cyclying center?
What prize do Armenians receive from the government if they win a gold medal?
How much money was spent to revamp Tsaghkadzor for winter sports?
How much did Armenia spend to fix up their sports schools?
What type of food is Armenian food most similair to?
What does Armenian cuisine place an emphasis on?
What does Armenian cuisine use to create its distinctive dishes?
What different uses does fruit have in Armenian food?
What is the ratio of human/bacteria cells in human flora?
What keeps bacteria at bay in human body?
What type of bacteria can cause infectious diseases?
What are the deadliest diseases caused by bacteria?
What makes bacteria resistant to antibiotic treatment?
What living organisms are bacteria being reffered as?
What vital part is missing in bacteria to eukaryotes?
When did the scientific classification change?
What are two main groups prokaryotes can be divided into?
When did the first antecedents of bacteria appear on Earth?
Why were bacteria and archaea dominant forms of life?
What are Stromatolites?
What pre-historic group did bacteria evolve from?
How did chloroplast appear in first vegetation?
What is the usual form for Neiserria bacteria?
What type of bacteria is surrounded by a capsule?
What well known bacteria structure chains?
What does typically Staphylococcus look like?
Formation of what can be related to fungal mycelia?
What does bacteria use to adhere to surfaces?
How extent can biofilm be?
What is part of secondary structure in the complex formation of bacteria?
What is the purpose of networks of channels in microcolonies?
Which bacteria is more difficult to eradicate?
What is the vital nutriment for Myxobacteria?
Why do cells of Myxobacteria migrate towards each other?
How hard to treat bacteria cells in a passive state?
What bacteria do in fruiting bodies?
What is a cell membrane?
What does membrane accomplish?
Do bacteria have membrabe-bound organelles in their cytoplasm?
Absence of what make bacteria belong to prokaryotes?
What bacteria was observed as before prokaryotic cytoskeleton was discovered?
What is crucial for biochemical reactions?
What kind of membrane do bacteria cells are filled with?
How does electron transit occur in bacteria?
Can membrane of bacteria create lipid structure?
What is genetic make of bacteria?
Where is DNA chromosome of bacteria located?
How does nucleoid look?
What are the exceptions of non-internal membrane bacteria?
What is the purpose of polyribosomes in bacteria?
What composes the cell envelope?
What is most common cell wall material?
Are cell walls of bacteria similar to cell walls of plants and fungi?
How can antibiotic penicillin destroy bacteria?
What are the main materials of cell walls of plants and fungi?
What is the most typical staining technique used to identify acid-fast bacteria?
What is mycolic acid is responsible for in Mycobacteria?
What helps Mycobacteria be resistant to decolorization?
What is the main pathogenic bacteria in L-form class ?
What are highly resistant dormant structures of certain gram-positive bacteria called?
Is creating endospore a reproductive process?
What are ribosomes in endospores are enclosed in?
What chemical compound comprises 5% to 15% of the dry weight of bacterial spores?
What is commonly used to determine taxonomy of bacteria?
How is bacterial metabolism determined?
What are electron acceptors accountable for?
What are three main criterias of bacterial metabolism?
How does heterotrophic carbon metabolism occur?
When carbon metabolism is called autotrophic?
What category do parasitic bacteria fall into?
Green sulfur-bacteria is typical representative of what type of bacteria?
What is chemotrophy ?
What do lithotrophs use ?
What type of electron donors organotrophs use?
In what organisms is oxygen used as eelectron acceptor?
What do respiratory organisms use as electron donors?
What is sulfate-reducing bacteria accountable for?
What is the by-product of non-repiratory anaerobes?
How can anaerobes adjust to the surrounding environment?
What are hydrogen and carbon monoxide for Lithotrophic bacteria?
How can gas methane be used in exceptional set of conditions by methanotrophic bacteria?
What is the main element for aerobic photorophy?
What chemical process  helps bacteria to absorb raw materials?
How can bacteria obtain raw materials from the environment?
What process is used by eukaryotic cells to absorb external items?
What part of bacteria cell is used during diffusion?
How size and reproduction are linked in bacteria?
How does bacteria reproduce?
If the conditions are right how long does it take for bacteria to reproduce?
What are produced in cell division?
In what environment are bacteria being cultivated in labs?
What is typical solid setting?
What can help to indentify specific bacteria?
Which environment is better to isolate a single example of bacteria strain?
Which media is preffered to grow larger volumes of bacteria?
What is the simple way of producing large volume of bacteria cells?
What caused the evolution of different growth strategies in bacteria?
What can create a subsequent increase of nutrients in natural environment?
What do algal bacteria if nutrients are available?
What is the first stage of bacteria adaptation?
What is the second phase of bacteria growth known for?
The absence of what causes the last stage of bacteria growth?
What is called the third statge of growth of bacteria?
How many phase are in the growth of bacteria?
What shape is chromosome of bacteria?
What bacteria is an exception to single circular chromosome rule?
What bacteria is responsible for Lyme disease?
How does chromosome of Borrelia burgdoferi look like?
What makes bacteria an asexual organism?
What can cause mutation in bacteria?
What are two ways changes to DNA of bacteria can occur?
What is the aftermath of infrequent errors during intracellular assembly of virus particles?
What is the result of bacterial adaptation of E.coli bacteria host and plasmid of another bacteria?
How does conjugation take place?
Is conjugation a common bacterial adaptation?
What does transformation of bacteria depends on?
How simple is the process of transformation?
What is the first requirement in order for bacteria to bind and recombine with other bacteria's DNA
How big can be the transformation level?
How rare is the transformation among bacteria organisms?
Between what species do usually transduction, conjugation and transformation take place?
What are the consequences of transfer between different species of bacteria?
What is horizontal gene transfer?
What are Bacteriophages?
What can viruses do to bacteria?
What can happen if Bacteriophage contain genes of host's phenotype?
How can bacteria resist virus DNA?
What is monotrichous?
How many proteins is typical flagellum consist os?
When flagellum is distributed throughout the surface of the cell?
If bacteria has flagellum at each end what is the name of the species?
How does flagellum function within the cell?
How can we classify the vast variety of bacterial species?
Can classification be helpful in determining differences between distinct species?
What supports the uncertainty in classification between the same kind of bacteria?
What can lateral gene transfer create in bacteria?
What is the way modern classification tries to determine species?
What would original term "bacteria" determine?
What are two main groups of prokaryotic organisms are divided into?
What groups of organisms are closely related to each other?
What domain system is commonly used nowdays to classify microorganisms?
Why are certain bacteria called predatory?
Which way do Vampirovibrio absorb nutrients of other microorganisms?
What technique do Daptobacter use in order to kill other microorganism?
Where do Daptobacter bacteria come from?
What helps bacteria to survive?
What kind of bacteria can form interspecies hydrogen transfer?
What do anaerobic bacteria consume?
Where do bacteria stay in soil?
What do bacteria do in soil?
How does the conversion help the vegetation?
What is the amount of bacteria in human intestines?
How does gut flora prevent growth of pathogenic bacteria?
What are the pathogenes?
Can cause for most pathogenic diseases be found soon?
What can pathogenes cause?
How pathogenes interact with it's human host?
Can all bacteria in human body  be harmful?
Which bacteria cause Rocky Mountain spotted fever disiease?
What type of antibiotics called bacterocidal?
What kind of antibiotics are used for prevention of bacterial growth
What is the drawback of using antibiotics if agriculture?
Besides in treating human disease where else are antibiotics used?
What is common prevention method of infections in medicine?
What quality of bacteria is being widely used re-cyling?
What is being used in cleaning up oil spills?
What other way is bacteria aiding to nature?
What sciences use bacteria?
What's the abbreviation for a printed wiring board?
What organization likes the term "circuit card assembly" for boards that have already been assembled?
What would we call a printed circuit board with embedded electronics, abbreviated PCA?
What's the more appropriate, but mostly unused, name for a printed circuit board when it doesn't have embedded components?
What abbreviation would the IPC use for an assembled circuit board?
In the old PCB design method, what was used to connect component pin pads?
What did PCB designers used to employ on a mylar sheet?
What were traces originally made out of?
Designers would rub on a dry transfer of what to make the process of laying out components simpler?
What kind of metal coated the blank boards used to make PCBs?
What process groups PCBs before transfer to a panel?
Is it more common for panels to have a single design or many designs?
What type of panels can also be referred to as an "array?'
What step of the bare board manufacture would be impossible if panels weren't always used?
Besides assembly panels, what's the other type of panel?
What is the process called whereby the individual PCBs are separated?
What boundaries would you follow to separate PCBs on a panel?
What technology has made depaneling possible without needing to physically interact with the board?
What does the V-shaped groove method save?
What delicate component is less likely to be damaged if laser depanelization is used?
Do additive or subtractive methods use less raw materials?
What object is used to expose selected parts of the photosensitive film to light?
What chemical element is often present in the bath used to sensitive exposed film after it's been imaged?
In subtractive methods, what metal covers the board and is then partially removed?
In the additive method, which parts of the laminate are plated with copper?
In the semi-additive process, what do the areas exposed by the mask become at the end?
What metal is used to plate the unmasked parts of the board in the semi-additive method?
After the mask comes off of the board, what step takes off the original plating?
What company used to make radios with additive boards in the mid-20th century?
What weight of plating is possible with copper?
What non-professionals might use immersion etching, since it's the easiest way to make a PCB?
If you wanted to speed up the etching process, you could agitate the bath up or add what to it?
Is the immersion etching process long or short compared to other production methods?
What funny name is used for the etching process where air is blown through the etching solution to get it moving around?
What's the fastest and most easily controlled process for etching?
If you started with a two-sided laminate etched on either side, laminated to the top and bottom, and processed it again to get traces on the outside layers, how many layers would your final PCB have?
What makes up the inside of a multi-layer PCB?
Pressure is one thing you need to apply to make a multi-layer PCB; what's the other thing?
What tool is used to push the trace layers in a multi-layer PCB together?
What kind of material sometimes used for drilling will lose sharpness quickly if used for PCBs?
What property do PCBs have that makes them tough to drill through?
What kind of drill bit do you need to drill holes in a PCB?
What's another name for NCD files that has an "x" in it?
What does the "NCD" in "NCD files" mean?
What do the hole walls in two-layer PCBs have to be before they can be electroplated?
What's the minimum number of layers a PCB can have to be considered "multi-layer"?
What process does a multi-layer PCB usually undergo before plating to make sure the layers have good connectivity with each other?
What type of boards undergo the etch-back process?
Etch-back removes glass fibers and what other material?
What happens to untreated copper that makes it difficult to solder?
What chemical treatment will prevent bare copper from oxidizing?
What's the process by which bare copper gets covered in solder?
What does hot air solder leveling ensure the coated copper will have?
What alloy can no longer be used in HASL because of restrictions on the use of one of its metal components?
What does OSP stand for?
What metal is often under the gold plating on edge connectors?
What's the abbreviation for immersion silver plating?
Ag3Cu is one intermetallic that tin forms; what's the other one?
What might the rapid diffusion of coating metal into tin solder leave in the surface coating?
What's the process whereby metal filaments are grown on or in a PCB via DC voltage?
Along with silver and aluminum, what metal grows metal filaments when exposed to an electric field?
In addition to "whiskers," what does silver sprout around ions like halide?
What do scientist call the function whereby tin changes when it's very cold?
What's present in plated surfaces that causes tin to grow metal filaments?
If part of a PCB isn't solderable, what can be used instead?
What's another term used for "solder resist"?
What solder resist with a four-word name is a popular choice in the industry?
What kind of coating gets applied to the PWB before light exposure?
What solder resist is so inaccurate that few choose it anymore?
What are bare-board tests looking for besides "opens"?
What conductive metal are the lands on a circuit board made out of?
What's an absent connection that needs to be linked up on an unpopulated board called?
What does a flying probe tester deliver to the contact points during testing?
What system tells the flying probe where to go and what to do?
Surface-mount is one type of construction used in PCB assembly; what's the other one?
Which type of construction makes components that use more space?
Which of the two kinds of construction is weaker under strain?
If you're building a circuit board that has a lot of components that won't be used, which construction would be better?
What's the most frequently used test configuration procedure for ICs?
Do test circuits create permanent or temporary connections between traces?
What component of the printed circuit board is appraised with boundary scan testing?
To whom would you go to acquire the algorithms you'd use for the Joint Test Action Group procedures?
What would you avoid by using the Joint Test Action Group standard?
If a PCB is intended for use in an setting with extreme conditions, what would probably be applied?
The conformal coating can prevent leaking, shorts, and what other type of moisture damage?
A conformal coating can be applied by spraying the PCB or by doing what else to it?
What material was first used for conformal coating?
What action is made much more difficult for boards that have a conformal coating?
What special protection are most PCBs shipped in?
What force can easily change or even completely destroy an etch on a PCB?
What's another term for "grounded" in the context of PCBs?
Non-traditional PCBs include microwave PCBs and what other type of board?
What class of PCBs are even more susceptible to static than standard ones?
If a lead wasn't soldered manually, what device was used?
Which type of PCB construction technique was used first?
In through-hole construction, what are the leads on the front attached to on the back?
For boards with two sides, to what angle are leads bent to in order to install them horizontally?
What is improved by bending leads in opposite directions on the back of double-sided PCBs?
Which type of construction is more expensive?
What type of boards end up with limited routing space in through-hole manufacture?
What force might damage a PCB if large components are surface mounted?
What components can be surface mounted to save space?
A component might not be able to be made any smaller because of its mechanical limitations or what other need?
When did surface-mount become a commonly used manufacturing process?
What did the new components with end tabs replace?
What improvement is possible with surface-mounting that enables higher production and lower labor costs?
What are SMDs?
Is it the chip or the package that influences the price of an SMD more?
What process is a trace left over from?
Along with thickness, what determines the resistance of a trace?
What type of trace is often narrower than a ground trace?
In a multi-layer board, what metal would a ground plane be mostly made out of?
What type of circuits use a stripline and microstrip format?
What's the common name of polytetrafluoroethylene?
What pre-preg material is designated by "FR-2"?
To what type of packaging is thermal expansion particularly critical?
What material delivers optimum dimensional stability?
What dielectric is matte glass and polyester?
Along with the non-woven class, what makes up the reinforcement type materials?
Which is the more expensive reinforcement type?
What type of structure do woven reinforcements have that cause them to have variation in their electrical parameters?
Which ratio varies because of the structure of woven reinforcements?
For what kind of applications are non-woven reinforcement materials better than woven ones?
What's the temperature at which resin softens and expands called?
Along with vias, what makes up the components of a board?
What will happen to the components when the temperature of resin goes above that of glass transition?
What do thick boards require to resist plating failure?
When resin stays below Tg, its thermal expansion is similar to that of copper and what other material?
What will happen to the materials when a board gets wet or is in a humid area?
If materials absorb moisture and then are heated enough to vaporize the water, the board might show delamination or what other type of damage?
What percentage absorption do F-4 epoxies have?
What's the approximate relative dielectric constant of most materials in circuit boards?
What material has an absorption rate of only 0.01%?
What type of construction is best for applications that need to portion space carefully?
What gets mounted in the middle of two parallel planes in a cordwood construction?
What type of component has to be used in cordwood construction to its detriment?
What do insulating cards prevent between interconnection layers?
What force caused the physical damage to components that affected the Apollo program?
Who was the German inventor who wrote in 1903 about conductors being laminated in layers to a board?
What material did Thomas Edison experiment with by trying to chemically attach conductors to it?
What year did Arthur Berry patent his print-and-etch method?
In Max Schoop's method, what was used to create the flame-sprayed pattern on the board?
Who obtained a patent in 1927 for his method of electroplating circuit patterns?
What was Paul Eisler making when he came up with the printed circuit?
What event prompted the United States to adopt the printed circuit to make proximity fuses?
When was the printed circuit released for commercial use in the U.S.?
Who was working on the same type of large-scale application of printed circuits as the U.S. in Britain in the mid-1950s?
What process was created by the U.S. Army that led to innovation in consumer electronics?
What company developed the first electronic circuit that could be mass produced and was durable enough to be fired from a gun?
Who was in charge of the Centralab Division of Globe Union when the PCB used in anti-aircraft fuses was invented?
Where did Harry Rubinstein attend college?
What was the plate used for anti-aircraft proximity fuses in World War II made out of?
What award did Rubinstein win in 1984 for his contributions?
What type of construction was originally used for all electronic components?
In what year was the Auto-Sembly process created?
What year was the patent for the Auto-Sembly process granted?
Although two men developed the Auto-Sembly process, to whom was the patent officially granted?
Which part of the Auto-Sembly manufacturing process is the most costly?
How many club members are there?
How many matches does each team play?
What days are most games played?
Who sponsors the Premier League?
How many member clubs are shareholders in the Premier League?
When do Premier League seasons run from?
How many matches do each team play?
Who sponsors the Premier League?
What is the Premier League commonly referred to outside the UK?
When was the low point for English football?
Why was there a low point for English football?
Why were the English clubs banned from European competition in the 1980's?
Had the Football League First Division ever been in the top level?
In which year were English football clubs banned from competition in Europe?
How long were the clubs banned for?
What did English players do after the ban?
When attendance dropped to the Football League First Division, what else decreased?
When did the downward trend of the English Football start to turn around?
Was England successful in the 1990 FIFA World Cup?
Did the UEFA remove the 5 year ban on English clubs playing in European competitions in 1990?
What did the removal of the ban result in?
Did the Taylor Report on stadiums safety standards propose expensive upgrades to stadiums?
In which year did English football's downward trend stop thanks to England making it to the FIFA World Cup semi-finals?
In which year was the English club ban lifted by UEFA?
In which year shortly thereafter did Manchester United win the UEFA Winners' Cup?
In which month was the Taylor Report published?
In which year was the Taylor Report published?
In 1991, was a proposal for a new league postponed?
What did this agreement establish?
When was the Founder Members Agreement signed?
Would the new top division have commerical independence from the Football Association as well as the Football League?
Would the FA Premier League be able to negotiate their broadcasting and sponsorship agreements?
On which day was the Founder Members Agreement signed?
What was the argument made for the splitting off of the FA Premier League which would lead to being able to compete across Europe?
In which year was the proposal for a new league tabled?
Why did Greg Dyke of London Weekend Television meet with representatives of the biggest five English football clubs in 1990?
Why did Dyke only want the larger clubs featured on national television?
Did the five clubs think this was a good idea?
Were talks held with the Football Association to see if they were okay with this plan?
Who was the London Weekend Television's managing director?
In which year did the managing director meet with the representatives of the "big five" football clubs?
In which country did the managing director meet with the representatives of the "big five" football clubs?
Which Arsenal representative held talks with the Football Association about getting their backing for the new league?
What did the Football Association want to do through building a relationship with the new league?
When did the First Division clubs resign from the Football League?
When was the FA Premier League formed as a limited company?
How many divisions did the Premier League start out with at this time?
How many divisions did the Football League after the the Premier League was founded?
Was there a change in the competition format after the Premier League was formed?
On which date was the FA Premier League formed legally?
Out of which organization's headquarters did the original FA Premier League staff operate out of?
How old was the Football League when the break-up happened?
How many divisions were left in the Football League after the split?
How many divisions did the Premier League start with after the split?
How many votes does each Football Association Premier League Ltd (FAPL) club have on issues?
Who is the chairman of the FAPL and when was he appointed?
Why did John Quinton and Peter Leaver resign as chairman and chief excutive?
Who owns the Football Association Premier League?
How many votes do the member clubs of the Premier League have each?
What do the people each club elect oversee?
Who is the current chairman of the Premier League?
Who is the current CEO of the Premier League?
When does the Premier League have its playing season?
How many games does each club play each season?
How many points does each club receive for each win?
Which criteria is used to rank the clubs?
How is a tie for the championship handled?
How many clubs are currently in the Premier League?
Which month marks the start of a Premier League season?
Which month marks the start of a Premier League season?
How many times does each club play every other club?
How many total games does each club in the Premier League play per season?
What will a fifth place Premier League team qualify for?
What places are reserved for the FA Cup and the League Cup winners?
Why is it important to have a high Fair Play ranking?
If a team already qualifies for the Champions League and they winner the FA Cup or the League Cup will another team get to qualify for the Champions League?
How many Europa League places are reserved for domestic tournament winners?
To which league is the fifth place Premier League team automatically qualified for?
The team which has the highest ranking in the Fair Play standings is guaranteed qualification for which qualifying round in the Europa League?
Which team received permission to move to Dublin, Ireland in 1998?
Are there any clubs Scotland or Ireland in the Premier League?
What are Scotland's two largest teams?
Why didn't they move to Dublin?
Which team received Premier League approval to relocate to Dublin?
In which year did a Premier League team consider relocating to Ireland?
Who occasionally discusses a Scottish team joining the Premier League?
Who received broadcasting rights to the Premier League in 1992?
Why was this a unique decision?
What was the cause of this?
In which year did the Premier League decide to give BSkyB broadcasting rights?
What sort of television was BSkyB that made it such a radical broadcaster to choose for the Premier League?
Do European Leagues sell their television rights per a collective level?
What happens when European Leagues sell their televsion rights individually?
How is the teleivsion revenue distributed in the Premier League?
How is half of the money distributed?
How is the final quarter of the money distributed?
On what sort of basis does the Premier League sell its television rights?
How does La Liga sell its broadcasting rights?
Which clubs get the greatest share of broadcasting income when rights are sold individually?
What percentage of broadcasting revenue is divided equally by all La Liga clubs?
What percentage of broadcasting revenue is awarded on a merit basis according to ranking at the end of the season?
Why has there been a several court cases against Sky and Premier League?
What did the Office of Fair Trading decide regarding the claim that Sky abuses their position in 2002.
Who investigated the Premier League's collective selling rights in 1999?
What has the agreement between the Premier League and Sky been accused of being?
Who investigated the agreement between the Premier League and Sky in 2002?
Who investigated how the Premier League sold television rights in 1999?
Why did the Home Office change it rules regardin work permits in 1999?
What was one of their changes?
What was another requirement of foreign players?
In which year did the Home Office tighten rules on granting work permits to foreign football players?
For what percent must a player play of the competitive A team matches for which he was available for selection in the previous two years to get a work permit from the Home OFfice?
Over the last two years, what rank must a player's team average at least in order for them to receive a work permit from the Home Office?
What can a club do if a player they wish to sign does not meet the Home Office's work permit requirements?
Who elected consuls in the Roman government?
Who eventually became full members of the aristocracy?
What were Rome's legislative structures eventually turned into?
What was the senate that advised consuls in the Roman government comprised of?
What went hand and hand with military success?
What factor is considered by some to be the main driving force behind the expansion of Rome?
What type of policy is considered by some to be responsible for Rome's many military conflicts?
What was a common conclusion to wars in the early days of republican Rome?
What type of alliance was created between the various Roman city-states?
What did Roman settlers commonly seek out?
After what war did the alliances start to solidify?
What helped Rome move closer to a confrontation with several other major powers in the area?
What towns had chosen Hannibal's side?
What did city-states hope to gain from the Roman confederacy?
What effect did the weakening of Ptolemaic Egypt have on nearby areas?
Who attempted to find out how Rome dominated the Greek east?
Why was Rome involved in matters in the Greek east?
Which countries citie-states attempted to gain the protection of Rome?
What was seen as the behind the Roman influence in the east?
At what point was the entire Roman world joined together under Roman control?
What was not seen as an influence of Rome's influence in the west?
What type of city-states were involved with the Roman Republic?
In what battle did Rome claim victory over several Latin cities in?
What year did the Battle of Lake Regillus take place?
In what year did Rome claim victory against the city of Veii?
What Roman battle took place in the year 446 BC?
Who initially had control over the Sabines?
What country did the Romans continue to expand to after Rome was sacked?
How many battles were conducted by Rome before they were forced to flee in The First Samnite War?
What caused the Romans early withdrawl in The First Samnite War?
When did The First Samnite War end?
Who did Rome claim victory against in The Battle of Vesuvius?
Who suffered a great amount of losses battling the Roman army?
What did Rome refuse to do in their relations with Pyrrhus?
What military leader does the term Pyrrhic victory come from?
What ultimately caused Pyrrhus to vacate completely from the country of Italy?
In what year did the Battle of Beneventum take place?
What battles were initially complete disasters for Rome?
What type of engine was invented by the Romans?
Who did the Carthaginians hire to lead their army after several losses against the Romans?
Who claimed victory at the Battle of Aegates Islands?
Who lost access to the Mediterranean after numerous naval losses?
What was the name of Hannibal's family member that wanted to join his army in battle?
At what river was Hasdrubal Barca defeated at?
In which battle was Hannibal clearly defeated at?
Who had led the army that the Romans had sent to Africa?
Why did the Romans send an army to Africa?
What had prevented Carthage from defending their territory from pirates?
What type of colony was Carthage primarily comprised of?
What cities flourished after they were conquered by the Romans?
What was the main request of the Romans that Carthage turned down?
Who did the Numidians form an alliance with?
What kingdom sent an ambassador to Italy in an attempt to form an alliance against Rome?
Where did Philip V want to extend his control to?
What peninsula was the kingdom of Macedonia able to be found in?
At what point did Rome discover that an alliance between Philip V and Hannibal had been achieved?
Who did Philip V seek an alliance with?
What was declared by the Romans now that the Philip had been defeated?
Where did the Romans remove their troops from after Philip's loss?
What request of Rome was ignored by Philip V that quickly led to the start of the Second Macedonian War?
In what year did Philip lose the Battle of Cynoscephalae?
What was Philip forced to return after his loss in the Battle of Cynoscephalae?
Who had now been appointed as a military advisor to the emperor of Seleucid?
What was thought to be the plan of Hannibal and the emperor of Seleucid?
Which empire currently controlled the majority of the former Persian Empire?
Who had managed to recreate nearly the entirety of the empire of Alexander the Great?
Which former enemy wanted an alliance with the Romans?
Which town in Italy now housed a large Roman garrison?
Why was a garrison implented in Italy by the Romans?
Who had been defeated in the Battle of Thermopylae?
Why did the Romans decide to withdraw their forces from Greece?
What loss started a decline of the Seleucids Empire?
In what year did Philip pass away?
Who was next in line to the throne at the time of Philip's death?
In what year were did the Macedonians lose The Battle of Pydna?
How did Rome respond to their successive losses against the Macedonians?
Who had initially begun the Third Macedonian War?
How many republics was the Kingdom of Macedonia splintered into?
In what year did the Fourt Macedonian War end?
Who did Rome fight in the Fourth Macedonian War?
What effect did the establishment of the kingdom of Macedonia have on Greece?
Who could claim victory at the Second Battle of Pydna?
How were soldiers rewarded by Roman generals?
Who saw increased loyalty from the Roman soldiers?
Who was greater in numbers than the Roman slave masters?
Around how many rebellious uprisings and civil wars happened in the 1st century BC?
Which individual later became princeps after having challenged the senate?
How many slaves at most were under the command of Spartacus?
When was the beginning of the Social War?
How many Italians became citizens after the loss of the Social War?
How many slave uprisings were there between the years of 135 BC and 71 BC?
Ultimately what started the Social War?
What type of war was caused by the clash of two generals?
In what year did Marius and Sull begin to clash?
In what specific section of Rome did the Battle of the Colline Gate take place?
Who was defeated in the Battle of the Colline Gate?
What can be considered one of the causes that led to the downfall of the Roman Republic?
Who was the leader of Pontus in the year 85 BC?
With which individual did Lucius Cornelius have a rivalry?
How did the ruler of Pontus anger Rome?
When was the last year of Mithridates the Great's reign?
How many Romans lived in Mithridate the Great's kingdom in 88 BC?
Who held  a term as praetor in the Iberian Peninsula?
Why did Julius Caesar wish to invade Gaul?
When did Julius Caesar's term as consul end?
What military leader was Julius Caesar a contemporary of?
What was the reasoning Julius Caesar used to start the Gallic Wars?
When was the invasion of the Parthian Empire begun?
Who started the invasion of the Parthian Empire?
In what battle did Marcus Licinius Crassus die?
Who was believed to have had a secret allegiance with enemies of Julius Caesar?
What did the senators request of Caesar in order for him to stand for consul?
During what year did Caesar's armies cross the river Rubicon?
Who would be seen as having been defeated in the Battle of Pharsalus?
Who decided to attack Pompey in Greece?
In what country did Pompey die in?
In which year did The Battle of Pharsalus take place?
Who was now considered to be the primary figure in the Roman state?
Which group of people conspired against Caesar in order to have him assassinated?
Which former lieutenant of Caesar was considered a public threat after Caesar was assassinated?
When did Julius Caesar die?
Why did the Roman senators wish to have Caesar assassinated?
What failure caused the the flares of civil war to spark up again?
In what year was Octavian first allowed to use the names Augustus and Princeps?
Who defeated Cleopatra and Mark Antony at the Battle of Actium?
Which individual was granted permanent consular powers?
Who has been designated as the first Emperor of Rome?
Who would elect a king in the Roman Kingdom prior to the revolution?
What was the length of a term that a king would be elected for in the Roman Kingdom?
When did the last king of the Roman Kingdom lose his seat of power?
Who was considered to be the last king of the Roman Kingdom?
Who were the joint consulars considered to be an equal of politically?
In what year was the city in conflict with two nearby tribes?
Which group of people requested the ability to elect officials?
What were the assistants to the plebeian tribunes named?
Who used the vetoes that they had been given to prevent the appointment of magistrates?
During what century were reformed passed that allowed laws passed by the plebeians to have the full force of the law?
What year were limits placed upon plebeians that prevented them from holding more than one office concurrently?
What could no longer be associated with debt after laws were passed preventing it?
What year saw the election of a plebeian to the office of praetor?
How did senators attempt to gain the favor of the tribunes?
What was considered a pathway to holding a higher office?
In what year was the Plebiscitum Ovinium initiative enacted?
Who had already held a large amount of magisterial offices?
Who was allowed to be elected to high office positions?
What initiative provided censors with the abillity to appoint new senators?
Who could a newly elected magistrate expect to be appointed by?
What was the economic status of your typical plebeian in 287 BC?
Who refused to concern themselves with the plebeians debt situation?
What did the patrician senators refusal to address the accumulating debt of the plebeians lead to?
What law was passed that allowed the Plebeian Council to consider a bill without the approval of the patrician senators?
Which group of people were now considered to be politically equal with the plebeians?
Which group of people rebelled by vacating Rome?
How many plebeian families had an identical standing as the old aristocratic patrician families?
What did the rebelling plebeians want before they returned to Rome?
What years did no important political changes happen during?
Why was the senate considered to be supreme during this time?
What group of people often failed to use the power that was given to them?
What was a political element that satiated the plebeians?
Who enacted crucial laws during this period of time?
What had caused citizens to vacate their farms?
How could a candidate assure the vote of a poverty stricken plebeian?
What type of culture was a side effect of the rampant poverty of the average plebeian?
What caused the bankruptcy of many farmers during this era?
Who had bought the now bankrupt farms?
To what position was Tiberius Gracchus elected?
Who had tried to enact a law that places a limit on the amount of property any single individual could possess?
When was Tiberius Gracchus murdered?
Which tribune was impeached by the Plebeian Council?
What was considered to be the opposite of Roman constitutional theory?
In what year was Gaius elected to office?
Who brought forward a law that would given citizenship right to Italian allies of Rome?
What is considered to be the end game of Gaius Gracchus?
Which elected official lost the election in 121 BC?
What was the location of the Gaius Gracchus murder?
Who was the illegitimate offspring of the King Micipsa of Numidia?
Who was Jugurtha's rival?
When was Gaius Marius elected to the position of consul?
Who did not agree with the election of Gaius Marius?
Which individual did the populares part have an allegiance with?
In what year was a Roman army dispatched to terminate the King of Pontus?
Who was ordered by the senate to become commander in the conflict with King Mithridates?
What political party did Lucius Cornelius Sulla belong to?
Who had successfully passed a law whose sole purpose was to lessen the power of the tribunate?
What happened after Sulla returned to the conflict with Mithridates?
How many years was normal to span between offices prior to the populares controlling the city?
Who were slaughtered upon the arrival of Sulla in Rome?
In what year did Sulla die?
In what year did Sulla succesfully take over the populares controlled city?
Which leader had achieved peace with Mithridates?
Where in the year 77 BC was an uprising?
Which former lieutenant of Sulla had dismantled most of the constitution that Sulla had crafted?
In what year was the election held that let Pompey and Crassus obtain the seat of consul?
Who was the instigator in the slave revolt in Italy?
When did Pompey return to Rome after having quelled the uprising in Spain?
When did the movement that considered the use of peaceful means to solve the plight of lesser classes begin?
How many former consuls in Rome were executed as a result of a conspiracy?
What town was a common site of agitation within the area?
Who can lay claim to the destruction of Lucius Sergius Catilina's forces?
Which individual had planned an uprising that ideally would see the death of most of the Roman senators?
In which year would Julius Caesar hope to be elected to the position of consul?
What was the name of the private agreement between Caesar, Pompey, and Crassus?
What was Crassus agree to receive in the First Triumvirate agreement?
When did Julius Caesar return to Rome?
What provided the Roman senate with exuberance?
Who had tried to prevent the enactment of the laws that Caesar had proposed?
What type of case saw Cicero testify against Clodius?
Who enacted a law that would increase the partial grain subsidy?
Which individual lost his home to a fire?
Who was elected to the tribunate in 58 BC?
Who was responsible for the attacks on followers of Pompey?
What political position were Pompey and Crassus assured they would receive in 55 BC?
What caused the death of Julius Caesar's female offspring?
Which individual ran for consul in 55 BC?
Who was responsible for an expedition against the Parthian Kingdom?
In which year did Clodius die?
Who was responsible for the death of Clodius?
Who did the senators decide would aid them in their conflict with Caesar?
What type of powers were granted to Pompey by the senate?
Ultimately what forced the senate to abandon Rome and flee to Greece?
In Rome during this time who was considered to hold both the dictatorship and the position of the tribunate?
What power could Caesar use against the senate should he choose?
In what year was Caesar given the power of a censor?
What is considered to have counteracted the prestige of the senatorial aristocracy?
On what date was Caesar killed?
Who comprised most of the members of the conspiracy to assassinate Caesar?
What did some members of the conspiracy believe Caesar would bring back?
Why did many members of the senate flee the city after Caesar's death?
Who did Gaius Cassius and Marcus Brutus lead the conspiracy against?
Who was soon allied with Caesar's adopted son following his death?
In what battle did Mark Antony see defeat?
In what year did the Battle of Philippi end?
How did Mark Antony die?
What was the alliance that was formed with Marcus Lepidus named?
Who in Rome was responsible for imposing tribute on nations that they had conquered?
What could be considered a trait of Rome's military campaigns?
What was considered a problem in the Roman Republic during its last century?
What would often lead Rome to wage war in foreign lands?
Who introduced the phalanx formation into Rome's army?
Were Roman soldiers expected to purchase their own equipment?
Who were contained in the first rank of the phalanx formation?
From what people did it appear the Etruscans had model their form of warfare on?
Where did Dionysius hail from?
What was a detriment of using the phalanx formation?
In what century was the phalanx formation finally discarded by the Roman people?
What fighting formation would eventually replace the phalanx in battle?
Where is the likely source of the change to the manipular formation?
What type of ground could be found in the central Italian peninsula?
How many horseman were likely to be found in a single manipular legion?
Where could you expect the extensive amount of cavalry troops to be sourced from?
What often neglected social class was the light infantry comprised of?
What type of infantry joined light, and the cavalry in battle?
Small shields could be found in what section of the infantry?
Where did Rome receive half of their army from?
How many calvary did Rome's Italian allies use?
How many soldiers were available to Rome at the start of the Second Punic War?
What did Rome's Italian allies call their battle formation?
What allowed Rome to source some of their military from other nearby areas?
During what century did Roman controlled areas see a decline in their populations?
What caused the Roman state to provide armaments to their army?
What was considered an attributing factor to the decline of the Roman population?
What were soldiers expected to own prior to the year 217 BC?
Who was now able to join military service in 107 BC?
Where would legionaries in the Roman army likely to be sourced from?
Who would likely make up the majority of the Roman army's light infantry?
Which consul was responsible for the reforms that allowed all citizens access to join the Roman army?
What was the process that removed the property requirement for the Roman military called?
Around how many units could be expected to be contained within a cohort?
How many troops were placed into each tent group?
Who would now be used as scouts instead of fighting alongside the army in the battlefield?
What designation of troops was considered to make up the majority of a legion?
In which sea was a large amount of naval vessels sent in order to remove Cilician pirates?
Around how many ships were sent into service from Greek cities?
Who was ultimately responsible for the naval ships that were sent to the English Channel?
What was the driving force behind the revitalization of the Roman naval forces?
What aspect of the Roman military saw a decline in size after the subjugation of the Mediterranean?
What was the general source of the Roman senate's authority?
Who was responsible for overseeing a military action?
What was a motion that was enacted by the senate called?
What area was the likely focal point of the Roman senate?
What governing Roman body would self-select their own members during times of great distress?
What was the main requirement of seeking a trial in the Roman courts?
Who would be expected to oversee a capital case in the Roman courts?
Which designation of people made up the entirety of the members of a comitia?
Who did the assemblies elected by the optimo jure elect?
What type of assembly could specific groupings of optimo jure be found in?
What Roman assembly elected both magistrates and censors?
What profession of people made up the entireity of the Comitia Centuriata?
Which elected official had imperium powers?
Would the Comitia Centuriata occasionally be called upon to serve as the highest court of appeal?
How many tribes were considered to be in the Comitia Tributa?
How were the assembly of tribes segregated into specific tribes?
What assembly was responsible for the election of quaestors?
When would the assembly of tribes cease voting?
Who would be responsible for the election of a plebeian tribune?
Who had the right to grant powers to a magistrate?
What is considered to be the most authoritative constitutional power?
What did the constitutional power of imperium grant a magistrate?
What would be one of the duties that a newly elected magistrate could expect to perform?
What power was in possession of every single magistrate in Rome?
How long concurrently could an elected magistrate serve in office?
How many people would serve concurrently in a single magisterial office?
What form of due process was a harbinger of our vary own habeas corpus?
What would you call a magistrate who had his powers of imperium continued?
Who would a Roman go see in an attempt to reverse the decision of a magistrate?
Which official had supremacy in both civil and military matters?
Who was responsible for the adminstration of civil laws?
Who was responsible for the handling of the Roman census?
How long could an elected censor remain in office for?
What officer primarily had duties over finance matters?
How long could a dictator be appointed for in times of certain emergencies?
What would happen during the commencement of a dictator's term?
What type of offense was the harm of a tribute treated as?
What was the ultimate source of the tribunes powers?
Where did the bulk of the cities populace live?
What type of housing could be located in the city center?
From what local area in Rome is the word palace borrowed from?
How many areas in Rome could be called hills?
What culture did Rome have an extreme amount of influence on?
What language was commonly used in scholarly mathematical writings prior to the 19th century?
From which people were many facets of Roman culture copied from?
What was considered to be the dominant language in the Roman Republic?
Around what percentage of the Roman populace were thought to be slaves?
Where in the Roman Republic could slaves be acquired?
Were slave masters allowed to free their slaves in the Roman Republic?
What branch of law did Rome lack?
Who was responsible for seeking justice in the Roman courts?
What article of clothing could generally be found on a male Roman?
What garment was worn by male gendered adults to convey their status as a citizen of Rome?
What was typically worn after the loss of a loved one in the Roman Republic?
Which official would wear a garment containing broad red striping?
How did a womans garment typically vary from a mans in the Roman Republic?
When were the staple foods in the Roman republic typically eaten at?
What did people in the Roman Republic use to consume solid foods?
What type of food was cheese considered to be in Rome?
What form of expression did the Roman Horace practice?
What did Romans sit on when they had a meal at home?
What beverage was consumed by all the classes in the Roman Republic?
What was considered a compelling way to defame poltical rivals?
During what meals was wine commonly drank?
What was considered an indication of alcoholism in the Roman Republic?
How did Romans develop their male children as Roman citizens?
Who could be expected to obtain guidance in the art of weaving?
What Roman art involved speeches made to the public?
When did academic schooling begin in the Roman Republic?
What caused the Romans to conform several educational concepts to their own system?
What was the primary language of the Romans?
What type of language is French considered to be?
What type of Latin was likely spoken in Rome?
How would Vulgar Latin eventually differ from Classical Latin?
Which Germanic originating language densely acquired aspects from Latin?
Who was responsible for massively affecting Roman literature?
What style of literature could commonly be found in Roman works?
Who was the author of the epic poem Aeneid?
What Roman poet attempted to develop science in their poetry?
Which epic poem tells the tale of the founding of the city that one day would become Rome?
What was a primary cause of the modification of Roman architectural elements?
What Roman construction material has continued to be a mystery to this day?
Do any Roman structures still exist in our time?
What facet of the capital city was emulated by other urban centers in the Roman Republic?
What was the name of the area in which youth played and exercised?
What could you also call Rome's Campus Maritus?
What is the Roman board game Tabula a precursor to?
What was Roman version of Chess called?
When did the Roman religion that is generally identified with the republic first established? 
Who did the Romans adapt several of their religious convictions from?
Where did a large amount of the deities that were worshiped in Roman civilization come from?
What religious element could be found in all Roman households?
What in Roman society was considered to be a temple to the gods?
When do most people believe the Pacific War began?
On what date did Japan attack Pearl Harbor?
When did the Second Sino-Japanese War begin?
Which countries did the Second Sino-Japanese War encompass?
Has Japan ever attacked Thailand?
What is the generally accepted date the Pacific War started?
When did Japan invade Manchuria?
What nation initiated hostilities?
When did Japan invade China?
What was the Pacific War theater part of after December 1941?
What events ended the war with Japan?
On what date did Japan surrender?
What changed in the ruling of Japan after the war?
Where did Japan's surrender occur?
What was the process called whereby the leader of Japan stepped down?
What nation were the allies against?
What nations comprised the Axis?
What cities were destroyed by atom bombs?
When did the Soviet Union invade Manchuria?
When did Japan surrender?
What role did Thailand play in the war?
Which group controlled Chinese costal regions?
Which army invaded Burma?
Burma was formerly annexed by what country?
What states assisting Japan was Thailand a part of?
What year did Thailand form an alliance with Japan?
What army invaded northeastern Burma?
What were the Japanese puppet states?
Who controlled the coast of China?
Did the U.S. believe that Thailand was an Axis ally?
What does the U.S. believe caused Thailand to help Japan?
Is Thailand treated differently than other Axis countries?
According to the USA, what country did Japan blackmail?
What nations were occupied by the Axis?
After 1945, how did the USA treat Thailand?
Who occupied Thailand according to the USA?
Where did many of Japan's soldiers come from?
What type of soldiers came from Hong Kong? 
What other Asian country, a group of islands, helped the Japanese?
What French forces assisted Japan?
What colonies did Japan conscript soldiers from?
Who were the collaborators assisting Japan in Hong King?
Did Mexico play a part in the war?
What other major continent participated as an ally of the U.S.?
On which side of the war were the Chinese?
What colonies did the Netherlands possess?
What large Asian country was allied with the United States?
What was the name of the Philippines nation?
What nation possessed the Dutch East Indies?
What nation possessed west New Guinea?
Who controled Indochina in 1940?
Who were the Axis Powers along with Japan in 1940?
When did Japan invade Indochina?
Did Japan and Germany work closely together prior to 1944?
When did Japan take over Indochina?
Who controlled Indochina before the Japanese takeover?
When did Japan become an Axis power?
How much coordination was there between Japan and Germany?
How many nations comprised the Axis powers?
Why did the Chinese ultimately fail in its counter offensives?
What policy did Japan adopt to retaliate against China?
What slowed the Japanese in their attacks on China?
In what city did Japan set up a provisional capital?
What was Japan's "Three Alls Policy"?
What year did China and Japan reach a stalemate?
Where was the Chinese provisional capital?
What natural obsticles stalled the Japanese offensive against the Chinese?
What group organised guerrilla warfare against the Japanese in China?
Who was the leader of the Nationalist government?
When did cooperation between communist and nationalist forces end?
Did Japan support rival governments?
When did the co-operation between Chinese nationalist forces and communists end?
What was Wang Jingwei's government considered?
What government did Chiang Kai-shek lead?
Which Japanese Admiral felt it was necessary to go to war with the U.S.?
Why was the Dutch East Indies important to Japan?
In what year did the Greater East Asia Co-Prosperity Sphere expand?
Who said a showdown between Japan and the United States would be necessary?
What was the importance of the Dutch East Indies to Japan?
By what year did Japanese strategists expand their concept of the Greater East Asia Co-Prosperity Sphere?
What were these embargoes called by the Japanese media?
What did The West do to disuade Japan in China and French Indochina?
Why was denying supplies important to the western countries?
Why did Western powers stop selling resources to Japan?
How did Japan view Western embargos?
What percent of oil made up Japan's domestic consumption?
What did the Japanese media refer to the embargoes as?
How many U.S. battleships were incapacitated in the Pearl Harbor attacks?
Was America at war when Japan attacked Pearl Harbor?
How many Americans died in the Pearl Harbor attacks?
Why did Japan attack America?
What were the most vital American ships at the time of the attack?
When did Japan launch the aattack on Pearl Harbor?
How many American battleships were put out of action in the attack on Pearl Harbor by Japan?
How many US citizens were killed in the attack on Pearl Harbor by Japan?
How many aircraft did the United States lose in the attack on Pearl Harbor by Japan?
Where were the American aircraft carriers during the attack on Pearl Harbor by Japan?
What program allowed America to sell military supplies to Britain and the Soviet Union?
On what day did the U.S. and its allies declar war on Japan?
How long after the Pearl Harbor attacks did Germany and Italy declare war?
Was Germany's declaration of war with the U.S. considered to be sound strategy?
how many members did the America First Committee have?
What group was opposed to American involvement in the war in Europe?
When did the United States declare war on Japan?
How many days after the attack on Pearl Harbor did Germany wait to declare war on the United States?
Who predicted Germany's declaration of war against the United States months before?
What date was the first official use of the term United Nations?
Who was appointed to command the Allied forces in Southeast Asia in 1942?
When did General Wavell assume control of the Southheast Asia Allied forces?
How spread out were the Allied forces in Southeastern Asia?
Where did General Wavell command the Allied forces from?
What islands did Japan invade?
When did Allied forces surrender Singapore to the Japanese?
How many Allied prisoners did Japan take after the Battle of Singapore?
When did General Wavell resign as commander of the Allied forces of Southeastern Asia?
After Wavell resigned from ABDACOM, What post did he return to?
When did the Chinese attack Burma?
How many British soldiers were rescued by the Chinese 38th Division on April 16??
Who led the rescue of British forces during the Battle of Yenangyaung?
How many of Chiang Kai-Shek's troops were controlled by warlords?
What was Chiang Kai-Shek's strongest army?
How many Australian divisions steamed from the Mid-East for Singapore?
Where did Churchill want the Australian divisions bound for Singapore to be diverted to?
What Japanese group opposed an invasion of Australia?
What was the capital of Papua?
What country did Japan isolate Australia from with a blockade?
Who ordered General MacArthur to make a defense plan with Australia?
When was General MacArthur ordered to make a defense plan with Australia?
Who was the Supreme Commander of the South West Allied forces?
Where was MacArthur's headquarters moved to in March of 1942?
How many Japanese submarines shelled Sydney on June 8, 1942?
What American president was a member of the Pacific War Council?
When was the Pacific War Council formed in Washingto D.C.?
Who was President Roosevelt's key advisor?
Where was the U.S.-UK Combined Chiefs of Staff located?
Where was the Australian and Dutch guerilla campaign led?
In Yamamoto's plan, what northern islands were to be attacked?
What was the second stage objective of Yamaoto's plan?
How many planes did Nagumo have for the Midway invasion?
How many planes did the United States have in the Battle of Midway?
How many U.S. planes were land-based?
When did the Japanese fleet arrive off Midway?
How many TBD Devastator torpedo bombers were lauched from the Hornet?
How many times did Nagumo change orders for arming his aircraft?
How many carriers did Nagumo have at the Battle of Midway?
What were on the decks of the Japanese aircraft carriers when the American dive bobers attacked?
What mountains did the Australian battalions fight a rearguard action over on the Kokoda Track?
What forces releived the worn Australian reserve battalions? 
In 1942, what Australian Air Force base was attacked by Japanese marines?
Where was Milne Bay located in New Guinea?
What theater did the Second Australian Imperial Force come from before they relieved the reserve battalions in New Guinea?
Where were most of the Japanese aircraft in the South Pacific redeployed to defend?
Where did Japanese ground attack repeatedly?forces 
What did the Allies call the Japanese convoys supplying the ground forces attacking Henderson Field?
What was the reason for the name "Ironbottom Sound" of the water stretches new Guadalcanal?
When did the Japanese give up trying to recapture Henderson Field?
What Allied command replaced the British India Command in August, 1943?
Who was appointed Supreme Commander of the SEAC in October, 1943?
Who was deputy commander to Mountbatten?
What was the name of the new link between India and China by land?
The British and Indian Fourteenth Army was formed to take on what force?
What did the United States turn it's industry to in the two years folloing the Battle of Midway?
How were the bypassed Japanese strongholds neutralized?
What blockade against Japan  was to be improved on?
What percentage of Japanese merchantmen were sunk by U.S. submarines?
What percentage of Japanese warships were sunk by U.S. submarines?
What future U.S. president was rescued by a submarine?
What was one of the important roles submarine played in the war?
What doctrine did Roosevelt give for submarines against Japan?
Who was the Dutch Admiral in charge of the East Indies?
What was the nickname given to the Dutch Admiral in charge of the East Indies?
What was the first Japanese warship to be sunk by submarine?
When was the first Japanese warship sunk by a submarine?
What doctrine stated that only fleet battles could win naval campaigns?
What was commerce raiding refered to as?
What was the primary use of Japanese submarines?
When was the Japanese submarine offensive against Australia?
What did the Japanese submarine offensive against Austrailia achieve?
What did the US Navy rely on?
What led to guerrilla submarine missions in early 1942?
What did Admiral Nimitze rely on submarines for?
When were the defective torpedo problems of the US Navy corrected?
What was the "maru code"?
What was the code name for the mid-1944 offensive across China?
Where did the Chinese stop the Operation Ichi-Go incursion?
What was the largest Japanese offensive in World War II?
Who was able to take advantage of the social confusion created by Operation Ichi-Go?
How many casualties did the Japanese suffer during Operation Ichi-Go?
What command prepared offensives into Burma after the Allied setbacks in 1943?
Who led Chinese and American troops for NCAC?
What road did the NCAC extend into northern Burma?
Who advanced aling the Arakan Province coast?
Who did aircraft drop supplies to isolated units until they could be relieved?
What month did the Japanese launch an offensive into India?
Who commanded the Japanese Fifteenth Army in Operation U-Go?
Where had the Japanese advanced to?
What did the Japanese cut?
What had the Japanese failed to capture?
What happened to Mutaguchi's troops?
When was the Japanese siege of Imphal broken?
How many troops had the Japanese lost?
What was the main cause of death of the Japanese troops?
What battle was the advance in the Arakan halted to release troops for?
Who aided the Americans and Chinese during the advance in northern Burma?
What fortified position was captured by the Chinese Expeditionary Force?
When did the Chinese invade northern Burma?
What airfield was taken by the NCAC in August, 1944?
What was it imperative for the Japanese to hold?
How many fleet carriers did the U.S. Fifth Fleet have?
How many fleet planes did the U.S. Fifth Fleet have?
What was the search radius of U.S. Navy Hellcat fighters?
How many carriers did Ozawa have?
How many of Ozawa's submarines were sunk by American destroyers?
In what sequence did Japanese planes arrive at their targets?
How many American warships were damaged during the Great Marianas Turkey Shoot?
Where did the radio interception orders to U.S> Hellcat fighters come from?
Who gave the directive for all carriers in the US Navy to have combat information centers?
On what day did U.S> planes located Ozawa's fleet?
How many miles away was Ozawa's fleet located?
How many planes did the U.S. lose?
How many planes did Japan lose?
How many U.S. aircrews were lost?
What is argued to be the largest naval battle in history?
When did the Battle of Leyte Gulf occur?
When did Nimitz launch a carrier raid against Formosa?
What was the largest naval battle in World War II?
What did Nimitz favor blockading?
Who would enter Leyte Gulf to attack the Allied landing forces?
How many Japanese forces were likely to be destroyed?
What was the namee of the plan where Ozawa's force would lure the U.S. 3rd Fleet away from Leyte?
How many battleships were in Kurita's "Center Force"?
How many cruisers were in Kurita's "Center Force"?
How many destroyers were in Kurita's "Center Force"?
When did Kurita's force enter the Sibuyan Sea?
When did Kurita pass through the San Bernardino Strait?
Where did Kurit head after passing through the San Bernardino Strait?
Admiral Kincaid commanded what three groups of the Seventh Fleet?
What broke the Japanes formations under Kurita?
How many of Kurita's heavy cruisers were sunk?
What were the Leyte beachheads of the U.S. Sixth Army secured from?
When did Operation Ten-Go occur?
How many battleships did Kurita begin Operation Ten-Go with?
What was the last battleship in history to engage in combat with another battleship?
Which battleship was still capable of combat when Kurita returned to Japan?
When did the U.S. Sixth Army land on the eastern shore of Leyte?
Where did the Japanese rush reinforcments to on the western side of Leyte?
What force devastated resupply attempts by the Japanese?
Fighting continued on Leyte for how long?
What was the neighboring island to the north of Leyte.
Landings were made on the beaches of what island on December 15, 1944?
Lingayen Gulf operations supported what landings?
Who led the Sixth Army?
Clark field was how many miles northwest of Manila?
What island was between Borneo and Mindoro?
What island was invaded by the Eighth Army on February 28?
Where did the Eighth Army land?
Who aided U.S. forces in finding Japanese holdouts in the Philippines?
What is the western-most Philippine island?
What was "Operation Detachment"?
When did "Operation Detachment" occur?
How many square miles is the island of Iwo Jima?
Iwo Jima is halfway between the Mariana Islands and what city?
How many airfields were on Iwo Jima?
How many miles of hidden tunnel were on the island?
What were the pillboxes and bunkers connected by?
Who transformed the island into a fortress?
Who did the network of fortifications on the island favor?
When did Iwo Jima come under bombardment?
How many men landed on Iwo Jima on February 19, 1945?
What was the name of the mountain on Iwo Jima?
How many U.S. Marines were killed by the time thhey reached the west coast of the island?
What marine regiment reached the summit of Mount Suribachi?
When was the summit of Mount Suribachi reached by U.S. marines?
Who said "there will be a Marine Corps for the next 500 years"?
When was the island of Iwo Jima secured by the Americans?
How many Japanese prisoners were taken on Iwo Jima?
What was the capital of Burma?
What was the principle port of Burma?
When was Operation Dracula launched?
What force was delayed by Japanese rearguards north of Rangoon?
What month was a delay caused by Japanese rearguards north of Rangoon?
How many British and Australian prisoners survived out of about 2500 around Sandakan?
Sandakan was located in what providence?
In 1945, how many years had Japan already been at war with China?
What battle did the Japanese Army begin to prepare for in March 1945?
How many Japanese soldiers were mobilized to capture the Chinese airfields and railroads in West Hunan?
Who was the Chinese commander-in-chief of the 10th and 27th Army Groups?
When did Chinese forces retake Guangxi?
What percent of Japanese troops died on Okinawa?
Using a total blockade and air raids, what did the US Navy hope to force?
How many Japanese troops defended Okinawa?
How did the Japanese attempt to cause high Allied casualties?
What date does Japan consider the end of the Pacific War?
What day is know in the United States as "V-J Day"?
When did Japan formally have signed the surrender?
On what battleship was the surrender document signed by the Japanese delagation?
Who accepted the Japanese surrender?
About how many Australians were taken prisoner after the fall of Singapore and British Malaya?
In what year did Japan establish a base in New Guinea?
What date was the Australian mainland first attacked?
What mainland Australian city was attacked by the Japanese on February 19?
For how many months was Australia attacked from the air by Japan?
Richmond is located at what line of the James river?
At what intersections is the Richmond located?
What counties are located? around Washington.D.C?
What suburb is located on the southwest?
What suburb is located on the north and west?
What are the major roads in Richmond?
What is the closest historically famous city is 44 miles away?
What counties surround Richmond?
Name at least two major suburbs of Richmond.
How many miles east of Richmond is Williamsburg?
How many kilometers west of Charlottesville is Richmond?
Leaving Washington DC, what cardinal direction would one travel to reach Richmond?
What is Richmond's southwestern suburb?
Where is Short Pump located in relation to Richmond?
What things are important to the economy of Richmond?
What judicial branches are located in Richmond?
There is a Federal Reserve Bank located in Richmond.  How many are there, total?
Name a Fortune 500 company with it's headquarters in Richmond
Along with law and finance, what is a major component of Richmond's economy?
What circuit of the US Court of Appeals is based in Richmond?
How many circuit courts of appeal are there in the United States?
How many Federal Reserve Banks exist?
Along with MeadWestvaco, what Fortune 500 company is based in Richmond?
What year did Patrick Henry give his speech?
What happened on April 18, 1780?
What did Patrick Henry's speech encourage to happen?
What's one reason the capital was moved to Richmond?
Who was Governor of Virginia in 1781
What did Patrick Henry's famous speech persuade Virginians to send delegates to?
What was the capital of Virginia prior to Richmond?
What general led the troops that burned Richmond?
Who led the militia that defended Richmond?
Who was the governor of Virginia in 1781?
What man-made body of water was designed in part by George Washington?
To where was the canal designed by Washington intended to ferry water?
To what city was Henry Brown shipped as freight?
What was Henry Brown's nickname?
What sort of economic center was Richmond in the wake of the American Revolution?
On what date was Virginia's secession from the Union?
After leaving the Union, what nation did Virginia join?
Along with 1864-5, what year notably saw US campaigns directed at Richmond?
What was the name of the biggest factory in the Confederate States of America?
What was the name of the first ironclad warship that saw combat?
What is another name for the Confederacy's executive mansion?
How far away from the Confederate executive mansion was the Virginia State Capitol?
Who commanded the Union armies during the Seven Days Battles?
Where was Petersburg located in relation to Ford Stedman?
5000 men represented what fraction of General Lee's army?
On what road did the US Army Sixth Corps shatter the Confederate line?
What general commanded the attack on Fort Stedman?
In what month of 1865 was Richmond judged to be no longer able to be defended?
What was contained in warehouses that were notably burned by Confederates when evacuating Richmond?
What general received the surrender of Richmond?
On what day did the Confederacy surrender Richmond to the Union?
By what means did Davis leave Richmond?
What percentage of Richmond was destroyed by fire after the Confederate evacuation?
What was the date before the day Lincoln entered Richmond?
How many soldiers did Lee have remaining when he surrendered?
To what state did Davis travel after Lee surrendered?
In what structure did Lee surrender to Grant?
How many years did Davis spend in Fort Monroe?
What mode of transportation took over from the canals?
What sort of railroad crossing was first built at Richmond?
Who was the inventor of the cigarette-rolling machine?
From what city did James Bonsack originate?
What was the name of the first American trolley system powered by electricity?
When the 1900s began, how many people lived in Richmond?
How many square kilometers was Richmond at the start of the 20th century?
What percentage of Richmond's 1900 population was African American?
What was another name for Richmond's Jackson Ward?
Who was the inaugural president of the St. Luke Penny Savings Bank?
When did the so-called downtown boom in Richmond end?
About how many structures were built in Richmond during the downtown boom?
What combined with the Richmond Professional Institute to form Virginia Commonwealth University?
In what direction did Richmond's borders expand in 1970?
People of what county did not want to join Richmond circa 1970?
What neighborhood is located in between Church and Shockoe Hill?
What Richmond neighborhood is home to the Jefferson Hotel?
What neighborhood of Richmond contains St. John's Church?
What is Fairfield Court?
In what year was the Richmond street grid first developed?
The neighborhood of Newtowne West is north of what street?
Along with Newtowne West, to what neighborhood is Carver regarded as having comparable demographics?
What Richmond street contains a notable amount of Victorian buildings?
In what part of Richmond is the Virginia Museum of Fine Arts found?
What is the primary race of the population of the Randolph neighborhood?
What name is given to the part of Richmond located to the south of the James?
Along with the affluent, what is the socioeconomic class of the inhabitants of the Southside?
What notable public housing projects are present in the Southside?
Prior to joining Richmond, what county was a significant portion of Southside part of?
What is the economic status of the Manchester part of Richmond?
What season in Richmond is most likely to see periods of dryness?
How many times does Richmond receive 7.6 centimeters or more of snow in a 24 hour period annually?
About how many centimeters of snow does Richmond experience in the fall?
During what span of 2010 did snowfall remain for a significant amount of time on the ground in Richmond?
What types of ice storms sometimes hit Richmond?
What is the most likely month for the James to flood Richmond?
What month sees the lowest likelihood of the James flooding?
In 1955, Richmond was hit with three hurricanes in how many weeks?
In 1955, what two hurricanes occurred within a week of one another?
What hurricane hit Richmond in 2004?
What crime notably increased in Richmond over the course of the 1980s?
In 1985, how many people were murdered in Richmond?
How many people per 100,000 were murdered in Richmond in 1990?
How many murders occurred in Richmond in 1995?
What is the oldest Presbyterian church in Richmond?
Who was a notable congregant at Second Presbyterian Church?
What architectural style was Second Presbyterian Church built in?
On what date did the oldest Catholic church open in Richmond?
In what year was Richmond's First Baptist Church founded?
Where did Richmond's Nation of Islam members initially meet?
On what street is Masjid Bilal located?
What was Masjid Bilal previously known as?
What year saw the establishment of the Islamic Center of Virginia?
On what street can Shabaaz Restaurant be found?
How many Indian-descended families lived in or around Richmond in 2011?
What does CCI stand for?
In what county can CCI be found?
What road is CCI near?
Along with CCI, what is the other Hindu gathering place near Richmond?
What federal court is located in Richmond?
Along with Philip Morris and CapitalOne, what prominent corporation is present in Richmond?
What type of business is LeClairRyan?
When did the Troutman Sanders-Mays & Valentine LLP merger occur?
How many Federal Reserve Banks exist in the United States?
How many square meters of space does Virginia BioTechnology Research Park consist of?
What does the United Network for Organ Sharing do?
What was the cost of the Philip Morris R&D facility opened at the Virginia BioTechnology Research Park?
When did Philip Morris' R&D facility open?
What Virginia Commonwealth University campus is near Virginia BioTechnology Research Park?
What movie, which filmed in Richmond, featured Daniel Day-Lewis?
Who notably appeared in Killing Kennedy?
On what television channel can the show Turn be seen?
When will Mercy Street first be shown on television?
What channel is Killing Kennedy on?
According to MarketWatch, where did Richmond rank among cities for business?
What did MarketWatch think was the fourth best city for business?
What type of business is Dominion Resources?
Prior to moving to the Richmond area, where was Altria's headquarters located?
What company moved to Richmond from Connecticut?
Where is SunTrust Bank headquartered?
What city is the headquarters of McKesson located in?
Who owns Philip Morris USA?
What DuPont factory is located in the Richmond area?
What was the former name of UPS Freight?
What architectural style was the 1919 Broad Street Union Station constructed in?
How far away from the Virginia Center for Architecture is the Children's Museum of Richmond?
What district of Richmond is the Virginia Historical Society located in?
What museum is next to the Science Museum of Virginia?
In what former industrial facility is the Richmond National Battlefield Park Visitors Center located?
What government building is the Museum of the Confederacy located near?
What is another name for the Davis Mansion?
On what Richmond street did General Lee live for a while?
Where are the Reconciliation Statues outside Richmond located?
What office was held by the inhabitant of the John Marshall House?
How many United States presidents are interred in Hollywood Cemetery?
Who gave a speech that contained the famous saying "Give me liberty or give me death"?
Where did Patrick Henry deliver his memorable speech?
What was the nickname of Bill Robinson?
Near what park is the monument dedicated to the person traditionally regarded as discovering America?
How many bells are contained in the World War I Memorial Carillon?
The dead of what war were the first to be commemorated by the Virginia War Memorial?
In what neighborhood is the monument to Bill Robinson located?
What notable project was funded by Richmond's "admissions tax"?
Along with blues and bluegrass, what is a type of folk music traditional to Virginia?
Along with busking and itinerant folk shows, what is an example of venueless art?
Along with Hamilton Glass and El Kamino, who is a mural artist local to Richmond?
What periodical has attempted to attract internationally known mural artists to Richmond?
What Richmond street art gathering has brought mural artists to the city?
In what city did Lewis Hallam present Shakespeare's plays?
What family of actors notably performed in 19th century Richmond?
What is Virginia Museum Theater known as today?
During what decade did the Virginia Museum most significantly work to promote theater in Richmond?
What disaster destroyed many of the early buildings in Richmond?
What percentage of Richmond's buildings were burned in a single fire in 1865?
What is the name of the era from which the building housing the Edgar Allan Poe Museum dates?
Prior to what year was the Patterson-Schutte House built?
What United States city has the most cast iron architecture?
In what year did iron production in Richmond peak?
How many more iron workers than construction workers were being employed in Richmond in 1890?
Along with Jackson and Monroe Wards, what neighborhood notably features cast-iron fences?
Who was the designer of the Federal Reserve Building?
Who designed the General Assembly Offices at the Eighth and Main Building?
What architectural style was the Rice House designed in?
What university was Landis Gores associated with?
Who did Landis Gores design a home for?
What Native American tribe at one time lived on Belle Isle?
During what conflict was Belle Isle used as a prison?
Between Brown's Island and Belle Isle, which is bigger?
On what island does the James River Beer and Seafood Festival take place?
How often does Friday Cheers take place on Brown's Island?
What part of Richmond is Maymont close to?
How many kilometers long is the track in Byrd Park?
How many monuments can be found in Byrd Park?
In what year was the World War I Memorial Carillon constructed?
What was previously located at the present location of Forest Hill Park?
What sport do the Washington Redskins play?
What sport do the Richmond Kickers compete in?
With what Major League Baseball team are the Richmond Flying Squirrels associated?
What is the home ground of the Richmond Kickers?
Where did the Richmond Braves move to?
What company owns the company that owns the Richmond Times-Dispatch?
How many people buy the Richmond Times-Dispatch on Sunday?
What newspaper is published by Landmark Communications?
Before switching to its current publication schedule, how often was RVA Magazine published?
Along with the Voice, what is Richmond's black-oriented news publication?
Per Nielsen, how many homes exist in the Richmond-Petersburg DMA?
Where does the Richmind-Petersburg DMA rank in the United States?
With what network is WUPV 65 affiliated?
What type of channel is WCVW 57?
What Richmond-area station is affiliated with CBS?
How many representatives make up the Richmond city council?
What official is in charge of Richmond's executive branch?
How many years does the term of a Richmond city council representative last?
On what day of the week does the city council meet?
In what month does the city council not meet?
What is A. Carl Prince's religious affiliation?
What is the current mayor of Richmond?
In what year was the first black Baptist minister elected to the city council?
In what district did A. Carl Prince win election to the city council?
What political organization supported the city council candidacy of A. Carl Prince?
How many kilometers away from Richmond is Richmond International Airport?
About how long does it take to drive from Richmond International Airport to Williamsburg?
How many airlines operate out of Richmond International?
What percentage increase in passenger traffic did Richmond International experience between 2005 and 2006?
What direction do you travel to get from Richmond to Sandston?
What is the street address if the Greyhound bus terminal in Richmond?
How long does a bus trip from Richmond to New York City take?
What is the lowest fare on Megabus?
How much did the Department of Transportation give to Richmond for its Rapid Transit System?
What city in Maryland does Megabus travel to?
What counties does the GRTC link to Richmond?
Along with Short Pump, what comprises the far part of the West End?
According to a GRTC report, what is an example of what most of its riders lack?
What is GRTC an initialism of?
What station services all southern rail traffic passing through Richmond?
What is the name of the railroad station inside Richmond proper?
In what year was Richmond's railroad station renovated?
Along with Williamsburg, what city's rail traffic uses the Main Street Station?
Why does the Main Street Station only receive rail traffic from Newport News and Williamsburg?
Who is Richmond's electricity supplier?
How many states does Dominion Virginia Power operate in?
Along with Surry Nuclear Generating Station, what is Richmond's main electricity generator?
In what town is a coal-fired plant that provides power to Richmond located?
What type of power plant is Darbytown?
How many kilometers of sewer lines exist in Richmond?
How much water is contained in Shockoe Retention Basin?
How many Richmond inhabitants get their water from the wastewater treatment plant?
How much sewage and stormwater can the treatment plant adjacent to the James River treat daily?
In what year did San Diego officially become a city?
Who was San Diego's first mayor?
What happened two years after San Diego elected it's first mayor?
Who controlled San Diego's charter for 2 years after it was revoked by California legislature?
When was San Diego's current charter adopted?
What was the main flaw of San Diego's original location?
Who developed New San Diego that was south of the first location?
Who was largely responsible for the population growth of Downtown San Diego?
What happened in 1878 that played a role in San Diego's economic growth?
What was San Diego's downtown area originally called?
What names was given to coastal artillery batteries erected shortly after 1852?
What was the name of Charles A. Lindbergh's plane that was built in San Diego by Ryan Airlines?
What was the original name of today's Marine Corps Air Station Miramar?
What branch of the military began to have a strong presence in San Diego in 1901?
What airplane developer was founded in San Diego in 1923?
When did San Diego's population grow so rapidly that it nearly doubled?
What was the name of the attack the Japanese had planned against San Diego?
What were the Japanese originally going to drop on San Diego from their kamikaze planes?
Why didn't the Japanese launch their planned attack on September 22, 1945?
How many civilians were the Japanese hoping to kill during their planned attack on San Diego?
What nickname was San Diego given by the tuna canning industry in the 1970s?
How many jobs were created by the mid-1930s thanks to San Diego's tuna cannery that was developed in 1911?
Why were the canneries ultimately closed by the early 1980s?
Immigrants from what country were primarily hired by the fishing fleets that supported the canneries??
From what region in Portugal did immigrants come from to work in San Diego's fishing industry?
In what direction does the San Diego River run through the city?
What bodies of water can be found separating different developed areas of the city?
What is created by the many canyons and hills throughout San Diego?
What divides the city's northern and southern segments?
Where did the San Diego River once flow to?
What was the first skyscraper built in San Diego that was over 300-feet tall?
How tall is One America Plaza?
What played a role in determining the maximum height skyscrapers can be in San Diego?
What organization regulates building heights in San Diego?
What bank spent time as being the tallest building in San Diego?
What trees are protected along the coast of San Diego?
What drought-resistant shrub is San Diego known for?
Where can one find the most sage scrub in San Diego?
How is San Diego able to offer everything from tidal marsh to canyons?
What disadvantage comes along with sage scrub habitats?
How many bird species have been observed in San Diego?
What birding event does the Audubon Society host every year?
What is special about the animal and plant species found in San Diego?
What word describes San Diego County due to the many birds residing there?
What flyway contributes to the diverse bird population in San Diego County?
When did California's largest wildfire of the century take place?
How many acres were burned in the historic Cedar Fire of 2003?
Why did San Diego schools close during the Cedar Fire?
How many years after the Cedar Fire did additional fires destroy Rancho Santa Fe?
How many homes were destroyed in the Cedar Fire?
What was the population density of San Diego in 2009?
What ethnicity made up 15.9.% of San Diego's population in 2009?
In 2009, what percentage of the population was Hispanic?
What was San Diego's population at the time of the 2010 census?
What was the population increase in San Diego from 2009 to 2010?
In what year was the household median income in San Diego at $45,733?
What was the median age of non-Hispanic whites in 2008?
What did the average salary increase to at the time of the 2008 census?
Of the population of individuals 55 and older, what percentage were non-Hispanic whites in 2008?
In 2008, which racial group had the most individuals under the age of 18?
What regional planning agency offers graphs and tables of census information for San Diego?
What percentage of San Diego's population was under the age of 18 in 2000?
Which age group accounted for 10.5% of the population in 2000?
In what year was the median age of residents in San Diego 35.6?
What percentage of the population in 2011 were millenials?
What percentage of the population fell below the poverty line in San Diego in 2005?
What did Money magazine rate San Diego as being in 2006?
What magazine rated San Diego as being the country's fifth wealthiest city?
In 2000,  what was the median salary for females in San Diego?
What percentage of familes were below the poverty line in 2005?
What type of tours attract a large number of visitors to San Diego?
What big event takes place in San Diego in November?
What historical mission is a major tourist attraction in San Diego?
What popular park in San Diego is home to the San Diego Zoo, SeaWorld, and countless museums?
What nickname has the city  been given as a result of its extensive craft beer industry?
Where is San Diego's border crossing?
How long is the border that San Diego shares with Mexico?
Where is the next nearest commercial crossing at the border?
How many border crossings does San Diego share with Mexico?
Why is San Diego known as an iHub Innovation Center?
What is San Diego's largest software company?
What cellular company is headquartered in San Diego that uses the AT&T network?
What sector does ESET fall under?
What cellular  company is one of the city's largest private-sector employers?
What institution has contributed to the growth of fuel biotechnology?
What city does San Diego come in second to in the biotech industry?
How many contract research organizations are in San Diego?
What two areas have the numerous research facilities and offices for biotech companies?
What two major biotech companies are headquartered in San Diego?
What museum has a branch at the Santa Fe Depot?
In what district can historic ship exhibits be found?
Where can one find the San Diego Zoo?
Which museum houses the USS Midway aircraft carrier?
What space-focused museum is in Balboa Park?
Who is the director of the San Diego Symphony? 
Where can one enjoy a performance directed by Christopher Ashley?
What did Opera America call the San Diego Opera at the Civic Center Plaza?
Which theater is known for hosting a variety of musicals and plays?
How far back to San Diego's roots in the arts and theater sector go?
What tournament used to be known as the Buick Invitational?
How many times were the America's Cup yacht races hosted by the San Diego Yacht Club from 1988 to 1955?
What beach sport was inveted in San Diego?
What yacht-related event is held annually in Mission Bay?
What golf course hosts the Farmers Insurance Open?
Who votes in the city's attorney and mayor?
How long is the term for council members?
Were there more Democrats or Republicans in 2007?
Who is Kevin Faulconer?
Who elects members of city council?
Why was Mayor Bob Filner asked to resign?
How many women claimed to be sexually harassed by Filner?
What was Filner's sentence?
When did a mediation process begin between Filner and a city representative?
How long did Filner's trial last?
What happened to the crime rate in San Diego between 1990 and 2000?
What did Business Insider call San Diego in 2013?
In what place did Forbes rank San Diego on it's top 10 list?
What percentage did the crime rate in San Diego drop from 2002 to 2006?
What type of crime increased between 2002 and 2006?
Which television station began broadcasting  on May 16, 1949?
What is San Diego's cable penetration rate?
Why was San Diego eligible for two VHF channels?
In what year did UHF channels beging being licensed by the FCC?
What independent station is in San Diego?
How many duopolies does the Mexico side of San Diego-Tijuana have?
What two stations are owned by Azteca?
What company owns XHDTV-TV and XHAS-TV?
Which station is ran by Bay City Television?
What is another name Free Radio San Diego is known by?
In addition to Free Radio San Diego, what other pirate station is in San Diego?
What is the largest nationwide broadcaster in San Diego?
Which language are some local radio stations available in?
What is the exact setting for FM News & Talk?
What major interstate runs from Tijuana to Los Angeles?
Where does Interstate 805 split from I-5?
Which interstate directly connects the east with the Arizona Sun Corridor and Imperial County?
What two major cities are Inland Empire connected to via Interstate 15?
What percentage of San Diego's residents rely on theri automobile as a primary source of transportation?
What areas of San Diego are primarily served by the trolley?
What public transportation is in the works to be completed by 2018?
How many Amtrak stations are in San Diego?
What number can you dial from any phone for public transportation information in San Diego?
Where do the Amtrak and Coaster trains primarily run?
What is the name given to the highly congested spot where Interstates 5 and 805 meet?
What tollway connects Otay Mesa with SR 54?
Which terminal was expanded in the San Diego International Airport in 2013?
What type of special lanes were added to Interstate 15?
In 2007, what percentage of the roads in San Diego were considered acceptable?
What type of ceramic art was popular from the 8th to the 18th century in the art of Islam?
Which ceramic glazing was developed by those potters which were Islamic?
Where would one find the earliest examples of opaque glazes in the Muslim world?
Around when were the first opaque glazes developed?
Where were stone-paste ceramics invented?
Layla and Majnun is an example of what kind of poetry?
Which era is Layla and Majnun from?
In what century does Layla and Majnun originate?
What kind of story is told in Shahnameh?
Who wrote Shahnameh?
What is another name for Ibn Tufail?
What Arabic book is Ibn Tufail noted for writing?
Who wrote Theologus Autodidactus?
What person wrote The Incoherence of the Philosophers?
Who was the main chracter of Philosophus Autodidactus?
Which year did a translation of Philosophus Autodidactus in Latin come to be?
Who wrote Robinson Crusoe?
Who first translated Philosophus Autodidactus into latin?
Simon Ockley translated Philosophus Autodidactus into English, in what year did he do that?
What book is Robert Boyle believe to have written after being inspired by Philosophus Autodidactus?
In what year was Kitab al-Miraj likely translated into Latin?
Who wrote the Divine Comedy?
Which works by Shakespeare is believed to be inspired by The Moors?
In what century is it believed that delegations of Moors began to influence western works by the likes of Shakespeare?
What aspects from Islamic works did the Divine Comedy feature?
Which philosopher of the Muslim world is considered an important author of work on evolution?
Ibn al-Haytham can be known by another name, what is it?
What type of work is Ibn al-Haytham known to have pioneered?
Who is considered to have been the one that founded Illuminationist philosophy?
Which philosopher in the Muslim world championed inductive logic in their works?
Ibn al-Haytham experimented with what around the year 1000?
Ibn al-Haytham wrote about his work around the year 1000, what was it?
Who is believed to have discovered decagonal quasicrystal geometry?
Regarding the intromission theory of light, who showed the first proof?
Which Muslim scientist worked on trigonometry?
What work is Mansur ibn Muhammad ibn al-Faqih Ilyas known for writing?
In what century did Tashrih al-badan come into being?
Who theorized about pulmonary circulation?
Who wrote The Canon of Medicine?
Who wrote Kitab al-Tasrif?
which crops were brought to europe from the Muslim World?
What was the windmill used for?
Trading in the Indian ocean was mainly controlled by whom?
Where was an important center of Indian Ocean trading in the 16th century?
When did the Portuguese arrive in the Indian Ocean?
How early did people in the Muslim World start using watermills?
In what century had mills such as gristmills and sawmills dominate the Islamic world?
At what point was the use of watermills common in the Muslim World?
Who invented crankshafts?
Who was the inventor of water turbines?
What percentage of the humans in the world are considered Muslim?
How many Muslims are believed to live on earth?
In how many nations are Muslims in the majority of people?
How many languages are spoken by Muslims?
What is the literacy rate in Kuwait?
In 2015 it was reported that what percentage of the Muslim World was not literate?
What organizations studied literacy in the Muslim World in 2015?
Which regions have the lowest rate of literacy in the Muslim world?
Which organization for scientific publications was established in Pakistan in 2002?
How much did the Higher Education Commission impact the number of PhDs in Pakistan?
What science university did Saudi Arabia establish?
Where is Zayed University?
How many universities were in Pakistan in 2001?
What is considered the most important work of Islamic architecture?
What type of decorations are used in Muslim world decorative art rather than pictures?
What is the definition of haram?
Where in Muslim architecture are pictures forbidden?
Where is one permitted to use representations of humans?
Why is depicting God forbidden in the Islamic world?
What do Muslims believe of the form of God?
How many sura's in the Quran begin with "In the name of God?"
What is the policy in the Muslim world on depicting Mohammed?
What other religions might one find depictions of God, or Prophets forbidden?
What is the repetitive use of geometric floral designs known as in Islamic art?
Islam forbade types of art found in what religions?
Miniature paintings of the Ottoman empire featured what kind of subjects?
What is one reason the art of Islam may be abstract?
In mosques domes may have what kind of scripts decorating them?
What are the main distinctive features of Islamic architecture?
What physical characteristics are common in Islamic architecture?
When did domes first appear in the architecture of the Muslim World?
Which mosque is believed to be the first with a dome?
When was the Taj Mahal constructed?
What is another name for the Shamsi Hijri calender?
What is one way to abbreviate the Solar Hiljri calender?
What is the customary calendar of Iran?
How many months are in the Shamsi Hijri calendar?
What is the first year of the Shamsi Hijri Calender based on?
How many Muslim nations require women to cover their legs, shoulders, or whole body?
What are the restrictions on the dress of Muslim women considered in the West?
Why do some Muslims oppose allowing women to reveal more of themselves?
In its most strict style what must a woman cover in some Muslim nations?
What resource does Iran have the largest supply of in the world?
What city is Iran's capital?
How does Iran effect the world economy and international energy markets?
What resource does Iran have the fourth largest supply of in the world?
How many UNESCO World Heritage Sites does Iran have?
What ancient city dates back as early as 4395 BC in Iran?
How long ago did ancient cultures and settlements exist across the Iranian plateau?
During what Age was Iran the site of several of these ancient civilizations?
Which ancient civilization in Iran during the 4th Millenium was the most prominent?
Elam's writing system had paralleled Sumer's cuneiform since what era?
Who dominated the area of Irea between the 10th Century BC to the late 7th Century BC?
When did this Civil War take place to free the Iranian peoples from Assyrian rule?
How long did the Assyrian Empire control and rule Iran?
Who lead the Persians into a coalition with the Medes, Babylon, Scythians, and Cimmerians to fight against the Assyrians?
When did the Median tribes unify under a single ruler to form the Median Empire?
Who founded the Achaemenid Empire when the city states in Iran came together in unification?
When did Cyrus the Great found the Achaemenid Empire?
Who triggered the Persian Revolt? 
What resulted from the Persian Revolt?
What was the first world goverment the world had seen at the time it existed?
What was the largest empire the world had seen at the time it existed?
What sea did the Achaemenid Empire control the majority of the coastal regions of?
The Achaemenid Empire expanded into what part of Asia?
The Achaemenid Empire controlled all of the significant settlements of what ancient country during its greatest extent?
The Achaemenid Empire was the known enemy of what nation's histories during its existence?
How many people lived in the Archaemenid Empire in 480BC?
The Achaemenid Empire had what percentage of the word's population in 480BC?
What was the Achaemenid Empire's official language?
What Seven Wonder of the Ancient world was built by the Archaemenid Empire in the 4th Century BC?
What wars in the 600s CE lead to the weakening of Iran and a subsequent invasion by the Arabs?
When did the Arabs invade Iran?
Which Arab Caliphate defeated Iran first?
What special tax did the discriminated Iranians - both converted and nonconverted - have to pay?
What academy was the most important medical center of the world at the time and became Islamicized after the Arab invasions?
What period was known for an era where Iranian civilization blossomed and peaked?
When did the Islamic Golden Age reach its zenith?
Prominent Iranian writers during this time of the Islamic Golden Age contributed to what area of writing?
Where was the main area where the peak of scientific activity take place during the Islamic Golden Age?
What tribes migranted en masse to the Iranian plateau in the 10th Century?
Where did these Turkic tribes come from before the migrated into Iran in the 10th Century?
The Abbasid army replaced Iranian and Arabic men with Turkic tribesmen as what element in their army?
In what year did the Ghaznavids briefly control large portions of Iran?
How were the Ghaznavids different from the original Turkics that migrated into Iran?
Who established an Ilkhanate in Iran after the break up of the Mongol Empire in 1256?
Timur established the Timurid Empire in Iran in what year?
How long did the Timurid empire last in Iran?
The Ilkhans and Tumrids had what type of culture when ruling Iran?
How many citizens were massacred in Isfahan by Timur in 1387?
Who established the Safavid Dynasty?
What was the capital of the Safavid Dynasty?
Ismail I forced a conversion to what Islamic branch?
What country is currently the only official Shia nation of the world?
Who drove out the Pashtuns from Iran in 1729?
Nader Shah expanded Iranian power to its highest peak since what Empire?
Nader Shah took back what territories that were annexed by the Ottomans and the Russians?
Where was Nader Shan from?
In what year were the Pashtuns defeated and driven out of Iran?
What wars resulted in Iran losing control of the Caucasus to the Russians?
What region consisting of Dagestan, Georgia, Armenia, & Azerbaijan did Iran lose control of to the Russians?
What century did Iran lose the Caucasus to Russia?
The Gulistan and Turkmenchay treaties between Iran and Russia confirmed what?
When did a series of protests over foreign concessions sales in Iran occur?
What resulted from the series of protests in Iran over foreign concessions sales?
The first national parliament of Iran was founded in what year?
The first Constitution of Iran was founded in what year?
The Iranian Constitution did what for Christians, Jews, and Zoroastrians in Iran?
The constitutional movement in Iran lasted from 1906 until what year?
The British occupied Western Iran from World War 1 until finally withdrawing in what year?
Who was defeated and forced to abdicate at the end of the Iranian constitutional movement?
In 1911, Russians occupied Northern Iran under what pretext?
Who massacred many Assyrian Iranians around Urmia during World War 1?
When was Reza Shah forced to abdicate in Iran?
Who succeeded Reza Shah after his abdication?
Mohammad Reza Pahlavi established what enormous supply route during World War 2?
Who backed two puppet regimes in/around Iran during WWII?
What happened which ended in two puppet states dissolving and Soviet withdrawal out of Iran after WWII?
What year did oil price spikes in Iran lead to inflation?
What caused inflation to Iran's economy during the oil price spike in 1973?
Iran's inflation led to what in 1975-1976?
Why did millions of youth migrate to the urban areas of Iran in the mid 1970s?
Due to increased unemployment, who mainly opposed the Shah's regime?
The new Iranian government following the Shah's downfall dealt with the Kurdish rebellion in what year?
How did the new Iranian government handle the rebellions and uprisings following their rise to power?
The new Iranian government purged itself of what political opposition?
What happened to the nationalists and Marxists that had helped the Islamic ruling government to depose the Shah?
Who seized the US Embassy in Iran in 1979?
When was the US Embassy in Iran seized?
ALl of the hostages were completely freed as the result of what treaty?
Who won the 1980 US Presidential Elections after President Carter's repeated failed attempts to resolve the US Iranian Embassy situation? 
How many hostages were taken in the US Embassy seizure?
Iran's landscape is dominated by what geographical feature?
What is Iran's highest mountain?
How tall is Mount Damavand?
Mount Damavand is located in what range?
What is the sixth most populous city of Iran?
What is Shiraz' population by the 2011 Census?
Shiraz is the capital of what Province?
What ancient civilization has majorly influenced the Fars Province?
Persians have been in the Fars Province since what century?
The Iranina Islamic Republic is based on what document?
What is the Leader of the Revolution also known as?
Who is the Commander in Chief of the Iranian Army?
The Supreme Leader appoints how many members of the Guardian Council?
Who is responsible for electing and dismissing the Supreme Leader?
In Iran, who has the final say in all matters directly related to the Supreme Leader?
Who exercises exective powers in Iran?
The Council of Ministers is appointed and supervised by who?
How many Vice-Presidents serve under the President in Iran?
The legislature approves the 8 vice presidents and how many cabinet members?
How many jurists are in the Guardian Council?
Who can veto Parliament?
What Council acts as a mediator when there are disputes between the Parliament and the Guardian Council?
How long are the terms of local city councils that are present in all Iranian cities and villages?
Who is responsible for interpreting the Constitution?
When crimes are committed by clerics, who handles the cases?
The Special Clerical Court is accountable to only which body?
How often does the Assembly of Experts meet?
The Assembly of Experts has how many clerics?
Which body can remove the Supreme Leader at any time by constitutional right?
Iran's nuclear program has caused discord within the international community since when?
Which country did Iran's leadership was quoted as being a possible target of its atomic weapons?  
Who imposed sanctions against Iran as a result of Iran's nuclear program?
When was it estimated by the US Director of National Intelligence that Iran would be able to develop a nuclear weapon?
What is Iran's volunteer militia force named?
How many full-time members does the Basij have?
How many members in total does the Basij have? 
In 2007 what was Iran spending 2.6% of its GDP on?
In 2014, Iran spent how much on weapons spending?
What is Iran's most advanced missile?
Why did Iran have to build its own military hardware, vehicles, and weapons after the 1979 Revolution?
Since when has Iran developed its domestic military infrastructure?
The Fajr-3 missile uses what type of propulsion system?
By 2007, Iran's crude oil exports resulted in how much of its foreign exchange currency?
What is a main cause of Iran's constant budget deficits?
What year did Iran pass an economic reform plan that would replace subsidies with targeted social assistance programs?
In 2008, how much was Iran's state subsidy in its energy sector?
How much of Iran's budget came from oil and natural gas reserves in 2006?
What is a main goal of Iran's market reform plans?
The Global COmpetitiveness Report in 2010 ranked Iran where out of 139 countries?
What Iranian nationalized industry has been noncompetitive and managed badly? 
What, along with a lack of competition, has held back Iran's nationalized industries?
How much was 1 US Dollar worth in Iranian Rials in early 2012?
How much was 1 US Dollar worth in Iranian Rials in April 2013?
What year did a nuclear and sanctions relief deal happen for Iran?
What economic sanction against Iranian crude oil has adversely affected the Iranian economy?
What would possibly prevent the even spread of relief benefits from Iran's nuclear and sanctions deal of 2015?
What does Teheran, Isfahan, Mashhad, and Shiraz have in common?
How many tourist visas were granted in 2003?
Which group made up the majority of granted tourist visas in 2003?
In 2003, what was Iran's worldwide rank in tourism revenues?
What was Iran's rank in the top 10 Middle East destinations according to UNESCO?
How much natural gas reserves does Iran have?
What is Iran ranked in the world in proved gas reserves?
How much oil reserves does Iran have?
Where does Iran rank in OPEC's top oil exporting nations?
How much did Iran spend in oil imports in 2005?
When did Iran open its first wind-powered plants?
When did Iran open its first geothermal plants?
How much did Iran's installed capacity of power increase to after it added new hydroelectric power in 2004?
How much of Iran's 33k megawatt installed capacity was based on natural gas? 
How much of Iran's 33k megawatt installed capacity was based on oil? 
Which Iranian scientist co-invented the first gas laser?
Which Iranian cardiologist developed and invented the first artificial cardiac pump?
In 2014, Maryam Mirzakhani became the first women ever and first Iranian to win what prestigious mathematics award? 
Which Iranian scientist discovered HbA1c to further treatment and research of diabetes?
When did Ali Javan, an Iranian scientist, co-invent the first gas laser?
What is Iran's presumed largest ethnic group?
What is Iran's presumed 2nd largest ethnic group?
Persians make up what percentage of Iran's population?
Ethnic minorities such as Azerbaijanis make up what percentage of Iran's population?
What percentage of Iran speaks any type of Iranian language?
What were the first known examples of Iranian visual art? 
How far back can the first known examples of Iranian visual art be traced to? 
What city was the ritual center of the Archaemenids?
In what era did Iranian visual art reach its peak?
What decade was significant to Iranian film?
What Iranian film festival in 1954 was the progenitor of future film festivals in 1969 and 1973?
How many commercial films were produced yearly on average in the early 1960s in Iran?
How many commercial films were produced yearly on average by the end of the 1960s in Iran?
What Iranian film festival was created in 1973?
Which director led off a new age of Iranian film after the 1979 Revolution?
What was the name of Sinai's film that ushered in Iran's new era of film after the 1979 Revolution?
Which Iranian director won the Palm d'Or at Cannes in 1997?
What was the name of Kiarostami's film which won the Palm d'Or at Cannes in 1997? 
What year did 6 different Iranian films of six different styles represent at the Berlin International Film Festival?
When did the Internet arrive in Iran?
What percentage of Iran's population were internet users in 2014?
What is Iran's most popular online social network?
What percentage of cloud-based instant messaging platform Telegram's users are from Iran? 
What site is responsible for around 90% of Iran's online e-commerce?
In Iranian cuisine, what is habitually used with fruits? 
Iranians usually eat what diet staple with lunch and dinner?
What delicacy is Iran famous for?
Why is Iranian cuisine so diverse besides being influenced by other cultures?
What melon is Iran a Top 5 producer in the world in 2012?
What type of materials is Iran a leading manufacturer of in the Middle East?
What type of chemicals is Iran a leading manufacturer of in the Middle East?
What type of appliances is Iran a leading manufacturer of in the Middle East?
The Achaemind Empire along with what other group became the foundation for the art in later Iranian history?
A blend of Iranian and what other type of artwork were the Parthians' art comprised of?
What Iranian art played a major role in the formation of medieval art from Europe and Asia?
The Sassanid became a cornerstone of what type of learning?
What is two islands that are part of the British Isles?
Where are the British Isles located?
How many people live in the British Isles?
What is one of the three Crown Dependencies of the British Isles?
Where are the Bailiwick of Jersey and the Bailiwick of Guernsey located?
Why is the name the British Isles disputed in Ireland?
Does the Government of Ireland use the British Isle term?
What is the alternative name that Government of Ireland uses instead of British Isles?
Does the Government of Ireland's London embassy use the name British Isles?
What is the earliest English usage of the term Brytish Illes?
When was this Brytish Illes name used in the English language by John Dee?
What is another name that is used for the British Isles?
What is the common term that the Government of Ireland uses when documents are written jointly with the British?
What was the most recent glaciation that has shaped the British Isles?
What happened with the Devensian glaciation ended?
When did sea levels reach their current highth?
What covered the sea between Ireland and Great Britian during the last glacier?
Which continent has similar plant and animal life as the British Isles?
In Ireland where does the native animal and plant species mostly come from?
When did the land bridge between Ireland and Britain disappear?
When did the last Ice Age end in the British Isles?
When did the clearing of swamp land and forests begin in the British Isles?
When did the clearing of the swamp land and forest begain to rapidly increase?
Why was Britain able to keep its ancient forests longer than Europe?
When did lumber shortages start to occur in Britain?
What are three of the most typical type of tress that can be found in Ireland?
Which two animals became extinct in the British Isles?
Which species of deer is protected in the British Isles?
How many bird species does the British Isles have?
What are three of the most common birds in the British Isles?
What kinds of fish are abundent in the British Isles?
Which snakes are considered native to the British Isles but not Ireland?
What is the name of the slug that is native to both Britain and Ireland?
Is the grass nake or the smooth snake native to Ireland?
What type of wild life are not native to Ireland but are in Britain?
Which area in the British Isles is s the most populated?
What percentage of the population does England have compared to the other areas in the British Isles?
What is the most populated city in Ireland?
How many people live in the area of London?
What are two other major populated cities in England?
Which two areas in the British Isles hasn't experienced a large population growth in the last one hundred years?
How does Ireland's population compare to the rest of the British Isles?
How long did the Great Irish Famine cause a population decline in Ireland?
How large is the Irish diaspora that was caused by the Great Irish Famine?
What mainland was the British Isles once connected to?
When did the British Isles area become separated from the European continent?
When sea levels rose what occured in the British Isles area?
What happened to British Isles area when the ice melted after the last ice age?
Did Britain become populated with people again before or after the ice came to an end?
The people that lived in the British Isles during the Roman Empire era spoke which language?
What was the name of the wall that the Romans built to mark their northern territory in the British Isles in 122AD?
During the Roman Empire occupation in the British Isles, what was the name of the people that lived in Ireland?
The northern area of Great Britain was populated by what native people during the Roman Empire occupation?
What was the name of the native people that lived in the southern parts of the British Isles during the Roman Empire occupation?
Which people arrived in the British Isles when the Roman Empire's power was diminishing?
What area did the Anglo-Saxons begin to dominate in the British Isles?
What happened to the British Isles and Europe after the Roman Empire ended?
What era did Ireland enter when the Roman Empire ended?
What did the Irish build during the Golden Age?
When did Viking invasions begin in the British Isles?
What is one area where the Vikings created a permanent settlement in the British Isles?
England became a possession of which country when it became conquered after the first millennium?
When did the Norman Conquest occur?
In 1169, Ireland was invaded by which people?
Since the Norman invasion who had feudal possession of Ireland?
During the end of the Middle Ages which two kingdoms was Great Britain divided into?
What was the name of the church that King Henry VIII founded?
Which king failed to receive a divorce from the Pope in 1534?
Which crown did the King of Scotland inherit in 1603?
Why did the King of England have issues with parliment in the 17th century?
What happened to Britain during the 17th century?
Who where the ruling class after the revolutionary republic was created?
The English Civil War brought about what change to Britain?
What are the names of the two states that are sovereign in the British Isles today?
What is another name that Ireland is also called?
Northern Ireland is part of which country?
What is another name for the  United Kingdom of Great Britain and Northern Ireland?
Which three states in the United Kingdom have devolved governements?
Which state send members to the parliament in Edinburgh?
What type of government does the United Kingdom and the Crown Dependencies have?
Who shares power in Northern Ireland?
Unionists in Northern Ireland want to remain part of which country?
Nationalist in Northern Ireland want to join which country?
The United Kingdom is part of what union?
What does the Schengen area allow in the European Union?
When was a free-travel area created betwen Northern Ireland and Ireland?
This free-travel area in Ireland is now called what?
What are the two exceptions to the voting rights in United Kingdom of Great Britain and Northern Irelandand Britain?
In what elections are other Europeans who are living in the United Kingdom or Ireland, allowed to vote in?
Which ministry wants to end this type of voting of EU nationals?
What type of arrangement let British and Irish citizens vote in each other's elections?
What has caused several uncommon arrangements between the various states in the United Kingdom?
What type of citizenship can Northern Ireland people have?
The Northern Ireland Executive meets with what other government to develop policies for the island of Ireland?
The 1998 Good Friday Agreement resulted in what arrangement?
What types of media give the people of Ireland information about what is going on in Britain?
What is available to the people in Northern Ireland so they have access to the media?
What is one of the most popoular television shows in the United Kingdom?
Who can receive the Costa Book Award?
What are some of the minor sports in the United Kingdom?
What is the most popular sport in the United Kingdom?
How many national Ruby teams are there in the United Kingdom?
In which hemisphere do the rugby playing countries meet once every four years?
How often do the national rugby teams play for the Triple Crown?
What Museum has a vase with an image of an episkyros player?
What game did Athenaeus reference in 228 AD?
What is the name of a similar, non-competitive game in Japan called?
What country is the game chuck-guk from?
What country is the game wogabaliri from?
What century does football in England date back to?
What organization has said that there is no historical connection to association football with any other game outside of Europe?
In what century did the modern rules of association football come from?
What country did kids play football in public schools in the 19th century?
Which rules were influential to the codes of association football?
Which college where the Cambridge Rules written at?
In what year did John Charles Thring come up with rules that were influential?
What year did the Sheffield FA form?
What year were the Cambridge Rules first drawn up?
What year did the Football Association form?
At what establishment did the Football Association have their first Meeting?
What year did the Rugby Football Union form?
How many clubs ended up ratifying the original laws of the game?
Who played by their own rules till the 1870's?
What is C.W. Alcock responsible for founding?
How long has the FA Cup been contested?
Who founded the worlds first football league?
How many clubs where in the first football league?
What country is the home of the first football league?
What does the abbreviation IFAB stand for?
What year was the IFAB formed?
What city was FIFA formed?
How many representatives did FIFA have in the IFAB?
How many different British associations where part of the IFAB?
What decade is considered the "golden age" of women's football?
Since what year has women's football been an Olympic event?
Who voted to ban women's football from its grounds in 1921?
In 1971, who officially recognized women's football?
What year was the FIFA Women's first World cup?
When is it okay for regular players to use their hands?
A ball cannot be received in what type of position?
throughout when can players move the ball in any direction?
Who can only handle the ball with their hands or arms during play?
Who guards the goal?
Who is the only one who has the authority to stop the game when something is wron?
what is allowed but restricted?
Besides a referee interfering, when else is play stopped?
How many laws are there in the official Laws of the Game?
Who maintains the Laws of the Game?
Broad terms in the laws allow for what?
Who publishes the Laws of the Game?
Out of the maximum amount of players allowed, one must be a what?
The maximum amount of players exclude what?
If there's a minimum amount of players it's usually what?
Players are usually strategically placed by who?
What is the maximum amount of players allowed?
The equipment a player wears is also called a what?
What is highly recommended by medical experts for male players?
Who wears clothing that easily sets them apart from everyone else on the field?
wearing anything that could be dangerous is what?
What is not required but can be chosen to protect a player from head injuries? 
Imperial units where once used to express the dimensions of a what?
What unit of measurement is now expressed by the Laws?
The use of imperial units is still popular in what kind of countries?
Laws were formulated in what country?
What is the penalty area marked by?
a penalty foul by the defending team can be punishable by a what?
how many meters from the goalpost does a penalty area extend? 
Only who can handle the ball with his hands?
Matches where a winner must be decided is called what type of competitions?
Extra time has two periods which each are how long in minutes?
What are penalty shootouts officially known as in the Laws of the Game?
Which goals count to the final score of the game? 
What is the golden goal?
Who was the first team to win using the golden goal to their advantage?
Who experimented with creating winners without requiring penalty shootouts?
What team did France beat in 1998?
What year did the Czech Republic lose in the final of Euro?
Which card does a referee use to signal a caution to a player?
How many yellow cards lead to a red card?
A referee gives out a yellow card and writes down the players name in his notebook which is called being what?
Managers and support staff is considered what and thus cannot be shown a card?
What does a red card mean?
Players who are sent off in a game are often faced with what?
Sometimes clubs can do what if they feel that a punishment was too harsh?
Football associations enforce what kind of conduct?
Which year was there not a Summer Olympic Game?
In what year was a women's tournament added to the Summer Olympics?
What year were professional players allowed to play in the  Summer Olympics? 
What is the age limit on the Olympic men's tournament? 
What was the first year that there was a football tournament at the Summer Olympics? 
What do teams gain for doing well throughout the season?
What is the name for the type of tournament teams play in regular season?
What could happen to the top few teams at the end of the season?
Who operate league systems?
What happens to the teams at the bottom of the ranks at the end of the season?
What is one who replaces a player during a game called?
What is the maximum number of substitutions during most professional games?
Who decides on who's rewarded points for abandoned games?
What classical architecture is Georgian architecture based on?
What type of architecture did Georgian replace?
Where is ornament typically not found in Georgian architecture?
During the period of Georgian architecture what did landowners turn into?
Where do many buildings constructed during the period of Georgian architecture still exist today?
What benefit convinced many wealthy people to move into town during this time?
What part of the world was mostly dominated by Georgian architecture?
What quality were the buildings constructed during that time?
Georgian architecture is characterized by?
What was a desirable feature of Georgian town planning?
What was considered a deep flaw of Georgian architecture?
What decorative vocabulary did Georgian designs draw from?
What revived style dominated English country house architecture?
What was done to make houses look more impressive from a distance?
Where was the height generally highest in Palladian architecture?
Where were areas such as kitchens, offices, and service areas generally found?
What floor were the main receptions rooms generally located?
What tax was in force throughout the United Kingdom during this time?
When was the sash window developed?
What plans became universal inside larger houses?
What cannot be generally deduced from the outside?
What aspect of windows generally varied between floors?
What was often used to hide functional parts of buildings?
What was occasionally visible in grander buildings?
What often topped pilasters of columns?
What designs did ornament use to avoid using the human figure?
What aspect of buildings became very rare?
Where could sometimes overwhelming ornament be found?
What was the typical main focus of rooms?
What type of ceilings became commonplace?
What fell out of favor during this time?
Where was very expensive wallpaper imported from?
Most town people lived in what type of houses?
What was used to protect the "area"?
Due to new entry styles what rooms were often moved down a floor?
What shape and size did most town terraced houses take on?
What year did The Albany convert?
Well-off continental dwellings consisted of?
What was the only city where working class purpose built tenements common?
What was popular for terraces where there was enough space?
What cities contest to being the original home of the semi?
A plan for a semi-detached houses was dated for what year?
Who conferred primacy to the Eyre Estate of St John's Wood?
What put an end to the scheme of semi-detached houses?
What act spurred to building of new churches in Britain?
What were Anglican churches internally designed for?
The later years of the period saw the demand for which places of worship increase?
What were common in new churches?
Churches filled up with monuments to what?
Somerset House was designed by whom?
In what year was Somerset House designed?
Commercial projects in the late period tended to be "architectural" in what way?
What was considered a lesser class of designers?
American buildings in the Georgian period were frequently constructed of which materials?
What was difficult to obtain and transport during the Georgian period?
Which colleges are considered examples of Georgian architecture in America?
What style did was little represented in British colonies?
Baroque style was mostly used for which buildings?
What is considered to be the best remaining example of a house from the Georgian period and style?
What year was the Hammond-Harwood House built?
What building did William Buckland model the Hammon-Harwood House?
What year did Georgian architecture begin to be abandoned?
What was the rivalry between Gothic Revival and Neoclassical referred to as?
When was the Battle of the Styles contested?
What style from the United States used many elements of Georgian style but with revolutionary symbols?
The British revival of Georgian architecture in the 20th century is generally referred to as?
Which police headquarters was constructed in 1958?
Which architects in the US and Britain still employ the Georgian style for private residences?
Neo-Georgain style was common in Britain until the end of which decade?
How did the republic of liberia begin?
When did the Republic of Liberia declare it's independence?
When did the united states recognize the republic of Liberia's independence?
How many slaves were freed in the american civil war?
What was the Liberian flag and constitution modeled after?
How long did william tubman rule?
In what year did a military coupe overthrow leadership leading to william tubmans death?
How long was the rule of the peoples redemption council?
How long was the rule of the national democratic party?
What did the liberian civil war result in?
What empire was o the decline on 1375?
What happened when regions underwent desertification?
Who opposed the influx of vai forming an alliance with maine?
Where did the people of the Mali empire immigrate to?
What is "the american colonization society"?
When was the "american colonization society founded"?
The "american colonization society" consisted mostly of whom"
What did slave holders want to do?
rather than emigrate African Americans wanted to do what?
African  Americans were sent to the pepper coast to do what?
By 1837 the ACS had assisted in moving how many african americans to liberia?
What did African Americans who were moved to Liberia identify as? 
Who did Americo-Liberians not identify with? 
What did African Americans moved to Liberia keep from America?
The americo-liberians did not identify with who?
What were americo-liberians encounters like with tribal Africans"
Who raided the colonial settlements?
What did Americo-liberians exclude tribes from?
Who was responsible for the death of William R. Tolbert?
On what date was William R. Tolbert killed?
Who was also executed on the day of William R. Tolbert's death?
The coup leaders later became known as?
What was the PRC criticized for ?
What eventually happened to the rebels?
Who intervened in the rebel crisis?
What did the economic community monitoring group do to intervene in the crisis?
During what period did the African civil war last?
How many liberians died in the civil war?
What is "Movement For democracy in Liberia"?
Movement For democracy in Liberia launched attacks against who?
where did peace talks begin between Movement For democracy in Liberia and Taylor?
Why was Taylor indicted by a special court ?
Who did the rebels launch an assault on in July, 2003?
The 2005 elections were known as what?
Who is ellen johnson sirleaf?
Who was elected the first female president of Africa?
Movement For democracy in Liberia requested the extradition of whom"
What was created to address the causes of civil war?
How many counties is liberia divided into?
How many districts are the 15 counties of liberia divided into?
What is the oldest county in liberia?
When was Grand Bassa founded?
What is Liberia's newest county?
What is the legislature composed of? 
How many members are in a house?
Who is the house led by?
What are the 73 members of the house are appropriated among? 
What is the senate made up of?
What is Liberia's highest judicial authority? 
How many members are in the Supreme court?
Who is the head of the supreme court?
How are members chosen for the court?
How long do members of the supreme court serve?
What was liberia's score on the 2010 Corruption Perceptions index?
What was Liberia's ranking compared to the other 176 countries?
What did Liberia's score  and ranking  on the 2010 Corruption Perceptions index represent? 
What was Liberia's score and rank on the 2007 Corruption Perceptions index?
In 2007, when seeking attention, selection or service . What percent of Liberians had to pay a bribe?
What is the central bank of Liberia responsible for?
What is Liberia considered around the world economically? 
What is Liberia's employment rate?
The GDP peaked in 1980 at what amount?
What does Liberia's economy heavily depends on?
When did the Liberian economy hit it's peak growth?
By what percentage did Liberia's GDP reduced by during the civil war?
Why did the Liberian economy decline after 1980?
Why was Liberia's GDP growth stalled in 2007?
What were UN sanctions place placed on 2003?
Why were sanctions place on Liberian timber exports?
When were the timber export sanctions lifted for Liberia?
When was Liberia was granted observer status with the world trade organization>
Liberia's account deficit peaked at what percentage in 2008?
Liberia has the highest ratio of what?
How much money has the US invested in Liberia since 2006?
What agreement did Liberia sign n 2006?
How long has Firestone tire and rubber company ran a rubber plantation in Liberia? 
What is the largest ethnic group in liberia?
What percentage of the population are the Kpelle?
Where do the Kpelle reside?
When did the decedents of the Congo and Afro-Caribbean arrive in liberia?
Congo descendants and Afro-Caribbean make of what percentage of liberia's population?
There is high percentage of interracial marriage between what two groups?
The interracial couples in Liberia result in what?
Where do Liberians of European decent live?
On average children attain how many years of education?
How intense is the enforcement of school attendance?
What was the literacy rate in Liberia in 2010?
What arts does Liberia have a rich history of?
In what years did Liberia host national fairs? 
Who is Martha Ann Ricks?
Who did Martha Ann Ricks present the famed Liberian coffee tree to?
What did President Ellen Johnson Sirleaf have installed in her presidential office?
Who are Windows main operating system competitors?
What new security features does Windows 8 have?
What USB version is Windows 8 compatible with?
What services does the Windows Store provide?
What can be found on the Start screen?
What about Windows 8 was well received?
What were the perceived problems with the new Windows 8 user interface?
How many Windows 8 licenses were purchased by January 2013?
Who is Windows division president?
When did Microsoft start creating Windows 8?
What is jupiter?
Where were the Windows 8 plans initially announced?
Who is Microsofts CEO?
What does BSoD stand for?
When was Milestone 1 divulged?
What was special about Milestone 1?
When was Milestone 2 divulged?
When was Build 7959 divulged?
What 3 versions of the build did Microsoft first release?
What developer tools did the build have?
How many downloads occured in the first 12 hours?
When did the developer preview expire?
When was the Developer preview initially intended to expire?
When was the beta version of Windows 8 made available to the public?
Who is the Windows Manager?
How many things were altered after developer version release?
How many times was the Consumer Preview downloaded in the first 24 hours?
When was the Consumer Preview set to expire?
When was the Release Preview revealed to consumers?
When was the release preview set to expire?
What were the main components of the Release preview?
What was the build number of the Windows 8 Release Preview?
When was the Windows 8 Release Preview accidentally revealed?
When did Windows 8 manufacturing begin?
When was Microsoft supposed to officially launch Windows 8?
What was the final build Microsoft decided to manufacture?
When were Software Assurance consumers allowed access to Windows 8?
What version of Windows 8 is Enterprise N?
How many things did Microsoft alter after Release Preview?
When was the General Availablity Cumulative Update provided?
How are system improvements released through Windows 8?
What name did Windows Explorer change to?
When was the first game of the 2013 Stanley Cup Finals?
Who did Windows 8 mock in their television campaign?
What was the name of the Windows 8 advertising campaign?
What three things did the Windows Everywhere campaign emphasize on?
What happens during Hybrid Boot mode?
What are the benefits of USB 3.0?
What is the point of near field communications?
What is Windows to Go?
What features were added to the lock screen?
What replaced the Windows Explorer comman bar?
What is the new name of Windows Explorer?
What does file history make possible?
What did the update of operation dalog boxes help with?
What is the point of using different colors on a heat map?
What changes were made to the BSoD?
What are some of the process type groups Windows 8 implemented?
How can users find out more about obscure Windows 8 processes?
What new security features did Windows 8 provide?
What were the new security features in Windows 8 geared at?
What options do Parental controls provide?
What new recovery options did Windows 8 implement?
When was the first Windows 8 patch sent out?
How does secure boot help avert boot process infections?
What requirements do Microsoft certified devices have?
What must always be enable in ARM-based Windows RT devices?
What is SkyDrive?
When was Facebook support turned off?
What features does Xbox Live hub offer?
What Xbox apps were bundled together?
What service options does Windows online now offer?
What forms is Internet Exploer 10 available as?
What limitations were put on Adobe flash to begin with?
Where can Adobe Flash now be used?
What improvements were made to Internet Explorer?
What does airplone mode do?
Where can Carrier account management systems be found?
What are some connection settings in Windows 8?
What registers the insertion of a SIM card?
Who is Jensen Harris?
What apps can one expect the People app to match with?
What apps can one expect the Photos app to match with?
What makes Windows Store apps unique?
What are contracts?
What programming languages does Windows Runtime work with?
What makes Windows apps binary code compatible?
What does compiling components as Windows Runtime make possible?
What kind of environment provides Windows apps extra security?
What does immersive app stand for?
What are apps after the introduction of Windows 8 called?
Who is Soma Somasegar?
When did Windows Store apps become the real term for the apps?
What code did Windows 8 change to?
What term did Microsoft give to its exception privilige for web browsing?
What different options did the desktop version have?
Which two browsers promised to develop Metro-style versions of their browsers?
What does Chromes version for Windows 8 do?
What does Firefox's version for Windows 8 do?
When was Firefox's version of Windows 8 made accesible?
What is found on the Start Screen?
What do live tiles do?
What is the primary function of the PC Settings app? 
Where can advanced settings options be found?
What is the new System User interface built on?
What is charms?
What is the purpose of charms?
How is an active list of apps accessed?
What does swiping from the left edge of the screen do?
How is the traditional desktop evironment opened?
Why was the ability to play DVD-Video taken off of Windows Media Player?
What does the Pro Pack do?
Which main feature was removed in Windows 8?
What backup element is still found on Windows 8?
How is Backup and Restore opened?
What does :76 Shadow Copy do?
What is :74 used for? 
How many Windows 8 editions are there?
What extras does Windows 8 Pro have?
What extras do Windows 8 Enterprise have?
How would one get Windows RT?
During it's launch how much was a Windows 8 upgrade?
What is the Windows 8 price?
What is the Windows 8 Pro price?
Which PC owners could purchase a Windows 8 Pro uprgrade for $14.99?
How much was the Windows Media Center add-on during the original Windows 8 promotion?
What restrictions do Windows upgrade licenses have?
What did Windows offer in place of a full version of the software?
What did the System Builder SKU take the place of?
What does OEM stand for?
What did the Personal Use License allow?
What replaced Windows 8?
What is the primary difference in Windows 8.1? 
What exemption was removed from Windows 8.1?
What is Windows 8.1 with Bing?
What architecture types does Windows 8 support?
What is 16-bit support intended for?
When was x86 2nd generation created?
How does the online Windows installer know which version to install?
What Windows version is compatible with ARM processors?
What apps work on Windows RT?
Why does Windows RT only work with apps included with the system?
Who condemned Microsoft for requiring devices to have secure boot enabled by default?
What resolution did Microsoft come to in their certificiation guidelines?
Who is Tony Mangefeste?
What ideology does Microsoft follow?
Who criticized Microsofts closed platform Windows Store?
Who created Minecraft?
Who developed Steam?
What company is Rob Pardo associated with?
Who equated windos 8 as the first desktop operating system that understand what a computer is supposed to do?
Why did Pierce give the Start Screen such glowing reviews?
Which improvements were most well regarded?
Who else uses a closed distribution platform?
What is IDC?
What is the decline in PC sales attributed to?
How much of a decrease in sales have Windows devices experienced?
While Windows sales went down, which company experienced an increase in sales?
What percent of tablets were running Windows in Q1 2013/
What was Androids market share in 2013?
What was teh iOS market share in 2013?
What does Strategy Analytics say Windows tablets are lacking?
When did Windows 8 surpass Windows Vistas market share?
When did Microsoft make the existence of Windows 8.1 with Bing OEM SKU official?
When did Microsoft remove license fees on device screens less than 9 inches?
When did Windows 8 decrease the price of Windows 8 for devices that cost less than $250?
What was the benefit of Windows 8.1 with Bing?
When did the Chinese government ban the purchase of Windows 8 products?
Why did the Chinese government ban Windows 8 based products?
What market share did Windows XP have in Chine?
Who claimed that the Windows 8 would allow the US Government to spy on its users?
What does CCTV stand for?
What is the name of the Chinese social network?
Who claimed that the Window 8 OS could gather sensitive user information?
Where did Yang Min practice as a computer scientiest?
When was Windows 8.1 introduced?
When did Microsoft release the beta version of Windows 8.1?
When did MSDN and TechNet users gain access to Windows 8.1?
What search engine was added in Windows 8.1?
How did the Windows 8.1 upgrade enhance desktop startup?
What main feature was added back to the desktop?
How many apps did the WIndows 8.1 update allow to be snapped onto a signular display?
How wide is Swaziland in miles??
What is the primary language spoken by the people in Swaziland?
In terms of size where does Swaziland rank within Africa in terms of country size?
When did the ethnic Swazis establish a kingdom?
Who was the leader of the 18th century Swazi kingdom?
What is the per capita GDP of Swaziland?
What is the SACU?
What is the lilangeni?
What does the acronym COMESA represent?
What form of currency is the lilangeni fixed to?
What is the literal translation of Nkhosi?
What did Mswati II do to the land controlled by Swaziland during his reign?
In terms of the most successful Swaziland kings in battle, who was the best?
What groups did Mswati attack in the mid 19th century?
Where does the name Swaziland originate?
In what year did the British take Swaziland on as a protectorate? 
What 1903 conflict involving the British caused Swaziland to become a protectorate?
In what year was Swaziland given self governance? 
How much of Swaziland did the European area contain after the portioning?
When was Sobhuza coronated?
When did the Swaziland constitution come to be?
What is another way to refer to the Swazi National Council?
When was the Legislative Council of Swaziland first created?
When did elections that provided for a House of Assembly for Swaziland occur?
In what year was the constitution of Swaziland suspended?
Who ruled Swaziland in the late 1970s?
When did King Sobhuza II die?
Who was the head of state of Swaziland after King Sobhuza II
Which monarch of Swaziland was crownd in April 1986?
Who appoints the prime minister of Swaziland?
What is the parliament of Swaziland known as?
What part of the Swaziland parliament is appointed by the King?
Why is the king allowed to appoint members of parliament?
How many seats are in the Senate of Swaziland?
How many members are there in the Swazi House of Assembly?
When were the most recent elections in Swaziland?
How many members of the Swazi House of Assembly are chosen by the king?
Which group looks over elections in Swaziland?
When did people begin to disputre royal hegenomy in Swaziland?
What portion of Swaziland is said to support the monarchy of Swaziland?
What entity took submissions about whether or not Swazi citizens wanted to change support of the monarchy?
How does a nominee for parliament in Swaziland get decided?
What is the minimum number of members that must support a nominee to parliament in Swaziland?
What is an Indvuna as it relates to the Parliament of Swaziland?
In the Swazi Parliament, what is the Bucopho? 
What is the minimum amount of nominees taken on the day of nomination in the Swazi Parliament?
How many representatives does each tinkhundla elect to the Swazi House of Assembly?
What is a single term of a Swazi development committee?
To whom do Bucopho take the decisions and concerns?
What is the chairman of the bucopho also called?
Where is the Bucopho chairman elected?
What portion of the Swazi population are subsistence farmers?
Outside of agriculture what provides to the Swazi economy?
In terms of Swaziland, what does SNL refer to?
What are the problems with Swazi Nation Land?
What has the Real growth in GDP since 2001 in Swaziland in percentage?
How much lower is the Swazi Real GDP growth in comparison to other Southern African Customs Union members is Swaziland?
When did the public finances in Swaziland decline?
What led to Swazi budget cuts?
What amount of total public spending in Swaziland is going to wages?
What amount of government revenue in Swaziland is from the SACU?
What has happened to debt external onus  in Swaziland in the past two decades?
What percentage of the GDP was represented by outside debt in Swaziland in 2006?
What currency is Swaziland bound to?
Which nation does Swazi defer to when it comes to monetary policy?
Duties from customs represent what amount of Swaziland government revenue?
From where does Swaziland get customs revenue?
Of pregnant women, how many are believed to be infected with HIV?
What does UNAIDS consider universal access to HIV/AIDS treatment?
Who was the prime minister of Swaziland in 2004?
What percentage of HIV/AIDS infected in Swaziland are believed to be treated?
What is the rate of mortality for those with tuberculosis in Swaziland?
What age attends pre-school in Swaziland?
What percentage of children of age for preschool have access to education in Swaziland?
In reference to education in Swaziland, hat is an NCP otherwise known as?
What is does ECCE refer to in the Swazi educational system?
How many years does a student spend in secondary and high school in Swaziland?
For how many years is a Swazi student in junior secondary school?
What is the ECOS within the Swazi education system?
What do students finishing senior secondary school get?
What institution does the accreditation for the IGCSE in Swaziland?
The University of Swaziland, Southern Nazarene University, offer higher learning in Swaziland, what is one other University?
Where can one find the Limkoking University of Creative Technology?
What is the capital of Swaziland?
Where in Swaziland is The Good shepherd Hospital?
What nursing school does The Good Shepherd Hospital contain?
Which school is the main location for technical education in Swaziland?
What types of education does the Swaziland College of Technology offer?
What is the location of the Gwamile Vocational and Commercial Training Institute?
There is an educational facility in Manzini within Swaziland known by the acronym MITC, what does it stand for?
In terms of education in Swaziland what does the acronym SIMPA represent?
In Swaziland, what is SIMPA?
In which locations is the Institute of Development Management?
What service does the IDM provide?
In what year was the Mananga Management Centre founded?
In Swaziland, what is kwetfwasa?
What is a Sangoma in Swaziland?
Why might one want to discover when consulting a sangoma in Swaziland?
How does a sangoma in Swaziland communicate?
What is kushaya ematsambo used for?
What is the most widely known event in Swazi culture?
How long is the Umhlanga Reed Dance?
During what time of year is the Umhlanga Reed Dance?
What individuals can take part in the Umhlanga Reed Dance?
As it relates to girls, what is the purpose of the Umhlanga Reed Dance?
Until what date was Swaziland bound by umchwasho?
What occurs during the custom of umchwaso in Swaziland?
Who became bound by umchwaso in Swaziland?
From where did the Reed Dance originate?
What would the end of umchwasho be marked with?
When it comes to translation, what is less commonly used today?
When do earlier approaches to translation still have relevance for historians?
What do historians try to piece together from pre-Western environments?
What do Chinese and related translations retain unique to their tradition?
When did translation of material into Arabic begin to increase?
What allowed the expansion of Arabic translations during the 5th century?
What material was initial Arab translations primarily focused on?
What cultures' classical works were later translated into Arabic?
What type of translation drew heavily on earlier Near Eastern traditions?
Why are Arabic translation efforts important to Western translation traditions?
When did Europeans begin more intense studying of Arabic translations of classical works?
What did Arabic, and to a less extent Persian, become to Europeans?
What helped revitalize Western translation traditions from Arabic?
What would Western traditions eventually do?
What transformed Arabic languages?
What came to be valued over previous convolutions?
Who expressed skepticism regarding the transformation of Arabic?
What was legitimate knowledge no longer defined by?
What was a neologism expressing the introduction of new ideas via translation?
Where do many non-transparent translation theories delve for concepts?
What nationality was Friedrich Schleiermacher?
When did Schleiermacher publish his lecture "On the Different Methods of Translation"?
Moving the writer toward the reader would be an example of what type of translation method?
What method of translation did Schleiermacher favor?
What is sometimes used to check the accuracy of a translation?
How are mathematical operations checked?
What operations are results from not always completely reliable?
What symbol set has a defining property of ambiguity?
What symbol set has the property of being intentionally unequivocal?
What has served as a school of writing for many authors?
Who spread Buddhist texts in East Asia?
What did translators shape in the course of their work?
What have translators acted as by conveying knowledge between cultures?
Where were idioms and vocabulary imported from?
What type of translation is favored by those wanting more accurate translations?
What reputation does machine translations have?
What type of translation is still the most accurate and reliable?
Because of crowdsourcing, what type of translation are agencies able to provide?
Who purchases the services of translation agencies?
Unedited machine translation will miss what crucial aspect of human language?
What does it take a person to be able to do?
What can even translations completely done by a human still be prone to?
How must machine translations be transformed by a human?
Where did Buddhism spread?
Buddhism's spread led to what large-scale effort?
How long did the translation effort take?
What Empire was especially good at translation?
What were the Tanguts able to do in only decades that took the Chinese centuries?
Whose court did Pletho arrive in and begin a new period of translation in Renaissance Italy?
What title did Georgius Gemistus Pletho carry?
When did Constantinople fall to the Turks?
Who undertook translating Plato's works to Latin?
What did religious beliefs depend upon when it came to Plato, Aristotle and Jesus?
What new standards of translation came with the 19th century?
Who observed that the policy became "the text, the whole text, and nothing but the text"?
What sort of passages were still left out of the supposed "whole" text?
What did the Victorians aim to remind the reader of their translations?
How did the translation of Rubaiyat achieve an Oriental flavor?
How is translation of sung texts different than translations of poetry?
Why is the translation of sung texts more restrictive?
What places a great challenge on someone trying to translate music from one language to another?
How can a syllable be added or deleted in prose sung texts?
What is one of the first known instances of translation in the West?
When was the Old Testament translated into Greek?
Why is the translation of the Old Testament into Greek known as the Septuagint?
How did each translator of the Bible work in Alexandria?
According to myth, what property did all seventy versions of the bible have?
What is an aerodome with facilities for flights to take off and land?
What is an aerially accessible open space that includes at least one active surface such as a runway or a helipad?
What is an airport?
What does ATC stand for?
What do airports use to assure smooth traffic flow between departing and arriving aircraft?
What is an important concern in the operation of an airport?
How many commercial airports did the British Airports Authority originally operate?
What group took over the British Airports Authority in 2006?
What group manages the Frankfurt Airport?
Who operates, through joint ventures, Indira Gandhi International Airport?
What do landside areas include?
Airports are divided into what two areas?
What do airside areas include?
Where can passengers purchase tickets?
What is the waiting area which provide passengers access to aircraft?
Most major airports provide commercial outlets for what?
Where are most of these companies located in an airport?
Some of these companies include what type of businesses?
Are prices at these outlets generally higher or lower than street prices?
What are some services that are offered by VIP services?
These services are usually reserved for what class of passengers?
What type of services are sometimes open to passengers who are members of a different airline's frequent flyer program?
When was the first lighting used on an airport?
When did approach lighting come into use?
When was the slope-line approach system introduced?
What indicated the proper direction and angle of descent?
What consisted of two rows of lights that formed a funnel, indicating an aircraft's position on the glidescope?
Why did airport construction boom during the 1960s?
How far were runways extended out?
What was constructed out of reinforced concrete?
When were jet bridge systems introduced to modern airport terminals?
What does ATC stand for?
ATC responsibilities are usually divided into how many main areas?
What is responsible for directing all ground traffic in designated areas?
Who instructs vehicles on which taxiways to use?
When a plane is ready to take off, who takes over the direction of a plane?
When is control turned back over to ground control?
Who controls aircraft on the runway?
Tower controllers use what to locate an aircraft's position in three-dimensional space?
Who controls aircraft in the controlled airspace immediately surrounding the airport?
Why should aircraft that is only passing through an airspace contact Tower Control?
What is a traffic pattern often called outside of the U.S.?
What assures smooth traffic flow between departing and arriving aircraft?
Due to this, the overall traffic planning tend to assure landing queues are avoided.
Traffic patterns are usually flown at what altitude above ground level?
Are standard traffic patterns right-handed or left-handed?
What does AGL stand for?
What is one of the main reasons pilots sit on the left side of the airplane?
At an extremely large airport, what is in place but not usually used?
What is the frequency called that is used by departing aircraft for the purpose of requesting approach clearance?
Which aircraft request approach clearance while they are still hours away from the airport?
What helps pilots fly the approach for landing?
What does VASI stand for?
What does VOR stand for?
What helps pilots find the direction to the airport?
What instruments do pilots use to find the runway and fly the correct approach, even if they cannot see the ground?
On runways, what indicate the beginning of the runway for landing?
On runways, what indicate the end of the runway?
What indicates the edge of a runway?
What may low-traffic airports use to save electricity and staffing costs?
What does ALS stand for?
What includes debris and nesting birds?
In adverse weather conditions, what can be used to improve traction on the landing strip?
What is one part of runway maintenance that helps maintain friction levels?
What pulls the aircraft to one of the airbridges?
What keeps the electricity running in the plane when it stands at the terminal?
The passengers disembark using what?
What can give the ground crew more clearance after the aircraft lands?
How long should it take for an aircraft to be off the airport and in the air?
An airfield is also referred to as what?
What provides basing and support of military aircraft?
Where is RAF Brize Norton located?
Where is Bardufoss Air Station located?
Where is Pune Airport located?
When was the movie Airport made?
What is the title of the film where a man becomes permanently grounded in an airport terminal?
When was the movie Final Destination released?
Landside, where can filming take place?
What are the only airside locations where filming is allowed?
What can not be undertaken n Security, at Immigration/Customs or in Baggage Reclaim?
Who populated the area between the Baltic Sea and the Black sea before Kievan Rus?
Where were the Limen Slavs located before Kievan Rus?
Where was the Finnic Chud Tripe located curing this time period?
Which tribe resided in the south?
Which early traveler provided an early description of the Rus?
What did Ahmad say about the Rus when he described clothing?
Which historian refered to the Rus as "Scythians"?
Which two groups were divided inn the territories of the East Slavs?
In what year did the Varangians impose tribute from the Slavic and Finnic?
In what year did the Slavic and Finnic tribes rebel againts the Varangians?
When did Ruik past away?
Who declared Kiev "The mother of Rus citis'?
When Rurik past away, who took over?
What year did Oleg conquer the Drevlians?
Why did the Kievan state prosper?
How many trade routes did the Kievan state control?
What other means of pay when purchasing items may have been in place?
Which route was a central post in Kiev?
What did the Byzantine empire use to expand its political influence?
What teritory did the Byzantine empire hit first with their political beliefs? 
What did the Byzantines help the Khazars with?
What led to Khazar having to put more strain on its military?
Who led the war on Dniester and Dnieper?
What year were the Magyars and Pechenges drug into the war?
What year did the Rus raid Baku, Gilan,Mazandaran, and Caucasus?
Around what time did the Khazars unable to no longer command tribute from Volga?
Who did the Byzantium ally with against the Khazar's?
What did the Pechenges trade with the Rus?
When did the relations between the Rus and Byzantines start to become more complicated?
What were the primary concerns the Rus and Byzantines had with oleg?
When did the Rus attack the Constantinole once again?
What known document tells of the death of Oleg?
What was prophesised by a sorcerer involving Oleg's death?
WHo succeeded Oleg in 913?
What does Oleg do to his horse?
When did Prince Igor past away?
In what year did Sviatoslav take over as leader?
Who ruled in Prince Oleg's place following his death?
Where did Sviatoslav move the capital to?
What was considered too be Kiev's most important route for trade?
What language did the church write  the liturgy in?
What did this literature help with that was written in Cyrillic?
What was Yaroslav also known as?
Who was Yaroslav's father?
In what year did Yaroslav become the prince of Kiev?
What did the rota system do?
What was the name of the UN-conventional system that was implemented?
What was often deployed when trying to gain power?
What country did the fleeing Grand Prince run off to?
What immediately occurred after Yarsolav the Wise past away?
Who was fighting for Tmutarakan following Yarsolav's death?
Where did the first federal council of Rus take place in 1097?
Who was the last ruller to keep the region united?
When did Mstislav die?
When did the Kievan state break up into twelve seperate principalities?
What helped speed up the decline of the Kievan Rus?
In what year did the Crusade sack Constantinople?
What group was attacking the the Baltic Region in 1204?
What happened to Novgorod when Kievan Rus began to decline?
Why was the Republic of Novgorod doing so well while the Kievan Rus declined?
In what year did Novgorod aquire its own archbishop?
How did the leader of Kiev gain political control?
From what did this new princedom emerge from?
What type of government came from the coalition of traditional patriachic family?
Which two groups dominated the society of Kievan Rus?
What was severely lacking in Kievan in the 12th century?
What was the group called that owed labour duty to the princes?
What eventually led to the creation of the peasant/smerdy class?
When did wages on the manors develop?
What were the smerdy initially given in the Kievian law code?
Despite being much smaller than wester europe, what they known for being?
What could you find in Novgorod that you couldn't in most other cities?
What were some of the rights women had during this time period?
To which dynasty did Yarolav's step mother belong to?
Which three countried did Yaroslav's daughters become queens of?
Who did Yaroslav's sons marry?
Although uncertian, who is considered to be the first head of Kiev?
Who was considered to be the first bishop of the Church of the Titches?
What was NEC's competitor to the NES called in Japan?
What was Sega's competitor to the NES called in Japan?
What was NEC's competitor to the NES called in the US?
What was Sega's competitor to the NES called in the US?
What were the Genesis's advantages over the NES?
What market did the Genesis target?
How much sooner than the Genesis did the Street Fighter II game come out for SNES?
How much of the US 16-bit console market did the Genesis have in summer 1992?
What game was key to the SNES's success?
How many SNES units were sold in the US overall?
How did Nintendo rank submitted games?
What game first challenged Nintendo's anti-violence policy?
When was Mortal Kombat released in arcades?
Which game console had a full-gore version of Mortal Kombat?
How much did the Genesis version of Mortal Kombat out-sell the SNES version?
Which senators held a hearing about video game violence in 1993?
What was the focus of the hearing about video game violence in 1993?
What organizations did the hearing about video game violence in 1993 lead to?
What regulatory change did the hearing about video game violence in 1993 lead to?
How did video game ratings affect Nintendo?
Which company developed Donkey Kong Country?
How many copies of Donkey Kong Country were sold in its first 45 days?
What kind of computers were Donkey Kong Country's graphics rendered on?
How did Donkey Kong Country's quality compare to games on newer consoles?
When was Donkey Kong Country released?
How much did the SNS-101 cost in the US?
What game was bundled with the SNS-101?
What features were removed in the SNS-101?
What redesigned console was released in Japan at the time of the SNS-101?
When was the SNS-101 released in the US?
How were adapters used to get around PAL region restrictions?
How was hardware modification used to get around PAL region restrictions?
What problem did the hardware modification cause with later games?
What video frequency does NTSC use?
What video frequency does PAL use?
How much slower do games run on PAL consoles than NTSC due to frequency differences?
What hardware modification could be made to the SNES to support game speed differences?
What color is the SNES?
Who designed the North American SNES?
What was Barr's job?
What color were the North American SNES's buttons?
What color were the Japanese Super Famicom Jr.'s buttons?
How is the SNES's slot positioned?
What connection types did MULTI OUT support?
How many pins did the SNES expansion port have?
What output type was the only one directly supported on the SNS-101?
What other Nintendo systems used MULTI OUT?
What material is the SNES case made of?
What chemical process turned some SNES cases yellow?
What mixture error in the plastic caused some SNES cases to turn yellow?
How can SNES yellowing sometimes be reversed?
Why would some SNESes be only partly yellow?
What face buttons do SNES controllers have that NES controllers didn't?
How many shoulder buttons do SNES controllers have?
Who designed the SNES controllers?
What color are the US SNES controllers' X and Y buttons?
What color are the US SNES controllers' A and B buttons?
What game accessory was similar to the NES Zapper?
What game accessory was similar to the NES Advantage?
What game used the SNES Mouse?
What game came with a baseball bat controller?
What type of accessory was the Super Scope?
How did Nintendo say an NES and SNES could be used on the same TV?
Which other game system's cartridges could be adapted to the SNES?
What improvements did the Super Game Boy have over the Game Boy?
Where was the Super Game Boy 2 released?
What did the Super Game Boy 2 add?
What modem was available for the Japanese SNES?
What service did the Satellaview connect to?
When did the Satellaview begin operation?
When did the Satellaview end operation?
What was the US equivalent of Satellaview?
Which companies did Nintendo try to get to make a CD add-on for the SNES?
What was Philips' multimedia system?
What competing console did Sony release after working with Nintendo?
What was Sega's CD add-on?
What did Nintendo consider emulators?
What is the term for a software product abandoned by its owners?
What device allows backing up SNES games?
What is the term for homemade software?
What smartphones have SNES emulators?
What was Nintendo's first approved emulator?
What portable game systems have SNES emulators?
Which publication said Nintendo's best console ever was the SNES?
Where did GameTrailers rank the SNES among all consoles?
Which writer said the SNES was the best console ever from any company?
Who said the SNES was "simply the most timeless system ever created"?
Where did IGN rank the SNES?
Some scholars contest that there was only one what?
Who do some scholars think the Sumerian language originally belonged to?
Where did the original Sumerians live?
What culture did the peoples who would be called Sumerian have a part in?
When were the earliest historical records of Sumer?
During what periods did the Sumerican city-states rise to power?
What is obscure until the Early Dynastic III period around the 23rd century BC?
What was developed that has allowed archaeologists to read contemporary records and inscriptions?
When does Classical Sumer end?
What cut short the Sumerian Renaissance in the 21st century BC?
Fine quality painted pottery is a distinctive style of what period in Sumerian history?
Where could the pottery be found spread throughout?
During the Ubaid, where was the first settlement in southern Mesopotamia established?
What type of agriculture did the farmers settling at Eridu bring with them?
Who was the chief god of Eridu?
What is an "ensi"?
What type of leadership did Sumerian cities during the Uruk period probably have?
Who assisted the ensi?
What was the most urbanized city in the world at the time?
Over how many people lived in Uruk?
What city-state was the rival of Lagash?
What did Eannatum annex?
What is one of the first empires known in history?
What did Eannatum use to keep the people of the time in line?
What happened to Eannatum's empire after his death?
Which dynasty of Ur was the last great Sumerian renaissance?
Who guided Ur during the last gasp of power?
Even during the 3rd dynasty, what was happening to the racial makeup of the region?
What was there an influx of waves of coming into Sumerian lands?
What effect was rising salinity having on the agricultural productivity of the Sumerian lands?
The salinity of what in the region was long recognized as a major problem?
Poorly drained irrigated soils in an arid climate with a good deal of evaporation is responsible for leaving what?
What did cultivation shift from to salt-tolerant barley during the Ur III phase?
How much did the population of the region decline due to the decrease in crop productivity? 
How were women protected in Sumerian society?
What gender dominated Sumerian culture?
Whose code reveals a bit about the societal structure through Sumerian law?
Who was at the top of the power pyramid in Sumerian society?
How many strata existed in Sumerian society?
Akkadian's language can be traced to the Semitic branch of what languages?
Why is the Sumerian language usually thought of as a language isolate in linguistics?
In Sumerian, what are morphemes added together to create?
What has been the result of attempts to connect Sumerian to other language groups?
What are morphemes?
How many cosmogenic myths does the religion of the Sumerians appear to be founded upon?
What does one myth see creation as being the result of?
In the Enuma Elish, what is creation seen as the union of?
What were the titles given to the gate keeps of the E-Abzu temple of Enki?
Who was the Lady Sacred Mountain?
What did the Sumerian deities form?
Why did the gods create human beings from clay?
What could Sumerian gods be associated with?
What did the religious importance of city gods wax and wan with?
How could a citizen avoid their labor duty to their local temple?
What were Sumerian temples known as?
What was the central pond in the forecourt of a Ziggurat for?
Who were the rooms on either side of the aisles in the temple for?
What was the mudbrick table in the temple for?
Where did the Sumerians usually locate their granaries and storehouses?
What type of afterlife could Sumerians look forward to?
Where were dead Sumerians buried?
What realm was guarded by gateways containing various monsters?
Who was Queen Puabi accompanied in death by?
What type of instrument are the Sumerians thought to have invented to use at royal funerals?
When do the pictograms suggest Sumerians had domesticated livestock?
What might be found by the side of a Sumerian house?
What animal did Sumerians use primary to facilitate transportation?
What was the primary purpose of oxen for Sumerians? 
Where were plants also grown besides the garden?
What was Sumerians one of the first societies known to consume?
What was the key ingredient in early Sumerian brews?
What kinds of beer did the Sumerians brew?
How important was beer brewing to Sumerians?
What did Enkidu become and do after consuming seven jugs of beer?
Why did the Sumerian farmers make their oxen stomp the ground?
How do archaeologists know about Sumerian agricultural practices? 
How many times did Sumerian farmers plow, harrow and rake the ground?
When would farmers flood their fields?
The the Ur III period, what crop had Sumerians switched to from wheat for their primary crop?
What is the most impressive and famous style of Sumerian buildings?
Sumerians also built houses from reeds not very different from ones built by inhabitants in Iraq as recently as when?
How did the Sumerians build their strong domes?
What development by the Sumerians allowed them to make use of domes?
Where were the use of advanced materials and techniques on display in Sumer?
What were the main types of loans in Sumerian society?
How man shekel per mina was the interest rate for loans?
What was trade credit backed by when extended by temples?
For how long was the interest rate of Sumerian loans consistent?
What typically arose as a result of unpaid obligations?
What type of debt did "clean slate" decrees cancel?
When did rulers typically proclaim "clean slate" decrees?
Why were the clean slate decrees useful to the rulers of Sumer?
What would happen if peasants couldn't repay their debts?
Who made the first known clean slate decrees?
What contributed to developing military technology for Sumer?
How many years were the Sumerian city-states at war?
Who was the first war between in 2525 BC?
What did the king of Lagash's army mostly consist of?
What shape were the shields of the infantry of Lagash?
When did evidence of wheeled vehicles appear throughout the world?
What form did wheels initially take?
The writing system of the Sumerian's is the second oldest to have what done to it?
What did the Sumerians map stars into?
How many planets were the Sumerians aware of?
Sumerians used number systems which included what alternating bases?
What type of number system was standard in Sumer and Babylonia?
What type of formations is it possible Sumerians invented?
What systems did the Sumerians develop which remain the first known these types to this day?
In Sumerian society, who oversaw the operation of the first formal schools?
How many years ago did migrations of people happen in the Pacific area?
By what means did locale people travel between Pacific islands?
How many islands are in the Tuvalu group?
On how many of Tuvalu's islands did people live?
What is the native language meaning of Tuvalu?
What is the creation myth of Tuvalu?
What does the flounder of the Tuvalu myth represent?
What does the eel of the Tuvalu creation myth represent?
From what land did the people of Niutao believe they came?
From where did the people of the island of Nanumea think they came?
When did Arent Schuyler de Peyster visit Tuvalu?
Which of the Tuvalu isalnds did de Peyster see?
What name did de Peyster give the Tuvalu islands?
For whom did de Peyster name Ellice's Island?
After Findlay's charting how many islands of the group were named Ellice?
In what century did trading companies arrive in Tuvalu?
What type of traders did the trading companies employ on Tuvalu?
Who was the first European to permanently settle on Tuvalu?
Which native did O'Brien marry?
What trader turned author established a post on Tuvalu?
What sea captain reported on the Tuvalu trading in 1892?
What was the name of Davis's ship?
What did palagi traders act as for the trading companies?
How many traders did some islands have?
What type of islands in the Tuvalu group have few traders? 
What operational changes caused a decline in the numbers of palagi traders in Tuvalu?
What type of traders did the Pacific trading companies cease to use?
How did the trading companies begin to trade with islanders?
By what year were there no more palagi traders on Tuvalu?
What is the term for a ship's cargo manager?
When did Robert Louis Stevenson sail on the ship Janet Nicoll?
Who recorded the trip aboard the Janet Nicoll?
What type of ship was the Janet Nicoll?
What writer visited the Tuvalu Islands in 1890?
What was the title of the travel book written by Fanny Vandegrift Stevenson?
What are the boreholes on Funafuti called?
What group conducted a study of coral on Funafuti?
What formations was the Royal Society studying?
Who's basic work in the area of coral reefs did the Royal Society's investigations follow?
What was Darwin's work on coral reefs titled?
What naturalist was on the 1896 expedition to Funafuti?
What type of objects did Hedley collect on Funafuti
For what purpose was Funafuti used during the Pacific War? 
What group occupied the Gilbert Islands?
What action delayed the Japanese occupation of the Gilbert Islands?
From what time span were USN Torpedo Boats stationed at Funafuti?
On what islet did US forces build a seaplane ramp?
In what year was ministerial government started in the Gilbert and Ellice islands?
When was a referendum held to determine the government of Ellice?
What document was changed to cause a change in government?
What was the determination of the referendum?
What did the Tuvaluan Order 1976 recognize Tuvalu to be?
When did Tuvalu acquire independence?
What was formed in 1974?
After independence, what was the Assembly on Tuvalu  named? 
What type of parliament does Tuvalu have?
In Tuvalu government, what group elect the Prime Minster?
How many courts are there on Tuvalu?
What is the name of the superior court of Tuvalu?
What is the High Court's right to determine?
What judge is the Chief Justice of the Tuvalu High Court?
To where can judgments be appealed?
In what group is Tuvalu involved?
In which forum group is Tuvalu a member?
In which British group is Tuvalu a member?
To what world organization does Tuvalu belong?
On what date did Tuvalu join the Pacific Islands Development Forum?
What crisis is a major concern for Tuvalu at the UN?
In concert with global warming, what is Tuvalu's other envirnmental priority? 
What agreement does Tuvalu advocate ratification?
What did Tuvalu call for from other nations concerning reduction of carbon emissions?
What does Tuvalu feel its position to be in climate change?
Of what alliance is Tuvalu a member?
What is the AOSIS'S main concern?
To what agreement has Tuvalu committed?
What type of energy does the Majuro Declaration advocate?
By what means does Tuvalu plan to produce 95% of its energy?
In what fishery group does Tuvalu participate? 
Of what fishery treaty is Tuvalu a signatory?
What is the focus of the Nauru Agreement?
Of what did Tuvalu agree to the extension ?
What did Tuvalu refuse to sell in 2015?
What trade agreement did Tuvalu sign in 2013?
What does the Memorandum concern?
What does the trade agreement encompass?
With what group does the  agreement form an alliance?
To whom does the Facility seek to deliver aid?
What is the Tuvalu high chief on each island called?
What is the name of the sub-chiefs in Tuvalu?
What is the Tuvaluan traditional assembly of elders?
What was the caste of priests in the past on Tuvalu?
With what group do the falekaupule share power on Tuvalu?
What was the argument against the deportation of a Tuvaluan family from new Zealand?
By what reason was the Tuvaluan family allowed to immigrate?
What court ruled the claim of climate change refugee to be untenable?
What feature was missing in the climate change claims?
What document draws out the requirements of refugee status?
What is New Zealand's annual quota of Tuvaluan granted work permits?
What must a Tuvaluan have to be considered for a work permit in New Zealand?
How many Pacific islander seasonal workers are permitted?
What is the program that allows season employees work permits?
What program was introduced in 2007 for season workers in New Zealand?
What is the only hospital in Tuvalu?
How many nurses does Princess Margaret have on staff?
On which island in Tuvalu is the hospital?
What kind of nursing services do outer islands nurses provide?
How many nurses are provided to the outer islands?
Where is the Extension Centre for the USP?
What group funds the Augmented Foundation Programme?
Where is the Augmented Programme required for further education?
Which students go into the Augmented Foundation Programme?
In what educational institution is the program found?
What is the required education for males on Tuvalu?
How long are females required to go to school?
What was the literacy rate on Tuvalu in 2002?
How many students were in Tuvalu schools in 2010?
What si the teacher-student ratio for Tuvalu schools?
What type of school has Tuvalu set up on each atoll?
For what have CTC students failed to qualify ?
What from of education do Community Training Centres provide?
Besides children, who can Take CTC  classes?
What kind of training classes are offered at CTC?
What were the traditional building materials on Tuvalu?
What type of trees provided lumber for building on Tuvalu?
What building material did coconut provide?
What construction feature was lacking in Tuvaluan building?
From what was rope made for tying buildings together?
What sea creatures were used in traditional handicrafts?
In what item has Tuvalu traditional design been produced?
What type of decorative items use traditional Tuvalu designs?
For what  have objects having traditional design been used?
What traditional purpose are Tuvalu designs still used?
What is the stable protein  of Tuvalu?
What vegetable features in the Tuvalu diet?
What kind of milk has been replaced with coconut milk on Tuvalu?
What type of meat is eaten on Tuvalu?
At what event is pork traditionally eaten on Tuvalu?
What is the traditional sport on Tuvalu?
What is the Tuvalu version of volley ball?
To what sport is kilikiti like?
What group disliked the traditional war-like sports of Tuvalu?
With what equipment is ano played?
What athlete won Tuvalu's first gold metal in competition? 
In which competition did Lapua win a metal for Tuvalu?
In what contests did Lapua win  metals for Tuvalu?
Who won a gold metal at the Pacific Games?
In what type of competition did Telupe losefa win in 2015?
What is a major annual sports event in Tuvalu?
What is the most important sports event held on Tuvalu?
In what year did Tuvalu first appear in the Commonwealth Games?
What type of competitor entered the commonwealth Games in 1998?
What competitions have Tuvalu athletes entered in the World Championships in Athletics?
What was Tuvalu's GDP rate from 1996 to 2002?
 What has been the GDP of Tuvalu in 2008?
What rises in cost have effected Tuvalu's domestic growth?
What has been the level of domestic growth in 2010 on Tuvalu?
What does Tuvalu expect as a return in fishing licenses and foreign aid?
What business provides banking services on Tuvalu?
Where are many of those who provide income to residents earning?
How do 15% of male Tuvaluans earn their income?
What percentage of the Tuvalu workforce is in the public sector?
What school provides maritime education on Tuvalu?
What is the yearly number of cadets at the Maritime Training Institute?
What is the only trade union on Tuvalu?
On what does the Seaman'd Union represent workers?
How many Tuvaluan men are active seafarers?
How much money does Tuvalu's tv domain name earn each year?
What si Tuvalu's tv domain?
What company is managing Tuvalu's tv domain?
How much of the total government revenue comes from the domain name?
What  income source does Tuvalu earn from shipping?
What is the UN developmental designation for Tuvalu?
What did Tuvalu do in 2013 in regards to it least developed country status?
What organization sponsors an assistance program for least developed countries?
What would Tuvalu have lost as a developed country?
What type of problem does the current developed country rating not take into enough consideration?
Where is Tuvalu's only port?
Where is there a deep water berth available on Tuvalu?
Of how many ships does the merchant marine fleet consist?
What ship did Japan donate to Tuvalu in 2015?
What do Tuvalu's merchant fleet carry?
How many reef islands does the Tuvalu group have?
What are the number of true atolls are in the Tuvalu islands?
What is the total land area of Tuvalu?
How does Tuvalu rank in country size as compared to other nations?
What is the coverage of Tuvalu's economic zone?
What type of device did Australia and New Zealand offer to Tuvalu during the 2011 drought?
As aprt of what program did Japan fund a new desalination plant at Tuvalu?
What did aid from the European Union provide during the drought on Tuvalu?
What did Tuvalu's new water tanks make possible to store?
In what year had Japan previously donated a desalination plant to Tuvalu?
What is the modern name for the air field built during WWII?
What was damaged by building of the war time air field?
What has the pits from the Tuvalu air runways construction  impacted?
What government funded the restoration of the borrow pits on Tuvalu?
How much increase in land space did the filling of the borrow pits cause?
What has been formed to protect the fish stocks in Tuvalu Lagoon?
What factor has caused an increased demand for fish?
What has growth in population and poor sanitation caused?
What organization has funded a waste management control plan on Tuvalu?
What do imports produce on Tuvalu?
What type of desalination is used on Funafuti?
How much water does the Funafuti plant produce?
At what storage  point is R/O water production meant to be used?
What organization subsidizes the cost of water desalination?
What is the cost of R/O produced water?
When did the UN ask Tuvalu to come up with a plan to improve drinking water?
What did Tuvalu develop as a safe water strategy?
What is the per person per day targeted use of water for Tuvalu?
What organization called for Tuvalu to  improve its water and sanitation systems?
What group ultimately sponsored the Tuvalu water resources policy?
What geological situation makes Tuvalu prone to storm damage?
To what climate change condition does Tuvalu's low elevation make it susceptible?
What is the highest elevation on Tuvalu?
Where on Tuvalu is the highest elevation?
Where does Tuvalu rank among other countries as to lowest elevation?
What were the wave heights during Cyclone Pam on Tuvalu?
In what year did Cyclone Pam strike Tuvalu?
During Cyclone Pam which island had the most damage?
What percentage of Tuvalu crops were destroyed during  Cyclone Pam?
The loss of what caused the Vasafua islet to become  a sand bar due to Cyclone Pam?
What did the Tuvalu government assess after Cyclone Pam?
What event on Tuvalu made assistance to the population necessary?
What assistance did many international groups give to Tuvalu?
For what action was government assistance necessary after the Tuvalu cyclone??
What subject is arguable concerning Tuvalu?
What was the amount of sea level change on Tuvalu estimated by the 2011 report?
What device was used to produce the measurements of sea level change on Tuvalu?
Prior to what year were the reports used to assess sea level rise?
What is assumed about the sea level reports and records of Tuvalu?
What have the Tuvalu atolls displayed about sea level rise?
What does gradual sea level rise allow for coral to increase?
What sea level rise rate could cause more uncertainty to the welfare of coral reefs? 
What condition besides sea level rise can damage coral reefs?
Where does sand and coral debris end up because of the action of cyclones?
What is the Immaculate Conception a representation of the avoidance of ?
What was Mary prevented from having to endure ?
Who was believed to have prevented this from occurring to Mary ?
What was the outcome of preventing Mary from having to endure such an injustice ?
Is it believed that Mary carried no transgression which would require blame ?
How did the Church view Mary in regards to her personal sins ? 
What was the name of the ecumenical council that made the decision ?
Is the view of the impregnation of Mary's pregnancy the same as the one held for the birth of her first child ?
What is the view held at the Vatican regarding how Mary was actually given life into the world ?
When did these contradictory views start to emerge ?
When were contradictory views to  the belief of Mary's parentage struck down ?
Who were the parents of Mary believed to be ?
What was explained by the man  Giovanni Maria Mastai-Ferretti who later became leader of the Holy Roman Church ?
What did Mary supposedly not require that everyone else also required and why was this so ?
What is the child of Mary known to be famous for according to  Giovanni Maria Mastai-Ferretti ?
What Empire held  Grecian teachers of the virginity of Mary's conception ?
Who gave a reason for the purging of evil for the Blessed Virgin and her first child ?
What procedure was being performed while he gave his reasoning ?
Who was compelled to write of this instance that was also an author of one of the book of the Bible ?
What became associated with the celebration of Mary's inception in the womb ? 
What proof do some believe is offered as to proof of Mary being the ultimate concept of pure?
What phrases were used to describe Mary ?
Who is often held as the model for all things holy and pure that is not Mary ?
Who refused to hear any contradictory views about Mary and her perceived inception ?
What did this person also state about all of mankind in regards to wayward transgressions  ?
Where did the majority of the concepts of Mary's birth show themselves the most ?
In what way did this Ruler refer to Mary  in his writings ?
What Byzantine Ruler ho ruled from from 527 to 565 was also a well trained thinker of concepts ?
What event happened to Theotokos that was of significant religious note ?
How did some view the the person whose name includes a Christian rite of passage from the Bible? 
What was widely observed in the eastern portion of the Byzantine world ?
What was the name of this festival ?
Was there anything in similarity that happened in the Western portion of the Empire ? If so who was it supported by?
Who was against all of the celebrations of Mary 's her birth ?
What happened on the final day of the month of love that was of significance was authorized by the Holy Roman Church leader ?
Who was the Holy Roman Church leader that authorized the change ?
What document made the authorization official ?
What word substitution did he use in the authorization to appease all of the worshipers and view points when speaking of the inception of Mary  ?
What was the opposite of a sinner who committed a venial type? It would be the most grave type of all . 
Who began to query the position of the conception of Mary following the 11th century ?
Who did the query starter lay blame upon for the festivals that surrounded Mary's inception ?
What did the query starter believe to be the ultimate difficulty in accepting  the a virgin conception of Mary ?
What did the query starter believe had been done by Mary's direct  maternal line that contradict the conception theory of immaculate for Mary ?
Did the query starter believe that the festival for Mary's conception had authorization to be held ?
What did the the monk of minor believe to be true of Mary ?
What point did his argument attempt to bring to the masses ?
What did the monk of minor believe could alleviate the tension in the matter of the 
What consequences did he believe that this would have on Mary's reputation ?
What holy document takes the view of Mary back to the creation of man and woman ?
What specific part the Bible does this document reference for Mary ?
According to the document what did the forebears already have knowledge of before Mary came about ?
Where was Mary represented (according to the Holy document ) on the vessel that wandered the sea for forty days and forty nights ?
What sect often stands in disagreement over the virginal inception of Mary ?
What does this group believe of the story of a Virgin mother for Mary and those who follow its teaching ?
What in particular does the group feels is impossible to believe ?
What did this theological study do to set itself apart from the other groups ?
What is the theological study of Mary called ?
Who is the person that started the religion that separated itself from the Catholic Church in the 17th century ?
What did he do that sparked the separation from the Catholic Church  ?
What did this leader of change believe of the conception of Mary ?
What did Mary's child avoid according to the leader of the separation ? 
What was written by the a all inclusive group convened by the holy church centered in Rome ?
What document did this group create once it was convened ?
What was the final conclusion reached in the report by the group ?
What type of interpretation did the group believe was of concern in regard to Mary ?
What did the document attempt to clarify ?
What  religion is credited by some authors from the west for initiating the story of the conceiving of Mary ?
According to the teaching of this other religion what occurred to Mary during the birth of her first child ?
What does this other religion also state  happens  to everyone besides Mary and her First born child  ?
What does the event cause to happen to everyone but Mary and her first born child ?
What do these authors use in the form of proof for credit given to the other religion  ?
What did the writer of a 1788 multi-volumed text say concerning plagiarism and the Roman Catholic Church ?
Who is the author of the texts entailed in the fifth part of the the collection about the Roman Catholic Church ?
What was the group of volumes titled ?
Where does the author state that the Roman Catholic Church received her facts and confirmations ?
What became very popular symbol among the who believed Mary had a Virgin for a mother ? 
What does Mary stand upon in this symbol?
What does Mary where atop her hair that twinkles in the symbol ?
When did Bantu immigrate to Namibia?
When did Namibia become German Imperial protectorate?
When did Namibia stop being a German colony?
What year did the League of Nations mandate Namibia to South Africa?
When did South Africa impose the apartheid policy on Namibia?
What does SWAPO stand for?
When was SWAPO designated as the representative of Namibian people?
When Namibia was under South African administration, what was it called?
Why did South Africa install an interim administration in Namibia?
When did Namibia obtain full independence?
Orlam clans crossed which river to migrate to Namibia?
What area of Namibia did Orlam clans settle in?
When did Orlam clans settle in Namibia?
When did the Nama-Herero war begin?
Who deployed troops to start the Nama-Herero war?
Herero and what other group took action against German occupiers?
When did two clans take up action against the German occupiers?
What was the war against the German occupiers considered?
How many Herero's were killed in the war against German occupiers?
How many Nama's were killed in the war against German occupiers?
When did South Africa refuse to surrender Namibia? 
When did South Africa occupy Namibia? 
Which council submitted petitions for Namibia's independence?
When was the League replaced by the United Nations?
When did European powers grant independence to their colonies in Africa?
Which guerrilla group fought for Namibia's independence? 
When did a guerrilla group fight for Namibia's independence? 
When did South Africa end occupation of Namibia?
Why did South Africa end occupation in Namibia?
What is the central-southern area of Namibia known as?
What was Namibia previously called?
What date did Namibia get it's official name?
What was the resolution that granted Namibia it's name?
How long did it take for South Africa to agree to the implantation of Namibia's new name? 
The diplomatic agreement between South Africa, Angola, and Cuba was observed by the USSR and what other country?
What does UNTAG stand for?
Who was the diplomat for UNTAG?
When was the diplomat for UNTAG deployed to supervise withdrawals from Namibia?
What nationality was the diplomat in UNTAG?
What was the official election slogan in the first Namibia election?
When was the Namibian Constitution adopted?
Who was the first President of Namibia?
When did the country of Namibia officially become a country?
Who swore in the first President of Namibia?
What was ceded to Namibia in 1994? 
What did Namibia transition to after white minority apartheid rule?
What type of independence was introduced in Namibia after independence? 
What party has won every election in Namibia?
Who succeeded Sam Nujoma?
How long did president Same Nujoma rule?
What Desert is shared between South Africa and Botswana?
How many plants species are found in Succulent Karoo?
How many plants are endemic to the Succulent Karoo?
How many of the worlds succulents are found in Karoo?
What is probably the reason there are so many unique plants in Karoo?
What current dominates the coastal area of Namibia?
What direction does the current in the coastal area flow?
Which ocean is on the coastal area of Namibia?
What is the condition that happens in winter in Namibia?
What do hot dry winds blowing inland to the coast create?
What does Namibia protect in it's constitution? 
What article in the Namibia constitution supports natural conservation?
What do Namibians believe sustains them?
When did Namibia receive funding from USAID?
What does LIFE project stand for?
What does CBNRM stand for?
What does USAID stands for?
Who does Namibia have affiliation with in their foreign policy?
What ties does Namibia want to strengthen?
Which number member is Namibia in the UN?
When did Namibia join the UN?
Which number member is Namibia in the Commonwealth of Nations?
What was the highest unemployment rate in Namibia?
Who is the Labour and Social Welfare Minister?
When was the lowest unemployment rate in Namibia?
What is Namibian's unemployment rate?
What did Bloomberg name Namibia?
What rank did Bloomberg name Namibia's economy?
How many African countries made the list for top Emerging Markets?
How much of the population depends on agriculture?
How much more is the per capita GDP in Namibia compared to the rest of Africa's countries?
Namibia has one of the highest rates of what type of income problems in the world?
Where does a majority of Namibia's people live?
How much of Namibia's land is arable?
How much revenue does mining provide Namibia?
Where does Namibia rank in the exportation of uranium? 
What does rich alluvial diamond deposits make Namibia a source of?
Namibia was expected to become the largest exporter of what in 2015?
What is the capital of Namibia?
What is the airport in Namibia?
What is the most popular hotel in Windhoek?
Avani Hotels and resorts is a chain resort in Windhoek, what is another?
What does NTB stand for?
What is act 21 of 2000 in Namibia?
What does act 21 in Namibia regulate?
What market does Act 21 promote?
Most residential areas are insufficient in what area of Namibia?
Besides installation cost, why are private flush toilets too expensive for most residents in Namibia?
What do Namibian's use as a toilet?
Where do flying toilets end up after use?
Urinating and defecating in public has been identified as what?
Whites make up how much of Namibia's population?
What is the language of Namibia?
Where do a large minority of whites trace their Namibian roots to?
What was the population in South-West Africa in 1960?
How much of the population was white in South-West Africa in 1960?
When was the first Population and Housing Census in Namibia?
How often does Namibia conduct a census?
What is it called when the census counts every person wherever they are the night of the census? 
How many enumeration areas are there in Namibia?
The enumeration areas in Namibia do not overlap with what in order to get reliable data?
German, English, and Afrikaans were the official languages until when in Namibia?
What is the primary language of Namibia, as SWAPO instituted?
SWAPO thought Namibia should have what type of official language?
How many Namibian's speak English?
There was a high rate of what due to monolingual instruction?
What is the toughest footrace around the world?
Which team participated in the 2008 FIRS World Championship?
What popular sport was first played in Namibia in 1995?
Who is the most famous athlete from Namibia?
What sport does the most famous Namibian athlete participate in?
What was the first Namibian newspaper?
What was the language in which the first Namibian newspaper was printed in?
When was the first Namibian newspaper founded?
When was radio introduced in Namibia?
When was TV introduced in Namibia?
Compared to neighbouring countries, what freedom does Namibia have?
Namibia is on par with what country in terms of media and reporting?
Where was Namibia ranked on Press Freedom in 2009?
Where was Namibia ranked on Press Freedom in 2013?
Where was Namibia ranked on Press Freedom in 2014?
What health issue is compounded by the AIDS epidemic in Namibia?
What is the risk of contracting malaria if an individual is already infected with HIV?
The risk of death by malaria raises by how much with a concurrent HIV infection?
How many physicians did Namibia have in 2002?
What language does the Russian Orthodox Church use?
What kind of words in Russian have been influenced by Church Slavonic?
What word forms are used together in some cases?
How much of Estonia is ethnic Russians?
How much of Estonia speaks Russian?
What is the ratio of young Estonians who speak Russian relative to those who speak English?
How much of Estonia's native Estonians speaks Russian?
When did Finland join the Russian Empire?
When did Finland leave the Russian Empire?
What percent of Finns speak Russian?
How many Finns speak Russian?
How many Russian-speaking Finns are descended from early immigrants?
How many Ukrainians speak Russian natively as of 2004?
How many Ukrainians speak Russian actively as of 2004?
What percent of Ukraine is fluent in Russian as of 2006?
What percent of Ukraine use Russian as their main language as of 2006?
What is Russian's legal status in Ukraine?
In which European countries do many Russian immigrants live?
How much of Ireland's Russian speakers are Russian citizens?
How many people in Ireland speak Russian?
How much of Ireland's Russian speakers are Irish citizens?
How much of Ireland's Russian speakers are Latvian citizens?
What convention recognizes Russian in Armenia?
How many Armenians speak Russian natively?
How many Armenians speak Russian actively?
What percent of Armenia speaks Russian?
What percent of Armenia uses Russian as their main language?
How many Georgians speak Russian actively?
What convention recognizes Russian in Georgia?
How many Georgians speak Russian natively?
What percent of Georgia is fluent in Russian?
What percent of Georgia use Russian as their main language?
What is the legal status of Russian in Kazakhstan?
What percent of people in Kazakhstan speak Russian fluently?
How many people in Kazakhstan speak Russian natively?
How many people in Kazakhstan speak Russian actively?
What percent of people in Kazakhstan use Russian as their main language?
Where did Russian explorers first reach North America?
When did Russian explorers first reach North America?
When did the US buy Alaska?
What portion of Russian-speaking Americans are ethnic Russians?
What is the term for Russian-speaking people?
When did Apollo-Soyuz fly?
For which mission did NASA astronauts first learn Russian?
What math competition has Russian as an official language?
What are Russian astronauts called?
What is the second-most-popular language online as of 2013?
What percent of all websites are in English?
What percent of all websites are in Russian?
What percent of all .ru websites are in Russian?
What percent of Ukraine's websites are in Russian?
What two regions do some linguists divide Russian into?
What three regions do some linguists divide Russian into?
What distinguishes Russian dialects?
Who says Russian has 6 vowels?
When are Russian vowels written differently?
What dialect is standard Russian based on?
What language does Russian treat hard consonants similar to?
What is done to unstressed vowels?
When did Eastern Slavs become the dominant group in the area of Ukraine?
When was Kievan Rus' formed?
What countries did Kievan Rus' become?
What was the main language in Kievan Rus'?
When did Kievan Rus' adopt Christianity?
When did the USSR dissolve?
When did the USSR make Russian the official language?
What unofficial status did Russian have in the USSR before 1990?
What department is the Research Center for Sociological Research part of?
Who wrote "Russian language at the turn of the 20th-21st centuries"?
When was "Russian language at the turn of the 20th-21st centuries" published?
What does Arefyev say is happening to Russian?
What is the USAF?
How many uniformed services are there in the United States?
When did the USAF split from the US Army?
What act formed the USAF?
What is one of the functions of the USAF?
How many departments are there in the Department of Defense?
Who does the Secretary of the Air Force currently report to? 
What branch of the government must confirm the President's appointment of the Secretary of the Air Force? 
Who serves as a member of the Joint Chiefs of Staff?
Who assigns combat missions to the Air Force? 
How many core functions did the Air Force reduce its duties down to recently? 
What do these core functions of the Air Force express? 
What are not considered doctrinal constructs of the Air Force? 
What is the mission set of the Air Force called that includes nuclear strike operations? 
How does the Air Force promote security to its allies? 
What is the US Air Force prepared to do to support its allies? 
What do potential adversaries threaten that the US Air Force prevents? 
What is the definition of a nuclear strike? 
What action by the US Air Force would deter adversaries from threatening US Security? 
Who has the authorization in the US to terminate a conflict?
What organization does the US Air Force support on its missions? 
What is one of the areas where the US Air Force might operate its missions? 
What ensures the safety of nuclear operations? 
What is the mission of the NDO in regards to nuclear security? 
What is a Broken Arrow incident in nuclear security? 
What is one of the five functions of NDO support? 
What other US departments does the Air Force coordinate with for nuclear security? 
What does the abbreviation OCA stand for? 
What is the function or definition of the OCA according to JP 1-02?
OCA is the preferred method of defeating what kind of attacks? 
What is one of the important functions of the OCA in dealing with attacks? 
What does the abbreviation DCA stand for? 
What sort of airspace is the DCA designed to protect?
What is active defense, according to the functions of the DCA? 
What kind of missile defense does active defense protect against, according to the DCA?
What is one of the many ways the DCA utilizes passive defense to protect from enemy attacks? 
What is the dominance in space of one force over another? 
What does Space Superiority encompass? 
Who does space superiority ensure freedom of action in space for? 
What areas does Space Superiority operate in? 
What is the definition of Space Control according to the US and its allies? 
What is one of the areas of operation that space control serves to protect? 
What is the operational environment that Space Control depends on? 
Who responds with the employment of capabilities where there is a threat?
What is the definition of CND?
What does Cyberspace defense include?
What is one of the things that Cyberspace defense highly dependent on? 
What branch of the military is in charge of Cyberspace defense? 
What division ensures the Air Force's information integrity and availability? 
What is ability is critical in Cyberspace Supports mission?
What important networks is it the function of Cyberspace support to protect?
What techniques does the Cyberspace Support branch of the Air Force use? 
What is the definition of Command and Control in the Air Force operations? 
Who is in charge of the Command and Control operations? 
What is one of the C2 related functions that the Command and Control mission of the Air Force uses? 
What are the main objectives of the Command and Control initiative? 
What agency is in charge of intelligence requirements? 
What is one of the ways that the Air Force uses Planning and Directing in its operations? 
Who benefits from the process analysis and dissemination of this information? 
What are Special Operations? 
What are the goals of Special Operations? 
What kind of forces can Special Operations missions employ? 
What is one of the ways that Special Operations is different from conventional methods?
Who coordinates the deployment of thee Aeromedical Evacuation? 
What is the movement of patients who need medical attention called?
Where does the Aeromedical Evacuation team transport casualties? 
Who operates and is able to conduct airland missions? 
What does the abbreviation PR stand for in terms of the US military?
What is the definition of a Personnel Recovery mission? 
What is one of the ways that PR uses its capabilities in a crisis? 
What are the types of international duties of the PR mission? 
What are programs that are designed to help with natural or manmade disaters? 
What kind of Humanitarian assistance is supplied by the US Forces?
What kinds of endemic conditions do the Human Assistance Operations entail? 
Who is the Humanitarian support intended to help? 
What does Building Partnerships relate to in the Air Force? 
What are the goals of the Building Partnership interactions?
What sort of inter-personal relationships does Building Partnerships encourage? 
What is the major goal of Building Partnerships in these deeds and actions?
What are Airmen expected to be competent in for these Building Partnerships missions?
Who created the first version of the US Air Force in 1907?
When did the US Air Force separate from the War Department? 
How many causalities did the US Air Force suffer during WWII? 
What does the USAAF stand for? 
Who signed the National Security Act of 1947? 
What was the National Military Establishment renamed in 1949?
How many subordinate divisions did the National Military Establishment contain?
What does the US Navy's responsibilities include?
Who is in charge of closed air support of infantry operations? 
What American broke the sound barrier in 1947?
What did the USAF strive to improve since 2005?
What is the deployment phase of BMT called? 
What other training do the US Air force Personnel get during BMT? 
Who acts as a mentor during this deployment phase of the BMT?
What year did the USAF take a Reduction-in-force?
Why did the USAF plan to take a reduction-in-force?
How many USAF personnel did the reduction end in during 2008?
What has there been a sharp reduction in during the years following 2005 in the USAF?
Who was Robert Gates? 
What Secretary of the Air Force resigned in 2008?
Where did the US Air Force accidentally ship a component of Nuclear Weapons? 
What US Chief of Staff of the US Air Force also resigned in June of 2008?
When was the Air Force Global Strike Command formed?
Why was the USAF forced to ground some of its squadrons in 2013?
Who was the Commander of Air Combat Command in 2013?
Why have many US Air Force pilots opted to resign from active service? 
Where have many of these US Air Force pilots chosen to find employment instead? 
What is one of the concerns of the Air Force? 
How did the USAF try to make these adjustments to help with strength and readiness of its fleet? 
How much money did Congress give to the USAF to enable them to replace some of the grounded fleet? 
Who is the Department of the Air Force managed by?
Who does the Secretary of the Air Force report to?
Who appoints the top positions in the USAF, including the Assistant Secretaries and General Council?
Upon whom does the President call on for support in his appointments to the USAF?
Who does the senior leadership roles in the USAF include? 
Who directs the Secretary of the Air Force during operational missions? 
What does the abbreviation CHOP stand for? 
Who does the AMC forces usually retain their componency to?
Who is in charge of these Change in Operational Control missions? 
What are "Chopped" units called in the USAF?
What is the top level structure of these Chopped forces in the USAF? 
What does the C-NAF provide support to?
Who does the C-NAFF coordinate with on ACEE missions?
What kind of AFSC is a JAG?
What is one of the many types of AFSC employed by the USAF? 
What is an example of an occupational field position in the USAF?
What does the abbreviation EOD stand for in the USAF?
What is one of the most dangerous jobs for USAF personnel?
What do some of these special missions in the USAF who deploy with the infantry do?
What are these enlisted positions in the USAF complimented by?
What other career fields have seen an increase in active combat missions? 
How long is the training for Explosive Ordnance Disposal in the USAF?
What USAF tech school has 31 days of training?
Who conducts the training for Technical Officers in the USAF?
How long does the flight training for the AETC's Nineteenth Air Force last? 
What groups is the USAF rank divided amoung? 
How are Enlisted promotions in the USAF decided? 
How are Officer promotions within the USAF decided?
How is a Commissioned Officer's rank shown?
Was does ROPMA stand for in the USAF? 
What are Air Force Officer promotions overseen by?
How long does it usually take to be promoted from second to first lieutenant in the USAF? 
Who establishes limits on the amount of Air Force officers? 
What promotion in the USAF is governed by a formal selection process?
Where is an officer's record in the USAF reviewed for a promotion?
What state is the Randolph Air Force Base located in? 
When does promotion from major to lieutenant colonel in the USAF typically occur?
The promotion process repeats when for officers promoted early in the USAF?
What section in the US Code for the Secretary of the Air Force allows for the appointment of warrant officers?
When did the USAF inherit warrant officer ranks from the Army?
When did Congress authorize the creation of two new senior officer grades?
When did the USAF stop appointing warrant officers?
What is the newest top enlisted grade in the USAF?
What is the lowest pay grade in the USAF?
What is the highest pay grade in the USAF?
What pay grades are included in the USAF for Senior NCOs?
What does junior NCO refer to in the USAF pay grade system?
When does NCO status happen in all other branches of the US Military?
When does NCO status occur in the USAF?
What must a Senior Airman do to become a supervisor in the USAF?
What rank is NCO status achieved in the US Army?
Where was the Uxbridge Blue dress uniform developed?
When was the first USAF dress uniform introduced?
When was the current USAF dress uniform standardized? 
Where does an officer in the USAF wear their rank insignia? 
What is worn by USAF members to indicate a billet assignment? 
What else can Badges be used to designate in the USAF? 
What is one of the types of Authorized Badges in the USAF? 
When is the special "pocket rocket" badge given to USAF personnel working in a missile system operation? 
USAF Officers can be commissioned after graduation from what school? 
What is another program that allows officers to become commissioned in the USAF?
Where is the OTS in the US currently located?
What is a line officer in the USAF? 
How many commissioning programs does the OTS offer the USAF?
What does the Air Force provide for officers of direct to non-line positions?
What fields of study in the COT are included in this area of the USAF? 
What is an example of the coursework now offered in the COT in the USAF? 
What is the more strict program that the USAF adopted in 2010 called?
What test is designed to test the fitness of airmen in the USAF? 
How long is the run that the USAF airmen are tested on for the fitness program? 
What is a passing score on the US Air Force Fitness Test? 
What score must an airman get on the US Air Force Fitness test to be able to opt out of one of the mandatory twice a year retests? 
What are the ground-attack aircraft in the USAF usually deployed in support for? 
What does the closeness to friendly troops require of these US Air Force aircraft?
What part of a battle line are the precision strike aircraft of the USAF deployed?
What type of aircraft is not appropriate to be used in close proximity of US ground troops? 
What are most attack aircraft in the US Air Force designed to do? 
What type of USAF aircraft is designed for long range airstrike attacks? 
What types of aircraft are typically limited to close proximity of battlefield conflict by the USAF? 
What increases the radius of combat missions by the US Air Force?
What countries utilize strategic bomber aircraft in their missions? 
When did the B-2A aircraft enter into service of the US Air Force? 
When did the USAF introduce the B-1B aircraft? 
What aircraft in the USAF was introduced in the 1960s?
How long is the B-52H scheduled to remain in service of the USAF? 
What aircraft is scheduled to replace the B-52 in the USAF?
What type of aircraft is used to deliver troops and weapons to military operations? 
What aircraft are considered the workhorses of the US Air Force?
The CV-22 aircraft is used by what section of the USAF?
What aircraft offers Antarctic Support to the US Air Force?
What did the USAF use the WC-130H aircraft for before they converted them for transport missions? 
What is the purpose of electronic warfare?
What nickname is given to Electronic warfare aircraft?
What does the USAF use Electronic warfare aircraft for?
What is the EC-130H used for by the US Air Force? 
What does the USAF use the E-4B aircraft for?
What is the primary function of the USAF fighter aircraft?
What is the name of a type of dual purpose fighter-bomber aircraft used by the US Air Force?
What aircraft is used by the US Air Demonstration group The Thunderbirds?
What kind of aircraft is utilized by the USAF in Full Scale Aerial Targets?
What are the QF-4 aircraft being replaced by the US Air Force? 
What kind of aircraft is the USAF's KC-135?
How does the aerial refueling aircraft supply fuel during flight?
When is air-to-air refueling primarily used by the US Air Force?
What aircraft will be available for use by the US Air Force in 2017?
What US Secretary of Defense accepted resignations of top US Air Force officials in June of 2009?
What US Secretary of the Air Force resigned following a nuclear weapons problem ?
Who was appointed to the Chief of Staff of the Air Force following Mosley's resignation?
What newspaper reported on Schwartz's dismantlement of the US Air Force's class system?
What author wrote about the US Air Force egalitarian culture?
How does the US Air Force differ from other branches of the military?
How have the enlisted forces of the US Air Force been seen?
What is the reason for the shortage of UAV operators in the US Air Force?
During what war the the USAF establish a new career field for piloting UAVs and drones?
Why did the USAF change its training methods on UAVs in 2014?
What branch of the US Military does a cultural divide prevent the US Air Force from adopting their drone protocols?
Where did some of the US Air Force traditions come from? 
What traditions does the US Air Force have? 
What organization did the US Air Force adopt "Challenge Coins" from?
What does the roof stomp tradition signify in the US Air Force?
What was a recent US Air Force recruiting slogan? 
What does the USAF slogan Uno Ab Alto mean? 
What is the most recent US Air Force recruitment slogan in October 2010?
Where can individual each USAF wing, group or squadrons individual motto be found?
What type of atmosphere can LED lighting be used?
What is an advantage to using LED lighting over the normal light sources?
What does LED stand for?
Why are some people hesitant to use LED lighting?
What is a popular use for LED lighting?
What was the nationality of the man who discovered Electroluminescence?
LED lighting is the end result of what phenomenon?
When was Electroluminescence discovered?
Who is the Soviet man that created the first LED?
What type of detector did H.J. Round use to help him in his discovery?
What year was it discovered that early LED instruments could be used for non-radio communication?
Who discovered non-radio uses for early LED devices?
The current in non-radio communication had to go through what type of component?
What other component was needed to detect the first current of a non-radio signal?
What final device was needed to hear the signal from the initial GaAs diode?
At what global company was the first visible-spectrum LED developed?
What GE employee developed the visible-spectrum LED?
What color is associated with the visible-spectrum LED?
What color LED was later created in 1972?
What graduate student of Holonyak created the yellow LED?
What was the first commercial uses of LEDs?
How much did the early LEDs cost?
What was one use of early LED light in products?
What modern company introduced LEDs in 1968?
In what decade were production costs greatly reduced for LEDs to enable successful commercial uses?
What color LED was demonstrated in 1994?
Who demonstrated the first blue LED?
What did Nakamura, Akasaki, and Amano receive for their work?
Who investigated the efficiency of high-brightness LED at Cardiff University in 1995?
What substance did Barbieri use in his work with high-brightness LED?
What LED quickly followed the blue LEDs?
What does the YAG phosphor coating produce?
What converts absorbed light energy into an electric current?
What is the phenomenon where a P-N junction emits light when an electrical current is applied to it?
Where are the free electrons located in the production of electroluminescence?
Whose energy levels are lower than the electrons in the electroluminescence process?
Why is some energy in the electroluminescence process emitted as heat and light?
In what year was a new type of blue LED produced?
Who demonstrated in 2003 the new type of blue LED?
How much more efficient as standard incandescents was the white LED commercially available in 2003?
What is the typical operating current for high-power LEDs?
What is a symptom of LED failure?
What is rare in LED lighting?
What was notable in early red LEDs?
What could cause early light-output degradation in LEDs?
What is a classification used in LED lighting to describe how much usefulness it will receive?
LED efficacy is inversely proportional to what?
Where is LED lighting very well suited?
LEDs produce less waste heat than what other device?
What is LED lighting more susceptible to than incandescent light?
What students developed the first blue-violet LED?
The first blue-violet LED was developed at what University?
When was the first blue-violet LED developed?
What substance helped demonstrate the first blue electroluminescence?
In what decade were breakthroughs made that brought in the modern era of GaN-based optoelectronic devices?
Who first patented a method to produce high-brightness blue LEDs?
Who first invented a method to produce high-brightness blue LEDs?
What technology was made possible by high-power blue light sources?
What is one modern gadget that benefits from high-power blue LED lighting?
What Nobel Prize did Nakamura, Amano, and Akasaki receive in 2014?
What award did Nakamura receive in 2006 for his invention?
How many companies did a judge say infringed on Dr. Moustakas's prior blue light patent in 2015?
What was the fine given to the three companies?
What are cladding layers?
How can light emission be varied from violet to amber?
What does AlGaN stand for?
What LEDs are more efficient when produced from the InGaN/GaN systems than without?
What colors are used to form white light?
What is the method called that mixes red, green, and blue colors to form white light?
What does the multi-color white LED method need to produce the end result?
What is another name to reference the multi-color white LED method?
What is a factor that may be different in the various types of multi-color white LEDs?
Higher efficiency in multi-color white LEDs may mean what?
What is one type of multi-color white LED?
What type has the best luminous efficacy?
What luminous efficacy does trichromatic white LEDs have?
Multi-color LEDs offer what else besides the formation of white light?
What problem must be solved before multi-color LEDs can play a role in the market?
What problem results when rising temperatures decays power?
What method involves coating LEDs of one color with phosphors of different colors?
In pcLEDs method, a fraction of what light is used?
What shift does blue light undergo in the pcLEDs method?
The different colors of phosphors that can be used is based on what?
What broadens the emitted spectrum in a pcLEDs method?
What do phosphor-based LEDs luminous efficacies depend on?
What is the most popular method for making high-intensity white LEDs?
Why is efficiency sometimes lost in phosphor-based LEDs?
What are some of the luminous efficacies of yellow phosphor based white LED compared to blue?
What type of emitter is used in phosphor-based white LED methods?
What can improve the efficiency of LED-based white light?
What is the most efficient yellow phosphor?
What is the percentage of stoke shift loss in YAG phosphor?
What area are scientists looking into regarding phosphor LED development?
What is one method that can raise the efficiency of phosphor-based LEDs?
White LEDs can be made by coating what?
What are near-ultraviolet LEDs coated with to create white LED?
What device also works in a similar way as NUV LEDs?
The method of coating NUVs less efficient than what other LEDs?
What light can harm human eyes or skin?
What is being used to produce white LEDs?
What size are the wafers used to create white LEDs?
By using silicon wafers, what is being avoided?
What needs to be used to reflect light that would otherwise be wasted?
By what year will% of all GaN LEDs be made with gallium-nitride-on-silicon wafers?
What nanocrystals possess unique optical properties?
Quantum Dot LEDs can do what special skill?
The narrowing of the emission spectrum in Quantum Dot LEDs allows them to do what?
How many types of schemes are there in Quantum Dot LED excitation?
What is one scheme of Quantum Dot excitation?
What is one material used in electrical-excitation?
During the electrical-excitation scheme, what moves into the quantum dot layer?
A Quantum Dot LED has been used in what?
How many lumens can some high-power LEDs emit?
Up to how many densities have been achieved with LED power?
Why must High-power LEDs be mounted on a heat sink?
What will happen if the heat from a high-power LED is not removed?
What can one high-power LED replace?
What company has developed LEDs that can operate on AC power?
What is the efficacy of an AC powered HP-LED?
When did Seoul Semiconductor release the first high DC voltage LED?
What is so good about ac powered HP-LEDs?
What did Seoul Semiconductor name their ac powered HP-LED?
What type of LEDs are available in seven-segment format?
What is another format that Alphanumeric LEDs are available in?
Which alphanumeric LED display can display all letters?
What type of pixels does a dot matrix display use?
What has reduced the popularity of numeric LED displays?
What makes RGB LEDs different?
How are Digital-RGB LED strobe signals connected?
What object sources the data in of the first LED of a digital rgb LED?
The microprocessor does what in a digital RGB LED?
What is one example of where Digital RGB LED lights are used?
What does an LED filament consist of?
How are LED filaments used?
What type of voltage is needed for LED filaments?
What helps LED filaments remain low cost?
Single die LEDs require what?
What dangerous metal can LEDs contain?
What substance does fluorescent lamps contain?
Which LEDs are considered dangerous by a 2011 study?
According to a California study, what harmful metal is in most LEDs?
What LEDs are considered safer than any other?
What type of light is ideal for traffic signals?
In what year were luminescence standards set?
What color LEDs are used when night vision is important?
What is an example of a night vision needed area?
What is another use for one-color light?
Because of their high output, LED lights are very useful where?
Why are LED lights sought after for various applications?
LED brake lights are how many times faster than incandescent ones?
What color LEDs are now starting to be used more?
What types of light can LEDs form better than incandescent?
Where are infrared LEDs used in everday life?
How are LEDs used in theaters?
LEDs can send data over what type of cable?
What type of fiber forms the backbone of the internet?
LEDs are often used for what type of systems?
Why are LEDs preferred for machine vision systems?
What can help make LEDs more widely used?
What is the most common example of a machine vision system?
Where are some LEDs in machine vision systems found?
Where are LEDs often used?
Where are opto-isolators found?
What is an example of a device that uses free space optic communications?
What does an optoisolator do?
In what common household item can you find infrared LEDs?
What video game console uses infrared LEDs?
What device uses infrared LEDs to measure oxygen saturation?
Some flatbed scanners use what type of LED?
By using LEDs, scanners do not have to what?
Grow lights use LEDs for what process?
What quality has LEDs been used as?
What LED has the flattest I/V curve above the knee?
What LEDs have a very steep I/V curve?
LED forward voltage is more current-dependent than what diode?
Zener diodes below what voltage are not widely available?
What is a group of endothermic vertebrates characterised by feathers and toothless beaked jaws?
What is the smallest bird?
What is the largest bird?
What is the size of the smallest bird?
What is the size of the largest bird?
What makes birds uniquely adapted for flight?
What type of bird particularly played an important part in the inception of Darwin's theory of evolution by natural selection?
Which part of the bird developed from forelimbs?
Which type of birds are among the most intelligent animals?
How to birds produce offspring?
Where are eggs usually laid?
Besides Aves, what group contains the only living representatives of the reptile clade Archosauria?
Who defined Aves to include only the crown group of the set of modern birds?
What is a sister group to Aves?
What evidence leads most scientists to accept that birds are a specialized subgroup of theropod dinosaurs?
What is a group of theropods which include dromaeosaurs and oviraptorids?
Recent discoveries in what country demonstrate many small theropod feathered dinosaurs.
What are the closest relatives of the deinonychosaurs?
What are the closest relatives of flying theropods?
Dromaeosaurids and troodontids are members of what group?
What is known as one of the first transitional fossils to be found?
What was the first fossil to display both clearly traditional reptilian characteristics?
Fossils with teeth, clawed fingers and a long lizard-like tail have what type of characteristics?
The Oxfordian stage is also known as what?
How long ago was the late Jurassic period?
What may have been used in aerial maneuvering?
Avian species such as Anchiornis huxleyi and Xiaotingia zhengi are from which time period?
During which time period did avialans diversify into a wide variety of forms?
Which forms retained the long bony tails of their ancestors?
When did the ancestor of all modern birds evolve a better sense of smell?
How long ago was the late Cretaceous period?
What were the first large, diverse lineage of short-tailed avialans to evolve?
Because of the construction of their shoulder bones, what were the enantiornithes called?
What was the dominant group of avialans during the Cretaceous period?
When did enantiornithes become extinct?
What group became the first avialans to develop true pygostyle and a fully mobile fan of tail feathers?
What does Euornithes mean?
Why does Euornithes mean "true birds?"
What may have replaced the "hind wing" as the primary mode of aerial maneuverability?
All modern birds lie within which crown group?
What is another name for Aves?
The two subdivisions of what group include Palaeognathae and Neognathae?
What is the number range of living bird species?
Sibley and Ahlquist' Phylogeny and Classification of Birds is a landmark work on the classification of what animals?
What do scientists disagree about?
What do scientists tend to agree on?
Birds live on how many continents?
Highest bird diversity occurs in which regions?
Some penguins have been recording diving up to how many feet?
Some seabird species only come ashore for what purpose?
The ring-necked pheasant has been introduced as what kind of bird?
Why have some species spread naturally far beyond their original ranges?
Where have many birds established breeding populations?
What consists of very lightweight bones?
What does the skeleton consist of?
What are pneumatic cavities?
What are large air-filled cavities that connect to the respiratory system?
What is formed when vertebrae are fused with the pelvis?
What is it called when a bird's kidneys extract nitrogenous waste from their bloodstream and secrete it as uric acid?
Which bid has a urinary bladder or external urethral opening?
What is a multi-purpose opening on birds?
How do most birds mate?
What aids birds with flight?
Upon inhalation, what percentage of fresh air bypasses the lungs and flows directly into a posterior air sac?
Where does the other 25 percent of fresh air go?
What is the syrinx?
Sound production is achieved using what muscular chamber?
Which animal has one of the most complex respiratory system of all animal groups?
The avian circulatory system is driven by what?
Where is the heart contained in the avian circulatory system?
What lubricates the pericardial sac?
Why are Avian hearts larger than mammalian hearts when compared to body mass?
Why are birds' arteries composed of thick elastic muscles?
What moves through the arteries?
What is organized into capillary beds in tissues?
What is the funneling that occurs that brings blood back to the heart?
Which bird system is large relative to a bird's size?
What is tetrachromatic?
Why do birds need to perceive ultraviolet light?
What regulates breeding activities?
What is known to sometimes result in injury or death?
What is another name for steamer ducks?
What is another name for Anhimidae?
What do stone curlews use to punch and hammer opponents?
What is a feature characteristic of birds?
What feature of a bird facilitate flight?
What is pterylae?
How often do birds groom their feathers?
What percentage of their day do birds groom their feathers?
What do birds use to brush away foreign particles?
What is the process of removing feather parasites?
What distinguishes birds from almost all other vertebrate classes?
What is the primary means of locomotion for most bird species?
How many large flight muscles do birds have?
Pectoralis account for what percentage of total mass of a bird?
Approximately how many extant bird species are flightless?
What is the term used for birds that employ many strategies to obtain food?
What is the term used for birds that concentrate time and effort on specific food items?
What type of birds have specially adapted brushy tongues?
What is the term for stealing food items from other birds?
What is kleptoparasitism?
A vulture is what type of bird?
How do nesting sandgrouse carry water to their young?
What is one family of birds have adaptations to produce a nutritive fluid to their chicks?
What is a nutritive fluid that some birds provide to their chicks?
What is crop milk?
Birds preen often with the application of secretions from which gland?
What do birds bathe in?
What is anting?
What is it called when birds encourage ants to run through their plumage?
When do birds substantially increase body fats and reduce the size of some of their organs?
What is the flight range of landbirds?
What is the flight range of shoebirds?
Which bird is capable of non-stop flights of up to 6,300 miles?
Which birds often undertake circumpolar trips between breeding seasons?
In Australia, what percentage of non-passerine birds were partially migratory
In Australia, what percentage of passerine birds were partially migratory
What is most often triggered by temperature changes?
Which family of birds are neither migratory or sedentary but considered to be dispersive, irruptive or nomadic?
In which type of migration do birds use the sun to navigate by day and a stellar compass at night?
Some species use specialised photoreceptors to sense what?
What do birds to compensate for the changing position of the sun during the day?
What allows for the identification of birds, particularly between species?
What do birds sometimes use to assess and assert social dominance?
Visual communication among birds may involve what kind of displays?
What do some birds use for auditory communication?
What do birds use for evaluation of potential mates and mate attraction?
Which birds drum territorially?
Which type of birds use tools to drum?
What are the principal benefits of flocking?
What is a cost of flocking?
What is particularly important in closed habitats like forests?
Sleeping birds often use a type of sleep known as what?
What are believed to be able to sleep in flight?
Why is communal roosting common?
These types of birds have a tendon locking mechanism.
Where do many ground birds, such as quails and pheasants, roost?
A few parrots of what genus roost hanging upside down?
What type of birds go into a nightly state of torpor?
Birds do not have what type of glands:?
Which gender typically performs some form of courtship display?
Most courtship displays involve some type of what?
Which gender generally drive partner selection?:
Generally, when is courtship feeding and billing performed between partners?
What kind of eggs to all birds lay?
All birds lay eggs with hard shells made mostly out of what?
What type of birds lay white or pale eggs?
What kind of eggs do open nesters lay?
What process optimises temperature for chick development?
When does incubation begin?
What are areas of bare skin on the abdomen or breast of incubating birds?
How many days is the incubation period for woodpeckers?
How many days is the incubation period for kiwis?
When does parental care end in megapodes?
What type of seabird has the longest period of parental care?
What is the period of breeding during which one of the adult birds is always present at the nest?
Which chicks leave the nest the night after they hatch?
Name a species which move their chicks away from the nest at an early age.
When do most species of chicks leave the nest?
What is it called when an egg-layer leaves her eggs with another individual's brood?
How many bird species are obligate parasites?
What type of birds lay eggs in the nests of conspecifics to increase their reproductive output?
What is it called when there is greater than 30 percent reduction in hatchability of eggs?
What can reduce the negative effects of inbreeding?
What percentage of broods produced by incestuously paired females contained extra pair of young?
What occurs when offspring delay dispersal from their natal group?
What leads to the masking of deleterious recesive alleles in progeny?
Why is inbreeding avoided?
What type of birds generally feed by fishing, plant eating or piracy?
What type of birds may be either insectivores, frugivores and nectarivores?
What type of birds specialise in hunting mammals or other birds?
What are often important to island ecology?
In New Zealand, what were important browsers, as the kereru and kokako are today?
What type of birds may also affect the ecology of islands and surrounding areas?
What is it called when the house sparrow has benefited from human activity?
What have threatened numerous bird species with extinction?
Why have humans had a relationship with birds since the dawn of man?
What are domesticated birds raised for meat and eggs?
What is the largest source of animal protein eaten by humans?
In 2003, how many tons of poultry were produced worldwide?
What is primarily a recreational activity except in extremely underdeveloped areas?
Why have birds been domesticated by humans?
What type of birds are bred in captivity or kept as pets?
How long have messenger pigeons been used?
What started on October 11, 1911?
Who was the last Qing emperor?
When did he step down?
Where did Nurhachi move his court to?
Where did Nurhachi move his court from?
Who posed a threat to the Chinese borders?
What group did the Manchus take over to add strength to their numbers?
What weapon helped the Ming defeat the Manchus?
When did the Manchus create their own artillery?
When were the first couple Han Banners founded?
When did the Han Banners grow to eight?
Who killed Yuan Chonghuan?
Which leader defeated the Ming armies?
Where did the Ming armies retreat to?
Who included newly conquered Ming officials in his government?
When did a Han revolt occur?
Where did a Han revolt occur?
What proportion of bannerman were Manchu by 1648?
When did Hong Taiji die?
Who was his heir?
Who were the likely heirs?
Who became the emperor?
Who raided Beijing in 1644?
Who was Li Zicheng?
Who was the last Ming leader?
What dynasty did Zicheng form?
How did the Chongzhen Emporer die?
How big was Li Zicheng's army?
Who did Li Zicheng's army fight?
What was the name of the general at the Ming fort?
Who beat Li Zicheng's army?
When did the battle take place?
How long did it take for the Manchus to take the rest of China?
Who did the Manchus struggle against?
When did the Shunzhi emperor become the Son of Heaven?
What was the Shunzi Emperor called?
When did Beijing fall?
What percent of bannermen did the Han represent?
Who made up the Han Chinese Banners?
Who besides the Manchus and the Han made up the Eight Banners?
Who were the three Liandong Han bannermen who were instrumental in the taking of southern China?
What part of China did Kexi, Zhongming, and Youde rule?
What was the three Han Bannermen position called?
Who made Beijing his capital?
Whose capital was Beijing before the Manchu's?
Why did Dorgon keep Beijing as his capital?
Who did the Manchus send to battle Koxinga's troops?
Where did the fight between Ming loyalists and Manchus occur?
What were the Manchus accused of being afraid of?
When did Kexi retire?
Who did Kexi thing should take over for him?
How long did the Revolt of the Three Feudatories last?
Who declared himself emperor?
When did the Qing regain power over southern China?
Who did the Qing think were the better soldiers to battle Han Chinese?
How many Green Standard Army soldiers  were on the Qing side?
When did Wu destroy the Qing armies?
How many soldiers did the Qing fight back with?
What happened to Wu's army?
Who did Yongzheng behead?
What religion did Yongzheng ban?
What did Yongzheng crack down on?
When did Yongzheng ban christianity?
Who did Yongzheng call Marquis?
When did Yongzheng give this title?
What was Zhu's job?
When was the Treaty of Kyakhta written?
Who was the partner in the Treaty of Kyakhta?
What did the treaty give to the Russians?
What did the Qing get from the Treaty of Kyakhta?
How many books were in the Siku Quanshu?
How many volumes were in the Siku Quanshu?
Who created the Siku Quanshu?
How many literary persecutions were there under Qianlongs reign?
What crops helped the Chinese?
What led to overpopulation in China?
How many people lived in China at the start of the 18th century?
How many people lived in China at the end of the 20th century?
What was the last part of China with farmland left?
Where did Hans go to to find land?
How much land did the Han cultivate?
What percent of the population in Manchuria was Han?
Which empires grew during the 18th century?
What country near China did the Europeans first control?
What was the only city the Chinese allowed the Europeans into to trade?
What were the economies of the European empires built on?
Which two European companies traded in Canton?
What products from China did Europeans want?
What did the Chinese want in return?
What were the British and French concerned about?
What else did the Chinese want from the British?
Where was opium made?
Who fought the Qing in the First Opium War?
When did the Qing surrender to the British?
What treaty marked the end of the First Opium War?
What 5 ports did the treaty force open?
What island was given to the British?
Were the European empires satisfied or unsatisfied by the Treaty of Nanjing?
Who did the Europeans support during the Rebellions?
When did the British try to redo the Treaty of Nanjing?
Whed did the British and French invade Beijing?
Where did the emperor go?
What happened to the Old Summer Palace?
What did Prince Gong sign?
Who put down the rebellions?
How old was Tongzhi when he came to power?
What year did Tongzhi take power?
What would the Chinese use to continue Confucian values?
What was the name of a modern Chinese Army?
Who did the Chinese lose territory to in exchange for help?
When was the Tientsin Massacre?
When was the Cochinchina Campaign?
Which territory did France control?
What triggered the Tientsin Massacre?
Where did the Empress Dowager spend most of her time?
When were two missionaries killed?
Where were the missionaries killed?
What was the murders of the missionaries called?
What did the emperor do in response to so many defeats by the Europeans?
Name an advisor to Guangxu?
Who took over the policy of China?
Where was there a drought?
What was another name for the Boxers?
When did the Boxers begin to kill missionaries and Chinese Christians?
Who invaded China?
Where did Cixi go after Beijing fell to the 8 armies?
What did Cixi do in 1901?
What were the governments New Policies also called?
When were imperial examinations halted?
What year did Guangxu die?
What year did Cixi die?
Who ruled after Guangxu?
How old was Prince Chun?
What year was the Republic of China created?
Who led the Qing?
Who negotiated with Yuan Shikai to prevent war?
Who led the Republic of China?
Who became the President?
What year did the end of Imperial China occur?
How long did Imperial China last for?
When was Manchukuo created?
Who split the leadership roles in the Qing dynasty?
Where did the Qing find their officials?
How many ranks were there in civil service in the Qing dynasty?
Who was the main leader of the Qing?
Which ethnicities made up the Qing government?
What happened to the Grand Secretariat?
Who controlled the "Inner Court"?
Where was the Inner Court?
What was the Grand Council?
What shape of emblem signified a Han official?
What shape of emblam signified members of the royal family?
Which two ethnicities made up each position in government?
Which emperor followed Shunzhi?
Where were textile factories located?
What did China trade with Tibet and Mongolia?
What century did Qing China stretch to its largest?
How many kilometers was Qing China at its height?
How many provinces were there at the height of Qing China?
When did Japan take over Taiwan?
How did the Japanese win Taiwan?
When did Tibet become part of Qing China?
What was the main government entity that ran the territories like Tibet?
What is another name for Chinese Turkestan?
Which emperor allowed Han migration to Dzungaria?
Who first ran Manchuria?
What title did the emperor hold in Mongolia?
Who ruled Kashgaria?
Who supported Beg?
When did the British invade Tibet?
What was the name of the agreement between Britain and the Chinese that kept the British out of Tibet?
Who created the Eight Banners?
How were the 8 banners recognized?
What were the banners called that were under direct leadership of the emperor?
What ethnicity made up the Upper Three Banners?
What were the rest of the banners called?
Who inspired Zeng Guofan in creating his army?
What did Qi Jiguang's private army do?
What was the original plan for the Xiang Army?
What entity became the main Qing troops?
Who paid for the Yongying?
Who led the Yongying?
When was the Second Opium War?
How big was the French-British army?
What was the Qing governments attempt to create a modern socity called?
What happened to the Summer Palace?
What happened in early and middle Qing history?
How much did the population grow during the 18th century?
What were the 2 types of migration during the 18th century?
How many estates were there in Qing society?
What 2 groups were normal Chinese broken into?
What was the legal term for commoner?
What did China export?
What did the Chinese get paid for their goods?
When did the Chinese economy finally recover after the wars with the Mings?
What was China's population at the end of the 18th century?
What were the reasons for the population explosion during the 18th century?
What crops were imported?
What arts were the Qing emperors good at?
What was the rhyme dictionary called that was published by Kangxi?
When was the Kangxi Dictionary published?
When was the Siku Quanshu finished?
What was the sign of a gentleman?
Who started writing poety during the Qing dynasty?
What was the name of Pu Songling's collection of short stories?
Who wrote the novel Dream of the Red Chamber?
What was the name of Shen Fu's memoir?
Where do most theories today attribute the settlement of the Americas as originating from?
What was Beringia?
How did humans cross over to the Americas from Asia?
Most experts can at least agree that the earliest pre-modern human migration took place when?
How do the indigenous peoples explain how they came to live in the Americas?
What incorrect term for the indigenous population originated with Christopher Columbus? 
Where did Columbus believe he had arrived?
Because of Columbus' mistake, the Americas came to be known as what?
What is implied by the global term of "Indian"?
Despite fitting under the umbrella label of "Indian", Aleuts, Inuit and Yupik peoples are still considered to be what to the Americas?
What does the data indicate about the population the individual was from?
What populations is the individual closely related to?
What type of divergence is implicated to have occurred between North American and South American populations?
Theories that there were invasions which overwhelmed or assimilated previous migrants into the Americas have been what?
What had the civilizations in the Americas achieved by the time the Europeans encountered them?
What had the Aztec civilization constructed?
How big was the population of the Aztec cit of Tenochtitlan?
Astronomy and mathematics were also accomplishments of which civilizations?
How many years of selective breeding did it take to domesticate maize?
What did the European colonization forever change?
How much did the population of the Americas decrease after first contact with the Europeans?
What was the leading cause of death for the native population after European contact?
What triad of disease epidemics ravaged the American continent?
Why did Native Americans suffer such high mortality rates to the diseases?
What Empire brought horses to the Americas?
What kind of impact did the re-emergence of horses have on some Native American cultures?
How long had horses been extinct in the Americas prior to their re-introduction?
What did some tribes achieve by domesticating horses?
What enabled some tribes to expand territory, increase trade and capture more game?
Where was a center of early agriculture?
Based on genetic testing, what has been suggested about the origin of the potato?
Where did the potato originate?
How long ago was the decedent of 99% of all modern potatoes cultivated as long ago as?
What event in 850 AD coincided with the collapse of Mayan civilization?
When did the North American natives begin farming?
What had pottery become 4,000 years ago in the Americas?
What did technology make feasible when it came to trees?
How did Archaic Indians use fire?
What was the intentional burning of vegetation intended to mimic?
What did geographical zones encourage the sharing of?
What did people in the same reason adopt?
Where did millennia of coexistence produce a culture with advanced agricultural and social patterns?
How long was there a homogeneous culture on the North American plains?
What creature did the nomadic hunter-gatherers of the plains hunt?
What is the Mayan writing system the only known pre-Columbian one to completely represent this?
What writing system combined phonetic symbols and logograms?
What signs play a significant role in the Mayan's writing system?
How many different glyphs in total does the Mayan writing system have?
How many of the Mayan glyphs had phonetic or syllabic interpretations?
When were indigenous scribes taught to use Latin letters?
Who taught indigenous scribes to write their languages?
What were a large number of the local documents in regards to?
What were Spanish translations at the time made for?
What viewpoint have scholars translated and analyzed documents to writes histories from?
What characteristic did the majority of Native American music have?
What did traditional Native American music center around?
What are examples of popular percussive instruments of Native Americans?
How were flutes constructed by the Native Americans?
How many strings did the Apache fiddle have?
Who retained indigenous language and culture after the Spanish conquest?
What re-emerged during the Katarista movement in the 1970s?
What did the highland peasants resist attempts at?
What took place frequently until 1953?
What march successfully pressured the national government to sign the ILO Convetion 169?
Who came up with a policy for indigenous autonomy?
When did Morales launch his policy in the eastern lowlands?
What was Bolivia the first country in the history of South America to do?
What did the President vow he would never betray?
What effect has the issue of indigenous autonomy had on Bolivia?
Who came up with a policy for indigenous autonomy?
When did Morales launch his policy in the eastern lowlands?
What was Bolivia the first country in the history of South America to do?
What did the President vow he would never betray?
What effect has the issue of indigenous autonomy had on Bolivia?
How much of Brazil's population is comprised of indigenous peoples?
Where do the majority of the indigenous people of Brazil live?
How many Brazillians have some indigenous ancestry?
How many different uncontacted tribes were confirmed in Brazil in 2007?
What country has the largest number of uncontacted tribes?
What were the early interactions between First Nations and Europeans?
What have Canadian indigenous peoples been able to have a strong influence on?
How long have European Canadians been encouraging Aboriginals to assimilate into their culture?
What does National Aboriginal Day recognize from the Aboriginal peoples of Canada?
How many recognized First Nations governments are spread across Canada?
El Salvador was home to which indigenous peoples?
What was a major Pipil settlement in western El Salvador?
What was the language of the Pipil?
What did the Princes and Princesses see the Spanish as?
What people resulted from the Spaniards intermarrying with Pipll and Lenca women?
How much of the population of Honduras is of full-blooded indigenous descent?
What percentage of Hondurans have African blood mixed in with the rest of their ancestry?
Where are the main concentrations of indigenous people in Honduras? 
The Lencas, Miskitos, Mayans Pech, Sumos and Tolupan comprise the majority of what in Honduras?
What do most Venezuelans have?
How many different languages does the 2% of truly indigenous Venezuelans speak?
Why are the languages of the indigenous peoples of Venezuela in danger of becoming extinct?
Who were the most advanced native people to have lived in what is present-day Venezuela?
What made the Timoto-cuicas so advanced?
What remains a controversy regarding how to refer to the indigenous peoples of the Americas?
How may subsets of peoples be named?
Many of what have been used to refer to the indigenous peoples of the Americas?
Who used foreign language terms to give names to indigenous peoples?
Why were pejorative terms sometimes used for the native populations?
What have the peoples in the Americas been more vocal about since the 20th century?
What terms do the indigenous people press to eliminate?
Who initially proposed using the term "Native American" to recognize the primacy of the native population?
What naming convention is accepted by all indigenous groups?
Where has there been a rise of indigenous movements in recent years?
What do the organizing groups hope to obtain for themselves?
What is an example of a movement which is working to obtain rights for Amazonian populations everywhere?
Where can similar movements for indigenous rights be seen?
Who started a forum in support of Morales' legal process of change?
What did the meeting condemn plans by the Europeans to do?
What did the forum express for Morales and his proposed changes?
What did the forum question about US interference?
What was the forum suspicious of?
What does the genetic history of indigenous peoples of the Americas primarily focus on?
How is Y-DNA passed along?
What is the only way that Y-DNA and mtDNA change?
Which type of DNA is passed from the mother to offspring of both genders?
What is AtDNA generally only used to measure?
Who have studies of the mtDNA of Turkic-speaking peoples shown they're closest to genetically?
What group were the ancestors of the American Indians separated from?
When did the ancestors of the American Indians separate from their parent population?
When did research find evidence for a common ancestry between Native Americans and Altaians?
What DNA analysis indicated the common ancestry of the Native Americans?
When was a study about the DNA of a young boy published in Nature?
How old was the young boy's remains?
What culture was the boy from?
What may one-third of the indigenous Americans ancestry be traced back to?
What percent of Native American ancestry may originate through gene flow from the Mal'ta-Buret' population?
What is more likely than the Solutrean hypothesis?
What supports a scenario of dual origin for Paleo-Indians?
What is C4c deeply rooted in the Asian portion of?
When did Kashani and others make their statement regarding the similarities for C4c distributions?
Because C4c and X2a are characterized by parallel genetic histories means what controversial hypothesis may be dismissed?
How far back does Egypt's history date back?
Why is Egypt considered a cradle of civilisation?
What were some of Egypt's foreign influences?
What are iconic monumuents of Egypt?
In what century were islamic conquests of Egypt?
How many inhabitants does Egypt have?
What is the rank of Egypt popultaion among African nations?
Majority of Egypt people live near what river?
What desert constitutes most of Egypt territory?
What leader stepped down in 2011?
What party rose to power after 2011 resignation of Egypt leader?
What economic sectors does Egypt have?
What influence does Egypt have?
During 6000 BC what area was occupied by a Neolithic culture?
What culture succeeded the Naqada culture?
When is the earliest hieroglyghics date back?
How long did cultures coexist in lower Egypt?
How long was the upheval of the first Intermediate period?
In 1650 BC Lower Egypt was control by what invaders?
What new capital was founded in 1650, lower Egypt?
What was the first foreign ruling dynasty of Egypt?
Who took control of Egypt in 525 BC?
What pharaoh was captured by the group led by Camyses II?
From where did Camyses II rule Egypt?
What was the duration of the 27th dynasty of Egypt?
What were the reaches of the Ptolemaic Kingdom?
What were leaders known as during Ptolemaic Kingdom?
What was the capital in the Prolemaic Kingdom?
What religious life was the Ptolemaic Kingdom?
Who was last ruler of Ptolemaic Kingdom?
Who captured Alexandria, ending Ptolemaic rule?
How did Mark Anthony's love die?
What culture annexed Egypt?
When was Suez canal completed?
Who partnered with Egypt to build Suez Canal?
In what year did Egypt sell its portion of Suez Canal?
Who sold Egypt's portion of Suez?
To whom did Egypt sell its interest in Suez Canal?
In what year did Egypt and Syria Form a sovereign union?
What was the sovereign union with Syria known?
How long did the union with Syria last?
Who found the claims of Israeli attack baseless?
How many steps did Nasser take in preparation for war?
Who warned of impending Israeli attack on Syria in May 1967?
On what day did Nasser state "The battle will be a general one and our basic objective will be to destroy Israel?"
How many rich, upper class were in Egypt in 1950s?
How many middle class were in Egypt in 1950s
How many lower class were in Egypt in 1950s
What professions made up the buld on middle class under Nasser?
What direction did the Egypt economy take in the 1960s?
When did Nasser die?
Who succeeded Nasser?
Which side of the Cold War was Sadat?
What was the October War?
What did Sadat exchange for the remainder of Sinai?
What was encouraged through Infitah?
What tools did Infitah use to attract investment?
What was largely ignored and upset many of Sadat's polidy?
What group dominated the political scene when Mubarak was in power?
What laws created in 1990s impacted culture?
When did parliamentary politics become irrelevant in Egypt?
What did constitutional changes in 2007 prohibit?
What was Dr. Ali El Deen Hilal Dessouki's position?
What was the long term goal for Egypt?
What presidential powers were included in 2007 law changes?
When was interim government instituted?
What was the support by voters for referendum?
Who was elected President in 2014?
What group boycotted the elections?
When does most of Egypts rain fall?
Where does snow fall in Egypt?
When was the last snow fall in Cairo?
What is the sunniest county in the world?
How many species of plants were recorded in Egypt?
How many species of fungi were recorded in Egypt?
How many species of algae were recorded in Egypt?
How many species of animals were recorded in Egypt?
How many species of protazoa were recorded in Egypt?
When was new constitution institutionalised?
How long are presidential terms?
How many terms may a president serve?
Who may impeach the president?
what may not be basis for political party?
Where does Egypt rank for Religious freedom according to Pew Forum?
What percentage of Egyptians polled support death penalty for those leaving Islam?
What violation could result in stoning and was supported by 82% of Egyptian responders?
What trend has Egypt healthcare made recently?
How much of ppopulation can be covered by immunization programs?
What was life expectancy in 1960s?
What was the life expectancy in 2009?
What direction has infant mortality rate taken?
According to QS World University Rankings where does Cairo University rank?
According to QS World University Rankings, where does American University in Cairo rank?
According to QS World University Rankings and Al-Azhar University, Alexandria University and Ain Shams University are all ranked where?
What is the aim of new research institutes?
what controversial practice does Egypt actively administer as punishment?
What was Muslim Brotherhood labelled post coup?
In March 2014 what number of people were sentenced to death in a single hearing?
What former president's supporters are set to be executed?
What US president was critical of Egypt's repression of Muslim Brotherhood?
How many individuals did one judge in Minya governatorate court sentence to death in April 2013?
What was the criticism of judge Mohammad NAgi Shatata sentence of 188 member of Muslim Brotherhood for assaulting police station?
How much military assistance di US give Egypt in 2015?
What event soured relations of US and Egypt in 2013?
Equipment from what country is being replaced?
How many factories does Egyptian military have?
After Morsi removal, what country has Egypt improved relations with?
In 2014 what country did Egypt form partnership with?
Where is the Arab League headquarters?
Who is the leader of Arab League?
What 2 Gulf monarchies have pledged billions of dollars to help Egypt overcome recent economic difficulties?
What country has Egypt famously had peace with since 1973 treaty?
Is Israel considered a safe state for egyptians?
What rope has Egypt played in Middle East peace efforts?
What areas of economy is Egypt dependent on?
Where do Egyptians working abroad work mainly?
What lake reulted from completion of Aswan High Dam?
What year was Aswan High Dam completed?
Is Egypt able to sustain just from its own energy production?
How much coal is mine yearly in northeast Sinai?
What efforts were made in 2013 to maintain sustainability?
What is Egypts energy market based upon?
What has been the trend lately in the Egypt economy?
What area of business have boomed lately in Egypt?
What was change made to corporate taxes in 2005?
What ws the overall impact to tax revenue from change of corporate tax rate?
How much had FDI increased to in 2006?
Since 2011 direction has Forign direct investment gone?
What has been the change in foreign exhange reserves since 2011?
What has been the overall growth of economy since 2011?
To what extent does wealth reach from affluent down to average population?
Who do Egyptians blame for higher prices, while purchasing power and standard of living are stagnate?
Where did Egyptian plan to get funds to use for reconstruction of infrastructure?
Where did Egypt rank in Corruption perceptions Index in 2013?
What are Egypt's 2 most prominent multinational compnaies?
What sector has expanded radiply by selling outsourcing services to North America and Europe?
What has stimulated IT sector?
How much oil is Egypt producing in a day?
How much natural gas is Egypt producing in a day?
Where does Egypt rank among oil and natural gas sonsumers in Africa?
Where is Egypt planning to build is first nuclear power plant?
What is consideredt the most important part of maritime transport in middle east?
Is the Suez Canal natural?
What 2 bodies of water does Suez connect?
When was Suez canal completed?
How long is Suez canal?
How deep is Suez canal?
How wide is Suez canal?
How many locks are contained in Suez Canal?
What direction does the canal north of Bitter lakes flow?
What basic part of civilization has been characterized by achievement and challenges?
From 1990 to 2010 what was improvement in piped water supply to urban areas?
From 1990 to 2010 what was improvement in piped water supply to rural areas?
Currently how much of Egypt's population is connected to sanitary sewers?
Because of low sanitation coverage 17,000 Egyptian children to die each year from what condition?
Relative to other countries of world how do Egypts's water tariffs compare?
Due to low waer tariffs, what is required to maintain water treatment operation?
What is the largest ethnic group in Egypt?
What are the minorities that live in eastern deserts of Egypt?
Where are Dom clans mostly gathered?
Approximately how many rufugees and asylum seekers are in Egypt?
What cities house several important Jewish archaelogical sites?
How may Palestinian refugees are in Egypt?
How many recent Iraqi refugees are in Egypt?
What is official language of Egypt?
What are main laguages of immigrants?
In the 19th century, what city of Egypt was a large community of Italian Egyptians?
What are the three most spoken languages in Egypt?
Prior to 7th century, what was primary religion of Egypt?
What became the main source of law with increasing Islamic influence in Egypt?
Under what leader did Islam become official religion of Egypt?
What church do 90% of Christian minority in Egypt belong?
Where are other Non-native Christian communities found?
What do Syro-Lebanese belong to?
What color was frequently used in Egyptian designs?
What art required adherence to rigid code?
What is the main performing arts venue in Egyptian capital?
Who designed the Pyramid of Djoser?
Who was the first to develop literature?
What syles did writers in Arabic literature experiment with first?
What was the first modern Egyptian novel?
When was Munammad Huayn Haykal's first modern novel published?
Who financed Studio Misr?
In more that 100 years how many films have been produced in Egypt?
In what year was Studio Misr founded?
What share of Arab productions have come from Egypt?
What elements mix for Egyptian music?
Who is credited with invention of music by ancient Egyptians?
What artist are considered the golden age of Egyptian music?
What is more contemporary Egyptian Pop Singer?
What is the oldest era in Egypt?
How many museums are found in Egypt?
What are some examples of Ages in Egypt?
What is koshari?
What can be added to koshari?
What is a polular green soup of Egypt?
What beans are used to make falafel?
What is the most popular sport in Egypt?
What is one of the toughest derbies in the world, run in Egypt?
In terms of international trophies, whos is the most successful club?
What was the last international competition Egypt hosted?
Who holds Guiness record for Deepest salt water scuba dive?
How deep did Gabr dive?
In what body of water did Gabr dive?
What millennium did Mosaic start?
What kind of mosaic were made in Tiryns?
Who besides the Romans did the Jewish people get influenced by?
When did mosaic fall out of fashion?
The Norman kingdomwas in what italian city state?
What common artform is far more prestigious than mosaic?
Which culture adapted the use of mosaics for large ground coverings in their villas?
Most names of Roman mosaic workers are what nationality?
Often regular everyday craftsman were most likely what?
Carthage and Tunisia are in what general area?
What type of mosaic uses small tesserae?
What were small panel mosaics known as?
What was the name of the mosaic technique that used larger tesserae?
What was the benefit of using small pieces to create a mosaic?
Why were black and white pieces used in most italian mosaics?
Which caesar hired builders to construct the Domus Aurea?
When did figure wall mosaics become the highest form of artistic expression?
The church of Santa Costanza is in what country?
When was the Domus Aurea constructed?
The imperial family of Rome used the church of Santa Costanza as what?
In what area of Italy is the largest collection of mosaics in the world?
Who most likely lived in the large villa rustica?
What caused the mosaics at the villa rustica to be protected for centuries? 
How long is the hunting scene at the villa rustica?
Where in Sicily were the "Orpheus," and the "Four Seasons" discovered?
Around what century were mosaics adapted for Christian churches?
What Christian church besides the Santa Costanza was built in the 4th century?
What was the original function of the Santa Costanza church?
In which basilica is the Tomb of Julii?
Under what period were the 4th century churches built?
Which city besides Ravenna served as the capital of the Western Roman Empire?
What is the name of the mosaic in the Basilica of Sant'Ambrogio?
The shrine of San Vittore in ciel d'oro had mosaics from which century?
Who do the mosaics at the the basilica of San Lorenzo depict as being abducted?
When was the baptistry at the Basilica of Sant'Ambrogio demolished?
How many Byzantine mosaics survived past the 8th century?
The mosaic in the church in Thessaloniki is know as what?
When were the panels in the Hagios Demetrios Church created?
Why was Christ in majesty protected from the iconoclastic destruction?
What is common about the surviving mosaics from the 7th-9th centuries?
How big were the tesserae in the Komnenian period miniature mosaic icons?
What were the tesserae usually set in for miniature mosaic icons?
The more humanistic conception of Christ appeared when?
What was the intended purpose of the miniature mosaic icons?
where is the greatest mosaic work of the renaissance?
How many mosaic panels from naos have survived?
The panels of naos are only capped in importance by which other location?
Who commissioned the mosaics at naos?
The panels from naos show what influence on Byzantine art. 
When was the Martorana church decorated?
Who is featured in the mosaic at the Martorana church?
The Martorana church was likely decorated by the same greek masters who decorated which church?
Who was the founder of the Martorana church?
Who is receiving a crown from christ in the mosaic originally in the narthex?
What is the name of the largest mosaics in Italy?
At least how many tesserae are used in the the Monreale mosaics?
Who commissioned the Monreale mosaics between 1176 and 1186?
Who is displayed getting crowned by christ in the Monreale mosaics?
What is the king offering Theotokos in the Monreale mosaics? 
Where is the Cathedral of Santa Maria Assunta?
When were the mosaics in the Cathedral of Santa Maria Assunta built?
Where is the Basilica of Santi Maria e Donato located?
Who purchased the 13th century mosaic from the the San Cipriano Church?
Where did Frederick William IV relocate the mural he purchased?
What proves mosaics were used in the early middle ages?
Where is the Abbey of Saint-Martial?
When was the crypt of the Abbey of Saint-Martial re-discovered?
What was found under the Basilica of Saint-Quentin?
What common element do mosaic panels from the 11th century have?
Where is the Church of the Holy Sepulchre located?
Where is the mosaic "Ascension of Christ" located?
What nation influenced the Crusaders mosaic styles?
What is the name of the lone surviving mosaic of the Crusader period?
The Byzantine emperor, the king of Jerusalem and the Latin Church came together in what year to redecorate the Church of the Holy Sepulchre?
How is Raphael portrayed in St. Peter's?
What year did Pietro Paolo Cristofari die?
What was the art of the Fabbrica usually used for?
What was the name of the painting used to represent raphael in St. Peter's?
The mosaics of St.Peter's are often based on what?
What is the most important mosaic piece built by Byzantine Christians?
When was the the Madaba Map made?
Where is the church of Saint George?
When was the Madaba Map rediscovered? 
The Madaba Map depicts as far South as the Nile delta, and as far North as what country?
What era were the mosaics that adorned Saint Catherine's Monastery?
Where is Saint Catherine's Monastery located?
Why have wall mosaics generally not survived in the region?
Who is depicted in Saint Catherine's Monastery on a mosaic landscape background? 
When was the mosaic at Saint Catherine's Monastery created?
Which city had the highest percentage of mosaic covered churches?
Where was the Armenian Mosaic found in Jerusalem?
What type of plant is depicted in the Armenian Mosaic?
When was the Armenian Mosaic re-discovered?
What was the room under the Armenian Mosaic used for?
Where would the Byzantine church of the Lazarium be located today?
When was the Byzantine church of the Lazarium constructed?
The mosaic at the Byzantine church of the Lazarium most closely resembles mosaics from which area?
A church was built on top of the Byzantine church of the Lazarium in waht century?
How many Christian churches have been found in the Christian Petra?
When was the most important Byzantine church re-discovered?
What type of mosaics were present in the church discovered in 1990?
What century was the oldest known mosaic at the church discovered in 1990?
The scenes depicted on the mosaics were both native and what kind of mythological animals?
Where would the Church of St Stephen be located today?
When were the mosaics in the Church of St Stephen created?
When were the mosaics in the Church of St Stephen re-discovered?
The mosaic floor in the Church of St Stephen is the largest in what country?
How many artists signed the frame of the mosaic at the Church of St Stephen?
Yaroslav held what title in medieval Russia?
Where did Yaroslav build his Cathedral?
What was used as a model for the church Yaroslav commissioned?
What was the name of the church Yaroslav commissioned?
Who sent the Byzantine craftsmen that built Yaroslav's cathedral?
In what country is the the Gelati Monastery located?
Who started construction on the Gelati Monastery?
Who eventually oversaw completion of the Gelati Monastery?
Who was the central theme of the mosaics at Tsromi?
In Byzantine Gaza, Jews were relaxed on what ban?
Where were ancient remains of a synagogue found in 1966?
The mosaic found in 1966 depicts who as the central figure?
What is the central figure doing in the mosaic found in 1966?
When was the mosaic floor constructed?
A 5th-century building in Huldah is believed to be what?
What does the mosaic at Huldah contain?
What language are the inscriptions on the mosaic at Huldah?
The synagogue located in Bet She'an had what kind of symbols depicted in its mosaic?
The masters who built the floor in the synagogue at Bet She'an also constructed what other mosaic?
Who conquered the Eastern Provinces of the Byzantine empire?
What would later become the main Islamic form of wall decoration?
In Syria and Egypt, other than early Christians, who influenced their mosaic work?
The Umayyad Dynasty made mosaic making do what in the Islamic culture?
Where is the most important Islamic mosaic work?
Where is the the Umayyad Mosque located?
What was the significance of Damascus during this time period?
What is the largest section of mosaic still present in the Umayyad Mosque?
What happened in 1893 that destroyed most of the mosaics in the mosque?
Where are some of the best examples of islamic mosaic work found?
The mosaics in the Great Mosque in Corduba have what kind of style?
Who sent the master mosaicist to Spain?
When were the mosaics in the Great Mosque in Corduba created?
Who created the mosaics in the Great Mosque in Corduba?
The Cathedral Basilica of St. Louis holds the largest what?
What along texas interstate Highways contains everyday examples of mosaics?
Which station in the NYC subway has a modern example of mosaic?
Edward Burne-Jones is noted for creating mosaics in what century?
What has recently seen an expansion of mosaic artwork?
Who is the most famous street artist who works with mosaics?
What does the French Invader usually create with the traditional style of mosaic?
The French invader coined his own style of mosaic named what?
How does the French Invader create "Rubikcubism" styled mosaics?
How were larger mosaics usually constructed?
Why was adding a step i production useful for larger projects?
What is the style called of putting tessere on a backing paper?
What besides benches and tabletops was usually created using the indirect method?
The indirect method also helped for projects with what kinds of areas?
When is the double indirect method of mosaic useful?
What is the most powerful aspect of the double indirect method?
When was the double indirect method invented?
Who invented the double indirect method?
What is used as a backing adhesive for the double indirect method besides putty or paper?
Why has production automation become popular?
Which software can aid in the design of robotically created mosaics?
How much faster is automated creation over handmade?
How does the robot pick the tiles it places?
What is not the same between hand made and robotic amde mosaics?
From what language does Universitas come from?
What did a universitas have in common with similar guilds?
Around the beginning of what two things did word universitas start to become prevalent?
Which individuals usually approved charters for universitas?
In terms of academics what is a core requirement of a university?
What was the first university?
What charter is said to be the first establishing academic freedom in a university?
What did the Constitutio Habita say students were allowed?
On what date was the Magna Carta Universitatum signed?
Which ancient texts began to see more study after universities were formed?
What outlook developed the creation of the university system?
Why did rulers and governments in Europe form universities?
What type of governments were involved in creating universities?
What type of university was an Islamic madrasa akin to?
What type of individual funded a Mediterranean university?
From where did a degree come in a madrasa?
In which century did Islamic madrasas start to transform into universities?
Madrasas in which specific location are said to have guided the formation of medieval universities?
Some scholars think that universities come from what, rather than solely local influences?
Al-Andalus was an Emirate of which entity?
During what notable Middle East conflict is it believed by some that Universities received influence from madrasas?
What war most curtailed the spread of universities in the 17th century?
Which university is said to have started faculty governance?
Which entity started to appoint the administration of universities in the 17th century?
The control of universities by the state can be attributed to the advancement in the development of what?
How would one describe the control of universities before nation-states in the 17th century?
What were the faculty who supervised students in the University of Paris called?
The structure of the University of Paris served as what for other universities?
What type of student did schools that focus on very specific topics aim to create?
Which university had teaching which was more general, and not centralized?
How many styles did the University of Paris model end up taking when applied to other universities?
Discovery and exposition were examples of the focus of what type of university scholar?
A concentration on the study of the self resulted in what field of study?
What work did Vesalius push the study of?
What spread the use of texts by Galen within universities?
In multiple countries in Europe students can attend a university with what kind if financial burden?
Until what year were public universities in nordic nation free of tuition?
What kind of students pay fees in public universities in Denmark?
In terms of Universities in Denmark what is the fee status for citizens of EFA states?
What happened to public grants in nordic universities that continued to allow foreign students?
In Ireland what word is mainly used instead of university?
Scotland is said to frequently refer to university as what?
Spain refers to a university in what other way?
The nation of Ghana shortens university to what?
In what century was it believed that the UK used the word varsity to refer to a university?
A college teaches students for how many years in Canada?
What type of institution is a college in Canada?
How many years does a degree-granting university in Canada spend teaching students?
What is McGill University in Canada an example of?
What type of university is St Francis Xavier in Canada?
How many vice presidents do most universities have?
What kind of board does a university commonly have?
Who controls public universities?
What are the different departments of a university called?
Besides students, what is the source of funds of private universities?
How does the financial backing of universities around the world differ?
Outside of state funded schools, and funds coming from donors, how might a university collect funds?
In nations that accept students from through the world what might the university offer to a student?
What was a focus of the National University of Ireland during the beginning of Irish Independence?
In what nation did the University Revolution occur?
In what year did Argentina's University Revolution occur?
What was the result of the University Revolution in Argentina?
In what year did the Robbins report say that universities should have four objectives to remain balanced?
What nation did the 1963 Robbins Report focus on?
What should a university promote, according to the Robbins Report?
Universities should maintain what, according to the Robbins Report?
The Robbins Report says universities should transmit what?
Ending with what century did religion play a smaller part in the curriculum of universities?
what model of university structure was being used throughout the world at the finish of the 19th century?
What was the focus of universities in the 20th century?
Who was Sir Keith Murray?
What university did Sir Samuel Curran contribute to the creation of?
At the end of what period would universities become alike to contemporary universities?
What type of focus did universities have at the end of the early modern period?
What replaced theological studies in universities at the completion of the early modern period?
The change in universities towards the completion of the early modern period is credited with the formation of what entity?
The study of the humanities at the end of the early modern period replaced the study of the work of what individual?
Scientists and universities were competing for what?
What type of education did private benefactors hope to provide to the public?
 Governments created universities to serve as what?
What type of entity created competition with government created universities?
What type of epistemology served as the foundation of knowledge constructions and  training scholars in universities?
The scientific revolution contributed to what, in terms of science?
There was disagreement between universities and scientists over schools focusing on science, and the idea of what?
A hierarchy of scientific disciplines came out of what?
Where did students after the scientific revolution put science on the scale of importance?
The study of humanism among those studying math, astronomy and medicine is said to have caused what?
Resisting what caused many scientists to court private benefactors?
Where might a scientist find a friendly private benefactor?
Which historian argues that traditionalism in a university system hindered attempts to form new views on knowledge and nature?
What characteristics were not inherent in Roman religious practice?
What was brought forth by religion in Rome?
What religious feature did each Roman home have?
What type of celebrations made up the Roman calendar?
What religious group was in charge of Rome's sacred flame?
How deities did the Romans have?
What group was an influence to Roman culture?
What sort  of practices did the Greeks offer to Rome's culture?
What myths did the Romans adapt to their needs?
What religion influenced augury for the Romans?
What was the practice of religion to the Romans?
What was the standard practice in Roman religious life?
What part of Roman religious practice involved secrecy?
What group viewed the mysteries as suspicious or subversive?
What did the mysteries seem to threaten that made the Romans occasionally attempt to ban them?
After the Republic collapsed,  what addition was made to the religions of Rome?
Who was the first Roman emperor?
For whose well being were public vows made in the empire?
What did the Romans use as a means of expanding their rule throughout the empire?
As what during the time of the Roman empire  was rejection of the state religion viewed?
What mythical figure did the Romans consider to be semi-divine?
Of what did Aeneas establish the central feature?
Who were the keepers of Aeneas's sacred objects?
What ancient festival was celebrated until the 5th century?
To whom did Aeneas set up an alter in Rome?
What mythical characters were involved in the founding of Rome?
What type of story was the Romulus and Remus tale?
Who was the mother of Romulus and Remus?
What god was the father of Romulus and Remus?
What type of events saved the twins of Roman myth?
What type of organization did Romulus establish?
According to myth, what god's temple did Romulus found?
What did Romulus offer to Jupiter in the first Roman Triumph?
What religious festival did Romulus found?
Instead of death, what happened to Romulus?
To what were the first kings of Rome associated?
To what group of deities did Lucius Tarquinius Priscus  establish a temple?
The removal of whom marked the beginning of the Roman Republic?
Where was the temple to the triad gods established?
What organization did Servius Tullius found?
What type of myth did Rome not have?
To the Romans who ruled all aspects of heaven and earth?
What did the Romans do for those deities that favored Rome? 
What did Rome make the myriad various cults?
What was basic facet of Roman religious experience?
To the Romans who was the most powerful of the gods?
What did Jupiter personify in regards to Rome's highest offices?
What gods did Juno and Minerva replace in Roman religious practice?
From where does the practice of linking various gods into grouping come?
Of what did the linking of Greek and Roman deities promote a feeling? 
What type of religious practices outnumbered the state observances?
To what did the mixture of official and individual religious practices  pertain? 
What were the characteristics of state religious observances?
Who made the choices of personal religious practices in Rome? 
What type of deities did Roman communities have?
How many religious celebrations did Rome have?
 What type of day were there more of in Rome?
With what were Roman festivals organized in accordance?
What traditions did the seasonal festivals incorporate?
Instead of the public, what did some religious rites only require?
What type of festivals happened when events warranted them?
What is an example of an event organized religious celebration?
In what aspect of the festival did political figures try to out do each other?
Under what auspices did public displays  come during the Principate?
Who paid for the most lavish of festival events?
Around what aspect did the Romans a lot space?
What religious practice did Rome use to determine ritual?
What Roman word was used to refer to the scared precinct?
What common Latin words were used to mean a shrine or building?
What monuments were the some of most visible of Roman culture?
What did each offering require to be valid in Roman religion?
What did Pliny the Elder think that a sacrifice without prayer was?
What act alone had power in Roman thought?
What was missing in the formulas of prayer in Rome?
What knowledge was of importance in the potency of prayer?
When were the gods below and the dead celebrated?
What type of sacrifice victims were the dark gods offered?
How was the sacrifice to the gods below handled?
What daylight event was not celebrated after the dark sacrifice?
What feature had importance in sacrifices?
What elements had the power of benefit or harm in Roman religion?
What was expected when the divine intervention benefited the patron?
What kind of intervention could be sought to avoid disasters?
What act was decreed in times of crisis in Rome?
What was the point of public procession to the god's temples?
What type of circumstances were called for in times of extreme difficulties?
What offering was Jupiter promised during the Second Punic War?
From whom was Rome asking for protection?
What happened to the sacrifice if the god failed to uphold the agreement?
What was the offering for the Emperor in Pompeii?
What were the exta of a sacrifice?
How were the exta read in Roman religious practice?
What part of the sacrifice were reserved for the gods?
What part of the sacrifice was shared among humans?
Into what was the god's portion of the sacrifice placed?
What type of sacrifice was rare in Rome?
What act was repulsive to Romans?
How were sacrifices of humans carried out in Rome?
Before the invasion of what area was human sacrifice carried out?
When was the invasion of Gaul by Rome?
During what war was the first gladiator munus held?
How was the gladiatorial combat described? 
What was not the ultimate purpose of gladiatorial rites?
In what way was gladiatorial combat considered?
How did later Christians view Gladiatorial combats?
Who was the founder of the Roman Republic?
What were stand-ins for child sacrifices to Mania?
Who was Mania in Roman religion?
What leader was the first consul of the Roman Republic?
What acts were sometimes arranged so as to be sacrifices?
What act did Romans view as obnoxious?
To whom was human sacrifice usually attributed?
What did Rome do about human sacrifice?
As what  did the law of 81 BC view human sacrifice?
What ruler banned human sacrifice empire wide?
Which individual in the household was responsible for the Vesta cult?
Who was the senior priest of the household in Rome?
Which ancient hero brought the lares cult to Rome?
From what city did Aeneas bring the lares cult?
What was put in the temple of Vesta?
On what kind of system was Roman religious law focused?
What form of religion was atheism considered to be? 
What results did proper religious practices produce?
What could deviations from proper religious practices cause?
What did participation in public religious rites show about the individual?
What organization payed for the maintenance official cults?
Who funded non-official religious cults?
What group benefited from non- official cults? 
What group presented the opening ceremonies of the Parentalia festival?
What individuals had the right to regulate all cults?
What was lacking as to the profession of a priest class in Rome?
What authority in a community sponsored religious rites? 
What type of religious participants were available for consultation?
What were the earliest priesthoods? 
Which member of a family functioned as priest?
How many Vestals were there in Rome?
Of what was Vesta the goddess?
Of what were the Vestals protectors?
What was the benefit of being a Vestal?
To whom did the Vestal answer?
What vow was required of Vestals?
How were the Vestals' devotion to Rome's security viewed to be ?
What was the punishment for the loss of a Vestal's chastity?
What was a Vestal expected to be to her duties?
What was the honor granted a Vestal ?
Where could a householder rekindle the home's flame?
For what state artifacts did the Vestals care?
What was the Vestal festival called?
To what part of official state sacrifices did the Vestals attend?
What was the nature of the role of the Vestals in state sacrifices?
What group's status was improved by Augustus' religious reforms?
What advantage was there in being a Vestal at games?
For whose cult were the Vestals appointed as priestesses?
Until what time did the Vestal retain their social distinctions?
Which emperor disbanded the Vestals?
In what area did public rites take place in Rome?
What person marked the religious area ritually?
What was the original meaning of the templum in Latin?
Who designated the first boundary of Rome?
What did augers seek to understand through observances?
From what source does information of Roman thought about the afterlife come?
What type of practices were those affecting the care of the dead?
What did the ancient Romans expect after death?
With whom did the  early Romans expect to associate?
What did later Romans invest in rather than grave offerings?
What type of rites varied in accordance with status and religion?
What was the grave sacrifice in Cicero's time?
What class gave only wine and food as a grave offering?
What was the multi day of remembrance for the dead? 
What goddess was an intermediary  between the dead and the living?
What group's burial practices over-lapped with the Roman's?
What items were shared among Christian and non- Christians?
What did St Augustine believe that funeral feasts gave an opportunity for?
When was Christian attendance at Parentalia become forbidden by the Christians?
How did the Romans view the corpse of the dead?
How were Roman camps laid out?
For what purpose were Roman camps arranged?
Of what were Roman camps diminutive versions?
What was in the center of each Roman camp?
What does the religious rites performed before battle suggest that the camp has become?
What was a Roman general's most extreme offering?
What Roman general had a dream of his fate in battle?
With what does the devotio link to military ethics?
By dying what did Decius avoid for the battle?
Who wrote a detailed account of the demise of Decius Mus?
What general was consul in 249 BC?
What type of campaign did Publius fight?
What was Publius's critical mistake in his sea campaign?
How did Publius fare in his battle?
What was the cause of Publius's failures according to Roman feeling?
What was the amount of participation by women in religious observances?
What religious act did women not perform?
What priesthood was reserved solely for women?
What Roman rites excluded men?
With what are many deities aligned for women in Rome's religions? 
What was excessive religious fervor in Rome's religions?
What was excessive religio equated with in Rome?
What was the basis of Roman religion?
Doing what type of actions were considered to be wrong in Rome?
What type of knowledge seeking was superstitio considered to be?
What type of diviners were suspect in Rome?
What was the purpose to be discovered by state sanctioned diviners?
What action was not to be sought by state diviners?
What group of people were several times expelled from Rome?
What had an astrologer predicted to warrant from Rome by Tiberius?
What word was used by the Romans for practitioners of magic?
To what did the term magi originally refer?
Who wrote a skeptical work outlining magic and its use?
What was the title of Pliny's work on magic?
Who was a noted magician who could vanish into thin air?
What witch was reputed to be able to stop the rotation of the heavens?
Who consulted a witch before the battle of Pharsalus?
What natural order was Erichtho accused of undermining?
How was Erichtho portrayed?
From what country did Erichtho come?
What forbid harmful  incantations?
What deities were on the edge of Roman religious community? 
What could public rites and magic easily become in some circumstances?
What did people seeking the aid of magicians avoid?
Where was magic conducted in Rome?
What science has confirmed the existence of magic use from early times?
What was the term for binding spells in the Roman world?
What did the elite use instead of spells and potions to redress a wrong?
Until what era did spells persist in the empire?
What era produced a decline in the use of spells?
The link between what groups was necessary to Rome?
Where was the basic power in Rome to be found?
What group was excluded from high offices ?
Who did the Senate select to settle a strike by the lower classes?
To whom was a temple dedicated at the settlement of the strike?
What did the patrician electorate keep in spite of a new plebeian nobility? 
What cult arrived from southern Italy?
During what time did the Dionysus cult become popular?
To what Roman god was Dionysus similar?
With loyalty a necessity, what censorship did not need to be enforced?
What appointment was the start of Cesar's political rise?
What did the Augustan settlement signify in Rome's classes?
What did the claims of officials imply about the nature of the individuals?
In what year was Cesar made pontifex maximus?
How were opportunities limited in the principate for the citizens of Rome?
At the end of the regal period, what class was kept out of the state political and priesthood arenas?
With whom did Rome have alliances at the end of the regal period?
What goddess became a part of the Capitoline triad?
In what style was the temple to Minerva built?
What gods were in the Capitoline triad?
Whose cult appeared from Africa at the time of the Latin League?
To whom was a new temple dedicated on the Alban Mount?
What cult was formed at the ars maxima in the Forum Boarium ?
For what group was Castor a patron?
From where was Venus brought and lodged on the Capitoline Hill?
What cult appeared from Pessinus in 206 BC?
What cult was brought in to Rome after the Great Mother cult?
In what year did the Senate declare the Bacchus subversive?
In what year was Diana  brought into the pomerium?
What god was introduced in Rome in 138 BC?
The spread of all things Greek provided what for the interpretation of Rome's religions?
What writer defined the development of the gods?
At the end of the Republic, who read the Stoic interpretations of Roman gods and religion?
What theory claims that popular belief was based on fiction?
What did many Romans claim in the Republican era?
What style of claim did Romans favor as a link to the gods?
Of what were such claims of deity relations the start?
What deity did the Julii claim as an ancestor?
What author further elaborated on the imperial claim of godhood? 
By the end of the Republic, what offices were increasingly joined?
What Roman figure was given wide and lifeime powers?
How many priesthoods was Augustus given?
How were Augustus's reforms viewed?
As a return to what did Augustus portray the Vestals in his reforms?
What means guaranteed the Jews and Judaism in Rome?
When did Judea become an allied kingdom to Rome?
What religious buildings were established in Rome in the imperial period?
Who recognized the Jewish synagogues as being legitimate in Rome?
In contrast to what religion was Judaism acceptable in Rome?
Which emperor decreed that all Romans must sacrifice to traditional gods?
What oath was a requirement of the emperor's decree?
What religious group was exempt from sacrifices?
What was the Decian decree meant to root out?
Who said the imperial honors were against Christian teachings?
To what did the Christian church equate the peace of the emperors?
With what veneration did most Christians have little trouble?
What Christian group did Constantine I disapprove?
What pontifax maximus favored the Catholic church? 
What group did Constantine call to a meeting?
From where were the bishops in attendance at the Council few in number?
How many bishops attended the First Council?
What agreement was reached a the Council of Nicaea ?
What was the Council of Nicaea meant to define?
What emperor tried to revive traditional religious practices?
What was proclaimed the state religion under Theodosius I?
What pleas were rejected by the empire?
What group was excluded or persecuted by the empire?
What aspects of Roman religion influenced Christian forms?
Who rejected the Christian religion?
When did Julian become Augustus?
What did Julian try to restore to the empire?
What building did Julian want to rebuild?
After Julian's death, under to what type of religion did the empire return?
What office did Western emperor Gratian decline?
What group did Gratian seek the abolish?
Which emperor briefly united the empire again?
Of what was Theodosius the last emperor?
What flame did Theodosius extinguish to remove the Vestals from power?
Where is Youtube headquartered? 
When was Youtube created?
How much did Google pay for Youtube in 2006?
Other than video blogging and and educational videos, what content is available on youtube?
How does youtube now operate as a business?
What are the first names of the men that invented youtube?
Where did Chen live in 2005?
What was the original stimuli for creating the website?
When did the creators have the idea for youtube?
when was the first beta test for the youtube site?
What was the first video to reach a million views?
How much did Sequoia Capital invest in youtube in November of 2005?
What was the official launch date for the youtube website?
As of May 2010 how many total video views had youtube attained?
As of 2014, how many hours of video were being uploaded every  minute?
How much content on youtube comes from outside the US?
How many unique visitors a month were tracked as of 2014?
As of June 2015, how many estimated visitors does youtube have in a month?
Youtube is ranked what on the world's list of most visited sites?
What did youtube do on March 31 2010? 
Who was the Google product manager in 2010?
How many videos was youtube serving per day as of May 2010?
How many views per day was youtube receiving as of May 2011?
How many videos per day were streamed as of January 2012?
What did youtube announce in Feb of 2015?
what was the name of the new app youtube launched?
What platform was launched in Aug of 2015?
What is the name of the youtube feature that removes ads and allows downloading movies?
On what OS was the YouTube Kids app available?
In 2010 youtube launched a version of its site that ran on what standard?
What was the main benefit from the switch to HTML5?
How did users opt into the trial version of youtube's HTML5 site?
What format besides H.264 was playable with HTML5?
What is the maximum length of a video on youtube?
When a user with a new account posts a video, what is the maximum length allowed?
When was the time limit on video length first enacted on youtube?
in 2006 Youtube found that the majority of longer videos were what?
What is the upload file size limit on out of date browsers?
Peter Bradshaw held what position in youtube?
What type of videos did youtube officially start supporting in July 2009?
What is the name for the common method of viewing a 3d movie, with red and blue glasses?
When did HTML5 officially support side-by-side 3D footage?
Youtube offers users the option to watch content where?
What is used to embed a youtube video to a webpage?
What is the most common use of embedded youtube videos?
What is a video called when a person records themselves watching a different video?
When did youtube officially remove the response feature?
YOutube does not often post a what for its videos?
Youtube intends for users to watch videos where?
What was added to the upload options in July of 2012?
Which site removed the option of downloading youtube videos after 2012?
Which videos are often available for download straight from youtube?
When did youtube become available on Apple products?
When did youtube launch its first app for the iPhone?
What percentage of Smartphone users use the youtube app?
What is Apple's prefered video standard?
How long did it take to transfer Youtube's content to Apple's standard?
What service was able to search and play youtube videos as of 2008?
What did youtube launch in Jan of 2009?
later in 2009 what service replaced youtube for TV
Google made youtube streamable on what gaming console in DEC. of 2013?
When did youtube finally become available on the Playstation 4?
What is youtube red?
When was youtube red originally announced?
What was the original title of youtube red?
When was youtube red re-launched with its added features?
What service was "music key" intended to replace?
Who is the TED curator?
What surprising feature does youtube possibly have the chance to revolutionize? 
Who is the founder of the Khan Academy?
What other surprising aspect of human development will youtube likely have an impact on?
An activist in the Arab spring said they were using Facebook to what?
An activist in the Arab spring said they were using Twitter to do what?
An activist in the Arab spring said they were using youtube to do what?
Who was the co-sponsor of the condemnation by the US Senate over the kony 2012 video?
What year was the first youtube question asked to a presidential nominee?
How has youtube helped the government?
the white house's youtube channel was the what number ranked news channel on youtube in 2012?
What was deemed necessary by the white house when creating youtube content?
In 2013 who did the healthcare exchange commission to impersonate Obama and post it to youtube?
What was the purpose of Iman Crosson's video?
What is the name of the group that drew responses from the resident and most of his staff regarding anti-bullying?
How old was Amanda Todd when she took her own life because of bullying?
How ling did it take the It Gets Better Project video to draw such a huge response?
What was done after Amanda Todd's death?
What was the goal of the actions taken after Amanda Todd's death?
How much time does the average person spend watching youtube videos each day?
What is the average time an American watches TV in day?
What was youtube's estimated ads revenue in 2013?
What was youtube's revenue as estimated in 2008?
Youtube's financial records are not reported by who?
When did youtube enter a partnership with NBC?
What is the name of the section in youtube that allows major content publishers to post full length movies and episodes?
What was the intended purpose of youtube's "shows" section?
When did youtube launch the version of "shows" for the UK?
In 2010 how many movies did youtube's rental service offer?
What was youtube's 2007 partner program based on?
What percentage of revenue does youtube get for ads on "partner program" channels?
How many people are employed by the partner program?
As per estimate in 2013 how much would a partner program member earn with ad revenue off of pre-roll advertising per 1000 views?
How much ad revenue goes to the original uploader of the youtube video if they're in the partner program?
Where does the majority of youtube's revenue go?
In 2010 what were the estimates for the amount of videos with advertisements uploaded without the copywriter's consent?
Which major gaming company claimed copyright ad revenue rights against uploaders?
When did Nintendo finally agree to share ad profits with the original uploaders?
What option besides removing the video does youtube grant copyright holders?
What does the message when uploading a video ask the user not to do?
Posting a video without consent of the copyright holder is what according to youtube?
How many copyright infringements must an account have before the account is deleted?
Youtube doesn't do what to videos before they're posted?
What kind of notice must a copyright holder issue when trying to take down content?
How much did Viacom want in damages in their lawsuit against youtube?
Companies including Viacom and Mediaset have done what against youtube?
What does youtube do to prevent losing lawsuits involving copyright infringement?
How many unauthorized clips did Viacom allegedly find on youtube that infringed its copyrights?
How much data did youtube have to hand over to Viacom as a result of the lawsuit?
Which organization spoke against the courts ruling?
What did Viacom plan to do after the ruling in 2010?
What happened to Viacom's lawsuit in 2010?
Who was the residing judge of the lawsuit?
In 2007 youtube launched an automated system to detect what?
Who was Google's CEO in 2007?
What is the name of the system that automatically detects copyright violations?
Why did the CEO of Google think the new software was necessary? 
What does Content ID do if an upload is too close a match to a known copyright material?
What was the ultimate view of Content ID's performance after a 2009 test?
As of 2010 what is the maximum length of a video a user can upload given the proper authority?
How does one dispute the ruling of Content ID?
What happened to the sites rules in Dec. 2010?
Youtube depends on who to flag inappropriate videos?
Who checks the flagged videos for unauthorized content?
Who of the house of commons spoke out on youtube's policies?
The United Kingdom stated it was what with youtube's policies with moderating its content?
When did the UK speak out against youtube's copyright policies?
Most videos enable users to do what
What has attracted negative attention about comments on youtube besides their content?
Time in 2006 wrote that youtube harnessed the wisdom and what else of humanity?
Which magazine wrote about youtube in a 2009 article on user comments?
Some of the positive aspects of youtube might be that it provides what on a scale we've never seen before?
When did youtube first require the user to have a google account before posting a comment?
The changes to the google+ additions allowed uploaders to better moderate and what to comments?
There were better sorting functions put in place in 2013 to make sure what kind of comments appeared on top?
What is youtube co-founder Karim's first name?
How many thumbs down votes did youtube's official statement about the new commenting system get within two days?
youtube is completely what in some places?
Why besides limited periods of time would youtube not be allowed in a country?
What might happen in a restrictive state even if you do have access to the youtube site itself?
Who made a metaphor about a wall of separation?
What has the U.S. Supreme Court repeatedly cited?
When was the case of Reynolds v. United States?
What did the Court write about Jefferson's comments as it related to the scope and effect of the First Amendment?
What was the clause against establishment of religion by law intended to erect?
What was one of the reason early immigrant groups came to America?
What were Protestant Christians fleeing from?
Who was persecuting the Puritans?
What did William Penn ensure the protection of in his colony?
What did the Plymouth Colony and Massachusetts Bay Colony both establish?
What may no person within Georgia be deprived of the privilege of doing in any manner agreeable to them?
When was the Georgia Constitution amended to add Article IV, Section 10?
What can a citizen of Georgia not be compelled to do?
What is constitutionally forbidden to be established in the state of Georgia?
What will no person be denied the enjoyment of in Georgia based on their religious principles?
When did the North Carolina Constitution disestablish the Anglican church?
What religious denomination was the only one allowed to hold public office in NC until 1835?
What category did the NC Constitution broaden the people allowed to hold public office to from 1835 to 1876?
What part of the NC Constitution forbids atheists from holding public office?
When did the U.S. Supreme Court rule clauses forbidding people from holding public office based on their religion was unenforceable? 
What shows support for the separation of church and state as early as the mid-17th century?
What were the Remonstrance opposed to?
When did a group of English citizens sign a document condemning hatred, war and bondage?
Who were the signers of the document affronted by the persecution of?
What had Peter Stuyvesant formally banned all of other than the Dutch Reformed Church?
What did an established church, even at the state level, have?
What was Issac Backus' profession?
What region did Isaac Backus come from?
When did Isaac Backus write against a state sanctioned religion?
When was Thomas Jefferson's Virginia Statute for Religious Freedom enacted?
Who was Roger Williams?
What phrase did Roger Williams first use?
What colony was Roger Williams the founder of?
When was the book The Bloody Tenent of Persecution published?
Who used William's phrase as a description of the First Amendment and its restriction on the legislative branch?
Whose conceptions of separation have long been argued over?
What did Jefferson refuse to issue, when it was sent to him by Congress during his presidency?
Where did both Jefferson and Madison attend religious services?
How many religious proclamations did Madison issue while President?
What is essential to the purity of both religion and civil government?
What did Jefferson's opponents accuse him of wanting to do to Christianity? 
What did Jefferson encourage the separate sects at the University of Virginia to have of their own?
How was the state banned from supporting a Professorship of Divinity?
What scheme did Jefferson apparently support when it came to University students?
What does Mark David Hall think people focus on way too much?
When did Jefferson's letter enter American jurisprudence?
What was the case that used Jefferson's letter?
What was the topic of Reynolds v. U.S.?
What was the court seeking, in using Jefferson's letter?
What did the court rule outlawing polygamy was?
What approach was not the only one taken in the 18th century?
What did Jefferson draft his Statute of Religious Freedom in opposition to?
Who was the chief supporter of the bill that got Jefferson motivated to draft his Statute?
What did Patrick Henry want to require Virginians to pay taxes to support?
What did the Constitution of Massachusetts express no one would be restrained from doing?
What did the Duke of York require every community in his lands to support?
Instead of Anglican, what were the churches most often supported in New York and New Jersey?
What were taxpayers free to do after they paid the Duke of York his local tax?
Why was the Duke not a friend of Anglicanism?
When did the first Anglican minister arrive in New Jersey?
What did the original charter of the Province of East Jersey restrict membership in its Assembly to?
What was the Duke of York's relationship to his religion described as being?
What religious sect were the proprietors of Perth Amboy?
What did the Province of West Jersey specify there would not be for those running for an office, in 1681?
When was an oath requiring militia to abjure the pretensions of the pope replaced?
What does the first amendment to the US Constitution state?
What is the first part of the First Amendment know as?
What is the last part of the sentence of the First Amendment known as?
What do the two clauses of the First Amendment for the basis of?
What are citizens of the United States free to embrace or reject as they choose?
Where was Representative Roger Sherman from?
Why did Sherman believe the establishment clause was unnecessary? 
What power was not granted to Congress by the Constitution?
What was Tucker concerned the establishment clause could preempt?
Where was Representative Thomas Tucker from?
When was the 14th Amendment to the US Constitution created?
What was the intent of the 14th Amendment?
What does the 14th Amendment also introduce the concept of?
What clauses does the 14th Amendment include?
What has the doctrine of incorporation been used to ensure?
What landmark case has impacted all subsequent interpretations of the separation of church and state in regard to state governments?
What did the Supreme Court uphold in Everson v. Board of Education?
What did the Supreme Court hold the First Amendment establishment clause was fully applicable to?
What was a recent case involving the application of the principle of the establishment clause against states?
When was the case of v. Grumet?
What did Jefferson's concept of 'separation of church and state" became part of what jurisprudence?
What case was Jefferson's concept apropos to?
What does the constitution guarantee when it comes to religion?
What word is not defined in the Constitution?
Who had Jefferson's letter been sent to?
When was the centrality of the "separation" concept to the Religion Clauses of the Constitution made explicit?
What was the topic of the Everson v. Board of Education?
What case was the concept relevant?
What was the case of Everson v. Board of Education the first instance of?
How must the wall separating church and state be kept?
What did the decision ultimately uphold?
What was the state allowed to continue to fund?
What did both the majority and dissenting opinions reiterate?
What was the disagreement between the Justices over whether funding breached what?
What did Justice Jackson argue there were no grounds upon which to support what?
When did the Supreme Court address the issue of officially sponsored prayer in public schools?
What was the case in 1962 where the Supreme Court addressed the issue of officially sponsored school prayer?
By what vote did the Supreme Court determine it unconstitutional for state official to compose an official school prayer?
Even if a prayer is non-denominational it's still considered what?
What was one of the reasons early colonists left England to seek religious freedom in America?
Who was the lone dissenter in the Supreme Court's ruling?
What did Stewart object to?
Stewart felt the court was not responsibly aided by the uncritical invocation of what?
Stewart pointed out that the phrase "Wall of separation" was nowhere to be found in what?
When did the case of Epperson v. Arkansas take place?
What did the Arkansas law violate the constitutional prohibition of state laws in respect to?
Who wrote the court's opinion in Epperson v. Arkansas?
What does the State have no legitimate interest in protecting any or all religions from?
What did an Arkansas law make it a crime to teach the theory of?
When was the case of Lemon v. Kurtzman?
What state's policy was in question in Lemon v. Kurtzman?
Whose salaries were being reimbursed in private religious schools?
What did the state's policy violate?
What did the court's decision argue that the separation of church and state could never be?
How many prongs is the Supreme COurt's test to determine if a government action comports with the Establishment Clause?
What is the three-pronged test regarding the Establishment Clause know as?
To not violate the Establishment Clause, a law must be adopted with neutral or what purpose?
What much the primary effect of a law neither advance or inhibit?
Excessive entanglement occurs when a state policy results in a close relationship of what?
How many judges were on the panel which held the Pledge of Allegiance in California public schools was unconstitutional?
When did the three judge panel make their ruling?
What did both houses of Congress pass measures reaffirming their support for?
Why was the case of Elk Grove Unified School District v. Newdow overturned?
What did the five-justice majority hold that Newdow lacked?
When did the US Court of Appeals rule in the case of ACLU v. Mercer County?
What was displayed in Kentucky courthouses?
What did a federal judge rule must be removed from public property?
When was a ruling handed down on the Mount Soledad cross controversy?
Why were the displays of the ten Commandments allowed?
What case is in regards to whether prayers at town meetings must allow various faiths?
When did the Supreme Court rule on Town of Greece v. Galloway?
What was the Supreme Court's final vote in Town of Greece v. Galloway?
Who did the Supreme Court rule in favor of?
What did the Supreme Court rule the Constitution allowed for?
What do some organizations disagree with the notion of?
What do the critics argue the phrase misrepresents?
What do scholars also disagree with about the way the Supreme Court has interpreted what?
What do critics note were intermingled at the time the Constitution was ratified?
What do these critics argue couldn't have been intended by the framers of the constitution?
Critics of modern separation of church and state note there was official establishment of what in several states at the time of ratification?
When was the passage of the 14th Amendment?
What was recognized by the time the 14th Amendment passed?
What kind of theory is the doctrine of the Living Constitution?
What do some debates center on the law of the land not being just defined by the Constitution's Supremacy Clause but also by what?
What clause are both elected officials and appointed ones covered by?
What type of beliefs are not an allowed job qualification test for federal employees?
How many states violate the religious test clause with language somewhere in their official policies?
What do states violate the clause require state office-holders to possess?
What do the non-permissible clauses require a belief in?
What's one example in Tennessee's constitution?
What language do some of the same states specify the oath of office include?
Requiring oaths invoking God are today deemed to be in violation of what?
Because such oaths are in violation of the First Amendment, they're what?
Why have perks like relaxed zoning rules and special parking privileges been allowed for churches?
What is the national motto "In God We Trust" officially known as?
What has the Supreme Court ruled about ceremonial deism?
What state uses as a motto a passage from the Bible?
Why was Ohio allowed to use a biblical passage as its motto?
What position do Jeffries and Ryan argue was the reason for support from a coalition of separationists?
What type of secularism came to dominate American public life?
Who supported the ban against government aid to religious schools before 1970?
What diminished after 1980?
What is opposed today by members of many Protestant faiths?
What do critics of the concept of separation of church and state argue it's untethered to?
What is the profession of Philip Hamburger?
What school is Philip Hamburger associated with?
What does Hamburger feel the modern concept of separation of church and state is rooted in?
What are state constitutional amendments relating to separation of church and state known as?
Who is the Executive Director of the Baptist Joint Committee?
What does Walker feel does not impugn the validity of the principle of separation of church and state?
Who have argued for the separation of church and state for reasons having nothing to do with a desire for a secular culture?
Separationists opposed the Catholic church when it sought to do what?
What does a principled debate on the issues not support a charge of?
What did evangelicals want to keep apart?
What did religious freedom result from?
What profession does Frank Lambert have?
What is the name of Lambert's book?
What did Deists and skeptics join together to fight for?
What does Bellah say the separation of church and state is grounded firmly in?
Whose speech does Bellah's 1967 article analyze?
What does Bellah use the term "civil religion' to describe?
What word does Bellah ask how a President is justified to use?
What has the separation of church and state failed to deny the political realm of?
What type of faith is Protestantism?
Whose teachings were once considered to be heretical?
Other than Protestantism, what are the other two divisions of Christianity?
Who wrote a letter protesting the condemnation of Martin Luther?
What was the name of the movement that started Protestantism?
What do all Protestantism denominations reject?
What Catholic doctrine is usually denied in Protestantism?
What is the term to describe using only faith for justification?
What is the highest authority in Protestantism for morals?
What is the term to describe the differences between Protestantism and Catholicism?
What percentage of Christians are Protestant?
Which continents have some form of Protestantism?
What types of Protestantism are increasing?
What Protestant church has members around the world?
How many people are considered Protestant?
From what language does the term evangelical originate?
What German word refers to the gospel or being Protestant?
What English word for a church began with the Puritans in England?
Name two contributors to Reformed churches.
Who brought Evangelicalism to the U.S.?
What is the term for teaching by only scripture?
How many primary doctrines are focused on the Bible?
What is the term that means all in the Bible is true?
What power can help someone overcome sin?
What is the term for needing the Bible for salvation?
Which ideas had little criticism for the most part?
What is the term for how the church as a whole works?
What group believes that some in the church have a special status to understand the bible?
At what period was inerrancy debated?
What item could be learned to gain salvation?
What was Luther's main principle?
What principle made the Bible the one source for teaching?
What did reformers considered their beliefs to be, in terms of focus?
What is the second principle of Protestantism?
Faith can bring what eternal benefit?
When did Protestantism begin to split?
What was one of the main causes of the split in Protestantism?
What Catholic belief did early Protestants not agree with?
What two substances are used in a Catholic Mass?
Whose body and blood is considered present in Holy Communion?
Who was one of the first to try to reform the Catholic Church?
When were the Waldensians created?
In what year were the Waldensians labeled as heretics?
Where does the Waldensian movement still exist currently?
What teachings originated with Arnold of Brescia?
When did Martin Luther attach his 95 theses on the door of the church?
What did the theses argue against selling?
What Catholic devotion would Martin Luther write about after the 95 theses/
Where was All Saints' Church?
Who did Martin Luther criticize in the 95 theses?
Who condemned the Reformation?
Who wrote the Ordinances of 1541?
What city became the unofficial capital of the Protestant movement?
When did John Calvin die?
What type of missionaries were taught in Geneva?
Who began the Protestant movement in Switzerland?
Which two areas had a long history of resentment?
What was the name of the meeting to make an alliance between Zwingli and Luther?
What Prince hosted the Colloquy of Marburg?
What did the Colloquy of Marburg become infamous for?
Under whose reign did the Church of England part from Rome?
When was the Act of Supremacy passed?
What made Anglicanism into a more distinct tradition?
In what years were the Dissolution of the Monasteries carried out?
Who was made the Supreme Head of the Church of England in 1534?
The growth of Puritanism happened during what age?
What did the Puritans want the Church of England to emulate?
The Puritan movement worked on reforming what church?
What was another name for the later Puritan movement?
What did the later Puritan movement create?
When was the Scottish Reformation?
The Scottish Reformation decreased what country's influence?
Who was the leader of the Scottish Reformation?
Whose regime made possible the Scottish Reformation?
When was the Papal Jurisdiction Act passed?
What movement occurred during the 1730's and 1740's?
What movement made a permanent mark on Protestantism in the U.S.?
When did the Second Great Awakening start?
Which congregations joined the Second Great Awakening the most after 1820?
When did the Second Great Awakening lose momentum?
What did the Second Great Awakening create?
What was the Second Great Awakening a reaction against?
When was the Third Great Awakening?
What denominations did the Third Great Awakening affect?
What other movement gained its force from the Third Great Awakening?
What movement was affiliated with the Third Great Awakening?
What new groups were formed as a result of the Third Great Awakening?
What modern movement began in the 20th century?
What were the roots of the modern Pentecostal movement?
What movement did Pentecostalism create?
In what city did the modern Pentecostal movement begin?
What type of mission was the birthplace of the modern Pentecostal movement?
What direction has Europe moved towards?
What caused the spread of secularism?
What areas have a higher rate of Christian observance?
When did South America show an increase in Evangelicals?
What country is more religious than other developed nations?
Which reformation was seen as not being effective enough?
What did Karlstadt call Lutheran theologians?
What were reform movement leaders compared to?
What is another name for magister?
What has been linked with pacifism?
What type of church do Protestants believe in?
Who comprises the invisible church?
What is the name of the main principles of Protestantism?
What other entities are also considered to be Protestant?
What Catholic doctrine do Protestants not believe in?
What type of movements have tried to unite Protestant denominations?
Which is larger, divisions or unions of Protestantism?
What beliefs do most denominations agree on?
What types of doctrines do denominations not agree on?
What type of belief defines what is a major or minor doctrine?
What is another name for denominational families?
What are the major branches of Protestantism?
What created the differentiation of Protestant branches?
What small branch of Protestantism will also be discussed?
What do some branches share in common?
The Adventist movement has encouraged examining what in full?
What Adventist groups observe the Sabbath?
What is the name of the Seventh-day Adventist's core beliefs?
What is used for justification of the 28 Fundamental Beliefs?
What belief about ultimate punishment do Adventists disagree on?
What does Anglican mean?
When did the word Anglican begin?
Who do the Anglican churches have communion with?
How many Anglican Communion members are there in the world?
What power does each national or regional church possess?
Who did the Church of England split from?
At what time did the Church of England become independent?
Who headed the Anglican reforms in the middle of the 16th century?
The Church of England's reforms put it in the middle of what two traditions?
What liturgical forms in Anglicanism were considered unacceptable by many progressive Protestants?
According to Baptists, who should have baptisms?
What type of churches are most Baptists churches considered to be?
What two offices do Baptists have?
What type of baptism do Baptists conduct?
What is another term for soul competency?
Where was the earliest Baptist church founded?
Who was the pastor of the first Baptist church?
Who believed that Christ's atonement was for everyone?
Who founded the first Baptist group in what is now the United States?
Who has spread the teachings of the Baptists to each continent?
What is one of the largest Protestant branches with 80 million members?
How popular is the branch of Lutheranism?
What is the largest body of Lutheran churches?
How many people belong to the Lutheran World Federation?
Name two smaller Lutheran church bodies.
What is Methodism known for, as far as music goes?
Methodists believe that Christ achieved salvation for whom?
What do Methodists believe that one must do to receive Christ's salvation?
Who wrote most of the Methodist hymns?
What Calvinist doctrine is focuses on salvation?
How many denominations were spawned by Pentecostalism?
How many Pentecostals are there in the world?
What movement has caused non-Pentecostal churches to accept some Pentecostal beliefs?
Who can claim over 500 million members?
Where is Pentecostalism currently growing the most?
What denomination do these small groups belong to?
How much affiliation do these small groups have with historical denominations?
Who has founded these small groups of Christians?
What do some groups of people who believe in basic Protestant principles identify as?
What is another informal name for Quaker?
What is the Quakers unifying belief?
What have the Quakers tried to avoid?
What collective movement are the Quakers associated with?
What types of Christianity do Quakers belong to?
What is a prominent example of a movement which crosses over denominational lines?
Which movement actually affected the Catholic Church?
What groups beliefs does the Charismatic Movement seek to add to branches of Christianity?
Name a sub-group of the Charismatic Movement.
What other types of churches often adopt charismatic or evangelical beliefs?
What period saw a large upswing in Evangelicalism?
Where did the Great Awakenings increase interest in Evangelicalism?
Methodism is part of what movement?
What man is associated with the beginnings of Evangelicalism?
What American is considered to have been a seminal influence in the charismatic movement?
When was the Massey conference held?
The Massey conference eventually led to developing what seminars?
Name UK influences on the Charismatic movement.
Where was the Massey conference held?
Who helped Lutherans understand the charismatic movement in the 1960s?
In what state did charismatic Lutheran congregations grow to be quite large?
Where is an annual event that has quite a bit of charismatic activity?
What was published in 1974?
Who wrote Touched by the Spirit?
Who heads the Newfrontiers movement?
What tendencies do reformed charismatics avoid?
Where is Every Nations Churches located?
What is a name for gifts of the Spirit?
Name the renewal movements which could be considered overemotional.
What group was very much hampered in England from making changes?
What college was influenced by Puritan beliefs?
What movement influenced the Puritans?
What movement did the Puritans adopt in the 17th century?
When was the Synod of Dort?
What type of theology did Puritans accept?
When did separatists become powerful in Puritanism?
What types of piety did the Puritans advocate?
Where was Calvin criticized?
At what gathering were supporters unsuccessful in establishing a new national church?
What religious movement affected education, politics, the economy, and marriage?
What churches let their clergy marry?
When did women join the Protestant ministry?
What types of churches have women had leading positions?
What priesthood rules do Protestant churches reject?
What did Reformers increase so that their followers could read the Bible?
In the middle of the eighteenth century, how many Swedes could read and write?
Who founded Harvard College?
When was Yale founded?
What state became a hub of learning?
What is the heart of the Protestant moral code?
What did Calvin particular reject?
What was a strong reason for inventors and investors to work on technical inventions?
What work ethic was an influence on capitalism and the Industrial Revolution?
What is another name for the Protestant work ethic?
Who calculated the Global Value Development Index?
What does a good job of combining religion and liberalism?
Who did an analysis of World Values Survey data?
What university is Arno Tausch from?
What type of engagement is considered a World Value?
What denominations are considered to be wealthier than most other groups?
Affluent American families are what type of families?
What denominations are considered to be better educated than most other groups?
What political group has a disproportionately large number of Protestants?
Other than politics, what areas have a disproportionately large number of Protestants?
What was the name of the doctrine that separated church and non-religious affairs?
Who added the election of laymen to church government?
When was the treatise that allowed a congregation to elect or remove a minister?
Who added synods to church government?
What were Luther's followers advised to use when governing worldly affairs?
What political mixture did Calvin prefer?
What is the term for checks and balances in a political system?
Who paved the way for modern democracy to emerge?
Who was allowed to teach a liberal Bible interpretation?
What philosophers were given asylum?
Whose democracies were created by Protestants?
What democratic principles were followed by the Plymouth Colony?
Other than the U.S., to what colonies did the British export their democratic beliefs?
What group believed that democracy was the will of God?
What other group in America practiced self-rule and separation of powers?
What group initiated the right to religious freedom?
Where did Luther refuse to change his beliefs?
What persecuted groups followed the separation of church and state?
Who wrote about religious freedom in the early 17th century?
How many American Protestants supported independence in America?
When did Prussia stop torture?
When did Britain end slavery?
Who were the first men to make large contributions to international law?
Who founded the Red Cross?
What international law was Henry Dunant mostly responsible for?
Who first introduced social insurance programs?
What did Bismarck consider social insurance programs to be?
What social reform movements were Protestants working toward in the nineteen century?
What country started programs that led to the welfare state?
What area copied Bismarck's social programs the most?
The Roman Catholic Church considers Protestant denominations to be what?
What is lacking in Protestant priesthood, according to the Roman Catholic Church?
What does the Roman Catholic Church say is not comparable to their sacraments and dogmas?
What other Church shares the Roman Catholic view on Protestant churches?
What is lacking in Protestantism, according to the Roman Catholic Church?
Who supported the Magisterial Reformation?
The Reformed churches based their beliefs about ecclesiastical organization on what movement?
What are the doctrines of the Reformed churches called?
What ecumenical council did the Reformed churches reject?
What type of character became central to religious unity in Reformed churches?
What group has been unsuccessful in creating a unified church since 1948?
What conference was held in 1910?
What churches have been strongly engaged in the ecumenical movement?
What have Orthodox churches condemned the perception of?
What types of churches have had rapidly declining memberships?
If done properly, what Protestant practice does the Catholic Church recognize?
What is the only other sacrament of the Protestants that the Catholic Church recognizes?
Who can become ordained to the Catholic priesthood after a period of study?
Protestants who want full communion with the Catholic Church do not have to be what?
Why does the Catholic Church not recognize the ordination of Protestant ministers?
What document was signed in 1999?
Who rejects the statement signed in 1999?
Who adopted the Joint Declaration in 2006?
The Joint Declaration supposedly resolves the conflict which originally led to what movement?
What two groups originally signed the Joint Declaration?
How many Protestants are there in the world?
What is the total population of Christians in the world?
Approximately how much of the world's population are Protestant (in fractions)?
What area only had about 2 million Protestants in 2010?
What area had the largest Protestant population in 2010?
In what European areas is Protestantism still the most practiced religion?
In 2012, what percentage of the EU was thought to be Protestant?
In what countries is Protestantism one of the most popular (but not THE most popular) religions?
The Pew Research Center estimated Protestants to be what percentage of Europe's Christian population in 2010?
What area was once the site of a significant pre-reformation movement, but now only has a small number of Protestants?
Where has Protestantism spread quickly since the 1900's?
When did much of the spread of Protestantism occur in the 20th century?
In 2010, what percentage of Anglicans were said to be in Africa?
What percentage of Anglicans were in the UK in 1910?
In 2010, what country had more Protestants than both the UK and Germany together?
What type of country is Greece?
What percentage of Greece's economy is based on service?
How much of Greece's economy is comprised of industrial sectors?
How much of the national economic output did the agricultural sector of Greece contribute in 2015?
How many international tourists visited Greece in 2013?
What is Greece a significant producer of within the EU?
Greece has the largest what in the Balkans?
What was Albania's largest foreign investor in 2013?
Who is Greece the most important trading partner to?
What Greek telecommunications company has become a strong investor in former Yugoslavia?
What organization was Greek a founding member?
What does the abbreviation OECD expand to?
What is Greece's economy classified as?
When did Greece join what is now the European Union?
When did Greece adopt the Euro as its currency?
What transformed a large part of the world in the 19th century?
What does recent research from 2006 examine?
What was Greece's GDP growth between 1833 and 1911 compared other Western European nations?
What type of industrial activity was evident in Greece in the period researched?
What did Greece do in 1826, 1843, 1860 and 1894?
How many years of consecutive growth had Greece had?
When did Greece go into recession?
What did the Greek economy have the highest of at the end of 2009?
What percentage of GDP was the budget deficit of Greece in 2009?
What type of crisis resulted from the budget deficit and rising debt levels of Greece?
What were the majority of the differences in the revised budget due to the temporary changing of?
What did retroactively applying the ESA95 methodology result in raising the budget deficit to?
By how much did the budget deficit of Greece exceed the 3% limit in the reference year of 1999?
What other European country were claims similar to those levied against Greece made?
When were expenses recorded by the new government?
Who provided a report for Greece in 2005?
What was the range of the impact of the new accounting rules on the Greek fiscal figures for the years 1997 to 1999?
What was the year of Greece's EMU membership qualification?
What methodology was in force when Greece submitted its membership qualification?
What did the Greek minister of finance clarify the 1999 budget was below when calculated with the ESA79 methodology?
What were credits given to European governments disguised as?
Why weren't swaps registered as debts by Eurostat at the time?
What rules did a German derivatives dealer say could be quite legally circumvented through swaps?
What was again revised in May of 2010?
What was Greece's public debt forecast to hit as high of a percentage of GDP of in 2010?
What did Greece have the highest percentage increase in between 2005 and 2011?
What was the increase of Greece's industrial output between 2005 and 2011?
What did the industrial production in Greece fall by due to the financial crisis?
What is Greece ranked in the EU in the production of marble?
How many tons of marble does Greece produce?
What does Greece have the largest of in the world?
Greece's navy accounts for more than what percentage of the world's total deadweight tonnage?
What is the Greek merchant navy's total dwt?
What percentage of the entire EU's dwt does Greece alone represent?
How many ships did Greece's navy have in the late 1970s?
When counting shipping as quasi-exports and in terms of monetary value, what is Greece's global rank?
What was the worth Greece's shipping services in 2011?
What three countries were ahead of Greece in 2011 with exports?
What was the shipping services imported by Greece in 2011 worth?
What was Greece's 2011 trade surplus?
Who ran the phones in Greece between 1949 and the 1980s?
What was the Hellenic Telecommunications Organization better known by the acronym of?
When did the liberalization of the telephone communications in Greece happen?
What company has a 40% stake in OTE?
How many shares of OTE does the Greek state own?
What does Greece lag behind other EU countries in terms of use?
How much did the percentage of households with access to the internet increase between 2006 and 2013?
What percentage of people in Greece had never used the Internet as of 2013?
Who has the EU's third highest percentage of people who've never used the Internet?
What has the been a massive increase in the number of households with in Greece?
How many millions of tourists does Greece attract each year?
What part of Greece's GDP is accounted for by tourism?
What did the 2008 OECD report show the average tourist expenditure while in Greece was?
How many jobs in 2008 in Greece were somehow related to the tourism industry?
How many tourists did Greece welcome in 2009?
What have a number of tourism-related organizations placed Greek destinations at the top of?
What Greek city was rated the world's fifth best ultimate party town by 2009's Lonely Planet?
What distinction does the city of Thessaloniki have in regards to size in Greece?
What did Travel+Leisure vote the island of Santorini as in 2011?
What island was ranked as the 5th best in Europe?
How long is Greek's rail network estimated to run?
Who runs the rail transport in Greece?
Who is TrainOSE a subsidiary of?
What gauge is most of Greece's railway?
How many kilometers of Greece's railway is electrified?
What was Greece's largest port as measured by good transported in 2010?
How many million of tons went through Aghioi Theodoroi in 2010?
How many million tons of goods did port Eleusis transport in 2010?
How many tons of goods were transported through Greece in 2007?
What was the port of Piraeus declared to be in 2013?
How many TEUs did Piraeus handle in 2010?
What amount of TEUs did Thessaloniki handle in 2010?
How many million of people passed through Greece's ports in 2010?
What record amount of TEUs did Piraeus handle in 2013?
What organization owns Pier II in Piraeus? 
How much of Greece's energy consumption came from renewable sources in 2008?
What was EU average amount of energy from renewable sources in 2008?
Where does most of Greece's renewable energy come from?
How much of Greece's energy is targeted to be from renewable sources by 2020?
Who suggested research into the possibility of a Greek nuclear power plant should begin?
What did IMF forecast Greece's unemployment rate to be in 2012?
What was Greece's unemployment rate between in 2009?
What did Greece's unemployment rate soar to in 2013?
What was Greece's jobless rate in 2015?
What is thought to have eroded Greece's potential output?
Does speaker of the House participate in dbate?
Are snate majority leaders more influential than Speaker of the house??
Who did Newt Gingrich delegate much authority to?
Who was speaker of the house When Tom Delay was Majority leader?
Who takes over as Speaker if the minority party gains control of the house?
What meetings do Minority and Majority leaders usually meet to discuss?
Who is he current Minority leader?
If minority party takes control of congress, who is usually in link to become majority leader?
Are minority leaders usually experienced?
In what congress did Nancy Pelosi bdcome minority leader?
How long had Richard Gephart served in house prior to being elected to minority leader?
When was Robert Michel elected minority leader?
John Rhodes served as minority leader beginning in what year?
Who is the leader of the majority leader in House?
What is the title of seconde in command for majority party in congress?
Who overshadowed House Speaker Dennis Hastert?
Who is the leader of the minority party in the House?
Does the minority or majority party have more leadership positions in House?
What role did Pelosi win in 112th Congress?
What party lost control of House in 2010 elections?
What rule gives minority leader right to offer motion to recommit with instructions?
Who may place legislation on a corrections calendar?
Are minority leadership roles specified closely?
What congressman largely specified the job description of minority leader?
What despcription was assigned to minority leader in part?
What defines a large part of minority leader role?
When was the minority leader position created? 
Why was minority leader position created?
Who is sometimes considered the first funcioning "Minority Leader?"
Who was Treasury Secretary at time of first congress?
In the early days who represented party leadership?
In early 19th century, what were 2 common parties?
What would be the purpose of organizing non majority members of  the house?
What made identifying House leadership difficult?
How many candidates was typical in early fields for speaker?
From 1861 to 1875 how many times was Dmocratic minority speaker not nominated?
Why was Keifer discredited/empty leader?
Who's contention is it that the minority party candidate is clearly Minority Leader since 1883?
Although Keifer held minority leader role, who was actual gloof leader?
Prior to 1883 there is evidence that serious caucus fights occured in what years?
What prominent ex-speaker was nominated for minority role in 1875?
What former appropriations chairman was nominated for minority leader in 1876,77,79?
Is there a consensus about the time that minority leadership officially emerged as a position?
What party characteristics emerged in the house in late 19th century?
What is the leadership structure when party controls house and presidency?
Is the Senate or the House more partisan?
What minority leaders have played prominenct roles to opposing incumbent president?
How many private calendar objector members does minority leader appoint?
What 2 commissions is the minority leader a member of?
Who does minority leader have informal ties with for scheduling house matters?
According to democratic rules of the 106th congress what committee does minority leader chair?
According to democratic rules of the 106th congress what committee does minority leader head?
According to democratic rules of the 106th congress what campaign membership do they have?
According to democratic rules of the 106th congress what leadership members do they appoint?
Who plays an influential role in the formation of party policy?
How are floor leaders kept informed of legislative status?
In what role are the floor leader's instrumental for legislation?
How much concern do minority leaders have for campaigning?
Outside of Washington how much involvement do minority leaders have in campaigns?
Who establishes leadership PACs?
Does minority leader act solely to advance party objectives?
Does minority leader always employ same strategy for party objectives?
Does dissension and cohesion of majority party factor into minority strategy?
What important aim of minority leader pertaining to elections?
How can a minority leader attempt to set some agenda for house?
How many signatures are required on a discharge pertition?
What non party affiliated voters are critical for party to attract in elections?
How do minority leaders keep party priorities publicized?
What items are discussed at party retreats?
How do minority leaders gauge party preferences?
What is the difference in role for Minority leader when majority party holds white house?
What was Gerald Ford's role as minority leader under Johnson administration?
What did Ford's alternatives provide for republican's?
What options do minority party have in amendment phase?
If minority party loses committ of the whole, then what motion may be filed?
If recommit fails, then what choice needs to be made by minority representatives?
What is a good technique to foster party harmony?
What colleagues are best to work with to reach a consensus?
What does the creation of leadership positions allow for?
Who is the chief vote counter for party?
Who holds the highest appointed Republican position in House?
Who is the leader of chief deputy whips in democratic conference?
How long has democratic leader of whips held position?
Where do Armenians mostly live besides Armenia?
How many Armenians live outside Armenia and the republic within it?
Where do most emigrant Armenians live?
Why did many Armenians leave Armenia?
What subgroup does Hamp put the Armenian language in?
Where does Hamp say the Pontic Indo-European languages originate?
What languages does Hamp say are similar to Armenian?
What was the first country to make Christianity its official religion?
What religion was Armenian paganism influenced by?
When did Armenia make Christianity its official religion?
Why did Armenia make Christianity its official religion?
Who invented the Armenian alphabet?
When did Armenia become a sovereign kingdom?
Under which ruler did Armenia become a sovereign kingdom?
What dynasty was Ashot I part of?
Who invaded Armenia in 1064?
What Turkic federations ruled Armenia?
When did the Russo-Persian War begin?
When did the Russo-Persian War end?
What treaty ended the Russo-Persian War?
When was the Peace of Amasya?
When did parts of Armenia under Iranian control become part of Russia?
Who says they didn't kill Armenians as genocide, just because they were 'in the way of the war'?
What has happened when other countries condemned Armenian genocide?
Who ruled Turkey when the Armenian genocide happened?
What was Armenia's status from 1918 to 1920?
When did communists take over Armenia?
Who invaded Armenia in 1920?
What part of the USSR did Armenia join?
When did Armenia leave the USSR?
What is the Armenian Quarter?
How many people live in the Armenian monastery in or near Italy?
When was the Italian Armenian monastery founded?
What religion is the Italian Armenian monastery?
Where is the Italian Armenian monastery?
When did Armenia's church become independent?
What is Armenia's church called?
What type of Catholicism is Armenia's church part of?
Where was the Armenian Catholicosate located at first?
Where did the Armenian Catholicosate move to?
What religion is dominant in the countries surrounding Armenia?
What are Hamshenis?
Who became Catholicos in Etchmiadzin in 1441?
Who remained Catholicos of Cilicia?
How do the two Catholicosates compare?
Which Armenian church recognizes the Pope?
What broke away from the Armenian Apostolic Church?
Which Armenian church is the most popular in Armenia?
What broke away from the Armenian Evangelical Church?
Who came up with the Armenian alphabet?
When did Armenian writing begin?
Who was the 'father of Armenian history'?
Who wrote 'The History of Armenia'?
Which European movement were the Revivalist authors similar to?
Who invaded Armenia in the 11th century?
What Armenian monasteries were built in the 11th century?
When was there an Armenian architecture revival?
What dynasty ruled Armenia in the 10th century?
What was ornately carved in the 9th-11th centuries?
When did Armenia begin winning Olympic medals?
Where were the 1952 Olympics held?
Which Armenian football team was the most successful?
Who won Armenia's first Olympic medal?
What pro team has FC Ararat beaten?
What kind of music does Sayat Nova play?
What instruments are used in Armenian folk music?
What kind of Armenian religious music is prevalent?
What did Mashtots do besides composing religious chants?
What was Aram Khatchaturian's career?
What type of music is Richard Hagopian famous for?
What instruments does 'kef' use?
What type of music does Sirusho perform?
What nationality is Charles Aznavour?
What US heavy metal band is comprised of Armenians?
What is Hakobyan's career?
What creatures are often depicted on Armenian carpets?
What are artsvagorgs?
What are vishapagorgs?
What are otsagorgs?
What is khorovats?
What is lavash?
What is paklava?
What is a kabob?
What is ghapama?
What are the Jehovah Witnesses?
What are the beliefs of Jehovah Witnesses distinct from?
How many adherents worldwide does the group claim?
Who is in charges of directing the Jehovah Witnesses?
Where are the group elders located?
What are Jehovah witnesses best known for?
What do Jehovah Witnesses refuse?
What do Jehovah Witnesses consider the name Jehovah vital for?
Why do Jehovah Witnesses reject inherent immortality of the soul, hellfire and Trinitarianism?
Why don't Jehovah Witnesses celebrate the usual holidays and customs?
When did Charles Taze Russell form a group?
Where did Russell and others form their group?
What was the purpose of Russell's group?
1914 would mark the end of a 2520 year period known as what?
When Russell met Nelson H. Barbour in 1876, they jointly produced what book?
When did Watch Tower supporters gather as autonomous congregations to study the Bible?
How many congregations were founded?
What did the congregations which continued to form during Russell's ministry remain?
When did Russell visit each of the congregations to provide the format he recommended to conduct their meetings?
Who presided over Zion's Watch Tower Tract Society in 1881?
When did Russell move the Society's headquarters to Brooklyn?
What did Russell combine at the headquarters?
What was the name of the residence where volunteers were housed?
When did Russell die?
How many people worldwide were associated with Russell's movement by 1910?
Who was elected as the Watch Tower Society's president in January of 1917?
When did Rutherford release The Finished Mystery?
What had Rutherford been before being elected the group's president?
Who did the Finished Mystery strongly criticize? 
What were Watch Tower Society directors jailed for?
Where as an international convention held in September of 1922?
What did Rutherford institute the appointment of in each congregation in 1919?
What was a new emphasis made on at the international convention?
What were all members instructed to report weekly to the Brooklyn headquarters?
How long was Rutherford's tenure as president of the Society?
Who was appointed as the third president of the Watch Tower Bible and Tract Society in 1942?
What did Knorr commission?
When was the full version of the New World Translation of the Holy Scriptures released?
What was Knorr's presidency marked by the increasing use of?
What was greater use of congregational judicial procedures used to enforce?
From 1966, what did Witness publications and conventions think would happen in late 1975?
How many baptisms were there in 1974?
How many active members were there in 1975?
Why did membership decline in the late 1970s?
What did the Watch Tower Society admit in 1980?
What is a requirement for being considered a member of Jehovah's Witnesses?
What aren't considered valid when performed by other denominations?
What do Witness publications say baptism symbolizes a person's personal dedication to?
Jehovah Witnesses' literature puts emphasis on the obedience to not only Jehovah but also to his what?
Individuals must remain Jehovah Witnesses if they wish to receive what from God?
What do Jehovah Witnesses believe their religion is a restoration of?
Who establishes the doctrines of the Jehovah Witnesses? 
Where does the Governing Body express its doctrinal position?
How does God reveal his will and purpose?
What is the Jehovah Witnesses' leadership said to provide?
What is considered the inspired, inerrant word of God?
What do Jehovah Witnesses consider the science and history within the Bible to be?
Whose pronouncements within Jehovah Witnesses group are considered to carry almost as much weight as the Bible?
What are members of Jehovah Witnesses cautioned against reading?
What is there no provision for members of the Jehovah Witnesses to do in relation to the official teachings?
Who do Jehovah Witnesses believe is God's only direct creation?
What was Jesus a ransom sacrifice to pay for?
What do Jehovah Witnesses believe Jesus died on rather than a traditional cross?
Jesus is considered to be the only what between God and humanity?
What biblical passage outlines Jesus' role as a mediator?
What do Jehovah Witnesses believe of God's kingdom?
Who rules with Jesus Christ in heaven according to Jehovah Witnesses?
What do the Jehovah Witnesses believe God will use the kingdom in heaven for?
What will the Earth be transformed into?
When do Jehovah Witnesses believe the kingdom of heaven was established?
One of Jehovah Witnesses' central teachings is that the world entered into its last days at what year?
What do Jehovah Witnesses consider all other present day religions to be?
Who do Jehovah Witnesses think is out to destroy them?
Who needs to attack Jehovah Witnesses for God to begin the war of Armageddon?
What will be the end result of God's kingdom?
How often did Jehovah Witnesses congregations meet prior to 2009?
What are Jehovah Witnesses' gatherings opened and closed with?
How are Jehovah Witnesses assigned to congregations?
What do Jehovah Witnesses refer to their weekly services as?
Where do Jehovah Witnesses meet for worship and study?
What are Jehovah Witnesses probably best known for by outsiders?
How many languages is the Watch Tower Society literature published in?
What is the objective of Jehovah Witnesses' door to door ministry?
When are Jehovah Witnesses advised to discontinue Bibles studies with students?
What are baptized members who fail to report a month of preaching termed as?
What is Jehovah Witnesses' view of divorce?
What is an acceptable grounds for divorce for a Jehovah Witness?
What do Jehovah Witnesses considered remarriage when the reason for divorce wasn't adultery?
Jehovah Witnesses will allow what in the event of extreme physical abuse or absolute endangerment of spirituality?
Why do Jehovah Witnesses believe the Bible condemns mixing of religions?
What are Jehovah Witnesses taught it's vital to remain?
What do Jehovah Witnesses believe is true of their religion and their religion alone?
What are Jehovah Witnesses taught association with worldly people presents to their faith?
What does Jehovah Witnesses define the "world" to mean?
Who is king of God's kingdom in heaven?
What do Jehovah Witnesses remain politically?
What are Jehovah Witnesses discouraged from doing?
Why do Jehovah Witnesses forego religious holidays and birthdays or other celebrations?
What do Jehovah Witnesses feel all the traditional holidays reflect?
What industries do Jehovah Witnesses avoid working in?
What may a Jehovah Witnesses' refusal to serve in the natural military service result in, in some countries?
What do Jehovah Witnesses see themselves as, which transcends national boundaries and ethnic loyalties?
What profession is Ronald Lawson?
What does Lawson suggest has contributed to the consistency of the sense of urgency in Jehovah Witnesses' apocalyptic message?
What biblical passage informs Jehovah Witnesses' refusal of blood transfusions?
What is grounds for expulsion from Jehovah Witnesses, since 1961?
What do Jehovah Witnesses accept in lieu of blood transfusions?
What does Jehovah Witnesses' literature provide about non-blood medical procedures?
What are Jehovah Witnesses allowed to accept at their discretion? 
What pre-formatted durable power of attorney documents are provided by the Watch Tower Society to prohibit?
What can Jehovah's Witnesses' members specify on the canned legal forms from the WTS?
What cooperative arrangement did Jehovah's Witnesses establish?
The Hospital Liaison Committees serve to bridge between hospitals, medical professionals and who?
Where do the officially published membership statistics come from?
Only about half all Jehovah's Witnesses are actually considered what in the faith itself?
What did a 2008 US Pew Forum on Religion & Public Life survey discover about Jehovah's Witnesses' retention rate?
Only about what percentage of the people raised in the religion continue to identify themselves as Jehovah's Witnesses?
What is the profession of James A. Beckford?
When did Beckford study the Jehovah's Witnesses?
What did Beckford classify the Jehovah's Witnesses organizational structure as being?
What is the conviction that Jehovah's Witness leaders dispense absolute truth?
What is the term for Jehovah's Witnesses' rejection of certain secular requirements and medical treatments?
Jehovah's Witnesses in the United States ranked highest in people whose education extended no further than what?
Compared to other religions, Jehovah's Witnesses have the highest frequency of doing what with the Bible outside of religious services?
What religion ranks highest in frequency of religious attendance? 
Statistically, what is a Jehovah's Witnesses likely not to care about at all?
What do few Jehovah's Witnesses earn?
What has at times led to immense violence against Jehovah's Witnesses?
Why have Jehovah's Witnesses sometimes been imprisoned?
Of the 20,000 Jehovah's Witnesses in Germany in 1933, how many were later imprisoned?
What were Jehovah's Witnesses identified by in Nazi concentration camps?
What countries ban the religious activities of Jehovah's Witnesses?
What did Jehovah's Witnesses persistent legal challenges result in, in the United States?
What is religious conduct protected from the interference of?
What right to abstain from do Jehovah's Witnesses exercise?
What do patients have the right to refuse?
Where have cases in the Jehovah's Witnesses favor been heard outside of the U.S.?
Who establishes the doctrines of the Jehovah's Witnesses?
What do the Jehovah's Witnesses religion not tolerate any of?
What happens to members who disagree with the religion's teachings?
Why should the counsel received from the Governing Body be trusted?
Who do Jehovah's Witnesses believe introduced independent thinking?
What do former Jehovah's Witnesses members Heath and Gary Botting compare the culture of the religion to?
Who describes the Jehovah's Witnesses' leadership as being totalitarian? 
How do the leaders of the Jehovah's Witnesses cultivate a system of unquestioning obedience?
What do critics of the Jehovah's Witnesses accuse the religion's leaders of exercising over members?
What did former Governing Body member Raymond Franz argue the methods employed by the religion were all elements of?
What profession did Rodney Stark grow up to become?
What statement does Stark make about the leaders of the Jehovah's Witnesses?
How do Jehovah's Witnesses see themselves in regards to the power structure of the church?
Another Sociologist, Andrew Holden, feels anyone who joins a movement such as the Jehovah's Witnesses has made a what?
Holden acknowledges that defectors are seldom allowed a what from the church?
Who do Watch Tower Society publications claim God has used?
What have various Jehovah's Witnesses' publications made predictions about?
What does God use Jehovah's Witnesses for?
What has God provided to Jehovah's Witnesses?
What had some of the failed predictions of Jehovah's Witnesses been presented as?
What has the Jehovah's Witnesses failure to report to authorities been criticized? 
Of the 1006 alleged perpetrators of child sexual abuse identified by Jehovah's Witnesses within their organization since 1950, how many were reported to secular authorities?
Why are the Jehovah's Witnesses reluctant to alert authorities to abuse?
What have courts in both the UK and the US found the Watch Tower Society to have been for failing to protect children from sexual predators within the congregation?
How much has the Society reportedly paid to settle lawsuits without admitting any wrongdoing?
Along with reducing the federal deficit, what was Eisenhower's main policy priority as president?
What did Eisenhower threaten to use to end the Korean War?
Along with Guatemala, what country's government did Eisenhower order overthrown?
What country did Eisenhower neglect to assist in their military action in Vietnam?
In what year was the Formosa Resolution passed?
Why political movement was named for Joseph McCarthy?
What political theory did Eisenhower use to oppose McCarthy?
Who served as Eisenhower's vice president?
What sort of conservative was Eisenhower?
What does DARPA stand for?
What book did Eisenhower's parents read every day?
What Mennonite sect did Eisenhower's mother initially belong to?
What is another name for the International Bible Students Association?
What university did Eisenhower attend?
What church did Eisenhower join in 1953?
In what year did Eisenhower graduate from high school?
What high school did Eisenhower go to?
What was the name of Eisenhower's brother?
In what year of high school did Eisenhower suffer a groin infection?
What high school year did Eisenhower have to repeat?
What was Eisenhower's job title during the first year his brother went to college?
Where did Eisenhower work during his brother's first year of college?
Who was Eisenhower's senator?
Why couldn't Eisenhower attend Annapolis?
In what year did Eisenhower matriculate to West Point?
What sport did Eisenhower notably enjoy?
What color were Eisenhower's winter golf balls?
Who was the Chairman of Augusta National and friend to Eisenhower?
What was Clifford Roberts by profession?
When did Eisenhower join Augusta National?
What was Eisenhower's favorite hobby other than golfing?
What car did Eisenhower compare modern art to?
What was the main type of oil painting painted by Eisenhower?
Who notably painted a picture of Mamie Eisenhower?
Who called Eisenhower's art "simple and earnest"?
What was Eisenhower's favorite film?
Who was Eisenhower's favorite author?
What genre did Zane Grey write in?
Where did Eisenhower learn to play poker?
At West Point, what game did Eisenhower play six nights a week for five months?
How long before Eisenhower was to be transferred to France did World War I end?
What decoration did Eisenhower receive as a result of his First World War service?
What notable Second World War commander disparaged Eisenhower for his lack of combat experience?
What was Eisenhower's Camp Meade unit equipped with?
When did Eisenhower leave Camp Meade?
Along with Patton, who was a notable interwar tank leader?
What was the traditional doctrine on the use of tanks?
What happened when Eisenhower was threatened with a court martial for his support for offensive tank tactics?
Who was the head of the American Battle Monuments Commission during this period?
During the 1920s, for what federal department did Milton Eisenhower work?
In what year did Eisenhower graduate from the Army War College?
What was the office held by George Mosely?
What was Eisenhower's rank in 1933?
What event made war planning difficult in this period?
What position was held by General MacArthur at this point in time?
What encampment was attacked in 1932 by soldiers including Eisenhower?
What sort of people did the Bonus March consist of?
What rank was Eisenhower promoted to in 1936?
Who was president of the Philippines circa 1939?
What is the current name of the capital city that was under construction in the Philippines in 1939?
What license did Eisenhower receive in 1939?
How did Eisenhower respond to the offer to become a Philippine police chief?
What unit did Eisenhower serve with upon his return to the United States?
At what military installation was the 15th Infantry based?
In the spring of 1941, who commanded IX Corps?
In what city was the 3rd Army based in June of 1941?
What event contributed to Eisenhower receiving a promotion to brigadier general?
To what body was Eisenhower assigned after Pearl Harbor was attacked?
Who headed the WPD before Eisenhower?
What body replaced the War Plans Division?
What was Eisenhower's title in the Operations Division?
Who was the Chief of Staff who promoted Eisenhower?
As of May 1942, who commanded the Army Air Forces?
To what city did Eisenhower travel to May 1942?
What appointment did Eisenhower receive on June 23, 1942?
Who commanded the English theater in May 1942?
To what rank was Eisenhower promoted on July 7, 1942?
What appointment did Eisenhower receive in November of 1942?
What was the code name of the North African campaign?
At what location was the North African campaign planned?
How many years before Eisenhower's command had a non-Briton commanded Gibraltar?
What was Rommel's rank?
Who commanded II Corps before being removed by Eisenhower?
Who commanded the UK's Eighth Army?
When did Eisenhower receive authority over the British Eighth Army?
What did Eisenhower command after he commanded ETOUSA?
What unit did Montgomery command?
What general commanded the 12th US Army Group?
What geographic portion of the front did the Sixth US Army Group operate on?
Who was the Sixth US Army Group's commander?
What supply port was opened late in 1944?
What European rank was equivalent to that of General of the Army?
On what date did Eisenhower receive his General of the Army appointment?
Along with Montgomery, with whom did Eisenhower disagree on strategy?
What Soviet military leader was a counterpart of Eisenhower?
What rank was held by de Gaulle?
When did the Battle of the Bulge begin?
What German city did the British wish to conquer?
Along with Roosevelt and Churchill, what political leader decided upon the division of Germany?
What nation's military conquered Berlin?
What date saw the surrender of Nazi Germany?
What was Eisenhower's title after Germany's surrender?
In what structure was Eisenhower's headquarters in the US Occupation Zone?
In what city was the headquarters of the US Occupation Zone located?
Aside from the US, what other countries had occupation zones in Germany?
What agreement was not applicable to Disarmed Enemy Forces?
When was it suggested to Eisenhower that he might one day become president?
Along with dogcatcher, what political job did Eisenhower specifically not want to be considered for?
What role did Eisenhower believe he could not fulfill if he was believed to want to become involved in politics?
What general was considered a potential Republican presidential candidate in 1948?
At what meeting did Truman tell Eisenhower that he would assist him in running for president?
What state's delegates were considering supporting Eisenhower in 1948?
How old would Eisenhower be in 1956?
Why was it unlikely that Eisenhower would run for president in 1956?
Who was it assumed would win the election of 1948?
What position did Eisenhower occupy in 1948?
Where is Columbia University located?
What was the title of Eisenhower's memoir?
What group of schools did Columbia University belong to?
What body ruled the Eisenhower was not a professional writer?
While Eisenhower was president of Columbia, what group did he also work with?
What was Blanche Wiesen Cook in relation to Eisenhower?
Along with business and government, what leaders did Eisenhower see meeting at the Council on Foreign Relations?
What sort of analysis did Eisenhower first experience with the Council on Foreign Relations?
What position was held by James Forrestal?
What position did Eisenhower informally hold?
After becoming sick, where did Eisenhower recover?
What was the name of Columbia University's alumni association?
When did Eisenhower vacation for two months outside New York?
Aside from his university work, where did Eisenhower gain useful contacts?
What Continental Oil leader was Eisenhower tied to?
What was the political orientation of Columbia's teachers?
What state was Frank Abrams' oil company located in?
From where did H.J. Porter hale?
When was Eisenhower's resignation of Columbia turned down?
What role did Eisenhower fill after leaving Columbia?
On what date did Eisenhower leave active duty in the military?
What job did Eisenhower hold after his second tenure as president of Columbia?
When did Eisenhower become President of the United States?
In what part of the country, previously neglected by Republican presidential candidates, did Eisenhower campaign?
Along with Korea and Communism, what issue did Eisenhower attack Truman on?
What was the strategy called that was used by Eisenhower's campaign?
How did Eisenhower claim Eastern Europe should be liberated?
What was the home state of Joseph McCarthy?
Where did Eisenhower claim he would end the war?
During the campaign, from where was it claimed Nixon had received money improperly?
What topic did Eisenhower not discuss during the campaign?
In what century was Eisenhower born?
Who was the oldest man to become President prior to Eisenhower?
What did Eisenhower have in common with presidents Taylor, Grant, Taft and Hoover?
How many times had Eisenhower been elected to office prior to becoming president?
How old was Truman in 1948?
Who was Eisenhower's budget director?
Along with Lucius Clay, who advised Eisenhower on cabinet appointments?
What woman was a member of Eisenhower's cabinet?
Along with George Humphrey, what cabinet official did Eisenhower have a close relationship with?
What quip was used to describe Eisenhower's cabinet?
What war did Eisenhower want to end as president?
What type of cabinet meeting did Eisenhower hold for the first time ever?
Policy in regard to what country was discussed at Eisenhower's first cabinet meeting?
What type of policy was the focus of Eisenhower's inaugural address?
How did Eisenhower describe his political views?
How many people were added to the Social Security rolls by Eisenhower?
What New deal program did Eisenhower particularly support?
What cabinet agency did Eisenhower make Social Security a part of?
What policy in regard to the military did Eisenhower see to completion?
What wing of the GOP was Eisenhower opposed to?
In what year were the first federal elections after Eisenhower became president?
What type of Republican did Eisenhower characterize himself as?
Prior to the 1954 elections, who had majorities in Congress?
Upon election, how many terms did Eisenhower believe he would serve?
In what year did Eisenhower have a heart attack?
When did Eisenhower make an announcement stating that he would run for a second term?
Who did Eisenhower want as his 1956 running mate?
Who did Eisenhower defeat in the 1956 presidential election?
What event led Eisenhower to want to improve highways in the US?
What German transportation project influenced Eisenhower on highways?
When did Eisenhower sign the law to create the Interstate Highway System?
Along with military benefits, what did Eisenhower see as the benefit of the highway project?
Why did Congress hold up the highway bill?
What agreements did the GOP Old Guard want Eisenhower to abandon?
Why did the Old Guard say Eisenhower should void the Yalta Agreements?
What world leader died in March of 1953?
What speech did Eisenhower give after Stalin died?
Who called the Chance for Peace speech the best one Eisenhower gave as president?
What did Eisenhower reduce as he increased nuclear weapons stockpiles?
What was the policy of increasing nuclear weapons while decreasing conventional forces called?
When did Eisenhower begin to cut the defense budget?
Along with NSC 162/2, what influenced the development of the New Look policy?
Why did nuclear arms negotiations with Russia fail prior to 1955?
In what city did the US and Russia conduct nuclear talks in 1955?
Who refused to permit nuclear weapons inspections in the wake of the 1955 talks?
In May of 1955, a treaty was signed giving independence to what country?
What was the plan Eisenhower presented at the Geneva Conference called?
What country did Eisenhower believe communists would conquer if they took over Guatemala?
The domino theory was applied to Central America and what other region?
In what year was Eisenhower's EDC rejected?
What country was made a full partner in NATO as the result of the failure of EDC?
According to Eisenhower, all of Southeast Asia would become communist if the communist insurgency won in what country?
What make and model aircraft was Air Force Flight 8610?
What aircraft had an incident with Air Force Flight 8610?
What call sign does an Air Force aircraft have when a president is traveling on it?
What was the name of the Lockheed C-121 Constellation that carried Eisenhower?
In what year was Eisenhower involved in an incident while flying?
What caused Eisenhower to kickstart the US space program?
What was the legal status of the U-2 flyovers?
Along with the U-2 flyovers, what did Eisenhower try to legitimize with the Open Skies Policy?
What was the name of the civilian space agency created by Eisenhower?
With whom did Eisenhower try to improve relations?
Where did the Chinese begin to increase forces after Eisenhower entered the White House?
What did Eisenhower threaten to do if there was no armistice in Korea?
Along with the Joint Chiefs and SAC, what body was involved with formulating plans for nuclear war with China?
What event led to decreased Russian support for China?
What was SAC an abbreviation of?
The boundary line of what year formed the 1953 armistice line?
In what month in 1953 did the armistice come into being?
Who was the President of South Korea at the time of the armistice?
What American official notably opposed the armistice?
Who described the armistice as Eisenhower's greatest presidential accomplishment?
Along with the British and Israelis, what forces invaded Egypt in 1956?
What was the combined Israeli-British-French invasion in response to?
Who was the leader of Egypt at the time of the Suez Crisis?
Who invaded Hungary in 1956?
What year saw the publication of Eisenhower's memoirs?
What war was being fought by France in 1953?
What was John W. O'Daniel's nickname?
Who convinced Eisenhower not to intervene in Vietnam?
Who was providing supplies to the Vietnamese communists fighting against France?
How large of a military deployment did Ridgway say would be necessary in Vietnam?
What is SEATO?
Along with the United States, the United Kingdom and France, who formed SEATO?
What was the purpose of SEATO?
What group did France split Vietnam with?
Who met in peace talks with France at Geneva?
What was South Vietnam called in 1955?
Who was the first ambassador to South Vietnam?
When did Eisenhower first send military advisers to South Vietnam?
Who was the leader of South Vietnam in 1954?
Along with Free Vietnam, what was another term for South Vietnam?
How many days did the President of South Vietnam visit the US for in 1957?
Where was a parade held for the President of South Vietnam?
How many soldiers did Eisenhower ultimately send to Vietnam?
Who was Secretary of State in 1957?
According to Dulles, why was Diem made president of Vietnam?
What did the Eisenhower administration refer to the downed U-2 as?
Where did the Eisenhower administration say that the downed U-2 was intended to be flying?
According to the cover story, what did the "weather research" pilot have trouble with?
What happened to Powers in the Soviet Union?
What did Khrushchev refer to the U-2 as?
Along with Eisenhower, Macmillan and de Gaulle, what leader attended the Four Powers Paris Summit?
What did Khrushchev demand that Eisenhower do?
Along with reducing nuclear weapons, what was to have been the topic of conversation at the Four Power Paris Summit?
What did Eisenhower blame for ruining the summit?
In what year was the Four Power Paris Summit intended to take place?
Which president initially began to desegregate the US military?
When did the desegregation of the United States Armed Forces begin?
When did Eisenhower deliver his first State of the Union?
What control did Eisenhower use to push through desegregation?
In what geographical area did Eisenhower promise to end desegregation in his State of the Union address?
Who did Eisenhower tell DC officials to integrate?
What was the first civil rights act proposed to Congress by Eisenhower?
In what year did Eisenhower propose his second civil rights act?
What sort of commission did the Civil Rights Act of 1957 establish?
Under the Civil Rights Act of 1957, what federal department contained a civil rights office?
What state refused to integrate its schools in 1957?
What military unit was sent from outside of Arkansas to oversee desegregation?
What Arkansas militia unit did Eisenhower federalize in 1957?
Who was the governor of Arkansas in 1957?
How many black students were escorted by the 101st Airborne to Little Rock Central High School?
In what year did Joseph McCarthy declare that the federal government was employing communists?
What did Eisenhower do when he was encouraged to respond to McCarthy's accusations?
Why did Eisenhower ignore McCarthy?
What organization did Eisenhower want to keep from being one of McCarthy's targets?
What was the AEC working on at this time?
What AEC scientists counseled delaying the development of the hydrogen bomb?
What did Eisenhower do to Oppenheimer after he said that the hydrogen bomb should be delayed?
What did McCarthy threaten to do in May of 1955?
What tradition was fostered by Eisenhower's reaction to McCarthy's subpoena threats?
Eisenhower denied McCarthy access to the personnel of what branch of the federal government?
Who won a Senate majority in 1954?
After the 1954 election, who was the Speaker of the House?
Who was made Senate Majority Leader after the 1954 election?
What state were Johnson and Rayburn from?
Who was Speaker of the House between 1953 and 1955?
What did Martin think Eisenhower did too much of in his relations with Congress?
As a result of Eisenhower's actions toward Congress, what did Martin think Congress often gave him?
Who did Martin think Eisenhower should have made better use of?
What were Harlan and Stewart's party affiliations?
What party did Brennan belong to?
Who did Eisenhower nominate for Chief Justice?
What sort of decisions did Warren favor on the Supreme Court?
Along with liberals, who was Eisenhower trying to appeal to with the Warren pick?
Where did Eisenhower pick up the habit of smoking?
How many cigarettes did Eisenhower smoke daily at West Point?
When did Eisenhower stop smoking completely?
Who was Eisenhower's employer when he gave up smoking?
Who was the cardiologist who treated Eisenhower after his heart attack?
What caused Eisenhower's stroke of 1957?
Where was Eisenhower when he suffered a stroke in 1957?
What couldn't Eisenhower move as a result of his stroke?
What is Crohn's disease?
Why did Eisenhower need surgery on June 9, 1956?
What August 1965 event caused Eisenhower to drop out of public life?
For what ailment did Eisenhower receive surgery in 1966?
What did Eisenhower have removed via surgery on December 12, 1966?
In what year did Eisenhower die?
How many heart attacks did Eisenhower have between 1955 and 1969?
Who did Eisenhower endorse for president in 1960?
Who was the Democratic candidate for president in 1960?
How old was Eisenhower in 1960?
Who was the youngest person elected to the United States presidency?
Who won the US presidential election of 1960?
What town did Eisenhower retire to after his presidency?
What Pennsylvania county did Eisenhower grow up in?
Who did Eisenhower donate his farm to in 1967?
What did Barry Goldwater call Eisenhower?
Who was the Republican presidential candidate in 1964?
How old was Eisenhower when he died?
At what facility did Eisenhower die?
What was Eisenhower's cause of death?
What was Eisenhower's date of death?
What Christian denomination did Eisenhower belong to?
When did Eisenhower's funeral train arrive in Abilene, Kansas?
What was the cost of Eisenhower's casket?
At what location was Eisenhower buried?
What color jacket was Eisenhower buried in?
When did Mamie Eisenhower die?
In popular memory, what sport was Eisenhower known for playing?
What did critics feel that Eisenhower should have opposed in public?
Where was Central High school located?
How did critics characterize Kennedy in comparison to Eisenhower?
What nation was considered the leader in the nuclear arms race?
How many appreciation medals were minted?
In what city were the appreciation medals minted?
During what period were the appreciation medals minted?
What were Eisenhower's initials?
How many appreciation medals were destroyed by the Bureau of the Mint?
What is the formal name of the Interstate Highway System?
Along with Germany and Switzerland, what country contained an autobahn during the Second World War?
What is another name for Eisenhower Expressway?
When were "Eisenhower Interstate System" signs first posted along highways?
What major city is Interstate 290 close to?
At what Augusta hole was the Eisenhower Pine located?
How many meters away from the Masters tee on Augusta's 17th was the Eisenhower Pine?
What did Eisenhower want to be done to the Eisenhower Pine?
What damaged the Eisenhower Pine in February 2014?
In what year did Eisenhower propose that the pine tree named after him be removed?
Who is the Bronx named for?
What did Bronck do?
When did Bronck settle in the New York area?
What native tribe lived in the New York area?
What types of music the Bronx famous for?
How poor is part of the Bronx?
What neighborhoods of the Bronx are more affluent?
When did the South Bronx lose quality of life?
What crime problem happened in the Bronx in the 70s?
What is the Bronx's county name?
What is the Bronx's borough name?
When was the Bronx created?
When was the Bronx added to?
What county was the Bronx split off from?
When did farmers build a bridge over the Harlem River?
Why did farmers build a bridge over the Harlem River?
What strategic advantage did the Bronx's location have?
When was Kingsbridge built?
Who owned Kingsbridge?
How many counties did New York originally have?
Parts of which towns became part of the Bronx?
When was West Farms created?
When was Morrisania created?
When was the town of Kingsbridge created?
When did New York City annex Kingsbridge?
When did New York City annex West Farms?
When did New York City annex Morrisania?
When did New York City annex part of Pelham?
When did New York City annex part of Eastchester?
How many Jews lived in the Bronx in 1937?
How many Jews lived in the Bronx in 2011?
What led to the Bronx's population growth?
What immigrant groups were the most prevalent in the Bronx?
How much of the Bronx was Jewish in 1937?
What crime was common in the Bronx in the 1970s?
Why did some landlords burn their own buildings?
Where were poverty and unemployment the worst in the Bronx?
What city plan helped redevelop the Bronx?
How many units are in the Nehemiah Homes?
Who built the Nehemiah Homes?
Who led the Melrose Commons project?
How many bank branches were in the Bronx by 2007?
What award did the Bronx receive in 1997?
Who gave the Bronx an award in 1997?
How were window decals used in the Bronx in the 1980s?
How many housing units were built in the Bronx in 2002-2007?
How much was invested in housing in the Bronx in 2002-2007?
What's on the other side of the Hudson from the Bronx?
What county is Tenafly in?
What state is Alpine in?
What's on the other side of the Harlem River from the Bronx?
What's on the other side of the East River from the Bronx?
Where is the Bronx's highest point?
What part of the Bronx formerly a salt marsh?
What are the Bronx's four low peninsulas?
What is Rodman's Neck between?
How long is the Bronx's shoreline?
What is Screvin's Neck also called?
In what river does the Bronx have 4 peninsulas?
What is NYC's largest park?
Where is Pelham Bay Park?
What parts of the Bronx have more hills?
What parts of West Bronx are more affluent?
What is NYC's 4th-largest park?
Where is Van Cortlandt Park?
What is the Grand Concourse?
Why has the supposed size of the 'South Bronx' grown?
When was Fordham Road being used as the limit of the South Bronx area?
Which river is the eastern edge of the South Bronx?
Which stadium is in the South Bronx?
Which direction does the Cross Bronx Expressway run through the South Bronx?
How much land was the Gateway Center at Bronx Terminal Market built on?
How much did the Gateway Center at Bronx Terminal Market cost?
How many floors does the Gateway Center at Bronx Terminal Market's parking garage have?
How many cars can the Gateway Center at Bronx Terminal Market's parking garage hold?
What part of Manhattan are the West Bronx's streets similar to?
What is the lowest street number seen in the Bronx?
What was the Bronx called in the mid-19th century?
When was the Bronx added to NYC?
How much of the Bronx's population is Hispanic?
How much of the Bronx's population is non-Hispanic White?
How much of the Bronx's population is non-Hispanic Black?
How much of the Bronx's population is non-Hispanic Asian?
How much of the Bronx's population is non-Hispanic multiracial?
How much of the Bronx speaks Spanish at home?
How much of the Bronx speaks English at home?
How much of the Bronx speaks African languages at home?
How much of the Bronx speaks French at home?
How much of the Bronx speaks Chinese at home?
How much of the Bronx is white (including Hispanic) as of 2009?
How much of the Bronx was non-Hispanic white as of 1980?
How much of the Bronx was non-Hispanic white as of 2009?
How many white people live in the Bronx?
How many non-Hispanic white people live in the Bronx?
How much of the Bronx's population is black (including Hispanic)?
How much of the Bronx's population is black (not including Hispanic)?
How many Bronx residents called themselves "Sub-Saharan African" in 2009?
What percent of Bronx residents called themselves "Sub-Saharan African" in 2009?
How many people in the Bronx are black (not including Hispanic)?
What percent of the Bronx is Hispanic and Latino Americans?
What percent of the Bronx is Puerto Rican?
What percent of the Bronx is Mexican?
What percent of the Bronx is Cuban?
What percent of the Bronx is Asian?
How many multiracial people live in the Bronx?
What percent of the Bronx has mixed Caucasian and African American heritage?
What percent of the Bronx is multiracial?
What percent of the Bronx has mixed Caucasian and Asian heritage?
What percent of the Bronx has mixed Caucasian and Native American heritage?
When was the 'one man, one vote' decision?
Which amendment contains the Equal Protection Clause?
When were Borough Presidents created?
When was the Board of Estimate found unconstitutional?
Why was the Board of Estimate found unconstitutional?
In the 2008 primary, how much of the Bronx vote did Clinton get?
In the 2008 primary, how much of the Bronx vote did Obama get?
In the 2008 primary, how much of the Bronx vote did McCain get?
In the 2008 primary, how much of the Bronx vote did Huckabee get?
In the 2008 primary, how much of the Bronx vote did Romney get?
Who did the Bronx support for President in 1928?
How much of the Bronx's vote in 1916 did Hughes get?
How much of the Bronx's vote in 1916 did Wilson get?
How much of the Bronx's vote in 1916 did Benson get?
How much of the Bronx's vote in 1948 did Truman get?
Who was the only Republican Mayor candidate to win the Bronx since 1914?
Who did the Bronx vote against for mayor in 1997?
Who did the Bronx vote against for mayor in 2005?
What party was Hillquit?
How much of the Bronx vote did Hillquit get in 1917?
What percent of the Bronx population has a high school diploma, as of 2000?
What percent of the Bronx population has a university degree, as of 2000?
What percent of the Brooklyn population has a high school diploma, as of 2000?
What percent of the Staten Island population has a high school diploma, as of 2000?
What percent of the Manhattan population has a university degree, as of 2000?
Which of NYC's prestigious nonreligious private schools are in the Bronx?
Where is the Validus Prepatory Academy?
Where is the High School for Violin and Dance?
Where is the School for Excellence?
Where is the DeWitt Clinton High School?
When did NYC begin splitting up the large Bronx high schools?
Which Bronx schools have been closed or made smaller?
What type of schools is NYC now working on shrinking?
When did a PBS documentary air about the Bronx's music history?
What PBS documentary covered the Bronx's music history?
Where did DJ Kool Herc hold parties?
Who produced 'From Mambo To Hip Hop'?
Where is 1520 Sedgwick?
Who were the Herculoids?
What is 'The Boogie Down'?
Where is Big Pun from?
What types of music did hip hop emerge from?
Who started BDP?
When did the first Yankee Stadium open?
Where was the first Yankee Stadium?
How many times have the Yankees won the World Series?
Which historic great players have played at Yankee Stadium?
What league are the NY Yankees in?
Where are many of the Bronx's playwrights from?
How many seats does the Pregones' new theater have?
What does the Pregones specialize in?
When did the Pregones' new theater open?
Where is the Pregones' new theater?
What types of art does the Bronx Museum of the Arts focus on?
How large are the Bronx Museum of the Arts' galleries?
When did the Bronx Museum of the Arts open?
How many works are in the Bronx Museum of the Arts' permanent collection?
Who designed the Bronx Museum of the Arts' 2006 expansion?
Who designed the City Island Historical Society and Nautical Museum's building?
Where is the NY Maritime College?
What was the City Island Historical Society and Nautical Museum's building originally?
What is 'Scullers' Row'?
Which river is near the New York Botanical Gardens?
What does the Inner City Press now focus on?
Who is the Riverdale Press's editor?
Why did Stein win a Pulitzer?
When did Stein win a Pulitzer?
Where did Stein graduate from?
What channel in the Bronx does Cablevision run?
Where is the official city TV station broadcast from?
What is the Bronx's only 4-year CUNY college?
When was 'From This Day Forward' released?
Where was 'From This Day Forward' set?
When was 'The Catered Affair' released?
What did 'The Catered Affair' explore?
What was 'Summer of Sam' about?
Where was arson a big problem in the Bronx?
When was the phrase "The Bronx is burning" first widespread?
Who made a documentary called "The Bronx is burning"?
Who published an editorial called "The Bronx is burning"?
Who made a film called 'Bronx Burning'?
When was 'The Warriors' movie released?
When was 'The Wanderers' published?
When was 'A Bronx Tale' released?
When was 'The Wanderers' movie released?
When was 'The Wanderers' published?
When was 'The Wanderers' movie released?
When was 'The Warriors' movie released?
When was 'A Bronx Tale' released?
When was 'Fort Apache' released?
When was 'Fuga dal Bronx' released?
What origin was 'Escape 2000'?
When did "Awakenings" come out?
Whose real story is 'Awakenings' based on?
What is Sacks' career?
When was 'A Kind of Alaska' performed?
Who wrote 'A Kind of Alaska'?
When was 'City Boy: The Adventures of Herbie Bookbinder' published?
How much of 'City Boy: The Adventures of Herbie Bookbinder' is set in the Bronx?
Who wrote 'City Boy: The Adventures of Herbie Bookbinder'?
When was 'The Grand Concourse' published?
Who wrote 'The Grand Concourse'?
Who wrote 'Bonfire of the Vanities'?
When was 'Bonfire of the Vanities' published?
Who was the main character of 'Bonfire of the Vanities'?
What race was Sherman McCoy?
Where did McCoy get lost?
What can be seen as of essential importance to a practiced of humanism?
What is a common tenant of humanism?
 What can be credited for the changes in the definition of humanism? 
These days humanism could be viewed as a form of what?
Instead of turning to a spiritual or divine source practicers of humanism turn to what?
 At the time of the French Revolution what previous focus of humanism was removed?
Protestantism differs from Humanism in its focus is on what?
What do current tenants humanism have their origins in?
What was a name for humanism believers who emerged in the late 19th and early 20th centuries?
 In what year did the term humanism gain yet another layer of meaning?
Who can be credited with assisting the word humanism with finding a home in the English language?
Who was responsible for yet another definition of the philosophy in 1856?
What nation was highly receptive to the new definition of this concept?
What was the main difference between humanism and the religions of the time?
What well known socialist adopted the usage of this term in Germany?
Who did benevolent believers in humanism turn to for ideas about the philosophy?
Where did the learned believers place their focus?
Who was known as being a founder of humanism thought in China?
What early adopter and developer of is associated with Confucianism?
What early adopter and developer of is associated with Confucianism?
Who is known for the thought that humanity is the most important thing in the world?
When were humanism beliefs mixed with another philosophy by a Taoist thinker?
What is an example of Humanism based philosophy that focused on ethics?
Who can be credited with saying essentially humans are the gods of gods?
Where could you read this information?
Who was one of the first Greeks to adopt a humanistic outlook?
Where did this type of thinking next travel to?
Who first introduced the idea that matter is made of atoms?
Who was the first person to provide education opportunities to females?
How were humanist able to identify the development of humanist thought?
What was included in this quest for knowledge of the belief system?
If your were unsure of the authenticity of an ancient text how could you verify it?
What caused a large migration of Greek refuges in the 1450s?
What caused a large migration of Greek refuges in the 1450s?
 What author had a great impact in Rome?
Who was able to spread the idea of equality among all through his words?
From where did this school of thought emerge?
Who again issued the same type of challenge centuries later
What was the name of the main belief Terence offered
Who felt that looking to these ancient documents for new ideas was not the way to mover forward?
 Closer examination of what information allowed for further progress in scientific knowledge?
What group was neutral about this issue as they felt the subject unimportant? 
 When did even the scholars and professors began to at least end to examine the works of Aristotle?
Who wotked with Carl Rogers on humanistic phycology?
What is human phycology?
In what century did humanistic phycology rise in prominence?
They introduced it in response to what?
What groups thoughts did he seek to include?
Who became responsible in part for the editing of The New Humanist?
How many cornerstones of this new way of thinking or religion were presented>
What was the name of the material that was produced from this groups and the opinions of others?
What is contemporary humanism optimistic about?
What is the main goal of humanism optimistic?
What is human flourishing?
What doesnt conetemporary humanism  believe about human nature?
The initial state of earth was what?
What formed on the outside of the earth after it cooled?
How does the mass of the moon compare to earth?
What created a primordial atmosphere on earth?
Ice from what source helped to create earths oceans?
Powerful volcanism contributed to cause early earth to be in what state?
What occurred in the atmosphere of the earth after the crust was formed?
What size of object may have created the moon?
When water was creating the oceans what was happening to atmospheric water vapor?
During what time period was the Archean era?
During what period did the earths crust cooling allow the creation of plates?
It is believed that a very warm earth would lead to more recycling of what?
What might have a very hot earth stopped from occurring?
What do some believe accounts for the small amount of Archean rocks?
What are Archean rocks composed of, in general?
What type of formation is indicated by low and high grade metamorphic rocks?
From where did high grade Archean rocks originate?
Low grade metamorphic rocks are composed of what, generally?
What is a greenstone belt?
During what period was the Paleozoic era?
How many periods of geology are within the Paleozoic era?
The Permian is an example of what?
After what continental event did the Paleozoic begin?
What continent was formed at the end of the Paleozoic?
What type of climate was normal in the Ordovician period?
What ice age signaled the end of the normal climate in the Ordovician period?
Oxygen from what kind of fossil were used to date the Hirnantian faunal stage?
How many years is the Hirnantian faunal stage believed to have lasted?
What started to develop on Gondwana as it moved over the south pole?
During what time period was the Devonian era?
Which continent was formed from the meeting of Laurentia and Baltica?
Which sedimentary beds were created in the dry areas of Euramerica in the Devonian period?
What was the largest ocean referred to that existed in the Devonian period?
Which mountains associated with the USA were formed near the equator on  Pangaea during the Devonian?
What occurred to the level of the sea when the Devonian period was finished?
During which period were epicontinental seas created?
What was on the land at 30 degrees latitude north in the carboniferous period?
What was the result in the decline in sea level in the middle of the Carboniferous period?
The Pennsylvania period is separated by the drop in Carboniferous era sea levels from what other period?
What geologic events took place when Pangea combined during the Carboniferous?
What was the continent that came to be North America and Europe called during the Carboniferous?
What was the effect of Laurussia impacting Gondwana in North America?
The mountains forming to the southwest of the Appalachians in the Carboniferous are known as what?
Which two large oceans existed during the Carboniferous period?
What supercontinent prevailed during the Permian era?
What was the largest ocean during the Permian called?
There was an ocean between Gondwana and Asia in the Permian, what was it?
The moving of which continent contributed to the decrease in size of the Paleo-Tethys?
During which period was the Tehtys Ocean dominant?
The current continents were formerly known as what continent?
Which oregenies followed the Nevadan in the Cretaceous?
South America was formerly which continent?
The rifting in the Cretaceous had what result on the oceans?
Antarctica was a part of what supercontinent?
How many continents did Laurasia break into?
In the Paleocene period Greenland was joined to which continent?
What mountain chain in the Cretaceous was lifted as a result of the Laramide oregeny?
In which period did North and South america join?
Which ocean was closed when Africa moved northward during the Paleocene?
During what years did the Eocene period take place?
Australia was connected to which other continent at the start of the Eocene?
How long ago did Antarctica and Australia split?
Around how many years ago is the current ice age pattern believed to have begun?
The mixing of equatorial currents with Antarctic waters in the Eocene resulted in what?
during which period did mountains form in the western part of North America?
In the Eocene, in Europe, which sea ceased to be?
The Mediterranean sea is a remaining part of which sea from the Eocene?
What began to form in the flat basins in North America during the Eocene?
Which oregeny was created when India collided with Asia?
What permanent structure formed on Antarctica?
The lift of which mountain range in Europe was the result of the African plate moving north into the Eurasian?
During what period was there a land bridge joining Europe and North America?
In the Oligocene period South America broke free from what other continent?
Which current resulted in the cooling of Antarctica?
The formation of which mountain range was the result of of what zone along the Pacific Ocean side of South America?
Which continent was India colliding with in the Miocene?
When Africa was colliding with Eurasia which seaway ceased to be during the Miocene?
Between what period of time did the Tethys disappear?
Which crisis occured towards the end of the Miocene period?
How long ago did the last glacial period end?
During what period did sea levels rice 115 feet?
By what height did sea levels rise at the end of the last glacial period?
Glaciars from what period depressed the height of northern lands by 591 feet?
What sea did the Hudson Bay used to be a part of?
What does the state want a police force to do?
What are gendarmerie?
What are police usually separate from?
How are police usually paid?
When were police used to protect the class system?
What kind of service are police?
What problem do many police forces have?
How are police usually paid?
What kind of service are police?
When were police used to protect the class system?
What problem do many police forces have?
Which Chinese kingdoms developed law enforcement?
What period was the Chu kingdom in?
What period was the Jin kingdom in?
Which countries adopted the 'prefecture system' from China?
What did ancient China call its police?
What war ended in 1479?
Who formed Spain's first national police force?
What was Spain's first national police force called, in Spanish?
What does Santa Hermandad mean?
When did Spain suppress local police units?
Who was Paris's first head of police?
How many commissioners worked under Reynie?
How many policing districts was Paris divided into?
When was Paris's police system expanded to the rest of France?
When were police inspectors added to Paris's police?
When did the French language adopt the word 'police'?
Which dictionary said police were 'a symbol of foreign oppression'?
What language did French borrow the word 'police' from?
When were the Marine Police created in the UK?
What was the first use of 'police' in the UK?
Which law established Glasgow's police?
When was Glasgow's police force established?
Which law established Ireland's police?
When was Ireland's police force established?
What was Ireland's police force called?
Who was the 'father of modern policing'?
Whose philosophy influenced Peel?
What political position did Bentham think police should have?
How did Peel standardize police?
How did Peel organize police?
When was the Metropolitan Police Act passed?
What did the Metropolitan Police Act say police were a subset of?
Where was the 'Continental model' of police from?
What part of the government did French police work under?
When did Canada get its first police?
What was Canada's first police force?
When was the Toronto police created?
When was the Montreal police created?
When were the first Mounties created?
What were the Old West's local police options?
Which military branch helped the Old West's inadequate local police?
Which military branch did the Pinkertons exceed at their height?
Which private contractor acted as police for businesses?
Who wrote 'Preventive Police'?
When was 'Preventive Police' published?
Where was 'Preventive Police' published?
What did Chadwick say police should be focused on?
What was the alternative to prevention?
What do some police departments make detectives go back to periodically?
Where do some think the most important police work happens?
How do patrol officers affect crime?
When did Nadelmann write about global policing?
When did Sheptycki write about global policing?
What terms have been used to describe policing beyond one country?
Where did Sheptycki study police cooperation?
When did Sheptycki write about police cooperation?
When did the Channel region establish routine cross-border policing?
When was the Schengen Treaty signed?
What did the Schengen Treaty do for policing?
Where has cross-border policing been most under-studied?
Who compared transnational police information and intelligence sharing practices?
What kind of policing has become common practice?
What problems did Sheptycki say 'organizational pathologies' have caused for police?
What paradox did Sheptycki point out?
Where has transnational policing become more important?
Who wrote about police development-aid in 2007?
What kind of countries get assistance with policing?
What concern did Hills raise about power imbalances?
What concern did Hills raise about police models?
Who wrote the Global Accountability Report for 2007?
Why is transnational policing so unaccountable?
How accountable is Interpol?
What is the least-accountable IGO?
What should non-lethal weapons properly be called?
What are common less-lethal weapons?
What is supposed to be the last resort for police?
What is South Africa's "shoot-to-kill" policy?
Where can police shoot fleeing convicts?
How do modern police often communicate?
Where do police have radios?
Why do police use radios?
What have computers in police cars enabled for investigation?
What have computers in police cars enabled for reporting?
When do police often use unmarked cars?
What use of unmarked cars is controversial?
Why did New York State ban unmarked cars for traffic cops?
When did New York State ban unmarked cars for traffic cops?
Why do some cops use bicycles to patrol?
How do bicycles help catch some suspects?
What do police use to control motorcyclist events?
Who was O.W. Wilson a student of?
Who introduced education requirements for US police?
Why did Wilson rotate officers between communities?
Where did Wilson reduce police corruption?
How did Wilson recruit more qualified police?
What does Miranda provide?
What does the 5th Amendment protect against?
Which amendment prevents self-incrimination?
When was the Terry v. Ohio case?
Which two parts did Terry v. Ohio divide seizure into?
What is an investigatory stop's search limited to?
What is the legal status of UK police officers?
What can only Inspector-ranked UK officers do?
What can only Superintendent-ranked UK officers do?
What powers of a new UK police officer are the same as a Commissioner's?
Why do some police acts limit when police can interfere without court orders?
What could be impeded without police interference?
How could police help the owner when a restaurant guest doesn't pay because their wallet got stolen?
What plain is Punjab in?
What are the Indus River's tributaries?
How much of Pakistan's large-scale manufacturing is in Punjab?
How much of Pakistan's small-scale manufacturing is in Punjab?
What crops does Punjab grow?
How large is Punjab compared to the other three provinces?
What is Pakistan's largest province?
How many square miles is Punjab?
What Indian states are on the east side of Punjab, Pakistan?
What Pakistani province is south of Punjab?
Which province in Pakistan borders the other 3 provinces?
What is Pakistan's capital?
How many rivers are in Punjab, Pakistan?
What is the easternmost river in Punjab?
How much of Pakistan's population lives in Punjab?
How many departments does the Punjab administration have?
Who heads each government department?
Who do the Provincial Ministers report to?
Who do the Provincial Secretaries report to?
What rank is the Chief Secretary?
What was Punjab formerly known as?
What ancient civilization lived in Punjab?
When was Punjab part of the Indus Valley Civilization?
What was the major Indus city in Punjab?
What were bricks taken from Harrapa for the construction of?
Who has invaded Punjab?
Who founded Taxila?
What is said to be the world's oldest university?
Who was Chanakya?
What empire was Taxila a center of learning of?
Where did Alexander the Great conquer in 10 days?
From which direction did Alexander enter Punjab?
What wealth did Alexander hope to find?
Who were the Aspii?
Who were the Cathians?
What religion did Punjab become?
What did missionary Muslims build in Punjab?
Who led the Umayyad army?
Where did the Umayyads conquer?
Who did the Umayyads defeat?
Who was Raghunath Rao?
Who did Rao conquer in 1758?
When was the Third Battle of Panipat?
Who ruled most of the eastern part of Peshawar?
Who captured part of the Maratha Empire in 1761?
When did Sikhism begin?
In which empire did many Hindus become Sikhs?
When did Ahmad fight at Akora Khattak?
When did Ahmad fight at Balakot?
Who won at Balakot?
When did Ranjit Singh die?
What did Ranjit Singh's death cause?
When was part of Punjab annexed into British India?
When was the Second Anglo-Sikh War?
What was the last territory added to British India?
When did India and Pakistan fight in Punjab?
What is Kahuta an important location for?
Where does Punjab have major military bases?
When did India and Pakistan begin serious peace talks?
Who visits Nankana Sahib?
Who elects the Chief Minister?
In what year did Sharif become CM?
When was Sharif re-elected CM?
What kind of legislature is the Provincial Assembly?
How many seats are in the Provincial Assembly?
What geographic feature does Punjab not have?
What medical product does Punjab manufacture?
What transportation products does Punjab manufacture?
How much of Pakistan's paper products does Punjab manufacture?
How much of Pakistan's sugar does Punjab manufacture?
What kind of climate does Punjab have?
Who built Punjab's irrigation system?
What are Punjab's largest crops?
What are Punjab's secondary crops?
What calendar do Punjab's farmers use?
What kind of inscriptions decorate Punjab's burial places?
When did Rukn-e-Alam die?
When did Gardezi die?
When was Ahangar's tomb built?
What color tile was used in Ahangar's tomb?
What are urs?
When are urs held?
What genre of music is played at urs?
Where is Buksh's shrine?
Where is Zakria's shrine?
What is Punjab's biggest festival?
Where is the national horse and cattle show held?
What happens at the national horse and cattle show?
What famous tomb is in Lahore?
Where was Nanak born?
Who was the first Sikh Guru?
What famous hill stations are in Punjab?
What famous mosque is in Punjab?
Who are some well-known Punjab poets?
What is Allah Ditta Lona Wala's career?
Who is the 'Queen of Music'?
When was Alam Lohar an important Punjabi folk singer?
What kind of music does Malika Pukhraj perform?
What do Punjab folk songs often reflect?
Who sings about the joy of living?
What does Heer Ranjha sing about?
What kind of music does Roshen Ara Begum perform?
Of the huge amount of microorganisms, how many cause disease in otherwise healthy individuals?
Interplay between pathogens and defenses of hosts results in what?
What does the severity of a disease resulting from a pathogen depend on?
What can a host's immune system do to a host?
What do clinicians classify infectious microorganisms according to the status of?
What is one way of proving that a given disease is infectious?
What must an infectious agent only be identified in to satisfy the first of Koch's postulates?
What is Koch's second postulate?
Why can't Koch's postulates be applied ethically for many human diseases?
What is the causative spirochete of syphilis? 
When are infectious diseases called contagious diseases? 
What is a contagious disease a subset of?
What sets a contagious disease after from a standard infectious disease?
Diseases with vector transmission or sexual transmission don't often require what type of isolation?
What is not always respected in popular use?
When does infection begin?
What group is not easily infected?
What group of humans have increased susceptibility to chronic or persistent infections?
What individuals are particularly susceptible to opportunistic infections?
What is it called when a pathogen grows within the host cells?
What does wound colonization refer to?
What type of organisms exist and injure tissue in infected wounds?
What are all multcellular organisms colonized to some degree by?
What's the difference between an infection and a colonization?
What species colonizes the mammalian colon?
Why is it difficult to now which chronic wounds are infected?
What is there limited quality data for evaluating despite the huge number of wounds seen in a clinical practice?
What is increased pain an indicator of?
What does not rule out infection?
Why do persistent infections occur?
What are persistent infections characterized by the continual presence of?
How can some viruses main a persistent infection?
What never leave the body when acquired?
Where does the herpes virus hide?
What does diagnosis of an infectious sometimes involve identifying? 
Many minor infectious diseases are diagnosed by what type of presentation?
How are minor infectious diseases treated?
What can be identified given sufficient effort?
Why is it often not worth bothering to identify an infectious agent?
How is diagnosis of infectious disease almost always initiated?
What does taking a culture of an infectious agent isolated from a patient allow?
What features of an infectious organism does a culture allow examining?
What can organisms be directly identified by?
What technique can be used to produce images of internal abnormalities?
What type of culture is a principal tool used to diagnose infectious disease?
What type of medium is provided for a specific agent in a microbial culture?
What are most pathogenic bacteria easily grown on?
What is it called when a visible mound forms on the surface of a plate?
What is a region of dead cells resulting from viral growth called?
What are live animals required by?
What can Mycobacterium leprae and Treponema pallidum be grown in?
What type of eggs may some viruses be grown in?
What is Xenodiagnosis?
What is it difficult to demonstrate the presence of in Chagas disease?
What is microscopy used for?
What do virtually all culture techniques rely on at some point?
What can samples obtained from patients viewed directly under?
When is microscopy exquisitely specific?
What can antibodies with artificial fluorescence be directed to do? 
What do almost all cells readily stain with?
Why do cells easily stain with dyes?
What electronic charge do cellular molecules have?
What is Geimsa stain?
How many methods comprise standard approaches used to classify bacteria and diagnose disease?
What needs to be isolated from infected tissue to provide a biochemical diagnosis of an infectious disease?
What enzyme's presence is characteristic of specific types of viral infections?
What does the protein hemagglutinin bind together?
Why are the presence of certain enymzes a tell tale sign of a virus?
What methods are highly sensitive, specifc and rapid tests used to identify microorganisms?
What are serological tests based upon the ability of an antibody to do?
What is the antigen bound to by the antibody usually?
What does the binding set off that will result in something visibly obvious in various ways?
What is the causative agent of "strep throat"?
What does the acronym PCR expand to?
What will be the ubiquitous gold standards of diagnostics in the near future?
What has the catalog of infectious agents grown to the point of?
What must an infectious agent do to cause disease?
What are primers derived from the genomes of?
What technological ability with regards to detection is currently available? 
What are the remaining blockades to the use or PCR as a standard tool of diagnosis?
What are some diseases which won't benefit from PCR methods?
PCR can't detect the presence of any bacteria when what doesn't occur?
What is used in the treatment of AIDS?
How was the course of AIDS followed?
What could be done by understanding how the disease was transmitted?
What did the genotypic identification of HIV later enable?
What is now commonly used to identify HIV in healthy people before the onset of the illnes?
What can wearing gowns and face masks help prevent?
What is the most important defense against the spread of unwanted organisms?
Avoiding drugs and using condoms are other forms of what?
Why is it important to cook foods well?
What should one do with foods that have been left outside for a long time?
Recognizing the different characteristics of various diseases is one way to do what?
What are some critical disease characteristics that should be evaluated?
What virus' strains incapacitate their victims extremely quickly before killing them?
Why is the initial stage of Ebola not very contagious?
What does the low virulence of HIV allow victims to do?
Recognizing the effects of small-world networks allows one to decrease what?
What type of interactions happen within groups of infected individuals in epidemics?
What is a way of drastically reducing infection rates?
What is an example of a success implementation of preventing transmission jumps?
When was vaccination used to prevent the spread of the foot-and-mouth virus?
What is resistance to infection known technically as?
When may immunity be acquired?
What is knowledge of protective antigens more complete for?
What does herd immunity offer to vulnerable people when a large enough proportion of the population has acquired immunity?
Vaccination is a way in which what may be acquired?
What can the clearance of pathogens be influenced by in an individual?
What is the brand name Pegasys for?
What are patients carrying certain genetic variant alleles near the IL28B gene more likely to achieve?
What type of drugs can suppress an infection when it attacks the body?
How many broad types of anti-infective drugs exist?
What depends on the method an antibiotic is given?
How are severe infections of the brain usually treated?
How do antibiotics work?
What are the top three killer diseases?
How much have deaths due to HIV/AIDS increased?
What are some popular childhood diseases?
Who makes up a large percentage of diarrheal deaths?
What is the number 4 leading cause of death in the world?
What medical field does the treatment of infectious diseases fall into?
Disease propagation can fall under the purview of what field of study?
Who tends to initially diagnose an infection?
What is the non-medical mumbo jumbo term for pulmonologist?
Who works with both patients and general practitioners to identify a disease?
What have a number of studies found a correlation between?
What is higher pathogen load associated with?
What does avoidance of other groups reduce?
What does more restricted sexual behavior result in?
What profession finds evidence of infection in fossil remains to be interesting?
What do paleopathologists study?
What has been discovered in the bones of carnivorous dinosaurs?
What dinosaur's skull had pit-like wounds surrounded by swollen and porous bone?
How did tyrannosaurs become infected?
What is the practice of killing or trapping any animal?
Why do humans most commonly hunt wildlife?
What is there a distinction between lawful hunting and?
What is poaching?
What is the species which is hunted referred to as?
What is the practice of killing or trapping any animal called?
When was lawful hunting distinguished from poaching?
Illegally killing, capturing or trapping an hunted species is called what?
Hunted species are usually referred to as what?
What animals are usually hunted?
What is it called to kill or trap an animal?
What species are usually hunted?
Why do humans hunt?
When was lawful hunting distinguished from poaching?
Species hunted are referred to as what? 
What does evidence suggest hunting may have been a factor in the extinction of?
What was the North American megafauna extinction coincidental with?
What are humans thought to have played a significant role in, in Australia?
When was Australian's megafauna widespread?
What along with multiple environmental factors led to the extinction of the holocene megafauna?
What replaced the holocene megafauna?
What event was coincidental with the North American megafauna extinction? 
What is thought to have played a significant role in the extinction of the Australian megafauna?
What is undisputed about early humans?
Hunting was important for the emergence of the Homo genus from what?
Production of stone tools and control of fire were also pushed forward by what?
What became a theme of stories and myths?
Hunting allowed what type of rituals?
What is undisputed about earlier humans?
What did hunting become a theme of?
Stone tools and control of fire are emphasised in what hypothesis? 
What is Louis Binford's profession?
What idea did Binford take issue with?
What did Binford conclude humans were instead of hunters?
What idea did Blumenschine propose?
What does confrontational scavenging involve doing to other predators after they've made a kill?
Who is the archaeologist that does not believe early humans were hunters?
Louis Binford concluded what based on skeletal remains of consumed animals?
What did Robert Blumenschine propose?
Louis Binford's idea is popular among whom?
Confrontational scavenging involves doing what to other predators?
What was a significant contributor to the human food supply?
What did the supplementary meat from hunting include?
What was the leather from hunting used for?
Rocks and spears are examples of some of man's earliest what?
Where is hunting still vital?
Hunt was a significant contributor to what?
Where is hunting still vital?
Why is hunting still vital in marginal climates?
How are the skins of sea mammals useful for people in the Arctic trap?
What are kings often depicted as on ancient reliefs?
What are the kings portrayed as hunting?
How was the cultural importance of hunting in ancient societies represented?
What could the mythological association of prey species with divinity be a form of?
What might the meaning of Euripides' tale be seen as a caution against?
Kings were depicted as hunting what big game from a chariot?
What is often related to hunting?
Deities represent what importance?
What tale is seen as cautions against disrespecting prey or impudent boasting?
Who in medieval Europe obtained the sole rights to hunt in certain areas of a feudal territory?
What was game in the  areas used by the upper class used as a source of?
What legends show the importance of the proprietary view of game as held by the nobles?
What is one of the primary charges against the outlaws in the legend?
Who in medieval Europe obtained the sole rights to hunt in certain areas of a feudal territory?
What did Anglophone settles take gloried pride in?
What was game in the  areas used by the upper class used as a source of?
What legends show the importance of the proprietary view of game as held by the nobles?
What is one of the primary charges against the outlaws in the legend?
What did Anglophone settles take gloried pride in?
In medieval Europe who obtained sole rights to hunt in certain areas?
What was the game in feudal territory was used as?
Who provided the game obtained in feudal territory?
The importance of can be seen in what legends?
Who did Anglophone colonies democratically glorify hunting for?
What kind of occupation do Hindu scriptures describe hunting as being?
What is one of the names of the god Shiva?
What is the translation of Mrigavyadha?
What does Shiva destroy in human beings?
What talent does Dasharatha have?
What scriptures describe hunting as and acceptable occupation?
Godly figures have engaged in what activity?
Mrigavyadha means what?
Mrigavyadha destroys animal instinct in who?
What happened after Krishna was accidentally wounded by an arrow of a hunter?
Who has hunting been forbidden to since early Christian times?
Who forbid to all servants of God hunting?
What pope was the Fourth Council of the Lateran held under?
What does the decree of the Council of Trent imply?
What type of hunting is unlawful?
Who was forbidden to hunt in early Christian time?
What forbid hunting in the woods with hounds and keeping hawks or falcons?
Who held the Fourth Council of the Lateran?
How is the the decree of the Council of Trent is worded?
Who stated quiet hunting is allowed?
What does New Zealand have?
What was the only land mammal native to New Zealand?
Why were game animals introduced by acclimatisation societies?
Why did the population of pigs and rabbits explode in New Zealand?
What do government agencies view the animals as?
What country has a strong hunting culture?
What were the the only land mammal in New Zealand?
What is New Zealand made up of?
Game animals were introduced here by whom?
What resulted having no natural predators for the animals introduced?
What was hunting regarded as in British India?
What does the Indian word "shikaris" mean in English?
What did British officers maintain whole corps of?
Why did the regals recruit low-ranking local tribes when hunting?
What could a Bengal tiger be hunted from the back of?
Where was hunting reguarded as a regal sport?
What is hunted from the back of an elephant?
Who did British officers maintain?
Who were the shikaris headed by?
Why were low-ranking local tribes recruited?
What norms are generally antagonistic to hunting?
What sect lays special emphasis on conservation of particular species?
What bans the killing of all wild animals in India?
Who may permit a person to hunt animals in India despite it being banned?
Whose property does the body of any wild animal killed or wounded become?
Who lay special emphasis on conservation of particular species?
What bans the killing of all wild animals?
What year was this protection act put into place?
Who can permit a person to hunt wild animals?
What happens to the body of the wild animal killed?
What type of hunting is most closely associated with the UK?
How do the English hunt foxes?
In England, what is hunted when "shooting" is called for?
Why were foxes originally hunted?
How is deer stalking with rifles carried out?
What hunting is done on horseback with hounds?
Hunting horseback with hound is associated with whom?
In Victorian times a popular social activity was?
What is carried out on foot without hounds?
Hounds were used for what purpose?
What law primarily regulates hunting?
What additional type of law applies in the case of migratory birds and endangered species?
What varies widely from state to state?
What do some states make a distinction between?
What do hunters of protected species require in all states?
How is hunting regulated?
Migratory birds and endangered species are protected by what law?
What hunters require a hunting license in all states?
What is sometimes a prerequisite of obtaining a hunting license?
What is required when hunting big game?
Tags are purchased in addition to what?
What is typically limited to an individual?
A wildlife management unit is a place where what may be restricted to?
What kind of stamp is required to hunt migratory waterfowl?
When hunting big game what is typically required?
What must be purchased with hunting license is comes in a limited number?
How are tags assigned if there are more hunters than game?
What is required of hunting migratory waterfowl?
Who issues requirement for hunting migratory waterfowl?
How is gun usage typically regulated?
What often specify a minimum caliber or muzzle energy for firearms?
Why is the use of rifles often banned?
Why may regulations ban the use of lead in ammunition?
Why are specific seasons for bow hunting established?
Why are the use of rifles banned?
How is gun useage regulated?
What is specified in big-game hunting?
When do hunting regulations date from in the US?
What do some modern hunters see themselves as?
What organizations provide hunter education and help protect the future of the sport?
Ducks Unlimited and the Delta Waterfowl are examples of groups representing what?
What do many hunting groups participate in doing at the federal and state level?
What do modern hunters see themselves as?
Who provides hunter education?
What do hunting groups also participate in?
What century is U.S. regulations dates from?
How much money is distributed to state agencies to support wildlife management programs each year?
How much money has the sale of Federal Duck Stamps raised since 1934?
How many acres can the money raised from the sale of federal duck stamps help purchase?
What do states use some of the money from hunting licenses to assist with?
What is a key task of state park rangers and game wardens?
Who are federal excise taxes are distributed to?
What do the taxes support?
How much has Federal Duck Stamps raised?
What does land has Federal Duck Stamp money helped purchase?
Park rangers and game wardens enforce laws and regulations related to what?
What is varmint hunting an American phrase for?
What does varmint hunting achieve? 
What detrimental effects are varmint species often responsible for visiting on?
Where has a non-native rodent known as a nutria become very destructive?
What has the state of Louisiana done to combat the nutria?
What is phrased for selective killing of non-game animals.
What was once considered a varmint but is now protected?
What is the non-native varmint of Louisiana?
What did Louisiana initiate to control the varmint population?
When was internet hunting introduced?
How did Internet hunting allow people to hunt?
Who criticized the practice of Internet hunting?
What did hunters feel hunting over the Internet violated?
What has the NRA always maintained that being in the field with your firearm is?
What allows people to hunt over the internet?
When was this type of hunting introduced?
How is this type of hunting done?
What was the principle was this type of hunting said to violate?
Who spoke on this violation?
Approximately how many sport hunters applied for hunting licences in recent years?
Where is there a very active tradition of hunting of small to medium-sized wild game?
What is there a very lucrative and thriving black market for?
What is hunting pressure from?
What very active tradition Trinidad and Tabago have?
What animal aids in the hunting?
What population has extirpated?
What do hunters pay to obtain hunting license?
What does hunting give resource managers an important tool?
What is carrying capacity in most circumstances determined by?
What do some environmentalists assert reintroducing predators would achieve?
How is hunting an important tool for resource managers?
What happens if a population exceeds the carrying capacity of their habitat?
How can hunting actually increase the population of predators?
What do some hunting advocates assert that is indirectly reduced among animals when intraspecific competition has been reduced?
What would environmentalists have done, instead of hunting?
What is an important tool in managing populations?
What is carrying capacity determined by?
What can it increase the population of?
What Continent did the biological Conservation state trophy hunting is of major importance to the conservation of?
What does hunting create economic incentives for?
What did another study show that less than 3% of reached the local level?
What type of studies does the Biological Conservation journal publish?
Why is trophy hunting important to conservation in Africa?
Trophy hunting can include areas which would likely be unsuitable for what other types of ecotourism?
How much of a trophy hunters' expenditures actually reach the local level, according to another study?
What thus is the level of economic incentive and benefit?
What is of major importance in Africa?
What does trophy hunting create in Africa?
How much of trophy hunters expenditures actually reach the local level?
What do a variety of industries benefit from?
Where is it estimated that a hunter spends fifty to one hundred times that of the average ecotourist?
Where does the average safari hunter stay in?
Advocates argue these hunters allow for what type of activities? 
What do a variety of industries obtain benefit from?
In what country is it estimated that a safari hunter spends fifty to one hundred times what an average ecotourist does?
What type of accommodations does the average photographer touring Tanzania seek?
Where does the typical safari hunter hang his hat at night?
Where can safari hunters go which are uninviting to the less hardcore ecotourist?
How much does a safari hunter spend compared to an average ecotourist?
What does the photo tourist seek?
Where does a safari hunter usually stay?
What hunters allow for anti-poaching activities?
Hunting has significant financial impact in what country?
What do many companies specialize in apropos to hunting?
"There's an app for that!",  what have been different technologies been created to do?
What broad range of backgrounds do today's hunters come from?
How much money did the thirteen million hunters spend on their sport in 2001?
What type of financial impact does hunting have on the U.S.?
What has been developed in the U.S. to help hunters?
One technology that is available for hunters in the U.S. is?
How much did hunters spend in 2001?
What do the proceeds from hunting assist with?
What has excessive hunting contributed heavily to?
What do Steller's sea cow, the bluebuck, and the Javan tigers all have in common?
Why have poachers killed endangered animals?
How have the North American cougar and Asian elephant been hunted?
How is excessive hunting related to the extinction of species?
What contributes to endangerment?
What have poachers contributed to hunting?
Who signed the Migratory Bird Hunting Stamp Act?
When did Roosevelt sign the Migratory Bird Hunting Stamp Act?
What does the Act require all hunters over the age of sixteen to do?
What do 98% of all the funds generated by the stamp sales go to?
How much of the nation's endangered species is it estimated benefits from the protection afford by the Duck Stamp funds?
What act was signed in 1934?
What President signed this act?
What is the requirement of the act?
What do the stamps depict?
What percentage of the endangered species seek food and shelter in areas protected using Duck Stamp Funds.
How much money has the sale of Federal Duck Stamps generated since 1934?
How many acres has the sale of Federal Duck Stamps helped to purchase or lease since 1934?
What do the stamps give the purchaser a license to do?
Who accounts for eighty-seven percent of the sale of duck stamps?
Who manages the distribution of the funds obtained by the sale of the stamps?
How much money has been generated due to the Duck Stamp act?
How much land has the Duck Stamp Act help purchase?
What do the Duck Stamps serve as?
What percent of sales are contributed by hunters?
Who manages distribution of funds?
What type of creature is the American bison?
What did the American bison inhabit much of prior to the 1800s?
What did market hunters leave the parts of the bison they didn't need to do?
What was the population of bison herds around prior to being eliminated by thousands of market hunters?
What is the current status of bison?
What did large herds of bison attract?
What part of North America did the bison live?
Why were the bison killed?
What did hunter do with the rest of the bison?
What do bison still remain?
Why has Botswana been forced to ban trophy hunting altogether?
What plummeting numbers of this species caused a decline in predator numbers?
What species saw its numbers rising while elephant numbers remained stable?
What factors other than trophy hunting are responsible for the decline of wildlife in Botswana?
What other African country has also recently banned trophy hunting?
What Botswana was resently forced to do?
What animal declined across Botswana?
What animal numbers have increased in Botswana?
What animal numbers remain stable in Botswana?
What else is partly to blame for the declining number of animals in Botswana and Uganda? 
About how long has Kathmandu existed?
What suggests that Kathmandu is as old as it is?
What is Kathmandu's majority religion?
What do most Kathmandu residents speak?
What secondary language do educated people in Kathmandu speak?
According to legend, what body of water once existed on the site of Kathmandu?
What animals notably resided in Nagdaha?
Who was the founder of Manjupattan?
What type of creature was Banasur?
Who was Banasur's murderer?
Who was the founder of the Kirata dynasty?
What geographical part of Kathmandu did Yambu once occupy?
Speakers of what languages sometimes call Kathmandu Yambu?
Where in Kathmandu was Yengal located?
What religion did the Sankhu monastery belong to?
Who won the war between the Licchavis and the Kiratas?
Who did the migrating Shakyas pretend to be?
What sect of Buddhism is the only remaining one based in Sanskrit?
Who killed the Shakyas?
Under the Licchavi dynasty, what name was typically used to refer to Yengal?
Who ruled Nepal after the Licchavi?
Along with Khas, who attacked Nepal in the early Malla period?
What fraction of Kathmandu's population died in an ancient earthquake?
Along with the Mangriha, what Licchavi-era building was destroyed in an ancient earthquake?
What notable Nepali figure died in a Kathmandu earthquake?
How many cities were present in the Kathmandu Valley in the late Malla period?
In the waning years of the Malla dynasty, what fortified cities existed in the Kathmandu Valley?
What cultures influenced Nepal in the later Malla era?
What is an example of a book of medicine from the Malla period?
When does Amarkosh date to?
Who won the Battle of Kathmandu?
What battle inaugurated the conquering of the Kathmandu Valley by the Gorkha?
How many stories high was the Basantapur tower?
What European country did Bhimsen Thapa oppose?
How many stories made up the Dharahara tower?
What river is south of Kathmandu?
What geographic portion of the Kathmandu Valley houses Kathmandu?
About how many feet above sea level is Kathmandu?
How large is Kathmandu in terms of square miles?
Where does the Lalitpur Sub-Metropolitan City stand in relation to the Bagmati River?
How many districts make up the Kathmandu Valley urban area?
What are Madhyapur Thimi, Kirtipur and Bhaktapur?
How many sub-metropolitan cities are present in the districts that make up the Kathmandu valley?
About how many people live in a square kilometer in Gonggabu VDC?
What is another term for VDCs?
What religion proliferated throughout Central Asia in part due to the efforts of Lhasa Newar merchants?
Existing between what two countries contributed to Kathmandu becoming a center of trade?
Other than trade, what was the traditional basis of Kathmandu's economy?
Approximately what portion of Nepal's GDP is produced by the Kathmandu metropolitan area?
What do Kathmandu residents earn per capita each year?
What is the GDP of Kathmandu?
What percentage of Kathmandu's economy is trade?
What portion of Kathmandu's economy consists of agriculture?
Approximately when did the Nepalese tourism industry begin?
What city was connected to Kathmandu via the Tribhuvan Highway?
When did construction on the Tribhuvan Highway begin?
What is the most significant industry in Nepal?
Along with Buddhists, what religion's devotees visit Kathmandu?
How many tourists visited Kathmandu in the period 1961-62?
What event led to an increase in tourism in 2009?
What Nepalese mountains are claimed to attract tourists?
What Kathmandu neighborhood is noted for its abundance of tourists?
What neighborhood is also known as Jhamel?
What is the traditional name for Freak Street?
What tourists first brought attention to Jhocchen Tol?
How many stars is Kathmandu's Grand Hotel?
What type of hotel is Aloha Inn?
De L'Annapurna is an example of what sort of hotel?
What attractions are present at Hotel Yak & Yeti and the Hyatt Regency?
How many sectors make up the Kathmandu metropolitan area?
What sector of Kathmandu doesn't have the word 'sector' in its name?
What is the purpose of Kathmandu being divided into 35 wards?
How many members of the Council received their positions via nomination rather than election?
How many hectares in size is Kathmandu's ward 26?
What is Kathmandu's fire department called?
What year saw the founding of Kathmandu's fire department?
When did Bhaktapur receive coverage from the fire department?
How many fire trucks did West Germany donate to Kathmandu?
What is the mission of FAN?
What was the population of Kathmandu in 1991?
About how many people are likely to live in Kathmandu in 2021?
How dense was the population of Kathmandu in 1991?
How many acres of land did the KMC control in 2001?
What percentage of Kathmandu residents are Chettris?
What is the third largest ethnic group in Kathmandu?
What are Kathmandu's primary religions?
What Kathmandu industry is particularly known for its English speakers?
Along with Nepali, what is Kathmandu's main language?
What religion does Changunarayan belong to?
What Buddhist monuments are present at Boudhanath?
How many acres are the Kathmandu valley monument zones?
In hectares, how large is the Kathmandu valley monument buffer zone?
When did the Kathmandu valley monuments receive WHS status?
Where is a Durban Square located that is not preserved?
What is the oldest dynasty to be represented with buildings in Kathmandu's Durbar Square?
How many temples are present in Kathmandu's Durbar Square?
When did a notable earthquake occur that damaged Kathmandu's Durbar Square?
How many kingdoms have buildings present in the Durbar Square of Kathmandu?
What is Durga called in Nepali?
How long is Kumari believed to incarnate Taleju?
Who was the Royal Kumari as of late 2008?
What type of government did Nepal have after the monarchy?
When was the Pashupatinath Temple built?
What faith does the Pashupatinath Temple serve?
What is another name for Pashupati?
Prior to the secularization of Nepal, who was the country's national god?
Who damaged the Pashupatinath Temple in the 14th century?
What people make up the majority of Pashupatinath followers?
In what part of India do the Pashupatinath priests originate?
What dynasty did Yaksha Malla belong to?
Who supposedly encouraged the usage of Karnataka Brahmin priests at Pashupatinath Temple?
What is another term for Bharatam?
Who is pictured on the stupa's base?
What is Ajima the deity of?
What are gompas?
Visitors from what faith routinely visit the stupa?
What mantra is engraved on the stupa's prayer wheels?
In what part of Kathmandu is Swayambhu located?
What faith does Swayambhu belong to?
Other than Buddhists, who worships at Swayambhu?
In how many directions does the Buddha of Swayambhu look?
In Swayambhu, what is present in the small area above the tiers?
Kathmandu valley contains art made of metal, terracotta, wood and what other substance?
What is the most typical type of art in the Kathmandu valley?
In what year could Nepal be said to have been discovered by the outside world?
What types of deities are Bhavani and Durga?
What is Sri-Lakshmi a deity of?
By tradition, what notable figure came to Nepal 250 years before the birth of Christ?
When did the Licchavi period end?
What is another name for the Licchavi period?
Along with the National Museum of Nepal, what notable Nepalese museum is present in Kathmandu?
From what time period are the oldest artifacts in Kathmandu museums?
Along with Buddhism, what religion has had a significant influence on Nepal?
What Kathmandu valley area was named a World Heritage Site by UNESCO?
How many Monument Zones are present in the Kathmandu valley?
Where in Kathmandu is Narayanhity Palace Museum located?
In what year was Narayanhity constructed?
Whose marriage led to the construction of Narayanhity?
How many acres is the Narayanhity Palace?
What god is Narayana?
What is the Taragaon Museum dedicated to?
Who is the designer of the Taragaon Museum?
In what year was the Taragaon Museum built?
What stupa is located close to the Taragaon Museum?
What was the Taragaon Museum prior to being a museum?
Contemporary Kathmandu art combines traditional influences with what type of art?
How many types are Nepali works of art typically divided into?
What do the Tibetans call traditional idealistic paintings?
What UK charity works on behalf of Kathmandu art?
What do the Nepalese call Thangkas?
Where can one find the Srijana Contemporary Art Gallery?
The Moti Azima Gallery contains objects that might be found in a Nepalese house of what time period?
What art gallery is located close to the Durbarmarg Royal Palace?
Where can the Nepal Art Council Gallery be found?
In which of Nepal's art galleries can one take an art class?
How many volumes are contained in Nepal's National Library?
Along with Hindi, Sanskrit, Nepali and English, the National Library contains books in what language?
What government department is located in the same building as the Kaiser Library?
How many volumes does the Kaiser Library contain?
Who did the Kaiser Library's books previously belong to?
Where can the National Dance Theatre be found in Kathmandu?
What year saw the beginning of the Aarohan Theater Group?
What gathering is the work of the Gurukul School of Theatre?
Who constructed the theater in Hanumandhoka Durbar Square?
What meat is very rarely eaten in Kathmandu?
What animal does buff come from?
What people are particularly known for eating buff?
What cuisine notably makes use of pork?
What do Kathmandu residents typically eat for breakfast?
How many restaurants in the western style were present in Kathmandu circa 1955?
What chain restaurants are present in Kathmandu?
How is the egg in American chop suey prepared?
Along with locals and tourists, who eats at Kathmandu's restaurants?
Along with Nepali, Indian and Chinese cuisines, what cuisine has been a focus of Kathmandu restaurants?
What beverage is consumed by more people in Kathmandu, coffee or tea?
How might a western traveler find the tea served in Kathmandu?
What is used to make thwon?
What are bhattis?
What goes through a fermentation process to create tongba?
To what era do a majority of Kathmandu's festivals date back to?
Before the modern era, who mostly celebrated Kathmandu festivals?
In what direction out of Kathmandu did the Khas originate from?
What does Ghode mean?
In relation to Kathmandu, where do the Tibetans hale?
In addition to Hindus, who regards the Bagmati River as sacred?
What is done with Hindus after they die?
What are done with the bodies of Kirants after death?
In a Hindu funeral, who is typically the main mourner?
Before Hindus are cremated, how many times are their bodies placed in the Bagmati?
In what century was Bhrikuti said to live?
When did Araniko die?
What religion did Araniko help to evangelize?
How many Newar Buddhist monasteries are present in Kathmandu?
Approximately how many monasteries in the Kathmandu area are run by Tibetan Buddhists?
What type of religion is Kirant Mundhum?
Who follows the Kirant Mudhum faith?
Who worshipped at Wanga Akash Bhairabh in ancient times?
What is another name for ancestor worship?
Where can a temple of the Jain faith be found?
Kathmandu valley is home to about how many Baha'i?
Where is the Baha'i national office located in Nepal?
About what percentage of the Nepali population follows Islam?
About how many Christian houses of worship exist in Kathmandu?
Of what university is the Institute of Medicine a constituent college?
In what part of Kathmandu is the Institute of Medicine found?
When did the Institute of Medicine begin to offer education in medicine?
What does KUSMS stand for?
What institution of tertiary education is known as NAMS?
Along with cricket, what sport is highly popular among Nepali youth?
What body oversees soccer in Nepal?
How many people can fit in Dasarath Rangasala Stadium?
In what part of Kathmandu is Dasarath Rangasala Stadium located?
Who assisted Nepal in renovating Dasarath Rangasala Stadium?
What is Nepal's primary airport for international travel?
Starting in the center of Kathmandu, how many kilometers must one travel to reach Tribhuvan International Airport?
How many airlines use Tribhuvan International for international flights?
From what city does Arkefly offer nonstop flights to Kathmandu?
Who operates flights between Kathmandu and Istanbul?
In what US state did Kathmandu first establish an international relationship?
What was Yangon previously known as?
With what Belorussian city does Kathmandu have a relationship?
In what year did Kathmandu create its initial international relationship?
What is KMC an initialism of?
